BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.311 and 2004 c 271 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nominating primaries for general elections to be held in November,
and the election of precinct committee officers, must be held on the
third Tuesday of the preceding ((September or on the seventh Tuesday
immediately preceding such general election, whichever occurs first))
August.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.04.321 and 2004 c 271 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All state, county, city, town, and district general elections
for the election of federal, state, legislative, judicial, county,
city, town, and district officers, and for the submission to the voters
of the state, county, city, town, or district of any measure for their
adoption and approval or rejection, shall be held on the first Tuesday
after the first Monday of November, in the year in which they may be
called. A statewide general election shall be held on the first
Tuesday after the first Monday of November of each year. However, the
statewide general election held in odd-numbered years shall be limited
to (a) city, town, and district general elections as provided for in
RCW 29A.04.330, or as otherwise provided by law; (b) the election of
federal officers for the remainder of any unexpired terms in the
membership of either branch of the Congress of the United States; (c)
the election of state and county officers for the remainder of any
unexpired terms of offices created by or whose duties are described in
Article II, section 15, Article III, sections 16, 17, 19, 20, 21, 22,
and 23, and Article IV, sections 3 and 5 of the state Constitution and
RCW 2.06.080; (d) the election of county officers in any county
governed by a charter containing provisions calling for general county
elections at this time; and (e) the approval or rejection of state
measures, including proposed constitutional amendments, matters
pertaining to any proposed constitutional convention, initiative
measures and referendum measures proposed by the electorate, referendum
bills, and any other matter provided by the legislature for submission
to the electorate.
(2) A county legislative authority may((, if it deems an emergency
to exist,)) call a special county election by presenting a resolution
to the county auditor ((at least forty-five days)) prior to the
proposed election date. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this
section, a special election called by the county legislative authority
shall be held on one of the following dates as decided by such
governing body:
(a) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;
(b) The second Tuesday in March;
(c) The fourth Tuesday in April;
(d) The third Tuesday in May;
(e) The day of the primary as specified by RCW 29A.04.311; or
(f) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) A resolution calling for a special election on a date set forth
in subsection (2)(a) through (d) of this section must be presented to
the county auditor at least fifty-two days prior to the election date.
A resolution calling for a special election on a date set forth in
subsection (2)(e) or (f) of this section must be presented to the
county auditor at least eighty-four days prior to the election date.
(4) In addition to the dates set forth in subsection (2)(a) through
(f) of this section, a special election to validate an excess levy or
bond issue may be called at any time to meet the needs resulting from
fire, flood, earthquake, or other act of God. Such county special
election shall be noticed and conducted in the manner provided by law.
(((4))) (5) In a presidential election year, if a presidential
preference primary is conducted in February, March, April, or May under
chapter 29A.56 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called
by the county legislative authority under subsection (2) of this
section during the month of that primary is the date of the
presidential primary.
(((5))) (6) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and
all other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having
different dates for such city, town, and district elections, the
purpose of this section being to establish mandatory dates for holding
elections except for those elections held pursuant to a home-rule
charter adopted under Article XI, section 4 of the state Constitution.
This section shall not be construed as fixing the time for holding
primary elections, or elections for the recall of any elective public
officer.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.04.330 and 2004 c 266 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All city, town, and district general elections shall be held
throughout the state of Washington on the first Tuesday following the
first Monday in November in the odd-numbered years.
This section shall not apply to:
(a) Elections for the recall of any elective public officer;
(b) Public utility districts, conservation districts, or district
elections at which the ownership of property within those districts is
a prerequisite to voting, all of which elections shall be held at the
times prescribed in the laws specifically applicable thereto;
(c) Consolidation proposals as provided for in RCW 28A.315.235 and
nonhigh capital fund aid proposals as provided for in chapter 28A.540
RCW.
(2) The county auditor, as ex officio supervisor of elections, upon
request in the form of a resolution of the governing body of a city,
town, or district, presented to the auditor ((at least forty-five
days)) prior to the proposed election date, may((, if the county
auditor deems an emergency to exist,)) call a special election in such
city, town, or district, and for the purpose of such special election
he or she may combine, unite, or divide precincts. Except as provided
in subsection (3) of this section, such a special election shall be
held on one of the following dates as decided by the governing body:
(a) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;
(b) The second Tuesday in March;
(c) The fourth Tuesday in April;
(d) The third Tuesday in May;
(e) The day of the primary election as specified by RCW
((29A.04.310)) 29A.04.311; or
(f) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) A resolution calling for a special election on a date set forth
in subsection (2)(a) through (d) of this section must be presented to
the county auditor at least fifty-two days prior to the election date.
A resolution calling for a special election on a date set forth in
subsection (2)(e) or (f) of this section must be presented to the
county auditor at least eighty-four days prior to the election date.
(4) In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference
primary is conducted in February, March, April, or May under chapter
29A.56 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called under
subsection (2) of this section during the month of that primary is the
date of the presidential primary.
(((4))) (5) In addition to subsection (2)(a) through (f) of this
section, a special election to validate an excess levy or bond issue
may be called at any time to meet the needs resulting from fire, flood,
earthquake, or other act of God, except that no special election may be
held between the first day for candidates to file for public office and
the last day to certify the returns of the general election other than
as provided in subsection (2)(e) and (f) of this section. Such special
election shall be conducted and notice thereof given in the manner
provided by law.
(((5))) (6) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and
all other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having
different dates for such city, town, and district elections, the
purpose of this section being to establish mandatory dates for holding
elections.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.20.121 and 2004 c 271 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any nomination of a candidate for partisan public office by
other than a major political party may be made only: (a) In a
convention held not earlier than the ((last Saturday in June)) first
Saturday in May and not later than the ((first)) second Saturday in
((July)) May or during any of the seven days immediately preceding the
first day for filing declarations of candidacy as fixed in accordance
with RCW 29A.28.041; (b) as provided by RCW 29A.60.021; or (c) as
otherwise provided in this section. Minor political party and
independent candidates may appear only on the general election ballot.
(2) Nominations of candidates for president and vice president of
the United States other than by a major political party may be made
either at a convention conducted under subsection (1) of this section,
or at a similar convention taking place not earlier than the first
((Sunday in July)) Saturday in June and not later than ((seventy days
before)) the ((general election)) fourth Saturday in July. Conventions
held during this time period may not nominate candidates for any public
office other than president and vice president of the United States,
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) If a special filing period for a partisan office is opened
under RCW 29A.24.211, candidates of minor political parties and
independent candidates may file for office during that special filing
period. The names of those candidates may not appear on the general
election ballot unless they are nominated by convention held no later
than five days after the close of the special filing period and a
certificate of nomination is filed with the filing officer no later
than three days after the convention. The requirements of RCW
29A.20.131 do not apply to such a convention.
(4) A minor political party may hold more than one convention but
in no case shall any such party nominate more than one candidate for
any one partisan public office or position. For the purpose of
nominating candidates for the offices of president and vice president,
United States senator, United States representative, or a statewide
office, a minor party or independent candidate holding multiple
conventions may add together the number of signatures of different
individuals from each convention obtained in support of the candidate
or candidates in order to obtain the number required by RCW 29A.20.141.
For all other offices for which nominations are made, signatures of the
requisite number of registered voters must be obtained at a single
convention.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.24.040 and 2003 c 111 s 604 are each amended to
read as follows:
A candidate may file his or her declaration of candidacy for an
office by electronic means on a system specifically designed and
authorized by a filing officer to accept filings.
(1) Filings that are received electronically must capture all
information specified in RCW ((29A.24.030)) 29A.24.031 (1) through (4).
(2) Electronic filing may begin at 9:00 a.m. the ((fourth)) first
Monday in ((July)) June and continue through 4:00 p.m. the following
Friday.
(3) In case of special filing periods established in this chapter,
electronic filings may be accepted beginning at 9:00 a.m. on the first
day of the special filing period through 4:00 p.m. the last day of the
special filing period.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.24.050 and 2003 c 111 s 605 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except where otherwise provided by this title, declarations of
candidacy for the following offices shall be filed during regular
business hours with the filing officer no earlier than the ((fourth))
first Monday in ((July)) June and no later than the following Friday in
the year in which the office is scheduled to be voted upon:
(1) Offices that are scheduled to be voted upon for full terms or
both full terms and short terms at, or in conjunction with, a state
general election; and
(2) Offices where a vacancy, other than a short term, exists that
has not been filled by election and for which an election to fill the
vacancy is required in conjunction with the next state general
election.
This section supersedes all other statutes that provide for a
different filing period for these offices.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.24.171 and 2004 c 271 s 165 are each amended to
read as follows:
Filings for a nonpartisan office shall be reopened for a period of
three normal business days, such three-day period to be fixed by the
election officer with whom such declarations of candidacy are filed and
notice thereof given by notifying press, radio, and television in the
county and by such other means as may now or hereafter be provided by
law whenever before the ((sixth)) eleventh Tuesday prior to a primary:
(1) A void in candidacy occurs;
(2) A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office leaving an unexpired
term to be filled by an election for which filings have not been held;
or
(3) A nominee for judge of the superior court entitled to a
certificate of election pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41
of the state Constitution, dies or is disqualified.
Candidacies validly filed within said three-day period shall appear
on the ballot as if made during the earlier filing period.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.24.181 and 2004 c 271 s 166 are each amended to
read as follows:
Filings for a nonpartisan office (other than judge of the supreme
court or superintendent of public instruction) shall be reopened for a
period of three normal business days, such three-day period to be fixed
by the election officer with whom such declarations of candidacy are
filed and notice thereof given by notifying press, radio, and
television in the county and by such other means as may now or
hereafter be provided by law, when:
(1) A void in candidacy for such nonpartisan office occurs on or
after the ((sixth)) eleventh Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to
the ((sixth)) eleventh Tuesday before an election; or
(2) A nominee for judge of the superior court eligible after a
contested primary for a certificate of election by Article 4, section
29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution, dies or is disqualified
within the ten-day period immediately following the last day allotted
for a candidate to withdraw; or
(3) A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office on or after the
((sixth)) eleventh Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the
((sixth)) eleventh Tuesday before an election leaving an unexpired term
to be filled by an election for which filings have not been held.
The candidate receiving a plurality of the votes cast for that
office in the general election shall be deemed elected.

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.24.191 and 2004 c 271 s 167 are each amended to
read as follows:
A scheduled election shall be lapsed, the office deemed stricken
from the ballot, no purported write-in votes counted, and no candidate
certified as elected, when:
(1) In an election for judge of the supreme court or superintendent
of public instruction, a void in candidacy occurs on or after the
((sixth)) eleventh Tuesday prior to a primary, public filings and the
primary being an indispensable phase of the election process for such
offices;
(2) Except as otherwise specified in RCW 29A.24.181, a nominee for
judge of the superior court entitled to a certificate of election
pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state
Constitution dies or is disqualified on or after the ((sixth)) eleventh
Tuesday prior to a primary;
(3) In other elections for nonpartisan office a void in candidacy
occurs or a vacancy occurs involving an unexpired term to be filled on
or after the ((sixth)) eleventh Tuesday prior to an election.

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.24.211 and 2004 c 271 s 116 are each amended to
read as follows:
Filings for a partisan elective office shall be opened for a period
of three normal business days whenever, on or after the first day of
the regular filing period and before the ((sixth)) eleventh Tuesday
prior to a primary, a vacancy occurs in that office, leaving an
unexpired term to be filled by an election for which filings have not
been held.
Any such special three-day filing period shall be fixed by the
election officer with whom declarations of candidacy for that office
are filed. The election officer shall give notice of the special
three-day filing period by notifying the press, radio, and television
in the county or counties involved, and by such other means as may be
required by law.
Candidacies validly filed within the special three-day filing
period shall appear on the ballot as if filed during the regular filing
period.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.28.021 and 2004 c 271 s 192 are each amended to
read as follows:
A vacancy caused by the death or disqualification of any candidate
or nominee of a major or minor political party may be filled at any
time up to and including the day prior to the election for that
position. For state partisan offices in any political subdivision
voted on solely by electors of a single county, an individual shall be
appointed to fill such vacancy by the county central committee in the
case of a major political party or by the state central committee or
comparable governing body in the case of a minor political party. For
other partisan offices, including federal or statewide offices, an
individual shall be appointed to fill such vacancy by the state central
committee or comparable governing body of the appropriate political
party.
If the vacancy occurs no later than the ((sixth)) eleventh Tuesday
prior to the state primary or general election concerned and the
ballots have been printed, it shall be mandatory that they be corrected
by the appropriate election officers. In making such correction, it
shall not be necessary to reprint complete ballots if any other less
expensive technique can be used and the resulting correction is
reasonably clear.
If the vacancy occurs after the ((sixth)) eleventh Tuesday prior to
the state primary or general election and time does not exist in which
to correct ballots (including absentee ballots), either in total or in
part, then the votes cast or recorded for the person who has died or
become disqualified shall be counted for the person who has been named
to fill such vacancy.
When the secretary of state is the person with whom the appointment
by the major or minor political party is filed, the secretary shall, in
certifying candidates or nominations to the various county officers
insert the name of the person appointed to fill a vacancy.
If the secretary of state has already sent forth the certificate
when the appointment to fill a vacancy is filed, the secretary shall
forthwith certify to the county auditors of the proper counties the
name and place of residence of the person appointed to fill a vacancy,
the office for which the person is a candidate or nominee, the party
the person represents, and all other pertinent facts pertaining to the
vacancy.

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.28.041 and 2004 c 271 s 118 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the United States house of
representatives or the United States senate from this state, the
governor shall order a special election to fill the vacancy. Minor
political party candidates and independent candidates may be nominated
through the convention procedures provided in chapter 29A.20 RCW.
(2) Within ten days of such vacancy occurring, he or she shall
issue a writ of election fixing a date for the special vacancy election
not less than ninety days after the issuance of the writ, fixing a date
for the primary for nominating major political party candidates for the
special vacancy election not less than thirty days before the day fixed
for holding the special vacancy election, fixing the dates for the
special filing period, and designating the term or part of the term for
which the vacancy exists. If the vacancy is in the office of United
States representative, the writ of election shall specify the
congressional district that is vacant.
(3) If the vacancy occurs less than six months before a state
general election and before the second Friday following the close of
the filing period for that general election, the special primary,
special vacancy election, and minor party and independent candidate
nominating conventions must be held in concert with the state primary
and state general election in that year.
(4) If the vacancy occurs on or after the first day for filing
under RCW 29A.24.050 and on or before the second Friday following the
close of the filing period, a special filing period of three normal
business days shall be fixed by the governor and notice thereof given
to all media, including press, radio, and television within the area in
which the vacancy election is to be held, to the end that, insofar as
possible, all interested persons will be aware of such filing period.
The last day of the filing period shall not be later than the ((third))
sixth Tuesday before the primary at which major political party
candidates are to be nominated. The names of major political party
candidates who have filed valid declarations of candidacy during this
three-day period shall appear on the approaching primary ballot. The
requirements of RCW 29A.20.131 do not apply to a minor political party
or independent candidate convention held under this subsection.
(5) If the vacancy occurs later than the second Friday following
the close of the filing period, a special primary, special vacancy
election, and the minor party and independent candidate conventions to
fill the position shall be held after the next state general election
but, in any event, no later than the ninetieth day following the
November election.

Sec. 13 RCW 29A.40.070 and 2004 c 266 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except where a recount or litigation under RCW ((29A.68.010))
29A.68.011 is pending, the county auditor shall have sufficient
absentee ballots available for absentee voters of that county, other
than overseas voters and service voters, at least twenty days before
any primary, general election, or special election. The county auditor
must mail absentee ballots to each voter for whom the county auditor
has received a request nineteen days before the primary or election at
least eighteen days before the primary or election. For a request for
an absentee ballot received after the nineteenth day before the primary
or election, the county auditor shall make every effort to mail ballots
within one business day, and shall mail the ballots within two business
days.
(2) ((The county auditor shall make every effort to mail ballots to
overseas and service voters earlier than eighteen days before a primary
or election)) At least thirty days before any primary, general
election, or special election, the county auditor shall mail ballots to
all overseas and service voters. A request for a ballot made by an
overseas or service voter after that day must be processed immediately.
(3) Each county auditor shall certify to the office of the
secretary of state the dates the ballots prescribed in subsection (1)
of this section were available and mailed.
(4) If absentee ballots will not be available or mailed as
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, the county auditor shall
immediately certify to the office of the secretary of state when
absentee ballots will be available and mailed. Copies of this
certification must be provided to the county canvassing board, the
press, jurisdictions with issues on the ballot in the election, and any
candidates.
(5) If absentee ballots were not available or mailed as prescribed
in subsection (1) of this section, for a reason other than a recount or
litigation, the county auditor, in consultation with the certification
and training program of the office of the secretary of state, shall
submit a report to the office of the secretary of state outlining why
the deadline was missed and what corrective actions will be taken in
future elections to ensure that absentee ballots are available and
mailed as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(6) Failure to have absentee ballots available and mailed as
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section does not by itself provide
a basis for an election contest or other legal challenge to the results
of a primary, general election, or special election.

Sec. 14 RCW 29A.52.011 and 2004 c 271 s 172 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever it shall be necessary to hold a special election in an
odd-numbered year to fill an unexpired term of any office which is
scheduled to be voted upon for a full term in an even-numbered year, no
((September)) primary election shall be held in the odd-numbered year
if, after the last day allowed for candidates to withdraw, either of
the following circumstances exist:
(1) No more than one candidate of each qualified political party
has filed a declaration of candidacy for the same partisan office to be
filled; or
(2) No more than two candidates have filed a declaration of
candidacy for a single nonpartisan office to be filled.
In either event, the officer with whom the declarations of
candidacy were filed shall immediately notify all candidates concerned
and the names of the candidates that would have been printed upon the
((September)) primary ballot, but for the provisions of this section,
shall be printed as nominees for the positions sought upon the November
general election ballot.

Sec. 15 RCW 29A.56.030 and 2003 c 111 s 1403 are each amended to
read as follows:
The name of any candidate for a major political party nomination
for president of the United States shall be printed on the presidential
preference primary ballot of a major political party only:
(1) By direction of the secretary of state, who in the secretary's
sole discretion has determined that the candidate's candidacy is
generally advocated or is recognized in national news media; or
(2) If members of the political party of the candidate have
presented a petition for nomination of the candidate that has attached
to the petition a sheet or sheets containing the signatures of at least
one thousand registered voters who declare themselves in the petition
as being affiliated with the same political party as the presidential
candidate. The petition shall be filed with the secretary of state not
later than ((the thirty-ninth day)) sixty days before the presidential
preference primary. The signature sheets shall also contain the
residence address and name or number of the precinct of each registered
voter whose signature appears thereon and shall be certified in the
manner prescribed in RCW 29A.72.230 and 29A.72.240.
The secretary of state shall place the name of the candidate on the
ballot unless the candidate, at least ((thirty-five)) fifty-two days
before the presidential preference primary, executes and files with the
secretary of state an affidavit stating without qualification that he
or she is not now and will not become a candidate for the office of
president of the United States at the forthcoming presidential
election. The secretary of state shall certify the names of all
candidates who will appear on the presidential preference primary
ballot to the respective county auditors on or before the fourth
Tuesday in April of each presidential election year.

Sec. 16 RCW 29A.60.190 and 2005 c 243 s 16 and 2005 c 153 s 12
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by subsection (3) of this section, ((ten))
fifteen days after a primary or special election and twenty-one days
after a general election, the county canvassing board shall complete
the canvass and certify the results. Each absentee ballot that was
returned before the closing of the polls ((on the date of the primary
or election for which it was issued)), and each absentee ballot
((with)) bearing a postmark on or before the date of the primary or
election ((for which it was issued)) and received on or before the date
on which the primary or election is certified, must be included in the
canvass report.
(2) At the request of a caucus of the state legislature, the county
auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state and
legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house of representatives.
(3) On or before the thirtieth day after an election conducted
under the instant runoff voting method for the pilot project authorized
by RCW 29A.53.020, the canvassing board shall complete the canvass and
certify the results.

Sec. 17 RCW 29A.60.190 and 2005 c 243 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Ten)) Fifteen days after a primary or special election and
twenty-one days after a general election, the county canvassing board
shall complete the canvass and certify the results. Each absentee
ballot that was returned before the closing of the polls ((on the date
of the primary or election for which it was issued)), and each absentee
ballot ((with)) bearing a postmark on or before the date of the primary
or election ((for which it was issued)) and received on or before the
date on which the primary or election is certified, must be included in
the canvass report.
(2) At the request of a caucus of the state legislature, the county
auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state and
legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house of representatives.

Sec. 18 RCW 27.12.355 and 1987 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, a rural county library district,
island library district, or intercounty rural library district may
withdraw areas from its boundaries, or reannex areas into the library
district that previously had been withdrawn from the library district
under this section.
(2) The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a)
Adoption of a resolution by the board of trustees requesting the
withdrawal and finding that, in the opinion of the board, inclusion of
this area within the library district will result in a reduction of the
district's tax levy rate under the provisions of RCW 84.52.010; and (b)
adoption of a resolution by the city or town council approving the
withdrawal, if the area is located within the city or town, or adoption
of a resolution by the county legislative authority of the county
within which the area is located approving the withdrawal, if the area
is located outside of a city or town. A withdrawal shall be effective
at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year
in which the resolutions are adopted, but for purposes of establishing
boundaries for property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be
established immediately upon the adoption of the second resolution.
The authority of an area to be withdrawn from a library district as
provided under this section is in addition, and not subject, to the
provisions of RCW 27.12.380.
The withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a library district
shall not exempt any property therein from taxation for the purpose of
paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the library district
existing at the time of the withdrawal.
(3) An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a
library district under this section may be reannexed into the library
district upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the board of trustees
proposing the reannexation; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the
city or town council approving the reannexation, if the area is located
within the city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the county
legislative authority of the county within which the area is located
approving the reannexation, if the area is located outside of a city or
town. The reannexation shall be effective at the end of the day on the
thirty-first day of December in the year in which the adoption of the
second resolution occurs, but for purposes of establishing boundaries
for property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established
immediately upon the adoption of the second resolution. Referendum
action on the proposed reannexation may be taken by the voters of the
area proposed to be reannexed if a petition calling for a referendum is
filed with the city or town council, or county legislative authority,
within a thirty-day period after the adoption of the second resolution,
which petition has been signed by registered voters of the area
proposed to be reannexed equal in number to ten percent of the total
number of the registered voters residing in that area.
If a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered
voters has been so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held
in abeyance and a ballot proposition to authorize the reannexation
shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the next special
election date ((specified in RCW 29.13.020 that occurs forty-five or
more days after the petitions have been validated)) according to RCW
29A.04.330. Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the
reannexation by a simple majority vote shall authorize the
reannexation.

Sec. 19 RCW 27.12.370 and 1982 c 123 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county legislative authority or authorities shall by resolution
call a special election to be held in such city or town at the next
special election date ((provided in RCW 29.13.010 but not less than
forty-five days from the date of the declaration of such finding))
according to RCW 29A.04.321, and shall cause notice of such election to
be given as provided for in RCW ((29.27.080)) 29A.52.351.
The election on the annexation of the city or town into the library
district shall be conducted by the auditor of the county or counties in
which the city or town is located in accordance with the general
election laws of the state and the results thereof shall be canvassed
by the canvassing board of the county or counties. No person shall be
entitled to vote at such election unless he or she is registered to
vote in said city or town for at least thirty days preceding the date
of the election. The ballot proposition shall be in substantially the
following form:

If a majority of the persons voting on the proposition shall vote
in favor thereof, the city or town shall thereupon be annexed and shall
be a part of such library district.

Sec. 20 RCW 35.02.086 and 1986 c 234 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each candidate for a city or town elective position shall file a
declaration of candidacy with the county auditor of the county in which
all or the major portion of the city or town is located((, not more
than forty-five nor less than thirty days)) prior to the primary
election at which the initial elected officials are nominated,
according to RCW 29A.24.050. The elective positions shall be as
provided in law for the type of city or town and form or plan of
government specified in the petition to incorporate, and for the
population of the city or town as determined by the county legislative
authority or boundary review board where applicable. Any candidate may
withdraw his or her declaration ((at any time within five days after
the last day allowed for filing declaration of candidacy)) according to
RCW 29A.24.131. All names of candidates to be voted upon shall be
printed upon the ballot alphabetically in groups under the designation
of the respective titles of offices for which they are candidates.
Names of candidates printed upon the ballot need not be rotated.

Sec. 21 RCW 35.06.070 and 1994 c 81 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
A ballot proposition authorizing an advancement in classification
of a town to a second class city shall be submitted to the voters of
the town if either: (1) Petitions proposing the advancement are
submitted to the town clerk that have been signed by voters of the town
equal in number to at least ten percent of the voters of the town
voting at the last municipal general election; or (2) the town council
adopts a resolution proposing the advancement. The clerk shall
immediately forward the petitions to the county auditor who shall
review the signatures and certify the sufficiency of the petitions.
A ballot proposition authorizing an advancement shall be submitted
to the town voters at the next ((municipal general)) special election
((occurring forty-five or more days after the petitions are submitted))
date according to RCW 29A.04.330 if the county auditor certifies the
petitions as having sufficient valid signatures. The town shall be
advanced to a second class city if the ballot proposition is approved
by a simple majority vote, effective when the corporation is actually
reorganized and the new officers are elected and qualified. The county
auditor shall notify the secretary of state if the advancement of a
town to a second class city is approved.

Sec. 22 RCW 35.13.1821 and 1998 c 286 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The annexation ordinance provided for in RCW 35.13.182 is subject
to referendum for forty-five days after its passage. Upon the filing
of a timely and sufficient referendum petition with the legislative
body, signed by qualified electors in number equal to not less than ten
percent of the votes cast in the last general state election in the
area to be annexed, the question of annexation shall be submitted to
the voters of the area in a general election if one is to be held
within ninety days or at a special election called for that purpose
((not less than forty-five days nor more than ninety days after the
filing of the referendum petition)) according to RCW 29A.04.330.
Notice of the election shall be given as provided in RCW 35.13.080 and
the election shall be conducted as provided in the general election
law. The annexation shall be deemed approved by the voters unless a
majority of the votes cast on the proposition are in opposition
thereto.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the
date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area annexed shall
become a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the ordinance
of annexation.

Sec. 23 RCW 35.13.480 and 2003 c 299 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any county planning under chapter
36.70A RCW and subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215 may
initiate an annexation process with the legislative body of any other
cities or towns that are contiguous to the territory proposed for
annexation in RCW 35.13.470 if:
(a) The county legislative body initiated an annexation process as
provided in RCW 35.13.470; and
(b) The affected city or town legislative body adopted a responsive
resolution rejecting the proposed annexation or declined to create the
requested interlocal agreement with the county; or
(c) More than one hundred eighty days have passed since adoption of
a county resolution as provided for in RCW 35.13.470 and the parties
have not adopted or executed an interlocal agreement providing for the
annexation of unincorporated territory. The legislative body for
either the county or an affected city or town may, however, pass a
resolution extending the negotiation period for one or more six-month
periods if a public hearing is held and findings of fact are made prior
to each extension.
(2) Any county initiating the process provided for in subsection
(1) of this section must do so by adopting a resolution commencing
negotiations for an interlocal agreement as provided in chapter 39.34
RCW between the county and any city or town within the county. The
annexation area must be within an urban growth area designated under
RCW 36.70A.110 and at least sixty percent of the boundaries of the
territory to be annexed must be contiguous to one or more cities or
towns.
(3) The agreement shall describe the boundaries of the territory to
be annexed. A public hearing shall be held by each legislative body,
separately or jointly, before the agreement is executed. Each
legislative body holding a public hearing shall, separately or jointly,
publish the agreement at least once a week for two weeks before the
date of the hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation
within the territory proposed for annexation.
(4) Following adoption and execution of the agreement by both
legislative bodies, the city or town legislative body shall adopt an
ordinance providing for the annexation. The legislative body shall
cause notice of the proposed effective date of the annexation, together
with a description of the property to be annexed, to be published at
least once each week for two weeks subsequent to passage of the
ordinance, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
city and in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
territory to be annexed. If the annexation ordinance provides for
assumption of indebtedness or adoption of a proposed zoning regulation,
the notice shall include a statement of the requirements. Any area to
be annexed through an ordinance adopted under this section is annexed
and becomes a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the
ordinance of annexation, which date may not be less than forty-five
days after adoption of the ordinance.
(5) The annexation ordinances provided for in RCW 35.13.470(4) and
subsection (4) of this section are subject to referendum for forty-five
days after passage. Upon the filing of a timely and sufficient
referendum petition with the legislative body, signed by registered
voters in number equal to not less than fifteen percent of the votes
cast in the last general state election in the area to be annexed, the
question of annexation shall be submitted to the voters of the area in
a general election if one is to be held within ninety days or at a
special election called for that purpose ((not less than forty-five
days nor more than ninety days after the filing of the referendum
petition)) according to RCW 29A.04.330. Notice of the election shall
be given as provided in RCW 35.13.080 and the election shall be
conducted as provided in the general election law. The annexation
shall be deemed approved by the voters unless a majority of the votes
cast on the proposition are in opposition thereto.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the
date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area annexed shall
become a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the ordinance
of annexation.
(6) If more than one city or town adopts interlocal agreements
providing for annexation of the same unincorporated territory as
provided by this section, an election shall be held in the area to be
annexed pursuant to RCW 35.13.070 and 35.13.080. In addition to the
provisions of RCW 35.13.070 and 35.13.080, the ballot shall also
contain a separate proposition allowing voters to cast votes in favor
of annexation to any one city or town participating in an interlocal
agreement as provided by this section. If a majority of voters voting
on the proposition vote against annexation, the proposition is
defeated. If, however, a majority of voters voting in the election
approve annexation, the area shall be annexed to the city or town
receiving the highest number of votes among those cast in favor of
annexation.
(7) Costs for an election required under subsection (6) of this
section shall be borne by the county.

Sec. 24 RCW 35.61.360 and 1987 c 138 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, a metropolitan park district may
withdraw areas from its boundaries, or reannex areas into the
metropolitan park district that previously had been withdrawn from the
metropolitan park district under this section.
(2) The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a)
Adoption of a resolution by the park district commissioners requesting
the withdrawal and finding that, in the opinion of the commissioners,
inclusion of this area within the metropolitan park district will
result in a reduction of the district's tax levy rate under the
provisions of RCW 84.52.010; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the
city or town council approving the withdrawal, if the area is located
within the city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the county
legislative authority of the county within which the area is located
approving the withdrawal, if the area is located outside of a city or
town. A withdrawal shall be effective at the end of the day on the
thirty-first day of December in the year in which the resolutions are
adopted, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for property tax
purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately upon the
adoption of the second resolution.
The withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a metropolitan
park district shall not exempt any property therein from taxation for
the purpose of paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the
metropolitan park district existing at the time of the withdrawal.
(3) An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a
metropolitan park district under this section may be reannexed into the
metropolitan park district upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the
park district commissioners proposing the reannexation; and (b)
adoption of a resolution by the city or town council approving the
reannexation, if the area is located within the city or town, or
adoption of a resolution by the county legislative authority of the
county within which the area is located approving the reannexation, if
the area is located outside of a city or town. The reannexation shall
be effective at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December
in the year in which the adoption of the second resolution occurs, but
for purposes of establishing boundaries for property tax purposes, the
boundaries shall be established immediately upon the adoption of the
second resolution. Referendum action on the proposed reannexation may
be taken by the voters of the area proposed to be reannexed if a
petition calling for a referendum is filed with the city or town
council, or county legislative authority, within a thirty-day period
after the adoption of the second resolution, which petition has been
signed by registered voters of the area proposed to be reannexed equal
in number to ten percent of the total number of the registered voters
residing in that area.
If a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered
voters has been so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held
in abeyance and a ballot proposition to authorize the reannexation
shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the next special
election date ((specified in RCW 29.13.020 that occurs forty-five or
more days after the petitions have been validated)) according to RCW
29A.04.330. Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the
reannexation by a simple majority vote shall authorize the
reannexation.

Sec. 25 RCW 35A.14.299 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.299 are each
amended to read as follows:
Such annexation ordinance as provided for in RCW 35A.14.297 shall
be subject to referendum for forty-five days after the passage thereof.
Upon the filing of a timely and sufficient referendum petition with the
legislative body, signed by qualified electors in number equal to not
less than ten percent of the votes cast in the last general state
election in the area to be annexed, the question of annexation shall be
submitted to the voters of such area in a general election if one is to
be held within ninety days or at a special election called for that
purpose ((not less than forty-five days nor more than ninety days after
the filing of the referendum petition)) according to RCW 29A.04.330.
Notice of such election shall be given as provided in RCW 35A.14.070
and the election shall be conducted as provided in RCW ((35A.14.060))
35A.29.151. The annexation shall be deemed approved by the voters
unless a majority of the votes cast on the proposition are in
opposition thereto.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the
date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area annexed shall
become a part of the code city upon the date fixed in the ordinance of
annexation. From and after such date, if the ordinance so provided,
property in the annexed area shall be subject to the proposed zoning
regulation prepared and filed for such area as provided in RCW
35A.14.330 and 35A.14.340. If the ordinance so provided, all property
within the area annexed shall be assessed and taxed at the same rate
and on the same basis as the property of such annexing code city is
assessed and taxed to pay for any then outstanding indebtedness of such
city contracted prior to, or existing at, the date of annexation.

Sec. 26 RCW 35A.14.470 and 2003 c 299 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any county planning under chapter
36.70A RCW and subject to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.215 may
initiate an annexation process with the legislative body of any other
cities or towns that are contiguous to the territory proposed for
annexation in RCW 35A.14.460 if:
(a) The county legislative body initiated an annexation process as
provided in RCW 35A.14.460; and
(b) The affected city legislative body adopted a responsive
resolution rejecting the proposed annexation or declined to create the
requested interlocal agreement with the county; or
(c) More than one hundred eighty days have passed since adoption of
a county resolution as provided for in RCW 35A.14.460 and the parties
have not adopted or executed an interlocal agreement providing for the
annexation of unincorporated territory. The legislative body for
either the county or an affected city may, however, pass a resolution
extending the negotiation period for one or more six-month periods if
a public hearing is held and findings of fact are made prior to each
extension.
(2) Any county initiating the process provided for in subsection
(1) of this section must do so by adopting a resolution commencing
negotiations for an interlocal agreement as provided in chapter 39.34
RCW between the county and any city or town within the county. The
annexation area must be within an urban growth area designated under
RCW 36.70A.110 and at least sixty percent of the boundaries of the
territory to be annexed must be contiguous to one or more cities or
towns.
(3) The agreement shall describe the boundaries of the territory to
be annexed. A public hearing shall be held by each legislative body,
separately or jointly, before the agreement is executed. Each
legislative body holding a public hearing shall, separately or jointly,
publish the agreement at least once a week for two weeks before the
date of the hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation
within the territory proposed for annexation.
(4) Following adoption and execution of the agreement by both
legislative bodies, the city or town legislative body shall adopt an
ordinance providing for the annexation. The legislative body shall
cause notice of the proposed effective date of the annexation, together
with a description of the property to be annexed, to be published at
least once each week for two weeks subsequent to passage of the
ordinance, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
city and in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
territory to be annexed. If the annexation ordinance provides for
assumption of indebtedness or adoption of a proposed zoning regulation,
the notice shall include a statement of the requirements. Any area to
be annexed through an ordinance adopted under this section is annexed
and becomes a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the
ordinance of annexation, which date may not be less than forty-five
days after adoption of the ordinance.
(5) The annexation ordinances provided for in RCW 35A.14.460(4) and
subsection (4) of this section are subject to referendum for forty-five
days after passage. Upon the filing of a timely and sufficient
referendum petition with the legislative body, signed by registered
voters in number equal to not less than fifteen percent of the votes
cast in the last general state election in the area to be annexed, the
question of annexation shall be submitted to the voters of the area in
a general election if one is to be held within ninety days or at a
special election called for that purpose ((not less than forty-five
days nor more than ninety days after the filing of the referendum
petition)) according to RCW 29A.04.330. Notice of the election shall
be given as provided in RCW 35A.14.070 and the election shall be
conducted as provided in the general election law. The annexation
shall be deemed approved by the voters unless a majority of the votes
cast on the proposition are in opposition thereto.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the
date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area annexed shall
become a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the ordinance
of annexation.
(6) If more than one city or town adopts interlocal agreements
providing for annexation of the same unincorporated territory as
provided by this section, an election shall be held in the area to be
annexed pursuant to RCW 35A.14.070. In addition to the provisions of
RCW 35A.14.070, the ballot shall also contain a separate proposition
allowing voters to cast votes in favor of annexation to any one city or
town participating in an interlocal agreement as provided by this
section. If a majority of voters voting on the proposition vote
against annexation, the proposition is defeated. If, however, a
majority of voters voting in the election approve annexation, the area
shall be annexed to the city or town receiving the highest number of
votes among those cast in favor of annexation.
(7) Costs for an election required under subsection (6) of this
section shall be borne by the county.

Sec. 27 RCW 36.24.190 and 1996 c 108 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In a county with a population of two hundred fifty thousand or
more, the county legislative authority may, upon majority vote at an
election called by the county legislative authority, adopt a system
under which a medical examiner may be appointed to replace the office
of the coroner. The county legislative authority must adopt a
resolution or ordinance that creates the office of medical examiner at
least thirty days prior to the first day of filing for the primary
election for county offices. If a county adopts such a resolution or
ordinance, the resolution or ordinance shall be referred to the voters
for confirmation or rejection at the next date for a special election
((that is more than forty-five days from the date the resolution or
ordinance was adopted)) according to RCW 29A.04.321. If the resolution
or ordinance is approved by majority vote, no election shall be held
for the position of coroner and the coroner's position is abolished
following the expiration of the coroner's term of office or upon
vacating of the office of the coroner for any reason. The county
legislative authority shall appoint a medical examiner to assume the
statutory duties performed by the county coroner and the appointment
shall become effective following the expiration of the coroner's term
of office or upon the vacating of the office of the coroner. To be
appointed as a medical examiner pursuant to this section, a person must
either be: (1) Certified as a forensic pathologist by the American
board of pathology; or (2) a qualified physician eligible to take the
American board of pathology exam in forensic pathology within one year
of being appointed. A physician specializing in pathology who is
appointed to the position of medical examiner and who is not certified
as a forensic pathologist must pass the pathology exam within three
years of the appointment.

Sec. 28 RCW 36.93.030 and 1991 c 363 s 91 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created and established in each county with a
population of two hundred ten thousand or more a board to be known and
designated as a "boundary review board".
(2) A boundary review board may be created and established in any
other county in the following manner:
(a) The county legislative authority may, by majority vote, adopt
a resolution establishing a boundary review board; or
(b) A petition seeking establishment of a boundary review board
signed by qualified electors residing in the county equal in number to
at least five percent of the votes cast in the county at the last
county general election may be filed with the county auditor.
Upon the filing of such a petition, the county auditor shall
examine the same and certify to the sufficiency of the signatures
thereon. No person may withdraw his or her name from a petition after
it has been filed with the auditor. Within thirty days after the
filing of such petition, the county auditor shall transmit the same to
the county legislative authority, together with his or her certificate
of sufficiency.
After receipt of a valid petition for the establishment of a
boundary review board, the county legislative authority shall submit
the question of whether a boundary review board should be established
to the electorate at the next ((county)) primary or ((county)) general
election ((which occurs more than forty-five days from the date of
receipt of the petition)) according to RCW 29A.04.321. Notice of the
election shall be given as provided in RCW ((29.27.080)) 29A.52.351 and
shall include a clear statement of the proposal to be submitted.
If a majority of the persons voting on the proposition shall vote
in favor of the establishment of the boundary review board, such board
shall thereupon be deemed established.

Sec. 29 RCW 42.12.040 and 2003 c 238 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a vacancy occurs in any partisan elective office in the
executive or legislative branches of state government or in any
partisan county elective office before the ((sixth)) eleventh Tuesday
prior to the primary for the next general election following the
occurrence of the vacancy, a successor shall be elected to that office
at that general election. Except during the last year of the term of
office, if such a vacancy occurs on or after the ((sixth)) eleventh
Tuesday prior to the primary for that general election, the election of
the successor shall occur at the next succeeding general election. The
elected successor shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired
term. This section shall not apply to any vacancy occurring in a
charter county which has charter provisions inconsistent with this
section.
(2) If a vacancy occurs in any legislative office or in any
partisan county office after the general election in a year that the
position appears on the ballot and before the start of the next term,
the term of the successor who is of the same party as the incumbent may
commence once he or she has qualified as defined in RCW ((29.01.135))
29A.04.133 and shall continue through the term for which he or she was
elected.

Sec. 30 RCW 42.17.080 and 2005 c 184 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On the day the treasurer is designated, each candidate or
political committee shall file with the commission and the county
auditor or elections officer of the county in which the candidate
resides, or in the case of a political committee, the county in which
the treasurer resides, in addition to any statement of organization
required under RCW 42.17.040 or 42.17.050, a report of all
contributions received and expenditures made prior to that date, if
any.
(2) At the following intervals each treasurer shall file with the
commission and the county auditor or elections officer of the county in
which the candidate resides, or in the case of a political committee,
the county in which the committee maintains its office or headquarters,
and if there is no office or headquarters then in the county in which
the treasurer resides, a report containing the information required by
RCW 42.17.090:
(a) On the twenty-first day and the seventh day immediately
preceding the date on which the election is held; and
(b) On the tenth day of the first month after the election((:
PROVIDED, That this report shall not be required following a primary
election from:
(i) A candidate whose name will appear on the subsequent general
election ballot; or
(ii) Any continuing political committee)); and
(c) On the tenth day of each month in which no other reports are
required to be filed under this section: PROVIDED, That such report
shall only be filed if the committee has received a contribution or
made an expenditure in the preceding calendar month and either the
total contributions received or total expenditures made since the last
such report exceed two hundred dollars.
When there is no outstanding debt or obligation, and the campaign
fund is closed, and the campaign is concluded in all respects, and in
the case of a political committee, the committee has ceased to function
and has dissolved, the treasurer shall file a final report. Upon
submitting a final report, the duties of the treasurer shall cease and
there shall be no obligation to make any further reports.
The report filed twenty-one days before the election shall report
all contributions received and expenditures made as of the end of the
fifth business day before the date of the report. The report filed
seven days before the election shall report all contributions received
and expenditures made as of the end of the one business day before the
date of the report. Reports filed on the tenth day of the month shall
report all contributions received and expenditures made from the
closing date of the last report filed through the last day of the month
preceding the date of the current report.
(3) For the period beginning the first day of the fourth month
preceding the date on which the special ((or general)) election is
held, or for the period beginning the first day of the fifth month
before the date on which the general election is held, and ending on
the date of that special or general election, each Monday the treasurer
shall file with the commission and the appropriate county elections
officer a report of each bank deposit made during the previous seven
calendar days. The report shall contain the name of each person
contributing the funds so deposited and the amount contributed by each
person. However, contributions of no more than twenty-five dollars in
the aggregate from any one person may be deposited without identifying
the contributor. A copy of the report shall be retained by the
treasurer for his or her records. In the event of deposits made by a
deputy treasurer, the copy shall be forwarded to the treasurer for his
or her records. Each report shall be certified as correct by the
treasurer or deputy treasurer making the deposit.
(4) If a city requires that candidates or committees for city
offices file reports with a city agency, the candidate or treasurer so
filing need not also file the report with the county auditor or
elections officer.
(5) The treasurer or candidate shall maintain books of account
accurately reflecting all contributions and expenditures on a current
basis within five business days of receipt or expenditure. During the
eight days immediately preceding the date of the election the books of
account shall be kept current within one business day. As specified in
the committee's statement of organization filed under RCW 42.17.040,
the books of account must be open for public inspection by appointment
at the designated place for inspections between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m.
on any day from the eighth day immediately before the election through
the day immediately before the election, other than Saturday, Sunday,
or a legal holiday. It is a violation of this chapter for a candidate
or political committee to refuse to allow and keep an appointment for
an inspection to be conducted during these authorized times and days.
The appointment must be allowed at an authorized time and day for such
inspections that is within twenty-four hours of the time and day that
is requested for the inspection.
(6) The treasurer or candidate shall preserve books of account,
bills, receipts, and all other financial records of the campaign or
political committee for not less than five calendar years following the
year during which the transaction occurred.
(7) All reports filed pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this
section shall be certified as correct by the candidate and the
treasurer.
(8) Copies of all reports filed pursuant to this section shall be
readily available for public inspection for at least two consecutive
hours Monday through Friday, excluding legal holidays, between 8:00
a.m. and 8:00 p.m., as specified in the committee's statement of
organization filed pursuant to RCW 42.17.040, at the principal
headquarters or, if there is no headquarters, at the address of the
treasurer or such other place as may be authorized by the commission.
(9) After January 1, 2002, a report that is filed with the
commission electronically need not also be filed with the county
auditor or elections officer.
(10) The commission shall adopt administrative rules establishing
requirements for filer participation in any system designed and
implemented by the commission for the electronic filing of reports.

Sec. 31 RCW 42.17.710 and 2003 c 164 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the
date a regular legislative session convenes and continuing ((thirty
days past)) through the date of final adjournment, and during the
period beginning on the date a special legislative session convenes and
continuing through the date that session adjourns, no state official or
a person employed by or acting on behalf of a state official or state
legislator may solicit or accept contributions to a public office fund,
to a candidate or authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt.
(2) This section does not apply to activities authorized in RCW
43.07.370.

Sec. 32 RCW 52.02.080 and 1989 c 63 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The election on the formation of the district and to elect the
initial fire commissioners shall be conducted by the election officials
of the county or counties in which the proposed district is located in
accordance with the general election laws of the state. This election
shall be held at the next general election date((, as specified under
RCW 29.13.020)) according to RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330, that occurs
((forty-five or more days)) after the date of the action by the
boundary review board, or county legislative authority or authorities,
approving the proposal.

Sec. 33 RCW 52.04.056 and 1989 c 63 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, a fire protection district may
withdraw areas from its boundaries, or reannex areas into the fire
protection district that previously had been withdrawn from the fire
protection district under this section.
(2) The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a)
Adoption of a resolution by the board of fire commissioners requesting
the withdrawal and finding that, in the opinion of the board, inclusion
of this area within the fire protection district will result in a
reduction of the district's tax levy rate under the provisions of RCW
84.52.010; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the city or town council
approving the withdrawal, if the area is located within the city or
town, or adoption of a resolution by the county legislative authority
or authorities of the county or counties within which the area is
located approving the withdrawal, if the area is located outside of a
city or town. A withdrawal shall be effective at the end of the day on
the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the resolutions
are adopted, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for property
tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately upon the
adoption of the second resolution.
The authority of an area to be withdrawn from a fire protection
district as provided under this section is in addition, and not
subject, to the provisions of RCW 52.04.101.
The withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a fire protection
district shall not exempt any property therein from taxation for the
purpose of paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the fire
protection district existing at the time of the withdrawal.
(3) An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a fire
protection district under this section may be reannexed into the fire
protection district upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the board of
fire commissioners proposing the reannexation; and (b) adoption of a
resolution by the city or town council approving the reannexation, if
the area is located within the city or town, or adoption of a
resolution by the county legislative authority or authorities of the
county or counties within which the area is located approving the
reannexation, if the area is located outside of a city or town. The
reannexation shall be effective at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the adoption of the second
resolution occurs, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for
property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately
upon the adoption of the second resolution. Referendum action on the
proposed reannexation may be taken by the voters of the area proposed
to be reannexed if a petition calling for a referendum is filed with
the city or town council, or county legislative authority or
authorities, within a thirty-day period after the adoption of the
second resolution, which petition has been signed by registered voters
of the area proposed to be reannexed equal in number to ten percent of
the total number of the registered voters residing in that area.
If a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered
voters has been so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held
in abeyance and a ballot proposition to authorize the reannexation
shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the next special
election date ((specified in RCW 29.13.020 that occurs forty-five or
more days after the petitions have been validated)) according to RCW
29A.04.330. Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the
reannexation by a simple majority vote shall authorize the
reannexation.

Sec. 34 RCW 52.04.071 and 1984 c 230 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county legislative authority or authorities shall by resolution
call a special election to be held in the city or town and in the fire
protection district at the next date ((provided in RCW 29.13.010 but
not less than forty-five days from the date of the declaration of the
finding)) according to RCW 29A.04.321, and shall cause notice of the
election to be given as provided for in RCW ((29.27.080)) 29A.52.351.
The election on the annexation of the city or town into the fire
protection district shall be conducted by the auditor of the county or
counties in which the city or town and the fire protection district are
located in accordance with the general election laws of the state. The
results thereof shall be canvassed by the canvassing board of the
county or counties. No person is entitled to vote at the election
unless he or she is a qualified elector in the city or town or unless
he or she is a qualified elector within the boundaries of the fire
protection district. The ballot proposition shall be in substantially
the following form:

"Shall the city or town of . . . . . . be annexed to and be a part
of . . . . . . fire protection district?

YES. . . . . . . . . .
NO . . . . . . . . . . "

If a majority of the persons voting on the proposition in the city
or town and a majority of the persons voting on the proposition in the
fire protection district vote in favor thereof, the city or town shall
be annexed and shall be a part of the fire protection district.

Sec. 35 RCW 53.04.110 and 1998 c 240 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any port district now existing or which may hereafter be organized
under the laws of the state of Washington is hereby authorized to
change its corporate name under the following conditions and in the
following manner:
(1) On presentation((, at least forty-five days before any general
port election to be held in the port district,)) of a petition to the
commissioners of any port district now existing or which may hereafter
be established under the laws of the state of Washington, signed by at
least ten percent of the total number of voters of the port district
who voted at the last general port election and asking that the
corporate name of the port district be changed, it shall be the duty of
the commissioners to submit to the voters of the port district the
proposition as to whether the corporate name of the port shall be
changed. The proposition shall be submitted at the next general port
election according to RCW 29A.04.330.
(2) The petition shall contain the present corporate name of the
port district and the corporate name which is proposed to be given to
the port district.
(3) On submitting the proposition to the voters of the port
district it shall be the duty of the port commissioners to cause to be
printed on the official ballot used at the election the following
proposition:

(4) At the time when the returns of the general election shall be
canvassed by the commissioners of the port district, it shall be the
duty of the commissioners to canvass the vote upon the proposition so
submitted, recording in their record the result of the canvass.
(5) Should a majority of the registered voters of the port district
voting at the general port election vote in favor of the proposition it
shall be the duty of the port commissioners to certify the fact to the
auditor of the county in which the port district shall be situated and
to the secretary of state of the state of Washington, under the seal of
the port district. On and after the filing of the certificate with the
county auditor as aforesaid and with the secretary of state of the
state of Washington, the corporate name of the port district shall be
changed, and thenceforth the port district shall be known and
designated in accordance therewith.

Sec. 36 RCW 54.08.010 and 1985 c 469 s 55 are each amended to
read as follows:
At any general election held in an even-numbered year, the county
legislative authority of any county in this state may, or, on petition
of ten percent of the qualified electors of the county based on the
total vote cast in the last general county election held in an even-numbered year, shall, by resolution, submit to the voters of the county
the proposition of creating a public utility district which shall be
coextensive with the limits of the county as now or hereafter
established. A form of petition for the creation of a public utility
district shall be submitted to the county auditor within ten months
prior to the election at which the proposition is to be submitted to
the voters. Petitions shall be filed with the county auditor not less
than four months before the election and the county auditor shall
within thirty days examine the signatures thereof and certify to the
sufficiency or insufficiency thereof. If the petition be found to be
insufficient, it shall be returned to the persons filing the same, who
may amend or add names thereto for ten days, when the same shall be
returned to the county auditor, who shall have an additional fifteen
days to examine the same and attach his certificate thereto. No person
having signed the petition shall be allowed to withdraw his name
therefrom after the filing of the same with the county auditor:
PROVIDED, That each signature shall be dated and that no signature
dated prior to the date on which the form of petition was submitted to
the county auditor shall be valid. Whenever the petition shall be
certified to as sufficient, the county auditor shall forthwith transmit
the same, together with his certificate of sufficiency attached
thereto, to the county legislative authority which shall submit the
proposition to the voters of the county at the next general election in
an even-numbered year ((occurring forty-five days after submission of
the proposition to the legislative authority)) according to RCW
29A.04.330. The notice of the election shall state the boundaries of
the proposed public utility district and the object of such election,
and shall in other respects conform to the requirements of the general
laws of the state of Washington, governing the time and manner of
holding elections. In submitting the question to the voters for their
approval or rejection, the proposition shall be expressed on the ballot
substantially in the following terms:

Public Utility District No. . . . . . . . . . . . . YES □
Public Utility District No. . . . . . . . . . . . . NO □

Any petition for the formation of a public utility district may
describe a less area than the entire county in which the petition is
filed, the boundaries of which shall follow the then existing precinct
boundaries and not divide any voting precinct; and in the event that
such a petition is filed the county legislative authority shall fix a
date for a hearing on such petition, and shall publish the petition,
without the signatures thereto appended, for two weeks prior to the
date of the hearing, together with a notice stating the time of the
meeting when the petition will be heard. The publication, and all
other publications required by chapter 1, Laws of 1931, shall be in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the district is
situated. The hearing on the petition may be adjourned from time to
time, not exceeding four weeks in all. If upon the final hearing the
county legislative authority shall find that any lands have been
unjustly or improperly included within the proposed public utility
district and will not be benefited by inclusion therein, it shall
change and fix the boundary lines in such manner as it shall deem
reasonable and just and conducive to the public welfare and
convenience, and make and enter an order establishing and defining the
boundary lines of the proposed public utility district: PROVIDED, That
no lands shall be included within the boundaries so fixed lying outside
the boundaries described in the petition, except upon the written
request of the owners of those lands. Thereafter the same procedure
shall be followed as prescribed in this chapter for the formation of a
public utility district including an entire county, except that the
petition and election shall be confined solely to the lesser public
utility district.
No public utility district created after September 1, 1979, shall
include any other public utility district within its boundaries:
PROVIDED, That this paragraph shall not alter, amend, or modify
provisions of chapter 54.32 RCW.

Sec. 37 RCW 54.08.070 and 1979 ex.s. c 240 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any district which does not own or operate electric facilities for
the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power on March
25, 1969, or any district which hereafter does not construct or acquire
such electric facilities within ten years of its creation, shall not
construct or acquire any such electric facilities without the approval
of such proposal by the voters of such district: PROVIDED, That a
district shall have the power to construct or acquire electric
facilities within ten years following its creation by action of its
commission without voter approval of such action.
At any general election held in an even-numbered year, the proposal
to construct or acquire electric facilities may be submitted to the
voters of the district by resolution of the public utility district
commission or shall be submitted to the voters of the district by the
county legislative authority on petition of ten percent of the
qualified electors of such district, based on the total vote cast in
the last general county election held in an even-numbered year. A form
of petition for the construction or acquisition of electric facilities
by the public utility district shall be submitted to the county auditor
within ten months prior to the election at which such proposition is to
be submitted to the voters. Petitions shall be filed with the county
auditor not less than four months before such election and the county
auditor shall within thirty days examine the signatures thereof and
certify to the sufficiency or insufficiency thereof. If such petition
is found to be insufficient, it shall be returned to the persons filing
the same, who may amend and add names thereto for ten days, when the
same shall be returned to the county auditor, who shall have an
additional fifteen days to examine the same and attach his certificate
thereto. No person having signed such petition shall be allowed to
withdraw his name therefrom after the filing of the same with the
county auditor: PROVIDED, That each signature shall be dated and that
no signature dated prior to the date on which the form of petition was
submitted to the county auditor shall be valid. Whenever such petition
shall be certified to as sufficient, the county auditor shall forthwith
transmit the same, together with his certificate of sufficiency
attached thereto, to the county legislative authority which shall
submit such proposition to the voters of said district at the next
general election in an even-numbered year ((occurring forty-five days
after submission of the proposition to said legislative authority))
according to RCW 29A.04.330. The notice of the election shall state
the object of such election, and shall in other respects conform to the
requirements of the general laws of Washington, governing the time and
manner of holding elections.
The proposal submitted to the voters for their approval or
rejection, shall be expressed on the ballot substantially in the
following terms:

Shall Public Utility District No. . . . . of . . . . . . County
construct or acquire electric facilities for the generation,
transmission or distribution of electric power?

Yes □ No □

Within ten days after such election, the election board of the
county shall canvass the returns, and if at such election a majority of
the voters voting on such proposition shall vote in favor of such
construction or acquisition of electric facilities, the district shall
be authorized to construct or acquire electric facilities.

Sec. 38 RCW 57.04.050 and 1999 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon entry of the findings of the final hearing on the petition if
one or more county legislative authorities find that the proposed
district will be conducive to the public health, welfare, and
convenience and will benefit the land therein, they shall present a
resolution to the county auditor calling for a special election to be
held at a date ((specified under RCW 29.13.020, that occurs forty-five
or more days after the resolution is presented)) according to RCW
29A.04.330, at which a ballot proposition authorizing the district to
be created shall be submitted to voters for their approval or
rejection. The commissioners shall cause to be published a notice of
the election for four successive weeks in a newspaper of general
circulation in the proposed district, which notice shall state the
hours during which the polls will be open, the boundaries of the
district as finally adopted and the object of the election, and the
notice shall also be posted ten days in ten public places in the
proposed district. The district shall be created if the ballot
proposition authorizing the district to be created is approved by a
majority of the voters voting on the proposition.
A separate ballot proposition authorizing the district, if created,
to impose a single-year excess levy for the preliminary expenses of the
district shall be submitted to voters for their approval or rejection
at the same special election, if the petition to create the district
also proposed that a ballot proposition authorizing an excess levy be
submitted to voters for their approval or rejection. The excess levy
shall be proposed in the amount specified in the petition to create the
district, not to exceed one dollar and twenty-five cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value, and may only be submitted to voters for
their approval or rejection if the special election is held in
February, March, April, or May. The proposition to be effective must
be approved in the manner set forth in Article VII, section 2(a) of the
state Constitution.

Sec. 39 RCW 70.44.235 and 1987 c 138 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, a public hospital district may
withdraw areas from its boundaries, or reannex areas into the public
hospital district that previously had been withdrawn from the public
hospital district under this section.
(2) The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a)
Adoption of a resolution by the hospital district commissioners
requesting the withdrawal and finding that, in the opinion of the
commissioners, inclusion of this area within the public hospital
district will result in a reduction of the district's tax levy rate
under the provisions of RCW 84.52.010; and (b) adoption of a resolution
by the city or town council approving the withdrawal, if the area is
located within the city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the
county legislative authority of the county within which the area is
located approving the withdrawal, if the area is located outside of a
city or town. A withdrawal shall be effective at the end of the day on
the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the resolutions
are adopted, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for property
tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately upon the
adoption of the second resolution.
The withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a public hospital
district shall not exempt any property therein from taxation for the
purpose of paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the public
hospital district existing at the time of the withdrawal.
(3) An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a public
hospital district under this section may be reannexed into the public
hospital district upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the hospital
district commissioners proposing the reannexation; and (b) adoption of
a resolution by the city or town council approving the reannexation, if
the area is located within the city or town, or adoption of a
resolution by the county legislative authority of the county within
which the area is located approving the reannexation, if the area is
located outside of a city or town. The reannexation shall be effective
at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year
in which the adoption of the second resolution occurs, but for purposes
of establishing boundaries for property tax purposes, the boundaries
shall be established immediately upon the adoption of the second
resolution. Referendum action on the proposed reannexation may be
taken by the voters of the area proposed to be reannexed if a petition
calling for a referendum is filed with the city or town council, or
county legislative authority, within a thirty-day period after the
adoption of the second resolution, which petition has been signed by
registered voters of the area proposed to be reannexed equal in number
to ten percent of the total number of the registered voters residing in
that area.
If a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered
voters has been so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held
in abeyance and a ballot proposition to authorize the reannexation
shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the next special
election date ((specified in RCW 29.13.020 that occurs forty-five or
more days after the petitions have been validated)) according to RCW
29A.04.330. Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the
reannexation by a simple majority vote shall authorize the
reannexation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 RCW 29A.04.158 (September primary) and 2004
c 271 s 187 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 Sections 1 through 16 and 18 through 40 of
this act take effect January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 Section 16 of this act expires July 1,
2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 43 Section 17 of this act takes effect July 1,
2013.

--- END ---