BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
PROVISIONS RELATING TO AGRICULTURE
Sec. 101 RCW 82.04.050 and 2005 c 515 s 2 and 2005 c 514 s 101
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible
personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:
(a) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(b) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(c) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(d) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; (([or])) or
(e) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of tangible personal
property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the
performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail
sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as provided in
(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use. The
term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons
engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and
(7), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908; or
(f) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or
for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities,
and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and shall also include the sale of services or charges
made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The ((charge for labor and services rendered in respect to))
constructing, repairing, or improving any structure upon, above, or
under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by
title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such
construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such
construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then
reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original
owner;
(d) The ((sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to the)) cleaning, fumigating, razing or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but shall not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) ((The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to)) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) ((The sale of and charge made for)) The furnishing of lodging
and all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel,
trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real
property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real
property, and it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real property
for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same.
For the purposes of this subsection, it shall be presumed that the sale
of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous
period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real
property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) ((The sale of or charge made for tangible personal property,
labor and services to)) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e),
and (f) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property,
labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by
such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at
retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services
may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection shall be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4)(a) The term shall also include:
(i) The renting or leasing of tangible personal property to
consumers; and
(ii) Providing tangible personal property along with an operator
for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this
is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to
perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (4)(a)(ii), an
operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible
personal property.
(b) The term shall not include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of
sublease or subrent.
(5) The term shall also include the providing of telephone service,
as defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6) The term shall also include the sale of prewritten computer
software other than a sale to a person who presents a resale
certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the method of delivery
to the end user, but shall not include custom software or the
customization of prewritten computer software.
(7) The term shall also include the sale of or charge made for an
extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection,
"extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to
perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no
additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property,
labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or
repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of
specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an
agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in
this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and
the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the
tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of
this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.010.
(8) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(9) The term shall also not include sales of chemical sprays or
washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for
the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it include
sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or the Washington state department of
fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that
the farmer owns or leases.
(10) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for
labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and
nuclear research and development.
(11) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for
labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements
providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway
equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the
labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency,
as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.

Sec. 102 RCW 82.04.190 and 2005 c 514 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) "Consumer" means the following:
(((1))) (a) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or
uses any article of tangible personal property irrespective of the
nature of the person's business and including, among others, without
limiting the scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter,
improve, construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for
consumers other than for the purpose (((a))) (i) of resale as tangible
personal property in the regular course of business or (((b))) (ii) of
incorporating such property as an ingredient or component of real or
personal property when installing, repairing, cleaning, altering,
imprinting, improving, constructing, or decorating such real or
personal property of or for consumers or (((c))) (iii) of consuming
such property in producing for sale a new article of tangible personal
property or a new substance, of which such property becomes an
ingredient or component or as a chemical used in processing, when the
primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction
directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being
produced for sale or (((d))) (iv) of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon or (((e))) (v) of satisfying the person's obligations
under an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), if such
tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or
component of property covered by the extended warranty without
intervening use by such person;
(((2)(a))) (b)(i) Any person engaged in any business activity
taxable under RCW 82.04.290 or 82.04.2908; (((b))) (ii) any person who
purchases, acquires, or uses any telephone service as defined in RCW
82.04.065, other than for resale in the regular course of business;
(((c))) (iii) any person who purchases, acquires, or uses any service
defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), other than for resale in the regular
course of business or for the purpose of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7);
(((d))) (iv) any person who purchases, acquires, or uses any amusement
and recreation service defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), other than for
resale in the regular course of business; (((e))) (v) any person who is
an end user of software; and (((f))) (vi) any person who purchases or
acquires an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7) other than
for resale in the regular course of business;
(((3))) (c) Any person engaged in the business of contracting for
the building, repairing or improving of any street, place, road,
highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or
parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a
municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state of
Washington or by the United States and which is used or to be used
primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation
vehicles of any kind as defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to
tangible personal property when such person incorporates such property
as an ingredient or component of such publicly owned street, place,
road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation
terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle by installing,
placing or spreading the property in or upon the right of way of such
street, place, road, highway, easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or
in or upon the site of such mass public transportation terminal or
parking facility;
(((4))) (d) Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of
possession to or an easement in real property which is being
constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or otherwise altered by a
person engaged in business, excluding only (((a))) (i) municipal
corporations or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor
and services rendered to their real property which is used or held for
public road purposes, and (((b))) (ii) the United States,
instrumentalities thereof, and county and city housing authorities
created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW in respect to labor and services
rendered to their real property. Nothing contained in this or any
other subsection of this definition shall be construed to modify any
other definition of "consumer";
(((5))) (e) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession to personal property which is being constructed, repaired,
improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered by a person engaged
in business;
(((6))) (f) Any person engaged in the business of constructing,
repairing, decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation; also, any person engaged
in the business of clearing land and moving earth of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person shall
be a consumer within the meaning of this subsection in respect to
tangible personal property incorporated into, installed in, or attached
to such building or other structure by such person, except that
consumer does not include any person engaged in the business of
constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or
for the United States, or any instrumentality thereof, if the
investment project would qualify for sales and use tax deferral under
chapter 82.63 RCW if undertaken by a private entity;
(((7))) (g) Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment,
the rental of which is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020
under RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or charge made for
tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the
machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful
life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other
subsection of this section shall be construed to modify any other
definition of "consumer";
(((8))) (h) Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for
the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and
other byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and
development; and
(((9))) (i) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession of tangible personal property that, under the terms of an
extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), has been repaired or
is replacement property, but only with respect to the sale of or charge
made for the repairing of the tangible personal property or the
replacement property.
(2) The term "consumer" does not include any person described in
RCW 82.04.050(9) who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses chemical
sprays or washes, feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for
enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and spray
materials, for the purposes described in RCW 82.04.050(9).

Sec. 103 RCW 82.04.213 and 2001 c 118 s 2 and 2001 c 97 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) "Agricultural product" means any product of plant cultivation
or animal husbandry including, but not limited to: A product of
horticulture, grain cultivation, vermiculture, viticulture, or
aquaculture as defined in RCW 15.85.020; plantation Christmas trees;
short-rotation hardwoods as defined in RCW 84.33.035; turf; or any
animal including but not limited to an animal that is a private sector
cultured aquatic product as defined in RCW 15.85.020, or a bird, or
insect, or the substances obtained from such an animal. "Agricultural
product" does not include animals defined as pet animals under RCW
16.70.020.
(2) "Farmer" means any person engaged in the business of growing,
raising, or producing, upon the person's own lands or upon the lands in
which the person has a present right of possession, any agricultural
product to be sold. "Farmer" does not include a person growing,
raising, or producing such products for the person's own consumption;
a person selling any animal or substance obtained therefrom in
connection with the person's business of operating a stockyard or a
slaughter or packing house; or a person in respect to the business of
taking, cultivating, or raising timber.
(3) "Plantation Christmas trees" means Christmas trees which are
exempt from the timber excise tax under RCW 84.33.170.

Sec. 104 RCW 82.04.330 and 2001 c 118 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter shall not apply to:
(a) Any farmer that sells any agricultural product at wholesale or
to any farmer who grows, raises, or produces agricultural products
owned by others, such as custom feed operations. This exemption shall
not apply to any person selling such products at retail or to any
person selling manufactured substances or articles((.
This chapter shall also not apply to any persons));
(b) Any person who participates in the federal conservation reserve
program or its successor administered by the United States department
of agriculture with respect to land enrolled in that program;
(c) Amounts received by persons engaged in the production and sale
of hatching eggs or poultry for use in the production for sale of
poultry or poultry products;
(d) Amounts received from buying wheat, oats, dry peas, dry beans,
lentils, triticale, canola, corn, rye, and barley, but not including
any manufactured products thereof, and selling the same at wholesale;
(e) Amounts received by any person as compensation for the
receiving, washing, sorting, and packing of fresh perishable
horticultural products and the material and supplies used therein when
performed for the person exempted in (a) or (b) of this subsection (1),
either as agent or as independent contractor;
(f) The gross receipts or value of products proceeding or accruing
from timber harvested by a person who is a small harvester as defined
in RCW 84.33.035 and whose value of products, gross proceeds of sales,
or gross income of the business is less than one hundred thousand
dollars per tax year;
(g) Amounts received by hop growers or dealers for hops which are
shipped outside the state of Washington for first use, but only if
those hops have been processed into extract, pellets, or powder in this
state. This exemption applies regardless of who owns the hops during
the processing and who arranges for shipment of the processed hops to
a location outside this state.
This subsection (1)(g) does not exempt a processor or warehouser
from taxation under this chapter on amounts charged for processing or
warehousing;
(h) Amounts received by a person engaging within this state in the
business of: (i) Making wholesale sales to farmers of seed conditioned
for use in planting and not packaged for retail sale; or (ii)
conditioning seed for planting owned by others.
For the purposes of this subsection (1)(h), "seed" means seed
potatoes and all other "agricultural seed" as defined in RCW 15.49.011.
"Seed" does not include "flower seeds" or "vegetable seeds" as defined
in RCW 15.49.011, or any other seeds or propagative portions of plants
used to grow ornamental flowers or used to grow any type of bush, moss,
fern, shrub, or tree;
(i) Any business of any bona fide agricultural fair, if no part of
the net earnings of such business inures to the benefit of any
stockholder or member of the association conducting the agricultural
fair. However, any amount paid for admission to any exhibit,
grandstand, entertainment, or other feature conducted within the
fairgrounds by others shall be taxable under the provisions of this
chapter, except as otherwise provided by law; and
(j) Any nonprofit organization in respect to gross income derived
from business activities for a hop commodity commission or hop
commodity board created by state statute or created under chapter 15.65
or 15.66 RCW if: (i) The activity is approved by a referendum
conducted by the commission or board; (ii) the person is specified in
information distributed by the commission or board for the referendum
as a person who is to conduct the activity; and (iii) the referendum is
conducted in the manner prescribed by the statutes governing the
commission or board for approving assessments or expenditures, or
otherwise authorizing or approving activities of the commission or
board.
For the purposes of this subsection (1)(j), "nonprofit
organization" means an organization that is exempt from federal income
tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(5).
(2) The tax imposed by RCW 82.04.240 does not apply to cleaning
fish. For the purposes of this subsection, "cleaning fish" means the
removal of the head, fins, or viscera from fresh fish without further
processing, other than freezing.

Sec. 105 RCW 82.08.02745 and 1997 c 438 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to charges made
for labor and services rendered by any person in respect to the
constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing
buildings or other structures used as agricultural employee housing, or
to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or
component of the buildings or other structures during the course of the
constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving the buildings or
other structures((, but)). The exemption is available only if the
buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and
manner prescribed by the department ((by rule)).
(2) The exemption provided in this section for agricultural
employee housing provided to year-round employees of the agricultural
employer, only applies if that housing is built to the current building
code for single-family or multifamily dwellings according to the state
building code, chapter 19.27 RCW.
(3) Any agricultural employee housing built under this section
shall be used according to this section for at least five consecutive
years from the date the housing is approved for occupancy, or the full
amount of tax otherwise due shall be immediately due and payable
together with interest, but not penalties, from the date the housing is
approved for occupancy until the date of payment. If at any time
agricultural employee housing that is not located on agricultural land
ceases to be used in the manner specified in subsection (2) of this
section, the full amount of tax otherwise due shall be immediately due
and payable with interest, but not penalties, from the date the housing
ceases to be used as agricultural employee housing until the date of
payment.
(4) The exemption provided in this section shall not apply to
housing built for the occupancy of an employer, family members of an
employer, or persons owning stock or shares in a farm partnership or
corporation business.
(5) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02685:
(a) "Agricultural employee" or "employee" has the same meaning as
given in RCW 19.30.010;
(b) "Agricultural employer" or "employer" has the same meaning as
given in RCW 19.30.010; and
(c) "Agricultural employee housing" means all facilities provided
by an agricultural employer, housing authority, local government, state
or federal agency, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based
organization that is exempt from income tax under section 501(c) of the
internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)), or for-profit
provider of housing for housing agricultural employees on a year-round
or seasonal basis, including bathing, food handling, hand washing,
laundry, and toilet facilities, single-family and multifamily dwelling
units and dormitories, and includes labor camps under RCW ((70.54.110))
70.114A.110. "Agricultural employee housing" does not include housing
regularly provided on a commercial basis to the general public.
"Agricultural employee housing" does not include housing provided by a
housing authority unless at least eighty percent of the occupants are
agricultural employees whose adjusted income is less than fifty percent
of median family income, adjusted for household size, for the county
where the housing is provided.

Sec. 106 RCW 82.08.0311 and 1988 c 68 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
materials and supplies directly used in the packing of fresh perishable
horticultural products by any person entitled to ((a deduction)) an
exemption under RCW ((82.04.4287)) 82.04.330(1)(e) either as an agent
or an independent contractor.

Sec. 107 RCW 88.40.011 and 2003 c 56 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Barge" means a vessel that is not self-propelled.
(2) "Cargo vessel" means a self-propelled ship in commerce, other
than a tank vessel, fishing vessel, or a passenger vessel, of three
hundred or more gross tons.
(3) "Bulk" means material that is stored or transported in a loose,
unpackaged liquid, powder, or granular form capable of being conveyed
by a pipe, bucket, chute, or belt system.
(4) "Covered vessel" means a tank vessel, cargo vessel, or
passenger vessel.
(5) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(6) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(7)(a) "Facility" means any structure, group of structures,
equipment, pipeline, or device, other than a vessel, located on or near
the navigable waters of the state that transfers oil in bulk to or from
any vessel with an oil carrying capacity over two hundred fifty barrels
or pipeline, that is used for producing, storing, handling,
transferring, processing, or transporting oil in bulk.
(b) A facility does not include any: (i) Railroad car, motor
vehicle, or other rolling stock while transporting oil over the
highways or rail lines of this state; (ii) retail motor vehicle motor
fuel outlet; (iii) facility that is operated as part of an exempt
agricultural activity as provided in RCW 82.04.330(1) (a) or (b); (iv)
underground storage tank regulated by the department or a local
government under chapter 90.76 RCW; or (v) marine fuel outlet that does
not dispense more than three thousand gallons of fuel to a ship that is
not a covered vessel, in a single transaction.
(8) "Fishing vessel" means a self-propelled commercial vessel of
three hundred or more gross tons that is used for catching or
processing fish.
(9) "Gross tons" means tonnage as determined by the United States
coast guard under 33 C.F.R. section 138.30.
(10) "Hazardous substances" means any substance listed as of March
1, 2003, in Table 302.4 of 40 C.F.R. Part 302 adopted under section
101(14) of the federal comprehensive environmental response,
compensation, and liability act of 1980, as amended by P.L. 99-499.
The following are not hazardous substances for purposes of this
chapter:
(a) Wastes listed as F001 through F028 in Table 302.4; and
(b) Wastes listed as K001 through K136 in Table 302.4.
(11) "Navigable waters of the state" means those waters of the
state, and their adjoining shorelines, that are subject to the ebb and
flow of the tide and/or are presently used, have been used in the past,
or may be susceptible for use to transport intrastate, interstate, or
foreign commerce.
(12) "Oil" or "oils" means any naturally occurring liquid
hydrocarbons at atmospheric temperature and pressure coming from the
earth, including condensate and natural gasoline, and any fractionation
thereof, including, but not limited to, crude oil, petroleum, gasoline,
fuel oil, diesel oil, oil sludge, oil refuse, and oil mixed with wastes
other than dredged spoil. Oil does not include any substance listed as
of March 1, 2003, in Table 302.4 of 40 C.F.R. Part 302 adopted under
section 101(14) of the federal comprehensive environmental response,
compensation, and liability act of 1980, as amended by P.L. 99-499.
(13) "Offshore facility" means any facility located in, on, or
under any of the navigable waters of the state, but does not include a
facility any part of which is located in, on, or under any land of the
state, other than submerged land.
(14) "Onshore facility" means any facility any part of which is
located in, on, or under any land of the state, other than submerged
land, that because of its location, could reasonably be expected to
cause substantial harm to the environment by discharging oil into or on
the navigable waters of the state or the adjoining shorelines.
(15)(a) "Owner or operator" means (i) in the case of a vessel, any
person owning, operating, or chartering by demise, the vessel; (ii) in
the case of an onshore or offshore facility, any person owning or
operating the facility; and (iii) in the case of an abandoned vessel or
onshore or offshore facility, the person who owned or operated the
vessel or facility immediately before its abandonment.
(b) "Operator" does not include any person who owns the land
underlying a facility if the person is not involved in the operations
of the facility.
(16) "Passenger vessel" means a ship of three hundred or more gross
tons with a fuel capacity of at least six thousand gallons carrying
passengers for compensation.
(17) "Ship" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or other floating
craft of any kind.
(18) "Spill" means an unauthorized discharge of oil into the waters
of the state.
(19) "Tank vessel" means a ship that is constructed or adapted to
carry, or that carries, oil in bulk as cargo or cargo residue, and
that:
(a) Operates on the waters of the state; or
(b) Transfers oil in a port or place subject to the jurisdiction of
this state.
(20) "Waters of the state" includes lakes, rivers, ponds, streams,
inland waters, underground water, salt waters, estuaries, tidal flats,
beaches and lands adjoining the seacoast of the state, sewers, and all
other surface waters and watercourses within the jurisdiction of the
state of Washington.

Sec. 108 RCW 88.46.010 and 2000 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Best achievable protection" means the highest level of
protection that can be achieved through the use of the best achievable
technology and those staffing levels, training procedures, and
operational methods that provide the greatest degree of protection
achievable. The director's determination of best achievable protection
shall be guided by the critical need to protect the state's natural
resources and waters, while considering (a) the additional protection
provided by the measures; (b) the technological achievability of the
measures; and (c) the cost of the measures.
(2) "Best achievable technology" means the technology that provides
the greatest degree of protection taking into consideration (a)
processes that are being developed, or could feasibly be developed,
given overall reasonable expenditures on research and development, and
(b) processes that are currently in use. In determining what is best
achievable technology, the director shall consider the effectiveness,
engineering feasibility, and commercial availability of the technology.
(3) "Cargo vessel" means a self-propelled ship in commerce, other
than a tank vessel or a passenger vessel, of three hundred or more
gross tons, including but not limited to, commercial fish processing
vessels and freighters.
(4) "Bulk" means material that is stored or transported in a loose,
unpackaged liquid, powder, or granular form capable of being conveyed
by a pipe, bucket, chute, or belt system.
(5) "Covered vessel" means a tank vessel, cargo vessel, or
passenger vessel.
(6) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(7) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(8) "Discharge" means any spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring,
emitting, emptying, or dumping.
(9)(a) "Facility" means any structure, group of structures,
equipment, pipeline, or device, other than a vessel, located on or near
the navigable waters of the state that transfers oil in bulk to or from
a tank vessel or pipeline, that is used for producing, storing,
handling, transferring, processing, or transporting oil in bulk.
(b) A facility does not include any: (i) Railroad car, motor
vehicle, or other rolling stock while transporting oil over the
highways or rail lines of this state; (ii) retail motor vehicle motor
fuel outlet; (iii) facility that is operated as part of an exempt
agricultural activity as provided in RCW 82.04.330(1) (a) or (b); (iv)
underground storage tank regulated by the department or a local
government under chapter 90.76 RCW; or (v) marine fuel outlet that does
not dispense more than three thousand gallons of fuel to a ship that is
not a covered vessel, in a single transaction.
(10) "Marine facility" means any facility used for tank vessel
wharfage or anchorage, including any equipment used for the purpose of
handling or transferring oil in bulk to or from a tank vessel.
(11) "Navigable waters of the state" means those waters of the
state, and their adjoining shorelines, that are subject to the ebb and
flow of the tide and/or are presently used, have been used in the past,
or may be susceptible for use to transport intrastate, interstate, or
foreign commerce.
(12) "Oil" or "oils" means any naturally occurring liquid
hydrocarbons at atmospheric temperature and pressure coming from the
earth, including condensate and natural gasoline, and any fractionation
thereof, including, but not limited to, crude oil, petroleum, gasoline,
fuel oil, diesel oil, oil sludge, oil refuse, and oil mixed with wastes
other than dredged spoil. Oil does not include any substance listed in
Table 302.4 of 40 C.F.R. Part 302 adopted August 14, 1989, under
section 101(14) of the federal comprehensive environmental response,
compensation, and liability act of 1980, as amended by P.L. 99-499.
(13) "Offshore facility" means any facility located in, on, or
under any of the navigable waters of the state, but does not include a
facility any part of which is located in, on, or under any land of the
state, other than submerged land. "Offshore facility" does not include
a marine facility.
(14) "Onshore facility" means any facility any part of which is
located in, on, or under any land of the state, other than submerged
land, that because of its location, could reasonably be expected to
cause substantial harm to the environment by discharging oil into or on
the navigable waters of the state or the adjoining shorelines.
(15)(a) "Owner or operator" means (i) in the case of a vessel, any
person owning, operating, or chartering by demise, the vessel; (ii) in
the case of an onshore or offshore facility, any person owning or
operating the facility; and (iii) in the case of an abandoned vessel or
onshore or offshore facility, the person who owned or operated the
vessel or facility immediately before its abandonment.
(b) "Operator" does not include any person who owns the land
underlying a facility if the person is not involved in the operations
of the facility.
(16) "Passenger vessel" means a ship of three hundred or more gross
tons with a fuel capacity of at least six thousand gallons carrying
passengers for compensation.
(17) "Person" means any political subdivision, government agency,
municipality, industry, public or private corporation, copartnership,
association, firm, individual, or any other entity whatsoever.
(18) "Ship" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or other floating
craft of any kind.
(19) "Spill" means an unauthorized discharge of oil into the waters
of the state.
(20) "Tank vessel" means a ship that is constructed or adapted to
carry, or that carries, oil in bulk as cargo or cargo residue, and
that:
(a) Operates on the waters of the state; or
(b) Transfers oil in a port or place subject to the jurisdiction of
this state.
(21) "Waters of the state" includes lakes, rivers, ponds, streams,
inland waters, underground water, salt waters, estuaries, tidal flats,
beaches and lands adjoining the seacoast of the state, sewers, and all
other surface waters and watercourses within the jurisdiction of the
state of Washington.
(22) "Worst case spill" means: (a) In the case of a vessel, a
spill of the entire cargo and fuel of the vessel complicated by adverse
weather conditions; and (b) in the case of an onshore or offshore
facility, the largest foreseeable spill in adverse weather conditions.

Sec. 109 RCW 90.56.010 and 2000 c 69 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply
unless the context indicates otherwise:
(1) "Best achievable protection" means the highest level of
protection that can be achieved through the use of the best achievable
technology and those staffing levels, training procedures, and
operational methods that provide the greatest degree of protection
achievable. The director's determination of best achievable protection
shall be guided by the critical need to protect the state's natural
resources and waters, while considering (a) the additional protection
provided by the measures; (b) the technological achievability of the
measures; and (c) the cost of the measures.
(2) "Best achievable technology" means the technology that provides
the greatest degree of protection taking into consideration (a)
processes that are being developed, or could feasibly be developed,
given overall reasonable expenditures on research and development, and
(b) processes that are currently in use. In determining what is best
achievable technology, the director shall consider the effectiveness,
engineering feasibility, and commercial availability of the technology.
(3) "Board" means the pollution control hearings board.
(4) "Cargo vessel" means a self-propelled ship in commerce, other
than a tank vessel or a passenger vessel, three hundred or more gross
tons, including but not limited to, commercial fish processing vessels
and freighters.
(5) "Bulk" means material that is stored or transported in a loose,
unpackaged liquid, powder, or granular form capable of being conveyed
by a pipe, bucket, chute, or belt system.
(6) "Committee" means the preassessment screening committee
established under RCW 90.48.368.
(7) "Covered vessel" means a tank vessel, cargo vessel, or
passenger vessel.
(8) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(9) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(10) "Discharge" means any spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring,
emitting, emptying, or dumping.
(11)(a) "Facility" means any structure, group of structures,
equipment, pipeline, or device, other than a vessel, located on or near
the navigable waters of the state that transfers oil in bulk to or from
a tank vessel or pipeline, that is used for producing, storing,
handling, transferring, processing, or transporting oil in bulk.
(b) A facility does not include any: (i) Railroad car, motor
vehicle, or other rolling stock while transporting oil over the
highways or rail lines of this state; (ii) underground storage tank
regulated by the department or a local government under chapter 90.76
RCW; (iii) motor vehicle motor fuel outlet; (iv) facility that is
operated as part of an exempt agricultural activity as provided in RCW
82.04.330(1) (a) or (b); or (v) marine fuel outlet that does not
dispense more than three thousand gallons of fuel to a ship that is not
a covered vessel, in a single transaction.
(12) "Fund" means the state coastal protection fund as provided in
RCW 90.48.390 and 90.48.400.
(13) "Having control over oil" shall include but not be limited to
any person using, storing, or transporting oil immediately prior to
entry of such oil into the waters of the state, and shall specifically
include carriers and bailees of such oil.
(14) "Marine facility" means any facility used for tank vessel
wharfage or anchorage, including any equipment used for the purpose of
handling or transferring oil in bulk to or from a tank vessel.
(15) "Navigable waters of the state" means those waters of the
state, and their adjoining shorelines, that are subject to the ebb and
flow of the tide and/or are presently used, have been used in the past,
or may be susceptible for use to transport intrastate, interstate, or
foreign commerce.
(16) "Necessary expenses" means the expenses incurred by the
department and assisting state agencies for (a) investigating the
source of the discharge; (b) investigating the extent of the
environmental damage caused by the discharge; (c) conducting actions
necessary to clean up the discharge; (d) conducting predamage and
damage assessment studies; and (e) enforcing the provisions of this
chapter and collecting for damages caused by a discharge.
(17) "Oil" or "oils" means naturally occurring liquid hydrocarbons
at atmospheric temperature and pressure coming from the earth,
including condensate and natural gasoline, and any fractionation
thereof, including, but not limited to, crude oil, petroleum, gasoline,
fuel oil, diesel oil, oil sludge, oil refuse, and oil mixed with wastes
other than dredged spoil. Oil does not include any substance listed in
Table 302.4 of 40 C.F.R. Part 302 adopted August 14, 1989, under
section 101(14) of the federal comprehensive environmental response,
compensation, and liability act of 1980, as amended by P.L. 99-499.
(18) "Offshore facility" means any facility located in, on, or
under any of the navigable waters of the state, but does not include a
facility any part of which is located in, on, or under any land of the
state, other than submerged land.
(19) "Onshore facility" means any facility any part of which is
located in, on, or under any land of the state, other than submerged
land, that because of its location, could reasonably be expected to
cause substantial harm to the environment by discharging oil into or on
the navigable waters of the state or the adjoining shorelines.
(20)(a) "Owner or operator" means (i) in the case of a vessel, any
person owning, operating, or chartering by demise, the vessel; (ii) in
the case of an onshore or offshore facility, any person owning or
operating the facility; and (iii) in the case of an abandoned vessel or
onshore or offshore facility, the person who owned or operated the
vessel or facility immediately before its abandonment.
(b) "Operator" does not include any person who owns the land
underlying a facility if the person is not involved in the operations
of the facility.
(21) "Passenger vessel" means a ship of three hundred or more gross
tons with a fuel capacity of at least six thousand gallons carrying
passengers for compensation.
(22) "Person" means any political subdivision, government agency,
municipality, industry, public or private corporation, copartnership,
association, firm, individual, or any other entity whatsoever.
(23) "Ship" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or other floating
craft of any kind.
(24) "Spill" means an unauthorized discharge of oil or hazardous
substances into the waters of the state.
(25) "Tank vessel" means a ship that is constructed or adapted to
carry, or that carries, oil in bulk as cargo or cargo residue, and
that:
(a) Operates on the waters of the state; or
(b) Transfers oil in a port or place subject to the jurisdiction of
this state.
(26) "Waters of the state" includes lakes, rivers, ponds, streams,
inland waters, underground water, salt waters, estuaries, tidal flats,
beaches and lands adjoining the seacoast of the state, sewers, and all
other surface waters and watercourses within the jurisdiction of the
state of Washington.
(27) "Worst case spill" means: (a) In the case of a vessel, a
spill of the entire cargo and fuel of the vessel complicated by adverse
weather conditions; and (b) in the case of an onshore or offshore
facility, the largest foreseeable spill in adverse weather conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.04.035 ("Plantation Christmas trees") and 1987 c 23 s 1;
(2) RCW 82.04.2403 (Manufacturer tax not applicable to cleaning
fish) and 1994 c 167 s 1;
(3) RCW 82.04.331 (Exemptions -- Wholesale sales to farmers of seed
for planting, conditioning seed for planting owned by others) and 1998
c 170 s 2;
(4) RCW 82.04.332 (Exemptions -- Buying and selling at wholesale
wheat, oats, dry peas, dry beans, lentils, triticale, canola, corn,
rye, and barley) and 1998 c 312 s 2;
(5) RCW 82.04.333 (Exemptions -- Small harvesters) and 1990 c 141 s
1;
(6) RCW 82.04.335 (Exemptions -- Agricultural fairs) and 1965 ex.s.
c 145 s 1;
(7) RCW 82.04.337 (Exemptions -- Amounts received by hop growers or
dealers for processed hops shipped outside the state) and 1987 c 495 s
1;
(8) RCW 82.04.338 (Exemptions -- Hop commodity commission or hop
commodity board business) and 1998 c 200 s 1;
(9) RCW 82.04.410 (Exemptions -- Hatching eggs and poultry) and 1967
ex.s. c 149 s 15 & 1961 c 15 s 82.04.410; and
(10) RCW 82.04.4287 (Deductions -- Compensation for receiving,
washing, etc., horticultural products for person exempt under RCW
82.04.330 -- Materials and supplies used) and 1980 c 37 s 8.

PART II
TELECOMMUNICATIONS PROVISIONS
Sec. 201 RCW 82.04.530 and 2004 c 153 s 410 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter, a telephone business other than a
mobile telecommunications service provider must calculate gross
proceeds of ((retail)) sales in a manner consistent with the sourcing
rules provided in RCW 82.32.520. The department may adopt rules to
implement this section, including rules that provide a formulary method
of determining gross proceeds that reasonably approximates the taxable
activity of a telephone business.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.14B.020 and 2002 c 341 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Emergency services communication system" means a multicounty,
countywide, or districtwide radio or landline communications network,
including an enhanced 911 telephone system, which provides rapid public
access for coordinated dispatching of services, personnel, equipment,
and facilities for police, fire, medical, or other emergency services.
(2) "Enhanced 911 telephone system" means a public telephone system
consisting of a network, data base, and on-premises equipment that is
accessed by dialing 911 and that enables reporting police, fire,
medical, or other emergency situations to a public safety answering
point. The system includes the capability to selectively route
incoming 911 calls to the appropriate public safety answering point
that operates in a defined 911 service area and the capability to
automatically display the name, address, and telephone number of
incoming 911 calls at the appropriate public safety answering point.
(3) "Switched access line" means the telephone service line which
connects a subscriber's main telephone(s) or equivalent main
telephone(s) to the local exchange company's switching office.
(4) "Local exchange company" has the meaning ascribed to it in RCW
80.04.010.
(5) "Radio access line" means the telephone number assigned to or
used by a subscriber for two-way local wireless voice service available
to the public for hire from a radio communications service company.
Radio access lines include, but are not limited to, radio-telephone
communications lines used in cellular telephone service, personal
communications services, and network radio access lines, or their
functional and competitive equivalent. Radio access lines do not
include lines that provide access to one-way signaling service, such as
paging service, or to communications channels suitable only for data
transmission, or to nonlocal radio access line service, such as
wireless roaming service, or to a private telecommunications system.
(6) "Radio communications service company" has the meaning ascribed
to it in RCW 80.04.010, except that it does not include radio paging
providers. It does include those persons or entities that provide
commercial mobile radio services, as defined by 47 U.S.C. Sec.
332(d)(1), and both facilities-based and nonfacilities-based resellers.
(7) "Private telecommunications system" has the meaning ascribed to
it in RCW 80.04.010.
(8) "Subscriber" means the retail purchaser of telephone service as
telephone service is defined in RCW 82.04.065(3).
(9) "Place of primary use" has the meaning ascribed to it in ((the
federal mobile telecommunications sourcing act, P.L. 106-252)) RCW
82.04.065.

Sec. 203 RCW 82.14B.030 and 2002 c 341 s 8 and 2002 c 67 s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county may impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of switched access lines in an
amount not exceeding fifty cents per month for each switched access
line. The amount of tax shall be uniform for each switched access
line. Each county shall provide notice of such tax to all local
exchange companies serving in the county at least sixty days in advance
of the date on which the first payment is due.
(2) The legislative authority of a county may also impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of radio access lines whose place of
primary use is located within the county in an amount not exceeding
fifty cents per month for each radio access line. The amount of tax
shall be uniform for each radio access line. ((The location of a radio
access line is the customer's place of primary use as defined in RCW
82.04.065.)) The county shall provide notice of such tax to all radio
communications service companies serving in the county at least sixty
days in advance of the date on which the first payment is due. Any
county imposing this tax shall include in its ordinance a refund
mechanism whereby the amount of any tax ordered to be refunded by the
judgment of a court of record, or as a result of the resolution of any
appeal therefrom, shall be refunded to the radio communications service
company or local exchange company that collected the tax, and those
companies shall reimburse the subscribers who paid the tax. The
ordinance shall further provide that to the extent the subscribers who
paid the tax cannot be identified or located, the tax paid by those
subscribers shall be returned to the county.
(3) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all switched
access lines in the state. The amount of tax shall not exceed twenty
cents per month for each switched access line. The tax shall be
uniform for each switched access line. The tax imposed under this
subsection shall be remitted to the department of revenue by local
exchange companies on a tax return provided by the department. Tax
proceeds shall be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911
account created in RCW 38.52.540.
(4) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all radio access
lines whose place of primary use is located within the state in an
amount of twenty cents per month for each radio access line. The tax
shall be uniform for each radio access line. The tax imposed under
this section shall be remitted to the department of revenue by radio
communications service companies, including those companies that resell
radio access lines, on a tax return provided by the department. Tax
proceeds shall be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911
account created in RCW 38.52.540. The tax imposed under this section
is not subject to the state sales and use tax or any local tax.
(5) By August 31st of each year the state enhanced 911 coordinator
shall recommend the level for the next year of the state enhanced 911
excise tax imposed by subsection (3) of this section, based on a
systematic cost and revenue analysis, to the utilities and
transportation commission. The commission shall by the following
October 31st determine the level of the state enhanced 911 excise tax
for the following year.

Sec. 204 RCW 82.32.520 and 2004 c 153 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for the defined telecommunications services listed in
this section, the sale of telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065
sold on a call-by-call basis shall be sourced to (a) each level of
taxing jurisdiction where the call originates and terminates in that
jurisdiction or (b) each level of taxing jurisdiction where the call
either originates or terminates and in which the service address is
also located.
(2) Except for the defined telecommunications services listed in
this section, a sale of telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065
sold on a basis other than a call-by-call basis, is sourced to the
customer's place of primary use.
(3) The sales of telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065 that
are listed in this section shall be sourced to each level of taxing
jurisdiction as follows:
(a) A sale of mobile telecommunications services, other than air-ground radiotelephone service and prepaid calling service, is sourced
to the customer's place of primary use as required by RCW 82.08.066.
(b) A sale of postpaid calling service is sourced to the
origination point of the telecommunications signal as first identified
by either (i) the seller's telecommunications system, or (ii)
information received by the seller from its service provider, where the
system used to transport such signals is not that of the seller.
(c) A sale of prepaid calling service is sourced as follows:
(i) When a prepaid calling service is received by the purchaser at
a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to that business
location;
(ii) When a prepaid calling service is not received by the
purchaser at a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to
the location where receipt by the purchaser or the purchaser's donee,
designated as such by the purchaser, occurs, including the location
indicated by instructions for delivery to the purchaser or donee, known
to the seller;
(iii) When (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection do not apply, the
sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the
purchaser that is available from the business records of the seller
that are maintained in the ordinary course of the seller's business
when use of this address does not constitute bad faith;
(iv) When (c)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection do not apply,
the sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the
purchaser obtained during the consummation of the sale, including the
address of a purchaser's payment instrument, if no other address is
available, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith;
(v) When (c)(i), (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this subsection do not
apply, including the circumstance where the seller is without
sufficient information to apply those provisions, then the location
shall be determined by the address from which tangible personal
property was shipped, from which the digital good or the computer
software delivered electronically was first available for transmission
by the seller, or from which the service defined as a retail sale under
RCW 82.04.050 was provided, disregarding for these purposes any
location that merely provided the digital transfer of the product sold;
(vi) In the case of a sale of mobile telecommunications service
that is a prepaid telecommunications service, (c)(v) of this subsection
shall include as an option the location associated with the mobile
telephone number.
(d) A sale of a private communication service is sourced as
follows:
(i) Service for a separate charge related to a customer channel
termination point is sourced to each level of jurisdiction in which
such customer channel termination point is located.
(ii) Service where all customer termination points are located
entirely within one jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction is sourced
in such jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination points
are located.
(iii) Service for segments of a channel between two customer
channel termination points located in different jurisdictions and which
segment of channel are separately charged is sourced fifty percent in
each level of jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination
points are located.
(iv) Service for segments of a channel located in more than one
jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction and which segments are not
separately billed is sourced in each jurisdiction based on the
percentage determined by dividing the number of customer channel
termination points in the jurisdiction by the total number of customer
channel termination points.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
chapter.
(a) "Air-ground radiotelephone service" means air-ground radio
service, as defined in 47 C.F.R. Sec. 22.99, as amended or renumbered
as of January 1, 2003, in which common carriers are authorized to offer
and provide radio telecommunications service for hire to subscribers in
aircraft.
(b) "Call-by-call basis" means any method of charging for
telecommunications services where the price is measured by individual
calls.
(c) "Communications channel" means a physical or virtual path of
communications over which signals are transmitted between or among
customer channel termination points.
(d) "Customer" means the person or entity that contracts with the
seller of telecommunications services. If the end user of
telecommunications services is not the contracting party, the end user
of the telecommunications service is the customer of the
telecommunications service. "Customer" does not include a reseller of
telecommunications service or for mobile telecommunications service of
a serving carrier under an agreement to serve the customer outside the
home service provider's licensed service area.
(e) "Customer channel termination point" means the location where
the customer either inputs or receives the communications.
(f) "End user" means the person who uses the telecommunications
service. In the case of an entity, the term end user means the
individual who uses the service on behalf of the entity.
(g) "Home service provider" means the same as that term is defined
in RCW 82.04.065.
(h) "Mobile telecommunications service" means the same as that term
is defined in RCW 82.04.065.
(i) "Place of primary use" means the street address representative
of where the customer's use of the telecommunications service primarily
occurs, which must be the residential street address or the primary
business street address of the customer. In the case of mobile
telecommunications services, "place of primary use" must be within the
licensed service area of the home service provider.
(j) "Postpaid calling service" means the telecommunications service
obtained by making a payment on a call-by-call basis either through the
use of a credit card or payment mechanism such as a bank card, travel
card, credit card, or debit card, or by charge made to ((which)) a
telephone number that is not associated with the origination or
termination of the telecommunications service. A postpaid calling
service includes a telecommunications service that would be a prepaid
calling service except it is not exclusively a telecommunications
service.
(k) "Prepaid calling service" means the right to access exclusively
telecommunications services, which must be paid for in advance and
which enables the origination of calls using an access number and/or
authorization code, whether manually or electronically dialed, and that
is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines
with use in a known amount.
(l) "Private communication service" means a telecommunications
service that entitles the customer to exclusive or priority use of a
communications channel or group of channels between or among
termination points, regardless of the manner in which such channel or
channels are connected, and includes switching capacity, extension
lines, stations, and any other associated services that are provided in
connection with the use of such channel or channels.
(m) "Service address" means:
(i) The location of the telecommunications equipment to which a
customer's call is charged and from which the call originates or
terminates, regardless of where the call is billed or paid;
(ii) If the location in (m)(i) of this subsection is not known, the
origination point of the signal of the telecommunications services
first identified by either the seller's telecommunications system or in
information received by the seller from its service provider, where the
system used to transport such signals is not that of the seller;
(iii) If the locations in (m)(i) and (ii) of this subsection are
not known, the location of the customer's place of primary use.

Sec. 205 RCW 82.32.555 and 2004 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a taxing jurisdiction does not subject some charges for
telephone services to taxation, but these charges are aggregated with
and not separately stated from charges that are subject to taxation,
then the charges for nontaxable telephone services may be subject to
taxation unless the telephone service ((or)) provider can reasonably
identify charges not subject to the tax, charge, or fee from its books
and records that are kept in the regular course of business and for
purposes other than merely allocating the sales price of an aggregated
charge to the individually aggregated items.

Sec. 206 RCW 34.05.030 and 2002 c 354 s 225 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter shall not apply to:
(a) The state militia, or
(b) The board of clemency and pardons, or
(c) The department of corrections or the indeterminate sentencing
review board with respect to persons who are in their custody or are
subject to the jurisdiction of those agencies.
(2) The provisions of RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 shall not
apply:
(a) To adjudicative proceedings of the board of industrial
insurance appeals except as provided in RCW 7.68.110 and 51.48.131;
(b) Except for actions pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, to the
denial, suspension, or revocation of a driver's license by the
department of licensing;
(c) To the department of labor and industries where another statute
expressly provides for review of adjudicative proceedings of a
department action, order, decision, or award before the board of
industrial insurance appeals;
(d) To actions of the Washington personnel resources board or the
director of personnel; or
(e) To the extent they are inconsistent with any provisions of
chapter 43.43 RCW.
(3) Unless a party makes an election for a formal hearing pursuant
to RCW 82.03.140 or 82.03.190, RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 do not
apply to a review hearing conducted by the board of tax appeals.
(4) The rule-making provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) Reimbursement unit values, fee schedules, arithmetic conversion
factors, and similar arithmetic factors used to determine payment rates
that apply to goods and services purchased under contract for clients
eligible under chapter 74.09 RCW; and
(b) Determinations by the department of revenue under RCW
43.20A.725 and 80.36.430 of the amount of telecommunications relay
service excise tax and telephone assistance excise tax, to be placed on
each switched access line.
(5) All other agencies, whether or not formerly specifically
excluded from the provisions of all or any part of the Administrative
Procedure Act, shall be subject to the entire act.

Sec. 207 2004 c 153 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) If a court of competent jurisdiction enters a final judgment on
the merits that is based on federal or state law, is no longer subject
to appeal, and substantially limits or impairs the essential elements
of P.L. 106-252, 4 U.S.C. Secs. 116 through 126, or chapter 67, Laws of
2002, then chapter 67, Laws of 2002 is null and void in its entirety.
(2) If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
section 502, chapter 168, Laws of 2003 is null and void.
(3) If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
section 410, chapter 153, Laws of 2004 is null and void.
(4) If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
section 111, chapter 514, Laws of 2005 is null and void.
(5) If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
sections 201 and 203, chapter ..., Laws of 2006 (sections 201 and 203
of this act) are null and void.

PART III
LOCAL SALES AND USE TAXES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
The amount of retail sales or use tax imposed by a local government
under the authority of this chapter or any other statute upon the
occurrence of any taxable event shall equal:
(1) In the case of a sales tax, the tax rates multiplied by the
selling price of the article, service, or extended warranty; and
(2) In the case of a use tax, the tax rates multiplied by the value
of the article used, value of the service used, or value of the
extended warranty used. However, in the case of a seller that is
required to collect use tax from the purchaser, the amount of tax
imposed shall equal the tax rates multiplied by the purchase price.

Sec. 302 RCW 82.14.030 and 1989 c 384 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governing body of any county or city while not required by
legislative mandate to do so, may, by resolution or ordinance for the
purposes authorized by this chapter, ((fix and)) impose a sales and use
tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. Such tax shall be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state ((pursuant
to)) under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within the county or city as the case may be((:
PROVIDED, That)). Except as provided in RCW 82.14.230, this sales and
use tax shall not apply to natural or manufactured gas. The rate of
such tax imposed by a county shall be five-tenths of one percent ((of
the selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article
used (in the case of a use tax))). The rate of such tax imposed by a
city shall not exceed five-tenths of one percent ((of the selling price
(in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case
of a use tax): PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). However, in the event a
county ((shall impose)) imposes a sales and use tax under this
subsection, the rate of such tax imposed under this subsection by any
city therein shall not exceed four hundred and twenty-five one-thousandths of one percent.
(2) ((Subject to the enactment into law of the 1982 amendment to
RCW 82.02.020 by section 5, chapter 49, Laws of 1982 1st ex. sess.,))
In addition to the tax authorized in subsection (1) of this section,
the governing body of any county or city may by resolution or ordinance
impose an additional sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of
this chapter. Such additional tax shall be collected upon the same
taxable events upon which the tax imposed under subsection (1) of this
section is ((levied)) imposed. The rate of such additional tax imposed
by a county shall be up to five-tenths of one percent ((of the selling
price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the
case of a use tax))). The rate of such additional tax imposed by a
city shall be up to five-tenths of one percent ((of the selling price
(in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case
of a use tax): PROVIDED HOWEVER, That)). However, in the event a
county ((shall)) imposes a sales and use tax under the authority of
this subsection at a rate equal to or greater than the rate imposed
under the authority of this subsection by a city within the county, the
county shall receive fifteen percent of the city tax((: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That)). In the event that the county ((shall impose)) imposes
a sales and use tax under the authority of this subsection at a rate
which is less than the rate imposed under this subsection by a city
within the county, the county shall receive that amount of revenues
from the city tax equal to fifteen percent of the rate of tax imposed
by the county under the authority of this subsection. The authority to
impose a tax under this subsection is intended in part to compensate
local government for any losses from the phase-out of the property tax
on business inventories.
(3) The rate of sales and use tax imposed by a city under the
authority of subsections (1) and (2) of this section may be altered
pursuant to a government service agreement as provided in RCW
36.115.040 and 36.115.050.
(4) The percentage of a city's sales and use tax receipts that a
county receives under the authority of subsections (1) and (2) of this
section may be altered pursuant to a government service agreement as
provided in RCW 36.115.040 and 36.115.050.

Sec. 303 RCW 82.14.045 and 2001 c 89 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any city pursuant to RCW 35.92.060, of
any county which has created an unincorporated transportation benefit
area pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110, of any public
transportation benefit area pursuant to RCW 36.57A.080 and 36.57A.090,
of any county transportation authority established pursuant to chapter
36.57 RCW, and of any metropolitan municipal corporation within a
county with a population of one million or more pursuant to chapter
35.58 RCW, may, by resolution or ordinance for the sole purpose of
providing funds for the operation, maintenance, or capital needs of
public transportation systems or public transportation limited to
persons with special needs under RCW 36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, and in
lieu of the excise taxes authorized by RCW 35.95.040, submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters or include such authorization in
a proposition to perform the function of public transportation or
public transportation limited to persons with special needs under RCW
36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, and if approved by a majority of persons
voting thereon, ((fix and)) impose a sales and use tax in accordance
with the terms of this chapter((: PROVIDED, That no such legislative
body shall impose such a sales and use tax without submitting such an
authorizing proposition to the voters and obtaining the approval of a
majority of persons voting thereon: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). Where
((such a)) an authorizing proposition is submitted by a county on
behalf of an unincorporated transportation benefit area, it shall be
voted upon by the voters residing within the boundaries of such
unincorporated transportation benefit area and, if approved, the sales
and use tax shall be imposed only within such area. Notwithstanding
any provisions of this section to the contrary, any county in which a
county public transportation plan has been adopted pursuant to RCW
36.57.070 and the voters of such county have authorized the imposition
of a sales and use tax pursuant to the provisions of section 10,
chapter 167, Laws of 1974 ex. sess., prior to July 1, 1975, shall be
authorized to ((fix and)) impose a sales and use tax as provided in
this section at not to exceed the rate so authorized without additional
approval of the voters of such county as otherwise required by this
section.
The tax authorized ((pursuant to)) by this section shall be in
addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and shall be collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state ((pursuant to)) under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within such city, public transportation benefit area, county, or
metropolitan municipal corporation as the case may be. The rate of
such tax shall be one-tenth, two-tenths, three-tenths, four-tenths,
five-tenths, six-tenths, seven-tenths, eight-tenths, or nine-tenths of
one percent ((of the selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or
value of the article used (in the case of a use tax))). The rate of
such tax shall not exceed the rate authorized by the voters unless such
increase shall be similarly approved.
(2)(a) In the event a metropolitan municipal corporation ((shall))
imposes a sales and use tax pursuant to this chapter no city, county
which has created an unincorporated transportation benefit area, public
transportation benefit area authority, or county transportation
authority wholly within such metropolitan municipal corporation shall
be empowered to ((levy)) impose and/or collect taxes ((pursuant to))
under RCW ((35.58.273,)) 35.95.040((, and/or 82.14.045)) or this
section, but nothing herein shall prevent such city or county from
imposing sales and use taxes pursuant to any other authorization.
(b) In the event a county transportation authority ((shall))
imposes a sales and use tax ((pursuant to)) under this section, no
city, county which has created an unincorporated transportation benefit
area, public transportation benefit area, or metropolitan municipal
corporation, located within the territory of the authority, shall be
empowered to ((levy)) impose or collect taxes ((pursuant to)) under RCW
((35.58.273,)) 35.95.040((,)) or ((82.14.045)) this section.
(c) In the event a public transportation benefit area ((shall))
imposes a sales and use tax ((pursuant to)) under this section, no
city, county which has created an unincorporated transportation benefit
area, or metropolitan municipal corporation, located wholly or partly
within the territory of the public transportation benefit area, shall
be empowered to ((levy)) impose or collect taxes ((pursuant to)) under
RCW ((35.58.273,)) 35.95.040((,)) or ((82.14.045)) this section.
(((3) Any local sales and use tax revenue collected pursuant to
this section by any city or by any county for transportation purposes
pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110 shall not be counted as locally
generated tax revenues for the purposes of apportionment and
distribution, in the manner prescribed by chapter 82.44 RCW, of the
proceeds of the motor vehicle excise tax authorized pursuant to RCW
35.58.273, except that the local sales and use tax revenue collected
under this section by a city with a population greater than sixty
thousand that as of January 1, 1998, owns and operates a municipal
public transportation system shall be counted as locally generated tax
revenues for the purposes of apportionment and distribution, in the
manner prescribed by chapter 82.44 RCW, of the proceeds of the motor
vehicle excise tax authorized under RCW 35.58.273 as follows:
(a) For fiscal year 2000, revenues collected under this section
shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for up to 25 percent
of the tax collected under RCW 35.58.273;
(b) For fiscal year 2001, revenues collected under this section
shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for up to 50 percent
of the tax collected under RCW 35.58.273;
(c) For fiscal year 2002, revenues collected under this section
shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for up to 75 percent
of the tax collected under RCW 35.58.273; and
(d) For fiscal year 2003 and thereafter, revenues collected under
this section shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for up
to 100 percent of the tax collected under RCW 35.58.273.))

Sec. 304 RCW 82.14.048 and 1999 c 165 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governing board of a public facilities district under
chapter 36.100 or 35.57 RCW may submit an authorizing proposition to
the voters of the district, and if the proposition is approved by a
majority of persons voting, ((fix and)) impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter.
(2) The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the public facilities
district. The rate of tax shall not exceed two-tenths of one percent
((of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the
article used, in the case of a use tax)).
(3) Moneys received from any tax imposed under this section shall
be used for the purpose of providing funds for the costs associated
with the financing, design, acquisition, construction, equipping,
operating, maintaining, remodeling, repairing, and reequipping of its
public facilities.
((No tax may be collected under this section by a public facilities
district under chapter 35.57 RCW before August 1, 2000, and no tax in
excess of one-tenth of one percent may be collected under this section
by a public facilities district under chapter 36.100 RCW before August
1, 2000.))

Sec. 305 RCW 82.14.0485 and 1995 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 101 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the
terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes
authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax
shall not exceed 0.017 percent ((of the selling price in the case of a
sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax)).
(2) The tax ((imposed)) authorized under subsection (1) of this
section ((shall be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required
to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue)) is a credit
against the state tax under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department
of revenue shall perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the
county at no cost to the county and shall remit the tax to the county
as provided in RCW 82.14.060.
(3) Moneys collected under the authority of this section shall only
be used for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by a county to construct a baseball stadium.
(4) No tax may be collected under the authority of this section
before January 1, 1996, and no tax may be collected under this section
unless the taxes under RCW 82.14.360 are being collected. The tax
((imposed in)) authorized under this section shall expire when the
bonds issued for the construction of the baseball stadium are retired,
but not more than twenty years after the tax is first collected.
(5) As used in this section, "baseball stadium" means a baseball
stadium with natural turf and a retractable roof or canopy, together
with associated parking facilities, constructed in the largest city in
a county with a population of one million or more.

Sec. 306 RCW 82.14.049 and 1997 c 220 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county may impose a sales and
use tax, in addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030, upon
retail car rentals within the county that are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of tax shall be one
percent ((of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or rental
value of the vehicle in the case of a use tax)). Proceeds of the tax
shall not be used to subsidize any professional sports team and shall
be used solely for the following purposes:
(((1))) (a) Acquiring, constructing, maintaining, or operating
public sports stadium facilities;
(((2))) (b) Engineering, planning, financial, legal, or
professional services incidental to public sports stadium facilities;
(((3))) (c) Youth or amateur sport activities or facilities; or
(((4))) (d) Debt or refinancing debt issued for the purposes of (a)
of this subsection (((1) of this section)).
(2) At least seventy-five percent of the tax ((imposed)) authorized
under this section shall be used for the purposes of ((subsections))
subsection (1)((, (2), and (4))) of this section.

Sec. 307 RCW 82.14.0494 and 1997 c 220 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county that has created a public
stadium authority to develop a stadium and exhibition center under RCW
36.102.050 may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with this
chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and
shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the county. The rate of tax shall be 0.016 percent ((of
the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article
used in the case of a use tax)).
(2) The tax ((imposed)) authorized under subsection (1) of this
section ((shall be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required
to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue)) is a credit
against the state tax under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department
of revenue shall perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the
county at no cost to the county and shall remit the tax to the county
as provided in RCW 82.14.060.
(3) Before the issuance of bonds in RCW 43.99N.020, all revenues
collected on behalf of the county under the authority of this section
shall be transferred to the public stadium authority. After bonds are
issued under RCW 43.99N.020, all revenues collected on behalf of the
county under the authority of this section shall be deposited in the
stadium and exhibition center account under RCW 43.99N.060.
(4) The definitions in RCW 36.102.010 apply to this section.
(5) This section expires on the earliest of the following dates:
(a) December 31, 1999, if the conditions for issuance of bonds
under RCW 43.99N.020 have not been met before that date;
(b) The date on which all bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 have
been retired; or
(c) Twenty-three years after the date the tax authorized under this
section is first imposed.

Sec. 308 RCW 82.14.010 and 1970 ex.s. c 94 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the several counties and cities of
the state lack adequate sources of revenue to carry out essential
county and municipal purposes. The legislature further finds that the
most efficient and appropriate methods of deriving revenues for such
purposes is to vest additional taxing powers in the governing bodies of
counties and cities which they may or may not implement. The
legislature intends, by enacting this chapter, to provide the means by
which essential county and municipal purposes can be financially served
should they choose to employ them.
(2) It is the intent of this chapter that any local sales and use
tax adopted under the authority of this chapter be identical to the
state sales and use tax, unless otherwise prohibited by federal law,
and with other local sales and use taxes adopted under the authority of
this chapter. It is further the intent of this chapter that the local
sales and use tax shall be imposed upon an individual taxable event
simultaneously with the imposition of the state sales or use tax upon
the same taxable event. The rule-making powers of the department
contained in RCW 82.08.060 and 82.32.300 are applicable to this
chapter.

Sec. 309 RCW 82.14.310 and 2005 c 282 s 49 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county criminal justice assistance account is created in
the state treasury. Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer
shall transfer into the county criminal justice assistance account from
the general fund the sum of twenty-three million two hundred thousand
dollars divided into four equal deposits occurring on July 1, October
1, January 1, and April 1. For each fiscal year thereafter, the state
treasurer shall increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth
factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by
the office of financial management in November of the preceding year.
(2) The moneys deposited in the county criminal justice assistance
account for distribution under this section, less any moneys
appropriated for purposes under subsection (4) of this section, shall
be distributed ((at such times as distributions are made under RCW
82.44.150)) quarterly during the months of January, April, July, and
October and on the relative basis of each county's funding factor as
determined under this subsection.
(a) A county's funding factor is the sum of:
(i) The population of the county, divided by one thousand, and
multiplied by two-tenths;
(ii) The crime rate of the county, multiplied by three-tenths; and
(iii) The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county
superior court, for each one thousand in population, multiplied by
five-tenths.
(b) Under this section and RCW 82.14.320 and 82.14.330:
(i) The population of the county or city shall be as last
determined by the office of financial management;
(ii) The crime rate of the county or city is the annual occurrence
of specified criminal offenses, as calculated in the most recent annual
report on crime in Washington state as published by the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, for each one thousand in
population;
(iii) The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county
superior court shall be determined by the most recent annual report of
the courts of Washington, as published by the administrative office of
the courts;
(iv) Distributions and eligibility for distributions in the 1989-91
biennium shall be based on 1988 figures for both the crime rate as
described under (ii) of this subsection and the annual number of
criminal cases that are filed as described under (iii) of this
subsection. Future distributions shall be based on the most recent
figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of this
subsection and the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as
described under (iii) of this subsection.
(3) Moneys distributed under this section shall be expended
exclusively for criminal justice purposes and shall not be used to
replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal justice purposes are
defined as activities that substantially assist the criminal justice
system, which may include circumstances where ancillary benefit to the
civil or juvenile justice system occurs, and which includes (a)
domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic violence
programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW
70.123.020, and (b) during the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, juvenile
dispositional hearings relating to petitions for at-risk youth,
truancy, and children in need of services. Existing funding for
purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar year 1989 actual
operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes. Calendar year
1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes
exclude the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events not
likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for criminal justice
services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction receiving the
services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.
(4) Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the county
criminal justice assistance account shall be available for
appropriations for enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory
system and the continuing costs related to these enhancements. Funds
appropriated from this account for such enhancements shall not supplant
existing funds from the state general fund.

Sec. 310 RCW 82.14.320 and 1998 c 321 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The municipal criminal justice assistance account is created in
the state treasury. Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer
shall transfer into the municipal criminal justice assistance account
for distribution under this section from the general fund the sum of
four million six hundred thousand dollars divided into four equal
deposits occurring on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For
each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer shall increase the
total transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW
43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial
management in November of the preceding year.
(2) No city may receive a distribution under this section from the
municipal criminal justice assistance account unless:
(a) The city has a crime rate in excess of one hundred twenty-five
percent of the statewide average as calculated in the most recent
annual report on crime in Washington state as published by the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;
(b) The city has levied the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2) at
the maximum rate or the tax authorized in RCW 82.46.010(3) at the
maximum rate; and
(c) The city has a per capita yield from the tax imposed under RCW
82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate of less than one hundred fifty percent
of the statewide average per capita yield for all cities from such
local sales and use tax.
(3) The moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice
assistance account for distribution under this section, less any moneys
appropriated for purposes under subsection (7) of this section, shall
be distributed ((at such times as distributions are made under RCW
82.44.150)) quarterly during the months of January, April, July, and
October. The distributions shall be made as follows:
(a) Unless reduced by this subsection, thirty percent of the moneys
shall be distributed ratably based on population as last determined by
the office of financial management to those cities eligible under
subsection (2) of this section that have a crime rate determined under
subsection (2)(a) of this section which is greater than one hundred
seventy-five percent of the statewide average crime rate. No city may
receive more than fifty percent of any moneys distributed under this
subsection (a) but, if a city distribution is reduced as a result of
exceeding the fifty percent limitation, the amount not distributed
shall be distributed under (b) of this subsection.
(b) The remainder of the moneys, including any moneys not
distributed in subsection (2)(a) of this section, shall be distributed
to all cities eligible under subsection (2) of this section ratably
based on population as last determined by the office of financial
management.
(4) No city may receive more than thirty percent of all moneys
distributed under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the
distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals
its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the
county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or
3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the city is located.
(6) Moneys distributed under this section shall be expended
exclusively for criminal justice purposes and shall not be used to
replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal justice purposes are
defined as activities that substantially assist the criminal justice
system, which may include circumstances where ancillary benefit to the
civil justice system occurs, and which includes domestic violence
services such as those provided by domestic violence programs,
community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020,
and publications and public educational efforts designed to provide
information and assistance to parents in dealing with runaway or at-risk youth. Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is
defined as calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for
criminal justice purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual operating
expenditures for criminal justice purposes exclude the following:
Expenditures for extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in
contract provisions for criminal justice services, beyond the control
of the local jurisdiction receiving the services, and major
nonrecurring capital expenditures.
(7) Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the
municipal criminal justice assistance account shall be available for
appropriations for enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory
system and the continuing costs related to these enhancements. Funds
appropriated from this account for such enhancements shall not supplant
existing funds from the state general fund.

Sec. 311 RCW 82.14.330 and 2003 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer shall
transfer into the municipal criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under this section from the general fund the sum of four
million six hundred thousand dollars divided into four equal deposits
occurring on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For each
fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer shall increase the total
transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025,
forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial management in
November of the preceding year. The moneys deposited in the municipal
criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this
section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsection (4)
of this section, shall be distributed to the cities of the state as
follows:
(a) Twenty percent appropriated for distribution shall be
distributed to cities with a three-year average violent crime rate for
each one thousand in population in excess of one hundred fifty percent
of the statewide three-year average violent crime rate for each one
thousand in population. The three-year average violent crime rate
shall be calculated using the violent crime rates for each of the
preceding three years from the annual reports on crime in Washington
state as published by the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs. Moneys shall be distributed under this subsection (1)(a)
ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management, but no city may receive more than one dollar per
capita. Moneys remaining undistributed under this subsection at the
end of each calendar year shall be distributed to the criminal justice
training commission to reimburse participating city law enforcement
agencies with ten or fewer full-time commissioned patrol officers the
cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic
law enforcement training, as provided in RCW 43.101.200.
(b) Sixteen percent shall be distributed to cities ratably based on
population as last determined by the office of financial management,
but no city may receive less than one thousand dollars.
The moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance
account for distribution under this subsection shall be distributed
((at such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150))
quarterly during the months of January, April, July, and October.
Moneys distributed under this subsection shall be expended
exclusively for criminal justice purposes and shall not be used to
replace or supplant existing funding. Criminal justice purposes are
defined as activities that substantially assist the criminal justice
system, which may include circumstances where ancillary benefit to the
civil justice system occurs, and which includes domestic violence
services such as those provided by domestic violence programs,
community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020.
Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar
year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes.
Calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice
purposes exclude the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events
not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for criminal
justice services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction
receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.
(2) In addition to the distributions under subsection (1) of this
section:
(a) Ten percent shall be distributed on a per capita basis to
cities that contract with another governmental agency for the majority
of the city's law enforcement services. Cities that subsequently
qualify for this distribution shall notify the department of community,
trade, and economic development by November 30th for the upcoming
calendar year. The department of community, trade, and economic
development shall provide a list of eligible cities to the state
treasurer by December 31st. The state treasurer shall modify the
distribution of these funds in the following year. Cities have the
responsibility to notify the department of community, trade, and
economic development of any changes regarding these contractual
relationships. Adjustments in the distribution formula to add or
delete cities may be made only for the upcoming calendar year; no
adjustments may be made retroactively.
(b) The remaining fifty-four percent shall be distributed to cities
and towns by the state treasurer on a per capita basis. These funds
shall be used for: (i) Innovative law enforcement strategies; (ii)
programs to help at-risk children or child abuse victim response
programs; and (iii) programs designed to reduce the level of domestic
violence or to provide counseling for domestic violence victims.
The moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance
account for distribution under this subsection, less any moneys
appropriated for purposes under subsection (4) of this section, shall
be distributed ((at the times as distributions are made under RCW
82.44.150)) quarterly during the months of January, April, July, and
October. Moneys remaining undistributed under this subsection at the
end of each calendar year shall be distributed to the criminal justice
training commission to reimburse participating city law enforcement
agencies with ten or fewer full-time commissioned patrol officers the
cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic
law enforcement training, as provided in RCW 43.101.200.
If a city is found by the state auditor to have expended funds
received under this subsection in a manner that does not comply with
the criteria under which the moneys were received, the city shall be
ineligible to receive future distributions under this subsection until
the use of the moneys are justified to the satisfaction of the director
or are repaid to the state general fund.
(3) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the
distributions to any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals
its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the
county for costs associated with criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or
3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which the city is located.
(4) Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the
municipal criminal justice assistance account shall be available for
appropriations for enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory
system and the continuing costs related to these enhancements. Funds
appropriated from this account for such enhancements shall not supplant
existing funds from the state general fund.

Sec. 312 RCW 82.14.340 and 1995 c 309 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county may ((fix and)) impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter,
provided that such sales and use tax is subject to repeal by
referendum, using the procedures provided in RCW 82.14.036. The
referendum procedure provided in RCW 82.14.036 is the exclusive method
for subjecting any county sales and use tax ordinance or resolution to
a referendum vote.
(2) The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
upon the occurrence of any taxable event within such county. The rate
of tax shall equal one-tenth of one percent ((of the selling price (in
the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of
a use tax))).
(3) When distributing moneys collected under the authority of this
section, the state treasurer shall distribute ten percent of the moneys
to the county in which the tax was collected. The remainder of the
moneys collected under the authority of this section shall be
distributed to the county and the cities within the county ratably
based on population as last determined by the office of financial
management. In making the distribution based on population, the county
shall receive that proportion that the unincorporated population of the
county bears to the total population of the county and each city shall
receive that proportion that the city incorporated population bears to
the total county population.
(4) Moneys received from any tax imposed under the authority of
this section shall be expended exclusively for criminal justice
purposes and shall not be used to replace or supplant existing funding.
Criminal justice purposes are defined as activities that substantially
assist the criminal justice system, which may include circumstances
where ancillary benefit to the civil justice system occurs, and which
includes domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic
violence programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined
in RCW 70.123.020. Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is
defined as calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for
criminal justice purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual operating
expenditures for criminal justice purposes exclude the following:
Expenditures for extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in
contract provisions for criminal justice services, beyond the control
of the local jurisdiction receiving the services, and major
nonrecurring capital expenditures.
(5) In the expenditure of funds for criminal justice purposes as
provided in this section, cities and counties, or any combination
thereof, are expressly authorized to participate in agreements,
pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW, to jointly expend funds for criminal
justice purposes of mutual benefit. Such criminal justice purposes of
mutual benefit include, but are not limited to, the construction,
improvement, and expansion of jails, court facilities, and juvenile
justice facilities.

Sec. 313 RCW 82.14.350 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 10 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority in a county with a population of
less than one million may submit an authorizing proposition to the
county voters, and if the proposition is approved by a majority of
persons voting, ((fix and)) impose a sales and use tax in accordance
with the terms of this chapter for the purposes designated in
subsection (3) of this section.
(2) The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax
shall equal one-tenth of one percent ((of the selling price in the case
of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use
tax)).
(3) Moneys received from any tax imposed under the authority of
this section shall be used solely for the purpose of providing funds
for costs associated with financing, design, acquisition, construction,
equipping, operating, maintaining, remodeling, repairing, reequipping,
and improvement of juvenile detention facilities and jails.
(4) Counties are authorized to develop joint ventures to colocate
juvenile detention facilities and to colocate jails.

Sec. 314 RCW 82.14.360 and 2000 c 103 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more may impose a special stadium sales and use tax upon the
retail sale or use within the county by restaurants, taverns, and bars
of food and beverages that are taxable by the state under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of the tax shall not exceed five-tenths
of one percent ((of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax)). The tax
((imposed)) authorized under this subsection is in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall not be credited against any
other tax imposed upon the same taxable event. As used in this
section, "restaurant" does not include grocery stores, mini-markets, or
convenience stores.
(2) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more may impose a special stadium sales and use tax upon
retail car rentals within the county that are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of the tax shall not
exceed two percent ((of the selling price in the case of a sales tax,
or rental value of the vehicle in the case of a use tax)). The tax
((imposed)) authorized under this subsection is in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall not be credited against any
other tax imposed upon the same taxable event.
(3) The revenue from the taxes imposed under the authority of this
section shall be used for the purpose of principal and interest
payments on bonds, issued by the county, to acquire, construct, own,
remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate a baseball
stadium. Revenues from the taxes authorized in this section may be
used for design and other preconstruction costs of the baseball stadium
until bonds are issued for the baseball stadium. The county shall
issue bonds, in an amount determined to be necessary by the public
facilities district, for the district to acquire, construct, own, and
equip the baseball stadium. The county shall have no obligation to
issue bonds in an amount greater than that which would be supported by
the tax revenues under this section, RCW 82.14.0485, and 36.38.010(4)
(a) and (b). If the revenue from the taxes imposed under the authority
of this section exceeds the amount needed for such principal and
interest payments in any year, the excess shall be used solely:
(a) For early retirement of the bonds issued for the baseball
stadium; and
(b) If the revenue from the taxes imposed under this section
exceeds the amount needed for the purposes in (a) of this subsection in
any year, the excess shall be placed in a contingency fund which may
only be used to pay unanticipated capital costs on the baseball
stadium, excluding any cost overruns on initial construction.
(4) ((The taxes authorized under this section shall not be
collected after June 30, 1997, unless the county executive has
certified to the department of revenue that a professional major league
baseball team has made a binding and legally enforceable contractual
commitment to:
(a) Play at least ninety percent of its home games in the stadium
for a period of time not shorter than the term of the bonds issued to
finance the initial construction of the stadium;
(b) Contribute forty-five million dollars toward the reasonably
necessary preconstruction costs including, but not limited to
architectural, engineering, environmental, and legal services, and the
cost of construction of the stadium, or to any associated public
purpose separate from bond-financed property, including without
limitation land acquisition, parking facilities, equipment,
infrastructure, or other similar costs associated with the project,
which contribution shall be made during a term not to exceed the term
of the bonds issued to finance the initial construction of the stadium.
If all or part of the contribution is made after the date of issuance
of the bonds, the team shall contribute an additional amount equal to
the accruing interest on the deferred portion of the contribution,
calculated at the interest rate on the bonds maturing in the year in
which the deferred contribution is made. No part of the contribution
may be made without the consent of the county until a public facilities
district is created under chapter 36.100 RCW to acquire, construct,
own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate a baseball
stadium. To the extent possible, contributions shall be structured in
a manner that would allow for the issuance of bonds to construct the
stadium that are exempt from federal income taxes; and
(c) Share a portion of the profits generated by the baseball team
from the operation of the professional franchise for a period of time
equal to the term of the bonds issued to finance the initial
construction of the stadium, after offsetting any losses incurred by
the baseball team after the effective date of chapter 14, Laws of 1995
1st sp. sess. Such profits and the portion to be shared shall be
defined by agreement between the public facilities district and the
baseball team. The shared profits shall be used to retire the bonds
issued to finance the initial construction of the stadium. If the
bonds are retired before the expiration of their term, the shared
profits shall be paid to the public facilities district.
(5) No tax may be collected under this section before January 1,
1996. Before collecting the taxes under this section or issuing bonds
for a baseball stadium, the county shall create a public facilities
district under chapter 36.100 RCW to acquire, construct, own, remodel,
maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate a baseball stadium.
(6) The county shall assemble such real property as the district
determines to be necessary as a site for the baseball stadium.
Property which is necessary for this purpose that is owned by the
county on October 17, 1995, shall be contributed to the district, and
property which is necessary for this purpose that is acquired by the
county on or after October 17, 1995, shall be conveyed to the district.
(7))) The proceeds of any bonds issued for the baseball stadium
shall be provided to the district.
(((8))) (5) As used in this section, "baseball stadium" means
"baseball stadium" as defined in RCW 82.14.0485.
(((9))) (6) The taxes imposed under the authority of this section
shall expire when the bonds issued for the construction of the baseball
stadium are retired, but not later than twenty years after the taxes
are first collected.

Sec. 315 RCW 82.14.370 and 2004 c 130 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a rural county may impose a sales
and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is
in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
county. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.08 percent ((of the selling
price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the
case of a use tax)), except that for rural counties with population
densities between sixty and one hundred persons per square mile, the
rate shall not exceed 0.04 percent before January 1, 2000.
(2) The tax ((imposed)) authorized under subsection (1) of this
section ((shall be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required
to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue)) is a credit
against the state tax under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department
of revenue shall perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the
county at no cost to the county and shall remit the tax to the county
as provided in RCW 82.14.060.
(3)(a) Moneys collected under the authority of this section shall
only be used to finance public facilities serving economic development
purposes in rural counties. The public facility must be listed as an
item in the officially adopted county overall economic development
plan, or the economic development section of the county's comprehensive
plan, or the comprehensive plan of a city or town located within the
county for those counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040. For those
counties that do not have an adopted overall economic development plan
and do not plan under the growth management act, the public facility
must be listed in the county's capital facilities plan or the capital
facilities plan of a city or town located within the county.
(b) In implementing this section, the county shall consult with
cities, towns, and port districts located within the county and the
associate development organization serving the county to ensure that
the expenditure meets the goals of chapter 130, Laws of 2004 and the
requirements of (a) of this subsection. Each county collecting money
under the authority of this section shall report to the office of the
state auditor, no later than October 1st of each year, a list of new
projects from the prior fiscal year, showing that the county has used
the funds for those projects consistent with the goals of chapter 130,
Laws of 2004 and the requirements of (a) of this subsection. Any
projects financed prior to June 10, 2004, from the proceeds of
obligations to which the tax imposed under the authority of subsection
(1) of this section has been pledged shall not be deemed to be new
projects under this subsection.
(c) For the purposes of this section, (i) "public facilities" means
bridges, roads, domestic and industrial water facilities, sanitary
sewer facilities, earth stabilization, storm sewer facilities,
railroad, electricity, natural gas, buildings, structures,
telecommunications infrastructure, transportation infrastructure, or
commercial infrastructure, and port facilities in the state of
Washington; and (ii) "economic development purposes" means those
purposes which facilitate the creation or retention of businesses and
jobs in a county.
(4) No tax may be collected under the authority of this section
before July 1, 1998. No tax may be collected under the authority of
this section by a county more than twenty-five years after the date
that a tax is first imposed under this section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "rural county" means a county
with a population density of less than one hundred persons per square
mile or a county smaller than two hundred twenty-five square miles as
determined by the office of financial management and published each
year by the department for the period July 1st to June 30th.

Sec. 316 RCW 82.14.390 and 2002 c 363 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
governing body of a public facilities district created before July 31,
2002, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that commences construction of
a new regional center, or improvement or rehabilitation of an existing
new regional center, before January 1, 2004, may impose a sales and use
tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from
those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the public
facilities district. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.033 percent
((of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the
article used in the case of a use tax)).
(2) The tax ((imposed)) authorized under subsection (1) of this
section ((shall be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required
to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue)) is a credit
against the state tax under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department
of revenue shall perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the
county at no cost to the public facilities district and shall remit the
tax to the district as provided in RCW 82.14.060.
(3) ((No tax may be collected under this section before August 1,
2000.)) The tax imposed ((in)) under the authority of this section
shall expire when the bonds issued for the construction of the regional
center and related parking facilities are retired, but not more than
twenty-five years after the tax is first collected.
(4) Moneys collected under the authority of this section shall only
be used for the purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched
with an amount from other public or private sources equal to thirty-three percent of the amount collected under the authority of this
section, provided that amounts generated from nonvoter approved taxes
authorized under chapter 35.57 RCW or nonvoter approved taxes
authorized under chapter 36.100 RCW shall not constitute a public or
private source. For the purpose of this section, public or private
sources includes, but is not limited to cash or in-kind contributions
used in all phases of the development or improvement of the regional
center, land that is donated and used for the siting of the regional
center, cash or in-kind contributions from public or private
foundations, or amounts attributed to private sector partners as part
of a public and private partnership agreement negotiated by the public
facilities district.
(5) The combined total tax ((levied)) imposed under the authority
of this section shall not be greater than 0.033 percent. If both a
public facilities district created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public
facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under
the authority of this section, the tax imposed by a public facilities
district created under chapter 35.57 RCW shall be credited against the
tax imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter
36.100 RCW.
(6) A public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW
is not eligible to impose the tax authorized under this section if the
legislative authority of the county where the public facilities
district is located has imposed a sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

Sec. 317 RCW 82.14.400 and 2000 c 240 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon the joint request of a metropolitan park district, a city
with a population of more than one hundred fifty thousand, and a county
legislative authority in a county with a national park and a population
of more than five hundred thousand and less than one million five
hundred thousand, the county shall submit an authorizing proposition to
the county voters, ((fixing and)) imposing a sales and use tax in
accordance with this chapter for the purposes designated in subsection
(4) of this section and identified in the joint request. Such
proposition must be placed on a ballot for a special or general
election to be held no later than one year after the date of the joint
request.
(2) The proposition is approved if it receives the votes of a
majority of those voting on the proposition.
(3) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax
shall equal no more than one-tenth of one percent ((of the selling
price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the
case of a use tax)).
(4) Moneys received from any tax imposed under the authority of
this section shall be used solely for the purpose of providing funds
for:
(a) Costs associated with financing, design, acquisition,
construction, equipping, operating, maintaining, remodeling, repairing,
reequipping, or improvement of zoo, aquarium, and wildlife preservation
and display facilities that are currently accredited by the American
zoo and aquarium association; or
(b) Those costs associated with (a) of this subsection and costs
related to parks located within a county described in subsection (1) of
this section.
(5) The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county. In lieu of the
charge for the administration and collection of local sales and use
taxes under RCW 82.14.050 from which the county is exempt under this
subsection (5), a percentage of the tax revenues authorized by this
section equal to one-half of the maximum percentage provided in RCW
82.14.050 shall be transferred annually to the department of community,
trade, and economic development, or its successor agency, from the
funds allocated under subsection (6)(b) of this section for a period of
twelve years from the first date of distribution of funds under
subsection (6)(b) of this section. The department of community, trade,
and economic development, or its successor agency, shall use funds
transferred to it pursuant to this subsection (5) to provide, operate,
and maintain community-based housing under chapter 43.185 RCW for
persons who are mentally ill.
(6) If the joint request and the authorizing proposition include
provisions for funding those costs included within subsection (4)(b) of
this section, the tax revenues authorized by this section shall be
allocated annually as follows:
(a) Fifty percent to the zoo and aquarium advisory authority; and
(b) Fifty percent to be distributed on a per capita basis as set
out in the most recent population figures for unincorporated and
incorporated areas only within that county, as determined by the office
of financial management, solely for parks, as follows: To any
metropolitan park district, to cities and towns not contained within a
metropolitan park district, and the remainder to the county. Moneys
received under this subsection (6)(b) by a county may not be used to
replace or supplant existing per capita funding.
(7) Funds shall be distributed annually by the county treasurer to
the county, and cities and towns located within the county, in the
manner set out in subsection (6)(b) of this section.
(8) Prior to expenditure of any funds received by the county under
subsection (6)(b) of this section, the county shall establish a process
which considers needs throughout the unincorporated areas of the county
in consultation with community advisory councils established by
ordinance.
(9) By December 31, 2005, and thereafter, the county or any city
with a population greater than eighty thousand must provide at least
one dollar match for every two dollars received under this section.
(10) Properties subject to a memorandum of agreement between the
federal bureau of land management, the advisory council on historic
preservation, and the Washington state historic preservation officer
have priority for funding from money received under subsection (6)(b)
of this section for implementation of the stipulations in the
memorandum of agreement.
(a) At least one hundred thousand dollars of the first four years
of allocations under subsection (6)(b) of this section, to be matched
by the county or city with one dollar for every two dollars received,
shall be used to implement the stipulations of the memorandum of
agreement and for other historical, archaeological, architectural, and
cultural preservation and improvements related to the properties.
(b) The amount in (a) of this subsection shall come equally from
the allocations to the county and to the city in which the properties
are located, unless otherwise agreed to by the county and the city.
(c) The amount in (a) of this subsection shall not be construed to
displace or be offered in lieu of any lease payment from a county or
city to the state for the properties in question.

Sec. 318 RCW 82.14.420 and 2002 c 176 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may submit an authorizing
proposition to the county voters, and if the proposition is approved by
a majority of persons voting, ((fix and)) impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter for the purposes designated
in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax
shall equal one-tenth of one percent ((of the selling price in the case
of sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax)).
(3) Moneys received from any tax imposed under the authority of
this section shall be used solely for the purpose of providing funds
for costs associated with financing, design, acquisition, construction,
equipping, operating, maintaining, remodeling, repairing, reequipping,
and improvement of emergency communication systems and facilities.
(4) Counties are authorized to develop joint ventures to collocate
emergency communication systems and facilities.
(5) Prior to submitting the tax authorization in subsection (2) of
this section to the voters in a county that provides emergency
communication services to a governmental agency pursuant to a contract,
the parties to the contract shall review and negotiate or affirm the
terms of the contract.
(6) Prior to submitting the tax authorized in subsection (2) of
this section to the voters, a county with a population of more than
five hundred thousand in which any city over fifty thousand operates
emergency communication systems and facilities shall enter into an
interlocal agreement with the city to determine distribution of the
revenue provided in this section.

Sec. 319 RCW 82.14.430 and 2002 c 56 s 405 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If approved by the majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, a regional transportation investment
district may impose a sales and use tax of up to 0.5 percent ((of the
selling price or value of the article used in the case of a use tax)).
The tax authorized by this section is in addition to the tax authorized
by RCW 82.14.030 and must be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing district. Motor
vehicles are exempt from the sales and use tax imposed under this
subsection.
(2) If approved by the majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, a regional transportation investment
district may impose a tax on the use of a motor vehicle within a
regional transportation investment district. The tax applies to those
persons who reside within the regional transportation investment
district. The rate of the tax may not exceed 0.5 percent ((of the
value of the motor vehicle)). The tax authorized by this subsection is
in addition to the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030 and must be
imposed and collected at the time a taxable event under RCW
82.08.020(1) or 82.12.020 takes place. All revenue received under this
subsection must be deposited in the local sales and use tax account and
distributed to the regional transportation investment district
according to RCW 82.14.050. The following provisions apply to the use
tax in this subsection:
(a) Where persons are taxable under chapter 82.08 RCW, the seller
shall collect the use tax from the buyer using the collection
provisions of RCW 82.08.050.
(b) Where persons are taxable under chapter 82.12 RCW, the use tax
must be collected using the provisions of RCW 82.12.045.
(c) "Motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but
does not include farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW
46.04.180 and 46.04.181, off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in
RCW 46.09.020, and snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(d) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(e) The value of a motor vehicle must be determined under RCW
82.12.010.
(f) Except as specifically stated in this subsection (2), chapters
82.12 and 82.32 RCW apply to the use tax. The use tax is a local tax
imposed under the authority of this chapter ((82.14 RCW)), and this
chapter ((82.14 RCW)) applies fully to the use tax.

Sec. 320 RCW 82.14.440 and 2003 c 83 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Public transportation benefit areas providing passenger-only
ferry service as provided in RCW 36.57A.200 whose boundaries (((1)))
(a) are on the Puget Sound, but (((2))) (b) do not include an area
where a regional transit authority has been formed, may submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters and, if approved by a majority of
persons voting, ((fix and)) impose a sales and use tax in accordance
with the terms of this chapter, solely for the purpose of providing
passenger-only ferry service.
(2) The tax authorized by this section is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of a taxable event within the taxing district. The maximum
rate of the tax must be approved by the voters and may not exceed four-tenths of one percent ((of the selling price in the case of a sales tax
or value of the article used in the case of a use tax)).

Sec. 321 RCW 82.14.450 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 24 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may submit an authorizing
proposition to the county voters at a primary or general election and,
if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which
the proposed sales and use tax will be used. Funds raised under this
tax shall not supplant existing funds used for these purposes. The
rate of tax authorized under this section shall not exceed three-tenths
of one percent ((of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used, in the case of a use tax)).
(2) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county.
(3) The retail sale or use of motor vehicles, and the lease of
motor vehicles for up to the first thirty-six months of the lease, are
exempt from tax imposed under this section.
(4) One-third of all money received under this section shall be
used solely for criminal justice purposes. For the purposes of this
subsection, "criminal justice purposes" means additional police
protection, mitigation of congested court systems, or relief of
overcrowded jails or other local correctional facilities.
(5) Money received under the authority of this section shall be
shared between the county and the cities as follows: Sixty percent
shall be retained by the county and forty percent shall be distributed
on a per capita basis to cities in the county.

Sec. 322 RCW 82.14.460 and 2005 c 504 s 804 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may ((authorize, fix, and))
impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this
chapter.
(2) The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax
shall equal one-tenth of one percent ((of the selling price in the case
of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use
tax)).
(3) Moneys collected under the authority of this section shall be
used solely for the purpose of providing new or expanded chemical
dependency or mental health treatment services and for the operation of
new or expanded therapeutic court programs. Moneys collected under the
authority of this section shall not be used to supplant existing
funding for these purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 323 (1) Any fund balance remaining in the
county sales and use tax equalization account, the municipal sales and
use tax equalization account, the distressed county assistance account,
and the city police and fire protection assistance account, as of July
1, 2006, shall be transferred by the state treasurer into the
city-county assistance account. The county sales and use tax
equalization account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the distressed county assistance account, and the city police
and fire protection assistance account shall cease to exist after July
1, 2006.
(2) Any loan repayments of funds borrowed from the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account under RCW 35.02.135 shall be deposited
by the state treasurer into the city-county assistance account.

Sec. 324 RCW 43.84.092 and 2005 c 514 s 1106, 2005 c 353 s 4,
2005 c 339 s 23, 2005 c 314 s 110, 2005 c 312 s 8, and 2005 c 94 s 2
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, ((the county sales and use tax
equalization account,)) the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the emergency reserve fund, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the freight mobility investment account, the health
services account, the public health services account, the health system
capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, ((the municipal sales and use tax equalization account,)) the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the regional transportation investment district
account, the resource management cost account, the rural Washington
loan fund, the site closure account, the small city pavement and
sidewalk account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
transportation partnership account, the tuition recovery trust fund,
the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 325 RCW 82.44.160 and 1999 c 309 s 931 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Before distributing moneys to the cities and towns from the city
police and fire protection assistance account, as provided in RCW
82.44.155, and from the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, as provided in RCW 82.14.210, the state treasurer shall, on
the first day of July of each year, make an annual deduction therefrom
of a sum equal to one-half of the biennial appropriation made pursuant
to this section, which amount shall be at least seven cents per capita
of the population of all cities or towns as legally certified on that
date, determined as provided in RCW 82.44.150, which sum shall be
apportioned and transmitted to the municipal research council, herein
created. Sixty-five percent of the annual deduction shall be from the
distribution to cities and towns under RCW 82.44.155, and thirty-five
percent of the annual deduction shall be from the distribution to the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account under RCW 82.14.210.))
The municipal research council may contract with and allocate moneys to
any state agency, educational institution, or private consulting firm,
which in its judgment is qualified to carry on a municipal research and
service program. Moneys may be utilized to match federal funds
available for technical research and service programs to cities and
towns. Moneys allocated shall be used for studies and research in
municipal government, publications, educational, conferences, and
attendance thereat, and in furnishing technical, consultative, and
field services to cities and towns in problems relating to planning,
public health, municipal sanitation, fire protection, law enforcement,
postwar improvements, and public works, and in all matters relating to
city and town government. The programs shall be carried on and all
expenditures shall be made in cooperation with the cities and towns of
the state acting through the Association of Washington Cities by its
board of directors which is hereby recognized as their official agency
or instrumentality.
Funds ((deducted under this section shall be deposited in the
treasury in the general fund, and)) shall be disbursed by warrant or
check to contracting parties on invoices or vouchers certified by the
chair of the municipal research council or his or her designee.
Payments to public agencies may be made in advance of actual work
contracted for, in the discretion of the council.
((Sixty-five percent of any moneys remaining unexpended or
uncontracted for by the municipal research council at the end of any
fiscal biennium shall be returned to the city police and fire
protection assistance account and be paid to cities and towns under RCW
82.44.155. The remaining thirty-five percent shall be deposited into
the municipal sales and use tax equalization account.))

Sec. 326 RCW 43.62.010 and 1990 c 42 s 317 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the state or any of its political subdivisions, or other
agencies, use the population studies services of the office of
financial management or the successor thereto, the state, its political
subdivision, or other agencies utilizing such services shall pay for
the cost of rendering such services. ((Expenditures shall be paid out
of funds allocated to cities and towns under RCW 82.44.155 and shall be
paid from said fund before any allocations or payments are made to
cities and towns under RCW 82.44.155.))

Sec. 327 RCW 70.05.125 and 1998 c 266 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county public health account is created in the state
treasury. Funds deposited in the county public health account shall be
distributed by the state treasurer to each local public health
jurisdiction based upon amounts certified to it by the department of
community, trade, and economic development in consultation with the
Washington state association of counties. The account shall include
((funds distributed under RCW 82.44.110 and 82.14.200(8) and such))
funds ((as are)) appropriated to the account from the health services
account under RCW 43.72.900, the public health services account under
RCW 43.72.902, and such other funds as the legislature may appropriate
to it.
(2)(a) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall certify the amounts to be distributed to
each local public health jurisdiction using 1995 as the base year of
actual city contributions to local public health.
(b) ((Only if funds are available and in an amount no greater than
available funds under RCW 82.14.200(8), the department of community,
trade, and economic development shall adjust the amount certified under
(a) of this subsection to compensate for any annexation of an area with
fifty thousand residents or more to any city as a result of a petition
during calendar year 1996 or 1997, or for any city that became newly
incorporated as a result of an election during calendar year 1994 or
1995. The amount to be adjusted shall be equal to the amount which
otherwise would have been lost to the health jurisdiction due to the
annexation or incorporation as calculated using the jurisdiction's 1995
funding formula.
(c))) The county treasurer shall certify the actual 1995 city
contribution to the department. Funds in excess of the base shall be
distributed proportionately among the health jurisdictions based on
incorporated population figures as last determined by the office of
financial management.
(3) Moneys distributed under this section shall be expended
exclusively for local public health purposes.

Sec. 328 RCW 53.08.090 and 1994 c 26 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) A port commission may, by resolution, authorize the
managing official of a port district to sell and convey port district
property of ten thousand dollars or less in value. The authority shall
be in force for not more than one calendar year from the date of
resolution and may be renewed from year to year. Prior to any such
sale or conveyance the managing official shall itemize and list the
property to be sold and make written certification to the commission
that the listed property is no longer needed for district purposes.
Any large block of the property having a value in excess of ten
thousand dollars shall not be broken down into components of ten
thousand dollars or less value and sold in the smaller components
unless the smaller components be sold by public competitive bid. A
port district may sell and convey any of its real or personal property
valued at more than ten thousand dollars when the port commission has,
by resolution, declared the property to be no longer needed for
district purposes, but no property which is a part of the comprehensive
plan of improvement or modification thereof shall be disposed of until
the comprehensive plan has been modified to find the property surplus
to port needs. The comprehensive plan shall be modified only after
public notice and hearing provided by RCW 53.20.010.
Nothing in this section shall be deemed to repeal or modify
procedures for property sales within industrial development districts
as set forth in chapter 53.25 RCW.
(((2) The ten thousand dollar figures in subsection (1) of this
section shall be adjusted annually based upon the governmental price
index established by the department of revenue under RCW 82.14.200.))

Sec. 329 RCW 43.160.220 and 1998 c 321 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The distressed county public facilities construction loan account
is created in the state treasury. ((All funds provided under RCW
82.14.200 shall be deposited in the account.)) Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the account shall
only be used to provide financial assistance under this chapter to
distressed counties that have experienced extraordinary costs due to
the location of a major new business facility or the substantial
expansion of an existing business facility in the county.
For purposes of this section, the term "distressed counties"
includes any county in which the average level of unemployment for the
three years before the year in which an application for financial
assistance is filed exceeds the average state employment for those
years by twenty percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 330 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.14.032 (Alteration of tax rate pursuant to government
service agreement) and 1994 c 266 s 11;
(2) RCW 82.14.034 (Alteration of county's share of city's tax
receipts pursuant to government service agreement) and 1994 c 266 s 12;
(3) RCW 82.14.046 (Sales and use tax equalization payments from
local transit taxes) and 1998 c 321 s 37, 1995 c 298 s 1, & 1994 c 241
s 2;
(4) RCW 82.14.070 (Uniformity -- Rule making -- Model ordinance) and
2003 c 168 s 202, 2000 c 104 s 5, & 1970 ex.s. c 94 s 10;
(5) RCW 82.14.200 (County sales and use tax equalization account--Allocation procedure) and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 941, 1998 c 321 s 8,
1997 c 333 s 2, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 15, 1990 c 42 s 313, 1985 c 57 s 82,
1984 c 225 s 5, 1983 c 99 s 1, & 1982 1st ex.s. c 49 s 21;
(6) RCW 82.14.210 (Municipal sales and use tax equalization
account -- Allocation procedure) and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 942, 1996 c 64
s 1, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 16, 1990 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 701, 1990 c 42 s 314,
1985 c 57 s 83, 1984 c 225 s 2, & 1982 1st ex.s. c 49 s 22;
(7) RCW 82.14.212 (Transfer of funds pursuant to government service
agreement) and 1994 c 266 s 13;
(8) RCW 82.14.220 (Figures for apportionments and distributions
under RCW 82.14.200 and 82.14.210) and 1984 c 225 s 4;
(9) RCW 82.14.380 (Distressed county assistance account -- Created--Distributions) and 1999 c 311 s 201 & 1998 c 321 s 10;
(10) RCW 35.02.135 (Newly incorporated city or town -- May borrow
from municipal sales and use tax equalization account) and 1991 c 360
s 5; and
(11) RCW 82.44.155 (City police and fire protection assistance
account -- Distribution to cities and towns -- Apportionment) and 1998 c
321 s 40, 1993 c 492 s 254, 1991 c 199 s 223, & 1990 c 42 s 309.

PART IV
RETAIL SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW, to be codified between RCW 82.12.024 and 82.12.0251, to read as
follows:
(1) The tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 does not apply to the use of
any article of tangible personal property, service, or extended
warranty, if the article, service, or extended warranty is specifically
described in and used solely by a person and solely for the purposes
specified in RCW 82.08.02525, 82.08.0252, 82.08.0253, 82.08.02537,
82.08.02567, 82.08.02568, 82.08.02569, 82.08.0256, 82.08.0257,
82.08.0258, 82.08.0259, 82.08.0267, 82.08.0272, 82.08.0274, 82.08.0275,
82.08.0277, 82.08.0278, 82.08.02795, 82.08.02805, 82.08.02806,
82.08.02807, 82.08.0281, 82.08.0282, 82.08.0283, 82.08.0285,
82.08.0288, 82.08.0291, 82.08.02915, 82.08.0293, 82.08.0294,
82.08.0296, 82.08.0297, 82.08.0298, 82.08.031, 82.08.0311, 82.08.0316,
82.08.032, 82.08.033, 82.08.034, 82.08.803, 82.08.804, 82.08.806,
82.08.808, 82.08.809, 82.08.813, 82.08.832, 82.08.841, 82.08.880,
82.08.890, 82.08.900, 82.08.910, 82.08.920, 82.08.925, 82.08.935,
82.08.940, 82.08.945, 82.08.950, 82.08.955, 82.08.975, or 82.08.985.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section is in addition to the specific
exemptions from the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 provided in other
provisions of this or any other chapter.

Sec. 402 RCW 82.08.0266 and 1999 c 358 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales to
nonresidents of this state for use outside of this state of watercraft
requiring coast guard registration or registration by the state of
principal use according to the Federal Boating Act of 1958, even though
delivery be made within this state, but only when (1) the watercraft
will not be used within this state for more than forty-five days and
(2) an appropriate exemption certificate supported by identification
ascertaining residence as required by the department ((of revenue)) and
signed by the ((purchaser)) buyer or ((his)) the buyer's agent
establishing the fact that the ((purchaser)) buyer is a nonresident and
that the watercraft is for use outside of this state, a copy of which
shall be retained by the ((dealer)) seller.

Sec. 403 RCW 82.08.02665 and 1999 c 358 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
vessels to residents of foreign countries for use outside of this
state, even though delivery is made within this state, but only if
(((1))):
(a) The vessel will not be used within this state for more than
forty-five days; and
(((2))) (b) An appropriate exemption certificate supported by
identification as required by the department ((of revenue)) and signed
by the ((purchaser)) buyer or the ((purchaser's)) buyer's agent
establishes the fact that the ((purchaser)) buyer is a resident of a
foreign country and that the vessel is for use outside of this state.
A copy of the exemption certificate is to be retained by the ((dealer))
seller.
(2) As used in this section, "vessel" means every watercraft used
or capable of being used as a means of transportation on the water,
other than a seaplane.

Sec. 404 RCW 82.12.0284 and 2003 c 168 s 603 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of computers, computer components, computer accessories, or
computer software irrevocably donated to any public or private
nonprofit school or college, as defined under chapter 84.36 RCW, in
this state. For purposes of this section, "computer" ((has)) and
"computer software" have the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.

Sec. 405 RCW 82.08.02569 and 1996 c 113 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
tangible personal property to a consumer as defined in RCW
82.04.190(((6))) (1)(f) if the tangible personal property is
incorporated into, installed in, or attached to a building or other
structure that is an integral part of a laser interferometer
gravitational wave observatory on which construction is commenced
before December 1, 1996.

Sec. 406 RCW 82.08.02917 and 1995 c 346 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 82.08.02915 ((and 82.12.02915)), "youth in
crisis" means any youth under eighteen years of age who is either:
Homeless; a runaway from the home of a parent, guardian, or legal
custodian; abused; neglected; abandoned by a parent, guardian, or legal
custodian; or suffering from a substance abuse or mental disorder.

Sec. 407 RCW 82.08.832 and 1998 c 178 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of gun
safes.
(2) As used in this section ((and RCW 82.12.832)), "gun safe" means
an enclosure specifically designed or modified for the purpose of
storing a firearm and equipped with a padlock, key lock, combination
lock, or similar locking device which, when locked, prevents the
unauthorized use of the firearm.

Sec. 408 RCW 82.08.880 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 17 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
farmers or to veterinarians of animal pharmaceuticals approved by the
United States department of agriculture or by the United States food
and drug administration, if the pharmaceutical is to be administered to
an animal that is raised by a farmer for the purpose of producing for
sale an agricultural product.
(2) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) For the purposes of this section ((and RCW 82.12.880)), the
following definitions apply:
(a) "Farmer" and "agricultural product" mean the same as in RCW
82.04.213.
(b) "Veterinarian" means a person who is licensed to practice
veterinary medicine, surgery, or dentistry under chapter 18.92 RCW.

Sec. 409 RCW 82.08.890 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
eligible persons of services rendered in respect to operating,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of dairy nutrient
management equipment and facilities, or to sales of tangible personal
property that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment and
facilities. The equipment and facilities must be used exclusively for
activities necessary to maintain a dairy nutrient management plan as
required under chapter 90.64 RCW. This exemption applies to sales made
after the dairy nutrient management plan is certified under chapter
90.64 RCW.
(2)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
department of agriculture must provide a list of eligible persons to
the department of revenue. The application must be in a form and
manner prescribed by the department and must contain information
regarding the location of the dairy and other information the
department may require.
(b) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section ((and
RCW 82.12.890)) unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Dairy nutrient management equipment and facilities" means
machinery, equipment, and structures used in the handling and treatment
of dairy manure, such as aerators, agitators, alley scrapers, augers,
dams, gutter cleaners, loaders, lagoons, pipes, pumps, separators, and
tanks. The term also includes tangible personal property that becomes
an ingredient or component of the equipment and facilities, including
repair and replacement parts.
(b) "Eligible person" means a person licensed to produce milk under
chapter 15.36 RCW who has a certified dairy nutrient management plan by
December 31, 2003, as required by chapter 90.64 RCW.

Sec. 410 RCW 82.08.900 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to an
eligible person establishing or operating an anaerobic digester or to
services rendered in respect to installing, constructing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving an anaerobic digester, or to sales of
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of
the anaerobic digester. The anaerobic digester must be used primarily
to treat dairy manure.
(2)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the department
and must contain information regarding the location of the facility and
other information as the department may require.
(b) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section ((and
RCW 82.12.900)) unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Anaerobic digester" means a facility that processes manure
from cattle into biogas and dried manure using microorganisms in a
decomposition process within a closed, oxygen-free container.
(b) "Eligible person" means any person establishing or operating an
anaerobic digester to treat primarily dairy manure.
(c) "Primarily" means more than fifty percent measured by volume or
weight.

Sec. 411 RCW 82.08.910 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
farmers of propane or natural gas used to heat structures used to house
chickens. The propane or natural gas must be used exclusively to heat
the structures. The structures must be used exclusively to house
chickens that are sold as agricultural products.
(2) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section ((and
RCW 82.12.910)).
(a) "Structures" means barns, sheds, and other similar buildings in
which chickens are housed.
(b) "Farmer" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.213.
(c) "Agricultural product" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.04.213.

Sec. 412 RCW 82.08.920 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to a
farmer of bedding materials used to accumulate and facilitate the
removal of chicken manure. The farmer must be raising chickens that
are sold as agricultural products.
(2) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section ((and
RCW 82.12.920)).
(a) "Bedding materials" means wood shavings, straw, sawdust,
shredded paper, and other similar materials.
(b) "Farmer" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.213.
(c) "Agricultural product" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.04.213.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 413 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.12.02525 (Exemptions -- Sale of copied public records by
state and local agencies) and 1996 c 63 s 2;
(2) RCW 82.12.0253 (Exemptions -- Use of tangible personal property
taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW) and 1980 c 37 s 53;
(3) RCW 82.12.02567 (Exemptions -- Use of machinery and equipment
used in generating electricity) and 2004 c 152 s 2, 2003 c 5 s 6, 2001
c 213 s 2, 1999 c 358 s 10, 1998 c 309 s 2, & 1996 c 166 s 2;
(4) RCW 82.12.02568 (Exemptions -- Use of carbon and similar
substances that become an ingredient or component of anodes or cathodes
used in producing aluminum for sale) and 1996 c 170 s 2;
(5) RCW 82.12.02569 (Exemptions -- Use of tangible personal property
related to a building or structure that is an integral part of a laser
interferometer gravitational wave observatory) and 1996 c 113 s 2;
(6) RCW 82.12.0257 (Exemptions -- Use of tangible personal property
of the operating property of a public utility by state or political
subdivision) and 1980 c 37 s 57;
(7) RCW 82.12.0258 (Exemptions -- Use of tangible personal property
previously used in farming and purchased from farmer at auction) and
1980 c 37 s 58;
(8) RCW 82.12.0259 (Exemptions -- Use of tangible personal property
by federal corporations providing aid and relief) and 2003 c 5 s 7 &
1980 c 37 s 59;
(9) RCW 82.12.0261 (Exemptions -- Use of livestock) and 2001 c 118 s
5 & 1980 c 37 s 60;
(10) RCW 82.12.0262 (Exemptions -- Use of poultry for producing
poultry and poultry products for sale) and 1980 c 37 s 61;
(11) RCW 82.12.0267 (Exemptions -- Use of semen in artificial
insemination of livestock) and 1980 c 37 s 66;
(12) RCW 82.12.0268 (Exemptions -- Use of form lumber by persons
engaged in constructing, repairing, etc., structures for consumers) and
1980 c 37 s 67;
(13) RCW 82.12.0269 (Exemptions -- Use of sand, gravel, or rock to
extent of labor and service charges for mining, sorting, crushing,
etc., thereof from county or city quarry for public road purposes) and
1980 c 37 s 68;
(14) RCW 82.12.0271 (Exemptions -- Use of wearing apparel only as a
sample for display for sale) and 1980 c 37 s 69;
(15) RCW 82.12.0273 (Exemptions -- Use of pollen) and 1980 c 37 s 71;
(16) RCW 82.12.0274 (Exemptions -- Use of tangible personal property
by political subdivision resulting from annexation or incorporation)
and 1980 c 37 s 72;
(17) RCW 82.12.02745 (Exemptions--Use by free hospitals of certain
items) and 1993 c 205 s 2;
(18) RCW 82.12.02747 (Exemptions -- Use of medical products by
qualifying blood, tissue, or blood and tissue banks) and 2004 c 82 s 3
& 1995 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 5;
(19) RCW 82.12.02748 (Exemptions -- Use of human blood, tissue,
organs, bodies, or body parts for medical research or quality control
testing) and 1996 c 141 s 2;
(20) RCW 82.12.02749 (Exemptions -- Use of medical supplies,
chemicals, or materials by organ procurement organization) and 2002 c
113 s 3;
(21) RCW 82.12.0275 (Exemptions -- Use of certain drugs or family
planning devices) and 2003 c 168 s 406, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 309, & 1980
c 37 s 73;
(22) RCW 82.12.0276 (Exemptions -- Use of returnable containers for
beverages and foods) and 1980 c 37 s 74;
(23) RCW 82.12.0277 (Exemptions -- Certain medical items) and 2004 c
153 s 109;
(24) RCW 82.12.0279 (Exemptions -- Use of ferry vessels by the state
or local governmental units -- Components thereof) and 2003 c 5 s 9 &
1980 c 37 s 77;
(25) RCW 82.12.0283 (Exemptions -- Use of certain irrigation
equipment) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 55 s 6;
(26) RCW 82.12.02915 (Exemptions -- Use of items by health or social
welfare organizations for alternative housing for youth in crisis) and
1998 c 183 s 2, 1997 c 386 s 57, & 1995 c 346 s 2;
(27) RCW 82.12.02917 (Exemptions -- Use of amusement and recreation
services by nonprofit youth organization) and 1999 c 358 s 7;
(28) RCW 82.12.0293 (Exemptions -- Use of food and food ingredients)
and 2003 c 168 s 303, 1988 c 103 s 2, 1986 c 182 s 2, 1985 c 104 s 2,
& 1982 1st ex.s. c 35 s 34;
(29) RCW 82.12.0294 (Exemptions -- Use of feed for cultivating or
raising fish for sale) and 1985 c 148 s 4;
(30) RCW 82.12.0296 (Exemptions -- Use of feed consumed by livestock
at a public livestock market) and 1986 c 265 s 2;
(31) RCW 82.12.0297 (Exemptions -- Use of food purchased with food
stamps) and 1998 c 79 s 19 & 1987 c 28 s 2;
(32) RCW 82.12.0298 (Exemptions -- Use of diesel fuel in operating
watercraft in commercial deep sea fishing or commercial passenger
fishing boat operations outside the state) and 1987 c 494 s 2;
(33) RCW 82.12.031 (Exemptions -- Use by artistic or cultural
organizations of certain objects) and 1981 c 140 s 5;
(34) RCW 82.12.0311 (Exemptions -- Use of materials and supplies in
packing horticultural products) and 1988 c 68 s 2;
(35) RCW 82.12.0316 (Exemptions -- Sales of cigarettes by Indian
retailers) and 2005 c 11 s 4 & 2001 c 235 s 5;
(36) RCW 82.12.032 (Exemption -- Use of used park model trailers) and
2001 c 282 s 4;
(37) RCW 82.12.033 (Exemption -- Use of certain used mobile homes)
and 1986 c 211 s 3 & 1979 ex.s. c 266 s 4;
(38) RCW 82.12.034 (Exemption -- Use of used floating homes) and 1984
c 192 s 4;
(39) RCW 82.12.0345 (Exemptions -- Use of newspapers) and 1994 c 124
s 11;
(40) RCW 82.12.0347 (Exemptions -- Use of academic transcripts) and
1996 c 272 s 3;
(41) RCW 82.12.803 (Exemptions -- Nebulizers) and 2004 c 153 s 105;
(42) RCW 82.12.804 (Exemptions -- Ostomic items) and 2004 c 153 s
107;
(43) RCW 82.12.806 (Exemptions -- Use of computer equipment parts and
services by printer or publisher) and 2004 c 8 s 3;
(44) RCW 82.12.808 (Exemptions -- Use of medical supplies, chemicals,
or materials by comprehensive cancer centers) and 2005 c 514 s 403;
(45) RCW 82.12.809 (Exemptions -- Vehicles using clean alternative
fuels) and 2005 c 296 s 3;
(46) RCW 82.12.813 (Exemptions -- High gas mileage vehicles) and 2005
c 296 s 4;
(47) RCW 82.12.832 (Exemptions -- Use of gun safes) and 1998 c 178 s
2;
(48) RCW 82.12.841 (Exemptions -- Farming equipment -- Hay sheds) and
2005 c 420 s 3;
(49) RCW 82.12.880 (Exemptions -- Animal pharmaceuticals) and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 17 s 2;
(50) RCW 82.12.890 (Exemptions -- Dairy nutrient management equipment
and facilities) and 2003 c 5 s 15 & 2001 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 3;
(51) RCW 82.12.900 (Exemptions -- Anaerobic digesters) and 2003 c 5
s 16 & 2001 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 5;
(52) RCW 82.12.910 (Exemptions -- Propane or natural gas to heat
chicken structures) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 4;
(53) RCW 82.12.920 (Exemptions -- Chicken bedding materials) and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 25 s 6;
(54) RCW 82.12.925 (Exemptions -- Dietary supplements) and 2003 c 168
s 304;
(55) RCW 82.12.935 (Exemptions -- Disposable devices used to deliver
prescription drugs for human use) and 2003 c 168 s 407;
(56) RCW 82.12.940 (Exemptions -- Over-the-counter drugs for human
use) and 2003 c 168 s 408;
(57) RCW 82.12.945 (Exemptions -- Kidney dialysis devices) and 2004
c 153 s 111 & 2003 c 168 s 411;
(58) RCW 82.12.950 (Exemptions -- Steam, electricity, electrical
energy) and 2003 c 168 s 704;
(59) RCW 82.12.955 (Exemptions -- Use of machinery, equipment,
vehicles, and services related to biodiesel or alcohol fuel blend) and
2003 c 63 s 3;
(60) RCW 82.12.960 (Exemptions -- Use of machinery, equipment,
vehicles, and services related to wood biomass fuel blend) and 2003 c
339 s 14;
(61) RCW 82.12.975 (Computer parts and software related to the
manufacture of commercial airplanes) and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 10; and
(62) RCW 82.12.985 (Exemptions -- Insulin) and 2004 c 153 s 103.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 414 The sole purpose of the legislature in
enacting section 401, chapter . . ., Laws of 2006 is to consolidate a
number of use tax exemptions into a single section for purposes of
simplification. It is not the intent of the legislature in enacting
section 401, chapter . . ., Laws of 2006 to create new use tax
exemptions, or to eliminate, narrow, or expand any existing use tax
exemptions. Therefore, the courts, taxpayers, the department of
revenue, and the board of tax appeals should construe section 401,
chapter . . ., Laws of 2006 as a consolidation of existing law with no
substantive effect.

PART V
MISCELLANEOUS B&O AND RETAIL SALES TAX PROVISIONS
Sec. 501 RCW 82.04.140 and 1961 c 15 s 82.04.140 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) "Business" includes all activities engaged in with the object
of gain, benefit, or advantage to the taxpayer or to another person or
class, directly or indirectly.
(2) "Engaging in business" means commencing, conducting, or
continuing in business and also the exercise of corporate or franchise
powers as well as liquidating a business when the liquidators thereof
hold themselves out to the public as conducting such business.

Sec. 502 RCW 82.04.250 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person ((except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260
(5) or (13), 82.04.272, or subsection (2) of this section)) engaging
within this state in the business of making sales at retail, except
persons taxable as retailers under other provisions of this chapter, as
to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by
the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (11), as
to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by
the rate of 0.484 percent.

Sec. 503 RCW 82.04.280 and 2004 c 24 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of:
(1) Printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or magazines;
(2) building, repairing or improving any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United
States and which is used or to be used, primarily for foot or vehicular
traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind and
including any readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the
facilities of any public, private or cooperatively owned utility or
railroad in the course of such building, repairing or improving, the
cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the
responsibility of the public authority whose street, place, road,
highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or
parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired
or improved; (3) extracting for hire or processing for hire, except
persons taxable as processors for hire under another section of this
chapter; (4) operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse,
but not including the rental of cold storage lockers; (5) representing
and performing services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an
independent resident managing general agent licensed under the
provisions of RCW 48.05.310; (6) radio and television broadcasting,
excluding network, national and regional advertising computed as a
standard deduction based on the national average thereof as annually
reported by the Federal Communications Commission, or in lieu thereof
by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and excluding
that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state audience
computed as a ratio to the station's total audience as measured by the
100 micro-volt signal strength and delivery by wire, if any; (7)
engaging in activities which bring a person within the definition of
consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(((6))) (1)(f); as to such persons,
the amount of tax on such business shall be equal to the gross income
of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
As used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or
vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination
thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the
product for orderly marketing.
As used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise
are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses,
fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under
chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight
sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage"
facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage
areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a
building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in
which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
As used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated
intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or
special edition of the publication.

Sec. 504 RCW 82.04.280 and 2003 c 149 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of:
(1) Printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or magazines;
(2) building, repairing or improving any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United
States and which is used or to be used, primarily for foot or vehicular
traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind and
including any readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the
facilities of any public, private or cooperatively owned utility or
railroad in the course of such building, repairing or improving, the
cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the
responsibility of the public authority whose street, place, road,
highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or
parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired
or improved; (3) extracting for hire or processing for hire, except
persons taxable as processors for hire under another section of this
chapter; (4) operating a cold storage warehouse or storage warehouse,
but not including the rental of cold storage lockers; (5) representing
and performing services for fire or casualty insurance companies as an
independent resident managing general agent licensed under the
provisions of RCW 48.05.310; (6) radio and television broadcasting,
excluding network, national and regional advertising computed as a
standard deduction based on the national average thereof as annually
reported by the Federal Communications Commission, or in lieu thereof
by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and excluding
that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state audience
computed as a ratio to the station's total audience as measured by the
100 micro-volt signal strength and delivery by wire, if any; (7)
engaging in activities which bring a person within the definition of
consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(((6))) (1)(f); as to such persons,
the amount of tax on such business shall be equal to the gross income
of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
As used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or
vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination
thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the
product for orderly marketing.
As used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise
are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses,
fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under
chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight
sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage"
facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage
areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a
building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in
which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
As used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated
intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or
special edition of the publication.

Sec. 505 RCW 82.04.418 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 66 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply to:
(1) Grants received from the state or the United States government
by municipal corporations or political subdivisions of the state of
Washington;
(2) Amounts received by any person for research and development
under the federal small business innovation research program (114 Stat.
2763A; 15 U.S.C. Sec. 638 et seq.);
(3) Amounts received by any person for research and development
under the federal small business technology transfer program (115 Stat.
263; 15 U.S.C. Sec. 638 et seq.); and
(4) Income received by the life sciences discovery fund authority
under chapter 43.350 RCW.

Sec. 506 RCW 82.04.4281 and 2002 c 150 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax:
(a) Amounts derived from investments;
(b) Amounts derived as dividends or distributions from (([the]))
the capital account by a parent from its subsidiary entities; and
(c) Amounts derived from interest on loans between subsidiary
entities and a parent entity or between subsidiaries of a common parent
entity, but only if the total investment and loan income is less than
five percent of gross receipts of the business annually.
(2) The following are not deductible under subsection (1)(a) of
this section:
(a) Amounts received from loans, except as provided in subsection
(1)(c) of this section, or the extension of credit to another,
revolving credit arrangements, installment sales, the acceptance of
payment over time for goods or services, or any of the foregoing that
have been transferred by the originator of the same to an affiliate of
the transferor; or
(b) Amounts received by a banking, lending, or security business.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply only to this section.
(a) "Banking business" means a person engaging in business as a
national or state-chartered bank, a mutual savings bank, a savings and
loan association, a trust company, an alien bank, a foreign bank, a
credit union, a stock savings bank, or a similar entity that is
chartered under Title 30, 31, 32, or 33 RCW, or organized under Title
12 U.S.C.
(b) "Lending business" means a person engaged in the business of
making secured or unsecured loans of money, or extending credit, and
(i) more than one-half of the person's gross income is earned from such
activities and (ii) more than one-half of the person's total
expenditures are incurred in support of such activities.
(c) The terms "loan" and "extension of credit" do not include
ownership of or trading in publicly traded debt instruments, or
substantially equivalent instruments offered in a private placement.
(d) "Security business" means a person, other than an issuer, who
is engaged in the business of effecting transactions in securities as
a broker, dealer, or broker-dealer, as those terms are defined in the
securities act of Washington, chapter 21.20 RCW, or the federal
securities act of 1933. "Security business" does not include any
company excluded from the definition of broker or dealer under the
federal investment company act of 1940 or any entity that is not an
investment company by reason of sections 3(c)(1) and 3(c)(3) through
3(c)(14) thereof.

Sec. 507 RCW 82.04.4286 and 1980 c 37 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
((In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax))
This chapter does not apply to amounts derived from business which the
state is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution of this state or
the Constitution or laws of the United States.

Sec. 508 RCW 82.04.440 and 2005 c 301 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in activities ((which)) that are ((within
the purview of the provisions of two or more of sections)) subject to
tax under two or more provisions of RCW 82.04.230 ((to)) through
82.04.298, inclusive, shall be taxable under each ((paragraph))
provision applicable to ((the)) those activities ((engaged in)).
(2) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.2909(2), 82.04.250, 82.04.270,
82.04.294(2), or 82.04.260(1)(c), (4), or (((13))) (11) with respect to
selling products in this state shall be allowed a credit against those
taxes for any (a) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the
manufacturing of products so sold in this state, and/or (b) extracting
taxes paid with respect to the extracting of products so sold in this
state or ingredients of products so sold in this state. Extracting
taxes taken as credit under subsection (3) of this section may also be
taken under this subsection, if otherwise allowable under this
subsection. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the sale of those
products.
(3) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.240 or 82.04.260(1)(b) shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with
respect to extracting the ingredients of the products so manufactured
in this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the manufacturing
of those products.
(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1),
82.04.294(1), or 82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), (((6),)) or (((13))) (11)
with respect to extracting or manufacturing products in this state
shall be allowed a credit against those taxes for any (i) gross
receipts taxes paid to another state with respect to the sales of the
products so extracted or manufactured in this state, (ii) manufacturing
taxes paid with respect to the manufacturing of products using
ingredients so extracted in this state, or (iii) manufacturing taxes
paid with respect to manufacturing activities completed in another
state for products so manufactured in this state. The amount of the
credit shall not exceed the tax liability arising under this chapter
with respect to the extraction or manufacturing of those products.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of
business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the
tax an income tax or value added tax; and
(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately
stated from the sales price.
(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the
United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of
such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign
country or political subdivision thereof.
(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and
includes (i) the taxes imposed in RCW 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1),
82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), and (((13))) (11), and 82.04.294(1); and (ii)
similar gross receipts taxes paid to other states.
(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act
or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes the
tax imposed in RCW 82.04.230 and similar gross receipts taxes paid to
other states.
(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used
in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through
82.04.212, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of
describing taxes imposed by other states.

Sec. 509 RCW 82.04.440 and 2006 c . . . s 508 (section 508 of
this act) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in activities that are subject to tax
under two or more provisions of RCW 82.04.230 through 82.04.298,
inclusive, shall be taxable under each provision applicable to those
activities.
(2) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.2909(2), 82.04.250, 82.04.270,
82.04.294(2), or 82.04.260(1) (c) or (e), (4), or (11) with respect to
selling products in this state shall be allowed a credit against those
taxes for any (a) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the
manufacturing of products so sold in this state, and/or (b) extracting
taxes paid with respect to the extracting of products so sold in this
state or ingredients of products so sold in this state. Extracting
taxes taken as credit under subsection (3) of this section may also be
taken under this subsection, if otherwise allowable under this
subsection. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the sale of those
products.
(3) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.240 or 82.04.260(1)(b) shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with
respect to extracting the ingredients of the products so manufactured
in this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the manufacturing
of those products.
(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1),
82.04.294(1), or 82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), or (11) with respect to
extracting or manufacturing products in this state shall be allowed a
credit against those taxes for any (i) gross receipts taxes paid to
another state with respect to the sales of the products so extracted or
manufactured in this state, (ii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect
to the manufacturing of products using ingredients so extracted in this
state, or (iii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to manufacturing
activities completed in another state for products so manufactured in
this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the extraction or
manufacturing of those products.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of
business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the
tax an income tax or value added tax; and
(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately
stated from the sales price.
(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the
United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of
such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign
country or political subdivision thereof.
(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and
includes (i) the taxes imposed in RCW 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1),
82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), and (11), and 82.04.294(1); and (ii) similar
gross receipts taxes paid to other states.
(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act
or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes the
tax imposed in RCW 82.04.230 and similar gross receipts taxes paid to
other states.
(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used
in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through
82.04.212, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of
describing taxes imposed by other states.

Sec. 510 RCW 82.04.4462 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for the investment related to design and preproduction
development computer software and hardware acquired between July 1,
1995, and December 1, 2003, and used by an eligible person primarily
for the digital design and development of commercial airplanes. The
credit shall be equal to the purchase price of such property,
multiplied by 8.44 percent. Credit taken in any one calendar year may
not exceed ten million dollars, and total lifetime credit taken under
this section by any one person may not exceed twenty million dollars.
Credit may be carried over until used.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Commercial airplane" has the meaning given in RCW 82.32.550.
(b) "Design and preproduction development computer software and
hardware" means computer-aided three-dimensional interactive
applications and other solid modeling computer technology that allow
for electronic design and testing during product development.
(c) "Eligible person" means a person as defined in RCW 82.04.030,
who is a manufacturer of commercial airplanes.
(3) An application must be made to the department before taking the
credit under this section. The application shall be made to the
department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
application shall contain information regarding the uses of the
computer software and hardware, purchase price, dates of acquisition,
and other information required by the department. The department shall
rule on the application within sixty days. All applications must be
received by the department within one year of December 1, 2003.
(4) This section expires July 1, ((2024)) 2006.

Sec. 511 RCW 82.04.4328 and 1985 c 471 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 82.04.4322, 82.04.4324, 82.04.4326,
82.04.4327, and 82.08.031, ((and 82.12.031,)) the term "artistic or
cultural organization" means an organization which is organized and
operated exclusively for the purpose of providing artistic or cultural
exhibitions, presentations, or performances or cultural or art
education programs, as defined in subsection (2) of this section, for
viewing or attendance by the general public. The organization must be
a not-for-profit corporation under chapter 24.03 RCW and managed by a
governing board of not less than eight individuals none of whom is a
paid employee of the organization or by a corporation sole under
chapter 24.12 RCW. In addition, to qualify for deduction or exemption
from taxation under RCW 82.04.4322, 82.04.4324, 82.04.4326, 82.04.4327,
82.08.031, and ((82.12.031)) section 401 of this act, the corporation
shall satisfy the following conditions:
(a) No part of its income may be paid directly or indirectly to its
members, stockholders, officers, directors, or trustees except in the
form of services rendered by the corporation in accordance with its
purposes and bylaws;
(b) Salary or compensation paid to its officers and executives must
be only for actual services rendered, and at levels comparable to the
salary or compensation of like positions within the state;
(c) Assets of the corporation must be irrevocably dedicated to the
activities for which the exemption is granted and, on the liquidation,
dissolution, or abandonment by the corporation, may not inure directly
or indirectly to the benefit of any member or individual except a
nonprofit organization, association, or corporation which also would be
entitled to the exemption;
(d) The corporation must be duly licensed or certified when
licensing or certification is required by law or regulation;
(e) The amounts received that qualify for exemption must be used
for the activities for which the exemption is granted;
(f) Services must be available regardless of race, color, national
origin, or ancestry; and
(g) The director of revenue shall have access to its books in order
to determine whether the corporation is exempt from taxes.
(2) The term "artistic or cultural exhibitions, presentations, or
performances or cultural or art education programs" includes and is
limited to:
(a) An exhibition or presentation of works of art or objects of
cultural or historical significance, such as those commonly displayed
in art or history museums;
(b) A musical or dramatic performance or series of performances; or
(c) An educational seminar or program, or series of such programs,
offered by the organization to the general public on an artistic,
cultural, or historical subject.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.04.055 (Selected business services) and 1997 c 304 s 3;
(2) RCW 82.04.150 ("Engaging in business") and 1961 c 15 s
82.04.150;
(3) RCW 82.04.4261 (Exemptions -- Federal small business innovation
research program) and 2004 c 2 s 9;
(4) RCW 82.04.4262 (Exemptions -- Federal small business technology
transfer program) and 2004 c 2 s 10; and
(5) RCW 82.04.4263 (Exemptions -- Income received by the life
sciences discovery fund authority) and 2005 c 424 s 11.

PART VI
GENERAL ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS
Sec. 601 RCW 82.32.550 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 17 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. takes effect on the
first day of the month in which the governor and a manufacturer of
commercial airplanes sign a memorandum of agreement regarding an
affirmative final decision to site a significant commercial airplane
final assembly facility in Washington state. The department shall
provide notice of the effective date of chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp.
sess. to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed
appropriate by the department.
(b) Chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. is contingent upon the
siting of a significant commercial airplane final assembly facility in
the state of Washington. If a memorandum of agreement under subsection
(1) of this section is not signed by June 30, 2005, chapter 1, Laws of
2003 2nd sp. sess. is null and void.
(c)(i) The department shall make a determination regarding the date
final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington state.
The rates in RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (11) (a)(ii) and (b)(ii) take effect
the first day of the month such assembly begins, or July 1, 2007,
whichever is later. The department shall provide notice of the
effective date of such rates to affected taxpayers, the legislature,
and others as deemed appropriate by the department.
(ii) If on December 31, 2007, final assembly of a superefficient
airplane has not begun in Washington state, the department shall
provide notice of such to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and
others as deemed appropriate by the department.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Commercial airplane" has its ordinary meaning, which is an
airplane certified by the federal aviation administration for
transporting persons or property, and any military derivative of such
an airplane.
(b) "Component" means a part or system certified by the federal
aviation administration for installation or assembly into a commercial
airplane.
(c) "Final assembly of a superefficient airplane" means the
activity of assembling an airplane from components parts necessary for
its mechanical operation such that the finished commercial airplane is
ready to deliver to the ultimate consumer.
(d) "Significant commercial airplane final assembly facility" means
a location with the capacity to produce at least thirty-six
superefficient airplanes a year.
(e) "Siting" means a final decision by a manufacturer to locate a
significant commercial airplane final assembly facility in Washington
state.
(f) "Superefficient airplane" means a twin aisle airplane that
carries between two hundred and three hundred fifty passengers, with a
range of more than seven thousand two hundred nautical miles, a
cruising speed of approximately mach .85, and that uses fifteen to
twenty percent less fuel than other similar airplanes on the market.

Sec. 602 RCW 82.12.045 and 2003 c 361 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((In the collection of the use tax on motor vehicles,)) (a) The
department ((of revenue)) may designate the county auditors of the
several counties of the state as its collecting agents in the
collection of the use tax on: (i) Tangible personal property
consisting of vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.670, off-road vehicles
as defined in RCW 46.09.020, snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010,
or vessels as defined in RCW 88.02.010; and (ii) any extended warranty
or maintenance agreement for any item of tangible personal property
described in (a)(i) of this subsection.
(b) Upon such designation, ((it shall be the duty of)) each county
auditor ((to)) shall collect the tax ((at the time)) when an applicant
applies for the registration of, and transfer of certificate of
ownership or vessel certificate of title to, the ((motor vehicle))
property, except ((in the following instances)) where the:
(((a) Where the)) (i) Applicant exhibits a dealer's report of sale
showing that ((the retail sales tax has been collected by)) the dealer
has collected the retail sales tax on the tangible personal property in
question and on any extended warranty or maintenance agreement on that
tangible personal property;
(((b) Where the)) (ii) Application is for the renewal of
registration;
(((c) Where the)) (iii) Applicant presents a written statement
signed by the department ((of revenue)), or its duly authorized agent
showing that no use tax is legally due; or
(((d) Where the)) (iv) Applicant presents satisfactory evidence
showing that the applicant has paid the retail sales tax or the use tax
((has been paid by the applicant)) on the ((vehicle)) tangible personal
property in question and on any extended warranty or maintenance
agreement on that tangible personal property.
(2) ((The term "motor vehicle," as used in this section means and
includes all motor vehicles, trailers and semitrailers used, or of a
type designed primarily to be used, upon the public streets and
highways, for the convenience or pleasure of the owner, or for the
conveyance, for hire or otherwise, of persons or property, including
fixed loads, facilities for human habitation, and vehicles carrying
exempt licenses.
(3) It shall be the duty of)) Every applicant applying for
registration and transfer of certificate of ownership or vessel
certificate of title who is subject to payment of tax under this
section ((to)) shall declare upon the application the value of the
((vehicle)) property for which application is made, which shall consist
of the consideration paid or contracted to be paid therefor.
(((4) Each county auditor who acts as agent of the department of
revenue shall at the time of)) (3) When remitting license fee receipts
on ((motor vehicles)) tangible personal property subject to the
provisions of this section, each county auditor shall pay over and
account to the state treasurer for all use tax revenue collected under
this section((, after first deducting as)). Each county auditor may
deduct a collection fee ((the sum)) of two dollars for each ((motor
vehicle)) transfer of personal property upon which the tax ((has been))
was collected. Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section,
the state treasurer shall credit all revenue received ((by the state
treasurer)) under this section ((shall be credited)) to the general
fund. Each county auditor shall deposit the ((auditor's)) collection
fee ((shall be deposited)) in the county current expense fund. A
duplicate of the county auditor's transmittal report to the state
treasurer shall be forwarded ((forthwith)) immediately to the
department ((of revenue)).
(((5))) (4) Any applicant who ((has)) paid use tax to a county
auditor under this section may apply to the department ((of revenue))
for refund ((thereof)) if ((he or she)) that person has reason to
believe that such tax was not legally due and owing. No refund shall
be allowed unless application therefor is received by the department
((of revenue)) within the statutory period for assessment of taxes,
penalties, or interest prescribed by RCW 82.32.050(3). Upon receipt of
an application for refund the department ((of revenue)) shall consider
the same and issue its order either granting or denying it and if
refund is denied, the taxpayer ((shall have the right of)) may appeal
as provided in RCW 82.32.170((,)) and 82.32.180 ((and 82.32.190)).
(((6))) (5) The provisions of this section shall be construed as
cumulative of other methods prescribed in ((chapters 82.04 to 82.32
RCW, inclusive,)) this title for the collection of the tax imposed by
this chapter. The department ((of revenue shall have power to
promulgate such)) may adopt rules ((as may be)) necessary to administer
the provisions of this section. Any duties required by this section to
be performed by the county auditor may be performed by the director of
licensing but no collection fee shall be deductible by said director in
remitting use tax revenue to the state treasurer.
(((7))) (6) The use tax revenue collected on the rate provided in
RCW 82.08.020(3) shall be deposited in the multimodal transportation
account under RCW 47.66.070.

PART VII
PROPERTY TAX PROVISIONS
Sec. 701 RCW 84.33.140 and 2003 c 170 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When land has been designated as forest land under RCW
84.33.130, a notation of the designation shall be made each year upon
the assessment and tax rolls. A copy of the notice of approval
together with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for
the land shall, at the expense of the applicant, be filed by the
assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded.
(2) In preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002, for
taxes payable in 2003 and each January 1st thereafter, the assessor
shall list each parcel of designated forest land at a value with
respect to the grade and class provided in this subsection and adjusted
as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The assessor shall
compute the assessed value of the land using the same assessment ratio
applied generally in computing the assessed value of other property in
the county. Values for the several grades of bare forest land shall be
as follows:

LAND
GRADE OPERABILITY
CLASS VALUES
PER ACRE

1 $234

1 2 229

3 217

4 157

1 198

2 2 190

3 183

4 132

1 154

3 2 149

3 148

4 113

1 117

4 2 114

3 113

4 86

1 85

5 2 78

3 77

4 52

1 43

6 2 39

3 39

4 37

1 21

7 2 21

3 20

4 20

8 1

(3) On or before December 31, 2001, the department shall adjust by
rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, the forest land values contained in
subsection (2) of this section in accordance with this subsection, and
shall certify the adjusted values to the assessor who will use these
values in preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002. For the
adjustment to be made on or before December 31, 2001, for use in the
2002 assessment year, the department shall:
(a) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1996, and June 30, 2001, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(b) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1995, and June 30, 2000, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(c) Adjust the forest land values contained in subsection (2) of
this section by a percentage equal to one-half of the percentage change
in the average values of harvested timber reflected by comparing the
resultant values calculated under (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(4) For the adjustments to be made on or before December 31, 2002,
and each succeeding year thereafter, the same procedure described in
subsection (3) of this section shall be followed using harvester excise
tax returns filed under RCW 84.33.074. However, this adjustment shall
be made to the prior year's adjusted value, and the five-year periods
for calculating average harvested timber values shall be successively
one year more recent.
(5) Land graded, assessed, and valued as forest land shall continue
to be so graded, assessed, and valued until removal of designation by
the assessor upon the occurrence of any of the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove the designation;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership making the land exempt from ad
valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of forest land
designation continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or
devisee of a deceased owner, shall not, by itself, result in removal of
designation. The signed notice of continuance shall be attached to the
real estate excise tax affidavit provided for in RCW 82.45.150. The
notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared by the department.
If the notice of continuance is not signed by the new owner and
attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all compensating
taxes calculated under subsection (11) of this section shall become due
and payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The auditor
shall not accept an instrument of conveyance regarding designated
forest land for filing or recording unless the new owner has signed the
notice of continuance or the compensating tax has been paid, as
evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the
treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the new
assessed valuation calculated under subsection (11) of this section to
the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of
RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of
equalization to hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that:
(i) The land is no longer primarily devoted to and used for growing
and harvesting timber. However, land shall not be removed from
designation if a governmental agency, organization, or other recipient
identified in subsection (13) or (14) of this section as exempt from
the payment of compensating tax has manifested its intent in writing or
by other official action to acquire a property interest in the
designated forest land by means of a transaction that qualifies for an
exemption under subsection (13) or (14) of this section. The
governmental agency, organization, or recipient shall annually provide
the assessor of the county in which the land is located reasonable
evidence in writing of the intent to acquire the designated land as
long as the intent continues or within sixty days of a request by the
assessor. The assessor may not request this evidence more than once in
a calendar year;
(ii) The owner has failed to comply with a final administrative or
judicial order with respect to a violation of the restocking, forest
management, fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest
debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable rules under Title
76 RCW; or
(iii) Restocking has not occurred to the extent or within the time
specified in the application for designation of such land.
(6) Land shall not be removed from designation if there is a
governmental restriction that prohibits, in whole or in part, the owner
from harvesting timber from the owner's designated forest land. If
only a portion of the parcel is impacted by governmental restrictions
of this nature, the restrictions cannot be used as a basis to remove
the remainder of the forest land from designation under this chapter.
For the purposes of this section, "governmental restrictions" includes:
(a) Any law, regulation, rule, ordinance, program, or other action
adopted or taken by a federal, state, county, city, or other
governmental entity; or (b) the land's zoning or its presence within an
urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110.
(7) The assessor shall have the option of requiring an owner of
forest land to file a timber management plan with the assessor upon the
occurrence of one of the following:
(a) An application for designation as forest land is submitted; or
(b) Designated forest land is sold or transferred and a notice of
continuance, described in subsection (5)(c) of this section, is signed.
(8) If land is removed from designation because of any of the
circumstances listed in subsection (5)(a) through (c) of this section,
the removal shall apply only to the land affected. If land is removed
from designation because of subsection (5)(d) of this section, the
removal shall apply only to the actual area of land that is no longer
primarily devoted to the growing and harvesting of timber, without
regard to any other land that may have been included in the application
and approved for designation, as long as the remaining designated
forest land meets the definition of forest land contained in RCW
84.33.035.
(9) Within thirty days after the removal of designation as forest
land, the assessor shall notify the owner in writing, setting forth the
reasons for the removal. The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal
the removal to the county board of equalization in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(10) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal a copy of the notice
of removal with a notation of the action, if any, upon appeal, together
with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for the land
removed from designation shall, at the expense of the applicant, be
filed by the assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded and a
notation of removal from designation shall immediately be made upon the
assessment and tax rolls. The assessor shall revalue the land to be
removed with reference to its true and fair value as of January 1st of
the year of removal from designation. Both the assessed value before
and after the removal of designation shall be listed. Taxes based on
the value of the land as forest land shall be assessed and payable up
until the date of removal and taxes based on the true and fair value of
the land shall be assessed and payable from the date of removal from
designation.
(11) Except as provided in subsection (5)(c), (13), or (14) of this
section, a compensating tax shall be imposed on land removed from
designation as forest land. The compensating tax shall be due and
payable to the treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the
amount of this tax. As soon as possible after the land is removed from
designation, the assessor shall compute the amount of compensating tax
and mail a notice to the owner of the amount of compensating tax owed
and the date on which payment of this tax is due. The amount of
compensating tax shall be equal to the difference between the amount of
tax last levied on the land as designated forest land and an amount
equal to the new assessed value of the land multiplied by the dollar
rate of the last levy extended against the land, multiplied by a
number, in no event greater than nine, equal to the number of years for
which the land was designated as forest land, plus compensating taxes
on the land at forest land values up until the date of removal and the
prorated taxes on the land at true and fair value from the date of
removal to the end of the current tax year.
(12) Compensating tax, together with applicable interest thereon,
shall become a lien on the land which shall attach at the time the land
is removed from designation as forest land and shall have priority to
and shall be fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance,
mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with
which the land may become charged or liable. The lien may be
foreclosed upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in
the same manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent
real property taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any compensating tax
unpaid on its due date shall thereupon become delinquent. From the
date of delinquency until paid, interest shall be charged at the same
rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.
(13) The compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section shall not be imposed if the removal of designation under
subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other forest
land located within the state of Washington;
(b) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain,
or sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in
anticipation of the exercise of such power;
(c) A donation of fee title, development rights, or the right to
harvest timber, to a government agency or organization qualified under
RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those
sections, or the sale or transfer of fee title to a governmental entity
or a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW
64.04.130, exclusively for the protection and conservation of lands
recommended for state natural area preserve purposes by the natural
heritage council and natural heritage plan as defined in chapter 79.70
RCW. At such time as the land is not used for the purposes enumerated,
the compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this section shall
be imposed upon the current owner;
(d) The sale or transfer of fee title to the parks and recreation
commission for park and recreation purposes;
(e) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located that disallows the
present use of the land;
(f) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(g) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040; or
(h) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34
RCW continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(13)(h)((; or
(i) The sale or transfer of land after the death of the owner of at
least a fifty percent interest in the land if the land has been
assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated as forest
land under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34 RCW
continuously since 1993 and the sale or transfer takes place after July
22, 2001, and on or before July 22, 2003, and the death of the owner
occurred after January 1, 1991. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(13)(i))).
(14) In a county with a population of more than one million
inhabitants, the compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section shall not be imposed if the removal of designation as forest
land under subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) An action described in subsection (13) of this section; or
(b) A transfer of a property interest to a government entity, or to
a nonprofit historic preservation corporation or nonprofit nature
conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW 64.04.130, to protect or
enhance public resources, or to preserve, maintain, improve, restore,
limit the future use of, or otherwise to conserve for public use or
enjoyment, the property interest being transferred. At such time as
the property interest is not used for the purposes enumerated, the
compensating tax shall be imposed upon the current owner.

Sec. 702 RCW 84.33.140 and 2005 c 303 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When land has been designated as forest land under RCW
84.33.130, a notation of the designation shall be made each year upon
the assessment and tax rolls. A copy of the notice of approval
together with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for
the land shall, at the expense of the applicant, be filed by the
assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded.
(2) In preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002, for
taxes payable in 2003 and each January 1st thereafter, the assessor
shall list each parcel of designated forest land at a value with
respect to the grade and class provided in this subsection and adjusted
as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The assessor shall
compute the assessed value of the land using the same assessment ratio
applied generally in computing the assessed value of other property in
the county. Values for the several grades of bare forest land shall be
as follows:

LAND
GRADE OPERABILITY
CLASS VALUES
PER ACRE

1 $234

1 2 229

3 217

4 157

1 198

2 2 190

3 183

4 132

1 154

3 2 149

3 148

4 113

1 117

4 2 114

3 113

4 86

1 85

5 2 78

3 77

4 52

1 43

6 2 39

3 39

4 37

1 21

7 2 21

3 20

4 20

8 1

(3) On or before December 31, 2001, the department shall adjust by
rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, the forest land values contained in
subsection (2) of this section in accordance with this subsection, and
shall certify the adjusted values to the assessor who will use these
values in preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002. For the
adjustment to be made on or before December 31, 2001, for use in the
2002 assessment year, the department shall:
(a) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1996, and June 30, 2001, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(b) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1995, and June 30, 2000, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(c) Adjust the forest land values contained in subsection (2) of
this section by a percentage equal to one-half of the percentage change
in the average values of harvested timber reflected by comparing the
resultant values calculated under (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(4) For the adjustments to be made on or before December 31, 2002,
and each succeeding year thereafter, the same procedure described in
subsection (3) of this section shall be followed using harvester excise
tax returns filed under RCW 84.33.074. However, this adjustment shall
be made to the prior year's adjusted value, and the five-year periods
for calculating average harvested timber values shall be successively
one year more recent.
(5) Land graded, assessed, and valued as forest land shall continue
to be so graded, assessed, and valued until removal of designation by
the assessor upon the occurrence of any of the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove the designation;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership making the land exempt from ad
valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of forest land
designation continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or
devisee of a deceased owner, shall not, by itself, result in removal of
designation. The signed notice of continuance shall be attached to the
real estate excise tax affidavit provided for in RCW 82.45.150. The
notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared by the department.
If the notice of continuance is not signed by the new owner and
attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all compensating
taxes calculated under subsection (11) of this section shall become due
and payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The auditor
shall not accept an instrument of conveyance regarding designated
forest land for filing or recording unless the new owner has signed the
notice of continuance or the compensating tax has been paid, as
evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the
treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the new
assessed valuation calculated under subsection (11) of this section to
the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of
RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of
equalization to hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that:
(i) The land is no longer primarily devoted to and used for growing
and harvesting timber. However, land shall not be removed from
designation if a governmental agency, organization, or other recipient
identified in subsection (13) or (14) of this section as exempt from
the payment of compensating tax has manifested its intent in writing or
by other official action to acquire a property interest in the
designated forest land by means of a transaction that qualifies for an
exemption under subsection (13) or (14) of this section. The
governmental agency, organization, or recipient shall annually provide
the assessor of the county in which the land is located reasonable
evidence in writing of the intent to acquire the designated land as
long as the intent continues or within sixty days of a request by the
assessor. The assessor may not request this evidence more than once in
a calendar year;
(ii) The owner has failed to comply with a final administrative or
judicial order with respect to a violation of the restocking, forest
management, fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest
debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable rules under Title
76 RCW; or
(iii) Restocking has not occurred to the extent or within the time
specified in the application for designation of such land.
(6) Land shall not be removed from designation if there is a
governmental restriction that prohibits, in whole or in part, the owner
from harvesting timber from the owner's designated forest land. If
only a portion of the parcel is impacted by governmental restrictions
of this nature, the restrictions cannot be used as a basis to remove
the remainder of the forest land from designation under this chapter.
For the purposes of this section, "governmental restrictions" includes:
(a) Any law, regulation, rule, ordinance, program, or other action
adopted or taken by a federal, state, county, city, or other
governmental entity; or (b) the land's zoning or its presence within an
urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110.
(7) The assessor shall have the option of requiring an owner of
forest land to file a timber management plan with the assessor upon the
occurrence of one of the following:
(a) An application for designation as forest land is submitted; or
(b) Designated forest land is sold or transferred and a notice of
continuance, described in subsection (5)(c) of this section, is signed.
(8) If land is removed from designation because of any of the
circumstances listed in subsection (5)(a) through (c) of this section,
the removal shall apply only to the land affected. If land is removed
from designation because of subsection (5)(d) of this section, the
removal shall apply only to the actual area of land that is no longer
primarily devoted to the growing and harvesting of timber, without
regard to any other land that may have been included in the application
and approved for designation, as long as the remaining designated
forest land meets the definition of forest land contained in RCW
84.33.035.
(9) Within thirty days after the removal of designation as forest
land, the assessor shall notify the owner in writing, setting forth the
reasons for the removal. The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal
the removal to the county board of equalization in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(10) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal a copy of the notice
of removal with a notation of the action, if any, upon appeal, together
with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for the land
removed from designation shall, at the expense of the applicant, be
filed by the assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded and a
notation of removal from designation shall immediately be made upon the
assessment and tax rolls. The assessor shall revalue the land to be
removed with reference to its true and fair value as of January 1st of
the year of removal from designation. Both the assessed value before
and after the removal of designation shall be listed. Taxes based on
the value of the land as forest land shall be assessed and payable up
until the date of removal and taxes based on the true and fair value of
the land shall be assessed and payable from the date of removal from
designation.
(11) Except as provided in subsection (5)(c), (13), or (14) of this
section, a compensating tax shall be imposed on land removed from
designation as forest land. The compensating tax shall be due and
payable to the treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the
amount of this tax. As soon as possible after the land is removed from
designation, the assessor shall compute the amount of compensating tax
and mail a notice to the owner of the amount of compensating tax owed
and the date on which payment of this tax is due. The amount of
compensating tax shall be equal to the difference between the amount of
tax last levied on the land as designated forest land and an amount
equal to the new assessed value of the land multiplied by the dollar
rate of the last levy extended against the land, multiplied by a
number, in no event greater than nine, equal to the number of years for
which the land was designated as forest land, plus compensating taxes
on the land at forest land values up until the date of removal and the
prorated taxes on the land at true and fair value from the date of
removal to the end of the current tax year.
(12) Compensating tax, together with applicable interest thereon,
shall become a lien on the land which shall attach at the time the land
is removed from designation as forest land and shall have priority to
and shall be fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance,
mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with
which the land may become charged or liable. The lien may be
foreclosed upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in
the same manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent
real property taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any compensating tax
unpaid on its due date shall thereupon become delinquent. From the
date of delinquency until paid, interest shall be charged at the same
rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.
(13) The compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section shall not be imposed if the removal of designation under
subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other forest
land located within the state of Washington;
(b) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain,
or sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in
anticipation of the exercise of such power;
(c) A donation of fee title, development rights, or the right to
harvest timber, to a government agency or organization qualified under
RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those
sections, or the sale or transfer of fee title to a governmental entity
or a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW
64.04.130, exclusively for the protection and conservation of lands
recommended for state natural area preserve purposes by the natural
heritage council and natural heritage plan as defined in chapter 79.70
RCW or approved for state natural resources conservation area purposes
as defined in chapter 79.71 RCW. At such time as the land is not used
for the purposes enumerated, the compensating tax specified in
subsection (11) of this section shall be imposed upon the current
owner;
(d) The sale or transfer of fee title to the parks and recreation
commission for park and recreation purposes;
(e) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located that disallows the
present use of the land;
(f) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(g) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040; or
(h) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34
RCW continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(13)(h)((; or
(i) The sale or transfer of land after the death of the owner of at
least a fifty percent interest in the land if the land has been
assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated as forest
land under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34 RCW
continuously since 1993 and the sale or transfer takes place after July
22, 2001, and on or before July 22, 2003, and the death of the owner
occurred after January 1, 1991. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(13)(i))).
(14) In a county with a population of more than one million
inhabitants, the compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section shall not be imposed if the removal of designation as forest
land under subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) An action described in subsection (13) of this section; or
(b) A transfer of a property interest to a government entity, or to
a nonprofit historic preservation corporation or nonprofit nature
conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW 64.04.130, to protect or
enhance public resources, or to preserve, maintain, improve, restore,
limit the future use of, or otherwise to conserve for public use or
enjoyment, the property interest being transferred. At such time as
the property interest is not used for the purposes enumerated, the
compensating tax shall be imposed upon the current owner.

Sec. 703 RCW 84.34.108 and 2003 c 170 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When land has once been classified under this chapter, a
notation of the classification shall be made each year upon the
assessment and tax rolls and the land shall be valued pursuant to RCW
84.34.060 or 84.34.065 until removal of all or a portion of the
classification by the assessor upon occurrence of any of the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove all or a portion of
the classification;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership, except a transfer that
resulted from a default in loan payments made to or secured by a
governmental agency that intends to or is required by law or regulation
to resell the property for the same use as before, making all or a
portion of the land exempt from ad valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of classification
continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or devisee of
a deceased owner shall not, by itself, result in removal of
classification. The notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared
by the department. If the notice of continuance is not signed by the
new owner and attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all
additional taxes calculated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section
shall become due and payable by the seller or transferor at time of
sale. The auditor shall not accept an instrument of conveyance
regarding classified land for filing or recording unless the new owner
has signed the notice of continuance or the additional tax has been
paid, as evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto
by the treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the
new assessed valuation calculated under subsection (4) of this section
to the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board
of equalization to hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that all or a portion of the
land no longer meets the criteria for classification under this
chapter. The criteria for classification pursuant to this chapter
continue to apply after classification has been granted.
The granting authority, upon request of an assessor, shall provide
reasonable assistance to the assessor in making a determination whether
the land continues to meet the qualifications of RCW 84.34.020 (1) or
(3). The assistance shall be provided within thirty days of receipt of
the request.
(2) Land may not be removed from classification because of:
(a) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120; or
(b) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040.
(3) Within thirty days after such removal of all or a portion of
the land from current use classification, the assessor shall notify the
owner in writing, setting forth the reasons for the removal. The
seller, transferor, or owner may appeal the removal to the county board
of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(4) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal, the assessor shall
revalue the affected land with reference to its true and fair value on
January 1st of the year of removal from classification. Both the
assessed valuation before and after the removal of classification shall
be listed and taxes shall be allocated according to that part of the
year to which each assessed valuation applies. Except as provided in
subsection (6) of this section, an additional tax, applicable interest,
and penalty shall be imposed which shall be due and payable to the
treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the amount of the
additional tax. As soon as possible, the assessor shall compute the
amount of additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty and the
treasurer shall mail notice to the owner of the amount thereof and the
date on which payment is due. The amount of the additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty shall be determined as follows:
(a) The amount of additional tax shall be equal to the difference
between the property tax paid as "open space land(("))," "farm and
agricultural land(("))," or "timber land" and the amount of property
tax otherwise due and payable for the seven years last past had the
land not been so classified;
(b) The amount of applicable interest shall be equal to the
interest upon the amounts of the additional tax paid at the same
statutory rate charged on delinquent property taxes from the dates on
which the additional tax could have been paid without penalty if the
land had been assessed at a value without regard to this chapter;
(c) The amount of the penalty shall be as provided in RCW
84.34.080. The penalty shall not be imposed if the removal satisfies
the conditions of RCW 84.34.070.
(5) Additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty, shall become
a lien on the land which shall attach at the time the land is removed
from classification under this chapter and shall have priority to and
shall be fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance, mortgage,
judgment, debt, obligation or responsibility to or with which the land
may become charged or liable. This lien may be foreclosed upon
expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner
provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property
taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050 ((now or as hereafter amended)).
Any additional tax unpaid on its due date shall thereupon become
delinquent. From the date of delinquency until paid, interest shall be
charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem
property taxes.
(6) The additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty specified
in subsection (4) of this section shall not be imposed if the removal
of classification pursuant to subsection (1) of this section resulted
solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other land
located within the state of Washington;
(b)(i) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent
domain, or (ii) sale or transfer to an entity having the power of
eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of such power, said
entity having manifested its intent in writing or by other official
action;
(c) A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or
other such calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the landowner
changing the use of the property;
(d) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located which disallows the
present use of the land;
(e) Transfer of land to a church when the land would qualify for
exemption pursuant to RCW 84.36.020;
(f) Acquisition of property interests by state agencies or agencies
or organizations qualified under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the
purposes enumerated in those sections. At such time as these property
interests are not used for the purposes enumerated in RCW 84.34.210 and
64.04.130 the additional tax specified in subsection (4) of this
section shall be imposed;
(g) Removal of land classified as farm and agricultural land under
RCW 84.34.020(2)(e);
(h) Removal of land from classification after enactment of a
statutory exemption that qualifies the land for exemption and receipt
of notice from the owner to remove the land from classification;
(i) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(j) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040; or
(k) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or classified under this
chapter continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(6)(k)((; or
(l) The sale or transfer of land after the death of the owner of at
least a fifty percent interest in the land if the land has been
assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated as forest
land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or classified under this chapter
continuously since 1993 and the sale or transfer takes place after July
22, 2001, and on or before July 22, 2003, and the death of the owner
occurred after January 1, 1991. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purpose of this subsection
(6)(l))).

Sec. 704 RCW 84.52.010 and 2005 c 122 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and
purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, shall be
determined, calculated, and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated, and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on
any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW
84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either of
these sections, the assessor shall recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(1) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
road district, and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax
rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law;
however any state levy shall take precedence over all other levies and
shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW
((84.52.125, 84.52.135, 36.54.130, 84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of
the levy by a metropolitan park district that was protected under RCW
84.52.120, and 84.52.105)) 36.54.130, 84.34.230, 84.52.069, 84.52.105,
the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that was
protected under RCW 84.52.120, 84.52.125, and 84.52.135, the combined
rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent
limitation exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property, then these levies shall be reduced as follows:
(a) The portion of the levy by a fire protection district that is
protected under RCW 84.52.125 shall be reduced until the combined rate
no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated;
(b) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under
RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(c) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry
district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or must be eliminated;
(d) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(e) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; and
(f) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or eliminated.
(2) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be
reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of
taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(a) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(b) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(c) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire
protection service authorities, library districts, the first fifty cent
per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park
districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for public hospital districts, shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;
(d) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(e) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to
((regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)
(b) and (c) and)) fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and
52.16.160 and regional fire protection service authorities under RCW
52.26.140(1) (b) and (c) shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or
eliminated; and
(f) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection
service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), ((fire protection
districts under RCW 52.16.130,)) library districts, metropolitan park
districts created before January 1, 2002, under their first fifty cent
per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public hospital
districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

Sec. 705 RCW 84.52.054 and 1986 c 133 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The additional tax provided for in ((subparagraph (a) of the
seventeenth amendment to)) Article VII, section 2 of the state
Constitution ((as amended by Amendment 59 and as thereafter amended)),
and specifically authorized by RCW 84.52.052, ((as now or hereafter
amended, and RCW)) 84.52.053 ((and)), 84.52.0531, and 84.52.130, shall
be set forth in terms of dollars on the ballot of the proposition to be
submitted to the voters, together with an estimate of the dollar rate
of tax levy that will be required to produce the dollar amount; and the
county assessor, in spreading this tax upon the rolls, shall determine
the eventual dollar rate required to produce the amount of dollars so
voted upon, regardless of the estimate of dollar rate of tax levy
carried in said proposition. In the case of a school district or fire
protection district proposition for a particular period, the dollar
amount and the corresponding estimate of the dollar rate of tax levy
shall be set forth for each of the years in that period. The dollar
amount for each annual levy in the particular period may be equal or in
different amounts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 84.55.012 (Reduction of property tax levy -- Setting amount
of future levies) and 1997 c 2 s 1 & 1995 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 2; and
(2) RCW 84.55.0121 (Reduction of property tax levy for collection
in 1998) and 1997 c 3 s 301.

PART VIII
MISCELLANEOUS TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS
Sec. 801 RCW 82.46.010 and 1994 c 272 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county or city shall identify
in the adopted budget the capital projects funded in whole or in part
from the proceeds of the tax authorized in subsection (2) of this
section, and shall indicate that such tax is intended to be in addition
to other funds that may be reasonably available for such capital
projects.
(2) The legislative authority of any county or any city may impose
an excise tax on each sale of real property in the unincorporated areas
of the county for the county tax and in the corporate limits of the
city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding one-quarter of one
percent of the selling price. The revenues from this tax shall be used
by any city or county with a population of five thousand or less and
any city or county that does not plan under RCW 36.70A.040 for any
capital purpose identified in a capital improvements plan and local
capital improvements, including those listed in RCW 35.43.040.
After April 30, 1992, revenues generated from the tax imposed under
this subsection in counties over five thousand population and cities
over five thousand population that are required or choose to plan under
RCW 36.70A.040 shall be used solely for financing capital projects
specified in a capital facilities plan element of a comprehensive plan
and housing relocation assistance under RCW 59.18.440 and 59.18.450.
However, revenues (a) pledged by such counties and cities to debt
retirement prior to April 30, 1992, may continue to be used for that
purpose until the original debt for which the revenues were pledged is
retired, or (b) committed prior to April 30, 1992, by such counties or
cities to a project may continue to be used for that purpose until the
project is completed.
(3) In lieu of imposing the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2), the
legislative authority of any county or any city may impose an
additional excise tax on each sale of real property in the
unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the
corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding
one-half of one percent of the selling price.
(4) Taxes imposed under this section shall be collected from
persons who are taxable by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the unincorporated areas of the
county or within the corporate limits of the city, as the case may be.
(5) Taxes imposed under this section shall comply with all
applicable rules, regulations, laws, and court decisions regarding real
estate excise taxes as imposed by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW.
(6) As used in this section, "city" means any city or town and
"capital project" means those public works projects of a local
government for planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction,
repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets; roads;
highways; sidewalks; street and road lighting systems; traffic signals;
bridges; domestic water systems; storm and sanitary sewer systems;
parks; recreational facilities; law enforcement facilities; fire
protection facilities; trails; libraries; administrative and/or
judicial facilities; river and/or waterway flood control projects by
those jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992, have expended funds
derived from the tax authorized by this section for such purposes; and,
until December 31, 1995, housing projects for those jurisdictions that,
prior to June 11, 1992, have expended or committed to expend funds
derived from the tax authorized by this section or the tax authorized
by RCW 82.46.035 for such purposes.

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 The repealed sections in sections 110,
330, 413, and 512 of this act do not affect any rights, liabilities,
obligations, or proceedings, incurred or instituted under those
repealed sections or rules or orders adopted by the department of
revenue pursuant to those repealed sections prior to the effective date
of section 110, 330, 413, or 512 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 (1) Unless expressly provided otherwise,
this act takes effect July 1, 2006.
(2) Section 702 of this act takes effect July 1, 2007.
(3) Section 509 of this act takes effect July 1, 2012.
(4) Sections 309 through 311 of this act are necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and take effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 Section 504 of this act takes effect if
chapter 149, Laws of 2003 takes effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 Section 503 of this act expires if chapter
149, Laws of 2003 takes effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 Section 701 of this act expires July 1,
2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 Part headings used in this act are not
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---