BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
SUBSTANCE ABUSE REDUCTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 70.96A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Any county that has imposed the sales and use tax authorized by
RCW 82.14.460 may seek a state appropriation of up to one hundred
thousand dollars annually beginning in fiscal year 2008 and ending in
fiscal year 2010. The funds shall be used to provide additional
support to counties for mental health or substance abuse treatment for
persons with methamphetamine addiction. Local governments receiving
funds under this section may not use the funds to supplant existing
funding.
(2) Counties receiving funding shall: (a) Provide a financial plan
for the expenditure of any potential funds prior to funds being
awarded; (b) report annually to the appropriate committees of the
legislature regarding the number of clients served, services provided,
and a statement of expenditures; and (c) expend no more than ten
percent for administrative costs or for information technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 72.09
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Through June 30, 2010, it is the intent of the legislature to
provide one hundred additional placements for therapeutic drug and
alcohol treatment in the state's correctional institutions, above the
level of placements provided on January 1, 2006.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide an annual combined level of state and federal funding for
multijurisdictional drug task forces and local government drug
prosecution assistance at a minimum of four million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 (1) It is the intent of the legislature to
provide assistance for jurisdictions enforcing illegal drug laws that
have historically been underserved by federally funded state narcotics
task forces and are considered to be major transport areas of narcotics
traffickers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 Three pilot enforcement areas shall be
established for a period of four fiscal years, beginning July 1, 2006,
and ending June 30, 2010, with one in the southwestern region of the
state, comprising of Pacific, Wahkiakum, Lewis, Grays Harbor, and
Cowlitz counties; one in the southeastern region of the state,
comprising of Walla Walla, Columbia, Garfield, and Asotin counties; and
one in the northeastern part of the state, comprising of Stevens,
Ferry, Pend Oreille, and Lincoln counties. The counties comprising a
specific pilot area shall coordinate with each other to establish and
implement a regional strategy to enforce illegal drug laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide funding of no less than one million five hundred seventy-five
thousand dollars annually. The funding is to be divided equally among
the three pilot enforcement areas. This funding is intended to provide
a minimum of four additional sheriff deputies for each pilot area, two
deputy prosecutors who will support the counties that are included in
the pilot area, a court clerk, and clerical staff to serve the pilot
area. It is the intent of the legislature that those counties that
have not previously received significant federal narcotics task force
funding shall be allocated funding for at least one additional
sheriff's deputy. Counties are encouraged to utilize drug courts and
treatment programs, and to share resources that operate in the region
through the use of interlocal agreements. The funding appropriated for
this purpose must not be used to supplant existing funding and cannot
be used for any purpose other than the enforcement of illegal drug
laws.
The criminal justice training commission shall allocate funds to
the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys and the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The Washington association
of prosecuting attorneys is responsible for administration of the
funding and programs for the prosecution of crimes and court
proceedings. The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
shall administer the funds provided for law enforcement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 The Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, and
the Washington association of county officials shall jointly develop
measures to determine the efficacy of the programs in the pilot areas.
These measures shall include comparison of arrest rates before the
implementation of this act and after, reduction of recidivism, and any
other factors that are determined to be relevant to evaluation of the
programs. The organizations named in this section shall present their
findings to the legislature by December 1, 2008.

Sec. 108 RCW 2.28.170 and 2005 c 504 s 504 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Counties may establish and operate drug courts.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "drug court" means a court
that has special calendars or dockets designed to achieve a reduction
in recidivism and substance abuse among nonviolent, substance abusing
felony and nonfelony offenders, whether adult or juvenile, by
increasing their likelihood for successful rehabilitation through
early, continuous, and intense judicially supervised treatment;
mandatory periodic drug testing; and the use of appropriate sanctions
and other rehabilitation services.
(3)(a) Any jurisdiction that seeks a state appropriation to fund a
drug court program must first:
(i) Exhaust all federal funding that is available to support the
operations of its drug court and associated services; and
(ii) Match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state moneys allocated
for drug court programs with local cash or in-kind resources. Moneys
allocated by the state must be used to supplement, not supplant, other
federal, state, and local funds for drug court operations and
associated services.
(b) Any county that establishes a drug court pursuant to this
section shall establish minimum requirements for the participation of
offenders in the program. The drug court may adopt local requirements
that are more stringent than the minimum. The minimum requirements
are:
(i) The offender would benefit from substance abuse treatment;
(ii) The offender has not previously been convicted of a serious
violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and
(iii) Without regard to whether proof of any of these elements is
required to convict, the offender is not currently charged with or
convicted of an offense:
(A) That is a sex offense;
(B) That is a serious violent offense;
(C) During which the defendant used a firearm; or
(D) During which the defendant caused substantial or great bodily
harm or death to another person.

Sec. 109 RCW 26.44.020 and 2000 c 162 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington,
juvenile department.
(2) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department, the
prosecuting attorney, the state patrol, the director of public safety,
or the office of the sheriff.
(3) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a
person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine and
surgery, optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic
medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery or to provide other
health services. The term "practitioner" includes a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a person who
is being furnished Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner will not be considered, for that reason
alone, a neglected person for the purposes of this chapter.
(4) "Institution" means a private or public hospital or any other
facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment or care.
(5) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(6) "Child" or "children" means any person under the age of
eighteen years of age.
(7) "Professional school personnel" include, but are not limited
to, teachers, counselors, administrators, child care facility
personnel, and school nurses.
(8) "Social service counselor" means anyone engaged in a
professional capacity during the regular course of employment in
encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support or education of
children, or providing social services to adults or families, including
mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and domestic violence
programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an employee or agent
of any public or private organization or institution.
(9) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology
under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as
an employee or agent of any public or private organization or
institution.
(10) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter
18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee
or agent of any public or private organization or institution.
(11) "Clergy" means any regularly licensed or ordained minister,
priest, or rabbi of any church or religious denomination, whether
acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any
public or private organization or institution.
(12) "Abuse or neglect" means the injury, sexual abuse, sexual
exploitation, negligent treatment, or maltreatment of a child by any
person under circumstances which indicate that the child's health,
welfare, and safety is harmed, including conduct prohibited under RCW
9A.42.100, and excluding conduct permitted under RCW 9A.16.100. An
abused child is a child who has been subjected to child abuse or
neglect as defined in this section.
(13) "Child protective services section" means the child protective
services section of the department.
(14) "Sexual exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing, permitting, or
encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any person; or (b)
allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in the obscene or
pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of a child by any
person.
(15) "Negligent treatment or maltreatment" means an act or omission
that evidences a serious disregard of consequences of such magnitude as
to constitute a clear and present danger to the child's health,
welfare, and safety. The fact that siblings share a bedroom is not, in
and of itself, negligent treatment or maltreatment.
(16) "Child protective services" means those services provided by
the department designed to protect children from child abuse and
neglect and safeguard such children from future abuse and neglect, and
conduct investigations of child abuse and neglect reports.
Investigations may be conducted regardless of the location of the
alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes referral
to services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of
children, the coordination of necessary programs and services relevant
to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse and
neglect, and services to children to ensure that each child has a
permanent home. In determining whether protective services should be
provided, the department shall not decline to provide such services
solely because of the child's unwillingness or developmental inability
to describe the nature and severity of the abuse or neglect.
(17) "Malice" or "maliciously" means an evil intent, wish, or
design to vex, annoy, or injure another person. Such malice may be
inferred from an act done in willful disregard of the rights of
another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an
act or omission of duty betraying a willful disregard of social duty.
(18) "Sexually aggressive youth" means a child who is defined in
RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive youth.
(19) "Unfounded" means available information indicates that, more
likely than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur. No unfounded
allegation of child abuse or neglect may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any other provider licensed
under chapter 74.15 RCW.

Sec. 110 RCW 26.44.020 and 2005 c 512 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington,
juvenile department.
(2) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department, the
prosecuting attorney, the state patrol, the director of public safety,
or the office of the sheriff.
(3) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a
person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine and
surgery, optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic
medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery or to provide other
health services. The term "practitioner" includes a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a person who
is being furnished Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner will not be considered, for that reason
alone, a neglected person for the purposes of this chapter.
(4) "Institution" means a private or public hospital or any other
facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment or care.
(5) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(6) "Child" or "children" means any person under the age of
eighteen years of age.
(7) "Professional school personnel" include, but are not limited
to, teachers, counselors, administrators, child care facility
personnel, and school nurses.
(8) "Social service counselor" means anyone engaged in a
professional capacity during the regular course of employment in
encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support or education of
children, or providing social services to adults or families, including
mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and domestic violence
programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an employee or agent
of any public or private organization or institution.
(9) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology
under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as
an employee or agent of any public or private organization or
institution.
(10) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter
18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee
or agent of any public or private organization or institution.
(11) "Clergy" means any regularly licensed or ordained minister,
priest, or rabbi of any church or religious denomination, whether
acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any
public or private organization or institution.
(12) "Abuse or neglect" means sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or
injury of a child by any person under circumstances which cause harm to
the child's health, welfare, or safety, including conduct prohibited
under RCW 9A.42.100, and excluding conduct permitted under RCW
9A.16.100; or the negligent treatment or maltreatment of a child by a
person responsible for or providing care to the child. An abused child
is a child who has been subjected to child abuse or neglect as defined
in this section.
(13) "Child protective services section" means the child protective
services section of the department.
(14) "Sexual exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing, permitting, or
encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any person; or (b)
allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in the obscene or
pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of a child by any
person.
(15) "Negligent treatment or maltreatment" means an act or a
failure to act, or the cumulative effects of a pattern of conduct,
behavior, or inaction, that evidences a serious disregard of
consequences of such magnitude as to constitute a clear and present
danger to a child's health, welfare, or safety. When considering
whether a clear and present danger exists, evidence of a parent's
substance abuse as a contributing factor to negligent treatment or
maltreatment shall be given great weight. The fact that siblings share
a bedroom is not, in and of itself, negligent treatment or
maltreatment. Poverty, homelessness, or exposure to domestic violence
as defined in RCW 26.50.010 that is perpetrated against someone other
than the child ((do [does])) does not constitute negligent treatment or
maltreatment in and of ((themselves [itself])) itself.
(16) "Child protective services" means those services provided by
the department designed to protect children from child abuse and
neglect and safeguard such children from future abuse and neglect, and
conduct investigations of child abuse and neglect reports.
Investigations may be conducted regardless of the location of the
alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes referral
to services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of
children, the coordination of necessary programs and services relevant
to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse and
neglect, and services to children to ensure that each child has a
permanent home. In determining whether protective services should be
provided, the department shall not decline to provide such services
solely because of the child's unwillingness or developmental inability
to describe the nature and severity of the abuse or neglect.
(17) "Malice" or "maliciously" means an evil intent, wish, or
design to vex, annoy, or injure another person. Such malice may be
inferred from an act done in willful disregard of the rights of
another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an
act or omission of duty betraying a willful disregard of social duty.
(18) "Sexually aggressive youth" means a child who is defined in
RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive youth.
(19) "Unfounded" means available information indicates that, more
likely than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur. No unfounded
allegation of child abuse or neglect may be disclosed to a child-
placing agency, private adoption agency, or any other provider licensed
under chapter 74.15 RCW.

Sec. 111 RCW 26.44.195 and 2005 c 512 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the department, upon investigation of a report that a child
has been abused or neglected as defined in this chapter, determines
that the child has been subject to negligent treatment or maltreatment,
the department may offer services to the child's parents, guardians, or
legal custodians to: (a) Ameliorate the conditions that endangered the
welfare of the child; or (b) address or treat the effects of
mistreatment or neglect upon the child.
(2) When evaluating whether the child has been subject to negligent
treatment or maltreatment, evidence of a parent's substance abuse as a
contributing factor to a parent's failure to provide for a child's
basic health, welfare, or safety shall be given great weight.
(3) If the child's parents, guardians, or legal custodians are
available and willing to participate on a voluntary basis in in-home
services, and the department determines that in-home services on a
voluntary basis are appropriate for the family, the department may
offer such services.
(4) In cases where the department has offered appropriate and
reasonable services under subsection (1) of this section, and the
parents, guardians, or legal custodians refuse to accept or fail to
obtain available and appropriate treatment or services, or are unable
or unwilling to participate in or successfully and substantially
complete the treatment or services identified by the department, the
department may initiate a dependency proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW
on the basis that the negligent treatment or maltreatment by the
parent, guardian, or legal custodian constitutes neglect. When
evaluating whether to initiate a dependency proceeding on this basis,
the evidence of a parent's substance abuse as a contributing factor to
the negligent treatment or maltreatment shall be given great weight.
(5) Nothing in this section precludes the department from filing a
dependency petition as provided in chapter 13.34 RCW if it determines
that such action is necessary to protect the child from abuse or
neglect.
(((6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create in any
person an entitlement to services or financial assistance in paying for
services or to create judicial authority to order the provision of
services to any person or family if the services are unavailable or
unsuitable or if the child or family is not eligible for such
services.))

Sec. 112 RCW 74.34.020 and 2003 c 230 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Abandonment" means action or inaction by a person or entity
with a duty of care for a vulnerable adult that leaves the vulnerable
person without the means or ability to obtain necessary food, clothing,
shelter, or health care.
(2) "Abuse" means the willful action or inaction that inflicts
injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or punishment on a
vulnerable adult. In instances of abuse of a vulnerable adult who is
unable to express or demonstrate physical harm, pain, or mental
anguish, the abuse is presumed to cause physical harm, pain, or mental
anguish. Abuse includes sexual abuse, mental abuse, physical abuse,
and exploitation of a vulnerable adult, which have the following
meanings:
(a) "Sexual abuse" means any form of nonconsensual sexual contact,
including but not limited to unwanted or inappropriate touching, rape,
sodomy, sexual coercion, sexually explicit photographing, and sexual
harassment. Sexual abuse includes any sexual contact between a staff
person, who is not also a resident or client, of a facility or a staff
person of a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, and a
vulnerable adult living in that facility or receiving service from a
program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, whether or not it is
consensual.
(b) "Physical abuse" means the willful action of inflicting bodily
injury or physical mistreatment. Physical abuse includes, but is not
limited to, striking with or without an object, slapping, pinching,
choking, kicking, shoving, prodding, or the use of chemical restraints
or physical restraints unless the restraints are consistent with
licensing requirements, and includes restraints that are otherwise
being used inappropriately.
(c) "Mental abuse" means any willful action or inaction of mental
or verbal abuse. Mental abuse includes, but is not limited to,
coercion, harassment, inappropriately isolating a vulnerable adult from
family, friends, or regular activity, and verbal assault that includes
ridiculing, intimidating, yelling, or swearing.
(d) "Exploitation" means an act of forcing, compelling, or exerting
undue influence over a vulnerable adult causing the vulnerable adult to
act in a way that is inconsistent with relevant past behavior, or
causing the vulnerable adult to perform services for the benefit of
another.
(3) "Consent" means express written consent granted after the
vulnerable adult or his or her legal representative has been fully
informed of the nature of the services to be offered and that the
receipt of services is voluntary.
(4) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(5) "Facility" means a residence licensed or required to be
licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, boarding homes; chapter 18.51 RCW,
nursing homes; chapter 70.128 RCW, adult family homes; chapter 72.36
RCW, soldiers' homes; or chapter 71A.20 RCW, residential habilitation
centers; or any other facility licensed by the department.
(6) "Financial exploitation" means the illegal or improper use of
the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult
by any person for any person's profit or advantage.
(7) "Individual provider" means a person under contract with the
department to provide services in the home under chapter 74.09 or
74.39A RCW.
(8) "Mandated reporter" is an employee of the department; law
enforcement officer; social worker; professional school personnel;
individual provider; an employee of a facility; an operator of a
facility; an employee of a social service, welfare, mental health,
adult day health, adult day care, home health, home care, or hospice
agency; county coroner or medical examiner; Christian Science
practitioner; or health care provider subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.
(9) "Neglect" means (a) a pattern of conduct or inaction by a
person or entity with a duty of care that fails to provide the goods
and services that maintain physical or mental health of a vulnerable
adult, or that fails to avoid or prevent physical or mental harm or
pain to a vulnerable adult, including but not limited to conduct
prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100; or (b) an act or omission that
demonstrates a serious disregard of consequences of such a magnitude as
to constitute a clear and present danger to the vulnerable adult's
health, welfare, or safety.
(10) "Permissive reporter" means any person, employee of a
financial institution, attorney, or volunteer in a facility or program
providing services for vulnerable adults.
(11) "Protective services" means any services provided by the
department to a vulnerable adult with the consent of the vulnerable
adult, or the legal representative of the vulnerable adult, who has
been abandoned, abused, financially exploited, neglected, or in a state
of self-neglect. These services may include, but are not limited to
case management, social casework, home care, placement, arranging for
medical evaluations, psychological evaluations, day care, or referral
for legal assistance.
(12) "Self-neglect" means the failure of a vulnerable adult, not
living in a facility, to provide for himself or herself the goods and
services necessary for the vulnerable adult's physical or mental
health, and the absence of which impairs or threatens the vulnerable
adult's well-being. This definition may include a vulnerable adult who
is receiving services through home health, hospice, or a home care
agency, or an individual provider when the neglect is not a result of
inaction by that agency or individual provider.
(13) "Vulnerable adult" includes a person:
(a) Sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or
physical inability to care for himself or herself; or
(b) Found incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW; or
(c) Who has a developmental disability as defined under RCW
71A.10.020; or
(d) Admitted to any facility; or
(e) Receiving services from home health, hospice, or home care
agencies licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW;
or
(f) Receiving services from an individual provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall review federal, state, and local funding
sources and funding levels available to local meth action teams through
the Washington state methamphetamine initiative to determine whether
funding is adequate to accomplish the mission of the meth action teams.
The department shall also review the funding levels for drug task
forces in the state of Washington to determine whether they may require
additional resources to successfully interdict drug trafficking
organizations and clandestine labs statewide. The department shall
report findings and recommendations to the legislature by November 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 The department of social and health
services shall consult with faith-based organizations to discuss the
appropriate role that such organizations may have in filling support
service delivery needs for persons with chemical dependency disorders.
The department shall report findings and recommendations to the
legislature by November 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 The agency council on coordinated
transportation shall adopt, as a part of its strategic program, a plan
to increase access by recovering addicts to existing special needs
transportation services already offered by medicaid brokerages and
local transportation coalitions. The council may also implement an
awareness campaign through department of corrections community
corrections officers and service providers licensed by the department
of social and health services division of alcohol and substance abuse
to promote to recovering addicts seeking treatment the use of special
needs transportation services, the council web site, and the statewide
trip planner. The council shall report back to the legislature
regarding the implementation of these strategies by November 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 The department of social and health
services, in consultation with the attorney general, shall report to
the legislature by January 15, 2007, on the status of ongoing
multimedia campaigns to prevent methamphetamine use and underage
drinking, and promote treatment, within the state of Washington.

PART II
DRUG-FREE WORKPLACE PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Alcohol" means ethyl alcohol, hydrated oxide of ethyl, or
spirits of wine, from whatever source or by whatever process produced.
(2) "Alcohol test" means a chemical, biological, or physical
instrumental analysis administered for the purpose of determining the
presence or absence of alcohol within an individual's body systems.
(3) "Chain of custody" means the methodology of tracking specimens
for the purpose of maintaining control and accountability from initial
collection to final disposition for all specimens and providing for
accountability at each stage in handling, testing, and storing
specimens and reporting test results.
(4) "Collection site" means a place where individuals present
themselves for the purpose of providing a urine, breath, or other
specimen to be analyzed for the presence of drugs or alcohol.
(5) "Confirmation test" or "confirmed test" means a second
analytical procedure used to identify the presence of a specific drug
or metabolic in a specimen. Drug tests must be confirmed as specified
in section 205(5) of this act. Alcohol tests must be confirmed by a
second breath test or as specified for drug tests.
(6) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(7) "Drug" means amphetamines, cannabinoids, cocaine, phencyclidine
(PCP), methadone, methaqualone, opiates, barbiturates, benzodiazepines,
propoxyphene, or a metabolite of any such substances.
(8) "Drug test" means a chemical, biological, or physical
instrumental analysis administered on a specimen sample for the purpose
of determining the presence or absence of a drug or its metabolites
within the sample.
(9) "Employee" means a person who is employed for salary, wages, or
other remuneration by an employer.
(10) "Employee assistance program" means a program designed to
assist in the identification and resolution of job performance problems
associated with employees impaired by personal concerns. A minimum
level of core services must include: Consultation and professional,
confidential, appropriate, and timely problem assessment services;
short-term problem resolution; referrals for appropriate diagnosis,
treatment, and assistance; follow-up and monitoring; employee
education; and supervisory training.
(11) "Employer" means an employer subject to Title 51 RCW but does
not include the state or any department, agency, or instrumentality of
the state; any county; any city; any school district or educational
service district; or any municipal corporation.
(12) "Initial test" means a sensitive, rapid, and reliable
procedure to identify negative and presumptive positive specimens. An
initial drug test must use an immunoassay procedure or an equivalent
procedure or must use a more accurate scientifically accepted method
approved by the national institute on drug abuse as more accurate
technology becomes available in a cost-effective form.
(13) "Injury" means a sudden and tangible happening, of a traumatic
nature, producing an immediate or prompt result and occurring from
without, and such physical conditions as result therefrom.
(14) "Job applicant" means a person who has applied for employment
with an employer and has been offered employment conditioned upon
successfully passing a drug test and may have begun work pending the
results of the drug test.
(15) "Last-chance agreement" means a notice to an employee who is
referred to the employee assistance program due to a verified positive
alcohol or drug test or for violating an alcohol or drug-related
employer rule that states the terms and conditions of continued
employment with which the employee must comply.
(16) "Medical review officer" means a licensed physician trained in
the field of drug testing who provides medical assessment of positive
test results, requests reanalysis if necessary, and makes a
determination whether or not drug misuse has occurred.
(17) "Nonprescription medication" means a drug or medication
authorized under federal or state law for general distribution and use
without a prescription in the treatment of human disease, ailments, or
injuries.
(18) "Prescription medication" means a drug or medication lawfully
prescribed by a physician, or other health care provider licensed to
prescribe medication, for an individual and taken in accordance with
the prescription.
(19) "Rehabilitation program" means a program approved by the
department that is capable of providing expert identification,
assessment, and resolution of employee drug or alcohol abuse in a
confidential and timely service. Any rehabilitation program under this
chapter must contain a two-year continuing care component.
(20) "Specimen" means breath or urine. "Specimen" may include
other products of the human body capable of revealing the presence of
drugs or their metabolites or of alcohol, if approved by the United
States department of health and human services and permitted by rules
adopted under section 212 of this act.
(21) "Substance" means drugs or alcohol.
(22) "Substance abuse test" or "test" means a chemical, biological,
or physical instrumental analysis administered on a specimen sample for
the purpose of determining the presence or absence of a drug or its
metabolites or of alcohol within the sample.
(23) "Threshold detection level" means the level at which the
presence of a drug or alcohol can be reasonably expected to be detected
by an initial and confirmation test performed by a laboratory meeting
the standards specified in this chapter. The threshold detection level
indicates the level at which a valid conclusion can be drawn that the
drug or alcohol is present in the employee's specimen.
(24) "Verified positive test result" means a confirmed positive
test result obtained by a laboratory meeting the standards specified in
this chapter that has been reviewed and verified by a medical review
officer in accordance with medical review officer guidelines
promulgated by the United States department of health and human
services.
(25) "Workers' compensation premium" means the medical aid fund
premium and the accident fund premium under Title 51 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 (1) An employer, except an employer that
is self-insured for the purposes of Title 51 RCW, implementing a drug-free workplace program in accordance with section 203 of this act shall
qualify for a five percent workers' compensation premium discount under
Title 51 RCW if the employer:
(a) Is certified by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of
the department as provided in section 212 of this act. The employer
must maintain an alcohol and drug-free workplace program in accordance
with the standards, procedures, and rules established in or under this
chapter. If the employer fails to maintain the program as required,
the employer shall not qualify for the premium discount provided under
this section;
(b) Is in good standing and remains in good standing with the
department of labor and industries with respect to the employer's
workers' compensation premium obligations and any other premiums and
assessments under Title 51 RCW; and
(c) Has medical insurance available to its full-time employees
through an employer, union, or jointly sponsored medical plan.
(2) The premium discount must remain in effect as long as the
employer is certified under section 212 of this act, up to a maximum of
three years from the date of initial certification.
(3) A certified employer may discontinue operating a drug-free
workplace program at any time. The qualification for a premium
discount shall expire in accordance with decertification rules adopted
by the department under section 212 of this act.
(4) An employer whose drug-free workplace program reasonably meets,
as of July 1, 2006, all the requirements for the premium discount
provided in this section is not eligible for certification, except that
an employer who has had in place for two years prior to the effective
date of this section a drug-free workplace program that meets the
requirements of section 203 of this act, but whose policy allows
termination for an employee's first verified positive test, shall
qualify for a two percent workers' compensation premium discount under
Title 51 RCW upon adding a provision for job continuation through a
last chance agreement following a first verified positive alcohol or
drug test, as required by section 207(1)(b) of this act.
(5) Nothing in this chapter creates or alters an obligation on the
part of an employer seeking to participate in this program to bargain
with a collective bargaining representative of its employees.
(6) An employer may not receive premium discounts from the
department of labor and industries under more than one premium discount
program. For purposes of this chapter, the retrospective rating
program is not considered a premium discount. An employer
participating in and meeting all of the requirements for the discount
provided in this section and also participating in another premium
discount program offered by the department of labor and industries is
only entitled to the premium discount that is the highest.
(7) The department of labor and industries will notify self-insured
employers of the value of drug-free workplace programs and encourage
them to implement programs that are in accord with section 203 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 (1) A drug-free workplace program
established under this chapter must contain all of the following
elements:
(a) A written policy statement in compliance with section 204 of
this act;
(b) Substance abuse testing in compliance with section 205 of this
act;
(c) An employee assistance program in compliance with section 206
of this act;
(d) Employee education in compliance with section 208 of this act;
and
(e) Supervisor training in compliance with section 209 of this act.
(2) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section, a drug-free workplace program established under this chapter
must be implemented in compliance with the confidentiality standards
provided in section 211 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 (1) An alcohol and drug-free workplace
program established under this chapter must contain a written substance
abuse policy statement in order to qualify for the premium discount
provided under section 202 of this act. The policy must:
(a) Notify employees that the use or being under any influence of
alcohol during working hours is prohibited;
(b) Notify employees that the use, purchase, possession, or
transfer of drugs or having drugs in their system is prohibited and
that prescription or nonprescription medications are not prohibited
when taken in accordance with a lawful prescription or consistent with
standard dosage recommendations;
(c) Identify the types of testing an employee or job applicant may
be required to submit to or other basis used to determine when such a
test will be required;
(d) Identify the actions the employer may take against an employee
or job applicant on the basis of a verified positive test result;
(e) Contain a statement advising an employee or job applicant of
the existence of this chapter;
(f) Contain a general statement concerning confidentiality;
(g) Identify the consequences of refusing to submit to a drug test;
(h) Contain a statement advising an employee of the employee
assistance program;
(i) Contain a statement that an employee or job applicant who
receives a verified positive test result may contest or explain the
result to the employer within five working days after receiving written
notification of the positive test result;
(j) Contain a statement informing an employee of the provisions of
the federal drug-free workplace act, if applicable to the employer; and
(k) Notify employees that the employer may discipline an employee
for failure to report an injury in the workplace.
(2) An employer not having a substance abuse testing program in
effect on July 1, 2006, shall ensure that at least sixty days elapse
between a general one-time notice to all employees that a substance
abuse testing program is being implemented and the beginning of the
actual testing. An employer having a substance abuse testing program
in place before July 1, 2006, is not required to provide a sixty-day
notice period.
(3) An employer shall include notice of substance abuse testing to
all job applicants. A notice of the employer's substance abuse testing
policy must also be posted in an appropriate and conspicuous location
on the employer's premises, and copies of the policy must be made
available for inspection by the employees or job applicants of the
employer during regular business hours in the employer's personnel
office or other suitable locations. An employer with employees or job
applicants who have trouble communicating in English shall make
reasonable efforts to help the employees understand the policy
statement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 (1) In conducting substance abuse testing
under this chapter, the employer must comply with the standards and
procedures established in this chapter and all applicable rules adopted
by the department under this chapter and must:
(a) Require job applicants to submit to a drug test after extending
an offer of employment. The employer may use a refusal to submit to a
drug test or a verified positive test as a basis for not hiring the job
applicant;
(b) Investigate each workplace injury that results in a worker
needing off-site medical attention and require an employee to submit to
drug and alcohol tests if the employer reasonably believes the employee
has caused or contributed to an injury which resulted in the need for
off-site medical attention. An employer need not require that an
employee submit to drug and alcohol tests if a supervisor, trained in
accordance with section 209 of this act, reasonably believes that the
injury was due to the inexperience of the employee or due to a
defective or unsafe product or working condition, or other
circumstances beyond the control of the employee. Under this chapter,
a first-time verified positive test result may not be used as a basis
to terminate an employee's employment. However, nothing in this
section prohibits an employee from being terminated for reasons other
than the positive test result;
(c) If the employee in the course of employment is referred to the
employee assistance program by the employer as a result of a verified
positive drug or alcohol test or an alcohol or drug-related incident in
violation of employer rules, require the employee to submit to drug and
alcohol testing in conjunction with any recommended rehabilitation
program. If the employee assistance program determines that the
employee does not require treatment services, the employee must still
be required to participate in follow-up testing. However, if an
employee voluntarily enters an employee assistance program, without a
verified positive drug or alcohol test or a violation of any drug or
alcohol related employer rule, follow-up testing is not required. If
follow-up testing is conducted, the frequency of the testing shall be
at least four times a year for a two-year period after completion of
the rehabilitation program and advance notice of the testing date may
not be given. A verified positive follow-up test result shall normally
require termination of employment.
(2) This section does not prohibit an employer from conducting
other drug or alcohol testing, such as upon reasonable suspicion or a
random basis.
(3) Specimen collection and substance abuse testing under this
section must be performed in accordance with regulations and procedures
approved by the United States department of health and human services
and the United States department of transportation regulations for
alcohol and drug testing and must include testing for marijuana,
cocaine, amphetamines, opiates, and phencyclidine. Employers may test
for any drug listed in section 201(7) of this act.
(a) A specimen must be collected with due regard to the privacy of
the individual providing the specimen and in a manner reasonably
calculated to prevent substitution or contamination of the specimen.
(b) Specimen collection and analysis must be documented. The
documentation procedures must include:
(i) Labeling of specimen containers so as to reasonably preclude
the likelihood of erroneous identification of test results; and
(ii) An opportunity for the employee or job applicant to provide to
a medical review officer information the employee or applicant
considers relevant to the drug test, including identification of
currently or recently used prescription or nonprescription medication
or other relevant medical information.
(c) Specimen collection, storage, and transportation to the testing
site must be performed in a manner that reasonably precludes specimen
contamination or adulteration.
(d) An initial and confirmation test conducted under this section,
not including the taking or collecting of a specimen to be tested, must
be conducted by a laboratory as described in subsection (4) of this
section.
(e) A specimen for a test may be taken or collected by any of the
following persons:
(i) A physician, a physician's assistant, a registered professional
nurse, a licensed practical nurse, a nurse practitioner, or a certified
paramedic who is present at the scene of an accident for the purpose of
rendering emergency medical service or treatment;
(ii) A qualified person certified or employed by a laboratory
certified by the substance abuse and mental health administration or
the college of American pathologists; or
(iii) A qualified person certified or employed by a collection
company using collection procedures adopted by the United States
department of health and human services and the United States
department of transportation for alcohol collection.
(f) Within five working days after receipt of a verified positive
test result from the laboratory, an employer shall inform an employee
or job applicant in writing of the positive test result, the
consequences of the result, and the options available to the employee
or job applicant.
(g) The employer shall provide to the employee or job applicant,
upon request, a copy of the test results.
(h) An initial test having a positive result must be verified by a
confirmation test.
(i) An employer who performs drug testing or specimen collection
shall use chain of custody procedures to ensure proper recordkeeping,
handling, labeling, and identification of all specimens to be tested.
(j) An employer shall pay the cost of all drug or alcohol tests,
initial and confirmation, that the employer requires of employees.
(k) An employee or job applicant shall pay the cost of additional
tests not required by the employer.
(4)(a) A laboratory may not analyze initial or confirmation drug
specimens unless:
(i) The laboratory is approved by the substance abuse and mental
health administration or the college of American pathologists;
(ii) The laboratory has written procedures to ensure the chain of
custody; and
(iii) The laboratory follows proper quality control procedures
including, but not limited to:
(A) The use of internal quality controls including the use of
samples of known concentrations that are used to check the performance
and calibration of testing equipment, and periodic use of blind samples
for overall accuracy;
(B) An internal review and certification process for test results,
conducted by a person qualified to perform that function in the testing
laboratory;
(C) Security measures implemented by the testing laboratory to
preclude adulteration of specimens and test results; and
(D) Other necessary and proper actions taken to ensure reliable and
accurate drug test results.
(b) A laboratory shall disclose to the employer a written test
result report within seven working days after receipt of the sample.
A laboratory report of a substance abuse test result must, at a
minimum, state:
(i) The name and address of the laboratory that performed the test
and the positive identification of the person tested;
(ii) Positive results on confirmation tests only, or negative
results, as applicable;
(iii) A list of the drugs for which the drug analyses were
conducted; and
(iv) The type of tests conducted for both initial and confirmation
tests and the threshold detection levels of the tests.
A report may not disclose the presence or absence of a drug other
than a specific drug and its metabolites listed under this chapter.
(c) A medical review officer shall provide technical assistance to
the employer, employee, or job applicant for the purpose of
interpreting a positive confirmed drug test result that could have been
caused by prescription or nonprescription medication taken by the
employee or job applicant. The medical review officer shall interpret
and evaluate the laboratory's positive drug test result and eliminate
test results that could have been caused by prescription medication or
other medically documented sources in accordance with the United States
department of health and human services medical review officer manual.
(5) A positive initial drug test must be confirmed using the gas
chromatography/mass spectrometry method or an equivalent or more
accurate scientifically accepted method approved by the substance abuse
and mental health administration as the technology becomes available in
a cost-effective form.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 (1) The employee assistance program
required under this chapter shall provide the employer with a system
for dealing with employees whose job performances are declining due to
unresolved problems, including alcohol or other drug-related problems,
marital problems, or legal or financial problems.
(2) To ensure appropriate assessment and referral to treatment:
(a) The employer must notify the employees of the benefits and
services of the employee assistance program;
(b) The employer shall publish notice of the employee assistance
program in conspicuous places and explore alternative routine and
reinforcing means of publicizing the services; and
(c) The employer shall provide the employee with notice of the
policies and procedures regarding access to and use of the employee
assistance program.
(3) A list of approved employee assistance programs must be
provided by the department according to recognized program standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 (1)(a) Rehabilitation of employees
suffering from either or both alcohol or drug addiction shall be a
primary focus of an employee assistance program.
(b) Under any program under this chapter, the employer may not use
a first-time verified positive drug or alcohol test as the basis for
termination of an employee. After a first-time verified positive test
result, the employee must be given an opportunity to keep his or her
job through the use of a last-chance agreement. The last-chance
agreement shall require an employee to:
(i) Submit to an employee assistance program evaluation for
chemical dependency;
(ii) Comply with any treatment recommendations;
(iii) Be subject to follow-up drug and alcohol testing for two
years;
(iv) Meet the same standards of performance and conduct that are
set for other employees; and
(v) Authorize the employer to receive all relevant information
regarding the employee's progress in treatment, if applicable.
Failure to comply with all the terms of this agreement normally
will result in termination of employment.
(2) When substance abuse treatment is necessary, employees must use
treatment services approved by the department, which include a
continuing care component lasting for two years.
(a) The employee assistance program shall monitor the employee's
progress while in treatment, including the two-year continuing care
component, and notify the employer when an employee is not complying
with the programs's treatment recommendations.
(b) The employer shall monitor job performance and conduct follow-up testing.
(3) An employer may terminate an employee for the following
reasons:
(a) Refusal to submit to a drug or alcohol test;
(b) Refusal to agree to or failure to comply with the conditions of
a last-chance agreement;
(c) A second verified positive drug or alcohol test result; or
(d) After the first verified positive drug or alcohol test, any
violation of employer rules pertaining to alcohol and drugs.
(4) Nothing in this chapter limits the right of any employer who
participates in the worker's compensation premium discount program
under this chapter to terminate employment for any other reason.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 As part of a program established under
this chapter, an employer shall provide all employees with an annual
education program on substance abuse, in general, and its effects on
the workplace, specifically. An employer with employees who have
difficulty communicating in English shall make reasonable efforts to
help the employees understand the substance of the education program.
An education program for a minimum of one hour should include but is
not limited to the following information:
(1) The explanation of the disease model of addiction for alcohol
and drugs;
(2) The effects and dangers of the commonly abused substances in
the workplace; and
(3) The employer's policies and procedures regarding substance
abuse in the workplace and how employees who wish to obtain substance
abuse treatment can do so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 In addition to the education program
provided in section 208 of this act, an employer shall provide all
supervisory personnel with a minimum of two hours of supervisor
training, that should include but is not limited to the following
information:
(1) How to recognize signs of employee substance abuse;
(2) How to document and collaborate signs of employee substance
abuse;
(3) How to refer employees to the employee assistance program or
proper treatment providers; and
(4) Circumstances and procedures for postinjury testing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 (1) A physician-patient relationship is
not created between an employee or job applicant and an employer,
medical review officer, or person performing or evaluating a drug or
alcohol test solely by the establishment, implementation, or
administration of a drug or alcohol testing program.
(2) This chapter may not be construed to prevent an employer from
establishing reasonable work rules related to employee possession, use,
sale, or solicitation of drugs, including convictions for drug-related
offenses, and taking action based upon a violation of any of those
rules.
(3) This chapter may not be construed to operate retroactively.
This chapter does not abrogate the right of an employer under state or
federal law to conduct drug or alcohol tests or implement employee drug
or alcohol testing programs. However, only those programs that meet
the criteria outlined in this chapter qualify for workers' compensation
insurance premiums discounts.
(4) This chapter may not be construed to prohibit an employer from
conducting medical screening or other tests required, permitted, or not
disallowed by a statute or rule for the purpose of monitoring exposure
of employees to toxic or other unhealthy materials in the workplace or
in the performance of job responsibilities. The screening or tests
must be limited to testing for the specific material expressly
identified in the statute or rule, unless prior written consent of the
employee is obtained for other tests.
(5) This chapter does not establish a legal duty for employers to
conduct alcohol or drug tests of employees or job applicants. A cause
of action may not arise in favor of a person based upon the failure of
an employer to establish or conduct a program or policy for substance
abuse testing or to conduct a program or policy in conformance with the
standards and procedures established in this chapter. This chapter
does not create individual rights of action and may be enforced only by
the department by denial of the workers' compensation premium discount
provided in section 202 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 Confidentiality standards that apply to
substance abuse testing programs implemented under this chapter include
the following:
(1) Information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, and
test results, written or otherwise, received through a substance abuse
testing program are confidential communications, and may not be used or
received in evidence, obtained in discovery, or disclosed in a civil or
administrative proceeding, except as provided in subsection (5) of this
section.
(2) An employer, laboratory, medical review officer, employee
assistance program, drug or alcohol rehabilitation program, and their
agents who receive or have access to information concerning test
results shall keep the information confidential, except as provided in
subsection (5) of this section.
(3) Any release of the information must be pursuant to a written
consent form that complies with RCW 70.02.030 and is signed voluntarily
by the person tested, unless the release is compelled by the division
of alcohol and substance abuse of the department or a court of
competent jurisdiction in accordance with state and federal
confidentiality laws, or unless required by a professional or
occupational licensing board in a related disciplinary proceeding. Any
disclosure by any agency approved by the department must be in
accordance with RCW 70.96A.150. The consent form must contain at a
minimum:
(a) The name of the person who is authorized to obtain the
information;
(b) The purpose of the disclosure;
(c) The precise information to be disclosed;
(d) The duration of the consent; and
(e) The signature of the person authorizing release of the
information.
(4) Information on test results may not be released or used in a
criminal proceeding against the employee or job applicant. Information
released contrary to this subsection is inadmissible as evidence in a
criminal proceeding.
(5) Nothing in this chapter prohibits:
(a) An employer from using information concerning an employee or
job applicant's substance abuse test results in a lawful manner with
respect to that employee or applicant; or
(b) An entity that obtains the information from disclosing or using
the information in a lawful manner as part of a matter relating to the
substance abuse test, the test result, or an employer action with
respect to the job applicant or employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 The department shall adopt by rule
procedures and forms for the certification of employers who establish
and maintain a drug-free workplace that complies with this chapter.
The department shall adopt by rule procedures for the decertification
of employers formally certified for the workers' compensation premium
discount provided under this chapter. The department may charge a fee
for the certification of a drug-free workplace program in an amount
that must approximate its administrative costs related to the
certification. Certification of an employer is required for each year
in which a premium discount is granted. The department may adopt any
other rules necessary for the implementation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 (1) The department of labor and industries
may adopt rules necessary for the implementation of this chapter
including but not limited to provisions for penalties and repayment of
premium discounts by employers that are decertified by the department
of social and health services under section 212 of this act.
(2) The department of labor and industries shall conduct an
evaluation of the effect of the premium discount provided for under
section 202 of this act on workplace safety and the state of Washington
industrial insurance fund. The department of labor and industries
shall report its preliminary findings to the appropriate committees of
the legislature on September 1st of 2007 and 2008 and shall issue a
comprehensive final report on December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 The department shall conduct an evaluation
to determine the costs and benefits of the program under this chapter.
If the department contracts for the performance of any or all of the
evaluation, no more than ten percent of the contract amount may be used
to cover indirect expenses. The department shall report its
preliminary findings to the legislature on September 1st of 2007 and
2008 and shall issue a comprehensive final report on December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 Notwithstanding any other provisions of
this chapter, the total premium discounts available under section 202
of this act shall not exceed five million dollars during any fiscal
year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 Sections 201 through 215 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

PART III
CLEANUP OF CONTAMINATED PROPERTY
Sec. 301 RCW 64.44.010 and 1999 c 292 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The words and phrases defined in this section shall have the
following meanings when used in this chapter unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise.
(1) "Authorized contractor" means a person who decontaminates,
demolishes, or disposes of contaminated property as required by this
chapter who is certified by the department as provided for in RCW
64.44.060.
(2) "Contaminated" or "contamination" means polluted by hazardous
chemicals so that the property is unfit for human habitation or use due
to immediate or long-term hazards. Property that at one time was
contaminated but has been satisfactorily decontaminated according to
procedures established by the state board of health is not
"contaminated."
(3) "Department" means the department of health.
(4) "Hazardous chemicals" means the following substances ((used
in)) associated with the illegal manufacture of ((illegal drugs))
controlled substances: (a) Hazardous substances as defined in RCW
70.105D.020((, and)); (b) precursor substances as defined in RCW
69.43.010 which the state board of health, in consultation with the
state board of pharmacy, has determined present an immediate or long-term health hazard to humans; and (c) the controlled substance or
substances being manufactured, as defined in RCW 69.50.101.
(((4))) (5) "Officer" means a local health officer authorized under
chapters 70.05, 70.08, and 70.46 RCW.
(((5))) (6) "Property" means any real or personal property, ((site,
structure, or part of a structure which)) or segregable part thereof,
that is involved in or affected by the unauthorized manufacture,
distribution, or storage of hazardous chemicals. This includes but is
not limited to single-family residences, units of multiplexes,
condominiums, apartment buildings, motels, hotels, boats, motor
vehicles, trailers, manufactured housing, ((or)) any shop, booth,
((or)) garden, or storage shed, and all contents of the items
referenced in this subsection.

Sec. 302 RCW 64.44.020 and 1999 c 292 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever a law enforcement agency becomes aware that property has
been contaminated by hazardous chemicals, that agency shall report the
contamination to the local health officer. The local health officer
shall ((post)) cause a posting of a written warning on the premises
within one working day of notification of the contamination and shall
inspect the property within fourteen days after receiving the notice of
contamination. The warning shall inform the potential occupants that
hazardous chemicals may exist on, or have been removed from, the
premises and that entry is unsafe. If a property owner believes that
a tenant has contaminated property that was being leased or rented, and
the property is vacated or abandoned, then the property owner shall
contact the local health officer about the possible contamination.
Local health officers or boards may charge property owners reasonable
fees for inspections of suspected contaminated property requested by
property owners.
A local health officer may enter, inspect, and survey at reasonable
times any properties for which there are reasonable grounds to believe
that the property has become contaminated. If the property is
contaminated, the local health officer shall post a written notice
declaring that the officer intends to issue an order prohibiting use of
the property as long as the property is contaminated.
If access to the property is denied, a local health officer in
consultation with law enforcement may seek a warrant for the purpose of
conducting administrative inspections. A superior, district, or
municipal court within the jurisdiction of the property may, based upon
probable cause that the property is contaminated, issue warrants for
the purpose of conducting administrative inspections.
Local health officers must report all cases of contaminated
property to the state department of health. The department may make
the list of contaminated properties available to health associations,
landlord and realtor organizations, prosecutors, and other interested
groups. The department shall promptly update the list of contaminated
properties to remove those which have been decontaminated according to
provisions of this chapter.
The local health officer may determine when the services of an
authorized contractor are necessary.

Sec. 303 RCW 64.44.030 and 1999 c 292 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If after the inspection of the property, the local health
officer finds that it is contaminated, then the ((property shall be
found unfit for)) local health officer shall issue an order declaring
the property unfit and prohibiting its use. The local health officer
shall cause the order to be served ((an order prohibiting use)) either
personally or by certified mail, with return receipt requested, upon
all occupants and persons having any interest therein as shown upon the
records of the auditor's office of the county in which such property is
located. The local health officer shall also ((post)) cause the order
((prohibiting use)) to be posted in a conspicuous place on the
property. If the whereabouts of such persons is unknown and the same
cannot be ascertained by the local health officer in the exercise of
reasonable diligence, and the health officer makes an affidavit to that
effect, then the serving of the order upon such persons may be made
either by personal service or by mailing a copy of the order by
certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to each
person at the address appearing on the last equalized tax assessment
roll of the county where the property is located or at the address
known to the county assessor, and the order shall be posted
conspicuously at the residence. A copy of the order shall also be
mailed, addressed to each person or party having a recorded right,
title, estate, lien, or interest in the property. The order shall
contain a notice that a hearing before the local health board or
officer shall be held upon the request of a person required to be
notified of the order under this section. The request for a hearing
must be made within ten days of serving the order. The hearing shall
then be held within not less than twenty days nor more than thirty days
after the serving of the order. The officer shall prohibit use as long
as the property is found to be contaminated. A copy of the order shall
also be filed with the auditor of the county in which the property is
located, where the order pertains to real property, and such filing of
the complaint or order shall have the same force and effect as other
lis pendens notices provided by law. In any hearing concerning whether
property is fit for use, the property owner has the burden of showing
that the property is decontaminated or fit for use. The owner or any
person having an interest in the property may file an appeal on any
order issued by the local health board or officer within thirty days
from the date of service of the order with the appeals commission
established pursuant to RCW 35.80.030. All proceedings before the
appeals commission, including any subsequent appeals to superior court,
shall be governed by the procedures established in chapter 35.80 RCW.
(2) If the local health officer determines immediate action is
necessary to protect public health, safety, or the environment, the
officer may issue or cause to be issued an emergency order, and any
person to whom such an order is directed shall comply immediately.
Emergency orders issued pursuant to this section shall expire no later
than seventy-two hours after issuance and shall not impair the health
officer from seeking an order under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 304 RCW 64.44.040 and 1999 c 292 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon issuance of an order declaring property unfit and
prohibiting its use, the city or county in which the contaminated
property is located may take action to prohibit use, occupancy, or
removal of such property; condemn, decontaminate, or demolish the
property; or ((to)) require that the property be vacated or the
contents removed from the property. The city or county may use an
authorized contractor if property is demolished, decontaminated, or
removed under this section. The city, county, or contractor shall
comply with all orders of the health officer during these processes.
No city or county may condemn, decontaminate, or demolish property
pursuant to this section until all procedures granting the right of
notice and the opportunity to appeal in RCW 64.44.030 have been
exhausted, but may prohibit use, occupancy, or removal of contaminated
property pending appeal of the order.
(2)(a) It is unlawful for any person to enter upon any property, or
to remove any property, that has been found unfit for use by a local
health officer pursuant to RCW 64.44.030.
(b) This subsection does not apply to: (i) Health officials, law
enforcement officials, or other government agents performing their
official duties; (ii) authorized contractors or owners performing
decontamination pursuant to authorization by the local health officer;
and (iii) any person acting with permission of a local health officer,
or of a superior court or hearing examiner following an appeal of a
decision of the local health officer.
(c) Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
(3) No provision of this section may be construed to limit the
ability of the local health officer to permit occupants or owners of
the property at issue to remove uncontaminated personal property from
the premises.

Sec. 305 RCW 64.44.050 and 1999 c 292 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An owner of contaminated property who desires to have the
property decontaminated, demolished, or disposed of shall use the
services of an authorized contractor unless otherwise authorized by the
local health officer. The contractor and property owner shall prepare
and submit a written work plan for decontamination, demolition, or
disposal to the local health officer. The local health officer may
charge a reasonable fee for review of the work plan. If the work plan
is approved and the decontamination, demolition, or disposal is
completed and the property is retested according to the plan and
properly documented, then the health officer shall allow reuse of the
property. A release for reuse document shall be recorded in the real
property records indicating the property has been decontaminated,
demolished, or disposed of in accordance with rules of the state
department of health. The property owner is responsible for: (a) The
costs of any property testing which may be required to demonstrate the
presence or absence of hazardous chemicals; and (b) the costs of the
property's decontamination, demolition, and disposal expenses, as well
as costs incurred by the local health officer resulting from the
enforcement of this chapter.
(2) The local health officer has thirty days from the issuance of
an order declaring a property unfit and prohibiting its use to
establish a reasonable timeline for decontamination. The department of
health shall establish the factors to be considered by the local health
officer in establishing the appropriate amount of time.
The local health officer shall notify the property owner of the
proposed time frame by United States mail to the last known address.
Notice shall be postmarked no later than the thirtieth day from the
issuance of the order. The property owner may request a modification
of the time frame by submitting a letter identifying the circumstances
which justify such an extension to the local health officer within
thirty-five days of the date of the postmark on the notification
regardless of when received.

Sec. 306 RCW 64.44.060 and 1999 c 292 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A contractor, supervisor, or worker may not perform
decontamination, demolition, or disposal work unless issued a
certificate by the state department of health. The department shall
establish performance standards for contractors, supervisors, and
workers by rule in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act. The department shall train and test, or
may approve courses to train and test, contractors, supervisors, and
((their employees)) workers on the essential elements in assessing
property used as an illegal ((drug)) controlled substances
manufacturing or storage site to determine hazard reduction measures
needed, techniques for adequately reducing contaminants, use of
personal protective equipment, methods for proper decontamination,
demolition, removal, and disposal of contaminated property, and
relevant federal and state regulations. Upon successful completion of
the training, and after a background check, the contractor, supervisor,
or ((employee)) worker shall be certified.
(2) The department may require the successful completion of annual
refresher courses provided or approved by the department for the
continued certification of the contractor or employee.
(3) The department shall provide for reciprocal certification of
any individual trained to engage in decontamination, demolition, or
disposal work in another state when the prior training is shown to be
substantially similar to the training required by the department. The
department may require such individuals to take an examination or
refresher course before certification.
(4) The department may deny, suspend, ((or)) revoke, or place
restrictions on a certificate for failure to comply with the
requirements of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to this
chapter. A certificate may be denied, suspended, ((or)) revoked, or
have restrictions placed on it on any of the following grounds:
(a) Failing to perform decontamination, demolition, or disposal
work under the supervision of trained personnel;
(b) Failing to perform decontamination, demolition, or disposal
work using department of health certified decontamination personnel;
(c) Failing to file a work plan;
(((c))) (d) Failing to perform work pursuant to the work plan;
(((d))) (e) Failing to perform work that meets the requirements of
the department and the requirements of the local health officers;
(((e) The certificate was obtained by error, misrepresentation, or
fraud; or))
(f) Failing to properly dispose of contaminated property;
(g) Committing fraud or misrepresentation in: (i) Applying for or
obtaining a certification, recertification, or reinstatement; (ii)
seeking approval of a work plan; and (iii) documenting completion of
work to the department or local health officer;
(h) Failing the evaluation and inspection of decontamination
projects pursuant to section 308 of this act; or
(i) If the person has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by
the department of social and health services as a person who is not in
compliance with a support order or a residential or visitation order.
If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for
reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or
certificate shall be automatic upon the department's receipt of a
release issued by the department of social and health services stating
that the person is in compliance with the order.
(5) A contractor, supervisor, or worker who violates any provision
of this chapter may be assessed a fine not to exceed five hundred
dollars for each violation.
(6) The department of health shall prescribe fees as provided for
in RCW 43.70.250 for: The issuance and renewal of certificates,
conducting background checks of applicants, the administration of
examinations, and ((for)) the review of training courses.
(7) The decontamination account is hereby established in the state
treasury. All fees collected under this chapter shall be deposited in
this account. Moneys in the account may only be spent after
appropriation for costs incurred by the department in the
administration and enforcement of this chapter.

Sec. 307 RCW 64.44.070 and 1999 c 292 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of health shall promulgate rules and standards
for carrying out the provisions in this chapter in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act. The local board
of health and the local health officer are authorized to exercise such
powers as may be necessary to carry out this chapter. The department
shall provide technical assistance to local health boards and health
officers to carry out their duties under this chapter.
(2) The department shall adopt rules for decontamination of a
property used as ((an illegal drug)) a laboratory for the production of
controlled substances and methods for the testing of porous and
nonporous surfaces, ground water, surface water, soil, and septic tanks
for contamination. The rules shall establish decontamination standards
for hazardous chemicals, including but not limited to methamphetamine,
lead, mercury, and total volatile organic compounds.
(3) The department shall adopt rules regarding independent third
party sampling including those pertaining to:
(a) Verification of possible property contamination due to the
illegal manufacture of controlled substances;
(b) Verification of satisfactory decontamination of property deemed
contaminated and unfit for use;
(c) Certification of independent third party samplers;
(d) Qualifications and performance standards for independent third
party samplers;
(e) Administration of background checks for third party sampler
applicants; and
(f) The denial, suspension, or revocation of independent third
party sampler certification.
(4) For the purposes of this section, an independent third party
sampler is a person who is not an employee, agent, representative,
partner, joint venturer, shareholder, or parent or subsidiary company
of the authorized contractor, the authorized contractor's company, or
the property owner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 A new section is added to chapter 64.44
RCW to read as follows:
The department may evaluate annually a number of the property
decontamination projects performed by licensed contractors to determine
the adequacy of the decontamination work, using the services of an
independent environmental contractor or state or local agency. If a
project fails the evaluation and inspection, the contractor is subject
to a civil penalty and license suspension, pursuant to RCW 64.44.060
(4) and (5); and the contractor is prohibited from performing
additional work until deficiencies have been corrected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 The department of health shall report to
the legislature on the feasibility of providing incentives and
protections to landlords to encourage housing rentals to recovering
substance abusers or those convicted of drug crimes. A final report
must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 The department of ecology shall, in
consultation with interested local health jurisdictions and their
corresponding city or county governments, conduct a pilot program to
demonstrate application of existing legal methods and grant programs
administered under the model toxics control act in chapter 70.105D RCW,
and other available authorities and funds to clean up methamphetamine-contaminated property for a public purpose. This pilot program shall
include: (1) A facility with hazardous substance releases to soil or
ground water resulting from a former methamphetamine lab or other
historic uses of the property that created liability under chapter
70.105D RCW; and (2) a facility where the primary issue is
decontamination or demolition of methamphetamine contaminated
structures and other solid waste related issues. The department of
ecology shall submit a report on the pilot program to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by January 1, 2007.

PART IV
CRIMINAL SANCTIONS AND PROCEDURE
Sec. 401 RCW 9.94A.533 and 2003 c 53 s 58 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence
ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.
(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the
standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid
sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the
seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by
seventy-five percent.
(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements
based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm
enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is
subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is
being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to
commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to
the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class
C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both,
and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements
under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has
previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July
23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection
(4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm
enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the
enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all
felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed
felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to
the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which
underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of
the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon
enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section
based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c)
of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender
has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after
July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or
subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly
weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of
the enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to
all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense
while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender
is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If
the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in
this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility,
and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under
chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this
subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(a) or (b) or 69.50.410;
(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(c), (d), or (e);
(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.4013.
For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a
state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part
of that facility or county jail.
(6) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter
69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or
9.94A.605. All enhancements under this subsection shall run
consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, for all offenses
sentenced under this chapter.
(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence
range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each
prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.

Sec. 402 RCW 9.94A.660 and 2005 c 460 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An offender is eligible for the special drug offender
sentencing alternative if:
(a) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a violent
offense or sex offense and the violation does not involve a sentence
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4);
(b) The offender has no current or prior convictions for a sex
offense at any time or violent offense within ten years before
conviction of the current offense, in this state, another state, or the
United States;
(c) For a violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act under
chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the offense involved only a small quantity of
the particular controlled substance as determined by the judge upon
consideration of such factors as the weight, purity, packaging, sale
price, and street value of the controlled substance;
(d) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not
become subject to a deportation order during the period of the
sentence;
(e) The standard sentence range for the current offense is greater
than one year; and
(f) The offender has not received a drug offender sentencing
alternative more than once in the prior ten years before the current
offense.
(2) A motion for a sentence under this section may be made by the
court, the offender, or the state. If the sentencing court determines
that the offender is eligible for this alternative, the court may order
an examination of the offender. The examination shall, at a minimum,
address the following issues:
(a) Whether the offender suffers from drug addiction;
(b) Whether the addiction is such that there is a probability that
criminal behavior will occur in the future;
(c) Whether effective treatment for the offender's addiction is
available from a provider that has been licensed or certified by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and
health services; and
(d) Whether the offender and the community will benefit from the
use of the alternative.
(3) The examination report must contain:
(a) Information on the issues required to be addressed in
subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) A proposed treatment plan that must, at a minimum, contain:
(i) A proposed treatment provider that has been licensed or
certified by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the
department of social and health services;
(ii) The recommended frequency and length of treatment, including
both residential chemical dependency treatment and treatment in the
community;
(iii) A proposed monitoring plan, including any requirements
regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by
family members and others; and
(iv) Recommended crime-related prohibitions and affirmative
conditions.
(4) After receipt of the examination report, if the court
determines that a sentence under this section is appropriate, the court
shall waive imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range
and impose a sentence consisting of either a prison-based alternative
under subsection (5) of this section or a residential chemical
dependency treatment-based alternative under subsection (6) of this
section. The residential chemical dependency treatment-based
alternative is only available if the midpoint of the standard range is
twenty-four months or less.
(5) The prison-based alternative shall include:
(a) A period of total confinement in a state facility for one-half
of the midpoint of the standard sentence range or twelve months,
whichever is greater. During incarceration in the state facility,
offenders sentenced under this subsection shall undergo a comprehensive
substance abuse assessment and receive, within available resources,
treatment services appropriate for the offender. The treatment
services shall be designed by the division of alcohol and substance
abuse of the department of social and health services, in cooperation
with the department of corrections;
(b) The remainder of the midpoint of the standard range as a term
of community custody which must include appropriate substance abuse
treatment in a program that has been approved by the division of
alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and health
services. If the department finds that conditions have been willfully
violated, the offender may be reclassified to serve the remaining
balance of the original sentence. An offender who fails to complete
the program or who is administratively terminated from the program
shall be reclassified to serve the unexpired term of his or her
sentence as ordered by the sentencing court;
(c) Crime-related prohibitions including a condition not to use
illegal controlled substances;
(d) A requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to
monitor that status; and
(e) A term of community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.715 to be
imposed upon failure to complete or administrative termination from the
special drug offender sentencing alternative program.
(6) The residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative
shall include:
(a) A term of community custody equal to one-half of the midpoint
of the standard sentence range or two years, whichever is greater,
conditioned on the offender entering and remaining in residential
chemical dependency treatment certified under chapter 70.96A RCW for a
period set by the court between three and six months. If the court
imposes a term of community custody, the department shall, within
available resources, make chemical dependency assessment and treatment
services available to the offender during the term of community
custody. The court shall impose, as conditions of community custody,
treatment and other conditions as proposed in the plan under subsection
(3)(b) of this section. The department may impose conditions and
sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.715 (2), (3), (6), and (7),
9.94A.737, and 9.94A.740. The court shall schedule a progress hearing
during the period of residential chemical dependency treatment, and
schedule a treatment termination hearing for three months before the
expiration of the term of community custody;
(b) Before the progress hearing and treatment termination hearing,
the treatment provider and the department shall submit written reports
to the court and parties regarding the offender's compliance with
treatment and monitoring requirements, and recommendations regarding
termination from treatment. At the hearing, the court may:
(i) Authorize the department to terminate the offender's community
custody status on the expiration date determined under (a) of this
subsection; or
(ii) Continue the hearing to a date before the expiration date of
community custody, with or without modifying the conditions of
community custody; or
(iii) Impose a term of total confinement equal to one-half the
midpoint of the standard sentence range, followed by a term of
community custody under RCW 9.94A.715;
(c) If the court imposes a term of total confinement under (b)(iii)
of this subsection, the department shall, within available resources,
make chemical dependency assessment and treatment services available to
the offender during the terms of total confinement and community
custody.
(7) If the court imposes a sentence under this section, the court
may prohibit the offender from using alcohol or controlled substances
and may require that the monitoring for controlled substances be
conducted by the department or by a treatment alternatives to street
crime program or a comparable court or agency-referred program. The
offender may be required to pay thirty dollars per month while on
community custody to offset the cost of monitoring. In addition, the
court may impose any of the following conditions:
(a) Devote time to a specific employment or training;
(b) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the
court or the community corrections officer before any change in the
offender's address or employment;
(c) Report as directed to a community corrections officer;
(d) Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations;
(e) Perform community restitution work;
(f) Stay out of areas designated by the sentencing court;
(g) Such other conditions as the court may require such as
affirmative conditions.
(8)(a) The court may bring any offender sentenced under this
section back into court at any time on its own initiative to evaluate
the offender's progress in treatment or to determine if any violations
of the conditions of the sentence have occurred.
(b) If the offender is brought back to court, the court may modify
the terms of the community custody or impose sanctions under (c) of
this subsection.
(c) The court may order the offender to serve a term of total
confinement within the standard range of the offender's current offense
at any time during the period of community custody if the offender
violates the conditions of the sentence or if the offender is failing
to make satisfactory progress in treatment.
(d) An offender ordered to serve a term of total confinement under
(c) of this subsection shall receive credit for any time previously
served under this section.
(9) If an offender sentenced to the prison-based alternative under
subsection (5) of this section is found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation order, a hearing shall be held
by the department unless waived by the offender, and, if the department
finds that the offender is subject to a valid deportation order, the
department may administratively terminate the offender from the program
and reclassify the offender to serve the remaining balance of the
original sentence.
(10) An offender sentenced under this section shall be subject to
all rules relating to earned release time with respect to any period
served in total confinement.
(11) Costs of examinations and preparing treatment plans under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section may be paid, at the option of
the county, from funds provided to the county from the criminal justice
treatment account under RCW 70.96A.350.

Sec. 403 RCW 9.94A.500 and 2000 c 75 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before imposing a sentence upon a defendant, the court shall
conduct a sentencing hearing. The sentencing hearing shall be held
within forty court days following conviction. Upon the motion of
either party for good cause shown, or on its own motion, the court may
extend the time period for conducting the sentencing hearing.
Except in cases where the defendant shall be sentenced to a term of
total confinement for life without the possibility of release or, when
authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for the crime of aggravated murder in the
first degree, sentenced to death, the court may order the department to
complete a risk assessment report. If available before sentencing, the
report shall be provided to the court.
Unless specifically waived by the court, the court shall order the
department to complete a chemical dependency screening report before
imposing a sentence upon a defendant who has been convicted of a
violation of the uniform controlled substances act under chapter 69.50
RCW ((or)), a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation under
chapter 9A.28 RCW, or any felony where the court finds that the
offender has a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her
offense. In addition, the court shall, at the time of plea or
conviction, order the department to complete a presentence report
before imposing a sentence upon a defendant who has been convicted of
a felony sexual offense. The department of corrections shall give
priority to presentence investigations for sexual offenders. If the
court determines that the defendant may be a mentally ill person as
defined in RCW 71.24.025, although the defendant has not established
that at the time of the crime he or she lacked the capacity to commit
the crime, was incompetent to commit the crime, or was insane at the
time of the crime, the court shall order the department to complete a
presentence report before imposing a sentence.
The court shall consider the risk assessment report and presentence
reports, if any, including any victim impact statement and criminal
history, and allow arguments from the prosecutor, the defense counsel,
the offender, the victim, the survivor of the victim, or a
representative of the victim or survivor, and an investigative law
enforcement officer as to the sentence to be imposed.
If the court is satisfied by a preponderance of the evidence that
the defendant has a criminal history, the court shall specify the
convictions it has found to exist. All of this information shall be
part of the record. Copies of all risk assessment reports and
presentence reports presented to the sentencing court and all written
findings of facts and conclusions of law as to sentencing entered by
the court shall be sent to the department by the clerk of the court at
the conclusion of the sentencing and shall accompany the offender if
the offender is committed to the custody of the department. Court
clerks shall provide, without charge, certified copies of documents
relating to criminal convictions requested by prosecuting attorneys.
(2) To prevent wrongful disclosure of information related to mental
health services, as defined in RCW 71.05.445 and ((71.34.225))
71.34.345, a court may take only those steps necessary during a
sentencing hearing or any hearing in which the department presents
information related to mental health services to the court. The steps
may be taken on motion of the defendant, the prosecuting attorney, or
on the court's own motion. The court may seal the portion of the
record relating to information relating to mental health services,
exclude the public from the hearing during presentation or discussion
of information relating to mental health services, or grant other
relief to achieve the result intended by this subsection, but nothing
in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the subsequent release
of information related to mental health services as authorized by RCW
71.05.445, ((71.34.225)) 71.34.345, or 72.09.585. Any person who
otherwise is permitted to attend any hearing pursuant to chapter 7.69
or 7.69A RCW shall not be excluded from the hearing solely because the
department intends to disclose or discloses information related to
mental health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 The Washington institute for public policy
shall conduct a study of criminal sentencing provisions of neighboring
states for all crimes involving methamphetamine. The institute shall
report to the legislature on any criminal sentencing increases
necessary under Washington law to reduce or remove any incentives
methamphetamine traffickers and manufacturers may have to locate in
Washington. The report shall be completed by January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 The Washington institute for public policy
shall conduct a study of the drug offender sentencing alternative. The
institute shall study recidivism rates for offenders who received
substance abuse treatment while in confinement as compared to offenders
who received treatment in the community or received no treatment. The
institute shall report to the legislature by January 1, 2007.

PART V
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 Part headings used in this act are no part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 113 of this act, referencing this act and section 113 of this
act by bill or chapter number and section number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, section 113 of this
act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 Section 109 of this act expires January 1,
2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 Sections 110 and 111 of this act take
effect January 1, 2007.

--- END ---