BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 63.14.010 and 2003 c 368 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Goods" means all chattels personal when purchased primarily
for personal, family, or household use and not for commercial or
business use, but not including money or, except as provided in the
next sentence, things in action. The term includes but is not limited
to merchandise certificates or coupons, issued by a retail seller, to
be used in their face amount in lieu of cash in exchange for goods or
services sold by such a seller and goods which, at the time of sale or
subsequently, are to be so affixed to real property as to become a part
thereof, whether or not severable therefrom;
(2) "Lender credit card" means a card or device under a lender
credit card agreement pursuant to which the issuer gives to a
cardholder residing in this state the privilege of obtaining credit
from the issuer or other persons in purchasing or leasing property or
services, obtaining loans, or otherwise, and the issuer of which is
not: (a) Principally engaged in the business of selling goods; or (b)
a financial institution;
(3) "Lender credit card agreement" means an agreement entered into
or performed in this state prescribing the terms of retail installment
transactions pursuant to which the issuer may, with the buyer's
consent, purchase or acquire one or more retail sellers' indebtedness
of the buyer under a sales slip or memorandum evidencing the purchase,
lease, loan, or otherwise to be paid in accordance with the agreement.
The issuer of a lender credit card agreement shall not be principally
engaged in the business of selling goods or be a financial institution;
(4) "Financial institution" means any bank or trust company, mutual
savings bank, credit union, or savings and loan association organized
pursuant to the laws of any one of the United States of America or the
United States of America, or the laws of a foreign country if also
qualified to conduct business in any one of the United States of
America or pursuant to the laws of the United States of America;
(5) "Services" means work, labor, or services of any kind when
purchased primarily for personal, family, or household use and not for
commercial or business use whether or not furnished in connection with
the delivery, installation, servicing, repair, or improvement of goods
and includes repairs, alterations, or improvements upon or in
connection with real property, but does not include services for which
the price charged is required by law to be determined or approved by or
to be filed, subject to approval or disapproval, with the United States
or any state, or any department, division, agency, officer, or official
of either as in the case of transportation services;
(6) "Retail buyer" or "buyer" means a person who buys or agrees to
buy goods or obtain services or agrees to have services rendered or
furnished, from a retail seller;
(7) "Retail seller" or "seller" means a person engaged in the
business of selling goods or services to retail buyers;
(8) "Retail installment transaction" means any transaction in which
a retail buyer purchases goods or services from a retail seller
pursuant to a retail installment contract, a retail charge agreement,
or a lender credit card agreement, as defined in this section, which
provides for a service charge, as defined in this section, and under
which the buyer agrees to pay the unpaid principal balance in one or
more installments or which provides for no service charge and under
which the buyer agrees to pay the unpaid balance in more than four
installments;
(9) "Retail installment contract" or "contract" means a contract,
other than a retail charge agreement, a lender credit card agreement,
or an instrument reflecting a sale made pursuant thereto, entered into
or performed in this state for a retail installment transaction. The
term "retail installment contract" may include a chattel mortgage, a
conditional sale contract, and a contract in the form of a bailment or
a lease if the bailee or lessee contracts to pay as compensation for
their use a sum substantially equivalent to or in excess of the value
of the goods sold and if it is agreed that the bailee or lessee is
bound to become, or for no other or a merely nominal consideration, has
the option of becoming the owner of the goods upon full compliance with
the provisions of the bailment or lease. The term "retail installment
contract" does not include: (a) A "consumer lease," heretofore or
hereafter entered into, as defined in RCW 63.10.020; (b) a lease which
would constitute such "consumer lease" but for the fact that: (i) It
was entered into before April 29, 1983; (ii) the lessee was not a
natural person; (iii) the lease was not primarily for personal, family,
or household purposes; or (iv) the total contractual obligations
exceeded twenty-five thousand dollars; or (c) a lease-purchase
agreement under chapter 63.19 RCW;
(10) "Retail charge agreement," "revolving charge agreement," or
"charge agreement" means an agreement between a retail buyer and a
retail seller that is entered into or performed in this state and that
prescribes the terms of retail installment transactions with one or
more sellers which may be made thereunder from time to time and under
the terms of which a service charge, as defined in this section, is to
be computed in relation to the buyer's unpaid balance from time to
time;
(11) "Service charge" however denominated or expressed, means the
amount which is paid or payable for the privilege of purchasing goods
or services to be paid for by the buyer in installments over a period
of time. It does not include the amount, if any, charged for insurance
premiums, delinquency charges, attorneys' fees, court costs, any
vehicle dealer administrative fee under RCW 46.12.042, any vehicle
dealer documentary service fee under RCW 46.70.180(2), or official
fees;
(12) "Sale price" means the price for which the seller would have
sold or furnished to the buyer, and the buyer would have bought or
obtained from the seller, the goods or services which are the subject
matter of a retail installment transaction. The sale price may include
any taxes, registration and license fees, any vehicle dealer
administrative fee, any vehicle dealer documentary service fee, and
charges for transferring vehicle titles, delivery, installation,
servicing, repairs, alterations, or improvements;
(13) "Official fees" means the amount of the fees prescribed by law
and payable to the state, county, or other governmental agency for
filing, recording, or otherwise perfecting, and releasing or
satisfying, a retained title, lien, or other security interest created
by a retail installment transaction;
(14) "Time balance" means the principal balance plus the service
charge;
(15) "Principal balance" means the sale price of the goods or
services which are the subject matter of a retail installment contract
less the amount of the buyer's down payment in money or goods or both,
plus the amounts, if any, included therein, if a separate identified
charge is made therefor and stated in the contract, for insurance, any
vehicle dealer administrative fee, any vehicle dealer documentary
service fee, and official fees; and the amount actually paid or to be
paid by the retail seller pursuant to an agreement with the buyer to
discharge a security interest or lien on like-kind goods traded in or
lease interest in the circumstance of a lease for like goods being
terminated in conjunction with the sale pursuant to a retail
installment contract;
(16) "Person" means an individual, partnership, joint venture,
corporation, association, or any other group, however organized;
(17) "Rate" means the percentage which, when multiplied times the
outstanding balance for each month or other installment period, yields
the amount of the service charge for such month or period;
(18) "Interchange fee" means the fee a merchant's financial
institution pays to a cardholder's financial institution when a
cardholder uses a credit card or debit card as payment during a retail
transaction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 63.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Financial institutions may not charge interchange fees that are
more than one and one-half percent of the total cost of the retail
transaction.

--- END ---