BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
2005-07 BIENNIUM
Sec. 1 2005 c 313 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The transportation budget of the state is hereby adopted and,
subject to the provisions set forth, the several amounts specified, or
as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes
designated, are hereby appropriated from the several accounts and funds
named to the designated state agencies and offices for employee
compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and for other
specified purposes, including the payment of any final judgments
arising out of such activities, for the period ending June 30, 2007.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2006" or "FY 2006" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2006.
(b) "Fiscal year 2007" or "FY 2007" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007.
(c) "FTE" means full-time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in
this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified
purpose which is not expended subject to the specified conditions and
limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.
(f) "Reappropriation" means appropriation and, unless the context
clearly provides otherwise, is subject to the relevant conditions and
limitations applicable to appropriations.
(g) "LEAP" means the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES -- OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to 2005 c 313
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $234,000

Sec. 102 2005 c 313 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($390,000))
$407,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) To address its growing caseload, the marine employees
commission shall develop a plan for prioritizing cases to schedule for
hearings. The commission shall report back to the transportation
committees of the legislature on its case prioritization plan by
December 15, 2005.
(2) $13,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6794 (marine employees collective bargaining). If
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6794 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 103 2005 c 313 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($329,000))
$330,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (($329,000)) $330,000 of the motor vehicle
account--state appropriation is provided solely for costs associated
with the motor fuel quality program.

Sec. 104 2005 c 313 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($200,000))
$487,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) ((If Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5056 is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the entire appropriation shall lapse.
(2) The entire)) $200,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is for additional staffing costs to be dedicated to state
transportation activities. Furthermore, any staff hired to support
transportation activities must have practical experience with complex
construction projects.
(2) $236,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for legal expenses related to the Lower Elwha Klallam
Tribe v. Washington (graving dock) case.
(3) $51,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for a pilot project testing remote sensing technology
in archeological investigations and surveys for transportation
projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 A new section is added to 2005 c 313
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The total appropriation is provided solely
for an evaluation of the current business needs of the legislative
transportation fiscal committee staffs with respect to the
transportation executive information system (TEIS). The committee
shall work with the staffs of the transportation committees, the office
of financial management, and the department of transportation to
perform the evaluation. Results of the evaluation, including any
recommendation for system improvements and usability, shall be
submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature and the
office of financial management by December 1, 2006.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES--CAPITAL
Sec. 106 2005 c 313 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND RECREATION--CAPITAL PROJECTS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
a one-time appropriation and is provided solely for the SR 14
interchange and bridge portion of the Beacon Rock state park entrance
road project. Any portion of the appropriation not expended by June
30, 2007, shall revert to the motor vehicle account--state.
(2) $100,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for road work
on state route 20 at Deception Pass state park.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES -- OPERATING
Sec. 201 2005 c 313 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,135,000))
$2,145,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,828,000))
$15,833,000
School Zone Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000
Bicycle and Pedestrian Safety Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,303,000))
$21,318,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The Washington traffic safety commission
shall contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to
conduct a study of the impact of state programs concerning the
reduction of DUI recidivism. The study must include, on a prioritized
basis to the extent federal funds are made available for the study, the
following components: (1) The state's existing deferred prosecution
program; (2) the state's vehicle impound program; and (3) other states'
programs that restrict a person's access to the vehicle, or suspend the
vehicle license and registration, upon arrest or conviction.
The completed study must be submitted to the appropriate
legislative committees by December 1, 2006.

Sec. 202 2005 c 313 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($821,000))
$823,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,942,000))
$1,950,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($777,000))
$780,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,540,000))
$3,553,000

Sec. 203 2005 c 313 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,624,000))
$1,630,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,625,000))
$1,632,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,249,000))
$3,262,000

Sec. 204 2005 c 313 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS
Pilotage Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($417,000))
$1,020,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $500,000 of the appropriation is provided
solely for stipends to trainees in the training program as set forth in
rules adopted by the board; however, if Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6870 (pilot trainees stipends) is enacted by June 30, 2006,
then $600,000 of the total appropriation provided in this act shall
lapse and the appropriation provided in Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6870 shall govern.

Sec. 205 2005 c 313 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,400,000))
$1,604,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) $200,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
the joint transportation committee to conduct a marine finance study
that will facilitate policy discussions and decisions by the
legislature regarding the Washington state ferry system. The committee
may hire an expert consultant to act as a resource and assist the
committee in conducting the study. The study is due by December 1,
2006. In addition to committee members, or their designees, a
representative of the governor shall also assist with this study. The
study must include, at a minimum, a review and evaluation of current
practices and past studies in the following areas:
(i) Forecasts and budgeting methodologies used for projecting:
(A) Ferry compensation increases;
(B) Fuel costs;
(C) Other operating costs;
(D) Ridership; and
(E) Farebox revenues; and
(ii) Capital projects, including:
(A) Project cost estimates;
(B) Project scope determinations;
(C) Project changes;
(D) Appropriateness of projects in the capital budget;
(E) Project prioritization;
(F) Reporting on project progress;
(G) Performance measures for benchmarking and identifying success
over time; and
(H) Legislative input regarding significant project changes; and
(iii) Operations review, including, but not limited to the
following issues:
(A) Zero base of the operating budget;
(B) Business plan for uniform boat size; and
(C) Organizational structure.
(b) The purpose of the study is to facilitate policy discussions
and decisions by members of the legislature, regarding the Washington
state ferry system, including tariff policy, management review, and the
potential for public private initiatives. The legislature recognizes
there is a need, within the Washington state ferry system, for
predictable cash flows, transparency, further integration with the rest
of Washington state department of transportation, verification that the
Washington state ferry system is operating at maximum efficiency, and
better labor relations, and this study is to help move in that
direction.
(2) The joint transportation committee shall conduct a study
regarding the feasibility of a statewide uniform motor vehicle excise
tax (MVET) depreciation schedule. In addition to committee members,
the participants in the study must include at a minimum the following
individuals: (a) A representative of a regional transit authority
(Sound Transit); (b) a representative of a regional transportation
planning organization; (c) the secretary of transportation, or his or
her designee; (d) a representative of the attorney general's office;
(e) a representative of the department of licensing; and (f) a
representative of the financial community. The purpose of the study is
to develop an MVET depreciation schedule that more accurately reflects
vehicle value but does not hinder outstanding contractual obligations.
(3) Funds provided in this section are sufficient for the committee
to administer a study of the most reliable and cost-effective means of
providing passenger-only ferry service.
(a) The study shall be guided by a 18 member task force consisting
of the chairs and ranking members of the house of representatives and
senate transportation committees, a designee of the director of the
office of financial management, a member of the transportation
commission, a designee of the secretary of transportation, a
representative of organized labor, and ten stakeholders to be appointed
by the governor as follows: Six representatives of ferry user
communities, two representatives of public transportation agencies, and
two representatives of commercial ferry operators.
(b) The study shall examine issues including but not limited to the
long-term viability of different service providers, cost to ferry
passengers, the state subsidies required by each provider, and the
availability of federal funding for the different service providers.
(c) By November 30, 2005, the task force shall make its
recommendations to the house of representatives and senate
transportation committees.
(4) $450,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to administer a consultant study of the long-term
viability of the state's transportation financing methods and sources.
(a) At a minimum, the study must examine the following: (i) The
short and long-term viability of the motor fuel tax (both state and
federal) as a major source of funding for transportation projects and
programs; (ii) the desirability and effectiveness of state-distributed
transportation funds for the benefit of local units of government;
(iii) the potential for alternative and/or emerging sources of
transportation revenues, with particular emphasis on user-based fees
and charges; and (iv) trends and implications of debt financing for
transportation projects. The scope of work for the study may be
expanded to include analysis of other financing issues relevant to the
long-term viability of the state's transportation system.
(b) The findings and recommendations must be submitted to the
fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2006.

Sec. 206 2005 c 313 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,607,000))
$4,167,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,150,000))
$1,507,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,757,000))
$5,674,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,500,000 of the motor vehicle fund account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a comprehensive tolling study.
The transportation commission, with the technical assistance of the
department, must conduct a study of the state's transportation system
to determine the feasibility of administering tolls on specific
transportation facilities or a network of facilities. This study shall
serve as the statewide tolling feasibility study required in Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1541, and shall serve as the tolling study
necessary to implement toll facilities within a regional transportation
investment district or its successor entity.
(a) The study must include an analysis of the only currently-authorized toll facility, the Tacoma Narrows bridge project. The study
findings must include (i) the development of more uniform and equitable
policies regarding the distribution of financial obligations imposed on
those paying the tolls on the Tacoma Narrows bridge, and (ii)
opportunities and options for reducing the outstanding indebtedness on
the bridge project, including the possibility of buy-downs and other
means of spreading the cost of the project more equitably.
(b) The study element for the benefit of a regional transportation
investment district or regional transportation improvement authority
must also address the state highway system and other transportation
facilities in King, Pierce, and Snohomish counties to determine the
feasibility of value pricing on a facility or network of facilities.
This study element should: (i) Determine the potential for value
pricing to generate revenues for needed transportation facilities; (ii)
maximize the efficient operation of facilities and the transportation
network; and (iii) provide economic indicators for future system
investments. This element of the study must take into account
congestion levels, facility and corridor capacity, time of use,
economic considerations, and other factors deemed appropriate. The
study must recommend any additional laws, rules, procedures, resources,
studies, reports, or support infrastructure necessary or desirable
before proceeding with the review, evaluation, or implementation of any
toll projects or a system-wide, value priced transportation structure.
(c) The study must specifically analyze the potential for a toll
facility on SR 704, the cross-base highway located in Pierce county.
(2) (($2,270,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the transportation performance audit board.
Within this amount, the transportation performance audit board shall
conduct a study and make recommendations to the legislature regarding
the modification RCW 47.01.012, state transportation goals and
benchmarks. In conducting the study, the board shall consider at a
minimum: Original recommendations of the Blue Ribbon Commission on
Transportation; the current policy goals and benchmark categories; the
goals outlined in Substitute House Bill No. 1969; the recent work
related to benchmarks completed by the transportation commission and
the Washington state department of transportation; the measures review
completed by TPAB; and best practices.
The board shall submit study results, including any legislative
recommendations, to the transportation committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2006.
(3))) $1,150,000 of the multimodal account--state appropriation is
provided solely for a statewide rail capacity and needs analysis. The
purpose of this study is to (a) assess the rail freight and rail
passenger infrastructure needs in this state; (b) review the current
powers, authorities, and interests the state has in both passenger and
freight rail; (c) recommend public policies for state participation and
ownership in rail infrastructure and service delivery, including but
not limited to planning and governance issues; and (d) develop a rail
asset management plan. The commission shall report their findings and
conclusions of the study to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2006.

Sec. 207 2005 c 313 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($664,000))
$666,000

Sec. 208 2005 c 313 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($202,530,000))
$200,893,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,544,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $169,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($213,243,000))
$211,606,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed
employment providing traffic control services to the department of
transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles
for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by
the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol
shall be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state
employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines
developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The patrol
shall report to the house of representatives and senate transportation
committees by December 31, 2005, on the use of agency vehicles by
officers engaging in the off-duty employment specified in this
subsection. The report shall include an analysis that compares cost
reimbursement and cost-impacts, including increased vehicle mileage,
maintenance costs, and indirect impacts, associated with the private
use of patrol vehicles.
(2) In addition to the user fees, the patrol shall transfer into
the state patrol nonappropriated airplane revolving account under RCW
43.79.470 no more than the amount of appropriated state patrol highway
account and general fund funding necessary to cover the costs for the
patrol's use of the aircraft. The state patrol highway account and
general fund--state funds shall be transferred proportionately in
accordance with a cost allocation that differentiates between highway
traffic enforcement services and general policing purposes.
(3) The patrol shall not account for or record locally provided DUI
cost reimbursement payments as expenditure credits to the state patrol
highway account. The patrol shall report the amount of expected
locally provided DUI cost reimbursements to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 31st
of each year.
(4) The state patrol highway account--state appropriation for DUI
reimbursements shall only be spent for pursuit vehicle video cameras,
datamaster DUI testing equipment, tire deflator equipment, and taser
guns. The Washington state patrol prior to the issuance of any taser
guns will train the troopers on using the equipment. The agency will
provide a report to the transportation committees of the senate and
house of representatives by December 31st of each year on the
occurrences where the taser guns were utilized along with any issues
that have been identified.
(5) $29,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill
No. 1469. If House Bill No. 1469 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $5,580,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for a
3.8% salary increase for commissioned officers effective July 1, 2005,
in addition to any other salary increases provided for in this act.
(((8))) (7) The Washington state patrol is authorized to use
certificates of participation to fund the King Air aircraft replacement
over a term of not more than ten years and an amount not to exceed
$1,900,000.
(8)(a) $834,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the Washington state patrol
troopers association under chapter 438, Laws of 2005. For commissioned
troopers and sergeants covered under this section, funding is provided
for a 2.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2006. This increase
supersedes the fiscal year 2007 increase granted under section 501,
chapter 313, Laws of 2005. Provisions of the collective bargaining
agreement contained in this subsection are described in general terms.
Only major economic terms are included in this description. This
description does not contain the complete contents of the agreement.
Due to the timing challenges in negotiating the initial collective
bargaining agreement under chapter 438, Laws of 2005, this agreement
was not concluded by the October 1st statutory deadline. However, the
legislature does not intend to fund bargaining agreements concluded
after the October 1st deadline, or other salary increases not included
in the governor's budget proposal, in future biennia.
(b) $62,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for salary increases for commissioned
captains and lieutenants covered under this section, if a new
collective bargaining agreement is reached between the governor and the
Washington state patrol lieutenants association by July 1, 2006. The
amount provided in this subsection is contingent on an agreement being
reached by July 1, 2006, and shall be held in reserve status until the
agreement is reached. If an agreement is not reached by July 1, 2006,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. If an agreement is
reached by July 1, 2006, the increase supersedes the fiscal year 2007
increase granted under section 501, chapter 313, Laws of 2005. Due to
the timing challenges in negotiating a collective bargaining agreement
funded under this subsection, the agreement will not have been
concluded by the October 1st statutory deadline. However, the
legislature does not intend to fund bargaining agreements concluded
after the October 1st deadline, or other salary increases not included
in the governor's budget proposal, in future biennia.
(9) $1,870,000 is provided solely for twelve additional troopers in
the vessel and terminal security division.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 A new section is added to 2005 c 313
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,358,000

Sec. 210 2005 c 313 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,748,000))
$91,359,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,008,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,756,000))
$93,367,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $247,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1188. If Second Substitute House Bill No.
1188 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(2) The Washington state patrol is instructed to work with the risk
management division in the office of financial management in compiling
the state patrol data for establishing the agency's risk management
insurance premiums to the tort claims account. The office of financial
management and the Washington state patrol shall submit a report to the
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 31st of each year on the number of claims, estimated claims to
be paid, method of calculation, and the adjustment in the premium.
(3) (($6,228,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
automobile fuel in the 2005-2007 biennium.
(4))) $8,678,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
the purchase of pursuit vehicles.
(((5))) (4) $5,254,000 of the total appropriation is provided
solely for vehicle repair and maintenance costs of vehicles used for
highway purposes.
(((6))) (5) $384,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely
for the purchase of mission vehicles used for highway purposes in the
commercial vehicle and traffic investigation sections of the patrol.
(6)(a) $28,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the Washington state patrol
troopers association under chapter 438, Laws of 2005. For commissioned
troopers and sergeants covered under this section, funding is provided
for a 2.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2006. This increase
supersedes the fiscal year 2007 increase granted under section 501,
chapter 313, Laws of 2005. Provisions of the collective bargaining
agreement contained in this subsection are described in general terms.
Only major economic terms are included in this description. This
description does not contain the complete contents of the agreement.
Due to the timing challenges in negotiating the initial collective
bargaining agreement under chapter 438, Laws of 2005, this agreement
was not concluded by the October 1st statutory deadline. However, the
legislature does not intend to fund bargaining agreements concluded
after the October 1st deadline, or other salary increases not included
in the governor's budget proposal, in future biennia.
(b) $2,000 of the state patrol highway account--state appropriation
is provided solely for salary increases for commissioned captains and
lieutenants covered under this section, if a new collective bargaining
agreement is reached between the governor and the Washington state
patrol lieutenants association by July 1, 2006. The amount provided in
this subsection is contingent on an agreement being reached by July 1,
2006, and shall be held in reserve status until the agreement is
reached. If an agreement is not reached by July 1, 2006, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse. If an agreement is reached by
July 1, 2006, the increase supersedes the fiscal year 2007 increase
granted under section 501, chapter 313, Laws of 2005. Due to the
timing challenges in negotiating a collective bargaining agreement
funded under this subsection, the agreement will not have been
concluded by the October 1st statutory deadline. However, the
legislature does not intend to fund bargaining agreements concluded
after the October 1st deadline, or other salary increases not included
in the governor's budget proposal, in future biennia.

Sec. 211 2005 c 313 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,000))
$95,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,418,000))
$11,676,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,043,000))
$7,381,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,000))
$102,000
((Biometric Security Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,000))
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,787,000))
$19,353,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,134,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6103. If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6103 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(2) $52,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 2829 (driver
training schools). If House Bill No. 2829 is not enacted by June 30,
2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 212 2005 c 313 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- INFORMATION SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,698,000))
$22,740,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,095,000))
$12,149,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,825,000))
$5,919,000
((Biometric Security Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $728,000))
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,985,000))
$41,447,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall submit a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature, detailing the progress made in
transitioning from the HP3000 system, by December 30, 2005, and each
December 1st thereafter until the project is fully completed.
(2) $357,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of all special license plate
bills introduced during the 2005 legislative session and approved by
the special license plate review board. The amount provided in this
subsection shall be reduced accordingly for any of those bills that are
not enacted by June 30, 2005.
(3) $58,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5423. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5423 is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $145,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6103. If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6103 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(5) $8,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6287 (parking privileges for legally blind). If Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6287 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $49,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 2829 (driver
training schools). If House Bill No. 2829 is not enacted by June 30,
2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 213 2005 c 313 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- VEHICLE SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($626,000))
$627,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,894,000))
$51,271,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $872,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,146,000
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $404,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,968,000))
$54,346,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $247,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of all special license plate
bills introduced during the 2005 legislative session and approved by
the special license plate review board. The amount provided in this
subsection shall be reduced accordingly for any of those bills that are
not enacted by June 30, 2005.
(2) $11,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No.
5423. If Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5423 is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $404,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6103. If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6103 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $37,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6287 (parking privileges for legally blind). If Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6287 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 214 2005 c 313 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- DRIVER SERVICES
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,005,000))
$3,006,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,051,000))
$87,078,000
Highway Safety Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000
((Biometric Security Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,523,000))
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($89,587,000))
$90,092,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $970,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the commercial driver license program. The
department shall informally report to the transportation committees of
the legislature on the progress made in addressing federal audit
findings and in implementing the federal motor carrier safety
improvement act. Reports shall be made by the following dates:
November 1, 2005, and each November 1st thereafter.
(2) $412,000 of the motorcycle safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department's motorcycle safety
program. The department shall informally report to the transportation
committees of the legislature detailing the progress made in
implementing national highway traffic safety assessment guidelines.
Reports shall be made by the following dates: November 1, 2005, and
each November 1st thereafter.
(3) The department of licensing, in consultation with the
department of transportation and other stakeholders, shall draft
legislation to bring the state into compliance with any federal
legislation or rules enacted relative to identification necessary for
persons crossing international borders. The department shall report to
the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005,
on the recommended legislation for bringing the state into compliance
with federal requirements.
(4) $738,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 2829 (driver
training schools). If House Bill No. 2829 is not enacted by June 30,
2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 215 2005 c 313 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TOLL OPERATIONS AND
MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM B
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,615,000))
$8,624,000

Sec. 216 2005 c 313 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM
C
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($55,941,000))
$56,597,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,973,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,558,000))
$8,572,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,835,000))
$67,505,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($850,000)) $800,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the continued maintenance and
support of the transportation executive information system (TEIS). The
TEIS shall be enhanced during the ((2005)) 2006 legislative interim to
continue the shift towards a monitoring and reporting system capable of
tracking and reporting on major project milestones and measurements.
The department shall work with the legislature to identify and define
meaningful milestones and measures to be used in monitoring the scope,
schedule, and cost of projects. The department shall provide updated
information on six project milestones for all active projects, funded
in part or in whole with 2005 transportation partnership account funds
or 2003 nickel account funds, on a quarterly basis in TEIS. The
department shall also provide updated information on six project
milestones for projects agreed to by the legislature, office of
financial management, and the department, and funded with preexisting
funds, on a quarterly basis in TEIS.
(2) $350,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for a financial and capital project system needs
assessment for future automation development and enhancements. The
completed assessment will identify options which shall be presented to
the transportation committees of the senate and the house of
representatives by December 31, 2005.
(3) The department shall consult with the office of financial
management and the department of information services to ensure that
(a) the department's current and future system development is
consistent with the overall direction of other key state systems; and
(b) when possible, use or develop common statewide information systems
to encourage coordination and integration of information used by the
department and other state agencies and to avoid duplication.
(4) $245,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for expanding the department's existing agreement with
the department of information services. This amount is provided for
additional bandwidth to accommodate web demand, particularly during
peak periods.
(5) $302,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department's share of the costs for the Union
Gap disaster recovery facility.
(6) The department shall review its GPS network services and survey
data, and evaluate the added benefits of using real-time data from a
regional cooperative GPS network.

Sec. 217 2005 c 313 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS
AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,499,000))
$33,600,000

Sec. 218 2005 c 313 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- AVIATION -- PROGRAM F
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,632,000))
$7,137,000
Aeronautics Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
((Aircraft Search and Rescue Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,000))
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,044,000))
$10,287,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) $433,000 of the aeronautics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for airport pavement projects. The department's
aviation division shall complete a priority airport pavement project
list by January 1, 2006, to be considered by the legislature in the
2006 supplemental budget. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5414 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(b) ((The entire aircraft search and rescue safety and education
account appropriation shall lapse if Substitute Senate Bill No. 5414 is
enacted by June 30, 2005.
(c))) If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5414 is enacted by July 1,
2005, then the remaining unexpended fund balance in the aircraft search
and rescue, safety, and education account shall be deposited into the
state aeronautics account.
(2) The entire multimodal transportation account--state and federal
appropriations are provided solely for implementing Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121. If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5121 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, or if federal funds are not
received by March 1, 2006, for the purpose of implementing Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 219 2005 c 313 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,961,000))
$52,828,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Multimodal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,711,000))
$53,578,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department solely for the
purposes of providing contract services to the association of
Washington cities and Washington state association of counties for (a)
activities of the transportation permit efficiency and accountability
committee, including pilot mitigation banking activities, and (b) other
permit delivery efforts.
(2) (($1,475,000)) $1,775,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the staffing activities of the
transportation permit efficiency and accountability committee.
(3) $3,500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for consultant contracts to assist the department in
the delivery of the capital construction program by identifying
improvements to program delivery, program management, project controls,
program and project monitoring, forecasting, and reporting. The
consultants shall work with the department of information services and
include department of information services' recommendations in their
reports.
The consultants shall develop a capital construction strategic
plan, due to the transportation committees of the house of
representatives and senate and to the office of financial management,
by June 30, 2006.
The consultants shall also coordinate their work with other budget
and performance efforts, including Roadmap, the joint transportation
committee budget study, the findings of the critical applications
modernization and integration strategies study, including proposed next
steps, and the priorities of government process.
The department shall report to the transportation committees of the
house of representatives and senate, and the office of financial
management, by July 31, 2006, on recommended capital budgeting and
reporting options. Options must include appropriate project groupings
for reporting purposes, and appropriate measures for reporting project
progress, timeliness, cost, and criteria and processes for project
transfers.

Sec.220 2005 c 313 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS -- PROGRAM
K
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,068,000))
$1,072,000

Sec. 221 2005 c 313 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($296,648,000))
$299,428,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,426,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,315,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($302,389,000))
$305,169,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) If portions of the appropriations in this section are required
to fund maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by
federal emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides,
supplemental appropriations must be requested to restore state funding
for ongoing maintenance activities.
(2) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
federal moneys received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall
place an equal amount of the motor vehicle account -- state into
unallotted status. This exchange shall not affect the amount of
funding available for snow and ice removal.
(3) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
private or local funds received for reimbursements of third party
damages that are in excess of the motor vehicle account -- private/local
appropriation.
(4) Funding is provided for maintenance on the state system to
allow for a continuation of the level of service targets included in
the 2003-05 biennium. In delivering the program, the department should
concentrate on the following areas:
(a) Meeting or exceeding the target for structural bridge repair on
a statewide basis;
(b) Eliminating the number of activities delivered in the "f" level
of service at the region level;
(c) Reducing the number of activities delivered in the "d" level of
service by increasing the resources directed to those activities on a
statewide and region basis; and
(d) Evaluating, analyzing, and potentially redistributing resources
within and among regions to provide greater consistency in delivering
the program statewide and in achieving overall level of service
targets.
(5) The department shall develop and implement a plan to improve
work zone safety on a statewide basis. As part of the strategy
included in the plan, the department shall fund equipment purchases
using a portion of the money from the annual OTEF equipment purchasing
and replacement process. The department shall also identify and
evaluate statewide equipment needs (such as work zone safety equipment)
and prioritize any such needs on a statewide basis. Substitute
purchasing at the statewide level, when appropriate, shall be utilized
to meet those identified needs. The department must report to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005, on
the plan, and by December 1, 2006, on the status of implementing the
plan.

Sec. 222 2005 c 313 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q--OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,811,000))
$38,777,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,000
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,070,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,989,000))
$46,025,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $4,400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The
department shall give priority to low-cost enhancement projects that
improve safety or provide congestion relief. The department shall
prioritize low-cost enhancement projects on a statewide rather than
regional basis.

Sec. 223 2005 c 313 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,434,000))
$25,516,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,321,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,758,000))
$27,840,000

Sec. 224 2005 c 313 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA,
AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,390,000))
$23,552,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,756,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,267,000))
$2,424,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,829,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,000,000))
$2,300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,342,000))
$47,961,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In order to qualify for state planning funds available to
regional transportation planning organizations under this section, a
regional transportation planning organization containing any county
with a population in excess of one million shall provide voting
membership on its executive board to any incorporated principal city of
a metropolitan statistical area within the region, as designated by the
United States census bureau, and to any incorporated city within the
region with a population in excess of eighty thousand as of July 1,
2005. Additionally, a regional transportation planning organization
described under this subsection shall conduct a review of its executive
board membership criteria to ensure that the criteria appropriately
reflects a true and comprehensive representation of the organization's
jurisdictions of significance within the region.
(((3))) (2) $2,000,000 of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation is provided solely for the costs of the regional
transportation investment district (RTID) election, not including
public outreach activities, and department of transportation project
oversight. The department shall provide support from its urban
corridors region to assist in preparing project costs, expenditure
plans, and modeling. The department shall not deduct a management
reserve, nor charge management or overhead fees. These funds are
provided as a loan to the RTID and shall be repaid to the state motor
vehicle account within one year following the certification of the
election results related to the RTID. If either Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2157 or Senate Bill No. 6089 are enacted by June 30,
2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. None of this
appropriation may be used for election expenses for an election held
before January 1, 2006.
(((4))) (3) $175,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided to the department in accordance with RCW
46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department to
support the processing and analysis of the backlog of city and county
collision reports by January 2006. The amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse if federal funds become available for this
purpose.
(((5))) (4) $150,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1565. If Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1565 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((6))) (5) The department of transportation shall evaluate the
number of spaces available for long-haul truck parking relative to
current and projected future needs. The department of transportation
shall also explore options for augmenting the number of spaces
available, including, but not limited to, expanding state-owned rest
areas or modifying regulations governing the use of these facilities,
utilizing weigh stations and park and ride lots, and encouraging the
expansion of the private sector's role. Finally, the department shall
explore the utility of coordinating with neighboring states on
long-haul truck parking and evaluate methodologies for alleviating any
air quality issues relative to the issue. The department must report
to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1,
2005, on the options, strategies, and recommendations for long-haul
truck parking.
(((7))) (6) $50,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for evaluating high-speed passenger
transportation facilities and services, including rail or magnetic
levitation transportation systems, to connect airports as a means to
more efficiently utilize airport capacity, as well as connect major
population and activity centers. This evaluation shall be coordinated
with the airport capacity and facilities market analysis conducted
pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121 and results of
the evaluation shall be submitted by July 1, 2007. If Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, or if
federal funds are not received by March 1, 2006, for the purpose of
implementing Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $700,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for completing funding for a route development plan of
U.S. route 2.
(8) The department shall conduct a study of the resources allocated
to each of the seven department regions and the corresponding
workloads. Given the magnitude of the investments in the Puget Sound
region, particular emphasis shall be given to reviewing the resources
allocated and corresponding workloads with respect to the urban
corridors region and the northwest region. Based on the results of
this study, the department shall submit recommendations by December 1,
2006, to the legislature and the office of financial management
regarding reallocating resources and revising regional boundaries
within the department, as appropriate, in order to better coincide
allocated resources with designated regional boundaries.
(9) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for predesign for safety improvements at the I-5 Martin
Way interchange in the city of Lacey.
(10) The department shall inventory all tidelands owned by the
department and, in cooperation with the department of natural
resources, assess the commercial value and viability of the on-going
harvesting of any shellfish thereupon.
(11) $750,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the support of the regional
transportation commission established under Substitute House Bill No.
2871 or Substitute Senate Bill No. 6599 (central Puget Sound regional
transportation governance). The amount provided in this subsection
must be used to support planning activities related to central Puget
Sound regional transportation governance issues, and other issues as
appropriate regarding the work of the commission. If neither
Substitute House Bill No. 2871 nor Substitute Senate Bill No. 6599 is
enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department solely to conduct an
analysis of expanding the transportation concurrency requirements
prescribed under the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW, to
include development impacts on level of service standards applicable to
state-owned transportation facilities, including state highways and
state ferry routes. The objective of the analysis is to determine how
to ensure that jurisdictional divisions do not defeat growth management
act concurrency goals. The department shall convene a committee to
oversee the analysis, with the committee comprised of, at a minimum,
four members of the transportation committees of the legislature and
four members of the appropriate land use committees of the legislature.
The completed study, including recommendations, must be submitted to
the appropriate standing committees of the legislature, and to the
office of financial management, by December 1, 2006.
(13) $300,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a transportation demand management
program, developed by the Whatcom council of governments, to further
reduce drive-alone trips and maximize the use of sustainable
transportation choices. The community based program must focus on all
trips, not only commute trips, by providing education, assistance, and
incentives to four target audiences: (a) Large work sites; (b)
employees of businesses in downtown areas; (c) school children; and (d)
residents of Bellingham.
(14) $300,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Puget Sound regional council
to support the work of the regional transportation investment district
planning committee's executive board.

Sec. 225 2005 c 313 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES--PROGRAM U
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,030,000))
$46,864,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,430,000))
$47,264,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $31,749,000 of the motor vehicle fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for the liabilities attributable to the department of
transportation. The office of financial management must provide a
detailed accounting of the revenues and expenditures of the self-insurance fund to the transportation committees of the legislature on
December 31st and June 30th of each year.
(2) Payments in this section represent charges from other state
agencies to the department of transportation.
(a) FOR PAYMENT OF OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
DIVISION OF RISK MANAGEMENT FEES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,667,000
(b) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,017,000))
$1,026,000
(c) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED
MAIL SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,049,000
(d) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,572,000))
$4,548,000
(e) FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY
PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,749,000
(f) FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS SURCHARGE . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,717,000
(g) FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . $545,000
(h) FOR OFFICE OF MINORITIES AND WOMEN BUSINESS
ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,114,000
(i) FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
HRMS PAYROLL SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . $817,000
(j) FOR PAYMENT OF THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT ROADMAP CHARGES . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
(k) FOR PAYMENT OF OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
CAPITAL BUDGET SYSTEM CHARGES . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
(l) FOR PAYMENT OF DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES
RATE INCREASES . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000

Sec. 226 2005 c 313 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM
V
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($62,269,000))
$86,933,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,603,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,027,000))
$89,691,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs
transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of
transportation.
(a) $5,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs
transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers shall be based on need,
including the availability of other providers of service in the area,
efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost
effectiveness of trips provided.
(b) $19,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons
with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit
agency must have a maintenance of effort for special needs
transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of
effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies
shall be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response
service and route deviated service in calendar year 2003 as reported in
the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2003" published by the
department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than
thirty percent of these distributions. The first $450,000 provided to
King county shall be used as follows:
(i) $320,000 shall be used to provide electric buses, instead of
diesel buses, for service on Capital Hill in Seattle, Washington
through June 30, 2007;
(ii) $130,000 shall be used to provide training for blind
individuals traveling through Rainier Valley and the greater Seattle
area. The training is to include destination training and retraining
due to the expected closure of the downtown bus tunnel and training on
how to use the Sound Transit light rail system.
(2) Funds are provided for the rural mobility grant program as
follows:
(a) $7,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for those transit systems
serving small cities and rural areas as identified in the Summary of
Public Transportation - 2003 published by the department of
transportation. Noncompetitive grants must be distributed to the
transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) $7,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to providers of rural mobility service
in areas not served or underserved by transit agencies through a
competitive grant process.
(3) (($5,000,000)) $8,900,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant
program for: (a) Public transit agencies to add vanpools; and (b)
incentives for employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant
program for public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; no
operating costs for public transit agencies are eligible for funding
under this grant program. No additional employees may be hired from
the funds provided in this section for the vanpool grant program, and
supplanting of transit funds currently funding vanpools is not allowed.
Additional criteria for selecting grants must include leveraging funds
other than state funds.
(4) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the city of Seattle for the
Seattle streetcar project on South Lake Union. ((Should the city
receive any state funds for this purpose during the 2003-05 or 2005-07
biennium, the amount provided in this subsection must be reduced
accordingly.))
(5) $1,200,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2124. If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2124 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6)(a) $20,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the regional mobility grant
projects identified on the LEAP Transportation Document 2006-C,
Regional Mobility Grant Program Projects as developed February 17,
2006. The department shall review all projects receiving grant awards
under this program at least semiannually to determine whether the
projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has been
awarded funds, but does not report activity on the project within one
year of the grant award, shall be reviewed by the department to
determine whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall
promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and
identify where unused grant funds remain because actual project costs
were lower than estimated in the grant award. When funds become
available either because grant awards have been rescinded for lack of
sufficient project activity or because completed projects returned
excess grant funds upon project closeout, the department shall
expeditiously extend new grant awards to qualified alternative projects
identified on the list.
(b) Pursuant to the grant program established in ((Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2124)) RCW 47.66.030, the department shall
issue a call for projects and/or service proposals. Applications must
be received by the department by November 1, 2005, and November 1,
2006. The department must submit a prioritized list for funding to the
transportation committees of the legislature that reflects the
department's recommendation, as well as, a list of all project or
service proposals received.
(7) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for new tri-county connection service
for Island, Skagit, and Whatcom transit agencies.
(8) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to King county as a state match to
obtain federal funding for a car sharing program for persons meeting
certain income or employment criteria.
(9) $750,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of the local
government and regional transportation planning requirements in
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6566 (commute trip reduction).
The department shall allocate the funds to regional transportation
planning organizations, counties, and cities on an as needed basis. If
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6566 is not enacted by June 30,
2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 227 2005 c 313 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($350,454,000))
$355,065,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,352,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,660,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($354,114,000))
$376,077,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($57,928,000)) $75,280,000 of the total appropriation is
provided solely for auto ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2005-2007
biennium.
(2) The total appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry
employees. ((The expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees
during the 2005-2007 biennium may not exceed $222,356,000, plus a
dollar amount, as prescribed by the office of financial management,
that is equal to any insurance benefit increase granted general
government employees in excess of $584.58 a month annualized per
eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine
employees for fiscal year 2006 and $584.58 a month annualized per
eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine
employees for fiscal year 2007, a dollar amount as prescribed by the
office of financial management for costs associated with pension
amortization charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of
financial management for salary increases during the 2005-2007
biennium. For the purposes of this section, the expenditures for
compensation paid to ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and
wages and employee benefits as defined in the office of financial
management's policies, regulations, and procedures named under objects
of expenditure "A" and "B" (7.2.6.2).)) The maximum amount of
expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees during the
2005-2007 biennium shall not exceed $226,621,000. This amount reflects
the sole source of state funding available to support the
implementation of any collective bargaining agreements or arbitration
awards with respect to state ferry employee compensation, including
salaries, wages, and employee benefits, during the 2005-2007 biennium,
which amount includes $6,223,000 in full satisfaction of the
arbitration awards for the 2001-2003 biennium and $1,339,000 for labor
productivity gains agreements. The department's use of this
expenditure authority constitutes a good faith attempt to implement
such agreements and awards, including those applicable to prior
biennia. It is the intent of the legislature that the expenditure
authority provided in this subsection fully satisfy any agreements or
awards required to be implemented during the 2005-2007 biennium, and
that the provisions of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6794 (marine
employees collective bargaining) will govern the implementation of
agreements or awards effective beginning with the 2007-2009 biennium.
For the purposes of this section, the expenditures for compensation
paid to ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and wages and
employee benefits as defined in the office of financial management's
state administrative and accounting manual, chapter 75.70, named under
objects of expenditure "A" and "B".
(3) $1,116,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for ferry security operations
necessary to comply with the ferry security plan submitted by the
Washington state ferry system to the United States coast guard. The
department shall track security costs and expenditures. Ferry security
operations costs shall not be included as part of the operational costs
that are used to calculate farebox recovery.
(4) The Washington state ferries must work with the department's
information technology division to implement an electronic fare system,
including the integration of the regional fare coordination system
(smart card). Each December and June, semi-annual updates must be
provided to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning
the status of implementing and completing this project, with updates
concluding the first December after full project implementation.
(5) The Washington state ferries shall continue to provide service
to Sidney, British Columbia.
(6) $3,660,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to provide passenger-only ferry
service. The ferry system shall continue the existing passenger-only
ferry service from Vashon Island to Seattle through June 30, 2007, but
shall not expand that service. Beginning September 1, 2005, ferry
system management shall implement its agreement with the
Inlandboatmen's Union of the Pacific and the International Organization
of Masters, Mates and Pilots providing for part-time passenger-only
work schedules. Funds may not be spent to implement the results of the
passenger-only ferry study conducted by the joint transportation
committee provided in section 205 of this act until approved by the
legislature.
(7) $350,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6794 (marine employees collective bargaining). If
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6794 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 228 2005 c 313 s 227 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,420,000))
$36,316,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) $29,091,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the Amtrak service contract and
Talgo maintenance contract associated with providing and maintaining
the state-supported passenger rail service. Upon completion of the
rail platform project in the city of Stanwood, the department shall
provide daily Amtrak Cascades service to the city.
(b) The department shall negotiate with Amtrak and Burlington
Northern Santa Fe to adjust the Amtrak Cascades schedule to leave
Bellingham at a significantly earlier hour.
(2) $2,750,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a new round trip rail service
between Seattle and Portland beginning July 1, 2006.
(3) No AMTRAK Cascade runs may be eliminated.
(4) (($200,000)) $40,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is provided solely for the produce railcar program.
The department is encouraged to implement the produce railcar program
by maximizing private investment.

Sec. 229 2005 c 313 s 228 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z--OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,947,000))
$8,500,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,597,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($211,000))
$411,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,755,000))
$11,508,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $211,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation and
(($211,000)) $411,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the state's contribution to
county and city studies of flood hazards in association with interstate
highways. First priority shall be given to threats along the I-5
corridor.
(2) $525,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department solely for contract
services with the association of Washington cities and the Washington
state association of counties for improving transportation permitting
and mitigation processes.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--CAPITAL
Sec. 301 2005 c 313 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,933,000))
$64,933,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,000
Passenger Ferry Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,392,000))
$32,697,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($98,680,000))
$106,985,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $355,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided for county ferries as set forth in RCW 47.56.725(4).
(2) $9,000,000 of the passenger ferry account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the grants authorized in Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6787 (local government passenger ferry service funding). If
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6787 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 302 2005 c 313 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($99,425,000))
$101,425,000
Small City Preservation and Sidewalk
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($103,601,000))
$94,401,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($205,026,000))
$197,826,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The transportation improvement account -- state appropriation
includes up to $14,143,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized in RCW 47.26.500. ((The transportation improvement board
may authorize the use of current revenues available to the agency in
lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.))
(2) $2,000,000 of the small city preservation and sidewalk
account--state appropriation is provided to fund the provisions of
chapter 83, Laws of 2005 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5775).

Sec. 303 2005 c 313 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,492,000))
$2,328,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($601,000)) $584,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for ((the)) statewide administration.
(2) $632,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for regional minor projects.
(3) (($224,000)) $305,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for designing the replacement of the
existing outdated maintenance facility in Ephrata.
(4) (($219,000)) $239,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the designing of the northwest
regional maintenance complex in Seattle.
(5) (($833,000)) $568,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Olympic region headquarters
project.
(a) The department of transportation is authorized to use
certificates of participation for the financing of the Olympic region
project in the amount of $34,874,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.
(b) The Washington state department of transportation may utilize
the design-build process in accordance with chapter 39.10 RCW for the
Olympic region project. If the design-build process is used, it may be
developed in partnership with the department of general administration.

Sec. 304 2005 c 313 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,175,004,000))
$1,200,261,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,359,000))
$82,924,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($229,036,000))
$399,718,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,893,000))
$58,522,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,419,000))
$5,679,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($272,329,000))
$274,038,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($519,786,000))
$374,486,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,002,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,303,826,000))
$2,396,630,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account
appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as
listed by fund, project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document
((2005-6)) 2006-1, Highway Improvement Program (I) as developed ((April
24, 2005)) February 17, 2006. However, limited transfers of
allocations between projects may occur for those amounts listed subject
to the conditions and limitations in section 603 of this act.
(((b))) (a) Within the amounts provided in this subsection,
(($5,000,000)) $6,835,000 of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation ((is provided solely)), $5,002,000 of the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation, and
$2,645,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are for
project ((109040S)) 109040T: I-90/Seattle to Mercer Island – Two way
transit/HOV. Expenditure of these funds on construction is contingent
upon the development of an access plan that provides equitable and
dependable access for I-90 Mercer Island exit and entry.
(((c))) (b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection,
$500,000 of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation
is ((provided solely)) for a west Olympia access study, to complete an
access study for state route 101/west Olympia.
(((d))) (c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection,
$800,000 of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation
is ((provided solely)) for an SR 534 access point decision report.
(((f))) (d) Within the amounts provided within this subsection,
(($435,000,000)) $6,000,000 of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation is ((provided solely)) for project 509009B: I-90
Snoqualmie Pass East - Hyak to Keechelus dam. However, if the
preferred alternative selected for this project results in a lower
total project cost, the remaining funds may be used for concrete
rehabilitation on I-90 in the vicinity of this project.
(e) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,999,286 of
the transportation partnership account--state appropriation is for fish
passage enhancement project 099955F Fish Barriers, which shall include
$300,000 for fish passage enhancement in the city of Kittitas.
(2) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
(($53,000,000)) up to $50,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.843. ((The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the department of
transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.))
(3) The department shall not commence construction on any part of
the SR 520 bridge project until agreements have been reached with the
incorporated towns or cities that represent the communities affected by
the SR 520 project. The agreements must provide reasonable assurance
that no further degradation will occur to the citizens' current use and
enjoyment of their properties as a result of repairs and improvements
made to the SR 520 bridge and its connecting roadways. Such assurances
may be achieved through engineering design choices, mitigation
measures, or a combination of both.
(4) The transportation partnership account--state appropriation
includes (($400,000,000)) up to $200,000,000 in proceeds from the sale
of bonds authorized ((by Substitute House Bill No. 2311 (or the version
as enacted into law))) in RCW 47.10.873. ((The transportation
commission may authorize the use of current revenues available to the
department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.))
(5) The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state appropriation
includes up to $257,016,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state appropriation includes (($15,313,000)) up to $17,022,000 in
unexpended proceeds from the ((January 2003)) March 2005 bond sale
authorized in RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma Narrows bridge project.
(6) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation includes (($940,000,000)) up to $900,000,000 in proceeds
from the sale of bonds authorized by chapter 147, Laws of 2003. ((The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues
available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.
(7) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to program I and replaced with state funds
in a dollar-for-dollar match. Fund transfers authorized under this
subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission and the
director of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1,
2006.
(8))) (7) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July
1, 2005, provide to the office of financial management and the
legislature reports providing the status on each project in the project
lists submitted pursuant to this act ((and on any additional projects
for which the department has expended funds during the 2005-07 fiscal
biennium)). Other projects may be reported on a programmatic basis.
The department shall work with the office of financial management and
the transportation committees of the legislature to agree on report
formatting and elements. Elements shall include, but not be limited
to, project scope, schedule, and costs. The department shall also
provide the information required under this subsection on a quarterly
basis via the transportation executive information systems (TEIS).
(((9))) (8) The department of transportation shall conduct an
analysis of the causes of traffic congestion on I-5 in the vicinity of
Fort Lewis and develop recommendations for alleviating the congestion.
The department must report to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2005, on its analysis and recommendations
regarding traffic congestion on I-5 in the vicinity of Fort Lewis.
(((10))) (9) The department of transportation is authorized to
proceed with the SR 519 Intermodal Access project if the city of
Seattle has not agreed to a project configuration or design by July 1,
2006.
(((12) $13,000,000)) (10) $12,841,000 of the transportation 2003
account (nickel account)--state appropriation and (($5,000,000))
$4,939,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation are provided solely for construction of a new interchange
on SR 522 to provide direct access to the University of Washington
Bothell/Cascadia community college joint campus. This appropriation
assumes an additional (($8,000,000)) $8,061,000 will be provided in the
2007-09 biennium from the transportation partnership account.
(11) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$14,214,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
RCW 47.10.843.
(12) The special category C account--state appropriation includes
up to $1,710,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized in RCW 47.10.812.
(13) $10,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation is for expenditures on damaged state and local roads due
to flooding, mudslides, rock fall, or other unforeseen events. Slide
repair on state routes 101, 4, 107, and 105 must be funded from this
amount if federal emergency funds are not available.
(14) The department should consider using mitigation banking on
appropriate projects whenever possible, without increasing the cost to
projects. The department should consider using the advanced
environmental mitigation revolving account (AEMRA) for corridor and
watershed based mitigation opportunities, in addition to project
specific mitigation.
(15) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for a planning study regarding congestion mitigation
improvements on state route 101 in the vicinity of the city of
Aberdeen.
(16) $6,200,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for eastern Washington international border crossing
and freight mobility projects, including pavement preservation,
pavement structural strengthening, and other safety enhancements.
Projects shall include funding for U.S. route 97 international border
vicinity paving and improvement projects, and the Usk Bridge.
(17) $19,262,149 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation and $1,873,478 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel
account) appropriation are provided solely for project 154302E: SR 543
(I-5 to the international boundary).
(18) $3,509,738 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
and $30,793 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation are
provided solely for project 100598C: I-5 Blaine Exit interchange
improvements.

Sec. 305 2005 c 313 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,622,000))
$1,687,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($76,824,000))
$89,780,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($404,360,000))
$431,308,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,656,000))
$8,485,000
Puyallup Tribal Settlement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($139,533,000))
$24,540,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($648,995,000))
$566,800,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account
appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as
listed by fund, project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document
((2005-6)) 2006-1, Highway Preservation Program (P) as developed
((April 24, 2005)) February 17, 2006. However, limited transfers of
allocations between projects may occur for those amounts listed subject
to the conditions and limitations in section 603 of this act.
(((a) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $139,033,000
of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of structures preservation (P2)
projects.
(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the
transportation partnership account--state appropriation is provided
solely for implementation of other facilities (P3) projects.))
(2) $11,000,000 of the Puyallup tribal settlement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for mitigation costs associated with
the Murray Morgan/((11st)) 11th Street Bridge demolition. The
department may negotiate with the city of Tacoma for the purpose of
transferring ownership of the Murray Morgan/11th Street Bridge to the
city. The department may use the Puyallup tribal settlement account
appropriation, as well as any funds appropriated in the current
biennium and planned in future biennia for the demolition and
mitigation for the demolition of the bridge to rehabilitate or replace
the bridge, if agreed to by the city. In no event shall the
department's participation exceed $26,500,000 and no funds may be
expended unless the city of Tacoma agrees to take ownership of the
bridge in its entirety and provide that the payment of these funds
extinguishes any real or implied agreements regarding future
expenditures on the bridge.
(3) (($11,590,000)) $740,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation, (($95,299,000)) $106,149,000 of the motor vehicle
account--federal appropriation, and (($113,591,000)) $10,305,000 of the
transportation partnership account--state appropriation are provided
solely for the Hood Canal bridge project.
(4) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
(($530,000)) up to $735,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.761 and 47.10.762 for emergency purposes.
(5) The department of transportation shall continue to implement
the lowest life cycle cost planning approach to pavement management
throughout the state to encourage the most effective and efficient use
of pavement preservation funds. Emphasis should be placed on
increasing the number of roads addressed on time and reducing the
number of roads past due.
(6) ((To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may
be transferred from program Z to program P and replaced with state
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. Fund transfers authorized under
this subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission and the
director of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1,
2006.
(7))) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2005, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each project in the project lists
submitted pursuant to this act ((and on any additional projects for
which the department has expended funds during the 2005-07 fiscal
biennium)). Other projects may be reported on a programmatic basis.
The department shall work with the office of financial management and
the transportation committees of the legislature to agree on report
formatting and elements. Elements shall include, but not be limited
to, project scope, schedule, and costs. The department shall also
provide the information required under this subsection on a quarterly
basis via the transportation executive information systems (TEIS).
(7) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$912,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
RCW 47.10.843.
(8) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$3,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843.

Sec. 306 2005 c 313 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($153,184,000))
$112,632,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($59,967,000))
$73,590,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,249,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,987,000))
$41,123,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($261,413,000))
$240,620,000

The appropriations in this section are provided for improving the
Washington state ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel
construction, major and minor vessel preservation, and terminal
preservation, construction, and improvements. The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The Puget Sound capital construction account -- state
appropriation includes (($72,000,000)) up to $40,950,000 in proceeds
from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and
terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long lead time
materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries. ((The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues
available to the motor vehicle account in lieu of bond proceeds for any
part of the state appropriation.))
(2) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes up to $10,249,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.867. ((The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the department of
transportation in lieu of bond proceeds from any part of the state
appropriation.))
(3) $15,617,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for the Eagle Harbor Terminal
Preservation project.
(4) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation and $10,249,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation are provided solely for the projects and
activities as listed by fund, project and amount in LEAP Transportation
Document ((2005-6)) 2006-1, Ferries Construction Program (W) as
developed ((April 24, 2005)) February 17, 2006. However, limited
transfers of allocations between projects may occur for those amounts
listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 603 of this
act.
(5) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2005, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each project in the project lists
submitted pursuant to this act and on any additional projects for which
the department has expended funds during the 2005-07 fiscal biennium.
Elements shall include, but not be limited to, project scope, schedule,
and costs. The department shall also provide the information required
under this subsection via the transportation executive information
systems (TEIS).
(((6) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement approved recommendations
of the stakeholder task force convened to study the most reliable and
cost-effective means of providing passenger-only ferry service. The
funds provided in this subsection shall be placed in reserve by the
office of financial management. The funds may not be released until
approved by the legislature.))
(6) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes up to $1,170,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized in RCW 47.10.867.

Sec. 307 2005 c 313 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL
Essential Rail Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,158,000))
$69,486,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,287,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,966,000))
$17,268,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,161,000))
$95,291,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The multimodal transportation account -- state appropriation
includes up to $33,435,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds and up to
$830,000 in unexpended bond proceeds authorized by RCW 47.10.867.
((The transportation commission may authorize the use of current
revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond
proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.))
(2) If federal block grant funding for freight or passenger rail is
received, the department shall consult with the transportation
committees of the legislature prior to spending the funds on additional
projects.
(3)(a) (($67,158,000)) $68,926,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation, (($11,966,000)) $17,268,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--federal appropriation, $8,287,000 of
the multimodal transportation account--local appropriation, and
$250,000 of the essential rail assistance account are provided solely
for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project and amount
in LEAP Transportation Document ((2005-2)) 2006-D, Rail Capital Program
(Y) as developed ((April 23, 2005)) February 17, 2006. However,
limited transfers of allocations between projects may occur for those
amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 603
of this act.
(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $6,500,000 of
the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is
((provided solely)) for the two commuter rail projects as listed ((in
the LEAP Transportation Document 2005-6, Rail Capital Program (Y) as
developed April 24, 2005)).
(c) The office of financial management shall negotiate the purchase
of the CW line. The purchase agreement must include both the operating
and capital rights of the CW line. If the office of financial
management is unable to negotiate the purchase of the CW line, the
office may stop all negotiations and acquire the line and operational
rights through any other alternative means available. The office of
financial management shall also negotiate a new operational agreement
for the line in consultation with local governments and other
stakeholders.
(d) The office of financial management shall negotiate a new
operating agreement on the P&L and PV Hooper lines. If the office is
unable to negotiate a new operating agreement for the lines, the office
may stop all negotiations and acquire the operational rights through
any other alternative means available.
(4) If the department issues a call for projects, applications must
be received by the department by November 1, 2005, and November 1,
2006.
(5) $50,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a study of eastern Skagit county
freight rail. The study shall examine the feasibility of restoring
portions of freight rail line to the towns of Lyman, Hamilton, and
Concrete. The study must also identify existing and potential
industrial sites available for development and redevelopment, and the
freight rail service needs of the identified industrial sites.
(6) $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a study of the realignment of
highway and rail in the Longview industrial area (SR 432) corridor,
specifically regarding whether the construction of a limited access
bypass highway to reduce congestion resulting from anticipated growth
in future rail and truck traffic, is a feasible alternative. In
conducting the study, the department shall consult port districts,
local government planning staff, and rail road companies, and other
appropriate stakeholders.
(7) $60,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a study of the need for
transloading capabilities in the West Plains area that could be served
by the Geiger Spur, including evaluation of prospective transloader
sites, potential operators and users, and the type, size, and special
needs of shippers/customers. The study must also evaluate the costs
associated with building and operating a transloader site and the
impact to local roadways and surrounding land uses. In conducting the
study, the department shall consult with Spokane County.
(8) The department shall finalize and issue the Amtrak Cascades
long range plan update as of the effective date of this act.

Sec. 308 2005 c 313 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z--CAPITAL
Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,221,000))
$80,310,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,702,000))
$13,340,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $908,000
Freight Mobility Investment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,000,000))
$9,700,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,002,000))
$41,728,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $557,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($74,734,000))
$154,352,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to programs I and P and state funds shall be
transferred from programs I and P to program Z to replace those federal
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. Fund transfers authorized under
this subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department may not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission. The
department shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund
transfers to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2006.
(2) The department shall, on a quarterly basis, provide status
reports to the legislature on the delivery of projects as outlined in
the project lists distributed with this act, and on any additional
projects for which the department has expended funds during the 2005-07
fiscal biennium. The department shall work with the transportation
committees of the legislature to agree on report formatting and
elements. For projects funded by new revenue in the 2003 and 2005
transportation packages, reporting elements shall include, but not be
limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs. Other projects may be
reported on a programmatic basis. The department shall also provide
the information required under this subsection on a quarterly basis via
the transportation executive information system (TEIS).
(3) The multimodal transportation account -- state appropriation
includes up to $6,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized
by RCW 47.10.867. ((The transportation commission may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the department of transportation
in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.))
(4) (($3,545,000)) $1,545,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely to
fund the multiphase cooperative project with the state of Oregon to
dredge the Columbia River. The amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse unless the state of Oregon appropriates a dollar-for-dollar
match to fund its share of the project.
(5) (($274,000)) $206,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for additional
traffic and pedestrian safety improvements near schools. The highways
and local programs division within the department of transportation
shall administer this program. The department shall review all
projects receiving grant awards under this program at least
semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory
progress. Any project that has been awarded traffic and pedestrian
safety improvement grant funds, but does not report activity on the
project within one year of grant award should be reviewed by the
department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The
department must promptly close out grants when projects have been
completed, and identify where unused grant funds remain because actual
project costs were lower than estimated in the grant award. The
department shall expeditiously extend new grant awards to qualified
projects when funds become available either because grant awards have
been rescinded for lack of sufficient project activity or because
completed projects returned excess grant funds upon project closeout.
(6) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$905,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.843.
(7) (($867,000)) $607,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely to
support the safe routes to school program.
(8) (($18,221,000)) $16,110,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation is provided solely for the local freight capital
projects in progress identified in this subsection. The specific
funding listed is provided solely for the respective projects: SR 397
Ainsworth Ave. Grade Crossing, (($5,180,000)) $4,992,000; Colville
Alternate Truck Route, (($2,000,000)) $1,746,000; S. 228th Street
Extension and Grade Separation, $6,500,000; Bigelow Gulch Road-Urban
Boundary to Argonne Rd., $2,000,000; Granite Falls Alternate Route,
(($1,791,000)) $122,000; and Pacific Hwy. E./Port of Tacoma Road to
Alexander, $750,000.
(9) (($3,400,000)) $2,898,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the local freight capital projects
in progress identified in this subsection. The specific funding listed
is provided solely for the respective projects: Duwamish Intelligent
Transportation Systems (ITS), (($2,520,000)) $2,382,000; Port of
Kennewick/Piert Road, (($520,000; SR 397 Ainsworth Ave. Grade Crossing,
$360,000)) $516,000.
(10) $6,000,000 of the multimodal account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the local freight 'D' street grade separation
project.
(11) The department ((must)) shall issue a call for pedestrian
safety projects, such as safe routes to schools and transit, and
bicycle and pedestrian paths. Applications must be received by the
department by November 1, 2005, and November 1, 2006. The department
shall identify cost-effective projects, and submit a prioritized list
to the legislature for funding by December 15th of each year.
Recommendations made to the legislature for safe routes to schools and
bicycle and pedestrian path projects must, to the extent practicable
based on available funding, allocate sixty percent of available funds
to bicycle and pedestrian path projects and forty percent to safe
routes to schools. Preference ((will)) shall be given to projects that
provide a local match. The grant recipients may only be governmental
entities.
(12) (($19,540,000)) $18,370,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation, $6,000,000 of the freight mobility
multimodal account--state appropriation, and (($12,000,000)) $6,000,000
of the freight mobility investment account--state appropriation are
provided solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund,
project and amount in LEAP Transportation Document ((2005-6)) 2006-1,
Local Programs (Z) as developed ((April 24, 2005)) February 17, 2006.
However, limited transfers of allocations between projects may occur
for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in
section 603 of this act.
(13) $870,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Yakima Avenue, 9th Street to
Front Street, pedestrian safety improvement project.
(14) $9,700,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for the intersection and corridor safety program
projects as identified on the LEAP Transportation Document 2006-A,
Intersection and Corridor Safety Program Projects as developed February
17, 2006.
(15) $19,500,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation is provided solely for rural county two-lane roadway
pilot projects including $7,500,000 already under contract. Any
further allocations shall be prioritized by the department based on
high-accident-corridor criteria. For purposes of this subsection,
"high-accident-corridor" means a highway corridor of one mile or more
where analysis of collision history indicates that the section has
higher than average collision and severity factors.
(16) $7,200,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
and $385,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the local road projects
identified in this subsection. The specific funding listed is provided
solely for the respective projects: Yakima downtown futures initiative
safety improvements, $2,500,000; Coal Creek parkway completion,
$4,700,000; SR 282 connector, $385,000.
(17) $250,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for completion of the Des Moines creek
trail.
(18) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the pedestrian and bicycle safety
program projects and safe routes to schools program projects identified
on the LEAP Transportation Document 2006-B, Pedestrian and Bicycle
Safety Program Projects and Safe Routes to Schools Program Projects as
developed February 17, 2006. Projects must be allocated funding based
on order of priority. The department shall review all projects
receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to
determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any
project that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on
the project within one year of the grant award, shall be reviewed by
the department to determine whether the grant should be terminated.
The department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been
completed, and identify where unused grant funds remain because actual
project costs were lower than estimated in the grant award. When funds
become available either because grant awards have been rescinded for
lack of sufficient project activity or because completed projects
returned excess grant funds upon project closeout, the department shall
expeditiously extend new grant awards to qualified alternative projects
identified on the list.
(19) $2,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a rail loop at the Port of Walla
Walla.
(20) For allocations made during the 2005-2007 biennium, any
steering committee that makes final selection of projects, and any
regional transportation planning organization that makes funding
recommendations regarding the selection of projects, funded from
federal surface transportation program enhancement funds or a similar
program shall ensure, to the greatest extent practicable, that funding
for each transportation enhancement activity is allocated such that the
allocation meets or exceeds the national average of allocations made
for each respective activity. The secretary of transportation may not
approve a project list submitted by the steering committee unless it
reflects allocation decisions that comply with this subsection. For
the purpose of this subsection, "transportation enhancement activity"
means the eligible project categories designated under 23 U.S.C. Sec.
101(a)(35).
(21) $19,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation is provided solely for projects meeting the federal
surface transportation program's definition of population areas under
5,000 in coordination with transportation improvement board
recommendations. $13,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation is provided solely for arterial and small city programs
on eligible federal functional classification routes. The
transportation improvement board shall select projects in metropolitan
areas, from the approved transportation improvement program in
cooperation with the metropolitan planning organization. Funds may not
be used for any purpose other than roadway improvements and shall not
be used for administrative costs or participation in project selection
processes or transportation improvement program compilation processes.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
Sec. 401 2005 c 313 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND
DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND
REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($354,913,000))
$334,313,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,775,000))
$6,091,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,010,000))
$38,241,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,899,000))
$30,923,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,562,000))
$1,550,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,000))
$120,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($303,000))
$370,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,177,000))
$6,343,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,550,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($455,744,000))
$419,501,000

Sec. 402 2005 c 313 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND
FISCAL AGENT CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($283,000))
$195,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($96,000))
$35,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,400,000))
$584,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,800,000))
$130,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,592,000))
$957,000

Sec. 403 2005 c 313 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Account--State Reappropriation:
For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $257,016,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$257,016,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be
deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.

(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound capital construction
account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($72,000,000))
$40,950,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
(($72,000,000)) $40,950,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for
vessel and terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long
lead-time materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries.

Sec. 404 2005 c 313 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($450,757,000))
$487,160,000

Sec. 405 2005 c 313 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
Motor Vehicle Account--State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . (($820,769,000))
$1,040,210,000

Sec. 406 2005 c 313 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSFERS
(1) RV Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000,000
(3) ((Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(4))) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry Operations
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,087,000))
$18,100,000
(((5))) (4) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation Partnership
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,372,000))
$31,347,000
(((6))) (5) Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Multimodal Transportation
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,170,000))
$25,980,000
(((7))) (6) Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation:
For transfer to the Small City Pavement and Sidewalk
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$1,000,000
(((8))) (7) Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation Improvement
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$2,500,000
(((9))) (8) Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation:
For transfer to the ((Rural)) County Arterial
((Trust)) Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$1,500,000
(((10))) (9) License Plate Technology Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
(((11) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the State Patrol Highway Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,406,000
(12) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation 2003 Account
(Nickel Account)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $461,000
(13))) (10) Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation Partnership
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,400,000
(11) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Freight Mobility Multimodal
Account--State, up to a maximum of . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000
(12) Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Freight Mobility Multimodal
Account--State, up to a maximum of . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,610,000
(13) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the State Patrol Highway Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
(14) Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

The transfers identified in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) The department of transportation shall only transfer funds in
subsection (2) of this section up to the level provided, on an as-needed basis.
(b) The amount ((identified in subsection (3) of this section may
not include any revenues collected as passenger fares.)) transferred in
subsection (11) of this section shall be the same as the Union Pacific
Railroad's original contribution, adjusted for earned interest and
expenditures, and shall be made on June 30, 2006.
(c) The amount transferred in subsection (12) of this section is
the equivalent of the Burlington Northern Santa Fe funds advanced to
the SR 519 project and shall be invested in a freight mobility project
agreed to by the freight mobility strategic investment board and the
BNSF Railway only after agreement has been reached on the final scope
of the SR 519 project.

COMPENSATION
Sec. 501 2005 c 313 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
EMPLOYEE SALARY COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENT. For those funds that
support noncapital FTE employees, agency appropriations in sections 101
through 408 of this act provide funding for salary cost of living
adjustments subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the purposes set forth in subsection (2) through
(4) of this section, the appropriations for cost of living adjustments
provide for a 3.2% increase effective July 1, 2005, for all state
employees represented by a collective bargaining unit under the
personnel system reform act of 2002.
(2) The appropriations for cost of living adjustments provide for
a 3.2% increase effective September 1, 2005, for all classified
employees, except those represented by a collective bargaining unit
under the personnel system reform act of 2002, and except the
certificated employees covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure
No. 732. Also included are employees in the Washington management
service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the personnel
resources board or the director of personnel, as applicable.
(3) The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a 3.2% salary
increase effective September 1, 2005, for ferry system employees and
for general government, legislative, and judicial employees exempt from
merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission
on salaries for elected officials.
(4) The appropriations for cost of living adjustments provide for
a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, for
all state employees represented by a collective bargaining unit under
the personnel system reform act of 2002. In addition, appropriation is
provided for a 1.6% increase effective September 1, 2006, for all
classified employees, except those represented by a collective
bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act of 2002, and
except the certificated employees covered by the provisions of
Initiative Measure No. 732. Also included are employees in the
Washington management service, and exempt employees under the
jurisdiction of the personnel resources board or the director of
personnel, as applicable. The appropriation is also sufficient to fund
a 1.6% salary increase effective September 1, 2006, until June 30,
2007, for ferry system employees and for general government,
legislative, and judicial employees exempt from merit system rules
whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for
elected officials. This subsection shall not apply to Washington state
patrol commissioned troopers and sergeants covered under sections
208(8)(a) and 210(6)(a) of this act. If a new collective bargaining
agreement is reached between the governor and the Washington state
patrol lieutenants association by July 1, 2006, this subsection shall
not apply to Washington state patrol commissioned captains and
lieutenants covered under sections 208(8)(b) and 210(6)(b) of this act.
(5)(a) No salary increase may be paid under this section to any
person whose salary has been Y-rated pursuant to rules adopted by the
personnel resources board or the director of personnel, as applicable.
(b) The average salary increases paid under this section to agency
officials whose maximum salaries are established by the committee on
agency official salaries shall not exceed the average increases
provided under subsection (3) of this section.

IMPLEMENTING PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 A new section is added to 2005 c 313
(uncodified) to read as follows:
Executive Order number 05-05, archaeological and cultural
resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005. Agencies and higher
education institutions that issue grants or loans for capital projects
shall comply with the requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 2005 c 313 s 602 (uncodified) is repealed.

Sec. 603 2005 c 313 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) The transportation commission may authorize a transfer of
spending allocation within the appropriation provided and between
projects funded with transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriations ((or the)), transportation partnership account
appropriations, multimodal transportation account appropriations,
freight mobility account appropriations, or freight mobility investment
account appropriations, in order to manage project spending and
efficiently deliver all projects in the respective program under the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) Transfers may only be made within each specific fund source
referenced on the respective project list;
(b) Transfers from a project may be made if the funds allocated to
the project are in excess of the amount needed to complete the project;
(((b))) (c) Transfers from a project may be made if the project is
experiencing unavoidable expenditure delays;
(((c))) (d) Transfers from a project may not be made as a result of
the reduction of the scope of a project, nor shall a transfer be made
to support increases in the scope of a project;
(((d))) (e) Each transfer between projects may only occur if the
commission finds that any resulting change will not hinder the
completion of the projects approved by the legislature; ((and
(e))) (f) Transfers may not occur to projects not identified on the
applicable project list; and
(g) Transfers may not be made while the legislature is in session.
(2) Upon approval of every transfer, a report of the transfers made
to date shall be submitted ((on October 1st of each fiscal year)) to
the senate and house of representatives transportation committees and
to the office of financial management. The report must also include a
list of monitored projects or transfers currently under consideration
by the commission or the department, and a balanced financial plan.

Sec. 604 RCW 47.29.170 and 2005 c 317 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before accepting any unsolicited project proposals, the commission
must adopt rules to facilitate the acceptance, review, evaluation, and
selection of unsolicited project proposals. These rules must include
the following:
(1) Provisions that specify unsolicited proposals must meet
predetermined criteria;
(2) Provisions governing procedures for the cessation of
negotiations and consideration;
(3) Provisions outlining that unsolicited proposals are subject to
a two-step process that begins with concept proposals and would only
advance to the second step, which are fully detailed proposals, if the
commission so directed;
(4) Provisions that require concept proposals to include at least
the following information: Proposers' qualifications and experience;
description of the proposed project and impact; proposed project
financing; and known public benefits and opposition; and
(5) Provisions that specify the process to be followed if the
commission is interested in the concept proposal, which must include
provisions:
(a) Requiring that information regarding the potential project
would be published for a period of not less than thirty days, during
which time entities could express interest in submitting a proposal;
(b) Specifying that if letters of interest were received during the
thirty days, then an additional sixty days for submission of the fully
detailed proposal would be allowed; and
(c) Procedures for what will happen if there are insufficient
proposals submitted or if there are no letters of interest submitted in
the appropriate time frame.
The commission may adopt other rules as necessary to avoid
conflicts with existing laws, statutes, or contractual obligations of
the state.
The commission may not accept or consider any unsolicited proposals
before ((January)) July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 A new section is added to 2005 c 313
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--DISABILITY SURVIVOR'S BENEFIT
State Patrol Highway Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $507,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
allocation to the department of retirement systems for the Washington
state patrol retirement system.

MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 5, 38
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
DRIVER SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
VEHICLE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AVIATION -- PROGRAM F . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS -- PROGRAM K . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM C . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
MARINE -- PROGRAM X . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM B . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
EMPLOYEE SALARY COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
DISABILITY SURVIVOR'S BENEFIT . . . . . . . . . . . . 65
STATE TREASURER
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 57, 58
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 6, 39
WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
CAPITAL PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
--- END ---