BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.12.080 and 2003 c 111 s 308 are each amended to
read as follows:
No voting device shall be approved by the secretary of state unless
it:
(1) Secures to the voter secrecy in the act of voting;
(2) Permits the voter to vote for any person for any office and
upon any measure that he or she has the right to vote for;
(3) Permits the voter to vote for all the candidates of one party
((or in part for the candidates of one or more other parties));
(4) Correctly registers all votes cast for any and all persons and
for or against any and all measures;
(5) Provides that a vote for more than one candidate cannot be cast
by one single operation of the voting device or vote tally system
except when voting for president and vice president of the United
States; and
(6) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this state, has
been tested((,)) and certified((, and used in at least one other state
or election jurisdiction)) by an independent testing authority
designated by the United States Election Assistance Commission.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.12.101 and 2004 c 271 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall not approve a vote tallying system
unless it:
(1) Correctly counts votes on ballots on which the proper number of
votes have been marked for any office or issue;
(2) Ignores votes marked for any office or issue where more than
the allowable number of votes have been marked, but correctly counts
the properly voted portions of the ballot;
(3) Accumulates a count of the specific number of ballots tallied
for each precinct, total votes by candidate for each office, and total
votes for and against each issue of the ballot in that precinct;
(4) Produces precinct and cumulative totals in printed form; and
(5) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this state, has
been tested((,)) and certified((, and used in at least one other state
or election jurisdiction)) by an independent testing authority
designated by the United States Election Assistance Commission.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.46.020 and 2004 c 267 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Disability access voting period" means the period of time starting
twenty days before an election until ((one day before)) the day of the
election.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.46.110 and 2004 c 267 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
((At the discretion of the county auditor,)) In-person disability
access voting ((may take place during the period)) must be available
starting twenty days before the day of a primary or election and ending
the day ((before)) of the election. During this period, the county
auditor must make available a voting system certified by the secretary
of state for disability access, consistent with the requirements of RCW
29A.12.160. The auditor shall maintain a system or systems to prevent
multiple voting. ((The end of the disability access voting period in
each county will be determined by the auditor's need and ability to
print and distribute poll books to the polls in order to prevent
multiple voting.))

--- END ---