BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.32.040 and 2003 c 111 s 804 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Explanatory statements prepared by the attorney general under
RCW 29A.32.070 (3) and (4) must be written in clear and concise
language, avoiding legal and technical terms when possible, and filed
with the secretary of state.
(2) When the explanatory statement ((for a measure initiated by
petition)) is filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state
shall immediately provide the text of the explanatory statement to the
person proposing the measure and any others who have made written
request for notification of the exact language of the explanatory
statement. In addition, when the explanatory statement for a measure
referred to the ballot by the legislature is filed with the secretary
of state, the secretary of state shall immediately provide the text of
the explanatory statement to the presiding officer of the senate and
the presiding officer of the house of representatives ((and any others
who have made written request for notification of the exact language of
the explanatory statement)).
(3) A person dissatisfied with the explanatory statement may appeal
to the superior court of Thurston County within five days of the filing
date. Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays are not counted in
calculating the time limits in this section. A copy of the petition
and a notice of the appeal must be served on the secretary of state and
the attorney general. The court shall examine the measure, the
explanatory statement, and objections, and may hear arguments. The
court shall render its decision and certify to and file with the
secretary of state an explanatory statement it determines will meet the
requirements of this chapter.
The decision of the superior court is final, and its explanatory
statement is the established explanatory statement. The appeal must be
heard without costs to either party.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.56.160 and 2003 c 111 s 1412 are each amended to
read as follows:
Recall petitions must be printed on single sheets of paper of good
writing quality (including but not limited to newsprint) not less than
eleven inches in width and not less than fourteen inches in length. No
petition may be circulated or signed prior to the first day of the one
hundred eighty or two hundred seventy day period established by RCW
29A.56.150 for that recall petition. The petitions must be
substantially in the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:
Petition for the recall of (here insert the name of the office and
of the person whose recall is petitioned for) to the Honorable (here
insert the name and title of the officer with whom the charge is
filed).
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of (the state of
Washington or the political subdivision in which the recall is to be
held), respectfully direct that a special election be called to
determine whether or not (here insert the name of the person charged
and the office which he or she holds) be recalled and discharged from
his or her office, for and on account of (his or her having committed
the act or acts of malfeasance or misfeasance while in office, or
having violated his or her oath of office, as the case may be), in the
following particulars: (here insert the synopsis of the charge); and
each of us for himself or herself says: I have personally signed this
petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Washington in the precinct
and city (or town) and county written after my name, and my residence
address is correctly stated, and to my knowledge, have signed this
petition only once.
The following declaration must be printed on the reverse side of
the petition:

I, . . . . . . . . . . . ., swear or affirm under penalty of law
that I circulated this sheet of the foregoing petition, and that, to
the best of my knowledge, every person who signed this sheet of the
foregoing petition knowingly and without any compensation or promise of
compensation willingly signed his or her true name and that the
information provided therewith is true and correct. I further
acknowledge that under RCW 29A.84.240, forgery of signatures on this
petition constitutes a class B felony, and that offering any
consideration or gratuity to any person to induce him or her to sign a
petition is a gross misdemeanor, such violations being punishable by
fine or imprisonment or both.
RCW 9A.46.020 applies to any conduct constituting harassment
against a petition signature gatherer. This penalty does not preclude
the victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.
The petition must include a place for each petitioner to sign and
print his or her name, and the address, city, and county at which he or
she is registered to vote.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.72.170 and 2003 c 111 s 1818 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state ((may)) must refuse to file any initiative
or referendum petition being submitted upon any of the following
grounds:
(1) That the petition ((does not contain the information)) is not
in the form required by RCW 29A.72.110, 29A.72.120, ((or)) 29A.72.130,
or 29A.72.140.
(2) That the petition clearly bears insufficient signatures.
(3) That the time within which the petition may be filed has
expired.
In case of such refusal, the secretary of state shall endorse on
the petition the word "submitted" and the date, and retain the petition
pending appeal.
If none of the grounds for refusal exists, the secretary of state
must accept and file the petition.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.72.180 and 2003 c 111 s 1819 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the secretary of state refuses to file an initiative or
referendum petition when submitted for filing, the persons submitting
it for filing may, within ((ten)) five days after the refusal, apply to
the superior court of Thurston county for an order requiring the
secretary of state to bring the petitions before the court, and for a
writ of mandate to compel the secretary of state to file it. The
application takes precedence over other cases and matters and must be
speedily heard and determined.
If the court issues the citation, and determines that the petition
is legal in form and apparently contains the requisite number of
signatures and was submitted for filing within the time prescribed in
the Constitution, it shall issue its mandate requiring the secretary of
state to file it as of the date of submission for filing.
The decision of the superior court granting a writ of mandate is
final.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 29A.32.050 (Notice of constitutional
amendments and state measures -- Explanatory statement) and 2003 c 111 s
805, 1967 c 96 s 3, & 1965 c 9 s 29.27.076 are each repealed.

--- END ---