BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of determining any locally imposed motor
vehicle excise tax, the value of a truck-type power or trailing unit
shall be the latest purchase price of the vehicle, excluding applicable
federal excise taxes, state and local sales or use taxes,
transportation or shipping costs, or preparatory or delivery costs,
multiplied by the following percentage based on year of service of the
vehicle since last sale. The latest purchase year shall be considered
the first year of service.

YEAR OF SERVICE PERCENTAGE

1 100

2 81

3 67

4 55

5 45

6 37

7 30

8 25

9 20

10 16

11 13

12 11

13 9

14 7

15 3

16 or older 0

(2) The reissuance of title and registration for a truck-type power
or trailing unit because of the installation of body or special
equipment shall be treated as a sale, and the value of the truck-type
power or trailing unit at that time, as determined by the department
from such information as may be available, shall be considered the
latest purchase price.
(3) For the purpose of determining any locally imposed motor
vehicle excise tax, the value of a motor vehicle other than a truck-type power or trailing unit shall be eighty-five percent of the
manufacturer's base suggested retail price of the vehicle when first
offered for sale as a new vehicle, excluding any optional equipment,
applicable federal excise taxes, state and local sales or use taxes,
transportation or shipping costs, or preparatory or delivery costs,
multiplied by the applicable percentage listed in this subsection (3)
based on year of service of the vehicle.
If the manufacturer's base suggested retail price is unavailable or
otherwise unascertainable at the time of initial registration in this
state, the department shall determine a value equivalent to a
manufacturer's base suggested retail price as follows:
(a) The department shall determine a value using any information
that may be available, including any guidebook, report, or compendium
of recognized standing in the automotive industry or the selling price
and year of sale of the vehicle. The department may use an appraisal
by the county assessor. In valuing a vehicle for which the current
value or selling price is not indicative of the value of similar
vehicles of the same year and model, the department shall establish a
value that more closely represents the average value of similar
vehicles of the same year and model. The value determined in this
subsection (3)(a) shall be divided by the applicable percentage listed
in (b) of this subsection (3) to establish a value equivalent to a
manufacturer's base suggested retail price and this value shall be
multiplied by eighty-five percent.
(b) The year the vehicle is offered for sale as a new vehicle shall
be considered the first year of service.

YEAR OF SERVICE PERCENTAGE

1 100

2 81

3 72

4 63

5 55

6 47

7 41

8 36

9 32

10 27

11 26

12 24

13 23

14 21

15 16

16 or older 10

(4) For purposes of this chapter, value shall exclude value
attributable to modifications of a motor vehicle and equipment that are
designed to facilitate the use or operation of the motor vehicle by a
person with a disability.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.100.060 and 2002 c 56 s 411 are each amended to
read as follows:
A county with a population of one million or more and a county with
a population of from two hundred ten thousand to less than one million
that is adjoining a county with a population of one million or more,
having within their boundaries existing or planned high-occupancy
vehicle lanes on the state highway system, or a regional transportation
investment district for capital improvements, but only to the extent
that the surcharge has not already been imposed by the county, may,
with voter approval, impose a local surcharge of not more than three-tenths of one percent of the value on vehicles registered to a person
residing within the county and not more than 13.64 percent on the state
sales and use taxes paid under the rate in RCW 82.08.020(2) on retail
car rentals within the county or investment district. A county may
impose the surcharge only to the extent that it has not been imposed by
the district. No surcharge may be imposed on vehicles licensed under
RCW 46.16.070 except vehicles with an unladen weight of six thousand
pounds or less, RCW 46.16.079, 46.16.085, or 46.16.090.
Counties or investment districts imposing a tax under this section
shall contract, before the effective date of the resolution or
ordinance imposing a surcharge, administration and collection to the
state department of licensing, and department of revenue, as
appropriate, which shall deduct an amount, as provided by contract, for
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department. All
administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.32, and 82.44 RCW, as
existing on January 1, 2006, shall, insofar as they are applicable to
motor vehicle excise taxes, be applicable to surcharges imposed under
this section before the effective date of this act. Motor vehicles
subject to the local surcharge authorized in this section shall be
administered in accordance with this act if the surcharge is first
imposed on or after the effective date of this act. All administrative
provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW shall,
insofar as they are applicable to state sales and use taxes, be
applicable to surcharges imposed under this section.
If the tax authorized in RCW 81.100.030 is also imposed, the total
proceeds from tax sources imposed under this section and RCW 81.100.030
each year shall not exceed the maximum amount which could be collected
under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.44.060 and 1990 c 42 s 304 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The)) Any locally imposed excise tax ((hereby imposed)) shall be
due and payable to the department or its agents at the time of
registration of a motor vehicle. Whenever an application is made to
the department or its agents for a license for a motor vehicle there
shall be collected, in addition to the amount of the license fee or
renewal license fee, the amount of ((the)) any locally imposed excise
tax ((imposed by this chapter)), and no dealer's license or license
plates, and no license or license plates for a motor vehicle shall be
issued unless such tax is paid in full. ((The excise tax hereby
imposed)) Locally imposed excise taxes shall be collected for each
registration year. ((The)) Any locally imposed excise tax upon a motor
vehicle licensed for the first time in this state shall be levied for
one full registration year commencing on the date of the calendar year
designated by the department and ending on the same date of the next
succeeding calendar year. For vehicles registered under chapter 46.87
RCW, proportional registration, and for vehicle dealer plates issued
under chapter 46.70 RCW, the registration year is the period provided
in those chapters((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the tax shall in no
case be less than two dollars except for proportionally registered
vehicles.
A motor vehicle shall be deemed licensed for the first time in this
state when such vehicle was not previously licensed by this state for
the registration year immediately preceding the registration year in
which the application for license is made or when the vehicle has been
registered in another jurisdiction subsequent to any prior registration
in this state.
No additional tax shall be imposed under this chapter upon any
vehicle upon the transfer of ownership thereof if the tax imposed with
respect to such vehicle has already been paid for the registration year
or fraction of a registration year in which transfer of ownership
occurs.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.80.130 and 2003 c 83 s 206 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Public transportation benefit areas authorized to implement
passenger-only ferry service under RCW 36.57A.200 whose boundaries (a)
are on the Puget Sound, but (b) do not include an area where a regional
transit authority has been formed, may submit an authorizing
proposition to the voters and, if approved, may levy and collect an
excise tax, at a rate approved by the voters, but not exceeding four-tenths of one percent on the value of every motor vehicle owned by a
resident of the taxing district, solely for the purpose of providing
passenger-only ferry service. The tax must be collected only at the
time of vehicle license renewal under chapter 46.16 RCW. The tax will
be imposed on vehicles previously registered in another state or nation
when they are initially registered in this state. The tax will not be
imposed at the time of sale by a licensed vehicle dealer. In a county
imposing a motor vehicle excise tax surcharge under RCW 81.100.060, the
maximum tax rate under this section must be reduced to a rate equal to
four-tenths of one percent on the value less the equivalent motor
vehicle excise tax rate of the surcharge imposed under RCW 81.100.060.
This rate does not apply to vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 with
an unladen weight more than six thousand pounds, or to vehicles
licensed under RCW 46.16.079, 46.16.085, or 46.16.090.
(2) The department of licensing shall administer and collect the
tax in accordance with chapter 82.44 RCW. The department shall deduct
a percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed ((two)) one
percent of the taxes collected, for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds must be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer for monthly distribution to the
public transportation benefit area.
(3) The public transportation benefit area imposing this tax shall
delay the effective date at least six months from the date the fee is
approved by the qualified voters of the authority area to allow the
department of licensing to implement administration and collection of
the tax.
(4) Before an authority may impose a tax authorized under this
section, the authorization for imposition of the tax must be approved
by a majority of the qualified electors of the authority area voting on
that issue.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.44.065 and 1990 c 42 s 305 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the department determines a value for a motor vehicle ((under
RCW 82.44.041)) equivalent to a manufacturer's base suggested retail
price or the value of a truck-type power or trailing unit under ((RCW
82.44.041(2))) section 1 of this act, any person who pays ((the)) a
locally imposed tax ((under this chapter)) for that vehicle may appeal
the valuation to the department under chapter 34.05 RCW. If the
taxpayer is successful on appeal, the department shall refund the
excess tax in the manner provided in RCW 82.44.120.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.44.090 and 1961 c 15 s 82.44.090 are each amended
to read as follows:
It shall be unlawful for the county auditor or any other person to
issue a dealer's license or dealer's license plates or a license or
identification plates with respect to any motor vehicle without
collecting, with the required license fee, the amount of ((the)) any
locally imposed motor vehicle excise tax due ((thereon under the
provisions of this chapter)). Any violation of this section shall
constitute a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.44.100 and 1961 c 15 s 82.44.100 are each amended
to read as follows:
The county auditor shall give to each person paying ((the)) a
locally imposed motor vehicle excise tax a receipt therefor which shall
sufficiently designate and identify the vehicle with respect to which
the tax is paid. ((Such)) The receipt may be incorporated in the
receipt given for the motor vehicle license fee or dealer's license fee
paid.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.44.120 and 2003 c 53 s 403 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any person has paid a motor vehicle license fee, and
together therewith has paid ((an)) a locally imposed excise tax
((imposed under the provisions of this chapter)), and the director
determines that the payor is entitled to a refund of the entire amount
of the license fee as provided by law, then the payor shall also be
entitled to a refund of the entire excise tax collected under the
provisions of this chapter. In case the director determines that any
person is entitled to a refund of only a part of the license fee so
paid, the payor shall be entitled to a refund of the difference, if
any, between the excise tax collected and that which should have been
collected.
(2) In case no claim is to be made for the refund of the license
fee or any part thereof, but claim is made by any person that he or she
has paid an erroneously excessive amount of excise tax, the department
shall determine in the manner generally provided in this chapter the
amount of such excess, if any, that has been paid and shall certify to
the state treasurer that such person is entitled to a refund in such
amount.
(3) In any case where due to error, a person has been required to
pay an excise tax pursuant to this chapter and a vehicle license fee
pursuant to Title 46 RCW which amounts to an overpayment of ten dollars
or more, such person shall be entitled to a refund of the entire amount
of such overpayment, regardless of whether or not a refund of the
overpayment has been requested. Conversely, if due to error, the
department or its agents has failed to collect the full amount of the
license fee and excise tax due, which underpayment is in the amount of
ten dollars or more, the department shall charge and collect such
additional amount as will constitute full payment of the tax.
(4) Any claim for refund of an erroneously excessive amount of
excise tax or overpayment of excise tax with a motor vehicle license
fee must be filed with the director within three years after the
claimed erroneous payment was made.
(5) If the department approves the claim it shall notify the state
treasurer to that effect, and the treasurer shall make such approved
refunds from the general fund and shall mail or deliver the same to the
person entitled thereto.
(6) Any person making any false statement under which he or she
obtains any amount of refund to which he or she is not entitled under
the provisions of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(7) Before a local government subject to this chapter may impose a
motor vehicle excise tax, the local government shall contract with the
department for reimbursement for any refunds paid to a person by the
treasurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Before a local government subject to this chapter may impose a
motor vehicle excise tax, the local government must contract with the
department for the collection of the tax. The department may charge a
reasonable amount, not to exceed one percent of tax collections, for
the administration and collection of the tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.44.022 (Credit on personal-use motor vehicle) and 1998
c 321 s 2;
(2) RCW 82.44.023 (Exemption -- Rental cars -- Alteration of license
plate month and year tabs -- Rules -- Taxes upon sale) and 1998 c 321 s 38,
1998 c 145 s 1, 1994 c 227 s 3, & 1992 c 194 s 8;
(3) RCW 82.44.025 (Exemption -- Vehicles of Taipei Economic and
Cultural Office) and 1998 c 321 s 39 & 1996 c 139 s 3;
(4) RCW 82.44.080 (Tax additional) and 1961 c 15 s 82.44.080;
(5) RCW 82.44.130 (Ad valorem taxation barred) and 1961 c 15 s
82.44.130;
(6) RCW 82.44.155 (City police and fire protection assistance
account -- Distribution to cities and towns -- Apportionment) and 1998 c
321 s 40, 1993 c 492 s 254, 1991 c 199 s 223, & 1990 c 42 s 309;
(7) RCW 82.44.157 (Transfer of funds pursuant to government service
agreement) and 1994 c 266 s 14;
(8) RCW 82.44.160 (Distribution to municipal research council) and
1999 c 309 s 931 & 1995 c 28 s 1; and
(9) RCW 82.44.170 (Computation of excise taxes when commingled with
licensing fees) and 1990 c 42 s 311, 1987 c 244 s 56, & 1985 c 380 s
22.

--- END ---