BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 85.07.170 and 1963 c 96 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioners of any drainage or diking district shall have
power, on behalf of the district, to acquire, place, repair and
maintain, dikes and dams, ditches, drains and outlets therefor,
together with right of way therefor and access thereto, or obtain
rights therein or full or joint use and maintenance thereof, when
deemed by them necessary or beneficial for the protection of the
district's system or its improvements, by eminent domain, purchase, or
contract, with the owners or other districts through their
commissioners, or other entities or persons together with power to
contract by and with other districts or entities with reference to such
matters and their performance.
(2) If the commissioners of any drainage or diking district
determine that repair or maintenance is required on any drainage
facilities, including dikes and dams, ditches, and drains and outlets,
that are on land owned by or under the jurisdiction of the department
of transportation, they may give notice in writing to the department
requesting that the department make the necessary repair or maintenance
pursuant to the department's obligations under RCW 47.01.260. If the
specified repair or maintenance is not conducted by the department
within seven days upon receipt of the notice, the district
commissioners may independently make the repair or maintenance. The
department shall then reimburse the district for all reasonable costs
incurred by the district associated with the repair or maintenance.
(3) The provisions of this section shall be construed as cumulative
and shall not derogate from any other powers authorized by law for such
districts.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.01.260 and 1983 c 29 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of transportation shall exercise all the powers
and perform all the duties necessary, convenient, or incidental to the
planning, locating, designing, constructing, improving, repairing,
operating, and maintaining state highways, including bridges and other
structures, culverts, and drainage facilities and channel changes
necessary for the protection of state highways, and shall examine and
allow or disallow bills, subject to the provisions of RCW 85.07.170,
for any work or services performed or materials, equipment, or supplies
furnished.
(2) Subject to the limitations of RCW 4.24.115, the department, in
the exercise of any of its powers, may include in any authorized
contract a provision for indemnifying the other contracting party
against specific loss or damages arising out of the performance of the
contract.
(3) The department is authorized to acquire property as provided by
law and to construct and maintain thereon any buildings or structures
necessary or convenient for the planning, design, construction,
operation, maintenance, and administration of the state highway system
and to acquire property and to construct and maintain any buildings,
structures, appurtenances, and facilities necessary or convenient to
the health and safety and for the accommodation of persons traveling
upon state highways.
(4) The department is authorized to engage in planning surveys and
may collect, compile, and analyze statistics and other data relative to
existing and future highways and highway needs throughout the state,
and shall conduct research, investigations, and testing as it deems
necessary to improve the methods of construction and maintenance of
highways and bridges.

--- END ---