BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.600 and 1980 c 97 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No person driving or in charge of a motor vehicle shall
permit it to stand unattended without first stopping the engine,
locking the ignition, removing the key and effectively setting the
brake thereon and, when standing upon any perceptible grade, turning
the front wheels to the curb or side of the highway.
(b) Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to unattended
motor vehicles east of the crest of the Cascade mountains from November
15th to March 31st.
(2) The most recent driver of a motor vehicle which the driver has
left standing unattended, who learns that the vehicle has become set in
motion and has struck another vehicle or property, or has caused injury
to any person, shall comply with the requirements of:
(a) RCW 46.52.010 if his vehicle strikes an unattended vehicle or
property adjacent to a public highway; or
(b) RCW 46.52.020 if his vehicle causes damage to an attended
vehicle or other property or injury to any person.
(3) Any person failing to comply with subsection (2)(b) of this
section shall be subject to the sanctions set forth in RCW 46.52.020.

--- END ---