BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 16.49 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to the slaughter and preparation of
one thousand or fewer rabbits in a calendar year by the agricultural
producer of the rabbits for the sale of whole raw rabbits by the
producer directly to the ultimate consumer at the producer's farm.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "rabbit" means the species
Oryctolagus cuniculus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 69.07 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A special, temporary permit issued by the department under this
section is required for the slaughter, preparation, and sale of one
thousand or fewer rabbits in a calendar year by the agricultural
producer of the rabbits for the sale of whole raw rabbits by the
producer directly to the ultimate consumer at the producer's farm.
These activities shall not be conducted without the permit. However,
if the activities are conducted under such a permit, the activities are
exempt from any other licensing requirements of this chapter.
(2)(a) The department must adopt by rule requirements for a
special, temporary permit for the activities described in subsection
(1) of this section. The requirements must be generally patterned
after those established by WAC 246-215-131 as it exists on the
effective date of this section, for temporary food service
establishments, but must be tailored specifically to these slaughter,
preparation, and sale activities. The requirements must include, but
are not limited to, those for: Cooling procedures, when applicable;
sanitary facilities, equipment, and utensils; clean water; washing and
other hygienic practices; and waste and wastewater disposal.
(b) The rules must also identify the length of time such a permit
is valid. In determining the length of time, the department must take
care to ensure that it is adequate to accommodate the seasonal nature
of the permitted activities. In adopting any rule under this section,
the department must also carefully consider the economic constraints on
the regulated activity.
(3) The department shall conduct inspections of the activities
permitted under this section as are reasonably necessary to ensure
compliance with permit requirements.
(4) The fee for a special permit issued under this section is
seventy-five dollars.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "rabbit" means the species
Oryctolagus cuniculus.

--- END ---