BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.01.210 and 1993 c 281 s 62 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of corrections shall appoint full-time and part-time
chaplains for the state correctional institutions as is necessary to
meet the religious needs for convicted felons((; and)), and for other
custodial and correctional institutions under his or her control. The
part-time chaplains are to be considered employees of the department of
corrections with all the rights and responsibilities accorded employees
under chapter 41.06 RCW as they relate to indemnification and defense
for matters arising from acts while the employee was acting within the
scope of his or her employment or duties. The chaplains appointed
under this section are under the direct authority of a chaplain
designated as the manager of religious programs within the department
of corrections. The secretary of social and health services shall
appoint chaplains for the correctional institutions for juveniles found
delinquent by the juvenile courts((;)), and ((the secretary of
corrections and the secretary of social and health services shall
appoint one or more chaplains)) for other custodial, correctional, and
mental institutions under ((their)) his or her control. The chaplains
((so)) appointed under this section shall have the qualifications
consistent with community standards of the given faith group to which
the chaplain belongs and shall be compensated in an amount, as shall
hereafter be recommended by the departments and approved by the
Washington personnel resources board. The department of corrections
and the department of social and health services shall require
chaplains appointed under this section to participate in training to
the extent the training is necessary and appropriate to enable the
chaplain to fulfill his or her duties as a chaplain.

--- END ---