BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "diplomat" means an individual who:
(a) Has a driver's license issued by the United States Department
of State; or
(b) Claims immunities or privileges under 22 U.S.C. Secs. 254a
through 258a with respect to:
(i) A moving traffic violation under this title or a moving traffic
violation of an ordinance of a local authority; or
(ii) Operating a motor vehicle while committing any of the
following offenses:
(A) Vehicular homicide under RCW 46.61.520;
(B) Vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522; or
(C) Reckless driving under RCW 46.61.500.
(2) A law enforcement officer who stops a motor vehicle and has
probable cause to believe that the driver is a diplomat who has
committed a violation described under subsection (1)(b)(i) or (ii) of
this section shall:
(a) As soon as practicable, contact the United States Department of
State in order to verify the driver's status and immunity, if any;
(b) Record all relevant information from any driver's license or
identification card, including a driver's license or identification
card issued by the United States Department of State; and
(c) Within five business days after the date the officer stops the
driver, forward all of the following to the department of licensing:
(i) If the driver is involved in a vehicle accident, the vehicle
accident report;
(ii) If a citation or other charging document was issued to the
driver, a copy of the citation or other charging document; and
(iii) If a citation or other charging document was not issued to
the driver, a written report of the incident.
(3) The department shall:
(a) File each vehicle accident report, citation or other charging
document, and incident report that the department receives under this
section;
(b) Keep convenient records or make suitable notations showing
each:
(i) Conviction;
(ii) Finding of responsibility; and
(iii) Vehicle accident; and
(c) Within five business days after receipt, send a copy of each
document and record described in this subsection to the Bureau of
Diplomatic Security, Office of Foreign Missions, of the United States
Department of State.
(4) This section does not prohibit or limit the application of any
law to a criminal or motor vehicle violation committed by a diplomat.

--- END ---