BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Helping students succeed is about both
defining the skills they need in order to succeed beyond high school as
well as ensuring students know how to relate and apply those skills to
their daily lives. The legislature recognizes that students must be
able to personalize their educational experience in order to understand
how what they are learning is a foundation for their future.
Additionally, the legislature recognizes that effective guidance and
counseling programs are essential to creating a learning environment
where staff, students, and their families work cooperatively to create
a personalized educational experience for every student. In order to
create an environment where all students and parents are empowered and
motivated to take a greater role in charting their own educational
experiences, the legislature intends to strengthen schools' planning
and guidance systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) To the extent funds are appropriated for
this purpose, the superintendent of public instruction shall develop
and disseminate a comprehensive student-centered planning program to
all districts by August 2006. The superintendent of public instruction
shall provide professional development for staff and ongoing technical
assistance to schools that implement the program. The program elements
shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) A long-term mentor-student relationship for every student at
the school;
(b) Curriculum to be used by the mentor in helping the student
develop, implement, and maintain a plan for meeting long-term learning
objectives with an emphasis on how those objectives impact the
student's current and future goals;
(c) An annual student-led parent and mentor conference;
(d) A data collection requirement that allows schools to monitor
student progress.
(2) To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, the
superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grants to selected
schools for the purpose of implementing the student-centered planning
program established under subsection (1) of this section. The
superintendent of public instruction shall develop and publish the
grant selection criteria, the number of awards, and the award amount.
Grant recipients shall be selected and notified by December 2006. To
the extent possible, the superintendent of public instruction shall
attempt to include representation from first and second class school
districts and from different geographic regions of the state in its
grant allocation.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules as
necessary to implement this section. The rules shall require school
districts receiving grants from the implementation of the
student-centered planning program to make every effort, to the extent
possible, to insure adequate capacity in the courses selected by the
students.
(4) By January 1, 2009, the superintendent of public instruction
shall report to appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the
impact of the student-centered planning program on student performance.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---