BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that good after-school programs and activities provide safe and effective learning
environments for children, including children who might otherwise be
alone and unsupervised after school. These programs not only support
children's academic efforts, they also build community partnerships
that support children and their learning.
(2) The legislature finds that students who participate in good
after-school care programs:
(a) Miss fewer days of school and have better behavior in school,
test scores, grades, and records of homework completion than children
who are left alone;
(b) Spend more time actively learning in a variety of settings and
less time watching television than their peers who are left alone; and
(c) Have better peer relations, emotional adjustment, and conflict
resolution skills than children who are left alone.
(3) The legislature further finds that, at the request of the
legislature, the Washington after-school network has prepared a
statewide after-school plan that would help the state make strategic
investments in programs and activities that support children
academically while keeping them safe and well-supervised. Therefore,
the legislature intends to implement the plan by expanding high quality
after-school programs, supporting professional development for after-school program staff, increasing public awareness of program benefits,
and supporting the after-school organizational infrastructure to ensure
economies of scale in support of after-school programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.215
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The Washington community learning center program is
established. The program shall be administered by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. The purposes of the program
include:
(a) Supporting the creation or expansion of community learning
centers that provide students with tutoring and educational enrichment
when school is not in session;
(b) Providing training and professional development for community
learning center program staff;
(c) Increasing public awareness of the availability and benefits of
after-school programs; and
(d) Supporting statewide after-school intermediary organizations in
their efforts to provide leadership, coordination, technical
assistance, advocacy, and programmatic support to after-school programs
throughout the state.
(2) To the extent that funding is available for this purpose, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction may provide
community learning center grants to any public or private organization
that meets the eligibility criteria of the federal twenty-first century
community learning centers program. Priority may be given to grant
requests submitted jointly by one or more schools or school districts
and one or more community-based organizations or other nonschool
partners. Priority shall be given to grant requests that focus on
improving reading and mathematics proficiency for students who attend
schools that have been identified as being in need of improvement under
section 1116 of Title I of the federal no child left behind act of
2001.
(3) Community learning center grant funds may be used to carry out
a broad array of out-of-school activities that support and enhance
academic achievement. The activities may include but need not be
limited to:
(a) Remedial and academic enrichment;
(b) Mathematics, reading, and science education;
(c) Arts and music education;
(d) Entrepreneurial education;
(e) Community service;
(f) Tutoring and mentoring programs;
(g) Programs enhancing the language skills and academic achievement
of limited English proficient students;
(h) Recreational and athletic activities;
(i) Telecommunications and technology education;
(j) Programs that promote parental involvement and family literacy;
(k) Drug and violence prevention, counseling, and character
education programs; and
(l) Programs that assist students who have been truant, suspended,
or expelled, to improve their academic achievement.
(4) Each community learning center grant may be made for a maximum
of five years.
(5) To the extent that funding is available for this purpose, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction may provide grants
or other support for the training and professional development of
community learning center staff, the activities of intermediary after-school organizations, and efforts to increase public awareness of the
availability and benefits of after-school programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of two hundred seventy-five thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to carry out the
purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect August 1, 2006.

--- END ---