BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.170.020 and 1991 c 334 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The requirements of this chapter do not apply to:
(1) A person who is employed exclusively or regularly by one
employer and performs the functions of a private security guard solely
in connection with the affairs of that employer, if the employer is not
a private security company;
(2) A sworn peace officer while engaged in the performance of the
officer's official duties; ((or))
(3) A sworn peace officer while employed by any person to engage in
off-duty employment as a private security guard, but only if the
employment is approved by the chief law enforcement officer of the
jurisdiction where the employment takes place and the sworn peace
officer does not employ, contract with, or broker for profit other
persons to assist him or her in performing the duties related to his or
her private employer; or
(4) Guest services or crowd management employees who do not perform
the duties of a security officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---