BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.280 and 1999 c 167 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person to carry onto, or to possess on,
public or private elementary or secondary school premises, school-provided transportation, or areas of facilities while being used
exclusively by public or private schools:
(a) Any firearm;
(b) Any ((other dangerous weapon as defined in RCW 9.41.250))
component of a firearm, including live ammunition, an ammunition
magazine, or a device for suppressing the noise of any firearm;
(c) Any device commonly known as "nun-chu-ka sticks", consisting of
two or more lengths of wood, metal, plastic, or similar substance
connected with wire, rope, or other means;
(d) Any device, commonly known as "throwing stars", which are
multi-pointed, metal objects designed to embed upon impact from any
aspect; ((or))
(e) Any air gun, including any air pistol or air rifle, designed to
propel a BB, pellet, or other projectile by the discharge of compressed
air, carbon dioxide, or other gas;
(f) A slung shot, sling shot, sand club, billy club, metal baton,
or metal knuckles;
(g) Any object or instrument equipped with a blade or sharp or
sharpened extension that could reasonably be used for cutting, slicing,
or stabbing, including but not limited to:
(i) Any knife, dirk, ice pick, dagger, or razor with an unguarded
blade; or
(ii) A tool or device, such as a leather punch or screwdriver, that
is used as a stabbing instrument or that is possessed or controlled
with the intent to be used as a stabbing instrument;
(h) Any stun gun or other object, instrument, or device that, when
applied to a person or animal, is designed to administer an
incapacitating electric shock, charge, or impulse, including but not
limited to a projectile stun gun, that projects wired probes attached
to the device that emit an electrical charge;
(i) Any metal pipe, bar, or tool used or intended to be used as a
club;
(j) Any explosive, firework as defined in RCW 70.77.126, or item
containing poisonous or injurious gas, liquid, or other substance; or
(k) Any object, implement, or instrument that has the capacity to
inflict death or substantial bodily harm and from the manner in which
it is used, attempted to be used, or threatened to be used is intended
to produce or may easily and readily produce death or substantial
bodily harm.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any such
person violating subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor. Any person violating subsection (1)(a) of this section is
guilty of a class C felony. In addition, if any person is convicted of
a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, the person shall have
his or her concealed pistol license, if any revoked for a period of
three years. Anyone convicted under this subsection is prohibited from
applying for a concealed pistol license for a period of three years.
The court shall send notice of the revocation to the department of
licensing, and the city, town, or county which issued the license.
Any violation of subsection (1) of this section by elementary or
secondary school students constitutes grounds for expulsion from the
state's public schools in accordance with RCW 28A.600.010. Within one
business day of any allegation or indication of such violation, an
appropriate school authority shall ((promptly)) notify law enforcement
and the student's parent or guardian regarding ((any)) the allegation
or indication of such violation. Law enforcement shall forward this
notification to the prosecuting attorney.
Upon the arrest of a person at least twelve years of age and not
more than twenty-one years of age for violating subsection (1)(a) of
this section, the person shall be detained or confined in a juvenile or
adult facility for up to seventy-two hours. The person shall not be
released within the seventy-two hours until after the person has been
examined and evaluated by the ((county-designated)) designated mental
health professional unless the court in its discretion releases the
person sooner after a determination regarding probable cause or on
probation bond or bail.
Within twenty-four hours of the arrest, the arresting law
enforcement agency shall refer the person to the ((county-designated))
designated mental health professional for examination and evaluation
under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW and inform a parent or guardian of the
person of the arrest, detention, and examination. The ((county-designated)) designated mental health professional shall examine and
evaluate the person subject to the provisions of chapter 71.05 or 71.34
RCW. The examination shall occur at the facility in which the person
is detained or confined. If the person has been released on probation,
bond, or bail, the examination shall occur wherever is appropriate.
The ((county-designated)) designated mental health professional may
determine whether to refer the person to the county-designated chemical
dependency specialist for examination and evaluation in accordance with
chapter 70.96A RCW. The county-designated chemical dependency
specialist shall examine the person subject to the provisions of
chapter 70.96A RCW. The examination shall occur at the facility in
which the person is detained or confined. If the person has been
released on probation, bond, or bail, the examination shall occur
wherever is appropriate.
Upon completion of any examination by the ((county-designated))
designated mental health professional or the county-designated chemical
dependency specialist, the results of the examination shall be sent to
the court, and the court shall consider those results in making any
determination about the person.
The ((county-designated)) designated mental health professional and
county-designated chemical dependency specialist shall, to the extent
permitted by law, notify a parent or guardian of the person that an
examination and evaluation has taken place and the results of the
examination. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the delivery of
additional, appropriate mental health examinations to the person while
the person is detained or confined.
If the ((county-designated)) designated mental health professional
determines it is appropriate, the ((county-designated)) designated
mental health professional may refer the person to the local regional
support network for follow-up services or the department of social and
health services or other community providers for other services to the
family and individual.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Any student or employee of a private military academy when on
the property of the academy;
(b) Any person engaged in military, law enforcement, or school
district security activities;
(c) Any person who is involved in a convention, showing,
demonstration, lecture, or firearms safety course authorized by school
authorities in which the firearms of collectors or instructors are
handled or displayed;
(d) Any person while the person is participating in a firearms or
air gun competition approved by the school or school district;
(e) Any person in possession of a pistol who has been issued a
license under RCW 9.41.070, or is exempt from the licensing requirement
by RCW 9.41.060, while picking up or dropping off a student;
(f) Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age legally in
possession of a firearm or ((dangerous)) other weapon described in
subsection (1) of this section that is secured within an attended
vehicle or concealed from view within a locked unattended vehicle while
conducting legitimate business at the school;
(g) Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age who is in lawful
possession of an unloaded firearm, secured in a vehicle while
conducting legitimate business at the school; ((or))
(h) Any law enforcement officer of the federal, state, or local
government agency;
(i) Any person who has in his or her possession or control any
device, object, implement, instrument, or tool for a school-approved
project, exercise, or class that has been provided by the school
specifically for the project, exercise, or class or that the student
has brought to school with the express prior verbal or written
permission of a teacher or other school official for use in the school-approved project, exercise, or class;
(j) Any person who possesses or controls any device, object,
implement, instrument, or tool for a nonschool-related activity or
class authorized to be conducted on the school premises, school-provided transportation, or areas of facilities while being used
exclusively by the school, if the device, object, implement,
instrument, or tool has been provided specifically for the activity or
class or has been brought to school premises with the express prior
permission to be used in the approved activity or class;
(k) Any person in possession or control of tools that are secured
within an attended vehicle or concealed from view within a locked
unattended vehicle while conducting legitimate business at the school;
or
(l) Any person in possession or control of medical equipment,
devices, or paraphernalia, including but not limited to hypodermic
needles or other devices, required for the administration or injection
of medications prescribed by a health professional to treat a health
condition. Students in possession of such medical equipment, devices,
or paraphernalia may only possess such items with the written
permission of the school and a student's parent or legal guardian, or
pursuant to a medication or treatment order and nursing plan to
implement the order.
(4) Subsections (1)(c) and (d) of this section do not apply to any
person who possesses nun-chu-ka sticks, throwing stars, or other
dangerous weapons to be used in martial arts classes authorized to be
conducted on the school premises.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (3)(b), (c), (f), and (h) of
this section, firearms are not permitted in a public or private school
building.
(6) "GUN-FREE ZONE" signs shall be posted around school facilities
giving warning of the prohibition of the possession of firearms on
school grounds.

--- END ---