BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.240 and 2005 c 274 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following investigative, law enforcement, and crime victim
information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this
chapter:
(1) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy;
(2) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the commission, if
disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical safety, or
property. If at the time a complaint is filed the complainant, victim,
or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure, such
desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with the commission
about any elected official or candidate for public office must be made
in writing and signed by the complainant under oath;
(3) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b);
(4) License applications under RCW 9.41.070; copies of license
applications or information on the applications may be released to law
enforcement or corrections agencies; ((and))
(5) Information revealing the identity of child victims of sexual
assault who are under age eighteen. Identifying information means the
child victim's name, address, location, photograph, and in cases in
which the child victim is a relative or stepchild of the alleged
perpetrator, identification of the relationship between the child and
the alleged perpetrator; and
(6) Any records provided to a state or local law enforcement agency
by an alarm system company at the request of the law enforcement
agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---