BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.20.297 and 2005 c 357 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that small technology-based firms are the
source of approximately one-half of the economy's major innovations and
that it is in the interest of the state to increase participation by
Washington state small businesses in the federal small business
innovation research program by assisting them in becoming small
business innovation research program grant recipients.
The legislature further finds that many small business innovators
lack the grant-writing skills necessary to prepare a successful small
business innovation research program proposal, and the federal program
that funded grant-writing assistance has stopped operations. Nearly
fifty percent of small businesses trained under the federal program won
grants compared to less than ten percent of those that did not receive
training.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Small business innovation research program" means the program,
enacted pursuant to the small business innovation development act of
1982, P.L. 97-219, that provided funds to small businesses to conduct
innovative research having commercial application.
(b) "Small business" means a corporation, partnership, sole
proprietorship, or individual, operating a business for profit, with
two hundred fifty employees or fewer, including employees employed in
a subsidiary or affiliated corporation, that otherwise meets the
requirements of the federal small business innovation research program.
(3) The Washington technology center and Washington State
University shall each establish a small business innovation research
assistance program, including a proposal review process, to train and
assist Washington small businesses to win phase I small business
innovation research program awards.
(a) The Washington technology center and Washington State
University shall give priority to first-time small business innovation
research program applicants, new businesses, and firms with fewer than
ten employees.
(b) The Washington technology center and Washington State
University may charge a fee for this service.

--- END ---