BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.28.015 and 2005 c 108 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) In 1998, the joint legislative audit and review committee, in
its performance audit of the Washington industrial insurance system,
reported that one of the most significant causes for delayed benefit
payments to workers and lack of employer involvement in claims was the
manner in which claims were reported. Under this system of reporting,
the worker generally reports the injury to a physician who, in turn,
reports the injury to the department.
(b) The performance audit further reported that adopting a system
in which the employee reports to the employer and the employer reports
to the department would speed the first payment of benefits to the
worker and involve the employer, from the beginning of the claim, in
assisting in the management of the claim, including returning the
worker to work.
(c) The performance audit also recognized that there would be
instances in which workers would be reluctant to report injuries to
employers and that, therefore, the system of physician reporting should
be retained as an alternative, and employer reporting should be tested
on a widespread basis.
(2)(((a))) The department of labor and industries shall develop and
implement an initiative to:
(a) Encourage the reporting of industrial injuries and occupational
diseases by the worker to his or her employer and by the employer to
the department((. Under this initiative, the department must take
steps to));
(b) Encourage the employer to provide assistance to the worker in
completing the application for compensation; and
(c) Educate workers and employers about the benefits and importance
of prompt reporting of injuries and diseases.
(((b) By)) (3) By January 1, 2007, the department shall develop and
begin a pilot program to allow employers to assist workers in
completing an application for benefits. This pilot program does not
replace the current method for reporting as provided in RCW 51.28.020.
The department shall develop requirements or rules for employers who
participate in the pilot program, including provisions to ensure prompt
reporting of the claim and communicating a worker's rights and
responsibilities under the pilot program. The pilot program shall
include the voluntary participation of employers that represent a
cross-section of industries, geographic areas, union and nonunion
workers, large and small businesses, and other criteria established by
the department with input of business and labor leaders. The
department will, to the greatest extent possible, attempt to include in
the pilot all employers who volunteer. During the pilot period, the
department shall continue to expand the participation of employers and
shall consider steps to address the unique needs and issues of small
employers. The pilot program expires July 1, 2009.
(4) On December 1, ((2006)) 2007, and December 1, 2008, the
department of labor and industries shall ((develop and make statutory
recommendations for an alternative system of reporting injuries under
which the worker would report to the employer and the employer would
report to the department. Upon passage of such legislation, the
department shall immediately begin an educational effort to promote
this method of reporting.
(3)(a) The department must conduct)) report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature the findings of a study of:
(((i))) (a) Claims that are not reported promptly, including but
not limited to a review of the circumstances of such claims, the type
of injuries involved in such claims, and the reasons for the failure to
report such claims promptly;
(((ii))) (b) The effect of the educational initiative required
under subsection (2)(((a))) of this section on whether the number of
claims reported to employers increased, whether there was a reduction
in delays in benefit payments, and whether there was an improvement in
employer involvement in assisting with claims management and an
increase in appropriate return-to-work and better outcomes for injured
workers and employers; ((and
(iii))) (c) The results of the efforts of the centers of
occupational health education in early reporting and early notification
of employers, and the general lessons that can be drawn from these
results for the larger workers' compensation program((.
(b) By December 1, 2006, the department must report on the results
of the study to the appropriate committees of the legislature)); and
(d) The results of the pilot program for workers to begin the
process of applying for compensation through the employer and whether
additional statutory changes are required or recommended to implement
this process for all employers and workers.

--- END ---