BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Washington state legislature finds that
pet animals are important to their owners. In addition, their presence
may bring comfort and enhance recovery for victims distressed over
injury or damage resulting from disasters caused by all hazards,
whether natural, technological, or human caused.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the policy of the state of Washington that in the event of an
emergency or disaster, and for the purposes of search and rescue
activities, an emergency worker shall make every practicable attempt
under the circumstances, when engaged in emergency management
activities, to rescue a victim's pet animal.

--- END ---