BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.010 and 1997 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section shall apply throughout
this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adjudicative proceeding" means a proceeding before an agency
in which an opportunity for hearing before that agency is required by
statute or constitutional right before or after the entry of an order
by the agency. Adjudicative proceedings also include all cases of
licensing and rate making in which an application for a license or rate
change is denied except as limited by RCW 66.08.150, or a license is
revoked, suspended, or modified, or in which the granting of an
application is contested by a person having standing to contest under
the law.
(2) "Agency" means any state board, commission, department,
institution of higher education, or officer, authorized by law to make
rules or to conduct adjudicative proceedings, except those in the
legislative or judicial branches, the governor, or the attorney general
except to the extent otherwise required by law and any local
governmental entity that may request the appointment of an
administrative law judge under chapter 42.41 RCW.
(3) "Agency action" means licensing, the implementation or
enforcement of a statute, the adoption or application of an agency rule
or order, the imposition of sanctions, or the granting or withholding
of benefits.
Agency action does not include an agency decision regarding (a)
contracting or procurement of goods, services, public works, and the
purchase, lease, or acquisition by any other means, including eminent
domain, of real estate, as well as all activities necessarily related
to those functions, or (b) determinations as to the sufficiency of a
showing of interest filed in support of a representation petition, or
mediation or conciliation of labor disputes or arbitration of labor
disputes under a collective bargaining law or similar statute, or (c)
any sale, lease, contract, or other proprietary decision in the
management of public lands or real property interests, or (d) the
granting of a license, franchise, or permission for the use of
trademarks, symbols, and similar property owned or controlled by the
agency.
(4) "Agency head" means the individual or body of individuals in
whom the ultimate legal authority of the agency is vested by any
provision of law. If the agency head is a body of individuals, a
majority of those individuals constitutes the agency head.
(5) "Entry" of an order means the signing of the order by all
persons who are to sign the order, as an official act indicating that
the order is to be effective.
(6) "Filing" of a document that is required to be filed with an
agency means delivery of the document to a place designated by the
agency by rule for receipt of official documents, or in the absence of
such designation, at the office of the agency head.
(7) "Institutions of higher education" are the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, the various community colleges, and the
governing boards of each of the above, and the various colleges,
divisions, departments, or offices authorized by the governing board of
the institution involved to act for the institution, all of which are
sometimes referred to in this chapter as "institutions."
(8) "Interpretive statement" means a written expression of the
opinion of an agency, entitled an interpretive statement by the agency
head or its designee, as to the meaning of a statute or other provision
of law, of a court decision, or of an agency order.
(9)(a) "License" means a franchise, permit, certification,
approval, registration, charter, or similar form of authorization
required by law, but does not include (i) a license required solely for
revenue purposes, or (ii) a certification of an exclusive bargaining
representative, or similar status, under a collective bargaining law or
similar statute, or (iii) a license, franchise, or permission for use
of trademarks, symbols, and similar property owned or controlled by the
agency.
(b) "Licensing" includes the agency process respecting the
issuance, denial, revocation, suspension, or modification of a license.
(10) "Mail" or "send," for purposes of any notice relating to rule
making or policy or interpretive statements, means regular mail or
electronic distribution, as provided in RCW 34.05.260. "Electronic
distribution" or "electronically" means distribution by electronic mail
or facsimile mail.
(11)(a) "Order," without further qualification, means a written
statement of particular applicability that finally determines the legal
rights, duties, privileges, immunities, or other legal interests of a
specific person or persons.
(b) "Order of adoption" means the official written statement by
which an agency adopts, amends, or repeals a rule.
(12) "Party to agency proceedings," or "party" in a context so
indicating, means:
(a) A person to whom the agency action is specifically directed; or
(b) A person named as a party to the agency proceeding or allowed
to intervene or participate as a party in the agency proceeding.
(13) "Party to judicial review or civil enforcement proceedings,"
or "party" in a context so indicating, means:
(a) A person who files a petition for a judicial review or civil
enforcement proceeding; or
(b) A person named as a party in a judicial review or civil
enforcement proceeding, or allowed to participate as a party in a
judicial review or civil enforcement proceeding.
(14) "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation,
association, governmental subdivision or unit thereof, or public or
private organization or entity of any character, and includes another
agency.
(15) "Policy statement" means a written description of the current
approach of an agency, entitled a policy statement by the agency head
or its designee, to implementation of a statute or other provision of
law, of a court decision, or of an agency order, including where
appropriate the agency's current practice, procedure, or method of
action based upon that approach.
(16) "Public" includes county and city governments.
(17) "Rule" means any agency order, directive, or regulation of
general applicability (a) the violation of which subjects a person to
a penalty or administrative sanction; (b) which establishes, alters, or
revokes any procedure, practice, or requirement relating to agency
hearings; (c) which establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification
or requirement relating to the enjoyment of benefits or privileges
conferred by law; (d) which establishes, alters, or revokes any
qualifications or standards for the issuance, suspension, or revocation
of licenses to pursue any commercial activity, trade, or profession; or
(e) which establishes, alters, or revokes any mandatory standards for
any product or material which must be met before distribution or sale.
The term includes the amendment or repeal of a prior rule, but does not
include (i) statements concerning only the internal management of an
agency and not affecting private rights or procedures available to the
public, (ii) declaratory rulings issued pursuant to RCW 34.05.240,
(iii) traffic restrictions for motor vehicles, bicyclists, and
pedestrians established by the secretary of transportation or his
designee where notice of such restrictions is given by official traffic
control devices, or (iv) rules of institutions of higher education
involving standards of admission, academic advancement, academic
credit, graduation and the granting of degrees, employment
relationships, or fiscal processes.
(((17))) (18) "Rules review committee" or "committee" means the
joint administrative rules review committee created pursuant to RCW
34.05.610 for the purpose of selectively reviewing existing and
proposed rules of state agencies.
(((18))) (19) "Rule making" means the process for formulation and
adoption of a rule.
(((19))) (20) "Service," except as otherwise provided in this
chapter, means posting in the United States mail, properly addressed,
postage prepaid, or personal service. Service by mail is complete upon
deposit in the United States mail. Agencies may, by rule, authorize
service by electronic telefacsimile transmission, where copies are
mailed simultaneously, or by commercial parcel delivery company.

Sec. 2 RCW 34.05.313 and 1995 c 403 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) During the development of a rule or after its adoption, an
agency may develop methods for measuring or testing the feasibility of
complying with or administering the rule and for identifying simple,
efficient, and economical alternatives for achieving the goal of the
rule. When the interests of a county or city are or could reasonably
be affected by a subject of rule making, and the agency determines that
pilot rule making is appropriate, the agency shall invite all affected
counties and cities to participate in a pilot rule project. If any
affected county or city accepts the invitation to participate, then the
agency and the participating counties and cities shall jointly develop
a pilot rule project.
(b) A pilot project shall include public notice, participation by
volunteers who are or will be subject to the rule, a high level of
involvement from agency management, reasonable completion dates, and a
process by which one or more parties may withdraw from the process or
the process may be terminated. Volunteers who agree to test a rule and
attempt to meet the requirements of the draft rule, to report
periodically to the proposing agency on the extent of their ability to
meet the requirements of the draft rule, and to make recommendations
for improving the draft rule shall not be obligated to comply fully
with the rule being tested nor be subject to any enforcement action or
other sanction for failing to comply with the requirements of the draft
rule.
(2) An agency conducting a pilot rule project authorized under
subsection (1) of this section may waive one or more provisions of
agency rules otherwise applicable to participants in such a pilot
project if the agency first determines that such a waiver is in the
public interest and necessary to conduct the project. Such a waiver
may be only for a stated period of time, not to exceed the duration of
the project.
(3) The findings of the pilot project should be widely shared and,
where appropriate, adopted as amendments to the rule.
(4) If an agency conducts a pilot rule project in lieu of meeting
the requirements of the regulatory fairness act, chapter 19.85 RCW, the
agency shall ensure the following conditions are met:
(a) If over ten small businesses are affected, there shall be at
least ten small businesses in the test group and at least one-half of
the volunteers participating in the pilot test group shall be small
businesses.
(b)(i) If there are at least one hundred businesses affected, the
participation by small businesses in the test group shall be as
follows:
(A) Not less than twenty percent of the small businesses must
employ twenty-six to fifty employees;
(B) Not less than twenty percent of the small businesses must
employ eleven to twenty-six employees; and
(C) Not less than twenty percent of the small businesses must
employ zero to ten employees.
(ii) If there do not exist a sufficient number of small businesses
in each size category set forth in (b)(i) of this subsection willing to
participate in the pilot project to meet the minimum requirements of
that subsection, then the agency must comply with this section to the
maximum extent practicable.
(c) The agency may not terminate the pilot project before
completion.
(d) Before filing the notice of proposed rule making pursuant to
RCW 34.05.320, the agency must prepare a report of the pilot rule
project that includes:
(i) A description of the difficulties small businesses had in
complying with the pilot rule;
(ii) A list of the recommended revisions to the rule to make
compliance with the rule easier or to reduce the cost of compliance
with the rule by the small businesses participating in the pilot rule
project;
(iii) A written statement explaining the options it considered to
resolve each of the difficulties described and a statement explaining
its reasons for not including a recommendation by the pilot test group
to revise the rule; and
(iv) If the agency was unable to meet the requirements set forth in
(b)(i) of this subsection, a written explanation of why it was unable
to do so and the steps the agency took to include small businesses in
the pilot project.

Sec. 3 RCW 34.05.328 and 2003 c 165 s 2 and 2003 c 39 s 13 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Before adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this
section, an agency shall:
(a) Clearly state in detail the general goals and specific
objectives of the statute that the rule implements;
(b) Determine that the rule is needed to achieve the general goals
and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection, and
analyze alternatives to rule making and the consequences of not
adopting the rule;
(c) Provide notification in the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320 that a preliminary cost-benefit analysis is
available. The preliminary cost-benefit analysis must fulfill the
requirements of the cost-benefit analysis under (d) of this subsection.
If the agency files a supplemental notice under RCW 34.05.340, the
supplemental notice shall include notification that a revised
preliminary cost-benefit analysis is available. A final cost-benefit
analysis shall be available when the rule is adopted under RCW
34.05.360;
(d)(i) Determine that the probable benefits of the rule are greater
than its probable costs, taking into account both the qualitative and
quantitative benefits and costs and the specific directives of the
statute being implemented;
(ii) In the case of costs and benefits to counties and cities when
counties and cities are required to comply with the rule, the analysis
shall be tailored to reflect that the cost of compliance is more or
less affordable by counties and cities dependant on various factors.
For purposes of this subsection, counties and cities able to afford the
costs of regulation shall be determined in descending order, either
individually or by groupings not to be less than five groups,
biennially by the office of financial management by taking into
consideration population, population growth, population density on
taxable land, median income, property tax revenues, sales tax revenues,
and general fund budget of the county or city. The ranking of the
county or city required to comply with the rule shall be considered by
the agency in determination of the ability of the county or city to
comply with the rule. The less able a county or city is to afford
compliance, the greater the cost to the county or city of compliance.
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to diminish the agency's
decision-making authority in determining whether the probable benefits
of the rule exceed the probable costs;
(e) Determine, after considering alternative versions of the rule
and the analysis required under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection,
that the rule being adopted is the least burdensome alternative for
those required to comply with it that will achieve the general goals
and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection;
(f) Determine that the rule does not require those to whom it
applies to take an action that violates requirements of another federal
or state law;
(g) Determine that the rule does not impose more stringent
performance requirements on private entities than on public entities
unless required to do so by federal or state law;
(h) Determine if the rule differs from any federal regulation or
statute applicable to the same activity or subject matter and, if so,
determine that the difference is justified by the following:
(i) A state statute that explicitly allows the agency to differ
from federal standards; or
(ii) Substantial evidence that the difference is necessary to
achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of
this subsection; and
(i) Coordinate the rule, to the maximum extent practicable, with
other federal, state, and local laws applicable to the same activity or
subject matter.
(2) In making its determinations pursuant to subsection (1)(b)
through (h) of this section, the agency shall place in the rule-making
file documentation of sufficient quantity and quality so as to persuade
a reasonable person that the determinations are justified.
(3) Before adopting rules described in subsection (5) of this
section, an agency shall place in the rule-making file a rule
implementation plan for rules filed under each adopting order. The
rule implementation plan shall describe all counties and cities
included within the purview of the proposed rule. For the rules that
impact the included counties and cities, the rule implementation plan
shall be prepared by the agency in consultation with the included
cities and counties. The plan shall describe how the agency intends
to:
(a) Implement and enforce the rule, including a description of the
resources the agency intends to use;
(b) Inform and educate affected persons about the rule;
(c) Promote and assist voluntary compliance; and
(d) Evaluate whether the rule achieves the purpose for which it was
adopted, including, to the maximum extent practicable, the use of
interim milestones to assess progress and the use of objectively
measurable outcomes.
(4) After adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this
section regulating the same activity or subject matter as another
provision of federal or state law, an agency shall do all of the
following:
(a) Provide to the business assistance center a list citing by
reference the other federal and state laws that regulate the same
activity or subject matter;
(b) Coordinate implementation and enforcement of the rule with the
other federal ((and)), state, and local entities regulating the same
activity ((or)), subject matter, or geographic location by making every
effort to do one or more of the following:
(i) Deferring to the other entity;
(ii) Designating a lead agency; or
(iii) Entering into an agreement with the other entities specifying
how the agency and entities will coordinate implementation and
enforcement.
If the agency is unable to comply with this subsection (4)(b), the
agency shall report to the legislature pursuant to (c) of this
subsection;
(c) Report to the joint administrative rules review committee:
(i) The existence of any overlap or duplication of other federal or
state laws, any differences from federal law, and any known overlap,
duplication, or conflict with local laws; and
(ii) Make recommendations for any legislation that may be necessary
to eliminate or mitigate any adverse effects of such overlap,
duplication, or difference.
For purposes of this subsection, "local entities" means counties
and cities.
(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, this section
applies to:
(i) Significant legislative rules of the departments of ecology,
labor and industries, health, revenue, social and health services, and
natural resources, the employment security department, the forest
practices board, the office of the insurance commissioner, and to the
legislative rules of the department of fish and wildlife implementing
chapter 77.55 RCW; and
(ii) Any rule of any agency, if this section is voluntarily made
applicable to the rule by the agency, or is made applicable to the rule
by a majority vote of the joint administrative rules review committee
within forty-five days of receiving the notice of proposed rule making
under RCW 34.05.320.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(i) Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;
(ii) Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that
are not subject to violation by a nongovernment party;
(iii) Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material
change federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes,
rules of other Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs
other than those programs governing shorelines of statewide
significance, or, as referenced by Washington state law, national
consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;
(iv) Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or
name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its
effect;
(v) Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically
dictated by statute;
(vi) Rules that set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative
standards; or
(vii) Rules of the department of social and health services
relating only to client medical or financial eligibility and rules
concerning liability for care of dependents.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) A "procedural rule" is a rule that adopts, amends, or repeals
(A) any procedure, practice, or requirement relating to any agency
hearings; (B) any filing or related process requirement for making
application to an agency for a license or permit; or (C) any policy
statement pertaining to the consistent internal operations of an
agency.
(ii) An "interpretive rule" is a rule, the violation of which does
not subject a person to a penalty or sanction, that sets forth the
agency's interpretation of statutory provisions it administers.
(iii) A "significant legislative rule" is a rule other than a
procedural or interpretive rule that (A) adopts substantive provisions
of law pursuant to delegated legislative authority, the violation of
which subjects a violator of such rule to a penalty or sanction; (B)
establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification or standard for the
issuance, suspension, or revocation of a license or permit; or (C)
adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a policy or
regulatory program.
(d) In the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320, an
agency shall state whether this section applies to the proposed rule
pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection, or if the agency will apply this
section voluntarily.
(6) By January 31, 1996, and by January 31st of each even-numbered
year thereafter, the office of financial management, after consulting
with state agencies, counties, and cities, and business, labor, and
environmental organizations, shall report to the governor and the
legislature regarding the effects of this section on the regulatory
system in this state. The report shall document:
(a) The rules proposed to which this section applied and to the
extent possible, how compliance with this section affected the
substance of the rule, if any, that the agency ultimately adopted;
(b) The costs incurred by state agencies in complying with this
section;
(c) Any legal action maintained based upon the alleged failure of
any agency to comply with this section, the costs to the state of such
action, and the result;
(d) The extent to which this section has adversely affected the
capacity of agencies to fulfill their legislatively prescribed mission;
(e) The extent to which this section has improved the acceptability
of state rules to those regulated; and
(f) Any other information considered by the office of financial
management to be useful in evaluating the effect of this section.

--- END ---