BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) By December 1, 2007, the department of
community, trade, and economic development, in coordination with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, will study how
local governments that are required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 and the school districts within whose boundaries they are
located could assure that permanent public school facility space
adequate to serve enrollment generated by residential development and
proximately located to the development is in place at the time the
enrollment is generated; develop recommendations for statutory
requirements, funding mechanisms, and planning processes; and present
the study and recommendations to the governor, the superintendent of
public instruction, and the legislature. The study and recommendations
shall assist the local governments and school districts in achieving
their overall school facility and community planning and development
objectives.
(2) The study and recommendations shall address the following:
(a) Statutory requirements for goals, comprehensive plan elements,
and development regulations under chapter 36.70A RCW, including but not
limited to (i) enhanced provisions within land use and capital
facilities elements or a separate public school facility's element, and
(ii) specifically including planning for adequate capacity of land
within land use categories in which public school facilities are an
allowable use in order to meet the goal of RCW 36.70A.020(8) for
natural resource lands;
(b) Provisions for state assistance for school plant facilities, as
set forth in chapter 28A.525 RCW and implementing regulations;
(c) Provisions of interlocal agreements between local governments
and school districts to coordinate planning and establish level of
service standards for schools, including but not limited to sources and
use of relevant data, local government infrastructure related to public
school facilities, shared use of facilities, dispute resolution, and
public participation and oversight;
(d) Review and enforcement of interlocal agreements and statutory
requirements, including but not limited to rule making, administrative
and judicial appeals, and sanctions;
(e) Other alternatives and model processes for enhanced
coordination between local governments and school districts, including
but not limited to needs for shared data and information, processes for
optimal coordination, local permitting and fee administration, and
enhanced communication procedures; and
(f) Any other topics relevant to the purpose of this section that
the department may identify.
(3) The department, in coordination with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, shall convene a working group
that includes, but is not limited to, representatives of: Pierce,
Clark, Spokane, and other counties; cities; public school districts;
private sector groups, including developers and agricultural interests;
educational associations; relevant state agencies; and the office of
the superintendent of public instruction.

--- END ---