BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a two
or four-year college or university in the state of Washington that is
authorized by the higher education coordinating board.
(2) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(3) "Public school" means an elementary school, a middle school,
junior high school, or high school within the public school system
referred to in Article IX of the state Constitution.
(4) "Satisfied" means paid-in-full.
(5) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received a zero
interest loan under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The zero interest loan program is
established for students attending a Washington institution of higher
education. The first loans shall be made to eligible students
enrolling in an institution of higher education in the 2006-07 academic
year. The program shall be administered by the board. In
administering the program, the board shall:
(1) Select students to receive zero interest loans;
(2) Adopt necessary rules and guidelines;
(3) Publicize the program;
(4) Collect and manage repayments from students; and
(5) Solicit and accept grants and donations from public and private
sources for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The board shall design the Washington zero
interest loan program based on the following parameters:
(1)(a) Loans shall be made to students graduating from public and
approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, students
participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200
RCW, and persons twenty-one years of age or younger receiving a GED
certificate, who meet the financial eligibility criteria in this
section.
(b) To meet the financial eligibility criteria, a student's family
income shall not exceed one hundred thirty-five percent of the state
median family income adjusted for family size, as determined by the
board for each graduating class. Students not meeting the eligibility
requirements for the first year of the loan may reapply for a second
year, but must still meet the income standard set by the board for the
student's graduating class.
(2) Zero interest loans are not intended to supplant any grant,
scholarship, or tax program related to postsecondary education. If the
board finds that zero interest loans supplant or reduce any grant,
scholarship, or tax program for categories of students, then the board
shall adjust the financial eligibility criteria or the amount of loan
to the level necessary to avoid supplanting.
(3) The loans may only be used for undergraduate coursework at
accredited institutions of higher education in the state of Washington.
(4) The loans may be used for college-related expenses, including
but not limited to, tuition, room and board, books, and materials.
(5) Loans may not be awarded to any student who is pursuing a
degree in theology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The board may provide zero interest loans to
eligible participants from the funds appropriated to the board for this
purpose, or from any private donations, or any other funds given to the
board for this program. The amount loaned to an individual may not
exceed the amount of tuition and fees at the institution of higher
education attended by the participant or resident undergraduate tuition
and fees at the University of Washington per academic year for a full-time student, whichever is lower. Participants are eligible to receive
loans for a maximum of five years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Participants in the zero interest loan
program incur an obligation to repay the loan upon completion of a
postsecondary education program or five years after they first receive
a loan under this chapter, whichever is earlier.
(2) Participants who fail to complete their postsecondary education
program must repay their loan beginning no later than five years after
they first receive the loan.
(3) The minimum payment shall be set by the board. The maximum
period for repayment shall be ten years, with payments of principal
accruing quarterly commencing six months from the date the participant
completes or discontinues the course of study. Provisions for deferral
of payment shall be determined by the board.
(4) The board is responsible for collection of repayments made
under this section and shall exercise due diligence in such collection,
maintaining all necessary records to ensure that maximum repayments are
made. Collection and servicing of repayments under this section shall
be pursued using the full extent of the law, including wage garnishment
if necessary.
(5) Receipts from the payment of principal or any other subsidies
to which the board as administrator is entitled, which are paid by or
on behalf of participants under this section, shall be deposited in the
zero interest loan account and shall be used to cover the costs of
granting the loans, maintaining necessary records, and making
collections under subsection (4) of this section. The board shall
maintain accurate records of these costs, and all receipts beyond those
necessary to pay such costs shall be used to grant loans to eligible
students.
(6) The board shall adopt rules to define the terms of repayment,
including fees and deferments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The zero interest loan account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures of funds from the account. The account is
not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW except for
moneys used for program administration.
(2) The board shall deposit in the account all moneys received for
the program. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds
appropriated by the legislature for the zero interest loan program,
private contributions to the program, and receipts from participant
repayments.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for zero
interest loans to participants in the program established by this
chapter and costs associated with program administration by the board.
(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the
authorization of the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---