BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Eligible teacher" means an individual currently employed as a
teacher in a Washington public school district and eligible for
national board certification candidacy from the national board for
professional teaching standards.
(2) "National board certification" means certification from the
national board for professional teaching standards.
(3) "Participant" means an eligible teacher who has received a zero
interest loan under this chapter.
(4) "Program" means the zero interest loans to obtain national
board certification program.
(5) "Superintendent" means the office of the superintendent of
public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The zero interest loans to obtain national
board certification program is established. The program shall be
administered by the superintendent. In administering the program, the
superintendent shall:
(1) Select eligible teachers to receive loans;
(2) Adopt necessary rules and guidelines;
(3) Publicize the program;
(4) Collect and manage repayments from eligible teachers; and
(5) Solicit and accept grants and donations from public and private
sources for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The superintendent shall design the program
based on the following parameters:
(1) Loans shall be made to eligible teachers currently teaching in
a Washington public school district.
(2) Zero interest loans are not intended to supplant any grant,
scholarship, or tax program related to national board certification.
If the superintendent finds that zero interest loans supplant or reduce
any grant, scholarship, or tax program for categories of eligible
teachers, then the superintendent shall adjust the amount of the loan
to the level necessary to avoid supplanting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The superintendent may provide zero interest
loans to eligible teachers from the funds appropriated to the
superintendent for this purpose, or from any private donations, or any
other funds given to the superintendent for this program. The amount
loaned to an individual may not exceed the amount of the national board
certification application fee. Participants are eligible to receive
additional zero interest loans to cover national board certification
retake fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Participants in the program incur an
obligation to repay the loan upon completion of the national board
certification program or two years after they receive a loan under this
chapter, whichever is earlier.
(2) Participants who fail to complete the program must repay their
loan beginning no later than two years after they first received the
loan.
(3) The minimum payment shall be set by the superintendent. The
maximum period for repayment shall be ten years, with payments of
principal and interest accruing quarterly commencing six months from
the date the participant completes or discontinues the program.
Provisions for deferral of payment shall be determined by the
superintendent.
(4) The superintendent is responsible for collection of repayments
made under this section and shall exercise due diligence in such
collection, maintaining all necessary records to ensure that maximum
repayments are made. Collection and servicing of repayments under this
section shall be pursued using the full extent of the law, including
wage garnishment if necessary.
(5) Receipts from the payment of principal or any other subsidies
to which the superintendent as administrator is entitled, which are
paid by or on behalf of participants under this section, shall be
deposited in the zero interest loans for national board certification
account and shall be used to cover the costs of granting the loans,
maintaining necessary records, and making collections under subsection
(4) of this section. The superintendent shall maintain accurate
records of these costs, and all receipts beyond those necessary to pay
such costs shall be used to grant loans to eligible teachers.
(6) The superintendent shall adopt rules to define the terms of
repayment, including fees and deferments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The zero interest loans for national
board certification account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. An appropriation is not required for expenditures of funds
from the account. The account is not subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW except for moneys used for program
administration.
(2) The superintendent shall deposit in the account all moneys
received for the program. The account shall be self-sustaining and
consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for the program,
private contributions to the program, and receipts from participant
repayments.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for zero
interest loans to participants in the program and costs associated with
program administration by the superintendent.
(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the
authorization of the superintendent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

--- END ---