BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the state of Washington has an
affirmative duty to protect, manage, and conserve public natural
resources such as the state's animal and plant life, and must take this
public trust into account when making decisions with respect to natural
resource-related policies and actions. Property rights in wild fish
and animals are vested in the state for the benefit of all the people
and the regulation of natural resources must be for the common good.
The paramount interest of the public is retained by the state to
protect the public's rights to natural resource use.
The legislature further finds that while the state's general
obligation is to act for the benefit of the public, the state's most
fundamental specific obligation is to act as a trustee for all public
natural resources. The principles cited in this section must be
supported by every level of government and may not be abridged by any
governmental action. The goal of the state must be to ensure the wise
and prudent management and long-term protection of each of the state's
natural resources through the implementation of comprehensive and
integrated resource management policies and plans. Entities of
government in the state of Washington must act with an undivided duty
of loyalty to all public natural resources.

--- END ---