BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The independent forest and fish science panel is created.
(2) The independent forest and fish science panel is composed of
the following seven members, appointed by the governor:
(a) A fish biologist;
(b) A conservation biologist;
(c) A geomorphologist;
(d) A geologist;
(e) A hydrologist; and
(f) Two persons with substantial experience assessing adaptive
management programs.
(3) Of the initial members appointed to the independent forest and
fish science panel by the governor, two members must serve two-year
terms, two members must serve three-year terms, and three members must
serve four-year terms. Thereafter, members of the panel serve four-
year terms. A member of the panel may serve no more than two full
terms. Vacancies on the panel must be filled in the same manner as the
original appointments.
(4) The purpose of the independent forest and fish science panel is
to provide advice to the commissioner with respect to the adaptive
management program created under this chapter and rules implementing
this chapter. The commissioner may consult with the panel and ask the
panel to review information produced by the adaptive management
program. The panel must be governed by generally accepted guidelines
and practices governing activities of independent science boards such
as the national academy of sciences. The panel must help ensure that
sound science is used in the adaptive management program.

--- END ---