BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.09.030 and 2003 c 39 s 32 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the forest practices board of the state
of Washington as an agency of state government consisting of members as
follows:
(a) The commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's
designee;
(b) ((The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development or the director's designee;
(c) The director of the department of agriculture or the director's
designee;
(d))) The director of the department of ecology or the director's
designee;
(((e))) (c) The director of the department of fish and wildlife or
the director's designee;
(((f))) (d) An elected member of a county legislative authority
appointed by the governor: PROVIDED, That such member's service on the
board shall be conditioned on the member's continued service as an
elected county official; and
(((g) Six)) (e) Seven members of the general public appointed by
the governor, one of whom shall be ((an owner of not more than five
hundred acres of forest land, and)) a fish biologist, one of whom shall
be ((an independent logging contractor)) a wildlife biologist, one of
whom shall be a representative of a landowner or forest products
company that is certified by the forest stewardship council, one of
whom shall be a representative of the tourism and outdoor recreation
industry, one of whom shall be an owner of less than two thousand acres
of forest land, one of whom shall be an owner of more than two thousand
acres of forest land, and one of whom shall be a member of an Indian
tribe with commercial forest land. Members serving on the board on the
effective date of this section must complete their term, and the
governor may reappoint any member who meets the qualifications of this
subsection (1)(e).
(2) The director of the department of fish and wildlife's service
on the board may be terminated two years after August 18, 1999, if the
legislature finds that after two years the department has not made
substantial progress toward integrating the laws, rules, and programs
governing forest practices, chapter 76.09 RCW, and the laws, rules, and
programs governing hydraulic projects, chapter 77.55 RCW. Such a
finding shall be based solely on whether the department of fish and
wildlife makes substantial progress as defined in this subsection, and
will not be based on other actions taken as a member of the board.
Substantial progress shall include recommendations to the legislature
for closer integration of the existing rule-making authorities of the
board and the department of fish and wildlife, and closer integration
of the forest practices and hydraulics permitting processes, including
exploring the potential for a consolidated permitting process. These
recommendations shall be designed to resolve problems currently
associated with the existing dual regulatory and permitting processes.
(3) The members of the ((initial)) board appointed by the governor
shall be appointed so that the term of one member shall expire December
31, ((1975)) 2007, the term of one member shall expire December 31,
((1976)) 2008, the term of one member shall expire December 31,
((1977)) 2009, ((the terms of two members shall expire December 31,
1978,)) and the terms of two members shall expire December 31, ((1979))
2010. Thereafter, each member shall be appointed for a term of four
years. Vacancies on the board shall be filled in the same manner as
the original appointments. Each member of the board shall continue in
office until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. The
commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's designee shall be
the ((chairman)) chair of the board.
(4) The board shall meet at such times and places as shall be
designated by the ((chairman)) chair or upon the written request of the
majority of the board. The principal office of the board shall be at
the state capital.
(5) Members of the board, except public employees and elected
officials, shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250. Each
member shall be entitled to reimbursement for travel expenses incurred
in the performance of their duties as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(6) The board may employ such clerical help and staff pursuant to
chapter 41.06 RCW as is necessary to carry out its duties.

--- END ---