BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that landscape-based
tourism, including scenic driving, trail use, and wildlife watching are
increasingly important contributors to the economic diversity of
Washington's rural areas. According to a 1998 study by the department
of community, trade, and economic development, nearly forty percent of
all tourists who visit Washington planned to visit a state or national
park. Travel spending by these tourists totaled more than ten billion
dollars, creating a payroll of two billion dollars while directly
supporting more than one hundred twenty-four thousand jobs. The
department of fish and wildlife has found that wildlife viewing creates
over twenty-two thousand jobs and contributed over one billion seven
hundred eighty-nine million dollars to Washington's economy.
Over the past ten years a number of state and local highways have
been designated as "scenic" routes to help promote Washington tourism.
Some of these routes go through or are adjacent to commercial forest
lands.
While commercial forests contribute to Washington's economy,
certain forest practices, including large, poorly designed clear-cuts,
mid-slope roads, and slash piles adversely impact the aesthetic quality
of important tourist routes and destinations, including state and
nationally designated scenic highways, gateway communities to Mt.
Rainier national park, highway 101 around the Olympic Peninsula, the
Lewis and Clark highway, and other areas. Recent studies, including
one by an independent panel of landscape aesthetic experts, verify that
forest practices in these areas fall below acceptable regional and
national standards of forest aesthetics and likely are having negative
impacts on the tourist economy and private property values.
Adopting forest practice rules that mitigate aesthetic impacts is
feasible, economical, and in the public interest. Mitigation of scenic
impacts that result from commercial forestry is time tested and widely
practiced in the Pacific Northwest, Canada, Europe, and Australia.
Numerous approaches and tools are available to plan timber harvests
with aesthetic considerations in mind. Many of these practices can be
applied at low cost, and can be done within a framework of large scale
harvests. Additionally, they do not require permanent reserves of
trees. Often only slight modifications of harvest designs or timing
are needed to meet acceptable aesthetic standards.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.09.010 and 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature hereby finds and declares that the forest land
resources are among the most valuable of all resources in the state;
that a viable forest products industry is of prime importance to the
state's economy; that it is in the public interest for public and
private commercial forest lands to be managed consistent with sound
policies of natural resource protection; that coincident with
maintenance of a viable forest products industry, it is important to
afford protection to forest soils, fisheries, wildlife, water quantity
and quality, air quality, recreation, and scenic beauty.
(2) The legislature further finds and declares it to be in the
public interest of this state to create and maintain through the
adoption of this chapter a comprehensive statewide system of laws and
forest practices rules which will achieve the following purposes and
policies:
(a) Afford protection to, promote, foster and encourage timber
growth, and require such minimum reforestation of commercial tree
species on forest lands as will reasonably utilize the timber growing
capacity of the soil following current timber harvest;
(b) Afford protection to forest soils and public resources by
utilizing all reasonable methods of technology in conducting forest
practices;
(c) Recognize both the public and private interest in the
profitable growing and harvesting of timber;
(d) Promote efficiency by permitting maximum operating freedom
consistent with the other purposes and policies stated herein;
(e) Provide for regulation of forest practices so as to avoid
unnecessary duplication in such rules;
(f) Provide for interagency input and intergovernmental and tribal
coordination and cooperation;
(g) Achieve compliance with all applicable requirements of federal
and state law with respect to nonpoint sources of water pollution from
forest practices;
(h) To consider reasonable land use planning goals and concepts
contained in local comprehensive plans and zoning regulations;
(i) Foster cooperation among managers of public resources, forest
landowners, Indian tribes, and the citizens of the state; ((and))
(j) Develop a watershed analysis system that addresses the
cumulative effect of forest practices on, at a minimum, the public
resources of fish, water, and public capital improvements of the state
and its political subdivisions; and
(k) Identify forested areas that are important for the state's
tourism economy where industrial forest practices may impair scenic
resources, and develop forest practice rules that adequately protect
these resources.
(3) The legislature further finds and declares that it is also in
the public interest of the state to encourage forest landowners to
undertake corrective and remedial action to reduce the impact of mass
earth movements and fluvial processes.
(4) The legislature further finds and declares that it is in the
public interest that the applicants for state forest practices permits
should assist in paying for the cost of review and permitting necessary
for the environmental protection of these resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By June 30, 2007, the board shall identify and map areas that
merit increased scenic protection based on their importance to
Washington's tourist and recreational economy. These locations
include, but are not necessarily limited to, topographically visible
areas within a five-mile distance of state and federally designated
scenic highways and byways, scenic waterways, and major recreation
trails. The board shall coordinate with the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of community, trade, and economic development,
the department of transportation, counties, and the public in
identifying, evaluating, and selecting appropriate areas.
(2) By December 31, 2007, the board shall adopt forest practices
rules for all forest practice permits proposed to be conducted on
topographically visible commercial forest lands within selected scenic
areas as set forth in subsection (1) of this section. These rules must
be designed to accomplish the following:
(a) The rules must require landowners owning more than two thousand
acres within the state to conduct a technically verifiable landscape
assessment of their lands that fall within scenic areas mapped by the
department. Multiple forest land parcels exceeding two thousand acres
in total that are owned by corporations or partnerships having fifty
percent or greater control by the same person must be included in these
rules. The landowner must prepare a visual impact mitigation plan
subject to design review and department approval prior to receiving
further harvest permits.
(b) The rules must prescribe a procedure for the department to
evaluate, approve, or reject visual mitigation plans that includes
design review by professional landscape architects with demonstrated
experience in aesthetic forestry.
(c) The rules must prescribe aesthetic forestry techniques that
include, but are not limited to:
(i) Identification of key viewpoints, view angles, and focal views;
(ii) Keeping harvest unit size within a scale appropriate to local
conditions;
(iii) Use of naturally shaped harvest unit boundaries that
harmonize with the natural topography of the surrounding landscape;
(iv) Designing new harvest units that balance and interlock with
nearby recovering and mature forest stands;
(v) Avoiding creation of strongly geometric harvest unit shapes;
(vi) Varying the density and spacing of leave trees within harvest
units to mimic naturally disturbed stands;
(vii) Minimizing the visual impact of roads by avoiding exposed
mid-slope cuts and fills;
(viii) Minimizing piling of slash and debris in near foreground
views;
(ix) Feathering the density of leave trees at the edges of harvest
units;
(x) Temporarily retaining buffers to maintain visual integrity
until harvest areas recover; and
(xi) Avoiding cumulative aesthetic impacts by restricting further
clear-cut harvests in a given area until a sufficient area of forest
has visually recovered.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.21C.037 and 1997 c 173 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Decisions pertaining to applications for Class I, II, and III
forest practices, as defined by rule of the forest practices board
under RCW 76.09.050, are not subject to the requirements of RCW
43.21C.030(2)(c) as now or hereafter amended.
(2) When the applicable county, city, or town requires a license in
connection with any proposal involving forest practices (a) on lands
platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter 58.17 RCW, (b) on
lands that have or are being converted to another use, or (c) on lands
which, pursuant to RCW 76.09.070 as now or hereafter amended, are not
to be reforested because of the likelihood of future conversion to
urban development, then the local government, rather than the
department of natural resources, is responsible for any detailed
statement required under RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c).
(3)(a) Those forest practices determined by rule of the forest
practices board to have a potential for a substantial impact on the
environment, and thus to be Class IV practices, require an evaluation
by the department of natural resources as to whether or not a detailed
statement must be prepared pursuant to this chapter. The evaluation
shall be made within ten days from the date the department receives the
application. A Class IV forest practice application must be approved
or disapproved by the department within thirty calendar days from the
date the department receives the application, unless the department
determines that a detailed statement must be made, in which case the
application must be approved or disapproved by the department within
sixty days from the date the department receives the application,
unless the commissioner of public lands, through the promulgation of a
formal order, determines that the process cannot be completed within
such period. This section shall not be construed to prevent any local
or regional governmental entity from determining that a detailed
statement must be prepared for an action regarding a Class IV forest
practice taken by that governmental entity concerning the land on which
forest practices will be conducted.
(b) The provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply to forest
practices that are approved under and in compliance with rules adopted
under section 3 of this act.

--- END ---