BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.51 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each nursing home shall compile and post in a visible and
accessible location of the residential area information about the
number and type of credentialed health care providers who are directly
responsible for resident care during each shift. The information shall
also specify the anticipated ratio of credentialed health care
providers to residents during each shift. The information shall be
adjusted within a reasonable amount of time after each shift has begun
to reflect the actual staffing level and the actual ratio of
credentialed health care providers to residents.
(2) Each nursing home shall compile the monthly averages of the
information listed in subsection (1) of this section by shift and
report it to the department every year at a time and manner prescribed
by the department. In addition, the nursing home shall provide a copy
of the report to any member of the public upon request. The department
shall compile an annual report of the reports that it receives from
each nursing home and make the information available to the public.

--- END ---