BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.805 and 2003 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to qualify for an exemption under this chapter, the
nonprofit organizations, associations, or corporations must satisfy the
conditions in this section.
(2) The property must be used exclusively for the actual operation
of the activity for which exemption is granted, unless otherwise
provided, and does not exceed an amount reasonably necessary for that
purpose, except:
(a) The loan or rental of the property does not subject the
property to tax if:
(i) The rents and donations received for the use of the portion of
the property are reasonable and do not exceed the maintenance and
operation expenses attributable to the portion of the property loaned
or rented; and
(ii) Except for the exemptions under RCW 84.36.030(4), 84.36.037,
and 84.36.060(1) (a) and (b), the property would be exempt from tax if
owned by the organization to which it is loaned or rented;
(b) The use of the property for fund-raising activities does not
subject the property to tax if the fund-raising activities are
consistent with the purposes for which the exemption is granted.
(3) ((The property must be irrevocably dedicated to the purpose for
which exemption has been granted, and on the liquidation, dissolution,
or abandonment by said organization, association, or corporation, said
property will not inure directly or indirectly to the benefit of any
shareholder or individual, except a nonprofit organization,
association, or corporation which too would be entitled to property tax
exemption. This property need not be irrevocably dedicated if it is
leased or rented to those qualified for exemption under this chapter or
RCW 84.36.560 for leased property, but only if under the terms of the
lease or rental agreement the nonprofit organization, association, or
corporation receives the benefit of the exemption.
(4))) The facilities and services must be available to all
regardless of race, color, national origin or ancestry.
(((5))) (4) The organization, association, or corporation must be
duly licensed or certified where such licensing or certification is
required by law or regulation.
(((6))) (5) Property sold to organizations, associations, or
corporations with an option to be repurchased by the seller shall not
qualify for exempt status. This subsection does not apply to property
sold to a nonprofit entity, as defined in RCW 84.36.560(7), by:
(a) A nonprofit as defined in RCW 84.36.800 that is exempt from
income tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code;
(b) A governmental entity established under RCW 35.21.660,
35.21.670, or 35.21.730;
(c) A housing authority created under RCW 35.82.030;
(d) A housing authority meeting the definition in RCW
35.82.210(2)(a); or
(e) A housing authority established under RCW 35.82.300.
(((7))) (6) The department shall have access to its books in order
to determine whether the nonprofit organization, association, or
corporation is exempt from taxes under this chapter.
(((8))) (7) This section does not apply to exemptions granted under
RCW 84.36.020, 84.36.032, 84.36.250, and 84.36.260.

--- END ---