BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The sum of six million one hundred thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the
department of community, trade, and economic development mountains to
Sound greenway project account, created in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of community, trade, and
economic development mountains to Sound greenway project account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the
appropriation in section 1 of this act must be deposited into the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
purposes of projects listed in section 3 of this act. Only the
director of the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2009. Any moneys remaining in
the account on June 30, 2009, must be transferred to the state general
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall expend funds from the department of
community, trade, and economic development mountains to Sound greenway
project account for the purposes of the projects listed in this
section. The department may expend funds for direct project
management. The department may expend more or less funds on each
project than the amounts listed in this section, provided that the
total expenditures do not exceed the funds in the account.
(1) Squak mountain trail upgrades: Improve twenty-two-mile
equestrian and hiking trail network, including multiple bridges, on
state parks and recreation commission and King county lands . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
(2) Tiger mountain trail and trailhead upgrades: Improve seventy-three-mile equestrian/biker/hiker trail system on Washington state
department of natural resources' lands, including multiple bridges,
improve high point trailhead . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
(3) Rattlesnake mountain trailhead and trail: Build a new
trailhead and complete a new ten-mile trail along ridgetop primarily on
Washington state department of natural resources' lands . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
(4) Mailbox peak trail: Build a new trail to the summit to create
a new "Mt. Si trail" type opportunity on Washington state department of
natural resources' land . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
(5) Middle fork valley access improvements: Improve family and
other user access to this wildland valley forty miles from Seattle.
Priority projects include: Building CCC trailhead and opening of the
bike/equestrian/hiker CCC trail into the middle fork; toilets, signage,
parking, and picnic facilities at access points for kayakers and other
users . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
(6) Greenway site signage for major trailheads and recreation
sites: Create unified system of user and agency information, greenway
history, and directional and safety messages to educate people
concerning proper use and increase identity. Install signage at a
minimum of twenty different sites . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
(7) Mountain bike and equestrian trail network enhancements:
Priorities include: Developing a new forty-plus-mile network in the
south fork Snoqualmie basin (part of state parks and recreation
commission's centennial vision); building a new trailhead; and
upgrading a twelve-plus-mile network on Taylor mountain . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
(8) Greenway legacy planning: Assist greenway land managers (the
Washington state parks and recreation commission, the department of
natural resources, King and Kittitas counties, and the United States
forest service) in creating a cooperative and cost-effective long-range
management plan for the 700,000 acre greenway . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
(9) Snoqualmie Point greenway scenic viewpoint park: Leverage
matching funds from the Gates foundation ($500,000) and federal
highways ($596,000) to complete view promontory, view shelter, and
restroom facilities at a dramatic regional visitor facility on I-90,
managed by the city of Snoqualmie . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of three million nine hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, from the general
fund to the state parks and recreation commission mountains to Sound
greenway project account, created in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The state parks and recreation
commission mountains to Sound greenway project account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the
appropriation in section 4 of this act must be deposited into the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
projects listed in section 6 of this act. Only the director of the
parks and recreation commission or the director's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2009. Any moneys remaining in
the account on June 30, 2009, must be transferred to the state general
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The state parks and recreation commission
shall expend funds from the state parks and recreation commission
mountains to Sound greenway project account to the state parks and
recreation commission for the purposes of the projects listed in this
section. The commission may expend funds for direct project
management. The commission may expend more or less funds on each
project than the amounts listed in this section, provided that the
total expenditures do not exceed the funds in the account.
(1) Upper Kittitas county snopark improvements: Priorities
include: Upgrading the state parks and recreation commission's busiest
winter recreation snopark at Crystal Springs and building a new Cabin
Creek snopark; improving parking; adding sanitation/water; creating
areas for different users; and developing as access for Iron Horse
state park/John Wayne trail . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
(2) Iron Horse state park/John Wayne trail enhancements and access:
Priority projects include: Acquiring twenty-plus-acre rail yard at
south Cle Elum depot for Iron Horse trailhead; creating connection of
Coal Mines and John Wayne trails near Cle Elum; and improving group
campsites, trailheads, parking, water supplies, railings, and trail
tread on Kittitas county portion of this cross-state trail . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
(3) Olallie/Mt. Washington state park enhancements: Improve access
at this state park. Priorities include: Acquiring inholding on Mt.
Washington and upgrading rock climber and hiker route to the summit;
building group camp for Iron Horse users and climbers; and building
picnic shelters, sanitation facilities, and trail upgrades for family
river access . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The sum of five million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the department of
transportation mountains to Sound greenway project account, created in
section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The department of transportation
mountains to Sound greenway project account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from the appropriation in section
7 of this act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for the purposes of projects listed in
section 9 of this act. Only the director of the department of
transportation or the director's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2009. Any moneys remaining in
the account on June 30, 2009, must be transferred to the state general
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The sum of five million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2007, from the department of transportation mountains to Sound
greenway project account to the department of transportation for the
purposes of the projects listed in this section. The department may
expend funds for direct project management. The department may expend
more or less funds on each project than the amounts listed in this
section, provided that the total expenditures do not exceed the funds
in the account.
(1) Protect I-90/state route no. 18 interchange from commercial
development: Acquire unprotected parcels in undeveloped interchange to
protect visual characteristics of the national scenic byway . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(2) City to mountains regional trail gap fund: Finish one of the
four short gaps that remain in the major one hundred mile
city-to-mountains trail for walkers, bicyclists, and horse riders.
Gaps include: (a) High point to Preston; (b) Eastgate; (c) south Lake
Sammamish; and (d) Preston to Snoqualmie. This project relates to the
state parks and recreation commission's centennial vision . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

--- END ---