BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that publicly owned
zoological facilities in Washington serve a public purpose by providing
educational and recreational opportunities for Washington citizens and
spurring economic development in the state. The legislature also finds
that private funds are critical to the survival of publicly owned
zoological facilities. When a public owner of a zoological facility
contracts with a nonprofit corporation to raise private funds through
the management and operations of the facility, additional excise taxes
apply. The legislature intends these nonprofit organizations to pay
the same taxes as other nonprofit artistic and cultural organizations
within the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.4328 and 1985 c 471 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 82.04.4322, 82.04.4324, 82.04.4326,
82.04.4327, 82.08.031, and 82.12.031, the term "artistic or cultural
organization" means an organization which is organized and operated
exclusively for the purpose of providing artistic ((or)), cultural, or
zoological exhibitions, presentations, or performances or cultural
((or)), art, or zoological education programs, as defined in subsection
(2) of this section, for viewing or attendance by the general public.
The organization must be a not-for-profit corporation under chapter
24.03 RCW and managed by a governing board of not less than eight
individuals none of whom is a paid employee of the organization or by
a corporation sole under chapter 24.12 RCW. In addition, to qualify
for deduction or exemption from taxation under RCW 82.04.4322,
82.04.4324, 82.04.4326, 82.04.4327, 82.08.031, and 82.12.031, the
corporation shall satisfy the following conditions:
(a) No part of its income may be paid directly or indirectly to its
members, stockholders, officers, directors, or trustees except in the
form of services rendered by the corporation in accordance with its
purposes and bylaws;
(b) Salary or compensation paid to its officers and executives must
be only for actual services rendered, and at levels comparable to the
salary or compensation of like positions within the state;
(c) Assets of the corporation must be irrevocably dedicated to the
activities for which the exemption is granted and, on the liquidation,
dissolution, or abandonment by the corporation, may not inure directly
or indirectly to the benefit of any member or individual except a
nonprofit organization, association, or corporation which also would be
entitled to the exemption;
(d) The corporation must be duly licensed or certified when
licensing or certification is required by law or regulation;
(e) The amounts received that qualify for exemption must be used
for the activities for which the exemption is granted;
(f) Services must be available regardless of race, color, national
origin, or ancestry; and
(g) The director of revenue shall have access to its books in order
to determine whether the corporation is exempt from taxes.
(2) The term "artistic ((or)), cultural, or zoological exhibitions,
presentations, or performances or cultural ((or)), art, or zoological
education programs" includes and is limited to:
(a) An exhibition or presentation of works of art or objects of
cultural or historical significance, such as those commonly displayed
in art or history museums;
(b) A musical or dramatic performance or series of performances;
((or))
(c) An educational seminar or program, or series of such programs,
offered by the organization to the general public on an artistic,
cultural, or historical subject; or
(d) Exhibits, presentations, performances, or educational programs
provided at a publicly owned zoological facility operated by a
nonprofit organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---