BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.010 and 2003 c 45 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In all competitive examinations, unless otherwise provided in this
section, to determine the qualifications of applicants for public
offices, positions or employment, either the state, and all of its
political subdivisions and all municipal corporations, or private
companies or agencies contracted with by the state to give the
competitive examinations shall give a scoring criteria status to all
veterans as defined in RCW 41.04.007, by adding to the passing mark,
grade or rating only, based upon a possible rating of one hundred
points as perfect a percentage in accordance with the following:
(1) Ten percent to a veteran who served during a period of war or
in an armed conflict as defined in RCW 41.04.005 and does not receive
military retirement. The percentage shall be added to the passing
mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations until the veteran's
first appointment. The percentage shall not be utilized in promotional
examinations;
(2) Five percent to a veteran who did not serve during a period of
war or in an armed conflict as defined in RCW 41.04.005 or is receiving
military retirement. The percentage shall be added to the passing
mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations until the veteran's
first appointment. The percentage shall not be utilized in promotional
examinations;
(3) Five percent to a veteran who was called to active military
service for one or more years from employment with the state or any of
its political subdivisions or municipal corporations. The percentage
shall be added to the first promotional examination only;
(4) All veterans' scoring criteria may be claimed upon release from
active military service.

--- END ---