BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.007 and 2005 c 251 s 1 and 2005 c 216 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
"Veteran" includes every person, who at the time he or she seeks
the benefits of RCW 46.16.30920, 72.36.030, 41.04.010, 73.04.090,
73.04.110, 73.08.010, ((73.08.060,)) 73.08.070, or 73.08.080 has
received an honorable discharge or received a discharge for medical
reasons with an honorable record, where applicable, and who has served
in at least one of the following capacities:
(1) As a member in any branch of the armed forces of the United
States, including the national guard and armed forces reserves, and has
fulfilled his or her initial military service obligation;
(2) As a member of the women's air forces service pilots;
(3) As a member of the armed forces reserves, national guard, or
coast guard, and has been called into federal service by a presidential
select reserve call up for at least one hundred eighty cumulative days;
(4) As a civil service crewmember with service aboard a U.S. army
transport service or U.S. naval transportation service vessel in
oceangoing service from December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946;
(5) As a member of the Philippine armed forces/scouts during the
period of armed conflict from December 7, 1941, through August 15,
1945; or
(6) A United States documented merchant mariner with service aboard
an oceangoing vessel operated by the department of defense, or its
agents, from both June 25, 1950, through July 27, 1953, in Korean
territorial waters and from August 5, 1964, through May 7, 1975, in
Vietnam territorial waters, and who received a military commendation.

--- END ---