BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.381 and 2005 c 390 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall grant special parking privileges to any
person who has a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk
and meets one of the following criteria, as determined by a licensed
physician or an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW:
(a) Cannot walk two hundred feet without stopping to rest;
(b) Is severely limited in ability to walk due to arthritic,
neurological, or orthopedic condition;
(c) ((Is so severely disabled)) Has such a severe disability, that
the person cannot walk without the use of or assistance from a brace,
cane, another person, prosthetic device, wheelchair, or other assistive
device;
(d) Uses portable oxygen;
(e) Is restricted by lung disease to such an extent that forced
expiratory respiratory volume, when measured by spirometry is less than
one liter per second or the arterial oxygen tension is less than sixty
mm/hg on room air at rest;
(f) Impairment by cardiovascular disease or cardiac condition to
the extent that the person's functional limitations are classified as
class III or IV under standards accepted by the American Heart
Association; ((or))
(g) Has a disability resulting from an acute sensitivity to
automobile emissions which limits or impairs the ability to walk. The
personal physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner of the
applicant shall document that the disability is comparable in severity
to the others listed in this subsection; or
(h) Is legally blind.
(2) The applications for parking permits for persons with
disabilities and parking permits for persons with temporary
disabilities are official state documents. Knowingly providing false
information in conjunction with the application is a gross misdemeanor
punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW. The following statement must
appear on each application form immediately below the physician's or
advanced registered nurse practitioner's signature and immediately
below the applicant's signature: "A parking permit for a person with
disabilities may be issued only for a medical necessity that severely
affects mobility (RCW 46.16.381). Knowingly providing false
information on this application is a gross misdemeanor. The penalty is
up to one year in jail and a fine of up to $5,000 or both."
(3) Persons who qualify for special parking privileges are entitled
to receive from the department of licensing a removable windshield
placard bearing the international symbol of access and an individual
serial number, along with a special identification card bearing the
name and date of birth of the person to whom the placard is issued, and
the placard's serial number. The special identification card shall be
issued ((no later than January 1, 2000,)) to all persons who are issued
parking placards, including those issued for temporary disabilities,
and special parking license plates for persons with disabilities. The
department shall design the placard to be displayed when the vehicle is
parked by suspending it from the rearview mirror, or in the absence of
a rearview mirror the card may be displayed on the dashboard of any
vehicle used to transport the person with disabilities. Instead of
regular motor vehicle license plates, persons with disabilities are
entitled to receive special license plates under this section or RCW
46.16.385 bearing the international symbol of access for one vehicle
registered in the name of the person with disabilities. Persons with
disabilities who are not issued the special license plates are entitled
to receive a second special placard upon submitting a written request
to the department. Persons who have been issued the parking privileges
and who are using a vehicle or are riding in a vehicle displaying the
placard or special license plates issued under this section or RCW
46.16.385 may park in places reserved for persons with physical
disabilities. The director shall adopt rules providing for the
issuance of special placards and license plates to public
transportation authorities, nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51
RCW, boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, senior citizen
centers, private nonprofit agencies as defined in chapter 24.03 RCW,
and vehicles registered with the department as cabulances that
regularly transport persons with disabilities who have been determined
eligible for special parking privileges provided under this section.
The director may issue special license plates for a vehicle registered
in the name of the public transportation authority, nursing home,
boarding home, senior citizen center, private nonprofit agency, or
cabulance service if the vehicle is primarily used to transport persons
with disabilities described in this section. Public transportation
authorities, nursing homes, boarding homes, senior citizen centers,
private nonprofit agencies, and cabulance services are responsible for
insuring that the special placards and license plates are not used
improperly and are responsible for all fines and penalties for improper
use.
(4) Whenever the person with disabilities transfers or assigns his
or her interest in the vehicle, the special license plates shall be
removed from the motor vehicle. If another vehicle is acquired by the
person with disabilities and the vehicle owner qualifies for a special
plate, the plate shall be attached to the vehicle, and the director
shall be immediately notified of the transfer of the plate. If another
vehicle is not acquired by the person with disabilities, the removed
plate shall be immediately surrendered to the director.
(5) The special license plate shall be renewed in the same manner
and at the time required for the renewal of regular motor vehicle
license plates under this chapter. No special license plate may be
issued to a person who is temporarily disabled. A person who has a
condition expected to improve within six months may be issued a
temporary placard for a period not to exceed six months. If the
condition exists after six months a new temporary placard shall be
issued upon receipt of a new certification from the person's physician.
The permanent parking placard and identification card of a person with
disabilities shall be renewed at least every five years, as required by
the director, by satisfactory proof of the right to continued use of
the privileges. In the event of the permit holder's death, the parking
placard and identification card must be immediately surrendered to the
department. The department shall match and purge its data base of
parking permits issued to persons with disabilities with available
death record information at least every twelve months.
(6) ((Each person with disabilities who has been issued a permanent
parking permit on or before July 1, 1998, must renew the permit no
later than July 1, 2003, subject to a schedule to be set by the
department, or the permit will expire.
(7))) Additional fees shall not be charged for the issuance of the
special placards or the identification cards. No additional fee may be
charged for the issuance of the special license plates except the
regular motor vehicle registration fee and any other fees and taxes
required to be paid upon registration of a motor vehicle.
(((8))) (7) Any unauthorized use of the special placard, special
license plate issued under this section or RCW 46.16.385, or
identification card is a traffic infraction with a monetary penalty of
two hundred fifty dollars.
(((9))) (8) It is a parking infraction, with a monetary penalty of
two hundred fifty dollars for a person to make inaccessible the access
aisle located next to a space reserved for persons with physical
disabilities. The clerk of the court shall report all violations
related to this subsection to the department.
(((10))) (9) It is a parking infraction, with a monetary penalty of
two hundred fifty dollars for any person to park a vehicle in a parking
place provided on private property without charge or on public property
reserved for persons with physical disabilities without a placard or
special license plate issued under this section or RCW 46.16.385. If
a person is charged with a violation, the person shall not be
determined to have committed an infraction if the person produces in
court or before the court appearance the placard or special license
plate issued under this section or RCW 46.16.385 required under this
section. A local jurisdiction providing nonmetered, on-street parking
places reserved for persons with physical disabilities may impose by
ordinance time restrictions of no less than four hours on the use of
these parking places. A local jurisdiction may impose by ordinance
time restrictions of no less than four hours on the use of nonreserved,
on-street parking spaces by vehicles displaying the special parking
placards or special license plates issued under this section or RCW
46.16.385. All time restrictions must be clearly posted.
(((11))) (10) The penalties imposed under subsections (8) and (9)
((and (10))) of this section shall be used by that local jurisdiction
exclusively for law enforcement. The court may also impose an
additional penalty sufficient to reimburse the local jurisdiction for
any costs it may have incurred in removal and storage of the improperly
parked vehicle.
(((12))) (11) Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section,
it is a traffic infraction with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty
dollars for any person willfully to obtain a special license plate
issued under this section or RCW 46.16.385, placard, or identification
card in a manner other than that established under this section.
(((13))) (12)(a) A law enforcement agency authorized to enforce
parking laws may appoint volunteers, with a limited commission, to
issue notices of infractions for violations of this section or RCW
46.61.581. Volunteers must be at least twenty-one years of age. The
law enforcement agency appointing volunteers may establish any other
qualifications the agency deems desirable.
(b) An agency appointing volunteers under this section must provide
training to the volunteers before authorizing them to issue notices of
infractions.
(c) A notice of infraction issued by a volunteer appointed under
this subsection has the same force and effect as a notice of infraction
issued by a police officer for the same offense.
(d) A police officer or a volunteer may request a person to show
the person's identification card or special parking placard when
investigating the possibility of a violation of this section. If the
request is refused, the person in charge of the vehicle may be issued
a notice of infraction for a violation of this section.
(((14))) (13) For second or subsequent violations of this section,
in addition to a monetary fine, the violator must complete a minimum of
forty hours of:
(a) Community restitution for a nonprofit organization that serves
persons having disabilities or disabling diseases; or
(b) Any other community restitution that may sensitize the violator
to the needs and obstacles faced by persons who have disabilities.
(((15))) (14) The court may not suspend more than one-half of any
fine imposed under subsection (((8))) (7), (((9))) (8), (((10))) (9),
or (((12))) (11) of this section.
(15) For the purposes of this section, "legally blind" means a
person who: (a) Has no vision or whose vision with corrective lenses
is so limited that the individual requires alternative methods or
skills to do efficiently those things that are ordinarily done with
sight by individuals with normal vision; or (b) has an eye condition of
a progressive nature which may lead to blindness.

--- END ---