BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
An agency must allow an employee who is a volunteer fire fighter to
respond to a fire or natural disaster when called to duty. The agency
shall continue to pay the employee's salary, without loss of seniority,
benefits, annual leave, or sick leave.

--- END ---