BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.04.320 and 1998 c 162 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of payment of contributions, "wages" means the
remuneration paid by one employer during any calendar year to an
individual in its employment under this title or the unemployment
compensation law of any other state in the amount specified in RCW
50.24.010. If an employer (hereinafter referred to as a successor
employer) during any calendar year acquires substantially all the
operating assets of another employer (hereinafter referred to as a
predecessor employer) or assets used in a separate unit of a trade or
business of a predecessor employer, and immediately after the
acquisition employs in the individual's trade or business an individual
who immediately before the acquisition was employed in the trade or
business of the predecessor employer, then, for the purposes of
determining the amount of remuneration paid by the successor employer
to the individual during the calendar year which is subject to
contributions, any remuneration paid to the individual by the
predecessor employer during that calendar year and before the
acquisition shall be considered as having been paid by the successor
employer.
(2) For the purpose of payment of benefits, "wages" means the
remuneration paid by one or more employers to an individual for
employment under this title during his base year: PROVIDED, That at
the request of a claimant, wages may be calculated on the basis of
remuneration payable. The department shall notify each claimant that
wages are calculated on the basis of remuneration paid, but at the
claimant's request a redetermination may be performed and based on
remuneration payable.
(3) For the purpose of payment of benefits and payment of
contributions, the term "wages" includes tips which are received after
January 1, 1987, while performing services which constitute employment,
and which are reported to the employer for federal income tax purposes.
(4)(a) "Remuneration" means all compensation paid for personal
services including commissions and bonuses and the cash value of all
compensation paid in any medium other than cash. The reasonable cash
value of compensation paid in any medium other than cash and the
reasonable value of gratuities shall be estimated and determined in
accordance with rules prescribed by the commissioner. Remuneration
does not include payments to members of a reserve component of the
armed forces of the United States, including the organized militia of
the state of Washington, for the performance of duty for periods not
exceeding seventy-two hours at a time. Remuneration also does not
include any stipend of one hundred dollars per week or less, up to a
maximum of six hundred dollars a year provided to a person involved in
performances sponsored by a business whose North American industry
classification code is within "711110," "711120," "711130," or "712110"
and which business employs no more than three employees paid for their
services performed in the same calendar year.
(b) Previously accrued compensation, other than severance pay or
payments received pursuant to plant closure agreements, when assigned
to a specific period of time by virtue of a collective bargaining
agreement, individual employment contract, customary trade practice, or
request of the individual compensated, shall be considered remuneration
for the period to which it is assigned. Assignment clearly occurs when
the compensation serves to make the individual eligible for all regular
fringe benefits for the period to which the compensation is assigned.
(c) Settlements or other proceeds received by an individual as a
result of a negotiated settlement for termination of an individual
written employment contract prior to its expiration date shall be
considered remuneration. The proceeds shall be deemed assigned in the
same intervals and in the same amount for each interval as compensation
was allocated under the contract.
(d) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the provisions of
this subsection (4) pertaining to the assignment of previously accrued
compensation shall not apply to individuals subject to RCW 50.44.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The term "stipend" as used in this title means reimbursement for
expenses incurred as a result of participating in performances
sponsored by a business whose North American industry classification
code is within "711110," "711120," "711130," or "712110." The expenses
for which reimbursement is appropriate include, but are not limited to,
child care, mileage, and meals.

--- END ---