BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2005 c 518 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($242,170,000))
$254,189,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($248,575,000))
$258,670,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($490,745,000))
$512,819,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) A maximum of $796,000 of this fiscal year 2006 appropriation
and a maximum of $812,000 of the fiscal year 2007 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(3) $5,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $5,000 of the
fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided solely for the
transportation of students enrolled in "choice" programs.
Transportation shall be limited to low-income students who are
transferring to "choice" programs solely for educational reasons.
(4) Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on
reimbursement rates of $41.51 per weighted mile in the 2005-06 school
year and $42.01 per weighted mile in the 2006-07 school year exclusive
of salary and benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act.
Allocations for transportation of students transported more than one
radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as determined by
superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based
on the number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five
living within one radius mile of their assigned school multiplied by
the per mile reimbursement rate for the school year multiplied by 1.29.
(5) For busses purchased between July 1, 2005, and June 30, 2007,
the office of superintendent of public instruction shall provide
reimbursement funding to a school district only after the
superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was
purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or
a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote
based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195. The competitive specifications shall meet
federal motor vehicle safety standards, minimum state specifications as
established by rule by the superintendent, and supported options as
determined by the superintendent in consultation with the regional
transportation coordinators of the educational service districts.
(6) Beginning with the 2005-06 school year, the superintendent of
public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district
buses on the five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate
category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the
depreciation payment shall be based on the current state price. The
superintendent may include a weighting or other adjustment factor in
the averaging formula to ease the transition from the current-price
depreciation system to the average depreciation system. Prior to
making any depreciation payment in the 2005-06 school year, the
superintendent shall notify the office of financial management and the
fiscal committees of the legislature of the specific depreciation
formula to be used. The replacement cost shall be based on the lowest
bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year. A maximum of
$50,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation may be expended for
software programming costs associated with the implementation of this
subsection.
(7) In addition to the allocations for transportation of students
in subsection (4) of this section, school districts shall be allocated
$3.05 per weighted mile in the 2005-06 school year and $1.79 per
weighted mile in the 2006-07 school year exclusive of salary and
benefit adjustments provided in section 504, chapter 518, Laws of 2005.
The total amount allocated pursuant to this subsection shall be limited
to $22,114,000 for the 2005-2007 biennium.

--- END ---