BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In order to promote the use of renewable
fuels in Washington it is the intent of the legislature that part and
service modifications necessary to allow motor vehicles to use high
concentrations of biodiesel fuel or ethanol fuel should not be subject
to sales and use tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied under this chapter does not apply to the sale of
parts and services necessary to modify motor vehicles to use fuel
concentrations greater than eighty-five percent biodiesel fuel or
ethanol fuel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of parts and services necessary to modify motor vehicles to use fuel
concentrations greater than eighty-five percent biodiesel fuel or
ethanol fuel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---