BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW
to read as follows:
No concurrence communication from the governor to the United States
secretary of the interior regarding gaming on lands acquired by the
secretary in trust for the benefit of an Indian tribe after October 17,
1988, in any federal proceeding requiring the governor to concur in the
secretary's determination as to those lands shall be made unless
specifically authorized by a sixty percent vote of both houses of the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---