BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.182.170 and 2005 c 342 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A victim of identity theft who has submitted a valid police
report to a consumer reporting agency may elect to place a security
freeze on his or her report by making a request in writing by certified
mail to a consumer reporting agency. "Security freeze" means a notice
placed in a consumer's credit report, at the request of the consumer
and subject to certain exceptions, that prohibits the consumer
reporting agency from releasing the consumer's credit report or any
information from it without the express authorization of the consumer.
If a security freeze is in place, information from a consumer's credit
report may not be released to a third party without prior express
authorization from the consumer. This subsection does not prevent a
consumer reporting agency from advising a third party that a security
freeze is in effect with respect to the consumer's credit report.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 19.182.180 through
19.182.210, a "victim of identity theft" means:
(a) A victim of identity theft as defined in RCW 9.35.020; or
(b) A person who has been notified by an agency, person, or
business that owns or licenses computerized data of a breach in a
computerized data system which has resulted in the acquisition of that
person's unencrypted personal information by an unauthorized person or
entity.
(3) A consumer reporting agency shall place a security freeze on a
consumer's credit report no later than five business days
after receiving a written request from the consumer.
(4) The consumer reporting agency shall send a written confirmation
of the security freeze to the consumer within ten business days and
shall provide the consumer with a unique personal identification number
or password to be used by the consumer when providing authorization for
the release of his or her credit report for a specific party or period
of time.
(5) If the consumer wishes to allow his or her credit report to be
accessed for a specific party or period of time while a freeze is in
place, he or she shall contact the consumer reporting agency, request
that the freeze be temporarily lifted, and provide the following:
(a) Proper identification, which means that information generally
deemed sufficient to identify a person. Only if the consumer is unable
to sufficiently identify himself or herself, may a consumer reporting
agency require additional information concerning the consumer's
employment and personal or family history in order to verify his or her
identity;
(b) The unique personal identification number or password provided
by the credit reporting agency under subsection (4) of this section;
and
(c) The proper information regarding the third party who is to
receive the credit report or the time period for which the report is
available to users of the credit report.
(6) A consumer reporting agency that receives a request from a
consumer to temporarily lift a freeze on a credit report under
subsection (5) of this section, shall comply with the request no later
than three business days after receiving the request.
(7) A consumer reporting agency may develop procedures involving
the use of telephone, fax, the internet, or other electronic media to
receive and process a request from a consumer to temporarily lift a
freeze on a credit report under subsection (5) of this section in an
expedited manner.
(8) A consumer reporting agency shall remove or temporarily lift a
freeze placed on a consumer's credit report only in the following
cases:
(a) Upon consumer request, under subsection (5) or (11) of this
section; or
(b) When the consumer's credit report was frozen due to a material
misrepresentation of fact by the consumer. When a consumer reporting
agency intends to remove a freeze upon a consumer's credit report under
this subsection, the consumer reporting agency shall notify the
consumer in writing prior to removing the freeze on the consumer's
credit report.
(9) When a third party requests access to a consumer credit report
on which a security freeze is in effect, and this request is in
connection with an application for credit or any other use, and the
consumer does not allow his or her credit report to be accessed for
that specific party or period of time, the third party may treat the
application as incomplete.
(10) When a consumer requests a security freeze, the consumer
reporting agency shall disclose the process of placing and temporarily
lifting a freeze, and the process for allowing access to information
from the consumer's credit report for a specific party or period of
time while the freeze is in place.
(11) A security freeze remains in place until the consumer requests
that the security freeze be removed. A consumer reporting agency shall
remove a security freeze within three business days of receiving a
request for removal from the consumer, who provides both of the
following:
(a) Proper identification, as defined in subsection (5)(a) of this
section; and
(b) The unique personal identification number or password provided
by the consumer reporting agency under subsection (4) of this section.
(12) This section does not apply to the use of a consumer credit
report by any of the following:
(a) A person or entity, or a subsidiary, affiliate, or agent of
that person or entity, or an assignee of a financial obligation owing
by the consumer to that person or entity, or a prospective assignee of
a financial obligation owing by the consumer to that person or entity
in conjunction with the proposed purchase of the financial obligation,
with which the consumer has or had prior to assignment an account or
contract, including a demand deposit account, or to whom the consumer
issued a negotiable instrument, for the purposes of reviewing the
account or collecting the financial obligation owing for the account,
contract, or negotiable instrument. For purposes of this subsection,
"reviewing the account" includes activities related to account
maintenance, monitoring, credit line increases, and account upgrades
and enhancements;
(b) A subsidiary, affiliate, agent, assignee, or prospective
assignee of a person to whom access has been granted under subsection
(5) of this section for purposes of facilitating the extension of
credit or other permissible use;
(c) Any federal, state, or local entity, including a law
enforcement agency, court, or their agents or assigns;
(d) A private collection agency acting under a court order,
warrant, or subpoena;
(e) A child support agency acting under Title IV-D of the social
security act (42 U.S.C. et seq.);
(f) The department of social and health services acting to fulfill
any of its statutory responsibilities;
(g) The internal revenue service acting to investigate or collect
delinquent taxes or unpaid court orders or to fulfill any of its other
statutory responsibilities;
(h) The use of credit information for the purposes of prescreening
as provided for by the federal fair credit reporting act;
(i) Any person or entity administering a credit file monitoring
subscription service to which the consumer has subscribed; ((and))
(j) Any person or entity for the purpose of providing a consumer
with a copy of his or her credit report upon the consumer's request;
(k) An insurance company authorized to do business in Washington
state; and
(l) A mortgage broker licensed and regulated by the department of
financial institutions.

--- END ---