BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that for a variety of
reasons, many citizens may lack the basic financial knowledge necessary
to spend their money wisely, save for the future, and manage money
challenges, such as a job loss, financing a college education, or a
catastrophic injury. The legislature also finds that financial
literacy is an essential element in achieving financial stability and
self-sufficiency. The legislature intends to encourage participation
in financial literacy activities by WorkFirst participants, in order to
promote their ability to make financial decisions that will contribute
to their long-term financial well-being.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.08A.250 and 2000 c 10 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this
chapter, "work activity" means:
(1) Unsubsidized paid employment in the private or public sector;
(2) Subsidized paid employment in the private or public sector,
including employment through the state or federal work-study program
for a period not to exceed twenty-four months;
(3) Work experience, including:
(a) An internship or practicum, that is paid or unpaid and is
required to complete a course of vocational training or to obtain a
license or certificate in a high demand field, as determined by the
employment security department. No internship or practicum shall
exceed twelve months; or
(b) Work associated with the refurbishing of publicly assisted
housing, if sufficient paid employment is not available;
(4) On-the-job training;
(5) Job search and job readiness assistance;
(6) Community service programs;
(7) Vocational educational training, not to exceed twelve months
with respect to any individual;
(8) Job skills training directly related to employment;
(9) Education directly related to employment, in the case of a
recipient who has not received a high school diploma or a GED;
(10) Satisfactory attendance at secondary school or in a course of
study leading to a GED, in the case of a recipient who has not
completed secondary school or received such a certificate;
(11) The provision of child care services to an individual who is
participating in a community service program;
(12) Internships, that shall be paid or unpaid work experience
performed by an intern in a business, industry, or government or
nongovernmental agency setting;
(13) Practicums, which include any educational program in which a
student is working under the close supervision of a professional in an
agency, clinic, or other professional practice setting for purposes of
advancing their skills and knowledge; ((and))
(14) Services required by the recipient under RCW 74.08.025(3) and
74.08A.010(3) to become employable; and
(15) Financial literacy activities designed to be effective in
assisting a recipient in becoming self-sufficient and financially
stable.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.08A.260 and 2003 c 383 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each recipient shall be assessed after determination of program
eligibility and before referral to job search. Assessments shall be
based upon factors that are critical to obtaining employment, including
but not limited to education, availability of child care, history of
family violence, history of substance abuse, and other factors that
affect the ability to obtain employment. Assessments may be performed
by the department or by a contracted entity. The assessment shall be
based on a uniform, consistent, transferable format that will be
accepted by all agencies and organizations serving the recipient.
Based on the assessment, an individual responsibility plan shall be
prepared that: (a) Sets forth an employment goal and a plan for moving
the recipient immediately into employment; (b) contains the obligation
of the recipient to become and remain employed; (c) moves the recipient
into whatever employment the recipient is capable of handling as
quickly as possible; and (d) describes the services available to the
recipient to enable the recipient to obtain and keep employment.
(2) Recipients who are not engaged in work and work activities, and
do not qualify for a good cause exemption under RCW 74.08A.270, shall
engage in self-directed service as provided in RCW 74.08A.330.
(3) If a recipient refuses to engage in work and work activities
required by the department, the family's grant shall be reduced by the
recipient's share, and may, if the department determines it
appropriate, be terminated.
(4) The department may waive the penalties required under
subsection (3) of this section, subject to a finding that the recipient
refused to engage in work for good cause provided in RCW 74.08A.270.
(5) In implementing this section, the department shall assign the
highest priority to the most employable clients, including adults in
two-parent families and parents in single-parent families that include
older preschool or school-age children to be engaged in work
activities.
(6) In consultation with the recipient, the department or
contractor shall place the recipient into a work activity that is
available in the local area where the recipient resides.
(7) Assessments conducted under this section shall include a
consideration of the potential benefit to the recipient of engaging in
financial literacy activities or courses. The department shall
consider the options for financial literacy activities available in the
community, including information and resources available through the
financial literacy public-private partnership created under RCW
28A.300.450, and may authorize up to ten hours of financial literacy
activities as a core activity or an optional activity under WorkFirst.

--- END ---