BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a systematic
assessment of the best available scientific and medical evidence and
timely application of this evidence to informed coverage and medical
necessity decisions by state purchased health care programs should
result in improved access, prevention, and health outcomes for
Washington citizens. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to
support the establishment by the state of an evidence-based health
technology assessment program that:
(1) Conducts systematic reviews of scientific and medical
literature to identify safe, efficacious, and cost-effective
treatments;
(2) Provides for the establishment of a statewide health technology
clinical advisory committee;
(3) Provides for the establishment of an evidence-based health
technology assessment center;
(4) Develops methods and processes to track health outcomes across
state agencies; and
(5) Provides clear and transparent access to the scientific basis
of coverage decisions and treatment guidelines developed under this
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Best available scientific and medical evidence" means the best
available external clinical evidence derived from systematic research.
(2) "Coverage decision" means a determination regarding including
or excluding a health technology as a covered benefit, and if covered,
under what circumstances.
(3) "Health technology" means a medical device, surgical and other
procedures, medical equipment, diagnostic tests, and other health care
services.
(4) "Medical necessity decision" or "proper and necessary decision"
means a determination whether or not to provide reimbursement for a
covered health technology in a specific circumstance for an individual
patient who is eligible to receive health care services from the state
purchased health care program making the decision.
(5) "Treatment guideline" means an evidence-based set of explicit
clinical recommendations for the appropriate application and use of a
covered health technology for an individual circumstance, and developed
or adopted by the health technology assessment program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each agency administering a state purchased health care program
as defined in RCW 41.05.011(2) shall, in cooperation with other
agencies, take action to prevent the application of health technologies
where scientific and medical evidence suggests little or no benefit or
possible harm, and to enhance the use of health technologies where
evidence suggests substantial benefits. To accomplish this purpose,
participating agencies may establish an evidence-based health
technology assessment program. The provisions of the health technology
assessment program do not apply to agency health technology decisions
that have not been reviewed by the health technology clinical advisory
committee and adopted by the agencies.
(2) In developing the evidence-based health technology assessment
program, agencies, to the extent permitted under federal and state law
governing each agency:
(a) Shall use the best available scientific and medical evidence to
make coverage and medical necessity decisions and shall develop the
resources necessary to collect and analyze the available scientific and
medical evidence regarding a medical technology under review, including
coordinating efforts with the evidence-based health technology
assessment center in section 4 of this act;
(b) Shall develop and implement uniform policies for a health
technology assessment as provided in RCW 41.05.013, including
development of common coverage decisions and treatment guidelines;
(c) May develop treatment guidelines to assist in the appropriate
application of medical necessity or proper and necessary decisions;
(d) May develop criteria for payment of health technologies under
reasonable exceptions, such as experimental or investigational
treatment or services under a clinical investigation approved by an
institutional review board;
(e) May track and share safety, health outcome, and cost data
related to use of health technologies to help inform health technology
decisions;
(f) For decisions related to the use of prescription drugs, shall
develop policies and decisions consistent with RCW 70.14.050; and
(g) Shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.
(3) The agencies shall establish a health technology clinical
advisory committee to make recommendations to the agencies regarding
this act, including the development of treatment guidelines as
appropriate.
(4) The agencies may develop methods to report cost and outcome
performance of the health technology assessment program.
(5) The agencies shall develop a centralized, web-based
communication tool that allows clear and transparent access to the
scientific basis of coverage decisions and treatment guidelines
developed under this program.
(6) The standard of medical necessity or proper and necessary shall
not apply to health technologies that are determined not to be covered
based on the best available scientific evidence.
(7) Appeals by persons or groups of an agency coverage decision or
a medical necessity or proper and necessary decision must demonstrate
that the decision is inconsistent with sound, evidence-based medical
practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An evidence-based health technology assessment center is
established to:
(a) Conduct systematic reviews of the scientific literature
regarding safety, efficacy, and cost-effectiveness; and
(b) Assess the adequacy and quality of systematic reviews
undertaken by other national or internationally recognized health
technology assessment programs using systematic review methods
substantially similar to those developed by the health technology
assessment program.
(2) Completed or received health technology assessments must be
conducted in a timely manner and at the request of the health
technology assessment program.
(3) Requests for the conduct of a new health technology assessment
must be proposed according to explicit prioritization criteria
developed by the health technology assessment program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.14 RCW
to read as follows:
In the conduct of systematic scientific reviews by the
evidence-based health technology assessment center, and in the conduct
of business by the health technology clinical advisory committee, the
health technology assessment program must ensure that conflicts of
interest regarding a specific health technology be minimized and fully
disclosed to the extent possible.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.05.013 and 2005 c 462 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The authority shall coordinate state agency efforts to develop
and implement uniform policies across state purchased health care
programs that will ensure prudent, cost-effective health services
purchasing, maximize efficiencies in administration of state purchased
health care programs, improve the quality of care provided through
state purchased health care programs, and reduce administrative burdens
on health care providers participating in state purchased health care
programs. The policies adopted should be based, to the extent
possible, upon the best available scientific and medical evidence and
shall endeavor to address:
(a) Methods of formal assessment, such as a health technology
assessment under sections 2 through 5 of this act. Consideration of
the best available scientific evidence does not preclude consideration
of experimental or investigational treatment or services under a
clinical investigation approved by an institutional review board;
(b) Monitoring of health outcomes, adverse events, quality, and
cost-effectiveness of health services;
(c) Development of a common definition of medical necessity; and
(d) Exploration of common strategies for disease management and
demand management programs, including asthma, diabetes, heart disease,
and similar common chronic diseases. Strategies to be explored include
individual asthma management plans. On January 1, 2007, and January 1,
2009, the authority shall issue a status report to the legislature
summarizing any results it attains in exploring and coordinating
strategies for asthma, diabetes, heart disease, and other chronic
diseases.
(2) The administrator may invite health care provider
organizations, carriers, other health care purchasers, and consumers to
participate in efforts undertaken under this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section "best available scientific and
medical evidence" means the best available external clinical evidence
derived from systematic research.

--- END ---