BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that
improvements in the quality of health care lead to better health care
outcomes for the residents of Washington state and contain health care
costs. The improvements are facilitated by the adoption of electronic
medical records and other health information technologies.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to encourage all hospitals
in the state of Washington to adopt health information technologies by
the year 2012.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.021 and 2005 c 446 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state health care authority is created within
the executive branch. The authority shall have an administrator
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. The
administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The
administrator may employ up to seven staff members, who shall be exempt
from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are
necessary to administer this chapter. The administrator may delegate
any power or duty vested in him or her by this chapter, including
authority to make final decisions and enter final orders in hearings
conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The primary duties of the authority
shall be to: Administer state employees' insurance benefits and
retired or disabled school employees' insurance benefits; administer
the basic health plan pursuant to chapter 70.47 RCW; study state-purchased health care programs in order to maximize cost containment in
these programs while ensuring access to quality health care; and
implement state initiatives, joint purchasing strategies, and
techniques for efficient administration that have potential application
to all state-purchased health services. The authority's duties
include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To administer health care benefit programs for employees and
retired or disabled school employees as specifically authorized in RCW
41.05.065 and in accordance with the methods described in RCW
41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other provisions of this chapter;
(b) To analyze state-purchased health care programs and to explore
options for cost containment and delivery alternatives for those
programs that are consistent with the purposes of those programs,
including, but not limited to:
(i) Creation of economic incentives for the persons for whom the
state purchases health care to appropriately utilize and purchase
health care services, including the development of flexible benefit
plans to offset increases in individual financial responsibility;
(ii) Utilization of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems,
utilization review, and prospective payment methods, and that ensure
access to quality care, including assuring reasonable access to local
providers, especially for employees residing in rural areas;
(iii) Coordination of state agency efforts to purchase drugs
effectively as provided in RCW 70.14.050;
(iv) Development of recommendations and methods for purchasing
medical equipment and supporting services on a volume discount basis;
(v) Development of data systems to obtain utilization data from
state-purchased health care programs in order to identify cost centers,
utilization patterns, provider and hospital practice patterns, and
procedure costs, utilizing the information obtained pursuant to RCW
41.05.031; and
(vi) In collaboration with other state agencies that administer
state purchased health care programs, private health care purchasers,
health care facilities, providers, and carriers((,)):
(A) Use evidence-based medicine principles to develop common
performance measures and implement financial incentives in contracts
with insuring entities, health care facilities, and providers that:
(((A))) (I) Reward improvements in health outcomes for individuals
with chronic diseases, increased utilization of appropriate preventive
health services, and reductions in medical errors; and
(((B))) (II) Increase, through appropriate incentives to insuring
entities, health care facilities, and providers, the adoption and use
of information technology that contributes to improved health outcomes,
better coordination of care, and decreased medical errors;
(B) Through state health purchasing, reimbursement, or pilot
strategies, promote and increase the adoption of health information
technology systems, including electronic medical records, by hospitals
as defined in RCW 70.41.020(4), that:
(I) Facilitate diagnosis or treatment;
(II) Reduce unnecessary duplication of medical tests;
(III) Promote efficient electronic physician order entry;
(IV) Increase access to health information for consumers and their
providers; and
(V) Improve health outcomes;
(C) Coordinate a strategy for the adoption of health information
technology systems using the final health information technology report
and recommendations developed under chapter 261, Laws of 2005.
(c) To analyze areas of public and private health care interaction;
(d) To provide information and technical and administrative
assistance to the board;
(e) To review and approve or deny applications from counties,
municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state to
provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to their
employees in accordance with the provisions of RCW 41.04.205, setting
the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined in RCW
41.05.050;
(f) To establish billing procedures and collect funds from school
districts ((and educational service districts under RCW 28A.400.400))
in a way that minimizes the administrative burden on districts;
(g) To publish and distribute to nonparticipating school districts
and educational service districts by October 1st of each year a
description of health care benefit plans available through the
authority and the estimated cost if school districts and educational
service district employees were enrolled; ((and))
(h) To apply for, receive, and accept grants, gifts, and other
payments, including property and service, from any governmental or
other public or private entity or person, and make arrangements as to
the use of these receipts to implement initiatives and strategies
developed under this section; and
(i) To promulgate and adopt rules consistent with this chapter as
described in RCW 41.05.160.
(2) On and after January 1, 1996, the public employees' benefits
board may implement strategies to promote managed competition among
employee health benefit plans. Strategies may include but are not
limited to:
(a) Standardizing the benefit package;
(b) Soliciting competitive bids for the benefit package;
(c) Limiting the state's contribution to a percent of the lowest
priced qualified plan within a geographical area;
(d) Monitoring the impact of the approach under this subsection
with regards to: Efficiencies in health service delivery, cost shifts
to subscribers, access to and choice of managed care plans statewide,
and quality of health services. The health care authority shall also
advise on the value of administering a benchmark employer-managed plan
to promote competition among managed care plans.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.05.075 and 2005 c 446 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The administrator shall provide benefit plans designed by the
board through a contract or contracts with insuring entities, through
self-funding, self-insurance, or other methods of providing insurance
coverage authorized by RCW 41.05.140.
(2) The administrator shall establish a contract bidding process
that:
(a) Encourages competition among insuring entities;
(b) Maintains an equitable relationship between premiums charged
for similar benefits and between risk pools including premiums charged
for retired state and school district employees under the separate risk
pools established by RCW 41.05.022 and 41.05.080 such that insuring
entities may not avoid risk when establishing the premium rates for
retirees eligible for medicare;
(c) Is timely to the state budgetary process; and
(d) Sets conditions for awarding contracts to any insuring entity.
(3) The administrator shall establish a requirement for review of
utilization and financial data from participating insuring entities on
a quarterly basis.
(4) The administrator shall centralize the enrollment files for all
employee and retired or disabled school employee health plans offered
under chapter 41.05 RCW and develop enrollment demographics on a plan-specific basis.
(5) All claims data shall be the property of the state. The
administrator may require of any insuring entity that submits a bid to
contract for coverage all information deemed necessary including:
(a) Subscriber or member demographic and claims data necessary for
risk assessment and adjustment calculations in order to fulfill the
administrator's duties as set forth in this chapter; and
(b) Subscriber or member demographic and claims data necessary to
implement performance measures or financial incentives related to
performance under subsection (7) of this section.
(6) All contracts with insuring entities for the provision of
health care benefits shall provide that the beneficiaries of such
benefit plans may use on an equal participation basis the services of
practitioners licensed pursuant to chapters 18.22, 18.25, 18.32, 18.53,
18.57, 18.71, 18.74, 18.83, and 18.79 RCW, as it applies to registered
nurses and advanced registered nurse practitioners. However, nothing
in this subsection may preclude the administrator from establishing
appropriate utilization controls approved pursuant to RCW 41.05.065(2)
(a), (b), and (d).
(7) The administrator shall, in collaboration with other state
agencies that administer state purchased health care programs, private
health care purchasers, health care facilities, providers, and
carriers((,)):
(a) Use evidence-based medicine principles to develop common
performance measures and implement financial incentives in contracts
with insuring entities, health care facilities, and providers that:
(((a))) (i) Reward improvements in health outcomes for individuals
with chronic diseases, increased utilization of appropriate preventive
health services, and reductions in medical errors; and
(((b))) (ii) Increase, through appropriate incentives to insuring
entities, health care facilities, and providers, the adoption and use
of information technology that contributes to improved health outcomes,
better coordination of care, and decreased medical errors;
(b) Through state health purchasing, reimbursement, or pilot
strategies, promote and increase the adoption of health information
technology systems, including electronic medical records, by hospitals
as defined in RCW 70.41.020(4), that:
(i) Facilitate diagnosis or treatment;
(ii) Reduce unnecessary duplication of medical tests;
(iii) Promote efficient electronic physician order entry;
(iv) Increase access to health information for consumers and their
providers; and
(v) Improve health outcomes;
(c) Coordinate a strategy for the adoption of health information
technology systems using the final health information technology report
and recommendations developed under chapter 261, Laws of 2005.

--- END ---