BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that "good time"
should be productive time, especially for those incarcerated in
Washington's criminal justice facilities. The legislature finds that
it is important to the safety of the public and to rehabilitation of
offenders that changes be considered to other programs offered in
prisons and in the community. The legislature further finds that
reforms to sentencing and supervision of offenders returning to the
community may enhance public safety, lower recidivism, and reduce crime
and victimization. Therefore, the legislature intends to create a
joint select committee on offenders programs, sentencing, and
supervision to provide findings and recommendations for the 2007
legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A joint select committee on offenders
programs, sentencing, and supervision is established.
(1) The joint select committee shall consist of the following
persons:
(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate, with at least one member
being a member of the senate human services and corrections committee;
(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, with at least one member being a member of the house
criminal justice and corrections committee;
(c) One member appointed by the governor's office;
(d) The attorney general, or the attorney general's designee;
(e) The secretary of corrections, or the secretary's designee, and
additional corrections representatives as the secretary of corrections
deems appropriate;
(f) A representative of the superior court judges association;
(g) Three members, one who provides mental health treatment, one
who provides alcohol and substance abuse counseling, and one who
provides medical assistance services to offenders. Two of the members
shall be from the department of social and health services and one
member shall be from an outside service provider designated by the
department of social and health services;
(h) One member from the Washington state association of counties;
(i) One member from the association of Washington cities;
(j) Two members representing crime victims, appointed jointly by
the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(k) One member from the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys;
(l) One member from the Washington association of criminal defense
lawyers;
(m) Two faculty members who educate offenders, one of whom educates
incarcerated offenders and one who educates released offenders;
(n) One member from the Washington federation of state employees
representing community corrections officers;
(o) One member from the labor organization representing
correctional officers who work in adult correctional facilities;
(p) One member appointed by the Washington multifamily housing
association;
(q) Two members representing local law enforcement, with one
representing cities and one representing counties;
(r) One member who is an ex-offender;
(s) One member from the sentencing guidelines commission;
(t) One member from a faith-based organization that provides
outreach or services to offenders;
(u) One member from the association of Washington business;
(v) One member from a nonprofit organization providing work force
training to released offenders; and
(w) A member from the Washington state institute for public policy
who conducts research on corrections programs.
(2) The committee shall be cochaired by a legislative member from
the senate and a legislative member from the house of representatives
and shall be elected by the joint select committee.
(3) The joint select committee shall review and make
recommendations regarding:
(a) The type of offender that would benefit most in terms of
personal achievement, responsibility, and community safety, by having
the opportunity to receive enhanced training and education while in
prison;
(b) The types of training and educational programs that would
provide the greatest return on investment with regard to offender
achievement, responsibility, and community;
(c) Changes to the sentencing law and policies related to "good
time" or early release, that would encourage incarcerated offenders to
participate in training and programs that will increase the likelihood
that they will be able to support themselves when they leave prison and
reduce recidivism;
(d) A method for evaluating the return on the investment and
determining from front line department of corrections staff and
community partners, whether the changes are improving personal
responsibility on the part of the offender and reducing crime in the
community; and
(e) Changes to community supervision that would provide greater
safety to the public and incentives for prisons in adhering to
treatment, educational goals, and reducing recidivism.
(4) The joint select committee shall present a report of its
findings and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature, including any proposed legislation, by
November 15, 2006.
(5) The joint select committee may, where feasible, consult with
individuals from the public and private sector in carrying out its
duties under this section.
(6) Nonlegislative members of the joint select committee shall
serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses
as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislative members of the
joint select committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 44.04.120.
(7) The staff from senate committee services and the office of
program research of the house of representatives shall provide support
to the joint select committee.
(8) This section expires December 1, 2006.

--- END ---