BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to add the elements
of (1) substantial improvement and (2) contiguous property ownership to
the common law elements of adverse possession, which are: Actual,
open, notorious, exclusive, hostile, and continuous possession. The
legislature intends that prior to taking property from the true owner,
the adverse possessor must have made substantial improvements upon the
property at issue and such improvements must have remained on the
property for at least ten years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 7.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may acquire title to real property by adverse
possession only if:
(a) The person has maintained actual, open, notorious, exclusive,
hostile, and continuous possession of the property for the period set
forth in RCW 4.16.020;
(b) The person has made or erected substantial improvements upon
the property at issue and such improvements have remained on the
property for at least ten years;
(c) The person owns property that is contiguous to the property at
issue; and
(d) The person proves each of the elements set forth in this
section by clear and convincing evidence.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Contiguous" means property adjoining or touching by common
corner or otherwise.
(b) "Substantial improvement" means a permanent or semipermanent
structure or enclosure for which the adverse possessor obtained a
building permit for the construction of the structure or enclosure.
(3) This section applies to all causes of action commenced on or
after July 1, 2006, regardless of when the cause of action arose. To
this extent, this section applies retroactively, but in all other
respects it applies prospectively.

--- END ---