BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the statewide certificated instructional staff
salary allocations in the state omnibus appropriations act, each school
district shall receive allocations sufficient to fund a salary bonus
equivalent to ten percent of its base pay for eligible certificated
instructional staff who teach in math, science, and/or special
education. To receive the salary bonus, individuals must be deemed an
"expert" to teach math, science, or special education according to
criteria developed and administered by the professional educator
standards board.
(2) In order to receive funding provided under this section, school
districts shall certify to the office of superintendent of public
instruction that they will provide the bonuses to the eligible
certificated instructional staff in the percentage amount specified in
this section and that the funding will not be used to supplant any
other state or local funding for compensation for these staff.
(3) The annual bonus shall be paid in a lump sum amount and shall
not be included in the definition of "earnable compensation" under RCW
41.32.010(10). The amount of the bonus shall be prorated based on a
full-time equivalent basis.
(4) The Washington institute for public policy shall conduct an
examination of the implementation and outcome of the math, science, and
special education bonus program established in this section. The
examination shall include, but is not limited to, a review of the
following impacts: The effect on recruitment and retention of math,
science, and special education teachers on a statewide and school
district basis; the change in experience and other quality indicators
of teaching performance of math, science, and special education
instruction; the cost-effectiveness of the salary bonus program; and
potential changes that would result in more effective math, science,
and special education instruction and cost-effectiveness. The
institute for public policy shall provide a report of its findings to
the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by January
1, 2014.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Eligible certificated instructional staff" means a classroom
teacher spending at least fifty percent of his or her work day in
direct classroom instruction in math and/or science at the middle,
junior, or high school levels, and/or special education at all grade
levels.
(b) "Work day" means the time spent in direct classroom and lab
instruction and/or mentor teaching responsibilities.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the Washington institute
for public policy at The Evergreen State College for the purposes of
section 1(4) of this act.

--- END ---