BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Record numbers of our citizens have been sentenced to prison
over the past two decades, more than ninety percent of whom will be
reentering society.
(2) The successful reentry and reintegration of previously
incarcerated men and women is important to the public safety of the
state of Washington, to the health of our communities, and to the
reduction of the growing costs of the criminal justice system.
(3) A comprehensive reentry program, including the removal of
unreasonable barriers to reentry, offers the best opportunity for
released persons to become productive citizens.
(4) Receipt of a certificate of discharge is critical to a released
person's ultimate reintegration into society and avoidance of
recidivism, including better employability, housing, and the exercise
of civil rights.
(5) It is in the public interest that a person who has satisfied
all incarceration and supervision requirements of his or her sentence
receive a certificate of discharge if he or she has made a good faith
effort to satisfy all legal financial obligations, according to his or
her means, and the legal financial obligations remain enforceable by
all parties as a civil judgment.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.637 and 2004 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When an offender has completed all requirements of the
sentence, including any and all legal financial obligations, and while
under the custody and supervision of the department, the secretary or
the secretary's designee shall notify the sentencing court, which shall
discharge the offender and provide the offender with a certificate of
discharge by issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by
mailing the certificate to the offender's last known address.
(b)(i) When an offender has reached the end of his or her
supervision with the department and has completed all the requirements
of the sentence except his or her legal financial obligations, the
secretary's designee shall provide the county clerk with a notice that
the offender has completed all nonfinancial requirements of the
sentence.
(ii) When the department has provided the county clerk with notice
that an offender has completed all the requirements of the sentence and
the offender subsequently satisfies all legal financial obligations
under the sentence, the county clerk shall notify the sentencing court,
including the notice from the department, which shall discharge the
offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge by
issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the
certificate to the offender's last known address.
(c) When an offender who is subject to requirements of the sentence
in addition to the payment of legal financial obligations either is not
subject to supervision by the department or does not complete the
requirements while under supervision of the department, it is the
offender's responsibility to provide the court with verification of the
completion of the sentence conditions other than the payment of legal
financial obligations. When the offender satisfies all legal financial
obligations under the sentence, the county clerk shall notify the
sentencing court that the legal financial obligations have been
satisfied. When the court has received both notification from the
clerk and adequate verification from the offender that the sentence
requirements have been completed, the court shall discharge the
offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge by
issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the
certificate to the offender's last known address.
(2) The court shall send a copy of every signed certificate of
discharge to the auditor for the county in which the court resides and
to the department. The department shall create and maintain a data
base containing the names of all felons who have been issued
certificates of discharge or certificates of conditional discharge, the
date of discharge, and the date of conviction and offense.
(3) An offender who is not convicted of a violent offense or a sex
offense and is sentenced to a term involving community supervision may
be considered for a discharge of sentence by the sentencing court prior
to the completion of community supervision, provided that the offender
has completed at least one-half of the term of community supervision
and has met all other sentence requirements.
(4) An offender may be considered for a conditional discharge of
sentence by the sentencing court prior to completing payment of legal
financial obligations, provided that the offender has met all other
sentence requirements and has made and is making reasonable efforts to
satisfy such legal financial obligations in accordance with the
offender's ability to pay. Such conditional discharge shall not affect
the offender's liability for legal financial obligations, which shall
continue to be enforceable under RCW 9.94A.760(4) as a civil judgment
by any party or entity to whom the obligation is owed. In addition,
the court shall retain jurisdiction over the offender for purposes of
the offender's compliance with payment of the legal financial
obligations, and the county clerk shall continue to be authorized to
collect unpaid legal financial obligations, in the manner provided in
RCW 9.94A.760(4).
(5) Except as provided in subsection (((5))) (6) of this section,
the discharge shall have the effect of restoring all civil rights lost
by operation of law upon conviction, and the certificate of discharge
shall so state; and the conditional discharge shall have the effect of
restoring all civil rights lost by operation of law upon conviction
except for the right to vote, and the certificate of conditional
discharge shall so state. Nothing in this section prohibits the use of
an offender's prior record for purposes of determining sentences for
later offenses as provided in this chapter. Nothing in this section
affects or prevents use of the offender's prior conviction in a later
criminal prosecution either as an element of an offense or for
impeachment purposes. A certificate of discharge is not based on a
finding of rehabilitation.
(((5))) (6) Unless otherwise ordered by the sentencing court, a
certificate of discharge shall not terminate the offender's obligation
to comply with an order issued under chapter 10.99 RCW that excludes or
prohibits the offender from having contact with a specified person or
coming within a set distance of any specified location that was
contained in the judgment and sentence. An offender who violates such
an order after a certificate of discharge has been issued shall be
subject to prosecution according to the chapter under which the order
was originally issued.
(((6))) (7) Upon release from custody, the offender may apply to
the department for counseling and help in adjusting to the community.
This voluntary help may be provided for up to one year following the
release from custody.

--- END ---