BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, in order to
improve the safety of our communities, more housing needs to be made
available to registered sex offenders. The legislature also finds that
registered sex offenders who reside in close proximity to one another,
or in the same housing or apartment unit, are less likely to reoffend.
The legislature finds that having registered sex offenders reside in
close proximity to each other will improve supervision and monitoring.
The legislature intends to increase the housing available to sex
offenders by providing that landlords who rent to registered sex
offenders shall be immune from civil liability for damages that may
result.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
A landlord who rents to a registered sex offender is immune from
civil liability for damages caused by the tenant if the actions of the
tenant that gave rise to civil liability were sex offenses described in
RCW 9.94A.030. In order for a landlord to be protected from liability
as provided under this section, a landlord must disclose to residents
of the property that he or she rents or has a policy of renting to sex
offenders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs shall conduct a study on sex offender registration
and sex offender housing laws in every state. The study may be limited
to a review and analysis of each state's laws regarding: (a) Whether
and how often sex offenders are required to report in person to law
enforcement; (b) whether and how often law enforcement is required to
make in-person contact with registered sex offenders in the community;
(c) the characteristics of sex offenders subject to registration
requirements; (d) estimates on the costs and benefits of more frequent
in-person contact between law enforcement and sex offenders in the
community; (e) restrictions on or supports for sex offender housing
units in the community regarding housing more than one offender in the
same residence; and (f) the costs and benefits of permitting or
encouraging housing in the community for more than one sex offender in
the same residence.
(2) The findings and any recommendations from the study shall be
placed into a final report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature no later than December 31, 2006.

--- END ---