BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.715 and 2003 c 379 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department for a sex offense not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712, a
violent offense, any crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or
a felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or
after July 1, 2000, the court shall in addition to the other terms of
the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody for the
community custody range established under RCW 9.94A.850 or up to the
period of earned release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2),
whichever is longer. The community custody shall begin: (a) Upon
completion of the term of confinement; (b) at such time as the offender
is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2); or (c) with regard to
offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660, upon failure to complete or
administrative termination from the special drug offender sentencing
alternative program. Except as provided in RCW 9.94A.501, the
department shall supervise any sentence of community custody imposed
under this section.
(2)(a) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions of
community custody shall include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4).
The conditions may also include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(5).
The court may also order the offender to participate in rehabilitative
programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct reasonably related to
the circumstances of the offense, the offender's risk of reoffending,
or the safety of the community, and the department shall enforce such
conditions pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.
(b) As part of any sentence that includes a term of community
custody imposed under this subsection, the court shall also require the
offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department under
RCW 9.94A.720. The department shall assess the offender's risk of
reoffense and may establish and modify additional conditions of the
offender's community custody based upon the risk to community safety.
In addition, the department may require the offender to participate in
rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct,
((and)) to obey all laws, or to submit to electronic monitoring as
defined in this section. The department shall, within available
resources, carry out any electronic monitoring imposed under this
section using the most appropriate technology given the individual
circumstances of the offender. As used in this section, "electronic
monitoring" means the monitoring of an offender using an electronic
offender tracking system including, but not limited to, a system using
radio frequency or active or passive global positioning system
technology.
(c) The department may not impose conditions that are contrary to
those ordered by the court and may not contravene or decrease court
imposed conditions. The department shall notify the offender in
writing of any such conditions or modifications. In setting,
modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the
department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.
(3) If an offender violates conditions imposed by the court or the
department pursuant to this section during community custody, the
department may transfer the offender to a more restrictive confinement
status and impose other available sanctions as provided in RCW
9.94A.737 and 9.94A.740.
(4) Except for terms of community custody under RCW 9.94A.670, the
department shall discharge the offender from community custody on a
date determined by the department, which the department may modify,
based on risk and performance of the offender, within the range or at
the end of the period of earned release, whichever is later.
(5) At any time prior to the completion or termination of a sex
offender's term of community custody, if the court finds that public
safety would be enhanced, the court may impose and enforce an order
extending any or all of the conditions imposed pursuant to this section
for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for the crime as it
is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a condition
extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of
the sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.631 and may be punishable as
contempt of court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040. If the court
extends a condition beyond the expiration of the term of community
custody, the department is not responsible for supervision of the
offender's compliance with the condition.
(6) Within the funds available for community custody, the
department shall determine conditions and duration of community custody
on the basis of risk to community safety, and shall supervise offenders
during community custody on the basis of risk to community safety and
conditions imposed by the court. The secretary shall adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this subsection.
(7) By the close of the next business day after receiving notice of
a condition imposed or modified by the department, an offender may
request an administrative review under rules adopted by the department.
The condition shall remain in effect unless the reviewing officer finds
that it is not reasonably related to any of the following: (a) The
crime of conviction; (b) the offender's risk of reoffending; or (c) the
safety of the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Local governments, their subdivisions and employees, the department
and its employees, and the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs and its employees shall be immune from civil liability
for damages arising from incidents involving offenders who are placed
on electronic monitoring, unless it is shown that an employee acted
with gross negligence or bad faith.

--- END ---