BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.030 and 1987 c 295 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter relating to the financing of
election campaigns shall apply in all election campaigns other than (1)
for precinct committee officer; and (2) for a federal elective office;
and (3) for an office of a political subdivision of the state that does
not encompass a whole county and that contains fewer than five thousand
registered voters as of the date of the most recent general election in
the subdivision, unless required by RCW 42.17.405 (2) through (((5)))
(6).

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17.405 and 1986 c 12 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
the reporting provisions of this chapter do not apply to candidates,
elected officials, and agencies in political subdivisions with less
than one thousand registered voters as of the date of the most recent
general election in the jurisdiction, to political committees formed to
support or oppose candidates or ballot propositions in such political
subdivisions, or to persons making independent expenditures in support
of or opposition to such ballot propositions.
(2) The reporting provisions of this chapter apply in any exempt
political subdivision from which a "petition for disclosure" containing
the valid signatures of fifteen percent of the number of registered
voters, as of the date of the most recent general election in the
political subdivision, is filed with the commission. The commission
shall by rule prescribe the form of the petition. After the signatures
are gathered, the petition shall be presented to the auditor or
elections officer of the county, or counties, in which the political
subdivision is located. The auditor or elections officer shall verify
the signatures and certify to the commission that the petition contains
no less than the required number of valid signatures. The commission,
upon receipt of a valid petition, shall order every known affected
person in the political subdivision to file the initially required
statement and reports within fourteen days of the date of the order.
(3) The reporting provisions of this chapter apply in any exempt
political subdivision that by ordinance, resolution, or other official
action has petitioned the commission to make the provisions applicable
to elected officials and candidates of the exempt political
subdivision. A copy of the action shall be sent to the commission. If
the commission finds the petition to be a valid action of the
appropriate governing body or authority, the commission shall order
every known affected person in the political subdivision to file the
initially required statement and reports within fourteen days of the
date of the order.
(4) The commission shall void any order issued by it pursuant to
subsection (2) or (3) of this section when, at least four years after
issuing the order, the commission is presented a petition or official
action so requesting from the affected political subdivision. Such
petition or official action shall meet the respective requirements of
subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(5) ((Any petition for disclosure, ordinance, resolution, or
official action of an agency petitioning the commission to void the
exemption in RCW 42.17.030(3) shall not be considered unless it has
been filed with the commission:
(a) In the case of a ballot measure, at least sixty days before the
date of any election in which campaign finance reporting is to be
required;
(b) In the case of a candidate, at least sixty days before the
first day on which a person may file a declaration of candidacy for any
election in which campaign finance reporting is to be required.
(6))) Any person exempted from reporting under this chapter may at
his or her option file the statement and reports.
(6) The campaign finance reporting provisions of this chapter apply
to a candidate in an election for city or town mayor or council if the
candidate receives or expects to receive three thousand five hundred
dollars or more in contributions. The commission shall increase or
decrease this amount pursuant to RCW 42.17.690.

--- END ---