BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the provision of
customized training is critical to attracting and retaining businesses,
and that the growth of many businesses is limited by an unmet need for
customized training. The legislature also finds that work force
training not only helps business, it also improves the quality of life
for workers and communities. Because of the statewide public benefit
to be gained from instituting a customized training program, the
legislature intends to create a new program to fund work force training
in a manner that reduces the up-front costs of training to new and
expanding firms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the state board for community and technical
colleges.
(2) "Costs of training" and "training costs" means the direct costs
experienced under a contract with a qualified training institution for
formal technical or skill training, including basic skills. "Costs of
training" includes amounts in the contract for costs of instruction,
materials, equipment, rental of class space, marketing, and overhead.
"Costs of training" does not include employee tuition reimbursements
unless the tuition reimbursement is specifically included in a
contract.
(3) "Participant" means a private employer that, under this
chapter, undertakes a training program with a qualified training
institution.
(4) "Qualified training institution" means a public community or
technical college or a private vocational school licensed by either the
work force training and education coordinating board or the higher
education coordinating board.
(5) "Training allowance" and "allowance" means a voucher, credit,
or payment from the board to a participant to cover training costs.
(6) "Training program" means a program funded under this chapter at
a qualified training institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Washington customized employment
training program is hereby created to provide training assistance to
employers locating or expanding in the state.
(2)(a) Application to receive funding under this program shall be
made to the board in a form and manner as specified by the board.
Successful applicants shall receive a training allowance from the board
to cover the costs of training at a qualified training institution.
Employers may not receive an allowance for training costs which exceed
the maximum annual training cost per employee, as established by the
board, and are not eligible to receive an allowance or allowances of
over five hundred thousand dollars per calendar year.
(b) Allowances shall be granted for applicants who meet the
following criteria:
(i) The employer must have entered into an agreement with a
qualified training institution to engage in customized training and the
employer must agree to: (A) Upon completion of the training, make a
payment to the employment training finance account created in section
6 of this act in an amount equal to one-quarter of the amount of the
training allowance; and (B) over the subsequent eighteen months, make
monthly or quarterly payments, as specified in the agreement, to the
employment training finance account created in section 6 of this act in
an amount equal to three-quarters of the amount of the training
allowance. The payments into the employment training finance account
provided for in this section do not constitute payment to the
institution.
(ii) The employer must ensure that the number of employees an
employer has in the state during the calendar year following the
completion of the training program will equal the number of employees
the employer had in the state in the calendar year preceding the start
of the training program plus seventy-five percent of the number of
trainees. The agreement with the qualified training institution
provided for in (b)(i) of this subsection shall specify terms for
reimbursement or additional payment to the employment training finance
account by the employer if the employment criterion of this subsection
is not met.
(iii) The training grant may not be used to train workers who have
been hired as a result of a strike or lockout.
(3) Qualified training institutions may enter into agreements with
four-year institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW
28B.10.016, in accordance with the interlocal cooperation act, chapter
39.34 RCW.
(4) The board and qualified training institutions may solicit and
receive gifts, grants, funds, fees, and endowments, in trust or
otherwise, from tribal, local, federal, or other governmental entities,
as well as private sources, for the purpose of providing training
allowances under this act. All revenue thus solicited and received
shall be deposited into the employment training finance account created
in section 6 of this act.
(5) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This chapter, being necessary for the
welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed
to effect its purposes. Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are
inconsistent with the provisions of any general or special law, or
parts thereof, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for participants in the Washington customized employment
training program created in section 3 of this act. The credit allowed
under this section is equal to fifty percent of the value of a
participant's payments to the employment training finance account
created in section 6 of this act. If a participant in the program does
not meet the qualifications in section 3(2)(b)(ii) of this act, the
participant must remit to the department the value of any credits taken
plus interest. The credit earned by a participant in one calendar year
may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in a
subsequent calendar year. No credit may be allowed for repayment of
training allowances received from the Washington customized employment
training program on or after July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All payments received from a participant in the Washington
customized employment training program created in section 3 of this act
shall be deposited into the employment training finance account, which
is hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the
state board for community and technical colleges may authorize
expenditures from the account and no appropriation is required for
expenditures. The money in the account must be used solely for
training allowances under the Washington customized employment training
program created in section 3 of this act. The deposit of payments
under this section from a participant shall cease when the board
specifies that the participant has met the monetary obligations of the
program.
(2) All revenue solicited and received under the provisions of
section 3(4) of this act shall be deposited into the employment
training finance account to provide training allowances.
(3) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The sum of five million dollars is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, from the general
fund to the employment training finance account for the purposes of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 4 and 6 of this act
expire July 1, 2016.

--- END ---