BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that, in many
areas of the state, the lack of necessary infrastructure and vacant
brownfields act as an impediment to economic growth.
(2) The legislature further finds that public improvements to
brownfields, carried out in accordance with local economic development
plans, will encourage investment in job-producing private development
and will expand the public tax base.
(3) The legislature intends, through this act, to promote and
facilitate the orderly development and economic stability of
communities in the state. It is the purpose of this chapter to provide
financial resources to assist local jurisdictions in the financing of
public improvements which are needed to encourage private development
where this development would not otherwise occur due to the presence of
contaminated property and other environmental considerations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means the Washington economic development finance
authority created in chapter 43.163 RCW.
(2) "Brownfield" means abandoned, idled, or underused property,
including industrial and commercial facilities, owned by a local
jurisdiction, where expansion or redevelopment is complicated by real
or perceived contamination.
(3) "Cleanup payments" means the payments made by lessees of former
brownfield sites as required by section 3 of this act.
(4) "Leasehold excise tax" means an excise tax imposed under
chapter 82.29A RCW on the act or privilege of occupying or using
publicly owned real or personal property.
(5) "Local economic development project" means a project that:
(a) Promotes economic development and job creation or retention by
the private sector; and
(b) Includes cleanup of publicly owned brownfield sites, including
adjacent marine waters, rivers, and lakes, that have been designated a
priority for cleanup in a local economic development plan and by the
department of ecology.
(6) "Local economic development project costs" means costs
associated with:
(a) Environmental cleanup, including restoring brownfields and fish
habitat;
(b) Street and road construction and improvements;
(c) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;
(d) Land use planning and associated environmental analysis and
project design;
(e) Relocation, maintenance, and operation of property pending
construction of the local economic development project;
(f) Complying with the requirements of this act and other
applicable law; and
(g) Administrative expenditures reasonably necessary and related to
these costs.
(7) "Local jurisdiction" means a county, city, town, or port
district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Local jurisdictions with local economic
development projects approved by the department of community, trade,
and economic development as provided under subsection (2) of this
section may enter into an agreement with the Washington economic
development finance authority regarding the issuance of bonds for the
purpose of financing local economic development project costs. The
agreement shall require that the local jurisdiction: (a) Collect from
any lessee of property associated with a local economic development
project a payment in an amount at least equal to all leasehold excise
taxes that would be imposed on and collected with respect to property
associated with the completed local economic development project but
for the exemption granted by section 13 of this act; (b) pledge the
cleanup payments collected to the payment of these bonds; (c) stop
collection of cleanup payments when the bond obligations have been
satisfied; (d) notify the lessee of the obligation to pay any leasehold
excise taxes which may be due subsequently; and (e) notify the
department of revenue, within thirty days of the date the bond
obligations have been satisfied, that the collection of cleanup
payments has ceased.
(2) No local jurisdiction may enter an agreement with the
Washington economic development finance authority under this act
unless:
(a) They have delivered a local economic development project plan
to the department of community, trade, and economic development that
includes a description of the contemplated property and the local
economic development project; the estimated cost of the total project,
including both public and private components; the estimated period
during which the leasehold excise tax exemption in section 13 of this
act is to be operative and cleanup payments from lessees are to be
devoted to meeting bond obligations; the proposed use of bond funds
financing the public portion of the project; and the estimated amounts
to be derived from the cleanup payments during the period in which
bonds for the project are being paid off;
(b) The department of community, trade, and economic development
has reviewed the plan and determined that the project meets the
definition of local economic development project under section 2 of
this act;
(c) The local jurisdiction demonstrates they are working with the
department of ecology to clean up the property consistent with the
requirements in the model toxics control act, chapter 70.105D RCW.
(3) Collection of cleanup payments must cease when the payments are
no longer necessary or obligated to pay the costs associated with the
local economic development project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The local economic development project
financing account shall be established by the authority. The proceeds
of all cleanup payments collected with respect to property associated
with a completed local economic development project shall be deposited
into the local economic development project financing account. Only
the Washington economic development finance authority may authorize
expenditures from the account and no appropriation is required for
expenditures. The money in the account must be used for the purposes
of bond resolution or trust indenture under which the bonds are issued
under this chapter and may not be used to replace or supplant existing
funding. The deposit of cleanup payments required under this section
shall cease when the authority specifies that all monetary obligations
associated with bonds issued to pay a local economic development
project's costs have been met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 In connection with any bonds issued by the
authority under the terms of this act, the authority shall enter into
agreements with participating local jurisdictions which shall provide
for the deposit by each local jurisdiction of all cleanup payments
collected on property associated with the completed local economic
development project. Cleanup payments shall be disbursed bimonthly
into the local economic development project account. Cleanup payments
collected shall be sufficient, together with other revenues available
to the authority, if any, to: (1) Pay the issuance and administrative
fees set by the authority; (2) pay the local economic development
project costs financed by the authority, to the extent that the payment
of the costs has not otherwise been adequately provided for; (3) pay
the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on outstanding bonds of
the authority issued to finance the local economic development project
costs as the same shall become due and payable; and (4) create and
maintain reserves required or provided for in any bond resolution or
trust indenture authorizing the issuance of such bonds of the
authority. The authority's payments shall not be subject to
supervision or regulation by any department, committee, board, body,
bureau, or agency of the state other than the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The authority shall provide the assessor
and treasurer of the county within which the local economic development
project is located and the department of revenue of the parcel number
or numbers and street address or addresses, if any, associated with all
property that is part of a local economic development project.
(2) The authority may, from time to time, issue its special
obligation bonds in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter and
to enable the authority to exercise any of the powers granted to it in
this chapter. The bonds may be issued on either a taxable or federally
tax-exempt basis. The bonds shall be issued pursuant to a bond
resolution or trust indenture and shall be payable solely out of the
local economic development project financing account created in section
4 of this act. The local economic development project financing
account shall be funded in whole or in part from moneys paid by one or
more local jurisdictions for whose benefit such bonds were issued and
from any other sources authorized by law, including from the proceeds
of bonds issued by the authority for the purpose of refunding any
outstanding bonds of the authority.
(3) The bonds may be secured by:
(a) A first lien against any unexpended proceeds of the bonds;
(b) A first lien against moneys in the local economic development
project financing account created in section 4 of this act;
(c) A first or subordinate lien against the cleanup payment
receipts of the local jurisdiction or jurisdictions that are collected
on property associated with the completed local economic development
project or projects;
(d) A first or subordinate security interest against any real or
personal property, tangible or intangible, of the local jurisdiction or
jurisdictions that is associated with the local economic development
project;
(e) Any other real or personal property of the local jurisdiction
or jurisdictions, tangible or intangible;
(f) Any combination of (a) through (e) of this subsection; or
(g) Any other security the authority may deem appropriate or
necessary.
Any security interest created against the unexpended bond proceeds
and against the local economic development project financing account
shall be immediately valid and binding against the moneys and any
securities in which the moneys may be invested without authority or
trustee possession, and the security interest shall be prior to any
party having any competing claim against the moneys or securities,
without filing or recording under Article 9A of the Uniform Commercial
Code or Title 62A RCW, and regardless of whether the party has notice
of the security interest.
(4) The bonds may be issued as serial bonds or as term bonds or any
such combination. The bonds shall bear such date or dates; mature at
such time or times; bear interest at such rate or rates, either fixed
or variable; be payable at such time or times; be in such
denominations; carry such registration privileges; be made
transferable, exchangeable, and interchangeable; be payable in lawful
money of the United States of America at such place or places; be
subject to such terms of redemption; and be sold at public or private
sale, in such manner, at such time, and at such price as the authority
shall determine. The bonds shall be executed by the manual or
facsimile signatures of the chairperson and the authority's duly
elected secretary or its executive director, and by the trustee if the
authority determines to use a trustee. At least one signature shall be
manually subscribed.
(5) Any bond resolution, trust indenture, or agreement with a local
jurisdiction relating to bonds issued by the authority or the financing
or refinancing made available by this act may contain provisions, which
may be made a part of the contract with the holders or owners of the
bonds to be issued, pertaining to the following, among other matters:
(a) The security interests granted by the local jurisdiction to
secure repayment of any amounts financed and the performance by the
local jurisdiction of its other obligations in the financing;
(b) The security interests granted to the holders or owners of the
bonds to secure repayment of the bonds;
(c) Rentals, fees, and other amounts to be charged, and the sums to
be raised in each year through such charges, and the use, investment,
and disposition of the sums;
(d) The segregation of reserves or sinking funds, and the
regulation, investment, and disposition thereof;
(e) Limitations on the purposes to which, or the investments in
which, the proceeds of the sale of any issue of bonds may be applied;
(f) Terms pertaining to the issuance of additional parity bonds;
(g) Terms pertaining to the incurrence of parity debt;
(h) The refunding of outstanding bonds;
(i) Procedures, if any, by which the terms of any contract with
bondholders may be amended or abrogated;
(j) Acts or failures to act that constitute a default by the local
jurisdiction or the authority in their respective obligations and the
rights and remedies in the event of a default;
(k) Terms governing performance by the trustee of its obligation;
or
(l) Such other additional covenants, agreements, and provisions as
are deemed necessary, useful, or convenient by the authority for the
security of the holders of the bonds.
(6) Bonds may be issued by the authority to refund other
outstanding authority bonds, at or before the maturity thereof, and to
pay any redemption premium with respect thereto. Bonds issued for such
refunding purposes may be combined with bonds issued for the financing
or refinancing of new local economic development project costs.
Pending the application of the proceeds of the refunding bonds to the
redemption of the bonds to be redeemed, the authority may enter into an
agreement or agreements with a corporate trustee under section 8 of
this act with respect to the interim investment of the proceeds and the
application of the proceeds and the earnings on the proceeds to the
payment of the principal of and interest on, and the redemption of the
bonds to be redeemed.
(7) All bonds and any interest coupons appertaining to the bonds
are negotiable instruments under Title 62A RCW.
(8) Neither the members of the authority, nor its employees or
agents, nor any person executing the bonds is liable personally on the
bonds or subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason
of the issuance of the bonds.
(9) The authority may purchase its bonds with any of its funds
available for the purchase. The authority may hold, pledge, cancel, or
resell the bonds subject to and in accordance with agreements with
bondholders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Bonds issued under this chapter shall not be
deemed to constitute obligations, either general or special, of the
state, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state, or a general
obligation of the authority. The bonds shall be special obligations of
the authority and shall be payable solely from the local economic
development project financing account created in section 4 of this act.
Except for any initial appropriations which may be made, the fund or
funds shall be funded in whole or in part from moneys paid by one or
more local jurisdictions for whose benefit such bonds were issued and
from any other sources authorized by law, including from the proceeds
of bonds issued by the authority for the purpose of refunding any
outstanding bonds of the authority. The issuance of bonds under this
chapter shall not obligate, directly, indirectly, or contingently, the
state to levy any taxes or appropriate or expend any funds for the
payment of the principal or the interest on the bonds.
Neither the proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter nor any
money used or to be used to pay the principal of or interest on the
bonds shall constitute public money or property. All of such moneys
shall be kept segregated and set apart from funds of the state and any
political subdivision of the state and shall not be subject to
appropriation or allotment by the state or subject to the provisions of
chapter 43.88 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 All moneys received by or on behalf of the
authority under this chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of
bonds or from participants or from other sources, shall be deemed to be
trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this chapter.
The authority, in lieu of receiving and applying the moneys itself, may
enter into an agreement or trust indenture with one or more banks or
trust companies having the power and authority to conduct trust
business in the state to:
(1) Perform all of any part of the obligations of the authority
with respect to: (a) Bonds issued by it; (b) the receipt, investment,
and application of the proceeds of the bonds and moneys paid by a local
jurisdiction or available from other sources for the payment of the
bonds; (c) the enforcement of the obligations of a local jurisdiction
in connection with the financing or refinancing of any project; and (d)
other matters relating to the exercise of the authority's powers under
this chapter;
(2) Receive, hold, preserve, and enforce any security interest or
evidence of security interest granted by a local jurisdiction for
purposes of securing the payment of the bonds; and
(3) Act on behalf of the authority or the holders or owners of
bonds of the authority for purposes of assuring or enforcing the
payment of the bonds, when due.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This chapter supplements and neither
restricts nor limits any powers that the state or any local
jurisdiction might otherwise have under any laws of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This chapter provides a complete,
additional, and alternative method for accomplishing the purposes of
this chapter and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to
powers conferred by other laws. The issuance of bonds and refunding
bonds under this chapter need not comply with the requirements of any
other law applicable to the issuance of bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This chapter, being necessary for the
welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed
to effect its purposes. Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are
inconsistent with the provisions of any general or special law, or
parts thereof, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.163.010 and 1999 c 294 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following words and terms have the
following meanings, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Authority" means the Washington economic development finance
authority created under RCW 43.163.020 or any board, body, commission,
department or officer succeeding to the principal functions of the
authority or to whom the powers conferred upon the authority shall be
given by law;
(2) "Bonds" means any bonds, notes, debentures, interim
certificates, conditional sales or lease financing agreements, lines of
credit, forward purchase agreements, investment agreements, and other
banking or financial arrangements, guaranties, or other obligations
issued by or entered into by the authority. Such bonds may be issued
on either a tax-exempt or taxable basis;
(3) "Borrower" means one or more public or private persons or
entities acting as lessee, purchaser, mortgagor, or borrower who has
obtained or is seeking to obtain financing either from the authority or
from an eligible banking organization that has obtained or is seeking
to obtain funds from the authority to finance a project. A borrower
may include a party who transfers the right of use and occupancy to
another party by lease, sublease or otherwise, or a party who is
seeking or has obtained a financial guaranty from the authority;
(4) "Eligible banking organization" means any organization subject
to regulation by the director of the department of financial
institutions, any national bank, federal savings and loan association,
and federal credit union located within this state;
(5) "Eligible export transaction" means any preexport or export
activity by a person or entity located in the state of Washington
involving a sale for export and product sale which, in the judgment of
the authority: (a) Will create or maintain employment in the state of
Washington, (b) will obtain a material percent of its value from
manufactured goods or services made, processed or occurring in
Washington, and (c) could not otherwise obtain financing on reasonable
terms from an eligible banking organization;
(6) "Eligible farmer" means any person who is a resident of the
state of Washington and whose specific acreage qualifying for receipts
from the federal department of agriculture under its conservation
reserve program is within the state of Washington;
(7) "Eligible person" means an individual, partnership,
corporation, or joint venture carrying on business, or proposing to
carry on business within the state and is seeking financial assistance
under RCW 43.163.210;
(8) "Financial assistance" means the infusion of capital to persons
for use in the development and exploitation of specific inventions and
products;
(9) "Financing document" means an instrument executed by the
authority and one or more persons or entities pertaining to the
issuance of or security for bonds, or the application of the proceeds
of bonds or other funds of, or payable to, the authority. A financing
document may include, but need not be limited to, a lease, installment
sale agreement, conditional sale agreement, mortgage, loan agreement,
trust agreement or indenture, security agreement, letter or line of
credit, reimbursement agreement, insurance policy, guaranty agreement,
or currency or interest rate swap agreement. A financing document also
may be an agreement between the authority and an eligible banking
organization which has agreed to make a loan to a borrower;
(10) "Plan" means the general plan of economic development finance
objectives developed and adopted by the authority, and updated from
time to time, as required under RCW 43.163.090;
(11) "Economic development activities" means activities related to:
Manufacturing, processing, research, production, assembly, tooling,
warehousing, airports, docks and wharves, mass commuting facilities,
high-speed intercity rail facilities, public broadcasting, pollution
control, brownfield cleanup and development, solid waste disposal,
federally qualified hazardous waste facilities, energy generating,
conservation, or transmission facilities, and sports facilities and
industrial parks and activities conducted within a federally designated
enterprise or empowerment zone or geographic area of similar nature;
(12) "Project costs" means costs of:
(a) Acquisition, lease, construction, reconstruction, remodeling,
refurbishing, rehabilitation, extension, and enlargement of land,
rights to land, buildings, structures, docks, wharves, fixtures,
machinery, equipment, excavations, paving, landscaping, utilities,
approaches, roadways and parking, handling and storage areas, and
similar ancillary facilities, and any other real or personal property
included in an economic development activity;
(b) Architectural, engineering, consulting, accounting, and legal
costs related directly to the development, financing, acquisition,
lease, construction, reconstruction, remodeling, refurbishing,
rehabilitation, extension, and enlargement of an activity included
under subsection (11) of this section, including costs of studies
assessing the feasibility of an economic development activity;
(c) Finance costs, including the costs of credit enhancement and
discounts, if any, the costs of issuing revenue bonds, and costs
incurred in carrying out any financing document;
(d) Start-up costs, working capital, capitalized research and
development costs, capitalized interest during construction and during
the eighteen months after estimated completion of construction, and
capitalized debt service or repair and replacement or other appropriate
reserves;
(e) The refunding of any outstanding obligations incurred for any
of the costs outlined in this subsection; and
(f) Other costs incidental to any of the costs listed in this
section;
(13) "Product" means a product, device, technique, or process that
is or may be exploitable commercially. "Product" does not refer to
pure research, but shall be construed to apply to products, devices,
techniques, or processes that have advanced beyond the theoretic stage
and are readily capable of being, or have been, reduced to practice;
(14) "Financing agreements" means, and includes without limitation,
a contractual arrangement with an eligible person whereby the authority
obtains rights from or in an invention or product or proceeds from an
invention or product in exchange for the granting of financial and
other assistance to the person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 82.29A
RCW to read as follows:
All leasehold interests in completed local economic development
projects financed under this act are exempt from tax under this chapter
for the period of time lessees are making cleanup payments as required
by this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---