BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the aerospace
sector, as the state's largest manufacturing and exporting industry,
has made a significant contribution to local, regional, state, and
national economies. The legislature further finds that airports of
regional significance in both eastern and western Washington have
underutilized property and facilities that could become substantial
tools for economic development. The legislature intends to examine and
determine how untapped capacity at airports of regional significance
can be used to expand manufacturing, research and development,
education, and training for the aerospace industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) The joint legislative task force on
aerospace manufacturing is established. The task force shall consist
of the following voting members:
(i) One member from each caucus of the senate, appointed by the
president of the senate;
(ii) One member from each caucus of the house of representatives,
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(iii) Three members representing the aerospace manufacturing and
services industry, appointed jointly by the president of the senate and
the speaker of the house of representatives;
(iv) Two members representing airport owners and managers, one from
eastern Washington and one from western Washington, appointed jointly
by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(v) Two members representing airport business tenants, appointed
jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(vi) Two members representing four-year institutions of higher
education and work force training at community and technical colleges,
appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the
house of representatives;
(vii) Two members representing counties, one from eastern
Washington and one from western Washington, appointed jointly by the
president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(viii) Two members from organized labor representing transportation
and aerospace workers, appointed jointly by the president of the senate
and the speaker of the house of representatives;
(ix) Two members representing cities near a regional airport, one
from eastern Washington and one from western Washington, appointed
jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(x) One member representing the federal aviation administration,
appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the
house of representatives.
(b) In addition, the departments of transportation and community,
trade, and economic development shall each maintain a liaison
representative, who shall be a nonvoting member. The departments shall
cooperate with the task force and provide information as the task force
may reasonably request.
(c) The task force shall choose bipartisan cochairs from among its
legislative membership.
(2) The task force shall review the following issues related to
expanding the presence of aerospace manufacturing and associated
research and development, education, and training businesses at
airports of regional significance:
(a) The composition of the current aerospace manufacturing industry
in Washington state and significant trends that affect retention,
expansion, and recruitment of companies in that industry;
(b) Aerospace and nonaerospace businesses currently sited at
airports of regional significance;
(c) The inventory of untapped or underutilized capacity at airports
of regional significance;
(d) Types of aerospace manufacturing and associated businesses that
could be sited at airports of regional significance;
(e) Financial and technical resources that are available and those
that would be needed; and
(f) Statutory and regulatory changes required to expand the
presence of aerospace manufacturing and associated businesses at
airports of regional significance.
(3) The task force, where feasible, may consult with individuals
from the public and private sector or ask such persons to establish an
advisory committee.
(4)(a) The task force shall use legislative facilities, and staff
support shall be provided by senate committee services and the house
office of program research.
(b) The task force may hire additional staff or contract with
additional persons who have specific technical expertise if such
expertise is necessary to carry out the mandates of the study.
(5) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The expenses of the task force shall be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.
(7) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the legislature by June 30, 2007.
(8) This section expires December 31, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from
the general fund to the house of representatives and the senate for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, to carry out the purposes of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---