BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
computer hardware, computer peripherals, or software, used primarily in
aerospace product development, or to sales of or charges made for labor
and services rendered in respect to installing the computer hardware,
computer peripherals, or software. The exemption is available only
when the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a
form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain
a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Aerospace product development" means research, design, and
engineering activities performed in relation to the development of:
(i) Commercial airplanes and components of such airplanes;
(ii) Tooling that is used in the manufacture of commercial
airplanes and by manufacturers of component parts of commercial
airplanes;
(iii) Maintenance, repair, or overhaul support equipment that is
used by airline customers in the aftermarket support of commercial
airplanes;
(iv) Ground support equipment, including test equipment, that is
used by airline customers in support of commercial airplanes; or
(v) General aviation aircraft and components of such aircraft.
(b) "Commercial airplane" and "component" have the meanings
provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(c) "Peripherals" includes keyboards, monitors, mouse devices, and
other accessories that operate outside of the computer, excluding
cables, conduit, wiring, and other similar property.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of computer hardware, computer peripherals, or software, used
primarily in aerospace product development, or to the use of labor and
services rendered in respect to installing the computer hardware,
computer peripherals, or software.
(2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person for qualified aerospace product development
expenditures occurring after the effective date of this section.
(2) The credit is equal to the amount of qualified aerospace
product development expenditures of a person, multiplied by the rate of
1.5 percent.
(3) The credit shall be taken against taxes due for the same
calendar year in which the qualified aerospace product development
expenditures are incurred. Credits may not be carried over. The
credit for each calendar year may not exceed the amount of tax
otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year. Refunds may
not be granted in the place of a credit.
(4) Any person entitled to the credit in this section as a result
of qualified aerospace product development conducted under contract may
assign all or any portion of the credit to the person contracting for
the performance of the qualified aerospace product development.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a)(i) "Aerospace product development" means research, design, and
engineering activities performed in relation to the development of a
product, product line, model, or model derivative, including prototype
development, testing, and certification. The development of a product,
product line, model, or model derivative, shall be for:
(A) Commercial airplanes and components of such airplanes;
(B) Tooling that is used in the manufacture of commercial airplanes
and by manufacturers of component parts of commercial airplanes;
(C) Maintenance, repair, or overhaul support equipment that is used
by airline customers in the aftermarket support of commercial
airplanes;
(D) Ground support equipment, including test equipment, that is
used by airline customers in support of commercial airplanes; or
(E) General aviation aircraft and components of such aircraft.
(ii) "Aerospace product development" includes the discovery of
technological information, the translating of technological information
into new or improved products, processes, techniques, formulas, or
inventions, and the adaptation of existing products and models into new
products or new models, or derivatives of products or models. The term
does not include manufacturing activities or other production-oriented
activities. The term does not include surveys and studies, social
science and humanities research, market research or testing, quality
control, sale promotion and service, computer software developed for
internal use, and research in areas such as improved style, taste, and
seasonal design.
(b) "Qualified aerospace product development" means aerospace
product development performed within this state.
(c) "Qualified aerospace product development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined by the department, benefits,
supplies, and computer expenses, directly incurred in qualified
aerospace product development by a person claiming the credit provided
in this section. The term does not include amounts paid to a person
other than a public educational or research institution to conduct
qualified aerospace product development. The term does not include
capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land, structures, or
depreciable property.
(6) Credit may not be claimed for expenditures for which a credit
is claimed under RCW 82.04.4452 or 82.04.4461.
(7) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.250 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person ((except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260
(5) or (13), 82.04.272, or subsection (2) of this section)) engaging
within this state in the business of making sales at retail, except
persons taxable as retailers under other provisions of this chapter, as
to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by
the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (11) or
(12), as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.04.260 and 2005 c 513 s 2 and 2005 c 443 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Seafood products which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw
salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the value of the products manufactured, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) Dairy products that as of September 20, 2001, are identified in
21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135, including byproducts
from the manufacturing of the dairy products such as whey and casein;
or selling the same to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course
of business the goods out of state; as to such persons the tax imposed
shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports
in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the seller
shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by the
department and retain the statement as a business record;
(d) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business shall be equal
to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(e) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are defined
in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the
gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied
by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter
82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to
the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or
foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be
equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed
under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
agent, insurance broker, or insurance solicitor licensed under chapter
48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to
such licensed activities shall be equal to the gross income of such
business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5
percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of
commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, manufactured by
that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the airplanes
or components multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial
airplane," "component," and "final assembly of a superefficient
airplane" have the meanings given in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (11) must report
as required under RCW 82.32.545.
(e) This subsection (11) does not apply after the earlier of: July
1, 2024; or December 31, 2007, if assembly of a superefficient airplane
does not begin by December 31, 2007, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(12)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of manufacturing the following: (i) Tooling that is used in
the manufacture of commercial airplanes and by manufacturers of
component parts of commercial airplanes; (ii) maintenance, repair, or
overhaul support equipment that is used by airline customers in the
aftermarket support of commercial airplanes; (iii) ground support
equipment, including test equipment, that is used by airline customers
in support of commercial airplanes; or (iv) general aviation aircraft
or components of such aircraft; as to such persons the amount of the
tax with respect to the business shall be equal to the gross income of
the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales, at retail or wholesale, of the following: (i) Tooling
that is used in the manufacture of commercial airplanes and by
manufacturers of component parts of commercial airplanes; (ii)
maintenance, repair, or overhaul support equipment that is used by
airline customers in the aftermarket support of commercial airplanes;
(iii) ground support equipment, including test equipment, that is used
by airline customers in support of commercial airplanes; or (iv)
general aviation aircraft or components of such aircraft; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to the business shall be
equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of
0.2904 percent.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.04.440 and 2005 c 301 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in activities which are within the purview
of the provisions of two or more of sections RCW 82.04.230 to
82.04.298, inclusive, shall be taxable under each paragraph applicable
to the activities engaged in.
(2) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.2909(2), 82.04.250, 82.04.270,
82.04.294(2), or 82.04.260 (4) ((or (13))), (11), or (12) with respect
to selling products in this state shall be allowed a credit against
those taxes for any (a) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the
manufacturing of products so sold in this state, and/or (b) extracting
taxes paid with respect to the extracting of products so sold in this
state or ingredients of products so sold in this state. Extracting
taxes taken as credit under subsection (3) of this section may also be
taken under this subsection, if otherwise allowable under this
subsection. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the sale of those
products.
(3) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.240 or 82.04.260(1)(b) shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with
respect to extracting the ingredients of the products so manufactured
in this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the manufacturing
of those products.
(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1),
82.04.294(1), or 82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), (((6), or (13))) (11), or
(12) with respect to extracting or manufacturing products in this state
shall be allowed a credit against those taxes for any (i) gross
receipts taxes paid to another state with respect to the sales of the
products so extracted or manufactured in this state, (ii) manufacturing
taxes paid with respect to the manufacturing of products using
ingredients so extracted in this state, or (iii) manufacturing taxes
paid with respect to manufacturing activities completed in another
state for products so manufactured in this state. The amount of the
credit shall not exceed the tax liability arising under this chapter
with respect to the extraction or manufacturing of those products.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of
business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the
tax an income tax or value added tax; and
(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately
stated from the sales price.
(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the
United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of
such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign
country or political subdivision thereof.
(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and
includes (i) the taxes imposed in RCW 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1),
82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), (11), and (((13))) (12), and 82.04.294(1); and
(ii) similar gross receipts taxes paid to other states.
(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act
or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes the
tax imposed in RCW 82.04.230 and similar gross receipts taxes paid to
other states.
(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used
in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through
82.04.212, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of
describing taxes imposed by other states.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for property taxes paid during the calendar year.
(2) The credit is equal to:
(a)(i) Property taxes paid on new buildings, and land upon which
this property is located, and used exclusively in manufacturing
activities performed in relation to the development of:
(A) Tooling that is used in the manufacture of commercial airplanes
and by manufacturers of component parts of commercial airplanes;
(B) Maintenance, repair, or overhaul support equipment that is used
by airline customers in the aftermarket support of commercial
airplanes;
(C) Ground support equipment, including test equipment, that is
used by airline customers in support of commercial airplanes; or
(D) Components of general aviation aircraft or components of such
aircraft; or
(ii) Property taxes attributable to an increase in assessed value
due to the renovation or expansion of a building used exclusively in
manufacturing activities described in (a)(i)(A) through (D) of this
subsection; and
(b) Property taxes paid on machinery and equipment exempt under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 and used exclusively in the manufacturing
activities described in (a)(i)(A) through (D) of this subsection.
(3) A person taking the credit under this section is subject to all
the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A credit earned during one
calendar year may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred
in a subsequent calendar year, but may not be carried over a second
year. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(4) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person taking the credit under this section must report as required
under section 8 of this act.
(5) A person shall not take a credit under this section and RCW
82.04.4463.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person claiming a tax incentive shall file a complete
annual survey with the department. The survey is due by March 31st
following any year in which a tax incentive is claimed. The department
may extend the due date for timely filing of annual surveys under this
section as provided in RCW 82.32.590. The survey shall include the
amount of any tax incentive claimed. For a person claiming a credit
under section 3 of this act, the survey shall also include the
qualified aerospace product development expenditures during the
calendar year, whether the credit has been assigned under section 3(4)
of this act and who assigned the credit, the number of new products or
research projects by general classification, and the number of
trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with the qualified
aerospace product development activities. The first survey filed under
this subsection shall include employment, wage, and benefit information
for the twelve-month period immediately before first use of a tax
incentive. The annual survey shall also include the following
information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(b) As part of the annual survey, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the tax incentive program.
(c) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of any tax incentive claimed, is deemed taxpayer information under RCW
82.32.330. Information on the amount of any tax incentive claimed is
not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may
be disclosed to the public upon request, except as provided in (d) of
this subsection. If the amount of any tax incentive reported on the
survey is different than the amount actually claimed on the taxpayer's
tax returns or otherwise allowed by the department, the amount actually
claimed or allowed may be disclosed.
(d) Persons for whom the actual amount of all tax incentives
claimed on the taxpayer's returns or otherwise allowed by the
department is less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered
by the survey may request the department to treat the tax incentive
amount as confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(3) If a person fails to submit a complete annual survey under
subsection (2) of this section by the due date or any extension under
RCW 82.32.590, the department shall declare the amount of taxes against
which any tax incentive was claimed for that year to be immediately due
and payable. The department shall assess interest, but not penalties,
on the taxes against which the tax incentive was claimed. Interest
shall be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes
under this chapter, retroactively to the date the tax incentive was
claimed, and shall accrue until the taxes against which the tax
incentive was claimed are repaid.
(4) The department shall use the information from the annual survey
required under subsection (2) of this section to prepare summary
descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than three taxpayers
shall be included in any category. The department shall report these
statistics to the legislature each year by September 1st.
(5) In conjunction with the reports due under RCW 82.32.545, by
November 1, 2010, and November 1, 2023, the fiscal committees of the
house of representatives and the senate, in consultation with the
department, shall report to the legislature on the effectiveness of the
tax incentives authorized in sections 3, 5, and 7 of this act in regard
to keeping Washington competitive. The report shall measure the effect
of the tax incentives authorized in sections 3, 5, and 7 of this act on
job retention, net jobs created for Washington residents, company
growth, diversification of the state's economy, cluster dynamics, and
other factors as the committees select. The reports shall include a
discussion of principles to apply in evaluating whether the legislature
should reenact the tax incentives authorized in sections 3, 5, and 7 of
this act.
(6) A person who is subject to the requirements in RCW 82.32.545 is
not required to file a complete annual survey under this section if the
person timely files the annual report required by RCW 82.32.545.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "tax incentive" means a tax
credit under sections 3 and 7 of this act and the preferential tax
rates in RCW 82.04.260(12).

Sec. 9 RCW 82.32.590 and 2005 c 514 s 1001 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey under RCW 82.04.4452 or section 8 of this act by the
due date was the result of circumstances beyond the control of the
taxpayer, the department shall extend the time for filing the survey.
Such extension shall be for a period of thirty days from the date the
department issues its written notification to the taxpayer that it
qualifies for an extension under this section. The department may
grant additional extensions as it deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey by the due date was the result of circumstances
beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department shall be guided by
rules adopted by the department for the waiver or cancellation of
penalties when the underpayment or untimely payment of any tax was due
to circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.32.600 and 2005 c 514 s 1002 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Persons required to file surveys under RCW 82.04.4452 or
section 8 of this act must electronically file with the department all
surveys, returns, and any other forms or information the department
requires in an electronic format as provided or approved by the
department((, unless the department grants relief under subsection (2)
of this section)). As used in this section, "returns" has the same
meaning as "return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(2) ((Upon request, the department may relieve a person of the
obligations in subsection (1) of this section if the person's taxes
have been reduced a cumulative total of less than one thousand dollars
from all of the credits, exemptions, or preferential business and
occupation tax rates, for which a person is required to file an annual
survey under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.535, 82.32.545, 82.32.570,
82.32.560, 82.60.070, or 82.63.020.
(3) Persons who no longer qualify for relief under subsection (2)
of this section will be notified in writing by the department and must
comply with subsection (1) of this section by the date provided in the
notice.
(4))) Any survey, return, or any other form or information required
to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format.
(3) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
subsection (1) of this section for good cause shown.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---