BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.44.020 and 2005 c 512 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington,
juvenile department.
(2) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department, the
prosecuting attorney, the state patrol, the director of public safety,
or the office of the sheriff.
(3) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a
person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine and
surgery, optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic
medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery or to provide other
health services. The term "practitioner" includes a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a person who
is being furnished Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner will not be considered, for that reason
alone, a neglected person for the purposes of this chapter.
(4) "Institution" means a private or public hospital or any other
facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment or care.
(5) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(6) "Child" or "children" means any person under the age of
eighteen years of age.
(7) "Professional school personnel" include, but are not limited
to, teachers, counselors, administrators, child care facility
personnel, and school nurses.
(8) "Social service counselor" means anyone engaged in a
professional capacity during the regular course of employment in
encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support or education of
children, or providing social services to adults or families, including
mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and domestic violence
programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an employee or agent
of any public or private organization or institution.
(9) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology
under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as
an employee or agent of any public or private organization or
institution.
(10) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter
18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee
or agent of any public or private organization or institution.
(11) "Clergy" means any regularly licensed or ordained minister,
priest, or rabbi of any church or religious denomination, whether
acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any
public or private organization or institution.
(12) "Abuse or neglect" means sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or
injury of a child by any person under circumstances which cause harm to
the child's health, welfare, or safety, excluding conduct permitted
under RCW 9A.16.100; or the negligent treatment or maltreatment of a
child by a person responsible for or providing care to the child. An
abused child is a child who has been subjected to child abuse or
neglect as defined in this section.
(13) "Child protective services section" means the child protective
services section of the department.
(14) "Sexual exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing, permitting, or
encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any person; or (b)
allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in the obscene or
pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of a child by any
person.
(15) "Negligent treatment or maltreatment" means an act or a
failure to act, or the cumulative effects of a pattern of conduct,
behavior, or inaction, that evidences a serious disregard of
consequences of such magnitude as to constitute a clear and present
danger to a child's health, welfare, or safety. When considering
whether a clear and present danger exists, evidence of a parent's
substance abuse as a contributing factor to negligent treatment or
maltreatment shall be given great weight. The fact that siblings share
a bedroom is not, in and of itself, negligent treatment or
maltreatment. Poverty, homelessness, or exposure to domestic violence
as defined in RCW 26.50.010 that is perpetrated against someone other
than the child ((do [does])) does not constitute negligent treatment or
maltreatment in and of ((themselves [itself])) itself.
(16) "Child protective services" means those services provided by
the department designed to protect children from child abuse and
neglect and safeguard such children from future abuse and neglect, and
conduct investigations of child abuse and neglect reports.
Investigations may be conducted regardless of the location of the
alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes referral
to services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of
children, the coordination of necessary programs and services relevant
to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse and
neglect, and services to children to ensure that each child has a
permanent home. In determining whether protective services should be
provided, the department shall not decline to provide such services
solely because of the child's unwillingness or developmental inability
to describe the nature and severity of the abuse or neglect.
(17) "Malice" or "maliciously" means an evil intent, wish, or
design to vex, annoy, or injure another person. Such malice may be
inferred from an act done in willful disregard of the rights of
another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an
act or omission of duty betraying a willful disregard of social duty.
(18) "Sexually aggressive youth" means a child who is defined in
RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive youth.
(19) "Screened-out report" means a report of alleged child abuse or
neglect that the department has determined does not rise to the level
of a credible report of abuse or neglect and is not referred for
investigation.
(20) "Unfounded" means ((available information indicates)) a
finding at the completion of an investigation by the department or a
judicial finding that, more likely than not, child abuse or neglect did
not occur. ((No unfounded allegation of child abuse or neglect may be
disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any
other provider licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.))
(21) "Inconclusive" means a finding at the completion of an
investigation by the department that there is insufficient evidence to
conclude that the alleged child abuse or neglect occurred.
(22) "Founded" means a finding at the completion of an
investigation by the department or a judicial finding that, more likely
than not, the alleged child abuse or neglect occurred.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.44.030 and 2005 c 417 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner,
law enforcement officer, professional school personnel, registered or
licensed nurse, social service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist,
licensed or certified child care providers or their employees, employee
of the department, juvenile probation officer, placement and liaison
specialist, responsible living skills program staff, HOPE center staff,
or state family and children's ombudsman or any volunteer in the
ombudsman's office has reasonable cause to believe that a child has
suffered abuse or neglect, he or she shall report such incident, or
cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to
the department as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(b) When any person, in his or her official supervisory capacity
with a nonprofit or for-profit organization, has reasonable cause to
believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect caused by a person
over whom he or she regularly exercises supervisory authority, he or
she shall report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the
proper law enforcement agency, provided that the person alleged to have
caused the abuse or neglect is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the organization and coaches, trains, educates, or
counsels a child or children or regularly has unsupervised access to a
child or children as part of the employment, contract, or voluntary
service. No one shall be required to report under this section when he
or she obtains the information solely as a result of a privileged
communication as provided in RCW 5.60.060.
Nothing in this subsection (1)(b) shall limit a person's duty to
report under (a) of this subsection.
For the purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Official supervisory capacity" means a position, status, or
role created, recognized, or designated by any nonprofit or for-profit
organization, either for financial gain or without financial gain,
whose scope includes, but is not limited to, overseeing, directing, or
managing another person who is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the nonprofit or for-profit organization.
(ii) "Regularly exercises supervisory authority" means to act in
his or her official supervisory capacity on an ongoing or continuing
basis with regards to a particular person.
(c) The reporting requirement also applies to department of
corrections personnel who, in the course of their employment, observe
offenders or the children with whom the offenders are in contact. If,
as a result of observations or information received in the course of
his or her employment, any department of corrections personnel has
reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect,
he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.
(d) The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult who has
reasonable cause to believe that a child who resides with them, has
suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable of making a report. For
the purposes of this subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the
following: Any single act of abuse that causes physical trauma of
sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause death; any
single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep
bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than
one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep
bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or
unconsciousness.
(e) The report must be made at the first opportunity, but in no
case longer than forty-eight hours after there is reasonable cause to
believe that the child has suffered abuse or neglect. The report must
include the identity of the accused if known.
(2) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred
during childhood if it is discovered after the child has become an
adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to believe other children
are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the accused, the reporting
requirement of subsection (1) of this section does apply.
(3) Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe that a
child has suffered abuse or neglect may report such incident to the
proper law enforcement agency or to the department of social and health
services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(4) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law
enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received
by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written
report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within
five days thereafter.
(5) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means, or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in writing as provided
in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney for
appropriate action whenever the law enforcement agency's investigation
reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law enforcement
agency shall also notify the department of all reports received and the
law enforcement agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases,
where the child's welfare is endangered, the law enforcement agency
shall notify the department within twenty-four hours. In all other
cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within
seventy-two hours after a report is received by the law enforcement
agency.
(6) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under
subsection (5) of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the
victim requests, and the local office of the department, of the
decision to charge or decline to charge a crime, within five days of
making the decision.
(7) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under
this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with
designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child
protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under
this section if the department determines it is in the best interests
of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(8) Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed
under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical
opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and
that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if returned home,
the department shall file a dependency petition unless a second
licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such expert
medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate a
second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that
such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the
child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the
physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home
while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.
(9) Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (7)
of this section shall not further disseminate or release the
information except as authorized by state or federal statute.
Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(10) Upon receiving a report((s)) of alleged abuse or neglect, the
department shall:
(a) Make reasonable efforts to learn the name, address, and
telephone number of each person making a report of abuse or neglect
under this section. The department shall provide assurances of
appropriate confidentiality of the identification of persons reporting
under this section. If the department is unable to learn the
information required under this subsection, the department shall only
investigate cases in which:
(i) The department believes there is a serious threat of
substantial harm to the child;
(ii) The report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that
has, or is about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or
(iii) The department has a prior founded report of abuse or neglect
that is within three years of receipt of the referral;
(b) Unless the report is screened-out or being investigated by a
law enforcement agency, conduct an investigation within time frames
established by the department in rule; and
(c) Make a finding that the report of child abuse or neglect is
unfounded, founded, or inconclusive at the completion of the
investigation.
(11) In conducting an investigation of alleged abuse or neglect,
the department or law enforcement agency:
(a) May interview children. The interviews may be conducted on
school premises, at day-care facilities, at the child's home, or at
other suitable locations outside of the presence of parents. Parental
notification of the interview must occur at the earliest possible point
in the investigation that will not jeopardize the safety or protection
of the child or the course of the investigation. Prior to commencing
the interview the department or law enforcement agency shall determine
whether the child wishes a third party to be present for the interview
and, if so, shall make reasonable efforts to accommodate the child's
wishes. Unless the child objects, the department or law enforcement
agency shall make reasonable efforts to include a third party in any
interview so long as the presence of the third party will not
jeopardize the course of the investigation((.
(11) Upon receiving a report of alleged child abuse and neglect,
the department or investigating law enforcement agency)); and
(b) Shall have access to all relevant records of the child in the
possession of mandated reporters and their employees.
(12) The department shall maintain investigation records and
conduct timely and periodic reviews of all founded cases
((constituting)) of abuse and neglect. The department shall maintain
a log of screened-out nonabusive cases.
(13) The department shall use a risk assessment process when
investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The
department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the
placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a
risk factor. The department shall, within funds appropriated for this
purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to persons who are
determined not to require further state intervention.
(14) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect the law
enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making the
report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is
involved in the reporting.
(((15) The department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the
name, address, and telephone number of each person making a report of
abuse or neglect under this section. The department shall provide
assurances of appropriate confidentiality of the identification of
persons reporting under this section. If the department is unable to
learn the information required under this subsection, the department
shall only investigate cases in which: (a) The department believes
there is a serious threat of substantial harm to the child; (b) the
report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that has, or is
about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or (c) the department
has, after investigation, a report of abuse or neglect that has been
founded with regard to a member of the household within three years of
receipt of the referral.))

Sec. 3 RCW 26.44.031 and 1997 c 282 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To protect the privacy in reporting and the maintenance of
reports of nonaccidental injury, neglect, death, sexual abuse, and
cruelty to children by their parents, and to safeguard against
arbitrary, malicious, or erroneous information or actions, the
department shall not disclose or maintain information related to
((unfounded referrals in files or)) reports of child abuse or neglect
((for longer than six years)) except as provided in this section.
((At the end of six years from receipt of the unfounded report, the
information shall be purged unless an additional report has been
received in the intervening period.))
(2) The department shall destroy all of its records concerning:
(a) A screened-out report, within thirty days from the receipt of
the report;
(b) An unfounded report, within one year of completion of the
investigation; and
(c) An inconclusive report, within six years of completion of the
investigation, unless a prior or subsequent founded report has been
received before the records are destroyed.
(3) The department may keep records concerning founded reports of
child abuse or neglect as the department determines by rule.
(4) An unfounded or screened-out report may not be disclosed to a
child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any other provider
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.
(5) A person who is the subject of an unfounded report that was
made prior to the effective date of this section may request that the
department destroy all of the records concerning the unfounded report
if one year or more has elapsed since the completion of the
investigation.
(6)(a) If the department fails to comply with this section, an
individual who is the subject of a report may institute proceedings for
injunctive or other appropriate relief for enforcement of the
requirement to purge information. These proceedings may be instituted
in the superior court for the county in which the person resides or, if
the person is not then a resident of this state, in the superior court
for Thurston county.
(b) If the department fails to comply with subsection (4) of this
section and an individual who is the subject of the report is harmed by
the disclosure of information, in addition to the relief provided in
(a) of this subsection, the court may award a penalty of up to one
thousand dollars and reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs to the
petitioner.
(c) A proceeding under this subsection does not preclude other
methods of enforcement provided for by law.
(7) The department shall establish, by rule, a process and
standards for an individual who is the subject of an inconclusive
report of child abuse or neglect to request destruction of department
records earlier than the time frames set out in this section.
(8) Nothing in this section shall prevent the department from
retaining general, nonidentifying information which is required for
state and federal reporting and management purposes.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.13.280 and 2001 c 318 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 70.24.105, whenever a child is placed
in out-of-home care by the department or a child-placing agency, the
department or agency shall share information about the child and the
child's family with the care provider and shall consult with the care
provider regarding the child's case plan. If the child is dependent
pursuant to a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW, the department or
agency shall keep the care provider informed regarding the dates and
location of dependency review and permanency planning hearings
pertaining to the child.
(2) Information about the child and the child's family shall
include information about behavioral and emotional problems of the
child and whether the child is a sexually aggressive youth as provided
in RCW 74.13.075.
(3) Any person who receives information about a child or a child's
family pursuant to this section shall keep the information confidential
and shall not further disclose or disseminate the information except as
authorized by law.
(((3))) (4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the
authority of the department or child-placing agencies to disclose
client information or to maintain client confidentiality as provided by
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A care provider may not be found to have abused or neglected a
child under chapter 26.44 RCW or be denied a license pursuant to
chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 for any allegations of failure to
supervise wherein:
(a) The allegations arise from the child's conduct that is
substantially similar to prior behavior of the child and:
(i) The child is a sexually aggressive youth as defined in RCW
74.13.075 and this fact was not disclosed to the care provider as
required by RCW 74.13.280; or
(ii) The child has behavioral or emotional problems that were known
to the department and the problems were not disclosed to the care
provider as required by RCW 74.13.280; or
(b) The child was not within the reasonable control of the care
provider at the time of the incident that is the subject of the
allegation.
(2) Allegations of child abuse or neglect that meet the provisions
of this section shall be designated as "unfounded" as defined in RCW
26.44.020.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.15.130 and 2005 c 473 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An agency may be denied a license, or any license issued
pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 may be suspended,
revoked, modified, or not renewed by the secretary upon proof (a) that
the agency has failed or refused to comply with the provisions of
chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 or the requirements promulgated
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031; or
(b) that the conditions required for the issuance of a license under
chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 have ceased to exist with respect
to such licenses. RCW 43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial,
revocation, suspension, or modification and provides the right to an
adjudicative proceeding.
(2) In any adjudicative proceeding regarding the denial,
modification, suspension, or revocation of a foster family home
license, the department's decision shall be upheld if there is
reasonable cause to believe that:
(a) The applicant or licensee lacks the character, suitability, or
competence to care for children placed in out-of-home care, however, no
unfounded or screened-out report of child abuse or neglect may be used
to deny employment or a license;
(b) The applicant or licensee has failed or refused to comply with
any provision of chapter 74.15 RCW, RCW 74.13.031, or the requirements
adopted pursuant to such provisions; or
(c) The conditions required for issuance of a license under chapter
74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 have ceased to exist with respect to such
licenses.
(3) In any adjudicative proceeding regarding the denial,
modification, suspension, or revocation of any license under this
chapter, other than a foster family home license, the department's
decision shall be upheld if it is supported by a preponderance of the
evidence.
(4) The department may assess civil monetary penalties upon proof
that an agency has failed or refused to comply with the rules adopted
under the provisions of this chapter and RCW 74.13.031 or that an
agency subject to licensing under this chapter and RCW 74.13.031 is
operating without a license except that civil monetary penalties shall
not be levied against a licensed foster home. Monetary penalties
levied against unlicensed agencies that submit an application for
licensure within thirty days of notification and subsequently become
licensed will be forgiven. These penalties may be assessed in addition
to or in lieu of other disciplinary actions. Civil monetary penalties,
if imposed, may be assessed and collected, with interest, for each day
an agency is or was out of compliance. Civil monetary penalties shall
not exceed seventy-five dollars per violation for a family day-care
home and two hundred fifty dollars per violation for group homes, child
day-care centers, and child-placing agencies. Each day upon which the
same or substantially similar action occurs is a separate violation
subject to the assessment of a separate penalty. The department shall
provide a notification period before a monetary penalty is effective
and may forgive the penalty levied if the agency comes into compliance
during this period. The department may suspend, revoke, or not renew
a license for failure to pay a civil monetary penalty it has assessed
pursuant to this chapter within ten days after such assessment becomes
final. Chapter 43.20A RCW governs notice of a civil monetary penalty
and provides the right of an adjudicative proceeding. The
preponderance of evidence standard shall apply in adjudicative
proceedings related to assessment of civil monetary penalties.
(5)(a) In addition to or in lieu of an enforcement action being
taken, the department may place a child day-care center or family day-care provider on nonreferral status if the center or provider has
failed or refused to comply with this chapter or rules adopted under
this chapter or an enforcement action has been taken. The nonreferral
status may continue until the department determines that: (i) No
enforcement action is appropriate; or (ii) a corrective action plan has
been successfully concluded.
(b) Whenever a child day-care center or family day-care provider is
placed on nonreferral status, the department shall provide written
notification to the child day-care center or family day-care provider.
(6) The department shall notify appropriate public and private
child care resource and referral agencies of the department's decision
to: (a) Take an enforcement action against a child day-care center or
family day-care provider; or (b) place or remove a child day-care
center or family day-care provider on nonreferral status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The code reviser shall alphabetize the
definitions in RCW 26.44.020 and correct any references.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 3, 6, and 7 of this act
take effect January 1, 2007, unless the department of social and health
services presents a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature before that date, including recommendations and proposed
legislation, addressing the retention, expungement, and disclosure of
reports of child abuse and neglect made to the department, in which
case sections 1 through 3, 6, and 7 are void.

--- END ---