BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.44.205 and 2005 c 243 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person desiring to vote at any primary or election is required
to provide valid photo identification to the election officer before
signing the poll book. ((The identification required in this section
can be satisfied by providing a valid photo identification, such as a
driver's license or state identification card, student identification
card, or tribal identification card, a voter's voter identification
issued by a county elections officer, or a copy of a current utility
bill, bank statement, paycheck, or government check or other government
document.)) Valid photo identification consists of any one of the
following:
(1) A valid driver's license;
(2) A valid state identification card;
(3) A valid United States passport;
(4) A valid tribal identification card;
(5) A valid United States military identification card.
Any individual who desires to vote in person but cannot provide
identification as required by this section shall be issued a
provisional ballot.
The secretary of state may adopt rules to carry out this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.117 and 2005 c 314 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Issuance. The department shall issue an identicard,
containing a picture, if the applicant:
(((a))) (i) Does not hold a valid Washington driver's license;
(((b))) (ii) Proves his or her identity as required by RCW
46.20.035 and 29A.44.205; and
(((c))) (iii) Pays the required fee. The fee is twenty dollars
unless an applicant is a recipient of continuing public assistance
grants under Title 74 RCW, who is referred in writing by the secretary
of social and health services. For those persons the fee must be the
actual cost of production of the identicard.
(b) The department may not collect a fee for an identification card
from a person:
(i) Who swears under oath that he or she is indigent and cannot pay
the fee for an identification card, that he or she desires an
identification card in order to vote in a primary or election in
Washington, and that he or she does not have any other form of
identification that is acceptable under RCW 29A.44.205 in order to
vote; and
(ii) Who produces evidence that he or she is registered to vote in
Washington. This subsection does not apply to a person who has been
issued a driver's license in this state.
(2) Design and term. The identicard must:
(a) Be distinctly designed so that it will not be confused with the
official driver's license; and
(b) Expire on the fifth anniversary of the applicant's birthdate
after issuance.
(3) Renewal. An application for identicard renewal may be
submitted by means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her identicard by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired. However, the
department may accept an application for renewal of an identicard
submitted by means of mail or electronic commerce only if specific
authority and funding is provided for this purpose by June 30, 2004, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act.
An identicard may not be renewed by mail or by electronic commerce
unless the renewal issued by the department includes a photograph of
the identicard holder.
(4) Cancellation. The department may cancel an identicard if the
holder of the identicard used the card or allowed others to use the
card in violation of RCW 46.20.0921.

--- END ---