BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.56.025 and 2003 c 12 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The interest and penalties for delinquencies on property taxes
shall be waived by the county treasurer if the notice for these taxes
due, as provided in RCW 84.56.050, was not sent to a taxpayer due to
error by the county. Where waiver of interest and penalties has
occurred, the full amount of interest and penalties shall be reinstated
if the taxpayer fails to pay the delinquent taxes within thirty days of
receiving notice that the taxes are due. Each county treasurer shall,
subject to guidelines prepared by the department of revenue, establish
administrative procedures to determine if taxpayers are eligible for
this waiver.
(2) In addition to the waiver under subsection (1) of this section,
the interest and penalties for delinquencies on property taxes shall be
waived by the county treasurer under the following circumstances:
(a) The taxpayer fails to make one payment under RCW 84.56.020 by
the due date on the taxpayer's personal residence because of hardship
caused by the death or serious illness of the taxpayer's spouse,
parent, sibling, or child who resides with the taxpayer, if the
taxpayer notifies the county treasurer of the hardship within sixty
days of the tax due date; ((or))
(b) The taxpayer fails to make one payment under RCW 84.56.020 by
the due date on the taxpayer's parent's or stepparent's personal
residence because of hardship caused by the death of the taxpayer's
parent or stepparent if the taxpayer notifies the county treasurer of
the hardship within sixty days of the tax due date; or
(c) The taxpayer fails to make a payment due to circumstances
beyond the control of the taxpayer, as determined by the department by
rule.
(3) Before allowing a hardship waiver under subsection (2) of this
section, the county treasurer may require a copy of the death
certificate along with an affidavit signed by the taxpayer.

--- END ---