BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of social and health services
shall seek all necessary exemptions and waivers from and amendments to
federal statutes, rules, and regulations to exempt housing assistance
or housing vouchers received by military personnel as income for
purposes of determining eligibility under this act for food stamps or
food stamp benefits transferred electronically and medical assistance.
The department shall report annually to the appropriate committees of
the legislature on the efforts to secure the federal changes to permit
full implementation of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---