BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 85.38.075 and 1998 c 121 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
The members of the governing body may each receive up to seventy
dollars in compensation for attendance at official meetings of the
governing body and for each day or major part thereof for all necessary
services actually performed in connection with their duties as a
member. To be eligible to receive this compensation, the land located
within the special district owned by the member of the governing body
of that special district shall not be subject to any lien for
delinquent special assessments under RCW 85.38.178. The governing body
shall fix the compensation to be paid to the eligible members,
secretary, and all other agents and employees of the district.
Compensation for the members shall not exceed six thousand seven
hundred twenty dollars in one calendar year. A member is entitled to
reimbursement for reasonable expenses actually incurred in connection
with such business, including subsistence and lodging, while away from
the member's place of residence, and mileage for use of a privately
owned vehicle in accordance with chapter 42.24 RCW.
Any member may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation
payable under this section as to any month or months during his or her
term of office, by a written waiver filed with the secretary as
provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed
any time after the member's election and prior to the date on which the
compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the
month or period of months for which it is made.

--- END ---