BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.383 and 2004 c 270 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, except where the
context clearly indicates a different meaning:
(1) The term "residence" means a single family dwelling unit
whether such unit be separate or part of a multiunit dwelling,
including the land on which such dwelling stands not to exceed one
acre, except that a residence includes any additional property up to a
total of five acres that comprises the residential parcel if this
larger parcel size is required under land use regulations. The term
shall also include a share ownership in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership if the person claiming
exemption can establish that his or her share represents the specific
unit or portion of such structure in which he or she resides. The term
shall also include a single family dwelling situated upon lands the fee
of which is vested in the United States or any instrumentality thereof
including an Indian tribe or in the state of Washington, and
notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090, such a
residence shall be deemed real property.
(2) The term "real property" shall also include a mobile home which
has substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its
being fixed in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the
mobile home and placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed
pipe, connections with sewer, water, or other utilities. A mobile home
located on land leased by the owner of the mobile home is subject, for
tax billing, payment, and collection purposes, only to the personal
property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.
(3) "Department" means the state department of revenue.
(4) "Combined disposable income" means the disposable income of the
person claiming the exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her
spouse, and the disposable income of each cotenant occupying the
residence for the assessment year, less amounts paid by the person
claiming the exemption or his or her spouse during the assessment year
for:
(a) Drugs supplied by prescription of a medical practitioner
authorized by the laws of this state or another jurisdiction to issue
prescriptions;
(b) The treatment or care of either person received in the home or
in a nursing home, boarding home, or adult family home; and
(c) Health care insurance premiums for medicare under Title XVIII
of the social security act.
(5) "Disposable income" means adjusted gross income as defined in
the federal internal revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989,
or such subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent
with the purpose of this section, plus all of the following items to
the extent they are not included in or have been deducted from adjusted
gross income:
(a) Capital gains, other than gain excluded from income under
section 121 of the federal internal revenue code to the extent it is
reinvested in a new principal residence;
(b) Amounts deducted for loss;
(c) Amounts deducted for depreciation;
(d) Pension and annuity receipts;
(e) Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and
medical-aid payments;
(f) Veterans benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid
payments;
(g) Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;
(h) Dividend receipts; and
(i) Interest received on state and municipal bonds.
(6) "Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming
the exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.
(7) "Disability" has the same meaning as provided in 42 U.S.C. Sec.
423(d)(1)(A) as amended prior to January 1, 2004, or such subsequent
date as the director may provide by rule consistent with the purpose of
this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.38.020 and 1997 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the
following words and phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter shall
have the following meanings:
(1) "Claimant" means a person who either elects or is required
under RCW 84.64.050 to defer payment of the special assessments and/or
real property taxes accrued on the claimant's residence by filing a
declaration to defer as provided by this chapter.
When two or more individuals of a household file or seek to file a
declaration to defer, they may determine between them as to who the
claimant shall be.
(2) "Department" means the state department of revenue.
(3) "Equity value" means the amount by which the fair market value
of a residence as determined from the records of the county assessor
exceeds the total amount of any liens or other obligations against the
property.
(4) "Local government" means any city, town, county, water-sewer
district, public utility district, port district, irrigation district,
flood control district, or any other municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or other political subdivision authorized to
levy special assessments.
(5) "Real property taxes" means ad valorem property taxes levied on
a residence in this state in the preceding calendar year.
(6) "Residence" has the meaning given in RCW 84.36.383((, except
that a residence includes any additional property up to a total of five
acres that comprises the residential parcel if this larger parcel size
is required under land use regulations)).
(7) "Special assessment" means the charge or obligation imposed by
a local government upon property specially benefited.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.38.030 and 2004 c 270 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A claimant may defer payment of special assessments and/or real
property taxes on up to eighty percent of the amount of the claimant's
equity value in the claimant's residence if the following conditions
are met:
(1) The claimant must meet all requirements for an exemption for
the residence under RCW 84.36.381, other than the age and income limits
under RCW 84.36.381 ((and the parcel size limit under RCW 84.36.383)).
(2) The claimant must be sixty years of age or older on December
31st of the year in which the deferral claim is filed, or must have
been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by
reason of physical disability: PROVIDED, That any surviving spouse of
a person who was receiving a deferral at the time of the person's death
shall qualify if the surviving spouse is fifty-seven years of age or
older and otherwise meets the requirements of this section.
(3) The claimant must have a combined disposable income, as defined
in RCW 84.36.383, of forty thousand dollars or less.
(4) The claimant must have owned, at the time of filing, the
residence on which the special assessment and/or real property taxes
have been imposed. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned
by a marital community or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to be
owned by each spouse or cotenant. A claimant who has only a share
ownership in cooperative housing, a life estate, a lease for life, or
a revocable trust does not satisfy the ownership requirement.
(5) The claimant must have and keep in force fire and casualty
insurance in sufficient amount to protect the interest of the state in
the claimant's equity value: PROVIDED, That if the claimant fails to
keep fire and casualty insurance in force to the extent of the state's
interest in the claimant's equity value, the amount deferred shall not
exceed one hundred percent of the claimant's equity value in the land
or lot only.
(6) In the case of special assessment deferral, the claimant must
have opted for payment of such special assessments on the installment
method if such method was available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2007 and thereafter.

--- END ---