BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any steering committee that makes final selection of projects
funded from federal surface transportation program enhancement funds or
a similar program shall ensure, to the greatest extent practicable,
that funding for each transportation enhancement activity is allocated
such that the allocation meets or exceeds the national average of
allocations made for each respective activity. The secretary of
transportation may not approve a project list submitted by the steering
committee unless it reflects allocation decisions that comply with this
section. For the purpose of this section, "transportation enhancement
activity" means the eligible project categories designated under 23
U.S.C. Sec. 101(a)(35).
(2) By December 1, 2007, and every two years thereafter, the
department shall report to the transportation committees of the
legislature detailing the national average of allocations for each
transportation enhancement activity and indicating whether the state's
allocations have met or exceeded the national average of allocations
made for each respective activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.80 RCW
to read as follows:
Any regional transportation planning organization that makes
funding recommendations regarding the selection of projects funded from
federal surface transportation program enhancement funds or a similar
program shall ensure, to the greatest extent practicable, that funding
for each transportation enhancement activity is allocated such that the
allocation meets or exceeds the national average of allocations made
for each respective activity. For the purpose of this section,
"transportation enhancement activity" means the eligible project
categories designated under 23 U.S.C. Sec. 101(a)(35).

--- END ---