BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.20A.320 and 1997 c 58 s 802 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The department may send notice to a responsible parent
informing the responsible parent of the department's intent to submit
the parent's name to the department of licensing and any appropriate
licensing entity as a licensee who is not in compliance with a child
support order. Notice of noncompliance may be sent by first class
mail, appropriately addressed to the responsible parent's last known
mailing address on file with the department, postage prepaid, or by
personal service. Notice by mail is given upon deposit in the United
States mail.
(b) If the support order establishing or modifying a child support
obligation does not include a statement as required under RCW 26.23.050
(1)(d) or (3) that the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and
maintain a driver's license may not be renewed, or may be suspended if
the parent is not in compliance with a support order, the department
must serve upon a responsible parent a notice informing the responsible
parent of the department's intent to submit the parent's name to the
department of licensing and any appropriate licensing entity as a
licensee who is not in compliance with a child support order((. The
department shall attach a copy of the responsible parent's child
support order to the notice)) before certifying the name of the parent
to the department of licensing or any other licensing entity. Service
of the notice must be by certified mail, return receipt requested. If
service by certified mail is not successful, service shall be by
personal service.
(c) The department shall provide a copy of the responsible parent's
child support order, upon request.
(2) The notice of noncompliance must include the address and
telephone number of the department's division of child support office
that issues the notice and must inform the responsible parent that:
(a) The parent may request an adjudicative proceeding to contest
the issue of compliance with the child support order. The only issues
that may be considered at the adjudicative proceeding are whether the
parent is required to pay child support under a child support order and
whether the parent is in compliance with that order;
(b) A request for an adjudicative proceeding ((shall be in writing
and)) must be received by the department within twenty days of the date
of service of the notice, or within twenty days from the date the
notice was mailed to the parent if the department was not required to
serve the notice under subsection (1)(b) of this section;
(c) If the parent requests an adjudicative proceeding within twenty
days ((of service)) from the date the notice was mailed or served, the
department will stay action to certify the parent to the department of
licensing and any licensing entity for noncompliance with a child
support order pending entry of a written adjudicative decision ((after
the adjudicative proceeding)) or order;
(d) If the parent does not request an adjudicative proceeding
within twenty days of ((service)) the notice being mailed or served and
remains in noncompliance with a child support order, the department
will certify the parent's name to the department of licensing and any
appropriate licensing entity for noncompliance with a child support
order;
(e) The department will stay action to certify the parent to the
department of licensing and any licensing entity for noncompliance if
the parent agrees to make timely payments of current support and agrees
to a reasonable payment schedule for payment of the arrears. It is the
parent's responsibility to contact in person or by mail the
department's division of child support office indicated on the notice
within twenty days of ((service of)) the notice being mailed or served
to arrange for a payment schedule. The department may stay
certification for up to thirty days after contact from a parent to
arrange for a payment schedule;
(f) If the department certifies the responsible parent to the
department of licensing and a licensing entity for noncompliance with
a child support order, the licensing entity will suspend or not renew
the parent's license and the department of licensing will suspend or
not renew any driver's license that the parent holds until the parent
provides the department of licensing and the licensing entity with a
release from the department stating that the responsible parent is in
compliance with the child support order;
(g) If the department certifies the responsible parent as a person
who is in noncompliance with a child support order, the department of
fish and wildlife will suspend the fishing license, hunting license,
commercial fishing license, or any other license issued under chapters
77.32((, 77.28 75.28, and 75.25)) and 77.65 RCW that the responsible
parent may possess. Notice from the department of licensing that a
responsible parent's driver's license has been suspended shall serve as
notice of the suspension of a license issued under chapters 77.32 and
((75.25)) 77.65 RCW;
(h) Suspension of a license will affect insurability if the
responsible parent's insurance policy excludes coverage for acts
occurring after the suspension of a license;
(i) If, after ((receiving)) the notice of noncompliance with a
child support order is mailed or served, the responsible parent files
a motion to modify support with the court or requests the department to
amend a support obligation established by an administrative decision or
order, or if a motion for modification of a court or administrative
order for child support is pending, the department or the court may
stay action to certify the parent to the department of licensing and
any licensing entity for noncompliance with a child support order. A
stay shall not exceed six months unless the department finds good
cause. The responsible parent has the obligation to notify the
department that a modification proceeding is pending and provide a copy
of the motion or request for modification; and
(j) If the responsible parent subsequently becomes in compliance
with the child support order, the department will promptly provide the
parent with a release stating that the parent is in compliance with the
order, and the parent may request that the licensing entity or the
department of licensing reinstate the suspended license.
(3) Upon the mailing or serving of the notice described in
subsection (1) of this section, a responsible parent may request an
adjudicative proceeding upon service of the notice described in
subsection (1) of this section. The request for an adjudicative
proceeding must be received by the department within twenty days of
service or mailing of the notice by the department. The request must
((be in writing and)) indicate the current mailing address and daytime
phone number, if available, of the responsible parent. The proceedings
under this subsection shall be conducted in accordance with the
requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW. The issues that may be considered
at the adjudicative proceeding are limited to whether:
(a) The person named as the responsible parent is the responsible
parent;
(b) The responsible parent is required to pay child support under
a child support order; and
(c) The responsible parent is in compliance with the order.
(4) The decision resulting from the adjudicative proceeding must be
in writing and inform the responsible parent of his or her rights to
review. The parent's copy of the decision may be sent by regular mail
to the parent's most recent address of record.
(5) If a responsible parent contacts the department's division of
child support office indicated on the notice of noncompliance within
twenty days of ((service of)) the department mailing or serving the
notice and requests arrangement of a payment schedule, the department
shall stay the certification of noncompliance during negotiation of the
schedule for payment of arrears. In no event shall the stay continue
for more than thirty days from the date of contact by the parent. The
department shall establish a schedule for payment of arrears that is
fair and reasonable, and that considers the financial situation of the
responsible parent and the needs of all children who rely on the
responsible parent for support. At the end of the thirty days, if no
payment schedule has been agreed to in writing and the department has
acted in good faith, the department shall proceed with certification of
noncompliance.
(6) If a responsible parent timely requests an adjudicative
proceeding pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the department
may not certify the name of the parent to the department of licensing
or a licensing entity for noncompliance with a child support order
unless the adjudicative proceeding results in a finding that the
responsible parent is not in compliance with the order.
(7) The department may certify to the department of licensing and
any appropriate licensing entity the name of a responsible parent who
is not in compliance with a child support order ((or a residential or
visitation order)) if:
(a) The responsible parent does not timely request an adjudicative
proceeding upon the mailing or service of a notice issued under
subsection (1) of this section and is not in compliance with a child
support order twenty-one days after the mailing or service of the
notice;
(b) An adjudicative proceeding results in a decision or order that
the responsible parent is not in compliance with a child support order;
(c) The court enters a judgment on a petition for judicial review
that finds the responsible parent is not in compliance with a child
support order;
(d) The department and the responsible parent have been unable to
agree on a fair and reasonable schedule of payment of the arrears; or
(e) The responsible parent fails to comply with a payment schedule
established pursuant to subsection (5) of this section((; or)).
The department shall send by regular mail a copy of any
certification of noncompliance filed with the department of licensing
or a licensing entity to the responsible parent at the responsible
parent's most recent address of record.
(8) The department of licensing and a licensing entity shall,
without undue delay, notify a responsible parent certified by the
department under subsection (7) of this section that the parent's
driver's license or other license has been suspended because the
parent's name has been certified by the department as a responsible
parent who is not in compliance with a child support order ((or a
residential or visitation order)).
(9) When a responsible parent who is served notice under subsection
(1) of this section subsequently complies with the child support order,
((or when the department receives a court order under section 886 of
this act stating that the parent is in compliance with a residential or
visitation order,)) the department shall promptly provide the parent
with a release stating that the responsible parent is in compliance
with the order. A copy of the release shall be transmitted by the
department to the appropriate licensing entities.
(10) The department may adopt rules to implement and enforce the
requirements of this section. The department shall deliver a copy of
rules adopted to implement and enforce this section to the legislature
by June 30, 1998.
(11) Nothing in this section prohibits a responsible parent from
filing a motion to modify support with the court or from requesting the
department to amend a support obligation established by an
administrative decision. If there is a reasonable likelihood that a
pending motion or request will significantly change the amount of the
child support obligation, the department or the court may stay action
to certify the responsible parent to the department of licensing and
any licensing entity for noncompliance with a child support order. A
stay shall not exceed six months unless the department finds good cause
to extend the stay. The responsible parent has the obligation to
notify the department that a modification proceeding is pending and
provide a copy of the motion or request for modification.
(12) The department of licensing and a licensing entity may renew,
reinstate, or otherwise extend a license in accordance with the
licensing entity's or the department of licensing's rules after the
licensing entity or the department of licensing receives a copy of the
release specified in subsection (9) of this section. The department of
licensing and a licensing entity may waive any applicable requirement
for reissuance, renewal, or other extension if it determines that the
imposition of that requirement places an undue burden on the person and
that waiver of the requirement is consistent with the public interest.
(13) The procedures in chapter 58, Laws of 1997, constitute the
exclusive administrative remedy for contesting the establishment of
noncompliance with a child support order and suspension of a license
under this section, and satisfy the requirements of RCW 34.05.422.

--- END ---