BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that students need to
know and understand the structure, workings, and roots of our state and
nation's democratic institutions and traditions. The legislature
further finds that studies on the historical and civics knowledge of
America's students suggest that too few students are learning those
lessons well. The United States department of education's national
assessment of education progress shows that fewer than twenty-five
percent of America's students are proficient in either history or
civics. In addition, while most of the states have learning standards
in the two subjects, only twelve states have enough depth and breadth
in the standards to ensure that students will understand their civic
responsibilities and opportunities once the students reach adulthood.
The legislature intends to make it mandatory that all graduating
students have at least one course in civics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the graduating class of 2010, students must
complete at least one course in civics. The superintendent of public
instruction shall develop specific guidelines to implement this
requirement.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "civics" means the social
science that analyzes our state's and nation's democratic institutions
and traditions including the rights and duties of citizens.

--- END ---