BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Members of the public have expressed
concern regarding a recent United States Supreme Court decision, Kelo
v. New London (No. 04-108 (June 23, 2005)), which upheld, under the
United States Constitution, a Connecticut city's exercise of eminent
domain. It is the intent of the legislature to recognize, reaffirm,
and support existing Washington case law under Article I, section 16 of
the Washington State Constitution, that prohibits the condemnation of
private property other than for certain public purposes pursuant to
law.
(2) In light of the United States Supreme Court decision in Kelo v.
New London, the legislature intends to reaffirm existing Washington
state law relating to the use of eminent domain by state and local
governments. The intent of this act is to make clear that Article I,
section 16 of the Washington State Constitution prohibits the use of
eminent domain to take private property for private use, except under
narrow exceptions. To this end, the legislature recognizes, reaffirms,
and supports the restrictions on the use of eminent domain to take
private property for private use, as set forth in chapters 8.04, 8.08,
8.12, 8.16, and 8.20 RCW and in the Washington State Supreme Court's
decisions in Hogue v. Seattle, 54 Wn.2d 799, 341 P.2d 171 (1959);
Miller v. Tacoma, 61 Wn.2d 374, 378 P.2d 464 (1963); In re Petition of
Seattle, 96 Wn.2d 616, 638 P.2d 549 (1981); and State ex rel.
Washington State Convention & Trade Center v. Evans, 136 Wn.2d 811, 966
P.2d 1252 (1998).

--- END ---