BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.30.230 and 2003 c 53 s 270 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person, knowing it to be such, to:
(a) Present, or cause to be presented, a false or fraudulent claim,
or any proof in support of such a claim, for the payment of a loss
under a contract of insurance; or
(b) Prepare, make, or subscribe any false or fraudulent account,
certificate, affidavit, or proof of loss, or other document or writing,
with intent that it be presented or used in support of such a claim.
(2) It is unlawful for any person engaged in the business of
insurance, knowing it to be such, to:
(a) Present, or cause to be presented, a false or fraudulent
refusal of a claim, or any proof in support of such a refused claim,
for the payment of a loss under a contract of insurance; or
(b) Prepare, make, or subscribe any false or fraudulent account,
certificate, affidavit, or proof of loss, or other document or writing,
with intent that it be presented or used in support of such a refusal
to pay a claim.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a violation of
this section is a gross misdemeanor.
(b) If the claim is in excess of one thousand five hundred dollars,
the violation is a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20
RCW.

--- END ---