BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.16.220 and 2005 c 422 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a worker of a nongovernment employer is injured or
develops an occupational disease due to an exposure while assisting in
the life and rescue phase of an emergency, in response to a request for
assistance from a Washington state or local government entity located
in Washington state, including fire service or law enforcement, the
cost of benefits shall be reimbursed from the disaster response
account, RCW 38.52.105, to the appropriate workers' compensation fund,
or to the self-insured employer, as the case may be. The cost of such
injuries or occupational diseases shall not be charged to the
experience record of a state fund employer.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "life and rescue phase" means
the first seventy-two hours after the occurrence of a natural or man-made disaster that results in a state of emergency proclaimed pursuant
to Washington state or local law, and during which time a Washington
state or ((municipal)) local government entity located within
Washington state, including fire service or law enforcement,
((acknowledges or declares such a disaster and)) requests assistance
from the private sector in locating and rescuing survivors. The
initial life and rescue phase may be extended for a finite period of
time by declaration of the state or ((municipal)) local government
entity requesting assistance.

--- END ---