BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.53.030 and 2005 c 105 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature recognizes the ethical obligation of
attorneys to represent clients without interference by third parties in
the discharge of professional obligations to clients. However, to
ensure the most beneficial use of state resources, the legislature
finds that it is within the authority of the legislature to specify the
categories of legal cases in which qualified legal aid programs may
provide civil representation with state moneys. Accordingly, moneys
appropriated for civil legal representation shall not be used for legal
representation that is either outside the scope of this section or
prohibited by this section.
(b) Nothing in this section is intended to limit the authority of
existing entities, including but not limited to the Washington state
bar association, the public disclosure commission, the state auditor,
and the federal legal services corporation to resolve issues within
their respective jurisdictions.
(2) Any money appropriated by the legislature for civil
representation of indigent persons shall be administered by the office
of civil legal aid established under RCW 2.53.020, and shall be used
solely for the purpose of contracting with qualified legal aid programs
for legal representation of indigent persons in matters relating to:
(a) Domestic relations and family law matters, (b) public assistance
and health care, (c) housing and utilities, (d) social security, (e)
mortgage foreclosures, (f) home protection bankruptcies, (g) consumer
fraud and unfair sales practices, (h) rights of residents of long-term
care facilities, (i) wills, estates, and living wills, (j) elder abuse,
and (k) guardianship.
(3) For purposes of this section, a "qualified legal aid program"
means a not-for-profit corporation incorporated and operating
exclusively in Washington which has received basic field funding for
the provision of civil legal aid to indigents from the federal legal
services corporation or that has received funding for civil legal aid
for indigents under this section before July 1, 1997.
(4) When entering into a contract with a qualified legal aid
provider under this section, the office of civil legal aid shall
require the provider to provide legal aid in a manner that maximizes
geographic access throughout the state.
(5) Funds distributed to qualified legal aid programs under this
section may not be used directly or indirectly for:
(a) Lobbying.
(i) For purposes of this section, "lobbying" means any personal
service, advertisement, telegram, telephone communication, letter,
printed or written matter, or other device directly or indirectly
intended to influence any member of congress or any other federal,
state, or local nonjudicial official, whether elected or appointed:
(A) In connection with any act, bill, resolution, or similar
legislation by the congress of the United States or by any state or
local legislative body, or any administrative rule, rule-making
activity, standard, rate, or other enactment by any federal, state, or
local administrative agency;
(B) In connection with any referendum, initiative, constitutional
amendment, or any similar procedure of the congress, any state
legislature, any local council, or any similar governing body acting in
a legislative capacity; or
(C) In connection with inclusion of any provision in a legislative
measure appropriating funds to, or defining or limiting the functions
or authority of, the recipient of funds under this section.
(ii) "Lobbying" does not include the response of an employee of a
legal aid program to a written request from a governmental agency, an
elected or appointed official, or committee on a specific matter. This
exception does not authorize communication with anyone other than the
requesting party, or agent or employee of such agency, official, or
committee.
(b) Grass roots lobbying. For purposes of this section, "grass
roots lobbying" means preparation, production, or dissemination of
information the purpose of which is to encourage the public at large,
or any definable segment thereof, to contact legislators or their staff
in support of or in opposition to pending or proposed legislation; or
contribute to or participate in a demonstration, march, rally, lobbying
campaign, or letter writing or telephone campaign for the purpose of
influencing the course of pending or proposed legislation.
(c) Class action lawsuits.
(d) Participating in or identifying the program with prohibited
political activities. For purposes of this section, "prohibited
political activities" means (i) any activity directed toward the
success or failure of a political party, a candidate for partisan or
nonpartisan office, a partisan political group, or a ballot measure;
(ii) advertising or contributing or soliciting financial support for or
against any candidate, political group, or ballot measure; or (iii)
voter registration or transportation activities.
(e) Representation in fee-generating cases. For purposes of this
section, "fee-generating" means a case that might reasonably be
expected to result in a fee for legal aid if undertaken by a private
attorney. The charging of a fee pursuant to subsection (6) of this
section does not establish the fee-generating nature of a case.
A fee-generating case may be accepted when: (i) The case has been
rejected by the local lawyer referral services or by two private
attorneys; (ii) neither the referral service nor two private attorneys
will consider the case without payment of a consultation fee; (iii)
after consultation with the appropriate representatives of the private
bar, the program has determined that the type of case is one that
private attorneys do not ordinarily accept, or do not accept without
prepayment of a fee; or (iv) the director of the program or the
director's designee has determined that referral of the case to the
private bar is not possible because documented attempts to refer
similar cases in the past have been futile, or because emergency
circumstances compel immediate action before referral can be made, but
the client is advised that, if appropriate and consistent with
professional responsibility, referral will be attempted at a later
time.
(f) Organizing any association, union, or federation, or
representing a labor union. However, nothing in this subsection (5)(f)
prohibits the provision of legal aid to clients as otherwise permitted
by this section.
(g) Representation of undocumented aliens, except for those people
who are victims of sexual assault, domestic violence, or human
trafficking.
(h) Picketing, demonstrations, strikes, or boycotts.
(i) Engaging in inappropriate solicitation. For purposes of this
section, "inappropriate solicitation" means promoting the assertion of
specific legal claims among persons who know of their rights to make a
claim and who decline to do so. Nothing in this subsection precludes
a legal aid program or its employees from providing information
regarding legal rights and responsibilities or providing information
regarding the program's services and intake procedures through
community legal education activities, responding to an individual's
specific question about whether the individual should consult with an
attorney or take legal action, or responding to an individual's
specific request for information about the individual's legal rights or
request for assistance in connection with a specific legal problem.
(j) Conducting training programs that: (i) Advocate particular
public policies; (ii) encourage or facilitate political activities,
labor or antilabor activities, boycotts, picketing, strikes, or
demonstrations; or (iii) attempt to influence legislation or rule
making. Nothing in this subsection (5)(j) precludes representation of
clients as otherwise permitted by this section.
(6) The office of civil legal aid may establish requirements for
client participation in the provision of civil legal aid under this
section, including but not limited to copayments and sliding fee
scales.
(7)(a) Contracts entered into by the office of civil legal aid with
qualified legal aid programs under this section must specify that the
program's expenditures of moneys distributed under this section:
(i) Must be audited annually by an independent outside auditor.
These audit results must be provided to the office of civil legal aid;
and
(ii) Are subject to audit by the state auditor.
(b)(i) Any entity auditing a legal aid program under this section
shall have access to all records of the legal aid program to the full
extent necessary to determine compliance with this section, with the
exception of confidential information protected by the United States
Constitution, the state Constitution, the attorney-client privilege,
and applicable rules of attorney conduct.
(ii) The legal aid program shall have a system allowing for
production of case-specific information, including client eligibility
and case type, to demonstrate compliance with this section, with the
exception of confidential information protected by the United States
Constitution, the state Constitution, the attorney-client privilege,
and applicable rules of attorney conduct. Such information shall be
available to any entity that audits the program.
(8) The office of civil legal aid must recover or withhold amounts
determined by an audit to have been used in violation of this section.
(9) The office of civil legal aid may adopt rules to implement this
section.

--- END ---