BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Washington has a long and proud history of establishing minimum
labor standards and protecting employee rights. This history is
exemplified by the state's industrial welfare, minimum wage, safety and
health, and family leave laws, and the state's industrial insurance and
unemployment compensation systems;
(b) Most working Washingtonians obtain health insurance coverage
through their employment, and a substantial majority of very large
employers responsibly offer health coverage to their employees in
Washington state. However, the failure of some very large employers to
offer affordable health coverage to their employees in Washington state
has created inappropriate competitive advantages for those employers,
and greatly increased the likelihood that their employees will be
uninsured or enroll in publicly funded health care programs;
(c) Washington state has a long standing tradition and interest in
financing and providing access to appropriate health care services for
low-income working families. Currently, one in six Washington state
residents receive health care coverage through either the medicaid
program, the state children's health insurance program, or the
Washington basic health plan. Despite this tradition, in 2004, more
than six hundred thousand Washingtonians were uninsured. The number of
uninsured Washingtonians has grown in the last several years, due in
substantial part to erosion in employer-sponsored health benefits; and
(d) Most uninsured working-age adults have workers in their family,
and low-wage workers are at greatest risk of being uninsured. This
situation impacts Washington state, as uninsured low-wage workers seek
health coverage through publicly funded programs such as the Washington
basic health plan, medicaid, and the state children's health insurance
program. In addition, uninsured low-wage workers seek care in hospital
emergency rooms and community health clinics when addressing their
health problems cannot be delayed any longer. This results in
uncompensated care costs that are shifted to health care purchasers,
including the state, its taxpayers, and private employers.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to set minimum labor
standards for some large employers in Washington state with respect to
health benefit expenditures, and to further the state's interest in
ensuring that its residents have access to appropriate health care
services. Ensuring that employers do not eliminate employer-paid
health care is important for minimizing the burden on taxpayers and the
public health system, and protecting the health, safety, and well-being
of the residents of Washington state.
(3) It is not the intent of the legislature to influence the
establishment, content, or administration of employee benefit plans.
The legislature is neutral as to whether employers covered under this
chapter choose to meet the minimum expenditure standard by providing or
reimbursing the costs of health care services for their employees or
paying to the state the difference between the minimum expenditure and
their actual expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Average annual wage" means the average annual wage as defined
in RCW 50.04.355.
(2) "Director" means the director of labor and industries.
(3) "Employee" means any individual employed by an employer.
(4) "Employer" means an employer as defined in RCW 49.46.010 who
employed a total of five thousand or more employees in any calendar
quarter in the preceding calendar year at any and all locations in
Washington. Employees of a franchisor's franchisees are not employees
of the franchisor.
(5) "Health care services expenditures" means amounts paid by an
employer for the purpose of providing or reimbursing the cost of health
care services, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, for its employees or their
dependents in the state of Washington. These amounts include, but are
not limited to: Payments by an employer on behalf of its employees or
their dependents for medical care, prescription drugs, vision care,
dental care, long-term care, and health savings accounts as defined
under section 223 of the United States internal revenue code, and
reimbursements by such an employer to its employees or their dependents
for the cost of health care services when the employees or their
dependents had no entitlement to the reimbursement. These amounts do
not include: Payments made directly or indirectly for workers'
compensation or medicare benefits; any costs of health care services,
taxes, or assessments that such an employer is required to pay pursuant
to any federal or state law other than section 4 of this act; or any
amounts deducted from an employee's wages.
(6) "Payroll" means all wages paid by an employer to its employees.
(7) "Wage" means wage as defined in RCW 49.46.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) On July 1, 2007, and each following July
1st, every employer shall report to the director: (a) The employer's
health care services expenditures in the preceding calendar year; and
(b) the employer's payroll in the preceding calendar year.
(2) When reporting the employer's payroll under subsection (1)(b)
of this section, the employer may exclude: (a) Wages paid to an
employee that are in excess of one hundred fifty percent of the average
annual wage; and (b) wages paid to an employee who is enrolled in or
eligible for medicare.
(3) When reporting the employer's payroll under subsection (1)(b)
of this section, the employer shall make the report in the form
specified by the director. The employer's chief executive officer or
an individual performing a similar function shall sign the report and
an affidavit under penalty of perjury. In the affidavit, the signing
officer shall affirm that the information in the report:
(a) Was reviewed by the signing officer, and is true to the best of
the signing officer's knowledge, information, and belief; and
(b) Does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or
omit a material fact necessary to make the statement not misleading.
(4)(a) An employer that fails to report to the director as required
under this section shall be assessed a civil penalty of two hundred
fifty dollars for each day that the employer fails to report up to a
maximum civil penalty of seven thousand five hundred dollars for thirty
days that the employer fails to report. If, after thirty days, the
employer continues to fail to report to the director as required under
this section, the employer is presumed to have failed to spend any
percentage of the employer's payroll on health care services
expenditures as required under section 4 of this act, and shall be
assessed the amount due, the interest penalty, and the civil penalty
specified in section 4 of this act.
(b) The employer must be afforded the opportunity for a hearing,
upon request to the director made within thirty days after the date of
issuance of the notice of assessment. The hearing shall be conducted
in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(c) If any employer fails to pay an assessment after it has become
a final and unappealable order, or after the court has entered final
judgment in favor of the director, the director shall refer the matter
to the state attorney general, who shall recover the amount assessed by
action in the appropriate superior court. In such an action, the
validity and appropriateness of the final order imposing the penalty is
not subject to review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, an employer shall either:
(a) Spend at least nine percent of the employer's payroll on health
care services expenditures; or
(b) Pay to the director an amount equal to the difference between
the employer's health care services expenditures and an amount equal to
nine percent of the employer's payroll.
(2) An employer that is a nonprofit organization or governmental
entity shall either:
(a) Spend at least seven percent of the employer's payroll on
health care services expenditures; or
(b) Pay to the director an amount equal to the difference between
the employer's health care services expenditures and an amount equal to
seven percent of its payroll.
(3)(a) An employer that fails to comply with this section shall be
assessed for the amount due under this section, plus an interest
penalty of one percent per month on the amount due and a civil penalty
of two hundred fifty thousand dollars.
(b) The employer must be afforded the opportunity for a hearing,
upon request to the director made within thirty days after the date of
issuance of the notice of assessment. The hearing shall be conducted
in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(c) If any employer fails to pay an assessment after it has become
a final and unappealable order, or after the court has entered final
judgment in favor of the director, the director shall refer the matter
to the state attorney general, who shall recover the amount assessed by
action in the appropriate superior court. In such an action, the
validity and appropriateness of the final order imposing the penalty is
not subject to review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The director shall:
(1) Administer and enforce this chapter;
(2) Review reports, inspect records, and conduct investigations and
audits of employment, payroll, and health care services expenditures,
as the director deems necessary or appropriate, to determine whether an
employer has complied with this chapter;
(3) Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter; and
(4) Deposit payments required and civil penalties assessed under
this chapter into the health services account established under RCW
43.72.900.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This chapter does not apply to workers hired
by a business whose purpose is to provide workers to other employers on
a temporary basis. For purposes of this section, "temporary" means no
more than ninety days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

--- END ---