BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.360 and 2002 c 331 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Appropriate location" means (i) the emergency department of a
hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW during the hours the hospital
is in operation; ((or)) (ii) a fire station during its hours of
operation and while fire personnel are present; or (iii) any additional
location designated by the legislative authority of a county to be a
location qualified to receive the transfer of a newborn.
(b) "Newborn" means a live human being who is less than seventy-two
hours old.
(c) "Qualified person" means (i) any person that the parent
transferring the newborn reasonably believes is a bona fide employee,
volunteer, or medical staff member of the hospital and who represents
to the parent transferring the newborn that he or she can and will
summon appropriate resources to meet the newborn's immediate needs;
((or)) (ii) a fire fighter, volunteer, or emergency medical technician
at a fire station who represents to the parent transferring the newborn
that he or she can and will summon appropriate resources to meet the
newborn's immediate needs; or (iii) any person who the parent
transferring the newborn reasonably believes is a bona fide employee,
volunteer, or staff member of a location designated by the legislative
authority of a county to be an appropriate location to receive the
transfer of a newborn.
(2) A parent of a newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified
person at an appropriate location is not subject to criminal liability
under RCW 9A.42.060, 9A.42.070, 9A.42.080, 26.20.030, or 26.20.035.
(3)(a) The qualified person at an appropriate location shall not
require the parent transferring the newborn to provide any identifying
information in order to transfer the newborn.
(b) The qualified person at an appropriate location shall attempt
to protect the anonymity of the parent who transfers the newborn, while
providing an opportunity for the parent to anonymously give the
qualified person such information as the parent knows about the family
medical history of the parents and the newborn. The qualified person
at an appropriate location shall provide referral information about
adoption options, counseling, appropriate medical and emotional
aftercare services, domestic violence, and legal rights to the parent
seeking to transfer the newborn.
(c) If a parent of a newborn transfers the newborn to a qualified
person at an appropriate location pursuant to this section, the
qualified person shall cause child protective services to be notified
within twenty-four hours after receipt of such a newborn. Child
protective services shall assume custody of the newborn within twenty-four hours after receipt of notification.
(d)(i) A hospital or fire station, its employees, volunteers, and
medical staff are immune from any criminal or civil liability for
accepting or receiving a newborn under this section.
(ii) Employees, volunteers, and staff members of a location
designated by the legislative authority of a county to be an
appropriate location to receive the transfer of a newborn are immune
from any criminal or civil liability for accepting or receiving a
newborn under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of social and health services
shall collect and compile information concerning the number and medical
condition of newborns transferred under RCW 13.34.360 and the number
and medical condition of newborns abandoned within the state who were
not transferred under RCW 13.34.360. The department shall make a
preliminary report to the legislature by January 1, 2007, and a final
report to the legislature by January 1, 2008.

--- END ---