BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.155 and 1998 c 191 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When purchasing any hunting license, persons under the age of
eighteen shall present certification of completion of a course of
instruction of at least ten hours in the safe handling of firearms,
safety, conservation, and sportsmanship. Beginning January 1, 1995,
all persons purchasing any hunting license for the first time, if born
after January 1, 1972, shall present such certification.
(2) The director may establish a program for training persons in
the safe handling of firearms, conservation, and sportsmanship and may
cooperate with the National Rifle Association, organized sportsmen's
groups, or other public or private organizations.
(3) The director shall prescribe the type of instruction and the
qualifications of the instructors.
(4) Upon successful completion of the course, a trainee shall
receive a hunter education certificate signed by an authorized
instructor. The certificate is evidence of compliance with this
section.
(5) The director may accept certificates from other states that
persons have successfully completed firearm safety, hunter education,
or similar courses as evidence of compliance with this section.
(6) The hunter education certificate requirements of this section
do not apply to active duty personnel in the United States armed forces
who provide documentation establishing successful completion of
firearms qualification requirements for his or her branch of the armed
forces.

--- END ---