BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 50.29 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If it is found that a significant purpose of the transfer of a
business was to obtain a reduced array calculation factor rate, then
the following applies:
(a) If the successor was an employer at the time of the transfer,
then the experience rating accounts of the employers involved shall be
combined into a single account and the employers assigned the higher of
the predecessor or successor array calculation factor rate to take
effect as of the date of the transfer.
(b) If the successor was not an employer at the time of the
transfer, then the experience rating account of the acquired business
must not be transferred and, instead, the sum of the rate determined by
the commissioner under RCW 50.29.025(2) (c)(ii) and (d)(ii), and
50.29.041 if applicable, shall be assigned.
(2) If any part of a delinquency for which an assessment is made
under this title is due to an intent to knowingly evade the
successorship provisions of RCW 50.29.062 and this section, then with
respect to the employer, and to any business found to be knowingly
promoting the evasion of such provisions:
(a) The commissioner shall, for the rate year in which the
commissioner makes the determination under this subsection and for each
of the three consecutive rate years following that rate year, assign to
the employer or business the total rate, which is the sum of the
recalculated array calculation factor rate and a civil penalty
assessment rate, calculated as follows:
(i) Recalculate the array calculation factor rate as the array
calculation factor rate that should have applied to the employer or
business under RCW 50.29.025 and 50.29.062; and
(ii) Calculate a civil penalty assessment rate in an amount that,
when added to the array calculation factor rate determined under (a)(i)
of this subsection for the applicable rate year, results in a total
rate equal to the maximum array calculation factor rate under RCW
50.29.025 plus two percent, which total rate is not limited by any
maximum array calculation factor rate established in RCW
50.29.025(2)(b)(ii);
(b) The employer or business may be prosecuted under the penalties
prescribed in RCW 50.36.020; and
(c) The employer or business must pay for the employment security
department's reasonable expenses of auditing the employer's or
business's books and collecting the civil penalty assessment.
(3) If the person knowingly evading the successorship provisions,
or knowingly attempting to evade these provisions, or knowingly
promoting the evasion of these provisions, is not an employer, the
person is subject to a civil penalty assessment of five thousand
dollars per occurrence. In addition, the person is subject to the
penalties prescribed in RCW 50.36.020 as if the person were an
employer. The person must also pay for the employment security
department's reasonable expenses of auditing his or her books and
collecting the civil penalty assessment.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Knowingly" means having actual knowledge of or acting with
deliberate ignorance or reckless disregard for the prohibition involved
and includes, but is not limited to, intent to evade,
misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure.
(b) "Person" means and includes an individual, a trust, estate,
partnership, association, company, or corporation.
(c) "Transfer of a business" includes the transfer or acquisition
of substantially all or a portion of the operating assets, which may
include the employer's work force.
(5) Any decision to assess a penalty under this section shall be
made by the chief administrative officer of the tax branch or his or
her designee.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny an employer
the right to appeal the assessment of a penalty in the manner provided
in RCW 50.32.030.
(7) All penalties and interest collected under this section shall
be expended solely for prevention, detection, and collection activities
related to evasion of the successorship provisions of RCW 50.29.062 and
this section, and for no other purposes.
(8) The commissioner shall establish procedures to enforce this
section.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.29.062 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 18 are each amended
to read as follows:
Except as provided in section 1 of this act, predecessor and
successor employer contribution rates shall be computed in the
following manner:
(1) If the successor is an employer, as defined in RCW 50.04.080,
at the time of the transfer((, its)) of a business, the following
applies:
(a) The successor's contribution rate shall remain unchanged for
the remainder of the rate year in which the transfer occurs((. From
and after)); and
(b) Beginning January 1st following the transfer, the successor's
contribution rate for each rate year shall be based on ((its)) a
combination of the following:
(i) The successor's experience with payrolls and benefits
((including the experience of the acquired business or portion of a
business from the date of transfer, as of the regular computation date
for that rate year)); and
(ii) Any experience assigned to the predecessor involved in the
transfer. If only a portion of the business was transferred, then the
experience attributable to the acquired portion is assigned to the
successor.
(2) ((For transfers before January 1, 2005, the following applies))
If the successor is not an employer at the time of the transfer((.)),
the following applies:
(a) For transfers before January 1, 2005:
(i) Except as provided in (ii) of this subsection (2)(a), the
successor shall pay contributions at the lowest rate determined under
either of the following:
(((a)(i) For transfers before January 1, 1997, the contribution
rate of the rate class assigned to the predecessor employer at the time
of the transfer for the remainder of that rate year and continuing
until the successor qualifies for a different rate in its own right;
(ii) For transfers on or after January 1, 1997,))
(A) The contribution rate of the rate class assigned to the
predecessor employer at the time of the transfer for the remainder of
that rate year. Any experience relating to the assignment of that rate
class attributable to the predecessor is transferred to the successor.
Beginning with the January 1st following the transfer, the successor's
contribution rate shall be based on a combination of the transferred
experience of the acquired business and the successor's experience
after the transfer; or
(((b))) (B) The contribution rate equal to the average industry
rate as determined by the commissioner, but not less than one percent,
and continuing until the successor qualifies for a different rate in
its own right. Assignment of employers by the commissioner to
industrial classification, for purposes of this subsection, must be in
accordance with established classification practices found in the
(("Standard Industrial Classification Manual")) North American industry
classification system issued by the federal office of management and
budget to the ((third)) fourth digit provided in the ((standard
industrial classification code, or in the)) North American industry
classification ((code)) system.
(((3) For transfers before January 1, 2005, if the successor is not
an employer at the time of the transfer and)) (ii) If the successor
simultaneously acquires the business or a portion of the business of
two or more employers in different rate classes, its rate from the date
the transfer occurred until the end of that rate year and until it
qualifies in its own right for a new rate, shall be the rate of the
highest rate class applicable at the time of the acquisition to any
predecessor employer who is a party to the acquisition, but not less
than one percent.
(((4))) (b) For transfers on or after January 1, 2005((, the
following applies if the successor is not an employer at the time of
the transfer)):
(((a))) (i) Except as provided in (((b))) (ii) and (iii) of this
subsection (2)(b), the successor shall pay contributions:
(((i))) (A) At the contribution rate ((determined for)) assigned to
the predecessor employer at the time of the transfer for the remainder
of ((the)) that rate year. Any experience attributable to the
predecessor relating to the assignment of the predecessor's rate class
is transferred to the successor. ((On and after))
(B) Beginning January 1st following the transfer, the successor's
contribution rate for each rate year shall be based on an array
calculation factor rate ((shall be based on the transferred experience
of the acquired business and the successor's experience after the
transfer; or
(ii) At)) that is a combination of the following: The successor's
experience with payrolls and benefits; and any experience assigned to
the predecessor involved in the transfer. If only a portion of the
business was transferred, then the experience attributable to the
acquired portion is assigned to the successor if qualified under RCW
50.29.010(6) by including the transferred experience. If not qualified
under RCW 50.29.010(6), the contribution rate shall equal ((to)) the
sum of the rates determined by the commissioner under RCW 50.29.025(2)
(c)(ii) and (d)(ii), and 50.29.041, if applicable, and continuing until
the successor qualifies for a different rate ((in its own right)),
including the transferred experience.
(((b))) (ii) If there is a substantial continuity of ownership,
control, or management by the successor of the business of the
predecessor, the successor shall pay contributions at the contribution
rate determined for the predecessor employer at the time of the
transfer for the remainder of that rate year. Any experience
attributable to the predecessor relating to the assignment of the
predecessor's rate class is transferred to the successor. ((On and
after)) Beginning January 1st following the transfer, the successor's
array calculation factor rate shall be based on a combination of the
transferred experience of the acquired business and the successor's
experience after the transfer.
(((c))) (iii) If the successor simultaneously acquires the business
or a portion of the business of two or more employers with different
contribution rates, the successor's rate from the date the transfer
occurred until the end of that rate year and until it qualifies in its
own right for a new rate, shall be the sum of the rates determined by
the commissioner under RCW 50.29.025(2) (a) and (b), and 50.29.041,
applicable at the time of the acquisition, to the predecessor employer
who, among the parties to the acquisition, had the largest ((taxable))
total payroll in the completed calendar quarter immediately preceding
the date of transfer, but not less than the sum of the rates determined
by the commissioner under RCW 50.29.025(2) (c)(ii) and (d)(ii), and
50.29.041, if applicable.
(((5))) (3) With respect to predecessor employers:
(a) The contribution rate on any payroll retained by a predecessor
employer shall remain unchanged for the remainder of the rate year in
which the transfer occurs.
(((6))) (b) In all cases, ((from and after)) beginning January 1st
following the transfer, the predecessor's contribution rate or((,
beginning January 1, 2005,)) the predecessor's array calculation factor
for each rate year shall be based on its experience with payrolls and
benefits as of the regular computation date for that rate year
((including)) excluding the experience of the ((acquired)) transferred
business or transferred portion of business ((up to the date of
transfer)) as that experience has transferred to the successor:
PROVIDED, That if all of the predecessor's business is transferred to
a successor or successors, the predecessor shall not be a qualified
employer until it satisfies the requirements of a "qualified employer"
as set forth in RCW 50.29.010.
(4) For purposes of this section, "transfer of a business" means
the same as section 1(4)(c) of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.12.220 and 2004 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If an employer fails to file in a timely and complete manner
a report required by RCW 50.12.070, or the rules adopted pursuant
thereto, the employer shall be subject to a penalty to be determined by
the commissioner, but not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars or ten
percent of the quarterly contributions for each such offense, whichever
is less.
(b) If an employer knowingly misrepresents to the employment
security department the amount of his or her payroll upon which
contributions under this title are based, the employer shall be liable
to the state for up to ten times the amount of the difference in
contributions paid, if any, and the amount the employer should have
paid and for the reasonable expenses of auditing his or her books and
collecting such sums. Such liability may be enforced in the name of
the department.
(((c) If any part of a delinquency for which an assessment is made
under this title is due to an intent to evade the successorship
provisions of RCW 50.29.062, then for the calendar year in which the
commissioner makes the determination under this subsection, the
commissioner shall assign to the employer, and to any business found to
be promoting the evasion of such provisions, the contribution rate
determined for that calendar year under RCW 50.29.025, including the
solvency surcharge, if any, for rate class 20 or rate class 40, as
applicable, plus two percent.))
(2) If contributions are not paid on the date on which they are due
and payable as prescribed by the commissioner, there shall be assessed
a penalty of five percent of the amount of the contributions for the
first month or part thereof of delinquency; there shall be assessed a
total penalty of ten percent of the amount of the contributions for the
second month or part thereof of delinquency; and there shall be
assessed a total penalty of twenty percent of the amount of the
contributions for the third month or part thereof of delinquency. No
penalty so added shall be less than ten dollars. These penalties are
in addition to the interest charges assessed under RCW 50.24.040.
(3) Penalties shall not accrue on contributions from an estate in
the hands of a receiver, executor, administrator, trustee in
bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating officer
subsequent to the date when such receiver, executor, administrator,
trustee in bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating
officer qualifies as such, but contributions accruing with respect to
employment of persons by a receiver, executor, administrator, trustee
in bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating officer shall
become due and shall be subject to penalties in the same manner as
contributions due from other employers.
(4) Where adequate information has been furnished to the department
and the department has failed to act or has advised the employer of no
liability or inability to decide the issue, penalties shall be waived
by the commissioner. Penalties may also be waived for good cause if
the commissioner determines that the failure to timely file reports or
pay contributions was not due to the employer's fault.
(5) Any decision to assess a penalty as provided by this section
shall be made by the chief administrative officer of the tax branch or
his or her designee.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny an employer
the right to appeal the assessment of any penalty. Such appeal shall
be made in the manner provided in RCW 50.32.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The commissioner of the employment security
department may adopt rules necessary to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is remedial in nature and shall be
applied retroactively to January 1, 2006.

--- END ---