BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 50.62 RCW
to read as follows:
When the employment security department assists in the reemployment
of unemployed workers through the job service program, work source, or
any other means and part of the reemployment assistance includes the
referral of a worker to a particular employer, the department must
follow up with the employer on a monthly basis to determine whether the
worker referred to the employer contacted the employer, was employed by
the employer, if so, for what length of time, and, if no longer
employed, the reasons why.

--- END ---