BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington state employers incur significant costs stemming
from the poor health of some of their employees. Costs come in the
form of increased health care premiums, lower productivity of
employees, and higher absenteeism.
(2) The health benefits of worksite health promotion programs can
include increased physical activity, improved nutrition, reduced rates
of obesity, lower stress, decreased rates of smoking, reductions in
other health risks, and increased self-management of chronic
conditions.
(3) The financial benefits of worksite health promotion programs
can include decreased absenteeism, reduction in medical costs, improved
productivity, and improved employee satisfaction and loyalty leading to
increased retention and short-term disability savings.
It is the intent of the legislature to encourage Washington's
public and private sector employers to develop worksite health
promotion programs using targeted, individualized health information
and appropriate incentives to promote employee participation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The authority shall develop an on-line health assessment tool
that is available to state employees. The health assessment tool must:
(a) Be voluntary; (b) be confidential; (c) enable participants to
compare their personal health information with local and national data;
and (d) generate recommendations about programs and actions most likely
to improve individual health.
(2) The authority shall make the on-line health assessment tool
available to private sector employers. The administrator may charge
private sector employers an annual enrollment fee sufficient to offset
the cost of administering the health assessment tool for private sector
employers.

--- END ---