BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person may operate a motor driven boat or vessel or have the
engine of a motor driven boat or vessel run idle while an individual is
teak surfing, platform dragging, or bodysurfing behind the motor driven
boat or vessel.
(2) No person may operate a motor driven boat or vessel or have the
engine of a motor driven boat or vessel run idle while an individual is
occupying or holding onto the swim platform, swim deck, swim step, or
swim ladder of the motor driven boat or vessel.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply when an
individual is occupying the swim platform, swim deck, swim step, or
swim ladder for a very brief period of time while assisting with the
docking or departure of the vessel, while exiting or entering the
vessel, or while the vessel is engaged in law enforcement or emergency
rescue activity.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "teak surfing" or "platform
dragging" means holding onto the swim platform, swim deck, swim step,
swim ladder, or any portion of the exterior of the transom of a motor
driven boat or vessel for any amount of time while the motor driven
boat or vessel is underway at any speed.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "bodysurfing" means swimming
or floating on one's stomach or on one's back on or in the wake
directly behind a motor driven boat or vessel that is underway.
(6) A violation of this section is an infraction punishable as
provided under chapter 7.84 RCW.

--- END ---