BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.94.175 and 1995 c 355 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 19.94.015, the following annual registration
fees shall be charged for each weighing or measuring instrument or
device used for commercial purposes in this state:

(a) Weighing devices:

(i) Small scales "zero to four
hundred pounds capacity" . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((5.00))
10.00

(ii) Intermediate scales "four
hundred one pounds to five
thousand pounds capacity" . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((20.00))
40.00

(iii) Large scales "over five
thousand pounds capacity" . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((52.00))
75.00

(iv) ((Large scales with
supplemental
devices . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 52.00

(v))) Railroad track scales . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 800.00

(b) Liquid fuel metering devices:

(i) Motor fuel meters with flows of
((less than)) twenty gallons or
less per minute . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((5.00))
10.00

(ii) Motor fuel meters with flows of
more than twenty but not more
than one hundred fifty gallons
per minute . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((16.00))
32.00

(iii) Motor fuel meters with flows
over one hundred fifty gallons
per minute . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((25.00))
50.00

(c) Liquid petroleum gas meters:

(i) With one inch diameter or
smaller dispensers . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((10.00))
25.00

(ii) With greater than one inch
diameter dispensers . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((30.00))
50.00

(d) Fabric meters . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((5.00))
10.00

(e) Cordage meters . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((5.00))
10.00

(f) Mass flow meters . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((14.00))
200.00

(g) Taxi meters . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((5.00))
25.00

(2) With the exception of subsection (3) of this section, no person
shall be required to pay more than the ((established)) annual
registration fee ((adopted under this section)) for any weighing or
measuring instrument or device in any one year.
(3) The department or a city sealer may establish reasonable
inspection and testing fees for each type or class of weighing or
measuring instrument or device specially requested to be inspected or
tested by the device owner. These inspection and testing fees shall be
limited to those amounts necessary for the department or city sealer to
cover the direct costs associated with such inspection and testing.
The fees ((established under this subsection)) shall not be set so as
to compete with service agents normally engaged in such services.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.80.450 and 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 16 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any person may apply to the director for a weighmaster's license.
Such application shall be on a form prescribed by the director and
shall include:
(1) The full name of the person applying for such license and if
the applicant is a partnership, association or corporation, the full
name of each member of the partnership or the names of the officers of
the association or corporation;
(2) The principal business address of the applicant in this state
and elsewhere;
(3) The names of the persons authorized to receive and accept
service of summons and legal notice of all kinds for the applicant;
(4) The location of any scale or scales subject to the applicant's
control and from which certified weights will be issued; and
(5) Such other information as the director feels necessary to carry
out the purposes of this chapter.
Such annual application shall be accompanied by a license fee of
((twenty)) fifty dollars for each scale from which certified weights
will be issued and a bond as provided for in RCW 15.80.480.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.80.490 and 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 20 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any weighmaster may file an application with the director for a
license for any employee or agent to operate and issue certified weight
tickets from a scale which such weighmaster is licensed to operate
under the provisions of this chapter. Such application shall be
submitted on a form prescribed by the director and shall contain the
following:
(1) Name of the weighmaster;
(2) The full name of the employee or agent and his resident
address;
(3) The position held by such person with the weighmaster;
(4) The scale or scales from which such employee or agent will
issue certified weights; and
(5) Signature of the weigher and the weighmaster.
Such annual application shall be accompanied by a license fee of
((five)) ten dollars.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.94.2582 and 1995 c 355 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each request for an official registration certificate shall be
in writing, under oath, and on a form prescribed by the department and
shall contain any relevant information as the director may require,
including but not limited to the following:
(a) The name and address of the person, corporation, partnership,
or sole proprietorship requesting registration;
(b) The names and addresses of all individuals requesting an
official registration certificate from the department; and
(c) The tax registration number as required under RCW 82.32.030 or
uniform business identifier provided on a master license issued under
RCW 19.02.070.
(2) Each individual when submitting a request for an official
registration certificate or a renewal of such a certificate shall pay
a fee to the department in the amount of ((eighty)) one hundred sixty
dollars per individual.
(3) The department shall issue a decision on a request for an
official registration certificate within twenty days of receipt of the
request. If an individual is denied their request for an official
registration certificate, the department must notify that individual in
writing stating the reasons for the denial and shall refund any
payments made by that individual in connection with the request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department of agriculture shall provide
a report to appropriate committees of the legislature on the status of
the weights and measures program by December 15, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---