BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Pandemic influenza is a global outbreak of disease that occurs
when a new virus appears in the human population, causes serious
illness, and then spreads easily from person to person.
(2) Historically, pandemic influenza has occurred on average every
thirty years. Most recently, the Asian flu in 1957-58 and the Hong
Kong flu in 1968-69 killed seventy thousand and thirty-four thousand,
respectively, in the United States.
(3) Another influenza pandemic could emerge with little warning,
affecting a large number of people. Estimates are that another
pandemic influenza would cause more than two hundred thousand deaths in
our country, with as many as five thousand in Washington. Our state
could also expect ten thousand to twenty-four thousand people needing
hospital stays, and as many as a million people requiring outpatient
visits. During a severe pandemic these numbers could be much higher.
The economic losses could also be substantial.
(4) The current Avian or bird flu that is spreading around the
world has the potential to start a pandemic. There is yet no proven
vaccine, and antiviral medication supplies are limited and of unknown
effectiveness against a human version of the virus, leaving traditional
public health measures as the only means to slow the spread of the
disease. Given the global nature of a pandemic, as much as possible,
the state must be able to respond assuming only limited outside
resources and assistance will be available.
(5) An effective response to pandemic influenza in Washington must
focus at the local level and will depend on preestablished partnerships
and collaborative planning on a range of best-case and worst-case
scenarios. It will require flexibility and real-time decision making,
guided by accurate information. It will also depend on a well-informed
public that understands the dangers of pandemic influenza and the steps
necessary to prevent the spread of the disease.
(6) Avian flu is but one example of an infectious disease that,
were an outbreak to occur, could pose a significant statewide health
hazard. As such, preparation for pandemic flu will also enhance the
capacity of local public health jurisdictions to respond to other
emergencies.
It is therefore the intent of the legislature that adequate
pandemic flu preparedness and response plans be developed and
implemented by local public health jurisdictions statewide in order to
limit the number of illnesses and deaths, preserve the continuity of
essential government and other community services, and minimize social
disruption and economic loss in the event of an influenza pandemic.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Local health jurisdiction" means a local health department as
established under chapter 70.05 RCW, a combined city-county health
department as established under chapter 70.08 RCW, or a health district
established under chapter 70.05 or 70.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 To the extent state or federal funds are
provided for this purpose, by January 1, 2007, each local health
jurisdiction shall develop a pandemic flu preparedness and response
plan, consistent with requirements and performance standards
established by the department and the United States department of
health and human services, for the purpose of:
(1) Defining preparedness activities that should be undertaken
before a pandemic occurs that will enhance the effectiveness of
response measures;
(2) Describing the response, coordination, and decision-making
structure that will incorporate the local health jurisdiction, the
local health care system, other local response agencies, and state and
federal agencies during the pandemic;
(3) Defining the roles and responsibilities for the local health
jurisdiction, local health care partners, and local response agencies
during all phases of a pandemic;
(4) Describing public health interventions in a pandemic response
and the timing of such interventions;
(5) Serving as a guide for local health care system partners,
response agencies, and businesses in the development of pandemic
influenza response plans; and
(6) Providing technical support and information on which
preparedness and response actions are based.
Each plan shall be developed based on an assessment by the local
health jurisdiction of its current capacity to respond to pandemic flu
and otherwise meet department outcome measures related to infectious
disease outbreaks of statewide significance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Each jurisdiction shall develop its pandemic
flu preparedness and response plan in consultation with appropriate
public and private sector partners, including departments of emergency
management, law enforcement, school districts, hospitals and medical
professionals, tribal governments, and business organizations. At a
minimum, each plan shall address:
(1) Strategies to educate the public about the consequences of
influenza pandemic and what each person can do to prepare, including
the adoption of universal infectious disease prevention practices and
maintaining appropriate emergency supplies;
(2) Jurisdiction-wide disease surveillance programs, coordinated
with state and federal efforts, to detect pandemic influenza strains in
humans and animals, including health care provider compliance with
reportable conditions requirements, and investigation and analysis of
reported illness or outbreaks;
(3) Communication systems, including the availability of and access
to specialized communications equipment by health officials and
community leaders, and the use of mass media outlets;
(4) Mass vaccination plans and protocols to rapidly administer
vaccine and monitor vaccine effectiveness and safety;
(5) Guidelines for the utilization of antiviral medications for the
treatment and prevention of influenza;
(6) Implementation of nonmedical measures to decrease the spread of
the disease as guided by the epidemiology of the pandemic, including
increasing adherence to public health advisories, voluntary social
isolation during outbreaks, and health officer orders related to
quarantines;
(7) Medical system mobilization, including improving the linkages
and coordination of emergency responses across health care
organizations, and assuring the availability of adequate facilities and
trained personnel; and
(8) Strategies for maintaining social order and essential community
services while limiting the spread of disease throughout the duration
of the pandemic.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 To the extent state or federal funds are
provided for this purpose, the department, in consultation with the
state director of emergency management, shall provide technical
assistance and disburse funds as needed to support local health
jurisdictions in developing their pandemic flu preparedness and
response plans. Upon receipt of a plan determined by the department to
meet its established requirements and standards, additional funding
shall be provided to a district to support the preparedness response
activities identified in the plan, including but not limited to:
(1) Education, information, and outreach, in multiple languages, to
increase community preparedness and reduce the spread of the disease
should it occur;
(2) Development of materials and systems to be used in the event of
a pandemic to keep the public informed about the influenza, the course
of the pandemic, and response activities;
(3) Development of the legal documents necessary to facilitate and
support the necessary government response;
(4) Training and response drills for local health jurisdiction
staff, law enforcement, health care providers, and others with
responsibilities identified in the plan;
(5) Enhancement of the communicable disease surveillance system;
and
(6) Development of coordination and communication systems among
responding agencies.
Where appropriate, these activities shall be coordinated and funded
on a regional or statewide basis. In the event that a local health
jurisdiction does not show adequate progress towards implementing its
plan, the department may intervene to provide necessary technical
assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---