BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received for water
services supplied by a:
(a) Public utility district established under Title 54 RCW, a
water-sewer district established under Title 57 RCW, or an irrigation
district established under Title 87 RCW that:
(i) Has less than one thousand five hundred water service
connections; and
(ii) Charges residential water rates that exceed one hundred
twenty-five percent of the statewide average residential water rate
published on or before July 1st of each year by the department of
health; or
(b) Water system that:
(i) Is operated or owned by a qualified satellite management agency
under RCW 70.116.134;
(ii) Has less than two hundred water service connections; and
(iii) Charges residential water rates that exceed one hundred
twenty-five percent of the statewide average residential water rate
published on or before July 1st of each year by the department of
health.
(2) To receive an exemption under this section, the water system or
irrigation district shall supply to the department of revenue proof
that an amount equal to at least ninety percent of the value of the
exemption shall be expended to repair, equip, maintain, and upgrade the
water system.
(3) The department of health may use rate information provided in
surveys and reports produced by the association of Washington cities,
an association of elected officials, or other municipal association to
estimate a statewide average residential water rate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received for water
services supplied by a:
(a) Public utility district under Title 54 RCW, a water-sewer
district established under Title 57 RCW, or an irrigation district
established under Title 87 RCW that:
(i) Has less than one thousand five hundred water service
connections; and
(ii) Charges residential water rates that exceed one hundred
twenty-five percent of the statewide average residential water rate
published on or before July 1st of each year by the department of
health; or
(b) Water system that:
(i) Is operated or owned by a qualified satellite management agency
under RCW 70.116.134;
(ii) Has less than two hundred water service connections; and
(iii) Charges residential water rates that exceed one hundred
twenty-five percent of the statewide average residential water rate.
(2) To receive an exemption under this section, the water system or
irrigation district shall supply to the department of revenue proof
that an amount equal to at least ninety percent of the value of the
exemption shall be expended to repair, equip, maintain, and upgrade the
water system.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "statewide average
residential water rate" means the statewide average residential water
rate published under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources, the
legislature needs information to evaluate whether the stated goals of
legislation were achieved.
(1) The goals of the small public water system excise tax
exemptions are:
(a) To provide assistance to small public water systems, that are
most in need, to make necessary and immediate repairs to their
infrastructural needs; and
(b) To allow these small systems to comply with state and federal
mandates necessary for safe drinking water for citizens served by these
systems.
(2)(a) A person who receives the benefit of a tax exemption under
section 1 or 2 of this act shall make an annual report to the
department detailing the specific capital improvements that were made
to their respective systems by utilizing the money made available by
these exemptions. The report is due by March 31st following any year
in which a tax exemption under section 1 or 2 of this act is claimed or
used. Information in a report under this section is not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection by the due date of the report, the department shall declare
the amount of taxes exempted for that year to be immediately due and
payable. Public utility taxes payable under this subsection are
subject to interest but not penalties, as provided under this chapter.
This information is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of
RCW 83.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(3) By December 1, 2010, the fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and the senate, in consultation with the department,
shall report to the legislature on the effectiveness of the tax
exemptions under sections 1 and 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---