BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.030 and 1993 c 327 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following real and personal property shall be exempt from
taxation:
(1) Property owned by nonprofit organizations or associations,
organized and conducted for nonsectarian purposes, which shall be used
for character-building, benevolent, protective or rehabilitative social
services directed at persons of all ages. The sale of donated
merchandise shall not be considered a commercial use of the property
under this section if the proceeds are devoted to the furtherance of
the purposes of the selling organization or association as specified in
this paragraph.
The exemption is not nullified by the lease or rental of the
property to entities not eligible for a property tax exemption under
this chapter if (a) the property is used a majority of the time for the
exempt purpose by the nonprofit organization or association, (b) the
amount of the rent or donations collected is reasonable, and (c) the
proceeds are used to retire the first mortgage on the property.
(2) Property owned by any nonprofit church, denomination, group of
churches, or an organization or association, the membership of which is
comprised solely of churches or their qualified representatives, which
is utilized as a camp facility if used for organized and supervised
recreational activities and church purposes as related to such camp
facilities. The exemption provided by this paragraph shall apply to a
maximum of two hundred acres of any such camp as selected by the
church, including buildings and other improvements thereon.
(3) Property, including buildings and improvements required for the
maintenance and safeguarding of such property, owned by nonprofit
organizations or associations engaged in character building of boys and
girls under eighteen years of age, and used for such purposes and uses,
provided such purposes and uses are for the general public good:
PROVIDED, That if existing charters provide that organizations or
associations, which would otherwise qualify under the provisions of
this paragraph, serve boys and girls up to the age of twenty-one years,
then such organizations or associations shall be deemed qualified
pursuant to this section.
(4) Property owned by all organizations and societies of veterans
of any war of the United States, recognized as such by the department
of defense, which shall have national charters, and which shall have
for their general purposes and objects the preservation of the memories
and associations incident to their war service and the consecration of
the efforts of their members to mutual helpfulness and to patriotic and
community service to state and nation. To be exempt such property must
be used in such manner as may be reasonably necessary to carry out the
purposes and objects of such societies.
The use of the property for pecuniary gain or to promote business
activities, except as provided in this subsection (4), nullifies the
exemption otherwise available for the property for the assessment year.
The exemption is not nullified by:
(a) The collection of rent or donations if the amount is reasonable
and does not exceed maintenance and operation expenses.
(b) Fund-raising activities conducted by a nonprofit organization.
(c) The use of the property for pecuniary gain for periods of not
more than three days in a year.
(d) An inadvertent use of the property in a manner inconsistent
with the purpose for which exemption is granted, if the inadvertent use
is not part of a pattern of use. A pattern of use is presumed when an
inadvertent use is repeated in the same assessment year or in two or
more successive assessment years.
(5) Property owned by all corporations, incorporated under any act
of congress, whose principal purposes are to furnish volunteer aid to
members of the armed forces of the United States and also to carry on
a system of national and international relief and to apply the same in
mitigating the sufferings caused by pestilence, famine, fire, floods,
and other national calamities and to devise and carry on measures for
preventing the same.
(6) Property owned by nonprofit organizations exempt from federal
income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of
1954, as amended, that are guarantee agencies under the federal
guaranteed student loan program or that issue debt to provide or
acquire student loans.
(7) To be exempt under this section, the property must be used
exclusively for the purposes for which exemption is granted, except as
provided in RCW 84.36.805.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.36.805 and 2003 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to qualify for an exemption under this chapter, the
nonprofit organizations, associations, or corporations must satisfy the
conditions in this section.
(2) The property must be used exclusively for the actual operation
of the activity for which exemption is granted, unless otherwise
provided, and does not exceed an amount reasonably necessary for that
purpose, except:
(a) The loan or rental of the property does not subject the
property to tax if:
(i) Except for the exemption under RCW 84.36.030(1), the rents and
donations received for the use of the portion of the property are
reasonable and do not exceed the maintenance and operation expenses
attributable to the portion of the property loaned or rented; and
(ii) Except for the exemptions under RCW 84.36.030 (1) and (4),
84.36.037, and 84.36.060(1) (a) and (b), the property would be exempt
from tax if owned by the organization to which it is loaned or rented;
(b) The use of the property for fund-raising activities does not
subject the property to tax if the fund-raising activities are
consistent with the purposes for which the exemption is granted.
(3) The property must be irrevocably dedicated to the purpose for
which exemption has been granted, and on the liquidation, dissolution,
or abandonment by said organization, association, or corporation, said
property will not inure directly or indirectly to the benefit of any
shareholder or individual, except a nonprofit organization,
association, or corporation which too would be entitled to property tax
exemption. This property need not be irrevocably dedicated if it is
leased or rented to those qualified for exemption under this chapter or
RCW 84.36.560 for leased property, but only if under the terms of the
lease or rental agreement the nonprofit organization, association, or
corporation receives the benefit of the exemption.
(4) The facilities and services must be available to all regardless
of race, color, national origin or ancestry.
(5) The organization, association, or corporation must be duly
licensed or certified where such licensing or certification is required
by law or regulation.
(6) Property sold to organizations, associations, or corporations
with an option to be repurchased by the seller shall not qualify for
exempt status. This subsection does not apply to property sold to a
nonprofit entity, as defined in RCW 84.36.560(7), by:
(a) A nonprofit as defined in RCW 84.36.800 that is exempt from
income tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code;
(b) A governmental entity established under RCW 35.21.660,
35.21.670, or 35.21.730;
(c) A housing authority created under RCW 35.82.030;
(d) A housing authority meeting the definition in RCW
35.82.210(2)(a); or
(e) A housing authority established under RCW 35.82.300.
(7) The department shall have access to its books in order to
determine whether the nonprofit organization, association, or
corporation is exempt from taxes under this chapter.
(8) This section does not apply to exemptions granted under RCW
84.36.020, 84.36.032, 84.36.250, and 84.36.260.

--- END ---