BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.68.020 and 1949 c 100 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person owning or having in charge any ((animal)) livestock
that has died ((or been killed on account)) because of disease shall
((immediately bury)) dispose of the carcass ((thereof to such a depth
that no part of the carcass shall be nearer than three feet from the
surface of the ground)) within a time frame and in a manner prescribed
in rule by the director, which may include, but is not limited to,
burial, composting, incinerating, landfilling, natural decomposition,
or rendering. Any ((animal)) livestock found dead ((shall be)) from an
unknown cause is presumed to have died ((from and on account)) because
of disease.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 16.68.020 is recodified as a section in
chapter 16.36 RCW.

--- END ---