BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall establish a capital add-on rate, not less than
the July 1, 2005, capital add-on rate established by the department,
for those assisted living facilities contracting with the department
that have a medicaid minimum occupancy percentage of fifty percent or
greater. The medicaid minimum occupancy percentage shall be determined
on an annual basis.

--- END ---