BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The director of agriculture shall
convene an advisory committee composed of representatives from the
various segments of the cattle industry that will be involved in the
implementation of the state's component of the national animal
identification program for animal health and disease trace-back
purposes. The advisory committee shall be chaired by the director of
agriculture or the director's appointee. In making the appointments to
the advisory committee, the director shall consult with organizations
that represent the affected segments of the cattle industry. The
director may appoint additional members to the advisory committee as
deemed necessary.
(2) The advisory committee shall evaluate the requirements of the
federal program and examine approaches being taken by other states to
implement the requirements, with an emphasis on neighboring states and
the states that engage in the largest amount of trade in cattle with
Washington, and evaluate demonstration projects that the department
shall conduct at two or more facilities that handle large numbers of
animals. The advisory committee shall make a recommendation on how the
federal requirements should be implemented in Washington that includes
recommended funding amounts and sources. In developing a funding
proposal, the advisory committee shall consult with the office of
financial management.
(3) The department shall submit a written report of the activities
and recommendations of the advisory committee to the house of
representatives and to the senate by December 1, 2006.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2007.

--- END ---