BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.16.0497 and 2001 c 214 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Base credit" means the maximum amount of credit against the
tax imposed by this chapter that each light and power business or gas
distribution business may take each fiscal year as calculated by the
department. The base credit is equal to the proportionate share that
the total grants received by each light and power business or gas
distribution business in the prior fiscal year bears to the total
grants received by all light and power businesses and gas distribution
businesses in the prior fiscal year multiplied by eight million five
hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 2007, and two million five
hundred thousand dollars for all other fiscal years before and after
fiscal year 2007.
(b) "Billing discount" means a reduction in the amount charged for
providing service to qualifying persons in Washington made by a light
and power business or a gas distribution business. Billing discount
does not include grants received by the light and power business or a
gas distribution business.
(c) "Grant" means funds provided to a light and power business or
gas distribution business by the department of community, trade, and
economic development or by a qualifying organization.
(d) "Low-income home energy assistance program" means energy
assistance programs for low-income households as defined on December
31, 2000, in the low-income home energy assistance act of 1981 as
amended August 1, 1999, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 8623 et seq.
(e) "Qualifying person" means a Washington resident who applies for
assistance and qualifies for a grant regardless of whether that person
receives a grant.
(f) "Qualifying contribution" means money given by a light and
power business or a gas distribution business to a qualifying
organization, exclusive of money received in the prior fiscal year from
its customers for the purpose of assisting other customers.
(g) "Qualifying organization" means an entity that has a
contractual agreement with the department of community, trade, and
economic development to administer in a specified service area low-income home energy assistance funds received from the federal
government and such other funds that may be received by the entity.
(2) Subject to the limitations in this section, a light and power
business or a gas distribution business may take a credit each fiscal
year against the tax imposed under this chapter.
(a)(i) A credit may be taken for qualifying contributions if the
dollar amount of qualifying contributions for the fiscal year in which
the tax credit is taken is greater than one hundred twenty-five percent
of the dollar amount of qualifying contributions given in fiscal year
2000.
(ii) If no qualifying contributions were given in fiscal year 2000,
a credit shall be allowed for the first fiscal year that qualifying
contributions are given. Thereafter, credit shall be allowed if the
qualifying contributions given exceed one hundred twenty-five percent
of qualifying contributions given in the first fiscal year.
(iii) The amount of credit shall be fifty percent of the dollar
amount of qualifying contributions given in the fiscal year in which
the tax credit is taken.
(b)(i) A credit may be taken for billing discounts if the dollar
amount of billing discounts for the fiscal year in which the tax credit
is taken is greater than one hundred twenty-five percent of the dollar
amount of billing discounts given in fiscal year 2000.
(ii) If no billing discounts were given in fiscal year 2000, a
credit shall be allowed in the first fiscal year that billing discounts
are given. Thereafter, credit shall be allowed if the dollar amount of
billing discounts given exceeds one hundred twenty-five percent of
billing discounts given in the first fiscal year.
(iii) The amount of credit shall be fifty percent of the dollar
amount of the billing discounts given in the fiscal year in which the
tax credit is taken.
(c) The total amount of credit that may be taken for qualifying
contributions and billing discounts in a fiscal year is limited to the
base credit for the same fiscal year.
(3)(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection, the
total amount of credit, statewide, that may be taken in any fiscal year
shall not exceed two million five hundred thousand dollars.
(ii) The total amount of credit, statewide, that may be taken in
fiscal year 2007 shall not exceed eight million five hundred thousand
dollars.
(b) By May 1st of each year starting in 2002, the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall notify the department
of revenue in writing of the grants received in the current fiscal year
by each light and power business and gas distribution business.
(4)(a) Not later than June 1st of each year beginning in 2002, the
department shall publish the base credit for each light and power
business and gas distribution business for the next fiscal year.
(b) Not later than July 1st of each year beginning in 2002,
application for credit must by made to the department including but not
limited to the following information: Billing discounts given by the
applicant in fiscal year 2000; qualifying contributions given by the
applicant in the prior fiscal year; the amount of money received in the
prior fiscal year from customers for the purpose of assisting other
customers; the base credit for the next fiscal year for the applicant;
the qualifying contributions anticipated to be given in the next fiscal
year; and billing discounts anticipated to be given in the next fiscal
year. No credit under this section will be allowed to a light and
power business or gas distribution business that does not file the
application by July 1st.
(c) Not later than August 1st of each year beginning in 2002, the
department shall notify each applicant of the amount of credit that may
be taken in that fiscal year.
(d) The balance of base credits not used by other light and power
businesses and gas distribution businesses shall be ratably distributed
to applicants under the formula in subsection (1)(a) of this section.
The total amount of credit that may be taken by an applicant is the
base credit plus any ratable portion of unused base credit.
(5) The credit taken under this section is limited to the amount of
tax imposed under this chapter for the fiscal year. The credit must be
claimed in the fiscal year in which the billing reduction is made. Any
unused credit expires. Refunds shall not be given in place of credits.
(6) No credit may be taken for billing discounts made before July
1, 2001. Within two weeks of May 8, 2001, the department of community,
trade, and economic development shall notify the department of revenue
in writing of the grants received in fiscal year 2001 by each light and
power business and gas distribution business. Within four weeks of May
8, 2001, the department of revenue shall publish the base credit for
each light and power business and gas distribution business for fiscal
year 2002. Within eight weeks of May 8, 2001, application to the
department must be made showing the information required in subsection
(4)(b) of this section. Within twelve weeks of May 8, 2001, the
department shall notify each applicant of the amount of credit that may
be taken in fiscal year 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---