BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A supplemental capital budget is hereby
adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the
several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as
shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2007, out of the several funds specified in this act.

SUPPLEMENTAL APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Acquisition of Historic Photographs (06-2-950)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Sec. 102 2005 c 488 s 109 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Program (06-4-003)

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,100,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,500,000))
$21,780,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,600,000))
$29,880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($98,000,000))
$108,280,000

Sec. 103 2005 c 488 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local/Community Projects (06-4-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) Funding for the Inland Northwest Science and Technology Center
shall be held in reserve until the balance of phase I funding has been
secured or committed from local government and community sources.
(3) The Washington state arts commission shall design a plaque that
shall be affixed to buildings or displayed as part of a project
receiving any appropriation from this section. The plaque shall
provide information to the public that the building or project has been
made possible by the tax dollars of Washington citizens. The
commission may contact the secretary of state to obtain approval for
use of the Washington seal in the design of the plaque. The final
design shall be approved by the chairs and ranking members of the house
of representatives capital budget committee and the senate ways and
means committee.
(4) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Projects Recommendation

7th street theatre $600,000

Alder creek pioneer association carousel museum $450,000

Asian counseling and referral service $2,000,000

Bailey Gatzert children's play area $75,000

Bridge for kids $850,000

Brookside school ADA playground equipment $25,000

Buena library $50,000

Camp Prime time repairs--Families with terminally ill
kids
$100,000

Cannon house $250,000

Central area motivation program (CAMP) $250,000

Cesar Chavez park $150,000

Childhaven $150,000

Clark Lake park and retreat center $500,000

Colman school $500,000

Columbia breaks fire interpretive center $150,000

Community Center at GreenBridge $400,000

Covington aquatics center phase 1 $350,000

Crossroads community center and park $250,000

Cutter theater $71,000

Des Moines beach park historic buildings $300,000

Discovery park $1,000,000

East Whatcom regional resource center $1,750,000

Eatonville family park $50,000

El Centro de la Raza $900,000

Filipino community center $200,000

Food bank refrigeration projects $465,000

Foster creek $150,000

Fox theater $2,398,000

GC health clinic $12,000

Grand Army of the Republic cemetery $5,000

Granite Falls museum expansion $50,000

Greenbridge plaza in White Center $200,000

Habitat park south hill $400,000

Hidden river environmental education center $50,000

ICL education center $200,000

Japanese cultural and community center $200,000

Joel Pritchard park $2,500,000

Joe's creek project $856,000

Juanita creek channel and riparian restoration $500,000

Julia Butler Hansen home restoration $10,000

LeRoi smelter smokestack monument $3,000

Lewis and Clark confluence project (($1,500,000))
$2,000,000

McCaw hall $2,000,000

MOBIUS/Inland Northwest science and technology
center
$1,500,000

Mt. Baker theater $200,000

Mt. Vernon Jasper Gates statue $12,000

Multicultural center of Kitsap county $250,000

Nathaniel Orr home site museum interpretive center $29,000

New Lakewood clinic $350,000

Northeast community center expansion $250,000

Northshore performing arts center $1,000,000

Northwest communities education center $1,000,000

Oak Harbor multi-purpose community and sports
facility
$50,000

Omak grandstand $250,000

Pacific Northwest salmon center $1,000,000

Pacific science center $900,000

Performing arts center (PACE) $500,000

Pike Place market health center emergency repairs $1,357,000

Puget Sound freight building warehouse--Thea Foss
waterway
$2,000,000

Relocation of Sieke Japanese gardens $250,000

River walk and Sammamish river restoration $200,000

Roslyn city hall $150,000

Ruth Dykeman children's center $27,000

Sandman historical tug restoration $10,000

Seattle Aquarium $2,000,000

Seattle community center (1115 E. Pike street) $13,000

Seward park environmental and audubon center $400,000

Snohomish senior center $150,000

Sno-Valley senior activity center kitchen $50,000

Sound way property preservation $500,000

Spokane river whitewater course $400,000

Sumas ballpark $250,000

Synthetic sportsfield partnership at Robinswood park $400,000

Tall ships moorage $300,000

Tukwila kayak and canoe launching facility $20,000

Undeveloped woodlands linked to interurban nature
trail
$150,000

Vancouver museum $125,000

Vancouver national historical reserve west barracks $1,000,000

Veterans memorial museum $100,000

West Seattle community resource center $500,000

West central community center $500,000

West Hylebos wetlands boardwalk $100,000

Wilson playfield land acquisition $200,000

Wing Luke Asian art museum $2,000,000

Youth housing/drop-in center $400,000

Total (($39,391,000))
$44,213,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,391,000))
$44,213,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,391,000))
$44,213,000

Sec. 104 2005 c 488 s 138 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Job/Economic Development Grants (06-4-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Projects Recommendation

Belfair sewer improvements $8,000,000

Bellingham waterfront restoration $2,000,000

Bremerton Harborside $4,000,000

Burien town square $2,000,000

Carnation sewer $2,000,000

City of Covington $1,000,000

Infrastructure for Renton Boeing property $5,000,000

Military communities infrastructure projects $5,000,000

Pacific Northwest national labs campus infrastructure
project
$6,000,000

Rainier court $1,500,000

Redevelop Snohomish riverfront $1,500,000

Ridgefield employment center project $2,000,000

Tukwila Southcenter parkway infrastructure $6,000,000

Yakima town center restoration $4,000,000

Total $50,000,000

(2) $1,000,000 of the appropriation for the Pacific Northwest
national labs campus infrastructure project is provided solely for
giga-pop infrastructure.
(3) $5,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for military
communities infrastructure projects ((is provided solely for grants to
support projects in Island county, Kitsap county, Pierce county,
Snohomish county, and Spokane county when a military base in that
county is identified for potential closure in the federal base
realignment and closure process. The grants will be used to address
infrastructure improvements that will aid in the removal of the base
from the closure list. The office of financial management shall
establish a process for selecting projects for funding based on
criteria used to determine the federal base realignment and closure
list and recommendations by the department of community, trade, and
economic development and the military department)). Military
communities infrastructure projects shall include:
(a) Grants to counties and cities for the purchase of development
easements to restrict the use of accident potential zones and clear
zones. The office of financial management shall establish a
competitive process for selecting projects to receive the grants.
The grants are subject to the following conditions:
(i) The county or city must be subject to and in compliance with
RCW 36.70A.530;
(ii) The grants may not be used to remove encroachments into these
zones caused by county or city zoning or permitting actions;
(iii) The county or city must have an encroachment prevention plan
preventing future encroachment into these zones; and
(iv) The grant provided by the state must not exceed one-third of
the project cost with funds from local and federal sources providing
the balance of the funds.
(b) Improvements to a military department site on Fairchild air
force base. Final allocation of ((the)) these grants shall be at the
discretion and with the approval of the director of the office of
financial management.

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

Sec. 105 2005 c 488 s 140 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Jobs in Communities (06-4-951)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Projects

Belfair sewer improvements $8,000,000

LeMay museum $1,000,000

Port of Walla Walla wine incubator $1,000,000

Wine and culinary arts center in Prosser $2,250,000

Infrastructure for Washington farm produce exports $1,000,000

Bremerton facility for alternative energy technology
research $300,000

Grays Harbor substation $1,500,000

Total (($12,250,000))
$15,050,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,250,000))
$15,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,250,000))
$15,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Energy Match Maker Grant Program (06-2-001)

Appropriation:
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Sec. 107 2005 c 488 s 142 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building: Rehabilitation and Capital Addition
(01-1-008)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,000))
$214,063

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,280,442
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($106,380,442))
$106,494,505

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Pritchard Predesign/Code Reviser Relocation (06-2-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
The appropriation in this section is provided solely for predesign
of the Joel M. Pritchard building as a legislative support facility and
public cafeteria. The predesign shall include, but not be limited to,
the following: (1) A rehabilitation plan addressing space use,
electrical and mechanical systems, plumbing, seismic safety, fire
protection, accessibility, and energy consumption; (2) An assessment of
the facility requirements of legislative support agencies including the
code reviser, the joint legislative audit and review committee, the
legislative service center, and the legislative evaluation and
accountability program as potential building tenants; and (3) A
financing strategy for the facility, that may consider a combination of
funding sources including state general obligation bonds and the use of
alternative financing mechanisms that utilize dedicated revenue streams
through the conversion of existing lease payments into debt service
payments. Funding is also provided for design and initial construction
activity for relocating the code reviser staff from the basement to the
first floor.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Sec. 109 2005 c 488 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Cherberg Building: Rehabilitation (02-1-005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is for the purpose of furthering the John
A. Cherberg building rehabilitation project, including but not limited
to the following: Project final design and initial phase of
reconstruction; purchase and remodel of the two modular buildings
currently owned by the Legislative building rehabilitation project; and
remodel of a portion of the Joel M. Pritchard building for use as swing
space during reconstruction.
(2) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Funding is provided solely for design, construction, and other
costs related to the relocation efforts associated with this project.
(((d))) (b) The department may negotiate agreements with the senate
for additional fees to manage the John A. Cherberg building
rehabilitation project.
(((e))) (c) Upon completion of the project, the temporary modular
buildings shall be sold and removed, and the parking lot shall be
restored and landscaped.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,253,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,439,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,692,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,292,000

Sec. 110 2005 c 488 s 152 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
((General Administration Building Rehabilitation)) North Capital
Campus Executive Office Building(s) (06-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for predesign
for replacement or renovation of the general administration building
combined with the development of an office building on the block
adjoining Capital Way and 11th avenue. The combined development is
intended to provide: (1) Executive office space for statewide elected
officials; (2) public access space for the state library collection and
historically significant documents from the state archives and the
state historical museum; and (3) high density general office space that
can adapt to changing state needs. The project will maximize
interagency sharing of support services such as information technology,
printing and mailing, management and storage of supplies, reception
areas, and other common functions. The project will also include
sufficient parking to provide a significant net increase in parking
spaces beyond what is required for the new office space. The project
shall also include leasable ground floor retail space on Capital Way.
The department shall consult with statewide elected officials and the
city of Olympia in developing the predesign. ((The predesign shall
evaluate the use of the Pritchard building as one of the options for
use by the state library and historically significant documents from
the state archives and state historical museum.)) Due to the intended
replacement of the building adjoining Capital Way and 11th avenue, the
department shall not charge the facility depreciation component of
lease charges for nonprofit tenants in that facility during the 2005-2007 biennium.

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($750,000))
$1,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,500,000))
$312,017,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,250,000))
$313,667,000

Sec. 111 2005 c 488 s 161 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building Omnibus (06-1-005)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall assist in the
relocation of the statute law committee offices from the legislative
building to the Pritchard building. The vacated space is intended for
additional offices for the house of representatives.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,100,000))
$1,950,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $878,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,978,000))
$2,828,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,978,000))
$2,828,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Capital Campus Master Plan (06-2-001)

The master plan shall include a review of the need for meeting
space and training facilities to support state government in Thurston
county. The review must compare existing facilities with other states'
capitals with similar populations. The master plan must also consider
the need for transportation access to the campus.

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Vancouver Crime Lab - Phase 2 (06-2-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,940,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,940,000

Sec. 114 2005 c 488 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
School Mapping (06-1-100)

The appropriations in this section ((is)) are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: ((The appropriation is provided
solely for the initial mapping of schools and production of software
and may not be used to supplant any local government's existing school
or other building mapping program that can transfer data to a statewide
first responder building mapping information system.)) Mapping of
((public buildings, including)) school buildings((,)) shall be
undertaken under standards adopted by the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs mapping software standards as required by
RCW 36.28A.070. The ((criminal justice training commission))
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall work with
the office of the superintendent of public instruction to ensure school
mapping is part of newly constructed or renovated construction projects
((and shall develop policies and procedures to ensure efficient use and
implementation of such procedures)). For school construction projects
funded through the state board of education's state school construction
assistance program during the 2005-2007 biennium, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall prioritize the initial
mapping or remapping of the state board of education's state school
construction assistance program projects that are colocated with
schools funded by the appropriation in this section. Additionally, the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall develop
policies and procedures to ensure efficient use and implementation of
such procedures.
It is the intention of the legislature that the design of new and
remodeled facilities incorporate mapping and remapping as needed.
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs will
consult with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and
report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on efficient and
low-cost ways to maintain up-to-date maps.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,500,000))
$5,500,000

Sec. 115 2005 c 488 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Echo Glen Children's Center - Eleven Cottages: Renovation
(00-1-041)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,800,000
Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,605,495
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,100,000))
$10,300,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,205,495

Sec. 116 2005 c 488 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Rainier School - Wastewater Treatment Plant: Construction
(Buckley) (04-1-950)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,926,000
Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $190,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,350,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,600,000))
$4,176,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Green Hill School: New Intensive Management Unit Building, and
Health Center and Administration Building (06-2-202)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Retsil Building 9 Renovation - Transient Program (06-1-008)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $318,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $489,000

Sec. 119 2005 c 488 s 252 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Coyote Ridge Corrections Center: Expansion (98-2-011)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($179,000,000)) $228,500,000 is provided solely to design and
construct a ((1,280)) 1,792 bed medium-security prison at Coyote Ridge
corrections center in Connell.
(2) The facility shall be a publicly-owned and operated facility.
(3) The new facility shall include at least 512 hybrid-security
beds that have a lower cost to construct than conventional medium
security beds but still maintain a medium security perimeter.
(4) Design of the facility shall incorporate efficiencies in
administrative space and support services realized by sharing services
within the region. The department shall examine other states' and
private industry standard designs, and report on how efficiencies will
be incorporated into the design of the facility to the office of
financial management and to legislative fiscal staff not later than
September 1, 2005. Nothing in this subsection requires the department
to adopt design parameters that would endanger public safety or
generate increased operating costs.
(5) Once opened, a portion of the new facility shall be used to
alleviate the crowded conditions in reception at the Washington
corrections center in Shelton.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $921,140
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($179,000,000))
$229,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $986,347
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($180,907,487))
$230,907,487

Sec. 120 2005 c 488 s 255 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: 100-Bed Management and Segregation Unit
(00-2-008)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $927,000
Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $819,229
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,674,000))
$17,747,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,493,229))
$18,566,229

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,944,803
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,438,032

Sec. 121 2005 c 488 s 264 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: North Close Security Compound
(04-2-005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $124,000,000
Appropriation:
((General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $927,000))
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,891,000))
$6,818,000
((Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,818,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,940,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,758,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Replace Correctional Industry Roof
(06-1-023)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,423,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,028,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,451,000

Sec. 123 2005 c 488 s 323 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (06-4-007)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $10,000,000 of the state building construction account--state appropriation is provided for the extended grant payment to
Spokane for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.
(2) $5,000,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for water quality grants for hardship
communities with a population of less than 5,000. The department shall
give priority consideration to: (a) Communities subject to a
regulatory order from the department of ecology for noncompliance with
water quality rules; (b) projects for which design work has been
completed; and (c) projects with a local match from reasonable water
quality rates and charges.
(3) $1,000,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely to design appropriate wastewater
treatment facilities to serve the Hoodsport to Skokomish reservation
areas of Hood Canal. The exact facilities will be based upon the
recommendations from an analysis of wastewater management options for
the Hoodsport to Skokomish river currently being undertaken by Mason
county.
(4) $750,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for assistance in management and clean
up activities at Long Lake in Kitsap county and $50,000 of the state
building construction account--state appropriation is provided solely
for assistance in cleaning up Wapato Lake in Pierce county. The
assistance is contingent on the lake communities adopting a lake
management plan that meets the department's requirement.
(5) $320,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation is
provided solely to Mason county to develop a septic system data base
and identify failing septic systems in Hood Canal.
(6) $70,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation is
provided solely to Kitsap county for surveys of septic systems in Hood
Canal.
(7) $70,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation is
provided solely to Jefferson county for surveys of septic systems in
Hood Canal.
(8) Up to $1,500,000 of the water quality account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for on-site sewage
replacement. This appropriation may be used to: (a) Establish new or
expand existing on-site sewage repair and replacement loan or grant
programs by county governments or tribes; or (b) develop a pilot
program to administer an on-site sewage repair and replacement loan
program through a qualified private or nonprofit lending institution.
This appropriation must be used in conjunction with the water pollution
control revolving account--state appropriation in section 127 of this
act provided for this purpose. Of this amount, up to $1,000,000 may be
used to help financially distressed homeowners repair and replace
failing on-site sewage system, and up to $500,000 may be used to help
local governments plan, implement, and administer the local loan fund
assistance programs. The total overall local government and tribal
administration costs may not exceed seven percent of the total
statewide grant and loan on-site program. The department must report
on the use of these funds to the Puget Sound water quality action team
as part of its activities under the 2005-2007 Puget Sound conservation
and recovery plan.
(9) $3,500,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for wastewater treatment upgrades at
Twanoh, Dosewallips, Fort Casey, Fort Ebey, Birch Bay, and Sequim Bay
state parks.
(10) $600,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the community of Klickitat to supplement other
local, state, and federal funds for wastewater treatment facility
construction. Klickitat will not be required to accept a state
revolving loan as a match to the grant.
(11) $1,250,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for accelerating toxic cleanup in the
Spokane area.
(12) $2,000,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the community of Carnation to
supplement other local, state, and federal funds for wastewater
treatment facility construction.
(13) The remaining appropriation in this section is provided for
statewide water quality implementation and planning grants and loans.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,000,000))
$22,000,000
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,500,000))
$9,600,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,500,000))
$15,250,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,000,000))
$46,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $211,808,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($249,808,000))
$258,658,000

Sec. 124 2005 c 488 s 324 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
State Drought Preparedness (05-4-009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for
response to the statewide drought that was declared pursuant to chapter
43.83B RCW. The department of ecology may provide funding or
compensation for purchase or lease of water rights and to public bodies
as defined in RCW 43.83B.050 in connection with projects and measures
designed to alleviate drought conditions which may affect: Public
health and safety; drinking water supplies; agricultural activities; or
fish and wildlife survival.
(2) Projects or measures for which funding or compensation will be
provided must be connected with a water system, water source, or water
body which is receiving, or has been projected to receive, less than
seventy-five percent of normal water supply, as the result of natural
drought conditions. This reduction in water supply must be such that
it is causing, or will cause, undue hardship for the entities or fish
or wildlife depending on the water supply. General criteria for
guidelines to be established by the department of ecology for
distribution of funds must include: A balanced and equitable
distribution of the funds among the different sectors affected by
drought; a funding process that ensures funds are available for drought
impacts that arise both early and later during the course of the
drought; and preference for projects that leverage other federal and
local funds.
(3) Up to $1,500,000 of the reappropriation in this section is
provided to the Roza irrigation district for the purchase or lease of
water rights.
(4) Of the funds provided in this section, $150,000 shall be made
available to support the development and demonstration of water
management measures in the Walla Walla Basin that improve and protect
instream flow and water quality, and which also help sustain
agricultural and economic vitality. The director of the department
shall report to the legislature by December 31, 2006, with any
findings, conclusions, and recommendations regarding such water
management measures.

Reappropriation:
State Drought Preparedness Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,200,000))
$7,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,200,000))
$7,200,000

Sec. 125 2005 c 488 s 325 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants for Clean up and Prevention (06-4-008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants
to local governments for local projects that implement the state "never
waste" plan. Grant funds will emphasize additional organics composting
and conversion, green building, and moderate risk waste projects
described in the plan. Of this amount, up to $1,600,000 may be used
for one-time funding for auto switch recycling consistent with the
memorandum of agreement being finalized with the auto recyclers
association.
(2) $2,000,000 of the appropriation is provided for emission
reduction projects for local governments to retrofit public sector
diesel engines with exhaust emission control devices or to make other
modifications or operational changes, including cleaner fuels, to allow
public sector fleets to reduce their emissions.
(3) $3,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants
to local governments needing assistance in complying with the new phase
II storm water permit requirements. Of this amount, $300,000 is
provided solely for Mason county to prepare storm water management
plans for Belfair and Hoodsport consistent with the storm water program
in the Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan.
(4) (($60,000,000)) $70,900,000 of the appropriation is provided
solely for remedial action grants. Of this amount, $1,000,000 is
provided to the town of Warden to respond to contamination of their
existing water system.
(5) From within this appropriation, the department shall prepare an
online guide to help small businesses and homeowners learn what to do
if they discover toxic wastes on their property. The guide shall
provide information about local resources for clean up and disposal of
toxic wastes.
(6) $8,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
coordinated prevention grants provided to local governments for local
government solid and hazardous waste planning, household and small
business hazardous waste collection and disposal, recycling capital
purchases and program development, and local solid waste enforcement.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,000,000))
$98,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($315,000,000))
$323,900,000

Sec. 126 2005 c 488 s 327 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soil Remediation and Awareness Projects (06-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$5,000,000

Sec. 127 2005 c 488 s 329 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (06-4-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall give priority loan funding consideration
to on-site septic system rehabilitation and replacement programs in
Mason, Kitsap, and Jefferson counties for at least $1,000,000 from the
water pollution control revolving account--state in the second year of
the funding cycle.
(2) Up to $5,000,000 of the water pollution control revolving
account--state appropriation is provided solely for loans for on-site
sewage replacement. This appropriation may be used to: (a) Establish
new or expand existing on-site sewage repair and replacement loan
programs by county governments or tribes; or (b) develop a pilot
program to administer an on-site sewage repair and replacement loan
program through a qualified private or nonprofit lending institution.
This appropriation must be used in conjunction with water quality
account--state appropriation in section 123 of this act provided for
this purpose. The department must work with the department of health,
the Puget Sound water quality action team, local governments, and the
lending industry in developing and piloting this program. The
department shall provide a status report on the loan program to the
governor and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by June 30,
2007, including any recommendations for improving the program. The
department must report on the use of these funds to the Puget Sound
water quality action team as part of its activities under the 2005-2007
Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan.

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $162,839,146
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,777,140
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,616,286

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $912,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,151,616,286

Sec. 128 2005 c 488 s 330 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (06-2-003)

The appropriations in this section ((is)) are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: $12,000,000 of the appropriation
is provided solely for projects and water right acquisitions to support
watershed planning efforts and achieving instream flows subject to the
following project types, conditions, and limitations:
(1) Up to $1,353,172 of the appropriation is provided to improve
irrigation efficiency and to achieve associated flow improvements in
the Twisp and Methow rivers by providing for cleaning and lining and/or
piping of 30,943 linear feet of the irrigation canal within the lower
(downstream) seven miles of the Methow Valley irrigation district's
west canal. Of this amount, up to $100,000 is provided for a neutral
independent consultant to provide management assistance to the Methow
Valley irrigation district for purposes of identifying structural and
operational improvements to increase overall system water use
efficiency.
(2) Up to $200,000 of the appropriation is provided for a portion
of the costs of the project level environmental impact statement for
the Ahtanum creek watershed restoration program, including construction
of the Pine Hollow reservoir, provided there is agreement among the
Yakama nation, Ahtanum irrigation district, and other jurisdictional
federal, state, and local agencies and entities to proceed with the
environmental impact statement.
(3) Up to $75,000 of the appropriation is provided to formalize the
Ahtanum creek watershed restoration program, including identification
of site specific habitat improvement projects and determination of the
most appropriate restoration program alternative to implement.
(4) Up to $1,500,000 of the appropriation is provided to reduce
diversions from the Dungeness river through pipeline projects
identified in the Dungeness river comprehensive irrigation district
management plan. For at least one year from the effective date of this
section, while the parties seek resolution of the court action filed in
Thurston county superior court, No. 04-2-00078-2, none of these funds
may be allocated to any projects in the Dungeness river basin that are
within the area that is the zone of contribution for ground and surface
water infiltration to the existing Graysmarsh wetland.
(5) $100,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to the city of
Normandy Park to implement the basin plan for the Miller/Walker and
Salmon creek basins.
(6) Water storage grants for the development of plans, engineering
and financing reports, acquiring lands and facilities, and other
preconstruction activities associated with the development of water
storage and groundwater storage and recovery projects. Proposed
projects should be consistent with the recommendations of the water
storage task force. The department of ecology would issue grants in
consultation with the departments of agriculture and fish and wildlife.
(7) Infrastructure improvement projects and other water management
actions that benefit stream flows and enhance water supply to resolve
conflicts among water needs for municipal water supply, agriculture
water supply, and fish restoration. The stream flow improvements and
other public benefits secured from these projects should be
commensurate with the investment of state funds.
(8) Projects for planning, acquisition, construction, and
improvement of agriculture water supply facilities and achieving water
conservation and water use efficiency improvements.
(9) Financial assistance to purchase and install water measuring
devices at points of diversion and withdrawal. Preference would be
given to fish-critical basins, to areas participating in the department
of fish and wildlife fish screening and cooperative compliance
programs, and to basins where watershed planning has determined
additional water diversion and withdrawal information is needed.
(10) Funding for acquisition of either water or water rights, or
both, for instream flow achievement and establishment of water
accounts. The appropriation is provided for either the purchase or
lease, or both, of water rights. It is also provided for the purpose
of improving stream and river flows in fish critical basins under the
trust water rights program under chapters 90.42 and 90.38 RCW.
(11) The department shall provide small grants to watershed
councils that have completed watershed plans. The grants are intended
to support periodic meetings and other monitoring activities of the
councils so that they can monitor the implementation of watershed
plans.
(12) $400,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation is
provided solely to support the Skagit comprehensive irrigation district
management plan.
(13) $250,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to the department
of ecology to work with interested parties to evaluate the instream
flows needed in the Hanford Reach to better protect salmon and
steelhead, and the ecological health of the Hanford Reach. The
department shall submit to the office of the governor and to the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature a report of
its findings by July 1, 2007.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
Water Quality Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,000,000))
$60,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Early Spill Response Equipment Caching (06-1-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,450,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for grants to local governments to secure and place
hazardous material spill response equipment at critical locations
around the state. Grant funds will emphasize strategic placement of
equipment that will allow for quick access and deployment by state,
local, or tribal responders in the event of a spill.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Innovative Storm Water Grants (06-2-006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: This appropriation is provided for grants
to local governments in Puget Sound to fund innovative, low-impact
development storm water management projects to meet critical storm
water management needs and protect or restore water quality. Projects
may include use of bioretention, rainwater harvest, permeable pavement,
vegetated roofs, and other low-impact development techniques. Projects
funded in Puget Sound must meet the design guidelines contained in the
low impact development technical guidance manual for Puget Sound,
unless the municipality can demonstrate that site conditions warrant a
deviation from the design guidelines and the deviations in design shall
provide similar performance. All projects must include performance
monitoring. The department must report on the use of these funds to
the Puget Sound water quality action team as part of its activities
under the 2005-2007 Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan.

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 131 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Waste Tire Clean Up (06-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the department to
initiate clean up of waste tires at the highest risk sites statewide.
This clean up work must include major progress at the Goldendale site
in Klickitat county.

Appropriation:
Waste Tire Removal Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 132 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (06-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the clean up of
contaminated sites that lie adjacent to and are within one-half mile of
Puget Sound. Clean ups must include orphan and abandoned sites that
pose a threat to Puget Sound with the highest priority sites being
cleaned up first. The department must report on the use of these funds
to the Puget Sound water quality action team as part of its activities
under the 2005-2007 Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan.

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxic Sites - Upland and Aquatics (06-1-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department must report on the use of
these funds to the Puget Sound water quality action team as part of its
activities under the 2005-2007 Puget Sound conservation and recovery
plan.

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 134 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Program (06-2-950)

Appropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 135 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Washington Bioenergy Loan Fund (06-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to
implement the Washington bioenergy assistance program created in
chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6501), Laws of
2005. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the appropriation
shall lapse.

Appropriation:
Washington Bioenergy Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

Sec. 136 2005 c 488 s 340 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (04-1-001)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations in this section are
provided solely to continue minor works projects that reduce the
deferred maintenance backlog.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,269
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,600,000))
$679,079
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,747,269))
$826,348

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,990,231
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,737,500))
$5,816,579

Sec. 137 2005 c 488 s 341 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Parkland Acquisition (04-2-013)

Reappropriation:
Parkland Acquisition Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($412,690))
$191,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($412,690))
$191,000

Sec. 138 2005 c 488 s 342 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Recreation Development (04-2-002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $100,000 of the reappropriation shall be used to retain
a consultant to conduct a predesign study for a headquarters building
located in Thurston county. The predesign shall compare a new leased
facility against options to build and evaluate appropriate funding
strategies.
(2) (($900,000)) Up to $700,000 of the reappropriation is provided
((solely)) to install fee collection stations at selected parks
statewide. Any unused funding of this reappropriation may be expended
on other recreation development projects.
(3) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the commission shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

Sec. 139 2005 c 488 s 346 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Beacon Rock - Pierce Trust (06-1-030)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for
improvements to ((the group camp at)) Beacon Rock state park.
(2) The funding has been provided solely and directly for this
project.

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 140 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Sustainable Development and Restoration (06-1-011)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Sec. 141 2005 c 488 s 360 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Parkland Acquisition Account (06-2-020)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The state parks and recreation commission
will provide lists of potential purchases and sales to the office of
financial management and the legislature prior to committing the state
parks and recreation commission to any sale or purchase of land or
buildings and prior to any allotments made for those purchases.
Included in the lists will be any potential operating or capital cost
impacts known to the state parks and recreation commission.

Appropriation:
Parkland Acquisition Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,000,000))
$22,000,000

Sec. 142 2005 c 488 s 365 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Park Development (06-1-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $250,000 is provided solely to construct a pedestrian/emergency
vehicle access bridge across Connor creek to allow for beach access.
(2) $500,000 is provided solely to determine long-term park zoning,
design park amenities and services, and provide site permit and initial
construction development at Nisqually-Mashel. The state parks and
recreation commission shall provide a predesign in accordance with the
office of financial management's predesign instructions.
(3) $150,000 is provided solely for initial park development at
Sequim Bay-Miller Peninsula. The state parks and recreation commission
shall provide a predesign in accordance with the office of financial
management's predesign instructions.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Sec. 143 2005 c 488 s 368 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Program (FARP) (98-2-004)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,478))
$61,478

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $542,191
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($573,669))
$603,669

Sec. 144 2005 c 488 s 369 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Nonhighway Off-road Vehicle Program (NOVA) (98-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities
Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,243,986))
$1,322,986

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,851,937
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,095,923))
$11,174,923

Sec. 145 2005 c 488 s 370 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (WWRP) (98-2-003)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Any amount of the reappropriations that is
not obligated to a specific project may be used to fund alternate
projects approved by the legislature from the same account in biennia
succeeding that in which the moneys were originally appropriated.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,547,515
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,170,894))
$4,382,894
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,718,409))
$8,930,409

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,883,173
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($77,601,582))
$80,813,582

Sec. 146 2005 c 488 s 372 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (SRFB) (00-2-001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,227,424))
$13,320,424
Salmon Recovery Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,366,010))
$3,597,010
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,593,434))
$16,917,434

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,031,707
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($101,625,141))
$104,949,141

Sec. 147 2005 c 488 s 376 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Program (02-0-001)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,677))
$120,677

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,323
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($400,000))
$476,000

Sec. 148 2005 c 488 s 382 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Wildlife and Recreation Program (WWRP) (02-4-003)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Any amount of the reappropriations that is
not obligated to a specific project may be used to fund projects in the
following order: (1) The department of natural resources Cypress
Island project; and (2) alternate projects approved by the legislature
from the same account in biennia succeeding that in which the funds
were originally appropriated.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,041,864))
$3,525,864
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,928,926
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,970,790))
$10,454,790

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,029,210
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,000,000))
$46,484,000

Sec. 149 2005 c 488 s 385 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Boating Facilities Program (BFP) (04-4-003)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,753,480))
$4,484,480

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,753,479
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,506,959))
$8,237,959

Sec. 150 2005 c 488 s 386 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Program (04-4-006)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($144,997))
$154,997

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,003
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($250,000))
$260,000

Sec. 151 2005 c 488 s 387 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Family Forest Fish Blockages Program (04-4-011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($780,379))
$1,191,379

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,219,621
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$2,411,000

Sec. 152 2005 c 488 s 390 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
National Recreation Trails Program (NRTP) (04-4-008)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,130,000))
$1,447,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,130,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,260,000))
$2,577,000

Sec. 153 2005 c 488 s 391 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (NOVA)
(04-4-004)

Reappropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,492,729))
$5,620,729

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,433,581
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,926,310))
$7,054,310

Sec. 154 2005 c 488 s 392 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (SRFB) (04-4-001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,832,305))
$35,876,305
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,500,000))
$13,885,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,332,305))
$49,761,305

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,332,305))
$50,761,305

NEW SECTION. Sec. 155 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Family Forest Fish Blockages Program (06-4-200)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $217,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 156 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Federal Trails Program (06-4-201)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

Sec. 157 2005 c 488 s 395 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
Boating Facilities Program (BFP) (06-4-003)

Appropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,350,000))
$7,271,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,597,535
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,947,535))
$43,868,535

NEW SECTION. Sec. 158 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
White River Property Acquisition Plan (06-2-951)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Sec. 159 2005 c 488 s 427 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish and Wildlife Population and Habitat Protection (06-1-003)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (((2))) It is the intent of the
legislature that expenditures from the wildlife account--state
appropriation shall only be made to the extent funds are available in
the account and will not result in a reduction to other programs or
activities.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,830,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,000))
$525,000
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,430,000))
$7,455,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,920,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,350,000))
$42,375,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 160 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Land Acquisition Pass-Thru Grants (06-4-018)

Appropriation:
State Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 161 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Department of Natural Resources - Department of Fish and Wildlife
Land Exchange (06-2-014)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided to appraise the value
of lands for exchange with the department of natural resources. Forest
lands transferred to the department of natural resources under this
section shall be actively managed by the department under a cooperative
agreement with surrounding public and private nonprofit landowners to
implement landscape scale restoration and other management objectives.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 162 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Consolidate Downtown Olympia Functions (06-2-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall consolidate functions
and services provided at its downtown Olympia facilities with other
state agencies providing those functions. The department shall vacate
the downtown Olympia facilities by June 30, 2007, and transfer
responsibility to dispose of the surplus property to the department of
general administration. The department of general administration will
work with the city of Olympia on necessary plans and permits that will
allow sale of the property at the highest price by June 30, 2009. The
proceeds of the disposal of the surplus property shall be deposited in
the wildlife account for future use in the construction of the
Deschutes watershed center.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 163 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Estuary and Salmon Restoration in Puget Sound (06-2-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for nearshore estuary and
shoreline projects supporting salmon recovery in Puget Sound.
(2) Project selection and funding decisions shall be submitted for
approval to the executive committee of the Puget Sound nearshore
partnership between the department and the United States army corps of
engineers.
(3) Funded projects require a nonstate match or in-kind
contributions. The match requirements must be approved by the
executive committee identified in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Project selection and funding decisions must be coordinated
with the salmon recovery funding board to ensure that project funding
and matching requirements are maximized to the greatest extent
possible.
(5) The department shall not utilize any amount of this
appropriation to support administration or overhead. Funding to
support the administration of the funds and the implementation of
selected projects must be obtained from the department's operating
budget.
(6) Eligible projects must be within Puget Sound and identified in
a current salmon recovery plan.
(7) All funds must be obligated to a specific project or projects
no later than October 15, 2006.
(8) The department shall submit a report to the legislature and the
office of financial management by November 1, 2006. The report must
describe the status of all projects authorized for funding under this
appropriation, including project location, implementation timeline,
performance measures, funding structure, matching funds, and expected
results.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

Sec. 164 2005 c 488 s 443 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Land Bank (06-2-015)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Prior to purchase or disposal of properties, the department
shall consult with other natural resource agencies to ensure the
properties marked for purchase or disposal are not eligible for trust
land transfers.
(2) The department shall not acquire new commercial properties
prior to the completion of the study by the state investment board of
the performance of the department's commercial properties portfolio.
The department shall cooperate with the state investment board and
their consultants in the work required by the study.
(3) The department shall also prepare an inventory of acquisitions,
sales, transfers, or exchanges of water rights within the past ten
years. This inventory shall be submitted in a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2006. The
report shall also estimate the cost of a study to inventory all water
rights that are connected to existing state lands.
(4) The department shall acquire sufficient university trust lands
with common school land replacement funds to pay for the acquisition of
lands specified by the University of Washington as required for the
Tacoma campus. The lands acquired for the Tacoma campus shall become
part of the university trust lands and shall be made available for use
by the university without charge.

Appropriation:
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,462,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,462,000

Sec. 165 2005 c 488 s 451 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Small Timber Landowner (FREP) (06-2-019)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.
(2) The department may not expend more than (($200,000)) $300,000
of the appropriation for administrative or staff costs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,750,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 166 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Federal HCP Land Acquisition Grants (06-2-950)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,720,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,720,000

Sec. 167 2005 c 488 s 453 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Statewide Aquatic Restoration Projects (06-2-008)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $2,000,000 of the state toxics control
account--state appropriation is provided solely for costs related to
removal of creosote logs and pilings in Puget Sound.

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($450,000))
$2,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,850,000))
$3,850,000

Sec. 168 2005 c 488 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Common School Construction Account Deposits

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($15,000,000)) $33,766,000 in fiscal year 2006 and $15,000,000
in fiscal year 2007 of the education savings account appropriation
shall be deposited in the common school construction account.
(2) $99,737,000 of the education construction account appropriation
shall be deposited in the common school construction account.

Appropriation:
Education Savings Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,000,000))
$48,766,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,737,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($129,737,000))
$148,503,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($129,737,000))
$148,503,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 169 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
School Acoustic Grants (06-2-953)

The appropriation in this section is subject to following
conditions and limitations: $500,000 of the state building
construction account appropriation is provided solely for pilot grants
for up to twenty school districts to implement coordinated classroom
acoustics improvement and amplification programs. The grants are
limited to the equipment costs associated with implementing the
program. The school districts selected shall represent various regions
of the state and reflect differences in school district size and
enrollment characteristics. By December 1, 2008, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide a report detailing
the impact on student performance, the school environment, and other
outcomes from the pilot.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Sec. 170 2005 c 488 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
School Construction Assistance Program (06-4-100)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For state assistance grants for purposes of calculating square
foot eligibility, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced
by fifty percent.
(2) (($14,439,000)) $14,889,000 from this appropriation is provided
solely for projects at skills centers that are included on the
prioritized list of capital items and major capital project list
submitted by the state board of education and $150,000 from this
appropriation is provided solely for a comprehensive feasibility study
for the development of a skills center in Skagit county. Skills
centers shall submit a budget plan to the state board of education and
the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature for proposed
expenditures and the proposed expenditures shall conform to state board
of education rules and procedures for reimbursement of capital items.
The state board of education shall develop a plan to include skills
center capital requests within the state construction assistance
program.
(3) $156,155,000 of this appropriation is provided solely to
increase the area cost allowance by $12.14 per square foot for grades
K-12 for fiscal year 2006, an additional $12.27 per square foot for
grades K-12 for fiscal year 2007, the student square footage allocation
in fiscal year 2007 in accordance with the first step in the state
board of education six-year plan, and the amount of state assistance
provided for modernization and new in-lieu projects to one hundred
percent of the area cost allowance.
(4) The appropriation in this section includes the amounts
deposited in the common school construction account under section 601
of this act.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($130,200,000))
$130,650,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($474,853,000))
$510,716,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($605,053,000))
$641,366,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,832,159,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,437,212,000))
$3,473,525,000

Sec. 171 2005 c 488 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Small Repair Grant Program (06-2-952)

The appropriations in this section ((is)) are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,370,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for nonrecurring costs associated with urgent health and safety
school facility repairs and renovations and minimal administrative
costs associated with administering the program. The state board of
education and the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
after consulting with maintenance and operations administrators of
school districts, shall develop criteria for providing funding for
specific projects that stay within the appropriation level provided in
this section. The criteria shall include, but is not limited to, the
following: (a) Limiting recipient district applications to one hundred
thousand dollars per three-year period; (b) limiting districts eligible
to receive the grant only once in any three-year period; and (c) any
district receiving funding provided in this section demonstrating a
consistent commitment to addressing school facilities needs. A portion
of this appropriation may be used to develop and administer the
program. It is the intent of the legislature that the state board of
education and the office of the superintendent of public instruction
keep the administrative costs of the program to a minimum by using
criteria from the prior federal rengrant program and other efficiency
measures to avoid duplication.
(2) $269,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for roof
repairs in the White Pass school district.
(3) $100,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for drainage
issues related to the freshman campus and Ferguson creek in the
Snohomish school district.
(4) $261,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for fire/alarm
control panels and devices in the Vashon school district.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$4,000,000

Sec. 172 2005 c 488 s 612 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Campus Preservation (06-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($700,000))
$900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,500,000))
$3,700,000

Sec. 173 2005 c 488 s 614 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
Omnibus Minor Works - Safety (06-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($800,816))
$1,000,816

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($800,816))
$1,000,816

Sec. 174 2005 c 488 s 632 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Guggenheim Hall Renovation (06-1-006)

The appropriations in this section ((is)) are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: No money from the appropriation
in this section may be expended on surge space.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,500,000))
$19,750,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,750,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,812,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,312,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 175 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Cleanup More Hall and Other Toxics/Shift Funds to Nanotechnology
(06-1-950)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 176 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Disposal of Surplus Downtown Spokane Property

Eastern Washington University is authorized to dispose of surplus
property in downtown Spokane under provisions of state law. Proceeds
of the disposal shall be deposited in the Eastern Washington University
capital projects account to support projects at the river point campus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 177 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Replace Chiller (06-1-025)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,880,000

Sec. 178 2005 c 488 s 696 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Seminar Building Phase II - Construction (02-2-004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation shall not be used for
vehicles, laptop computers, small printers, disposable items, or other
items with a useful life of less than one year.

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,550,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,250,000))
$47,500,000

Sec. 179 2005 c 488 s 714 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Campus Roadway Development (04-2-073)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of the reappropriation is to complete a predesign
of potential south campus roadway options and general circulation
issues that avoids significant impacts on adjacent neighborhoods and
conforms to the city of Bellingham traffic plans.
(2) The predesign shall also investigate options to achieve higher
rates of alternative modes of transportation among faculty, staff, and
students, minimize surface parking, and make improvements for traffic
circulation, including public transit. Safe movement of pedestrians
and bicyclists shall be a priority.
(3) Allotment for predesign is contingent upon the completion of a
communication and public involvement plan for this project that is
consistent with the significant projects section of the Western
Washington University institutional master plan and adjacent
neighborhood plans adopted by the city of Bellingham, the city of
Bellingham Western Washington University neighborhood plan, and the
neighborhood meeting requirements contained in Bellingham municipal
code 20.40.060. The communication and public involvement plan shall
seek to maximize public input through coordination of the planning
effort with established neighborhood advisory groups and boards
recognized by the city of Bellingham.

Reappropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,826))
$36,466

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($290,174))
$292,534
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $329,000

Sec. 180 2005 c 488 s 777 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Undergraduate Education Center
(04-2-692)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,363,700
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,844,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,207,700

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $126,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,407,540))
$38,103,591
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,897,240))
$49,437,291

Sec. 181 2005 c 488 s 795 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College: Science Building Replacement (04-1-209)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,664

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,693,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,018,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $285,336
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,268,049))
$26,693,049
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,261,049))
$30,011,049

NEW SECTION. Sec. 182 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Water System Replacement (06-1-501)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,951,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,951,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 183 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Highline Community College: Primary Power Branch Replacement
(06-1-503)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,717,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,717,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 184 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College: Campus Fire Loop Replacement (06-1-504)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,634,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,634,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 185 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Maritime Academy Repairs
(06-1-502)

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $268,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,588,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,856,000

Sec. 186 2005 c 488 s 733 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Statewide - Washington Heritage Project Grants (06-4-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
27.34.330.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Amount Recommended
Whatcom museum of history and art $133,303
Fort Walla Walla museum $150,000
Northwest maritime center $345,000
Squaxin Island tribal museum library and research center $210,539
Confluence project $500,000
City of Tumwater $70,901
City of Tacoma $350,000
Fox theater $102,000
Shoreline historical museum $143,578
Metro park district of Tacoma $35,000
Seattle parks department $150,000
Armed forces and aerospace museum $295,000
City of Lynnwood $85,294
Meadowbrook farm interpretive center $72,149
Center for wooden boats $100,000
Bainbridge Island historical society $207,957
Quileute tribal council $150,000
Northwest railway museum $360,000
Port Gamble S'Klallam tribe $363,579
Concrete heritage museum association $12,750
Quincy Valley historical society and museum $23,300
Foss waterway development authority $250,000
Broadway center for the performing arts $225,000
Village theatre $65,581
White river valley museum $99,069
Cascade land conservancy $112,500
Nunez Gaona veterans park $43,000
TOTAL (($4,612,500))
$4,655,500

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,612,500))
$4,655,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,612,500))
$20,655,500

Sec. 187 2005 c 488 s 905 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) To ensure that minor works appropriations are carried out in
accordance with legislative intent, funds appropriated in this act
shall not be allotted until project lists are on file at the office of
financial management ((and the office of financial management has
formally approved the lists. Proposed revisions)), the house of
representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means
committee. All projects must meet the criteria included in subsection
(2)(a) of this section. Revisions to the lists must be filed with
((and approved by)) the office of financial management, the house of
representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means
committee and include an explanation of variances from the prior list
before funds may be expended on the revisions.
(2)(a) Minor works projects are single line appropriations that
shall include multiple projects valued between $25,000 and $1,000,000
each that are of a similar nature and can ((generally)) be completed
within two years of the appropriation with the funding provided. These
projects cannot be combined with or be a part of an overall project,
that if combined over a continuous period of time, would exceed
$1,000,000. Minor works categories include (i) health, safety, and
code requirements; (ii) facility preservation; (iii) infrastructure
preservation; and (iv) program improvement or expansion. Improvements
for accessibility in compliance with the Americans with disabilities
act may be included in any of the above minor works categories.
(b) Minor works appropriations shall not be used for, among other
things: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or
designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor
works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works
list; moveable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment
not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office
of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a
specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; or
to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless
expressly authorized elsewhere in this act. The office of financial
management may make an exception to the limitations described in this
subsection (2)(b) for exigent circumstances after notifying the
legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the
legislature regarding the proposed exception.
(3) The ((office of financial management)) agency shall ((forward))
provide copies of these project lists and revised lists to the office
of financial management, the house of representatives capital budget
committee, and the senate ways and means committee. No expenditure may
be incurred or obligation entered into for minor works appropriations
until the office of financial management has approved the allotment of
the funds to be expended. The office of financial management shall
encourage state agencies to incorporate accessibility planning and
improvements into the normal and customary capital program.
(4) It is generally not intended to make future appropriations for
capital expenditures or for maintenance and operating expenses for an
acquisition project or a significant expansion project that is
initiated through the minor works process and therefore does not
receive a policy and fiscal analysis by the legislature. Minor works
projects are intended to be one-time expenditures that do not require
future state resources to complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 188 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
Executive Order No. 05-05, archeological and cultural resources,
was issued effective November 10, 2005. Agencies and higher education
institutions shall comply with the requirements set forth in this
executive order.

Sec. 189 2005 c 488 s 909 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL
CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter into financial contracts,
paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for
the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section,
agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option
available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements,
lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial
contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an
agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the
authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation
therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial
contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent
provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance
committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions
authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not
eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional
space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic
transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible
for state funded maintenance and operations.
(1) Department of general administration:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $12,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct the fifth and final phase of the roof membrane replacement
at the east plaza parking structure as well as safety improvements to
the parking garage below the plaza.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $6,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the fourth phase of the office building-2 rehabilitation that will
renew failing building systems, correct code deficiencies, and improve
access.
(c) Enter into a financing contract for up to $13,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the rehabilitation of the Cherberg building.
(2) Liquor control board: Enter into a financing contract for up
to $17,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an extension to the liquor control
board's distribution center to meet liquor sales growth through 2018.
(3) Department of corrections:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $400,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct a waste transfer station and purchase a garbage truck at
the McNeil Island corrections center.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $4,588,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct a transportation services warehouse and offices for
correctional industries.
(c) Enter into a financing contract for up to $4,536,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct additions to the food factory and warehouses at the Airway
Heights corrections center for correctional industries.
(4) Parks and recreation commission: Enter into a financing
contract in an amount not to exceed $4,800,000 plus financing expenses
and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop Cama
Beach state park.
(5) Community and technical colleges:
(a) ((Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bellevue
Community College for up to $20,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the North
Center building.
(b))) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clark College
for up to $9,100,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a ((parking structure))
building for a training center.
(((c))) (b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clover
Park Technical College for up to $14,000,000 plus financing expenses
and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a
student center.
(((d))) (c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia
Basin College for up to $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the Hawk Union
building, and for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct the Richland health
sciences center.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community
College for up to $8,500,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a bookstore and
student center.
(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community
College for up to $4,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a black box theater
as a part of the Instructional Lab building.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River
Community College for up to $7,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase Kent
Station higher education center.
(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Olympic College
for up to $3,600,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an addition to the student
center bookstore.
(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Shoreline
Community College for up to $15,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student
union building.
(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Skagit Valley
Community College for up to $3,200,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate existing
space into a new student center.
(j) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $2,175,100 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase land, make
site improvements, and construct a building for ((the enology program))
professional-technical instruction.
(k) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $640,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an
addition to the health sciences building at the Clarkston center.
(l) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Seattle Central
Community College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a math and
science building.
(m) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Pierce
College/Puyallup for up to $8,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student
gym and fitness center.
(n) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Pierce College/Ft.
Steilacoom for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an addition to the
college health and wellness center.
(((p))) (o) The projects in (((a),)) (f), (((k),)) (j), (l), (m),
and (n) of this subsection are reauthorizations of projects originally
authorized in the 2003-2005 biennium. If the college enters into a
financing contract before the effective date of this section, then the
appropriate reauthorization contained in this section is null and void.
(6) Washington State University: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $11,650,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a bioproducts facility in
the Tri-Cities.
(7) Washington State University: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $63,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a biotechnology and life
sciences research laboratory and instructional facility in Pullman.
Repayment of the financing contract shall be made from the Washington
State University building account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 190 Part headings in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 191 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 192 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
--- END ---