BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.0255 and 2005 c 443 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of:
(a) Dyed special fuel used by a farmer in the process of producing
agricultural products, as these terms are defined in RCW 82.04.213; and
(b) Motor vehicle and special fuel if:
(((a))) (i) The fuel is purchased for the purpose of public
transportation and the purchaser is entitled to a refund or an
exemption under RCW 82.36.275 or 82.38.080(3); or
(((b))) (ii) The fuel is purchased by a private, nonprofit
transportation provider certified under chapter 81.66 RCW and the
purchaser is entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW 82.36.285
or 82.38.080(1)(h); or
(((c))) (iii) The fuel is taxable under chapter 82.36 or 82.38 RCW.
(2) Any person who has paid the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 on the
sale of special fuel delivered in this state shall be entitled to a
credit or refund of such tax with respect to fuel subsequently
established to have been actually transported and used outside this
state by persons engaged in interstate commerce. The tax shall be
claimed as a credit or refunded through the tax reports required under
RCW 82.38.150.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.0256 and 2005 c 443 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of:
(1)(a) Special fuel purchased in this state upon which a refund is
obtained as provided in RCW 82.38.180(2); and
(b) Dyed special fuel used by a farmer in the process of producing
agricultural products, as these terms are defined in RCW 82.04.213; and
(2) Motor vehicle and special fuel if:
(a) The fuel is used for the purpose of public transportation and
the purchaser is entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW
82.36.275 or 82.38.080(3); or
(b) The fuel is purchased by a private, nonprofit transportation
provider certified under chapter 81.66 RCW and the purchaser is
entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW 82.36.285 or
82.38.080(1)(h); or
(c) The fuel is taxable under chapter 82.36 or 82.38 RCW:
PROVIDED, That the use of motor vehicle and special fuel upon which a
refund of the applicable fuel tax is obtained shall not be exempt under
this subsection (2)(c), and the director of licensing shall deduct from
the amount of such tax to be refunded the amount of tax due under this
chapter and remit the same each month to the department of revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---