BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
special fuel to a harvester for use in equipment used to fell or cut
timber. The exemption is available only if the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. Harvesters must provide the department with a valid
forest practices permit to obtain an exemption certificate.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Harvester" means every person who from the person's own land
or from the land of another under a right or license granted by lease
or contract, either directly or by contracting with others for the
necessary labor or mechanical services, fells, cuts, or takes timber
for sale or for commercial or industrial use.
(b) "Timber" means trees of any species maintained for eventual
harvest whether planted or of natural growth, standing or down, on
privately or publicly owned land, and also includes related wood
products, but does not include Christmas trees or other trees to which
the timber excise tax in chapter 84.33 RCW is not imposed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of special fuel by a harvester for use in equipment used to fell or
cut timber.
(2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---