BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.50.551 and 2000 c 128 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board of trustees of each college district shall adopt for each
community and technical college under its jurisdiction written policies
on granting leaves to employees of the district and those colleges,
including but not limited to leaves for attendance at official or
private institutions and conferences; professional leaves for personnel
consistent with the provisions of RCW 28B.10.650; leaves for illness,
injury, bereavement, and emergencies, consistent with RCW 28B.50.4893,
and except as otherwise in this section provided, all with such
compensation as the board of trustees may prescribe, except that the
board shall grant to all such persons leave with full compensation for
illness, injury, bereavement and emergencies as follows:
(1) For persons under contract to be employed, or otherwise
employed, for at least three quarters, not more than twelve days per
year, commencing with the first day on which work is to be performed;
provisions of any contract in force on June 12, 1980, which conflict
with requirements of this subsection shall continue in effect until
contract expiration; after expiration, any new contract executed
between the parties shall be consistent with this subsection;
(2)(a) Such leave entitlement may be accumulated after the first
three-quarter period of employment for full-time employees, and may be
taken at any time;
(b) For part-time academic employees, such leave entitlement
((may)) shall be accumulated after the first quarter of employment by
a college district or the first quarter after June 8, 2000, whichever
is later, and may be taken at any time;
(3) Leave for illness, injury, bereavement and emergencies
heretofore accumulated pursuant to law, rule, regulation or policy by
persons presently employed by college districts and community and
technical colleges shall be added to such leave accumulated under this
section;
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this section or other law,
accumulated leave under this section not taken at the time such person
retires or ceases to be employed by college districts or community and
technical colleges shall not be compensable;
(5) Accumulated leave for illness, injury, bereavement and
emergencies shall be transferred from one college district to another
or between a college district and the following: Any state agency, any
educational service district, any school district, or any other
institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016;
(6) Leave accumulated by a person in a college district or
community and technical college prior to leaving that district or
college may, under the policy of the board of trustees, be granted to
such person when he or she returns to the employment of that district
or college; and
(7) Employees of the Seattle Vocational Institute are exempt from
this section until July 1, 1993.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 In the event that Substitute Senate Bill No.
6356 passes the legislature, the provisions of that bill shall apply to
the state community and technical college system.

--- END ---