BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.44.090 and 2001 c 262 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of transportation, pursuant to rules adopted by the
transportation commission with respect to state highways, and local
authorities, with respect to public highways under their jurisdiction,
may, upon application in writing and good cause being shown therefor,
issue a special permit in writing, or electronically, authorizing the
applicant to operate or move a vehicle or combination of vehicles of a
size, weight of vehicle, or load exceeding the maximum set forth in RCW
46.44.010, 46.44.020, 46.44.030, 46.44.034, and 46.44.041 upon any
public highway under the jurisdiction of the authority granting such
permit and for the maintenance of which such authority is responsible.
Except as provided in rules adopted by the department, no vehicle
required to have a special permit under this chapter is allowed on
public highways in urban areas during peak commute periods.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.44.105 and 2002 c 254 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter is a traffic
infraction, and upon the first finding thereof shall be assessed a
basic penalty of not less than fifty dollars; and upon a second finding
thereof shall be assessed a basic penalty of not less than seventy-five
dollars; and upon a third or subsequent finding shall be assessed a
basic penalty of not less than one hundred dollars.
(2) In addition to the penalties imposed in subsection (1) of this
section, any person violating RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047,
46.44.090, 46.44.091, or 46.44.095 shall be assessed a penalty for each
pound overweight, as follows:
(a) One pound through four thousand pounds overweight is three
cents for each pound;
(b) Four thousand one pounds through ten thousand pounds overweight
is one hundred twenty dollars plus twelve cents per pound for each
additional pound over four thousand pounds overweight;
(c) Ten thousand one pounds through fifteen thousand pounds
overweight is eight hundred forty dollars plus sixteen cents per pound
for each additional pound over ten thousand pounds overweight;
(d) Fifteen thousand one pounds through twenty thousand pounds
overweight is one thousand six hundred forty dollars plus twenty cents
per pound for each additional pound over fifteen thousand pounds
overweight;
(e) Twenty thousand one pounds and more is two thousand six hundred
forty dollars plus thirty cents per pound for each additional pound
over twenty thousand pounds overweight.
Upon a first violation in any calendar year, the court may suspend
the penalty for five hundred pounds of excess weight for each axle on
any vehicle or combination of vehicles, not to exceed a two thousand
pound suspension. In no case may the basic penalty assessed in
subsection (1) of this section or the additional penalty assessed in
subsection (2) of this section, except as provided for the first
violation, be suspended.
(3) In addition to the penalties imposed in subsections (1) and (2)
of this section, any person in violation of any peak commute period
travel restrictions, adopted by rule by the department, on a permit
issued under this chapter shall be assessed a penalty of one thousand
dollars.
(4) In addition to the penalties imposed in subsections (1) and (2)
of this section, any person who fails to obtain a required permit that
includes peak commute period travel restrictions, adopted by rule by
the department, and travels on a state highway in violation of any peak
commute period travel restrictions shall be assessed a penalty of one
thousand dollars.
(5) Whenever any vehicle or combination of vehicles is involved in
two violations of RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.090,
46.44.091, or 46.44.095 during any twelve-month period, the court may
suspend the certificate of license registration of the vehicle or
combination of vehicles for not less than thirty days. Upon a third or
succeeding violation in any twelve-month period, the court shall
suspend the certificate of license registration for not less than
thirty days. Whenever the certificate of license registration is
suspended, the court shall secure such certificate and immediately
forward the same to the director with information concerning the
suspension.
(((4))) (6) Any person found to have violated any posted
limitations of a highway or section of highway shall be assessed a
monetary penalty of not less than one hundred and fifty dollars, and
the court shall in addition thereto upon second violation within a
twelve-month period involving the same power unit, suspend the
certificate of license registration for not less than thirty days.
(((5))) (7) It is unlawful for the driver of a vehicle to fail or
refuse to stop and submit the vehicle and load to a weighing, or to
fail or refuse, when directed by an officer upon a weighing of the
vehicle to stop the vehicle and otherwise comply with the provisions of
this section. It is unlawful for a driver of a commercial motor
vehicle as defined in RCW 46.32.005, other than the driver of a bus as
defined in RCW 46.32.005(2) or a vehicle with a gross vehicle or
combination weight not over sixteen thousand pounds and not
transporting hazardous materials in accordance with RCW 46.32.005(3),
to fail or refuse to stop at a weighing station when proper traffic
control signs indicate scales are open. However, unladen tow trucks
regardless of weight and farm vehicles carrying farm produce with a
gross vehicle or combination weight not over twenty-six thousand pounds
may fail or refuse to stop at a weighing station when proper traffic
control signs indicate scales are open.
Any police officer is authorized to require the driver of any
vehicle or combination of vehicles to stop and submit to a weighing
either by means of a portable or stationary scale and may require that
the vehicle be driven to the nearest public scale. Whenever a police
officer, upon weighing a vehicle and load, determines that the weight
is unlawful, the officer may require the driver to stop the vehicle in
a suitable location and remain standing until such portion of the load
is removed as may be necessary to reduce the gross weight of the
vehicle to the limit permitted by law. If the vehicle is loaded with
grain or other perishable commodities, the driver shall be permitted to
proceed without removing any of the load, unless the gross weight of
the vehicle and load exceeds by more than ten percent the limit
permitted by this chapter. The owner or operator of the vehicle shall
care for all materials unloaded at the risk of the owner or operator.
Any vehicle whose driver or owner represents that the vehicle is
disabled or otherwise unable to proceed to a weighing location shall
have its load sealed or otherwise marked by any police officer. The
owner or driver shall be directed that upon completion of repairs, the
vehicle shall submit to weighing with the load and markings and/or seal
intact and undisturbed. Failure to report for weighing, appearing for
weighing with the seal broken or the markings disturbed, or removal of
any cargo prior to weighing is unlawful. Any person so convicted shall
be fined one thousand dollars, and in addition the certificate of
license registration shall be suspended for not less than thirty days.
(((6))) (8) Any other provision of law to the contrary
notwithstanding, district courts having venue have concurrent
jurisdiction with the superior courts for the imposition of any
penalties authorized under this section.
(((7))) (9) For the purpose of determining additional penalties as
provided by subsection (2) of this section, "overweight" means the
poundage in excess of the maximum allowable gross weight or axle/axle
grouping weight prescribed by RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047,
46.44.091, and 46.44.095.
(((8))) (10) The penalties provided in subsections (1) and (2) of
this section shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW or RCW
10.82.070. For the purpose of computing the basic penalties and
additional penalties to be imposed under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, the convictions shall be on the same vehicle or
combination of vehicles within a twelve-month period under the same
ownership.
(((9))) (11) Any state patrol officer or any weight control officer
who finds any person operating a vehicle or a combination of vehicles
in violation of the conditions of a permit issued under RCW 46.44.047,
46.44.090, and 46.44.095 may confiscate the permit and forward it to
the state department of transportation which may return it to the
permittee or revoke, cancel, or suspend it without refund. The
department of transportation shall keep a record of all action taken
upon permits so confiscated, and if a permit is returned to the
permittee the action taken by the department of transportation shall be
endorsed thereon. Any permittee whose permit is suspended or revoked
may upon request receive a hearing before the department of
transportation or person designated by that department. After the
hearing the department of transportation may reinstate any permit or
revise its previous action.
Every permit issued as provided for in this chapter shall be
carried in the vehicle or combination of vehicles to which it refers
and shall be open to inspection by any law enforcement officer or
authorized agent of any authority granting such a permit.
Upon the third finding within a calendar year of a violation of the
requirements and conditions of a permit issued under RCW 46.44.095, the
permit shall be canceled, and the canceled permit shall be immediately
transmitted by the court or the arresting officer to the department of
transportation. The vehicle covered by the canceled permit is not
eligible for a new permit for a period of thirty days.
(((10))) (12) For the purposes of determining gross weights the
actual scale weight taken by the arresting officer is prima facie
evidence of the total gross weight.
(((11))) (13) It is a traffic infraction to direct the loading of
a vehicle with knowledge that it violates the requirements in RCW
46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.090, 46.44.091, or 46.44.095 and
that it is to be operated on the public highways of this state.
(((12))) (14) The chief of the state patrol, with the advice of the
department, may adopt reasonable rules to aid in the enforcement of
this section.

--- END ---