BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.65.150 and 2000 c 107 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall issue the charter licenses and angler
permits listed in this section according to the requirements of this
title. The licenses and permits and their annual fees and surcharges
are:

License or Permit Annual Fee Governing

(RCW 77.95.090 Surcharge) Section

Resident Nonresident

(a) Nonsalmon charter $225 $375

(b) Salmon charter $380 $685 RCW 77.70.050

(plus $100) (plus $100)

(c) Salmon angler $ 0 $ 0 RCW 77.70.060

(d) Salmon roe $ 95 $ 95 RCW 77.65.350

(2) A salmon charter license designating a vessel is required to
operate a charter boat ((to take)) from which persons may, for a fee,
fish for salmon, other food fish, and shellfish. The director may
issue a salmon charter license only to a person who meets the
qualifications of RCW 77.70.050.
(3) A nonsalmon charter license designating a vessel is required to
operate a charter boat ((to take)) from which persons may, for a fee,
fish for food fish other than salmon and shellfish. ((As used in this
subsection, "food fish" does not include salmon.))
(4)(a) "Charter boat" means a vessel from which persons may, for a
fee, fish for food fish or shellfish for personal use((, and that
brings food fish or shellfish into state ports or brings food fish or
shellfish taken from state waters into United States ports)) in those
state waters set forth in (b) of this subsection. "Charter boat" also
means a vessel from which persons may, for a fee, fish for food fish or
shellfish for personal use in offshore waters or in the waters of other
states. The director may specify by rule when a vessel is a "charter
boat" within this definition. (("Charter boat" does not mean a vessel
used by a guide for clients fishing for food fish for personal use in
freshwater rivers, streams, and lakes, other than Lake Washington or
that part of the Columbia River below the bridge at Longview.))
(b) A person may not operate a vessel from which persons may, for
a fee, fish for food fish or shellfish in Puget Sound, Grays Harbor,
Willapa Bay, Pacific Ocean waters, Lake Washington, or the Columbia
river below the bridge at Longview unless the vessel is designated on
a charter boat license.
(5) A charter boat licensed in Oregon may fish without a Washington
charter license under the same rules as Washington charter boat
operators in ocean waters within the jurisdiction of Washington state
from the southern border of the state of Washington to Leadbetter
Point, as long as the Oregon vessel does not ((land at any Washington
port with the purpose of taking on or discharging passengers)) take on
or discharge passengers for any purpose from any Washington port, the
Washington shore, or a dock, landing, or other point in Washington.
The provisions of this subsection shall be in effect as long as the
state of Oregon has reciprocal laws and regulations.
(6) A salmon charter license under subsection (1)(b) of this
section may be renewed if the license holder notifies the department by
May 1st of that year that he or she will not participate in the fishery
during that calendar year. The license holder must pay the one
hundred-dollar enhancement surcharge, plus a fifteen-dollar handling
charge, in order to be considered a valid renewal and eligible to renew
the license the following year.

--- END ---