BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.04.610 and 2004 c 216 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If any owner of forest land within a forest protection zone
neglects or fails to provide adequate fire protection as required by
RCW 76.04.600, the department shall provide such protection and shall
annually impose the following assessments on each parcel of such land:
(a) A flat fee assessment of fourteen dollars and fifty cents; and (b)
twenty-five cents on each acre exceeding fifty acres. Assessors may,
at their option, collect the assessment on tax exempt lands. If the
assessor elects not to collect the assessment, the department may bill
the landowner directly.
(2) An owner who has paid assessments on two or more parcels, each
containing fewer than fifty acres and each within the same county, may
obtain the following refund:
(a) If all the parcels together contain less than fifty acres, then
the refund is equal to the flat fee assessments paid, reduced by the
total of (i) fourteen dollars and (ii) the total of the amounts
retained by the county from such assessments under subsection (((5)))
(6) of this section.
(b) If all the parcels together contain fifty or more acres, then
the refund is equal to the flat fee assessments paid, reduced by the
total of (i) fourteen dollars, (ii) twenty-five cents for each acre
exceeding fifty acres, and (iii) the total of the amounts retained by
the county from such assessments under subsection (((5))) (6) of this
section.
Applications for refunds shall be submitted to the department on a
form prescribed by the department and in the same year in which the
assessments were paid. The department may not provide refunds to
applicants who do not provide verification that all assessments and
property taxes on the property have been paid. Applications may be
made by mail.
In addition to the procedures under this subsection, property
owners with multiple parcels in a single county who qualify for a
refund under this section may apply to the department on an application
listing all the parcels owned in order to have the assessment computed
on all parcels but billed to a single parcel. Property owners with the
following number of parcels may apply to the department in the year
indicated:

Year Number of Parcels
2002 10 or more parcels
2003 8 or more parcels
2004 and thereafter 6 or more parcels

The department must compute the correct assessment and allocate one
parcel in the county to use to collect the assessment. The county must
then bill the forest fire protection assessment on that one allocated
identified parcel. The landowner is responsible for notifying the
department of any changes in parcel ownership.
(3) Beginning January 1, 1991, under the administration and at the
discretion of the department up to two hundred thousand dollars per
year of this assessment shall be used in support of those rural fire
districts assisting the department in fire protection services on
forest lands.
(4)(a) For a parcel of forest land subject to assessment under
subsection (1) of this section, the department shall annually impose a
supplemental forest fire protection assessment on the owner of such a
parcel where that parcel contains a structure and lies outside the
boundaries of a fire protection district. The supplemental assessment
must be based on the assessed value of that parcel. The rate of the
supplemental assessment is equal to one-half of the average regular
local fire protection district tax rate levied in that tax year by all
fire protection districts in the county in which the parcel is located.
(b) The department shall annually distribute one-half of all moneys
received from the supplemental assessment to counties and fire
protection districts for projects to improve the local infrastructure
supporting fire protection and suppression activities on forest lands.
The remainder of the moneys received by the department must be used in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
(5) For the purpose of this chapter, the department may divide the
forest lands of the state, or any part thereof, into districts, for
fire protection and assessment purposes, may classify lands according
to the character of timber prevailing, and the fire hazard existing,
and place unprotected lands under the administration of the proper
district. Amounts paid or contracted to be paid by the department for
protection of forest lands from funds at its disposal shall be a lien
upon the property protected, unless reimbursed by the owner within ten
days after October 1st of the year in which they were incurred. The
department shall be prepared to make statement thereof, upon request,
to a forest owner whose own protection has not been previously approved
as to its adequacy, the department shall report the same to the
assessor of the county in which the property is situated. The assessor
shall extend the amounts upon the tax rolls covering the property, and
upon authorization from the department shall levy the forest protection
assessment against the amounts of unimproved land as shown in each
ownership on the county assessor's records. The assessor may then
segregate on the records to provide that the improved land and
improvements thereon carry the millage levy designed to support the
rural fire protection districts as provided for in RCW 52.16.170.
(((5))) (6) The amounts assessed under this section shall be
collected at the time, in the same manner, by the same procedure, and
with the same penalties attached that general state and county taxes on
the same property are collected, except that errors in assessments may
be corrected at any time by the department certifying them to the
treasurer of the county in which the land involved is situated.
Assessments shall be known and designated as assessments of the year in
which the amounts became reimbursable. Upon the collection of
assessments the county treasurer shall place fifty cents of the total
assessments paid on a parcel for fire protection into the county
current expense fund to defray the costs of listing, billing, and
collecting these assessments. The treasurer shall then transmit the
balance to the department. Collections shall be applied against
expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this section,
including necessary and reasonable administrative costs incurred by the
department in the enforcement of these provisions. The department may
also expend sums collected from owners of forest lands or received from
any other source for necessary administrative costs in connection with
the enforcement of RCW 76.04.660.
(((6))) (7) When land against which forest protection assessments
or supplemental forest protection assessments are outstanding is
acquired for delinquent taxes and sold at public auction, the state
shall have a prior lien on the proceeds of sale over and above the
amount necessary to satisfy the county's delinquent tax judgment. The
county treasurer, in case the proceeds of sale exceed the amount of the
delinquent tax judgment, shall immediately remit to the department the
amount of the outstanding forest protection assessments.
(((7))) (8) All nonfederal public bodies owning or administering
forest land included in a forest protection zone shall pay the forest
protection assessments provided in this section and the special forest
fire suppression account assessments under RCW 76.04.630. The forest
protection assessments and special forest fire suppression account
assessments shall be payable by nonfederal public bodies from available
funds within thirty days following receipt of the written notice from
the department which is given after October 1st of the year in which
the protection was provided. Unpaid assessments are not a lien against
the nonfederal publicly owned land but shall constitute a debt by the
nonfederal public body to the department and are subject to interest
charges at the legal rate.
(((8))) (9) A public body, having failed to previously pay the
forest protection assessments required of it by this section, which
fails to suppress a fire on or originating from forest lands owned or
administered by it, is liable for the costs of suppression incurred by
the department or its agent and is not entitled to reimbursement of
costs incurred by the public body in the suppression activities.
(((9))) (10) The department may adopt rules to implement this
section, including, but not limited to, rules on levying and collecting
forest protection assessments.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.04.016 and 1993 c 196 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department when acting, in good faith, in its statutory
capacity as a fire prevention and suppression agency, is carrying out
duties owed to the public in general and not to any individual person
or class of persons separate and apart from the public. Nothing
contained in this title, including but not limited to any provision
dealing with payment or collection of any forest protection or fire
suppression assessments under this chapter, may be construed to: (1)
Evidence a legislative intent that the duty to prevent and suppress
forest fires is owed to any individual person or class of persons
separate and apart from the public in general; or (2) evidence a
legislative intent that the department owes a duty to protect any
structure from fire. This section does not alter the department's
duties and responsibilities as a landowner.

--- END ---