BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Sections 1 through 3 and 5 of chapter 436,
Laws of 2005, supersede and preempt all rules, regulations, codes,
statutes, or ordinances of all cities, counties, municipalities, and
local agencies regarding the same subject matter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) 2005 c 436 s 4 (uncodified); and
(2) 2005 c 436 s 6 (uncodified).

--- END ---