BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.08.064 and 2003 c 96 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
There shall be in the counties of Benton and Franklin jointly, six
judges of the superior court; in the county of Clallam, ((two)) three
judges of the superior court; in the county of Jefferson, one judge of
the superior court; in the county of Snohomish, fifteen judges of the
superior court; in the counties of Asotin, Columbia and Garfield
jointly, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Cowlitz,
((four)) five judges of the superior court; in the counties of
Klickitat and Skamania jointly, one judge of the superior court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The additional judicial positions created by
section 1 of this act in Clallam and Cowlitz counties shall be
effective only if each county through its duly constituted legislative
authority documents its approval of the additional positions and its
agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement
from the state, the expenses of such additional judicial positions as
provided by statute.

--- END ---