BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Neither the state nor any of its political subdivisions may
sell or exchange motor vehicles that have been used for law enforcement
purposes before removing all equipment added to or in or on the motor
vehicle that is in addition to equipment customarily in or on a motor
vehicle purchased for ordinary consumer use.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if a motor
vehicle is sold or exchanged to be used for law enforcement purposes to
the state or its political subdivisions.

--- END ---