BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.36.071 and 2004 c 271 s 169 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided to the contrary in RCW 82.14.036, 82.46.021,
or 82.80.090, the ballot title of any referendum filed on an enactment
or portion of an enactment of a local government and any other question
submitted to the voters of a local government consists of three
elements: (a) An identification of the enacting legislative body and
a statement of the subject matter; (b) a concise description of the
measure; and (c) a question. If the ballot is a request for ad valorem
taxing authority, the ballot title must also contain an amount set
forth in terms of dollars on the ballot of the proposition to be
submitted to the voters, together with an estimate of the dollar rate
of tax levy that will be required to produce the dollar amount. The
ballot title must conform with the requirements and be displayed
substantially as provided under RCW 29A.72.050, except that the concise
description must not exceed seventy-five words. If the local
governmental unit is a city or a town, the concise statement shall be
prepared by the city or town attorney. If the local governmental unit
is a county, the concise statement shall be prepared by the prosecuting
attorney of the county. If the unit is a unit of local government
other than a city, town, or county, the concise statement shall be
prepared by the prosecuting attorney of the county within which the
majority area of the unit is located.
(2) A referendum measure on the enactment of a unit of local
government shall be advertised in the manner provided for nominees for
elective office.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if another
provision of law specifies the ballot title for a specific type of
ballot question or proposition.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.36.210 and 2004 c 80 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
the regular property tax levies authorized in RCW 36.69.145, 67.38.130,
84.52.069, or 84.52.135 shall contain in substance the following:

"Shall the . . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose a regular property tax ((levies)) levy of . . . .
. . (insert levy amount) . . . . . . resulting in an estimated rate of
. . . . . . (insert the estimated rate) . . . . . . not to exceed
. . . . . . (insert the maximum rate) ((or less)) per thousand dollars
of assessed valuation for collection in . . . . . . (insert the first
year in which tax will be collected) and continuing for each of
. . . . . . (insert the maximum number of years allowable) consecutive
years?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"
Each voter shall indicate either "Yes" or "No" on his or her ballot
in accordance with the procedures established under this title.

(2) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
a permanent regular tax levy under RCW 84.52.069 shall contain the
following:

"Shall the . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose a PERMANENT regular property levy of . . . . .
(insert the amount of the first year's levy) at a rate not to exceed .
. . . . . (insert the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"

Sec. 3 RCW 84.55.050 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 24 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to any otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate
limitations, regular property taxes may be levied by or for a taxing
district in an amount exceeding the limitations provided for in this
chapter if such levy is authorized by a proposition approved by a
majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition
at a general election held within the district or at a special election
within the taxing district called by the district for the purpose of
submitting such proposition to the voters. Any election held pursuant
to this section shall be held not more than twelve months prior to the
date on which the proposed levy is to be made, except as provided in
subsection (3)(b) of this section. The ballot of the proposition shall
state ((the dollar rate proposed)) an amount set forth in terms of
dollars, together with an estimate of the dollar rate of tax levy that
will be required to produce the dollar amount, and shall clearly state
any conditions which are applicable under subsection (3) of this
section.
(2) After a levy authorized pursuant to this section is made, the
dollar amount of such levy shall be used for the purpose of computing
the limitations for subsequent levies provided for in this chapter,
except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(3) A proposition placed before the voters under this section may:
(a) Limit the period for which the increased levy is to be made;
(b) Subject to statutory dollar limitations in RCW 84.52.043,
authorize annual increases in levies for any county, city, or town for
multiple consecutive years, up to six consecutive years, during which
period each year's authorized maximum legal levy shall be used as the
base upon which an increased levy limit for the succeeding year is
computed, but the ballot proposition must state the dollar amount,
together with the estimated rate required to produce the dollar amount
proposed only for the first year of the consecutive years and must
state the limit factor, or a specified index to be used for determining
a limit factor, such as the consumer price index, which need not be the
same for all years, by which the regular tax levy for the district may
be increased in each of the subsequent consecutive years. Elections
for this purpose must be held at a primary or general election. The
title of each ballot measure must state the specific purposes for which
the proposed levy increase shall be used, and funds raised under this
levy shall not supplant existing funds used for these purposes;
(c) Limit the purpose for which the increased levy is to be made,
but if the limited purpose includes making redemption payments on
bonds, the period for which the increased levies are made shall not
exceed nine years;
(d) Set the levy ((at a)) amount so that the estimated rate is less
than the maximum rate allowed for the district;
(e) Provide that the maximum allowable dollar amount of the final
annual levy of the period specified in the measure shall be used to
compute the limitations provided for in this chapter on levy increases
occurring after the expiration of the period; or
(f) Include any combination of the conditions in this subsection.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in an approved ballot measure
under this section, after the expiration of a limited period or the
satisfaction of a limited purpose, whichever comes first, subsequent
levies shall be computed as if:
(a) The limited proposition under subsection (3) of this section
had not been approved; and
(b) The taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which
would otherwise have been allowed under this chapter during the years
levies were made under the limited proposition.

--- END ---