BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.130 and 1999 c 6 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall prescribe the content of the driver
licensing examination and the manner of conducting the examination,
which shall include but is not limited to:
(a) A test of the applicant's eyesight and ability to see,
understand, and follow highway signs regulating, warning, and directing
traffic;
(b) A test of the applicant's knowledge of traffic laws and ability
to understand and follow the directives of lawful authority, orally or
graphically, that regulate, warn, and direct traffic in accordance with
the traffic laws of this state;
(c) An actual demonstration of the applicant's ability to operate
a motor vehicle without jeopardizing the safety of persons or property.
If the applicant is deaf or hearing impaired, the applicant may be
accompanied by an interpreter to assist the applicant during the
demonstration. The interpreter will be of the applicant's choosing and
at the applicant's expense; and
(d) Such further examination as the director deems necessary:
(i) To determine whether any facts exist that would bar the
issuance of a vehicle operator's license under chapters 46.20, 46.21,
and 46.29 RCW; and
(ii) To determine the applicant's fitness to operate a motor
vehicle safely on the highways.
(2) If the applicant desires to drive a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle he or she must qualify for a motorcycle endorsement under
RCW 46.20.500 through 46.20.515.

--- END ---