BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that access to
preventive oral health care services by citizens of Washington state is
currently restricted by regulatory, financial, and geographic barriers.
The legislature finds that many citizens unnecessarily suffer from
dental disease. Access to preventive oral health care services can
reverse dental disease in many cases, thereby significantly reducing
costs of providing oral health care services. The legislature further
finds that dental hygienists licensed in Washington state have been
providing preventive oral health care services without the supervision
of a dentist to the most medically fragile patients in institutional
settings for over twenty years. The legislature also finds that access
to preventive oral health care services can be improved, and that the
cost of these services can be reduced when provided by dental
hygienists practicing independent of dentist supervision. It is the
intent of the legislature to address the problem of access to
preventive oral health care services by providing five pilot projects
that allow dental hygienists to practice within the current scope of
practice without the supervision of a dentist.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The access to preventive care pilot projects
are established. The secretary of health is authorized to create five
pilot projects in dentally underserved areas of the state whereby
dental hygienists are authorized to practice within the current scope
of practice in RCW 18.29.050, without the supervision of a dentist.
These pilot projects are effective for three years after the effective
date of this section. The secretary of health, in consultation with
the dental hygiene examining committee, shall adopt rules to implement
this section, including the designation of dentally underserved areas
of the state.
(1) The goals of the pilot projects are to:
(a) Open access to preventive oral health care services delivered
by dental hygienists;
(b) Collect data of patients treated by dental hygienists,
including age, treatments rendered, insurance coverage, if any, and
patient referral to dentists;
(c) Evaluate independently managed dental hygiene practices in
increasing the patient flow to dentists, thereby improving dental care;
and
(d) Examine the ways in which the pilot projects affect access to
preventive oral health care for underserved persons. This shall
include a report that (i) determines current levels of child and adult
access to dental care, application of preventive sealants or other
decay preventive measures, and incidence of child dental decay; and
(ii) provides indicators of changes in levels of child and adult access
to dental care, application of preventive sealants or other decay
preventive measures, and incidence of child dental decay as the result
of these pilot programs.
(2) The secretary of health, in consultation with the dental
hygiene examining committee, will:
(a) Create a registry in which dental hygienists can apply to be a
participant in the pilot projects; and
(b) Select the participants of the five pilot projects.
(3) The secretary of health, in consultation with the Washington
state dental hygienists' association, shall provide a report to the
legislature by December 1, 2009, evaluating the outcome of the pilot
projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Dental hygienists participating in the pilot
projects shall not perform injections of anesthetic agents, administer
nitrous oxide, or give a diagnosis for dental treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Dental hygienists participating in the pilot
projects shall refer patients seen in these pilot projects to dentists
as needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The secretary of health shall establish a
task force to recommend ways to improve oral health services to
dentally underserved children and adults in Washington state. The task
force shall provide a report with recommendations to the legislature by
December 1, 2009. Task force membership shall include representation
from the department of health, board of health, Washington state dental
hygienists association, Washington state dental association, and local
health authorities from dentally underserved regions of the state.

--- END ---