BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Part-time academic employees at community
and technical colleges are currently eligible for full health care
benefits beginning the second consecutive quarter of employment, at
half-time or more of an academic workload, as defined in RCW
28B.50.489. They are also eligible for health benefits through the
summer even if they receive no work at all that quarter, if they have
worked half-time or more of an academic workload in three of the four
preceding quarters. However, workload fluctuations below these
thresholds may result in the loss of employer contributions for health
care benefits. It is the intent of the legislature to provide for
continuous health care eligibility for part-time academic employees
based on averaging workload gained during the preceding academic year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Part-time academic employees, as defined in RCW 28B.50.489, who
have established eligibility as determined from the payroll records of
the employing community or technical college districts, for employer
contributions for benefits under this chapter and who have worked an
average of half-time or more in an academic year, through employment at
one or more community or technical college districts, are eligible for
continuation of employer contributions for the subsequent summer
quarter period including the break between summer and fall quarters.
(2) Once a part-time academic employee meets the criteria in
subsection (1) of this section, the employee shall continue to receive
uninterrupted employer contributions for benefits if the employee works
at least three of the four quarters of the academic year with an
average academic workload of half-time or more. Benefits provided
under this section cease at the end of the academic year if this
criteria is not met.
(3) As used in this section, "academic year" means summer, fall,
winter, and spring quarters.
(4) This section does not modify rules in existence on the
effective date of this section adopted under this chapter regarding the
initial establishment of eligibility for benefits.
(5) This section does not preclude individuals from being eligible
for benefits under other laws or rules that may apply or for which they
may be eligible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
Health care benefits for part-time academic employees are governed
by section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---