BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.60.160 and 2005 c 243 s 15 and 2005 c 153 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Except for an election conducted under the instant runoff voting
method for the pilot project authorized by RCW 29A.53.020, (([and]))
and except for Sundays and legal holidays, the county auditor, as
delegated by the county canvassing board, shall process absentee
ballots and canvass the votes cast at that primary or election ((on a
daily basis in counties with a population of seventy-five thousand or
more, or)) at least every third day ((for counties with a population of
less than seventy-five thousand)) after a primary or election and
before certification of election results, if the county auditor is in
possession of more than twenty-five ballots that have yet to be
canvassed. The county auditor, as delegated by the county canvassing
board, may use his or her discretion in determining when to process the
remaining absentee ballots and canvass the votes during the final four
days before the certification of election results in order to protect
the secrecy of any ballot. In counties where this process has not been
delegated to the county auditor, the county auditor shall convene the
county canvassing board to process absentee ballots and canvass the
votes cast at the primary or election as set forth in this section.
Except for an election conducted under the instant runoff voting
method for the pilot project authorized by RCW 29A.53.020, each
absentee ballot previously not canvassed that was received by the
county auditor two days or more before processing absentee ballots and
canvassing the votes as delegated by or processed by the county
canvassing board, that either was received by the county auditor before
the closing of the polls on the day of the primary or election for
which it was issued, or that bears a postmark on or before the primary
or election for which it was issued, must be processed at that time.
The tabulation of votes that results from that day's canvass must be
made available to the general public immediately upon completion of the
canvass.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.60.160 and 2005 c 243 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except Sundays and legal holidays, the county auditor, as
delegated by the county canvassing board, shall process absentee
ballots and canvass the votes cast at that primary or election ((on a
daily basis in counties with a population of seventy-five thousand or
more, or)) at least every third day ((for counties with a population of
less than seventy-five thousand)) after a primary or election and
before certification of election results, if the county auditor is in
possession of more than twenty-five ballots that have yet to be
canvassed. The county auditor, as delegated by the county canvassing
board, may use his or her discretion in determining when to process the
remaining absentee ballots and canvass the votes during the final four
days before the certification of election results in order to protect
the secrecy of any ballot. In counties where this process has not been
delegated to the county auditor, the county auditor shall convene the
county canvassing board to process absentee ballots and canvass the
votes cast at the primary or election as set forth in this section.
Each absentee ballot previously not canvassed that was received by
the county auditor two days or more before processing absentee ballots
and canvassing the votes as delegated by or processed by the county
canvassing board, that either was received by the county auditor before
the closing of the polls on the day of the primary or election for
which it was issued, or that bears a postmark on or before the primary
or election for which it was issued, must be processed at that time.
The tabulation of votes that results from that day's canvass must be
made available to the general public immediately upon completion of the
canvass.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2013.

--- END ---