BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.64.021 and 2005 c 243 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the official canvass of all of the returns for any office at
any statewide primary or statewide election reveals that the difference
in the number of votes cast for a candidate apparently nominated or
elected to any statewide office and the number of votes cast for the
closest apparently defeated opponent is less than ((two)) one thousand
votes and also less than ((one-half)) one-fourth of one percent of the
total number of votes cast for both candidates, the ((county canvassing
board shall conduct a)) secretary of state shall, within three business
days of the day that the returns of the statewide primary or statewide
election are certified, direct the canvassing boards of the counties to
conduct a manual recount of all votes cast on that position.
(((a) Whenever such a difference occurs in the number of votes cast
for candidates)) (2) If the official canvass of all the returns for any
office at any primary or election for a position the declaration of
candidacy for which was filed with the secretary of state reveals that
the difference in the number of votes cast for a candidate apparently
nominated or elected and the number of votes cast for the closest
apparently defeated opponent is less than one hundred fifty votes and
also less than one-fourth of one percent of the total number of votes
cast for both candidates, the secretary of state shall, within three
business days of the day that the returns of the primary or election
are first certified by the canvassing boards of those counties, direct
those boards to conduct a manual recount of all votes cast ((on the))
for that position.
(((b)(i) For statewide elections, if the difference in the number
of votes cast for the apparent winner and the closest apparently
defeated opponent is less than one thousand votes and also less than
one-fourth of one percent of the total number of votes cast for both
candidates, the votes shall be recounted manually or as provided in
subsection (3) of this section.
(ii) For elections not included in (b)(i) of this subsection, if
the difference in the number of votes cast for the apparent winner and
the closest apparently defeated opponent is less than one hundred fifty
votes and also less than one-fourth of one percent of the total number
of votes cast for both candidates, the votes shall be recounted
manually or as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(2))) (3) If the official canvass of all the returns for any office
at any primary or election for a position the declaration of candidacy
for which was filed with the county auditor reveals that the difference
in the number of votes cast for a candidate apparently nominated or
elected and the number of votes cast for the closest apparently
defeated opponent is less than one hundred fifty votes and also less
than one-fourth of one percent of the total number of votes cast for
both candidates, the county canvassing board shall conduct a manual
recount of all votes cast for that position.
(4) A mandatory recount shall be conducted in the manner provided
by RCW 29A.64.030, 29A.64.041, and 29A.64.061. No cost of a mandatory
recount may be charged to any candidate.
(((3))) (5) The apparent winner and closest apparently defeated
opponent for an office for which a manual recount is required under
((subsection (1)(b) of)) this section may select an alternative method
of conducting the recount. To select such an alternative, the two
candidates shall agree to the alternative in a signed, written
statement filed with the election official for the office. The recount
shall be conducted using the alternative method if: It is suited to
the balloting system that was used for casting the votes for the
office; it involves the use of a vote tallying system that is approved
for use in this state by the secretary of state; and the vote tallying
system is readily available in each county required to conduct the
recount. If more than one balloting system was used in casting votes
for the office, an alternative to a manual recount may be selected for
each system.

--- END ---