BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Land used for growing agricultural crops used in the production
of biodiesel feedstock is exempt from the state property tax levied in
RCW 84.52.065, to the extent provided in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2)(a) A parcel used exclusively for growing an agricultural crop
used in the production of biodiesel feedstock is exempt from the state
property tax levied in RCW 84.52.065 for the assessment year in which
the crop used in the production of biodiesel feedstock is harvested.
A person claiming the exemption under this subsection (2)(a) shall file
a claim for exemption with the county assessor by November 1st of the
assessment year during which these crops are harvested.
(b) A parcel used for growing an agricultural crop used in the
production of biodiesel feedstock and other crops is exempt from the
state property tax levied in RCW 84.52.065 on a proportional basis for
the assessment year in which the crop used in the production of
biodiesel feedstock is harvested. This basis shall be derived by
dividing the acreage used to grow an agricultural crop used in the
production of biodiesel feedstock by the total acreage under
cultivation. A person claiming the exemption under this subsection
(2)(b) shall file a claim for exemption with the county assessor by
November 1st of the assessment year during which the crops are
harvested identifying the total acreage under cultivation and the
acreage devoted to an agricultural crop used in the production of
biodiesel feedstock.
(c) Land on which buildings are situated is not subject to the
exemption in this section.
(3) Claims for exemption under this section shall be filed with the
county assessor on forms prescribed by the department and furnished by
the assessor. The assessor shall verify and approve claims as the
assessor determines to be justified and in accordance with this
section. A claim for exemption under this section shall be for taxes
due and payable in the year following the year in which the claim is
filed.
(4) The department may adopt rules necessary to administer this
section.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "biodiesel feedstock" has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 84.36.635.

--- END ---