BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.300 and 2005 c 274 s 410 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Records, maps, or other information identifying the location of
archaeological sites in order to avoid the looting or depredation of
such sites are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.
(2) Records, maps, and other information identifying the location
of cultural resources acquired during watershed analysis pursuant to
the forests and fish report under RCW 76.09.370 in order to prevent the
looting or depredation of such sites are exempt from disclosure under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---