BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.020 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Accrual method of accounting" means a method of accounting in
which revenues are reported in the period when they are earned,
regardless of when they are collected, and expenses are reported in the
period in which they are incurred, regardless of when they are paid.
(2) "Appraisal" means the process of estimating the fair market
value or reconstructing the historical cost of an asset acquired in a
past period as performed by a professionally designated real estate
appraiser with no pecuniary interest in the property to be appraised.
It includes a systematic, analytic determination and the recording and
analyzing of property facts, rights, investments, and values based on
a personal inspection and inventory of the property.
(3) "Arm's-length transaction" means a transaction resulting from
good-faith bargaining between a buyer and seller who are not related
organizations and have adverse positions in the market place. Sales or
exchanges of nursing home facilities among two or more parties in which
all parties subsequently continue to own one or more of the facilities
involved in the transactions shall not be considered as arm's-length
transactions for purposes of this chapter. Sale of a nursing home
facility which is subsequently leased back to the seller within five
years of the date of sale shall not be considered as an arm's-length
transaction for purposes of this chapter.
(4) "Assets" means economic resources of the contractor, recognized
and measured in conformity with generally accepted accounting
principles.
(5) "Audit" or "department audit" means an examination of the
records of a nursing facility participating in the medicaid payment
system, including but not limited to: The contractor's financial and
statistical records, cost reports and all supporting documentation and
schedules, receivables, and resident trust funds, to be performed as
deemed necessary by the department and according to department rule.
(6) "Bad debts" means amounts considered to be uncollectible from
accounts and notes receivable.
(7) "Beneficial owner" means:
(a) Any person who, directly or indirectly, through any contract,
arrangement, understanding, relationship, or otherwise has or shares:
(i) Voting power which includes the power to vote, or to direct the
voting of such ownership interest; and/or
(ii) Investment power which includes the power to dispose, or to
direct the disposition of such ownership interest;
(b) Any person who, directly or indirectly, creates or uses a
trust, proxy, power of attorney, pooling arrangement, or any other
contract, arrangement, or device with the purpose or effect of
divesting himself or herself of beneficial ownership of an ownership
interest or preventing the vesting of such beneficial ownership as part
of a plan or scheme to evade the reporting requirements of this
chapter;
(c) Any person who, subject to (b) of this subsection, has the
right to acquire beneficial ownership of such ownership interest within
sixty days, including but not limited to any right to acquire:
(i) Through the exercise of any option, warrant, or right;
(ii) Through the conversion of an ownership interest;
(iii) Pursuant to the power to revoke a trust, discretionary
account, or similar arrangement; or
(iv) Pursuant to the automatic termination of a trust,
discretionary account, or similar arrangement;
except that, any person who acquires an ownership interest or power
specified in (c)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection with the purpose
or effect of changing or influencing the control of the contractor, or
in connection with or as a participant in any transaction having such
purpose or effect, immediately upon such acquisition shall be deemed to
be the beneficial owner of the ownership interest which may be acquired
through the exercise or conversion of such ownership interest or power;
(d) Any person who in the ordinary course of business is a pledgee
of ownership interest under a written pledge agreement shall not be
deemed to be the beneficial owner of such pledged ownership interest
until the pledgee has taken all formal steps necessary which are
required to declare a default and determines that the power to vote or
to direct the vote or to dispose or to direct the disposition of such
pledged ownership interest will be exercised; except that:
(i) The pledgee agreement is bona fide and was not entered into
with the purpose nor with the effect of changing or influencing the
control of the contractor, nor in connection with any transaction
having such purpose or effect, including persons meeting the conditions
set forth in (b) of this subsection; and
(ii) The pledgee agreement, prior to default, does not grant to the
pledgee:
(A) The power to vote or to direct the vote of the pledged
ownership interest; or
(B) The power to dispose or direct the disposition of the pledged
ownership interest, other than the grant of such power(s) pursuant to
a pledge agreement under which credit is extended and in which the
pledgee is a broker or dealer.
(8) "Capitalization" means the recording of an expenditure as an
asset.
(9) "Case mix" means a measure of the intensity of care and
services needed by the residents of a nursing facility or a group of
residents in the facility.
(10) "Case mix index" means a number representing the average case
mix of a nursing facility.
(11) "Case mix weight" means a numeric score that identifies the
relative resources used by a particular group of a nursing facility's
residents.
(12) "Certificate of capital authorization" means a certification
from the department for an allocation from the biennial capital
financing authorization for all new or replacement building
construction, or for major renovation projects, receiving a certificate
of need or a certificate of need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW
after July 1, 2001.
(13) "Contractor" means a person or entity licensed under chapter
18.51 RCW to operate a medicare and medicaid certified nursing
facility, responsible for operational decisions, and contracting with
the department to provide services to medicaid recipients residing in
the facility.
(14) "Default case" means no initial assessment has been completed
for a resident and transmitted to the department by the cut-off date,
or an assessment is otherwise past due for the resident, under state
and federal requirements.
(15) "Department" means the department of social and health
services (DSHS) and its employees.
(16) "Depreciation" means the systematic distribution of the cost
or other basis of tangible assets, less salvage, over the estimated
useful life of the assets.
(17) "Direct care" means nursing care and related care provided to
nursing facility residents. Therapy care shall not be considered part
of direct care.
(18) "Direct care supplies" means medical, pharmaceutical, and
other supplies required for the direct care of a nursing facility's
residents.
(19) "Entity" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
limited liability company, or any other association of individuals
capable of entering enforceable contracts.
(20) "Equity" means the net book value of all tangible and
intangible assets less the recorded value of all liabilities, as
recognized and measured in conformity with generally accepted
accounting principles.
(21) "Essential community provider" means a facility which is the
only nursing facility within a commuting distance radius of at least
forty minutes duration, traveling by automobile.
(22) "Facility" or "nursing facility" means a nursing home licensed
in accordance with chapter 18.51 RCW, excepting nursing homes certified
as institutions for mental diseases, or that portion of a multiservice
facility licensed as a nursing home, or that portion of a hospital
licensed in accordance with chapter 70.41 RCW which operates as a
nursing home.
(23) "Fair market value" means the replacement cost of an asset
less observed physical depreciation on the date for which the market
value is being determined.
(24) "Financial statements" means statements prepared and presented
in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles including,
but not limited to, balance sheet, statement of operations, statement
of changes in financial position, and related notes.
(25) "Generally accepted accounting principles" means accounting
principles approved by the financial accounting standards board (FASB).
(26) "Goodwill" means the excess of the price paid for a nursing
facility business over the fair market value of all net identifiable
tangible and intangible assets acquired, as measured in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles.
(27) "Grouper" means a computer software product that groups
individual nursing facility residents into case mix classification
groups based on specific resident assessment data and computer logic.
(28) "High labor-cost county" means an urban county in which the
median allowable facility cost per case mix unit is more than ten
percent higher than the median allowable facility cost per case mix
unit among all other urban counties, excluding that county.
(29) "Historical cost" means the actual cost incurred in acquiring
and preparing an asset for use, including feasibility studies,
architect's fees, and engineering studies.
(30) "Home and central office costs" means costs that are incurred
in the support and operation of a home and central office. Home and
central office costs include centralized services that are performed in
support of a nursing facility. The department may exclude from this
definition costs that are nonduplicative, documented, ordinary,
necessary, and related to the provision of care services to authorized
patients.
(31) "Imprest fund" means a fund which is regularly replenished in
exactly the amount expended from it.
(32) "Joint facility costs" means any costs which represent
resources which benefit more than one facility, or one facility and any
other entity.
(33) "Lease agreement" means a contract between two parties for the
possession and use of real or personal property or assets for a
specified period of time in exchange for specified periodic payments.
Elimination (due to any cause other than death or divorce) or addition
of any party to the contract, expiration, or modification of any lease
term in effect on January 1, 1980, or termination of the lease by
either party by any means shall constitute a termination of the lease
agreement. An extension or renewal of a lease agreement, whether or
not pursuant to a renewal provision in the lease agreement, shall be
considered a new lease agreement. A strictly formal change in the
lease agreement which modifies the method, frequency, or manner in
which the lease payments are made, but does not increase the total
lease payment obligation of the lessee, shall not be considered
modification of a lease term.
(34) "Medical care program" or "medicaid program" means medical
assistance, including nursing care, provided under RCW 74.09.500 or
authorized state medical care services.
(35) "Medical care recipient," "medicaid recipient," or "recipient"
means an individual determined eligible by the department for the
services provided under chapter 74.09 RCW.
(36) "Minimum data set" means the overall data component of the
resident assessment instrument, indicating the strengths, needs, and
preferences of an individual nursing facility resident.
(37) "Net book value" means the historical cost of an asset less
accumulated depreciation.
(38) "Net invested funds" means the net book value of tangible
fixed assets employed by a contractor to provide services under the
medical care program, including land, buildings, and equipment as
recognized and measured in conformity with generally accepted
accounting principles.
(39) "Nonurban county" means a county which is not located in a
metropolitan statistical area as determined and defined by the United
States office of management and budget or other appropriate agency or
office of the federal government.
(40) "Operating lease" means a lease under which rental or lease
expenses are included in current expenses in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles.
(41) "Owner" means a sole proprietor, general or limited partners,
members of a limited liability company, and beneficial interest holders
of five percent or more of a corporation's outstanding stock.
(42) "Ownership interest" means all interests beneficially owned by
a person, calculated in the aggregate, regardless of the form which
such beneficial ownership takes.
(43) "Patient day" or "resident day" means a calendar day of care
provided to a nursing facility resident, regardless of payment source,
which will include the day of admission and exclude the day of
discharge; except that, when admission and discharge occur on the same
day, one day of care shall be deemed to exist. A "medicaid day" or
"recipient day" means a calendar day of care provided to a medicaid
recipient determined eligible by the department for services provided
under chapter 74.09 RCW, subject to the same conditions regarding
admission and discharge applicable to a patient day or resident day of
care.
(44) "Professionally designated real estate appraiser" means an
individual who is regularly engaged in the business of providing real
estate valuation services for a fee, and who is deemed qualified by a
nationally recognized real estate appraisal educational organization on
the basis of extensive practical appraisal experience, including the
writing of real estate valuation reports as well as the passing of
written examinations on valuation practice and theory, and who by
virtue of membership in such organization is required to subscribe and
adhere to certain standards of professional practice as such
organization prescribes.
(45) "Provider fees" means taxes and assessments levied by any
state or local government, in the form of real estate or property
taxes, and the business and occupation tax levied pursuant to chapter
82.04 RCW.
(46) "Qualified therapist" means:
(a) A mental health professional as defined by chapter 71.05 RCW;
(b) A mental retardation professional who is a therapist approved
by the department who has had specialized training or one year's
experience in treating or working with the mentally retarded or
developmentally disabled;
(c) A speech pathologist who is eligible for a certificate of
clinical competence in speech pathology or who has the equivalent
education and clinical experience;
(d) A physical therapist as defined by chapter 18.74 RCW;
(e) An occupational therapist who is a graduate of a program in
occupational therapy, or who has the equivalent of such education or
training; and
(f) A respiratory care practitioner certified under chapter 18.89
RCW.
(((46))) (47) "Rate" or "rate allocation" means the medicaid per-patient-day payment amount for medicaid patients calculated in
accordance with the allocation methodology set forth in part E of this
chapter.
(((47))) (48) "Real property," whether leased or owned by the
contractor, means the building, allowable land, land improvements, and
building improvements associated with a nursing facility.
(((48))) (49) "Rebased rate" or "cost-rebased rate" means a
facility-specific component rate assigned to a nursing facility for a
particular rate period established on desk-reviewed, adjusted costs
reported for that facility covering at least six months of a prior
calendar year designated as a year to be used for cost-rebasing payment
rate allocations under the provisions of this chapter.
(((49))) (50) "Records" means those data supporting all financial
statements and cost reports including, but not limited to, all general
and subsidiary ledgers, books of original entry, and transaction
documentation, however such data are maintained.
(((50))) (51) "Related organization" means an entity which is under
common ownership and/or control with, or has control of, or is
controlled by, the contractor.
(a) "Common ownership" exists when an entity is the beneficial
owner of five percent or more ownership interest in the contractor and
any other entity.
(b) "Control" exists where an entity has the power, directly or
indirectly, significantly to influence or direct the actions or
policies of an organization or institution, whether or not it is
legally enforceable and however it is exercisable or exercised.
(((51))) (52) "Related care" means only those services that are
directly related to providing direct care to nursing facility
residents. These services include, but are not limited to, nursing
direction and supervision, medical direction, medical records, pharmacy
services, activities, and social services.
(((52))) (53) "Resident assessment instrument," including federally
approved modifications for use in this state, means a federally
mandated, comprehensive nursing facility resident care planning and
assessment tool, consisting of the minimum data set and resident
assessment protocols.
(((53))) (54) "Resident assessment protocols" means those
components of the resident assessment instrument that use the minimum
data set to trigger or flag a resident's potential problems and risk
areas.
(((54))) (55) "Resource utilization groups" means a case mix
classification system that identifies relative resources needed to care
for an individual nursing facility resident.
(((55))) (56) "Restricted fund" means those funds the principal
and/or income of which is limited by agreement with or direction of the
donor to a specific purpose.
(((56))) (57) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of
social and health services.
(((57))) (58) "Support services" means food, food preparation,
dietary, housekeeping, and laundry services provided to nursing
facility residents.
(((58))) (59) "Therapy care" means those services required by a
nursing facility resident's comprehensive assessment and plan of care,
that are provided by qualified therapists, or support personnel under
their supervision, including related costs as designated by the
department.
(((59))) (60) "Title XIX" or "medicaid" means the 1965 amendments
to the social security act, P.L. 89-07, as amended and the medicaid
program administered by the department.
(((60))) (61) "Urban county" means a county which is located in a
metropolitan statistical area as determined and defined by the United
States office of management and budget or other appropriate agency or
office of the federal government.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.421 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The purpose of part E of this chapter is to determine nursing
facility medicaid payment rates that, in the aggregate for all
participating nursing facilities, are in accordance with the biennial
appropriations act.
(2)(a) The department shall use the nursing facility medicaid
payment rate methodologies described in this chapter to determine
initial component rate allocations for each medicaid nursing facility.
(b) The initial component rate allocations shall be subject to
adjustment as provided in this section in order to assure that the
statewide average payment rate to nursing facilities is less than or
equal to the statewide average payment rate specified in the biennial
appropriations act.
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as creating a legal
right or entitlement to any payment that (a) has not been adjusted
under this section or (b) would cause the statewide average payment
rate to exceed the statewide average payment rate specified in the
biennial appropriations act.
(4)(a) The statewide average payment rate for any state fiscal year
under the nursing facility payment system, weighted by patient days,
shall not exceed the annual statewide weighted average nursing facility
payment rate identified for that fiscal year in the biennial
appropriations act.
(b) If the department determines that the weighted average nursing
facility payment rate calculated in accordance with this chapter is
likely to exceed the weighted average nursing facility payment rate
identified in the biennial appropriations act, then the department
shall adjust all nursing facility payment rates proportional to the
amount by which the weighted average rate allocations would otherwise
exceed the budgeted rate amount, except as provided in section 7 of
this act. Any such adjustments shall only be made prospectively, not
retrospectively, and shall be applied proportionately to each component
rate allocation for each facility.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.46.431 and 2005 c 518 s 944 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 1999, nursing facility medicaid payment rate
allocations shall be facility-specific and shall have seven components:
Direct care, therapy care, support services, operations, property,
financing allowance, and variable return. The department shall
establish and adjust each of these components, as provided in this
section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing
facility in this state.
(2) With the exception of the direct care component, all component
rate allocations for essential community providers as defined in this
chapter shall be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five
percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in
use. For all facilities other than essential community providers,
effective July 1, ((2001)) 2006, component rate allocations in ((direct
care,)) therapy care, support services, and variable return((,
operations, property, and financing allowance)) shall continue to be
based upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of
licensed beds. For all facilities other than essential community
providers, effective July 1, ((2002)) 2006, the component rate
allocations in operations, property, and financing allowance shall be
based upon a minimum facility occupancy of ninety percent of licensed
beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use. For all
facilities, effective July 1, 2006, the component rate allocation in
direct care shall be based upon actual facility occupancy.
(3) Information and data sources used in determining medicaid
payment rate allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report
periods, resident assessment instrument formats, resident assessment
methodologies, and resident classification and case mix weighting
methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to time as
determined by the department.
(4)(a) Direct care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
((cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, direct care component rate allocations; adjusted)) cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
((2005)) 2006, direct care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost
report data from ((1999)) 2004 will continue to be used for July 1,
((2005)) 2006, and later direct care component rate allocations.
(b) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1996 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(c) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1999 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(5)(a) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
((cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, therapy care component rate allocations; adjusted)) cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
((2005)) 2006, therapy care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost
report data from ((1999)) 2004 will continue to be used for July 1,
((2005)) 2006, and later therapy care component rate allocations.
(b) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(6)(a) Support services component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months. Adjusted ((cost report data from 1996 shall be used for
October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services component rate
allocations; adjusted)) cost report data from 1999 shall be used for
July 1, 2001, through June 30, ((2005)) 2006, support services
component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report data from ((1999))
2004 will continue to be used for July 1, ((2005)) 2006, and later
support services component rate allocations.
(b) Support services component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(7)(a) Operations component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from ((1996 shall be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, operations component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from)) 1999 shall be used for July 1, 2001, through June
30, ((2005)) 2006, operations component rate allocations. Adjusted
cost report data from ((1999)) 2004 will continue to be used for July
1, ((2005)) 2006, and later operations component rate allocations.
(b) Operations component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(8) For July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, a facility's
property and return on investment component rates shall be the
facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on investment component
rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999,
a facility's property and return on investment component rates shall be
rebased utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months of data.
(9) Total payment rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment
system shall not exceed facility rates charged to the general public
for comparable services.
(10) Medicaid contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum
wage of the greater of the state minimum wage or the federal minimum
wage.
(11) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions for determining component rate allocations for
facilities in circumstances not directly addressed by this chapter,
including but not limited to: The need to prorate inflation for
partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities, existing
facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded
new bed capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of
ownership of the nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or
converting beds back into service, facilities temporarily reducing the
number of set-up beds during a remodel, facilities having less than six
months of either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.
(12) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions, including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting
rates to reflect capital improvements or new requirements imposed by
the department or the federal government. Any such rate adjustments
are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
(13) Effective July 1, 2001, medicaid rates shall continue to be
revised downward in all components, in accordance with department
rules, for facilities converting banked beds to active service under
chapter 70.38 RCW, by using the facility's increased licensed bed
capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting. However,
for facilities other than essential community providers which bank beds
under chapter 70.38 RCW, after May 25, 2001, medicaid rates shall be
revised upward, in accordance with department rules, in direct care,
therapy care, support services, and variable return components only, by
using the facility's decreased licensed bed capacity to recalculate
minimum occupancy for rate setting, but no upward revision shall be
made to operations, property, or financing allowance component rates.
(14) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or a certificate of
need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30, 2001, must have
a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a) the
depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included in
calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation; and
(b) the net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition to
be included in calculation of the facility's financing allowance rate
allocation.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.46.506 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The direct care component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of nursing care for one resident of a nursing facility for
one day, including direct care supplies. Therapy services and
supplies, which correspond to the therapy care component rate, shall be
excluded. The direct care component rate includes elements of case mix
determined consistent with the principles of this section and other
applicable provisions of this chapter.
(2) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall determine and
update quarterly for each nursing facility serving medicaid residents
a facility-specific per-resident day direct care component rate
allocation, to be effective on the first day of each calendar quarter.
In determining direct care component rates the department shall
utilize, as specified in this section, minimum data set resident
assessment data for each resident of the facility, as transmitted to,
and if necessary corrected by, the department in the resident
assessment instrument format approved by federal authorities for use in
this state.
(3) The department may question the accuracy of assessment data for
any resident and utilize corrected or substitute information, however
derived, in determining direct care component rates. The department is
authorized to impose civil fines and to take adverse rate actions
against a contractor, as specified by the department in rule, in order
to obtain compliance with resident assessment and data transmission
requirements and to ensure accuracy.
(4) Cost report data used in setting direct care component rate
allocations shall be 1996 ((and)), 1999, and 2004 for rate periods as
specified in RCW 74.46.431(4)(a).
(5) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall rebase each
nursing facility's direct care component rate allocation as described
in RCW 74.46.431, adjust its direct care component rate allocation for
economic trends and conditions as described in RCW 74.46.431, and
update its medicaid average case mix index, consistent with the
following:
(a) Reduce total direct care costs reported by each nursing
facility for the applicable cost report period specified in RCW
74.46.431(4)(a) to reflect any department adjustments, and to eliminate
reported resident therapy costs and adjustments, in order to derive the
facility's total allowable direct care cost;
(b) Divide each facility's total allowable direct care cost by its
adjusted resident days for the same report period((, increased if
necessary to a minimum occupancy of eighty-five percent; that is, the
greater of actual or imputed occupancy at eighty-five percent of
licensed beds,)) to derive the facility's allowable direct care cost
per resident day;
(c) Adjust the facility's per resident day direct care cost by the
applicable factor specified in RCW 74.46.431(4) (b) and (c) to derive
its adjusted allowable direct care cost per resident day;
(d) Divide each facility's adjusted allowable direct care cost per
resident day by the facility average case mix index for the applicable
quarters specified by RCW 74.46.501(7)(b) to derive the facility's
allowable direct care cost per case mix unit;
(e) Effective for July 1, 2001, rate setting, divide nursing
facilities into at least two and, if applicable, three peer groups:
Those located in nonurban counties; those located in high labor-cost
counties, if any; and those located in other urban counties;
(f) Array separately the allowable direct care cost per case mix
unit for all facilities in nonurban counties; for all facilities in
high labor-cost counties, if applicable; and for all facilities in
other urban counties, and determine the median allowable direct care
cost per case mix unit for each peer group;
(g) Except as provided in (i) of this subsection, from October 1,
1998, through June 30, 2000, determine each facility's quarterly direct
care component rate as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than eighty-five percent of the facility's peer group median
established under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per
case mix unit equal to eighty-five percent of the facility's peer group
median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to
the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group median established
under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit
equal to one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group median, and
shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(iii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is
between eighty-five and one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group
median established under (f) of this subsection shall have a direct
care component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost
per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case
mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(h) Except as provided in (i) of this subsection, from July 1,
2000, forward, and for all future rate setting, determine each
facility's quarterly direct care component rate as follows:
(i) ((Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than ninety percent of the facility's peer group median established
under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit
equal to ninety percent of the facility's peer group median, and shall
have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's
assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid
average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii))) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is
greater than one hundred ten percent of the peer group median
established under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per
case mix unit equal to one hundred ten percent of the peer group
median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to
the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(((iii))) (ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit
is ((between ninety and)) under one hundred ten percent of the peer
group median established under (f) of this subsection shall have a
direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable
cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average
case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(i)(i) Between October 1, 1998, and June 30, 2000, the department
shall compare each facility's direct care component rate allocation
calculated under (g) of this subsection with the facility's nursing
services component rate in effect on September 30, 1998, less therapy
costs, plus any exceptional care offsets as reported on the cost
report, adjusted for economic trends and conditions as provided in RCW
74.46.431. A facility shall receive the higher of the two rates.
(ii) Between July 1, 2000, and June 30, 2002, the department shall
compare each facility's direct care component rate allocation
calculated under (h) of this subsection with the facility's direct care
component rate in effect on June 30, 2000. A facility shall receive
the higher of the two rates. Between July 1, 2001, and June 30, 2002,
if during any quarter a facility whose rate paid under (h) of this
subsection is greater than either the direct care rate in effect on
June 30, 2000, or than that facility's allowable direct care cost per
case mix unit calculated in (d) of this subsection multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c), the facility shall be paid in that
and each subsequent quarter pursuant to (h) of this subsection and
shall not be entitled to the greater of the two rates.
(iii) Effective July 1, 2002, all direct care component rate
allocations shall be as determined under (h) of this subsection.
(6) The direct care component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7) Payments resulting from increases in direct care component
rates, granted under authority of RCW 74.46.508(1) for a facility's
exceptional care residents, shall be offset against the facility's
examined, allowable direct care costs, for each report year or partial
period such increases are paid. Such reductions in allowable direct
care costs shall be for rate setting, settlement, and other purposes
deemed appropriate by the department.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.46.511 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 11 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The therapy care component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of medicaid one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified
therapist as defined in this chapter, including therapy supplies and
therapy consultation, for one day for one medicaid resident of a
nursing facility. The therapy care component rate allocation for
October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, shall be based on adjusted
therapy costs and days from calendar year 1996. The therapy component
rate allocation for July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2004, shall be based
on adjusted therapy costs and days from calendar year 1999. The
therapy component rate allocation for July 1, 2006, and later shall be
based on adjusted therapy costs and days from calendar year 2004. The
therapy care component rate shall be adjusted for economic trends and
conditions as specified in RCW 74.46.431(5)(b), and shall be determined
in accordance with this section.
(2) In rebasing, as provided in RCW 74.46.431(5)(a), the department
shall take from the cost reports of facilities the following reported
information:
(a) Direct one-on-one therapy charges for all residents by payer
including charges for supplies;
(b) The total units or modules of therapy care for all residents by
type of therapy provided, for example, speech or physical. A unit or
module of therapy care is considered to be fifteen minutes of one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified therapist or support personnel; and
(c) Therapy consulting expenses for all residents.
(3) The department shall determine for all residents the total cost
per unit of therapy for each type of therapy by dividing the total
adjusted one-on-one therapy expense for each type by the total units
provided for that therapy type.
(4) The department shall divide medicaid nursing facilities in this
state into two peer groups:
(a) Those facilities located within urban counties; and
(b) Those located within nonurban counties.
The department shall array the facilities in each peer group from
highest to lowest based on their total cost per unit of therapy for
each therapy type. The department shall determine the median total
cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type and add ten percent of
median total cost per unit of therapy. The cost per unit of therapy
for each therapy type at a nursing facility shall be the lesser of its
cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type or the median total cost
per unit plus ten percent for each therapy type for its peer group.
(5) The department shall calculate each nursing facility's therapy
care component rate allocation as follows:
(a) To determine the allowable total therapy cost for each therapy
type, the allowable cost per unit of therapy for each type of therapy
shall be multiplied by the total therapy units for each type of
therapy;
(b) The medicaid allowable one-on-one therapy expense shall be
calculated taking the allowable total therapy cost for each therapy
type times the medicaid percent of total therapy charges for each
therapy type;
(c) The medicaid allowable one-on-one therapy expense for each
therapy type shall be divided by total adjusted medicaid days to arrive
at the medicaid one-on-one therapy cost per patient day for each
therapy type;
(d) The medicaid one-on-one therapy cost per patient day for each
therapy type shall be multiplied by total adjusted patient days for all
residents to calculate the total allowable one-on-one therapy expense.
The lesser of the total allowable therapy consultant expense for the
therapy type or a reasonable percentage of allowable therapy consultant
expense for each therapy type, as established in rule by the
department, shall be added to the total allowable one-on-one therapy
expense to determine the allowable therapy cost for each therapy type;
(e) The allowable therapy cost for each therapy type shall be added
together, the sum of which shall be the total allowable therapy expense
for the nursing facility;
(f) The total allowable therapy expense will be divided by the
greater of adjusted total patient days from the cost report on which
the therapy expenses were reported, or patient days at eighty-five
percent occupancy of licensed beds. The outcome shall be the nursing
facility's therapy care component rate allocation.
(6) The therapy care component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7) The therapy care component rate shall be suspended for medicaid
residents in qualified nursing facilities designated by the department
who are receiving therapy paid by the department outside the facility
daily rate under RCW 74.46.508(2).

Sec. 6 RCW 74.46.521 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The operations component rate allocation corresponds to the
general operation of a nursing facility for one resident for one day,
including but not limited to management, administration, utilities,
office supplies, accounting and bookkeeping, minor building
maintenance, minor equipment repairs and replacements, and other
supplies and services, exclusive of direct care, therapy care, support
services, property, financing allowance, and variable return.
(2) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall determine each
medicaid nursing facility's operations component rate allocation using
cost report data specified by RCW 74.46.431(7)(a). Effective July 1,
2002, operations component rates for all facilities except essential
community providers shall be based upon a minimum occupancy of ninety
percent of licensed beds, and no operations component rate shall be
revised in response to beds banked on or after May 25, 2001, under
chapter 70.38 RCW.
(3) To determine each facility's operations component rate the
department shall:
(a)(i) Array facilities' adjusted general operations costs per
adjusted resident day for each facility from facilities' cost reports
from the applicable report year, for facilities located within urban
counties and for those located within nonurban counties and determine
the median adjusted cost for each peer group.
(ii) Beginning July 1, 2006, the department shall subtract the cost
of provider fees, as defined in RCW 74.46.020, from the operations
costs prior to determining the adjusted operations costs per resident
day;
(b) Set each facility's operations component rate at the lower of:
(i) The facility's per resident day adjusted operations costs from
the applicable cost report period adjusted if necessary to a minimum
occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed beds before July 1, 2002,
and ninety percent effective July 1, 2002; or
(ii) The adjusted median per resident day general operations cost
for that facility's peer group, urban counties or nonurban counties;
((and))
(c) Beginning July 1, 2006, the department shall grant a property
and business tax add-on rate to the operations component rate:
(i) The property and business tax add-on rate shall be determined
by dividing the sum of provider fees, as defined in RCW 74.46.020, by
each facility's actual total resident days. Minimum occupancy levels
shall not be used in calculating the property and business tax add-on
rate; and
(ii) The property and business tax add-on rate shall be added to
the operations component rate as determined under (b) of this
subsection; and
(d) Adjust each facility's operations component rate for economic
trends and conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(7)(b).
(4) The operations component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall include a "hold harmless" provision after
rebasing to 2004 costs for the July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007,
rate-setting period.
(2) The department shall determine each facility's expected rate
for July 1, 2006, adjusted for economic terms and conditions according
to the biennial appropriations act, according to the methodology and
budget provisions in place prior to the effective date of this act.
(3) For the July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, rate-setting
period, the department shall set each facility's rate at the higher of:
(a) The rate determined in accordance with the provisions of RCW
74.46.421 through 74.46.535; or
(b) The rate determined under subsection (2) of this section.
(4)(a) If the department determines that the weighted average
nursing facility payment rate calculated in accordance with this
chapter for the July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, rate-setting
period is likely to exceed the weighted average nursing facility
payment rate identified in the biennial appropriations act, then the
department shall:
(i) Determine, for each facility, the increase in its rate
calculated under subsection (3)(a) of this section over its rate
calculated under subsection (2) of this section. For facilities whose
rate under subsection (2) of this section is greater than its rate
under subsection (3)(a) of this section, the increase shall be zero;
(ii) Reduce the amount of the increase determined under (a)(i) of
this subsection by a proportional amount in each cost center across
facilities, except for those facilities where the increase is zero,
until the weighted average nursing facility payment rate identified in
the biennial appropriations act is reached.
(b) In applying the methodology in (a) of this subsection, the
department shall not reduce any facility's rate below the rate
determined under subsection (2) of this section.

--- END ---