BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The sum of five thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to
the Washington State University energy extension program for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2007, to support the program's participation in
the northwest solar tour, which annually provides public outreach and
education regarding existing solar-powered facilities in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of thirty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund
to the Washington State University energy extension program for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, to assist in the installation of the
solar demonstration facility entered by the university in the national
solar decathlon. The facility was constructed entirely by the
university's students and is a structure built for residential use that
is entirely powered by renewable energy sources. It was one of
nineteen entries in this event in the nation's capitol, and has been
shipped back to Washington for installation in Seattle's Magnuson park,
where it will serve as a demonstration and learning center for solar
power and other renewable energy sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of twenty-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general
fund to the Washington State University energy extension program for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, for the purposes of sponsoring a
solar decathlon in Washington state. The energy extension program
shall collaborate with the University of Washington and the Washington
state participants in the 2005 national solar decathlon to design the
state decathlon and to provide a jury for the competition. The program
may provide a monetary award to the winning entry in the decathlon.
The purpose of the state decathlon is to encourage entries from the
state in future national solar decathlons. The state decathlon must be
held prior to September 30, 2008.

--- END ---