BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that recent events,
including the 9/11 terrorist acts, the tsunami in southeast Asia,
Hurricanes Katrina and Rita in the gulf coast, outbreaks of avian flu,
and the earthquake in Pakistan, have demonstrated the need for a
coordinated, comprehensive all-hazards disaster plan involving
citizens, industry, local governments, and the state. Washington
state's topography, geography, location, and strategic and economic
interests place the state at particular risk from both natural
disasters and man-made disasters. In response, Washington state and
its local governments have implemented nationally recognized all-hazards emergency management and disaster response plans. However,
recent studies have revealed the lack of a secure funding source for
resolving impediments to the ability of state and local programs to
integrate and coordinate comprehensive disaster preparedness. In
addition, local programs suffer disparities in funding and expertise,
leaving troublesome gaps in a well-coordinated statewide all-hazards
emergency management system.
Recognizing that all disasters are local disasters, the legislature
therefore intends to strengthen state and local emergency response,
mitigation, preparation, and coordination by establishing a stable
source of funding with the intent that Washington state become the
nationally recognized leader in emergency management. The funding will
be dedicated to the development and coordination of state and local
government emergency management programs by supporting joint training
exercises, citizen and industry coordination with emergency management
efforts, public education, and relationship building among local and
state emergency management officials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The emergency management, preparedness, and
assistance account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from
the surcharge authorized by section 3 of this act must be deposited
into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only as
provided in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 In order to provide funds for emergency
management, preparedness, and assistance, an annual surcharge of two
dollars per policy must be imposed on every homeowner's, mobile
homeowner's, tenant homeowner's, and condominium unit owner's insurance
policy, and an annual four-dollar surcharge shall be imposed on every
commercial fire, commercial multiple peril, and business owner's
property insurance policy, issued or renewed on or after the effective
date of this section. The surcharge must be paid by the policyholder
to the insurer. The insurer must collect the surcharge and remit it to
the department of revenue, which will collect, administer, audit, and
enforce the surcharge under chapter 82.32 RCW. The surcharge is not to
be considered premiums of the insurer and is not subject to premium
taxes, however, nonpayment of the surcharge by the insured may be a
valid reason for cancellation of the policy. The surcharge imposed on
policyholders under this section is not subject to retaliatory tax
provisions. All proceeds of the surcharge must be deposited in the
emergency management, preparedness, and assistance account and may not
be used to supplant existing local funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Funds appropriated from the emergency
management, preparedness, and assistance account must be allocated by
the department as follows:
(a) Twenty percent to the military department to be used for
administrative expenses and to fund the assessment required by section
5 of this act; and
(b) Eighty percent for grants to regional agencies, local
governments, tribal governments, regional incident management teams,
and private organizations to: Develop and coordinate comprehensive
emergency management plans and train elected and appointed officials on
state laws, ordinances, disaster command and response structures, and
the roles and responsibilities of officials before, during, and after
a disaster; administer periodic joint emergency management training
exercises; and implement projects that will strengthen emergency
response, mitigation, preparation, and coordination.
(2) Projects funded under this section must include, but need not
be limited to, projects that will promote neighborhood level public
education on disaster preparedness and recovery issues, situate all
weather radios in public buildings, enhance coordination of relief
efforts of statewide private-sector organizations, and improve the
training and operations capabilities of agencies assigned lead or
support responsibilities in the state comprehensive emergency
management plan.
(3) Grant funding may also be used as seed money to establish a
dedicated, full-time emergency management director in every county that
does not have such a director as of the effective date of this section.
(4) The department must establish criteria and procedures for
competitive allocation of these funds by rule. At a minimum, the rules
must:
(a) Establish preferential funding for projects and exercises
addressing needs and recommendations identified by the department in
the assessment conducted under section 5 of this act;
(b) Specify a formula that establishes a base grant allocation and
weighted factors for funds to be allocated over the base grant amount
for regional agencies, local governments, tribal governments, regional
incident management teams, and private organizations with existing
emergency management and preparedness programs that are located in a
part of the state where the risk of exposure to disasters is deemed by
the department to be particularly acute;
(c) Specify match requirements; and
(d) Include requirements that, at a minimum, a local emergency
management agency have: A comprehensive emergency management plan or
be a member of a joint local organization for emergency management; and
a local director who works at least forty hours a week in that
capacity, or have designated by ordinance or resolution an emergency
management coordinator who works at least fifteen hours a week in that
capacity.
(5) No more than five percent of any award made under subsection
(1)(b) of this section may be used for administrative expenses.
(6) The distribution formula provided in this section may be
adjusted proportionally when necessary to meet any matching
requirements imposed as a condition of receiving federal disaster
relief assistance or planning funds.
(7) Local governments receiving funds under this section may not
use the funds to supplant existing funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Beginning in January 2008 and biennially
thereafter, the department must conduct in conjunction with the
emergency management council a strategic assessment of, and issue a
report on, the ability of state, local, and tribal emergency management
organizations to effectively provide for all phases of comprehensive
emergency management. The assessment must:
(1) Evaluate state, local, and tribal emergency management
capabilities and needs;
(2) Evaluate the ability of state, local, and tribal emergency
management organizations to provide emergency management mitigation,
preparedness, response, and recovery;
(3) Evaluate the effectiveness of the emergency management
structure at the state, local, and tribal levels;
(4) Provide findings and make recommendations that increase the
ability of state, local, and tribal emergency management organizations
to meet current and future risks; and
(5) Detail where and for what purpose funds under section 4(1)(b)
of this act have been distributed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The joint legislative audit and review
committee must study and review the performance of programs implemented
under this act. The committee must examine at least the following
factors: The number and type of joint exercises conducted under
section 4 of this act; the number of programs receiving grant money and
the status of those programs; the coordination of comprehensive
emergency management plans between state and local jurisdictions; the
number of training programs administered; the number of comprehensive
emergency management or safety plans created using funds distributed
under section 4 of this act; and the number of emergency preparedness
officials created and trained with funds distributed under this act.
The committee must provide a final report on this review by December
2008. Funds from the emergency management, preparedness, and
assistance account may be provided to the committee for the purposes of
conducting the study.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.18.170 and 1947 c 79 s .18.17 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Premium" as used in this code means all sums charged, received, or
deposited as consideration for an insurance contract or the continuance
thereof. Premium does not include the annual surcharge imposed under
section 3 of this act. Any assessment, or any "membership," "policy,"
"survey," "inspection," "service" or similar fee or charge made by the
insurer in consideration for an insurance contract is deemed part of
the premium.

Sec. 8 RCW 48.18.180 and 1994 c 203 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The premium stated in the policy shall be inclusive of all
fees, charges, premiums, or other consideration charged for the
insurance or for the procurement thereof.
(2) No insurer or its officer, employee, agent, solicitor, or other
representative shall charge or receive any fee, compensation, or
consideration for insurance which is not included in the premium
specified in the policy.
(3) Each violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.
(4) This section does not apply to a fee paid to a broker by an
insured as provided in RCW 48.17.270.
(5) This section does not apply to the surcharge imposed under
section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 38.52 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 4 through 6 of this act take
effect January 1, 2007.

--- END ---