BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The high school graduates of 2008 will be
the first graduating class for which passage of the Washington
assessment of student learning or an alternative assessment to earn the
certificate of academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061 or the
certificate of individual achievement under RCW 28A.155.045 is required
in order to obtain a high school diploma. The legislature recognizes
that passage of the Washington assessment of student learning or an
alternative assessment is only one of four graduation requirements for
students. While some students may need additional time beyond high
school to pass the Washington assessment of student learning or an
alternative assessment and achieve a diploma, the legislature finds
that it is important to recognize and celebrate the successes of
students in meeting the other three graduation requirements. In light
of the social importance that commencement ceremonies hold for the
families and friends of students, as well as the necessity of having a
standardized practice throughout the state, the legislature intends to
create the certificate of academic progress, which shall be awarded to
those students who have met all high school graduation requirements
except passage of the tenth grade Washington assessment of student
learning or an alternative assessment. The certificate of academic
progress is intended to honor the student's accomplishments while also
providing the student with the guidance and encouragement necessary
ultimately to succeed in attaining a high school diploma.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the high school graduating class of 2008, a
certificate of academic progress shall be available to students who
have completed all state and local requirements for high school
graduation except obtaining a certificate of academic achievement under
RCW 28A.655.061 or a certificate of individual achievement under RCW
28A.155.045. The certificate of academic progress is not the
equivalent of a high school diploma, but enables students to
participate in commencement ceremonies upon meeting the criteria in
this section.
(2) To be eligible for a certificate of academic progress, a
student must:
(a) Pass all state and local high school graduation requirements
except for obtaining a certificate of academic achievement or a
certificate of individual achievement and must have taken at least one
retake;
(b) Maintain at least a ninety percent attendance level during the
senior year of high school, however the school district superintendent
may waive this requirement upon the student providing documentation of
circumstances such as illness that warrant waiving this requirement;
and
(c) Meet with counselors, teachers, and parents, as appropriate, to
update the student's high school and beyond plan.

--- END ---