BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 6.17.160 and 1988 c 231 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
The sheriff to whom the writ is directed and delivered shall
execute the same without delay as follows:
(1) Real property, including a vendee's interests under a real
estate contract, shall be levied on by recording a copy of the writ,
together with a description of the property attached, with the
recording officer of the county in which the real estate is situated.
(2) Personal property, capable of manual delivery, shall be levied
on by taking into custody. If the property or any part of it is
concealed in a building or enclosure, the sheriff shall publicly demand
delivery of the property. If the property is not delivered and if the
order of execution so directs, the sheriff shall cause the building or
enclosure to be broken open and take possession of the property.
(3) Shares of stock and other investment securities shall be levied
on in accordance with the requirements of RCW 62A.8-317.
(4) A fund in court shall be levied on by leaving a copy of the
writ with the clerk of the court with notice in writing specifying the
fund.
(5) A franchise granted by a public or quasi-public corporation
shall be levied on by (a) serving a copy of the writ on, or mailing it
to, the judgment debtor as required by RCW 6.17.130 and (b) filing a
copy of the writ in the office of the auditor of the county in which
the franchise was granted together with a notice in writing that the
franchise has been levied on to be sold, specifying the time and place
of sale, the name of the owner, the amount of the judgment for which
the franchise is to be sold, and the name of the judgment creditor.
(6) A vendor's interest under a real estate contract shall be
levied on by (a) recording a copy of the writ, with descriptions of the
contract and of the real property covered by the contract, with the
recording officer of the county in which the real estate is located and
(b) serving a copy of the writ, with a copy of the descriptions, on, or
mailing the same to, the judgment debtor and the vendee under the
contract in the manner as described in RCW 6.17.130.
(7) Other intangible personal property may be levied on by serving
a copy of the writ on, or mailing it to, the judgment debtor in the
manner as required by RCW 6.17.130, together with a description of the
property. If the property is a claim on which suit has been commenced,
a copy of the writ and of the description shall also be filed with the
clerk of the court in which the suit is pending.

--- END ---