BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When there is probable cause to believe that there is property
within the county subject to distraint pursuant to RCW 84.56.070 or
84.56.090, any judge of the superior court or district court in the
county in which such property is located may, upon the request of the
county treasurer or their deputy, issue a warrant directed to the
county treasurer or their deputy commanding the search for and seizure
of the property described in the request for warrant at the place or
places described in the request for warrant.
(2) The procedure for the issuance and execution and return of the
warrant authorized by this section and for return of any property
seized shall be the criminal rules of the superior court and the
district court.
(3) Property seized under this section shall be disposed of as
provided in RCW 84.56.070 or 84.56.090.
(4) This section does not require the application for or issuance
of any warrant not otherwise required by law.

--- END ---