BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Public bodies, as defined in RCW 43.99C.020, may transfer real
property and facilities acquired, constructed, or otherwise improved
under chapter 43.99C RCW to nonprofit corporations organized to provide
services for individuals with sensory, physical, or mental handicaps.
The nonprofit corporation shall use the real property and facilities
for the purpose of providing the following limited programs as
designated by the department: Nonprofit group training homes,
community centers, close to home living units, sheltered workshops,
vocational rehabilitation centers, developmental disability training
centers, and community homes for the mentally ill.
(2) Public bodies, as defined in RCW 43.83D.050, may transfer real
property and facilities acquired, constructed, or otherwise improved
under chapter 43.83D RCW to nonprofit corporations organized to provide
individuals with social and health services. The nonprofit corporation
shall use the real property and facilities for the purpose of providing
the following programs as designated by the department: Facilities for
social services, adult and juvenile correction or detention, child
welfare, day care, drug abuse and alcoholism treatment, mental health,
public health, developmental disabilities, and vocational
rehabilitation.
(3) The deed transferring the property in subsections (1) and (2)
of this section must provide for reversion back to the public body if
the nonprofit corporation is found to be out of compliance with this
section.
(4) The nonprofit corporation is authorized to sell the property
transferred to it in subsections (1) and (2) of this section provided
that: (a) Any such sale must be subject to prior written approval by
the department; (b) all proceeds from such a sale must be applied to
the purchase price of a different facility or facilities of equal or
greater value than the original facility; (c) any new facility or
facilities must be used for the purposes stated in subsections (1) and
(2) of this section; (d) the new facility or facilities must be
available for use within one year of sale; and (e) the reversion
language in subsection (3) of this section applies to the new facility
or facilities.
(5) In the event the nonprofit corporation is found to be out of
compliance with this section, the real property and facilities revert
to the public body. The public body shall then determine if the assets
can be used by another program as designated by the department. Such
programs shall have priority in obtaining the assets to ensure the
purposes specified in chapters 43.99C and 43.83D RCW are carried out.

--- END ---