BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.40.630 and 2000 c 247 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service
credit years who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.40.620.
(2) UNREDUCED RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least
five service credit years and for whom the sum of the number of years
of the member's age and the number of years of the member's service
credit equals ninety or more shall be eligible to retire and receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.40.620.
(3) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty
service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant
to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially
reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(((3))) (4) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has
completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age
fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except
that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the
retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the
difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the
attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.40.820 and 2000 c 247 s 309 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five
and who has:
(a) Completed ten service credit years; or
(b) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
credit months after attaining age fifty-four; or
(c) Completed five service credit years by the transfer payment
date specified in RCW 41.40.795, under the public employees' retirement
system plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.40.795;
shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance
computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790.
(2) UNREDUCED RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed the number
of service credit years required in subsection (1) of this section and
for whom the sum of the number of years of the member's age and the
number of years of the member's service credit equals ninety or more
shall be eligible to retire and receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790.
(3) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age
fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be
eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number
of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(((3))) (4) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has
completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age
fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.790, except
that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the
retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the
difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the
attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.32.765 and 2000 c 247 s 902 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service
credit years of service who has attained at least age sixty-five shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760.
(2) UNREDUCED RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least
five service credit years and for whom the sum of the number of years
of the member's age and the number of years of the member's service
credit equals ninety or more shall be eligible to retire and receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.32.760.
(3) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty
service credit years of service who has attained at least age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance
computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a
member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number
of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(((3))) (4) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has
completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age
fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except
that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the
retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the
difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the
attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.32.875 and 2000 c 247 s 903 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five
and who has:
(a) Completed ten service credit years; or
(b) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
credit months after attaining age fifty-four; or
(c) Completed five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan
2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817;
shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance
computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840.
(2) UNREDUCED RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed the number
of service credit years required in subsection (1) of this section and
for whom the sum of the number of years of the member's age and the
number of years of the member's service credit equals ninety or more
shall be eligible to retire and receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840.
(3) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age
fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be
eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number
of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(((3))) (4) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has
completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age
fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840, except
that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the
retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the
difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the
attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.35.420 and 2000 c 247 s 905 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service
credit years who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.35.400.
(2) UNREDUCED RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least
five service credit years and for whom the sum of the number of years
of the member's age and the number of years of the member's service
credit equals ninety or more shall be eligible to retire and receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.35.400.
(3) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty
service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.35.400, except that a member retiring pursuant
to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially
reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(((3))) (4) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has
completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age
fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400, except
that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the
retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the
difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the
attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.35.680 and 2000 c 247 s 906 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five
and who has:
(a) Completed ten service credit years; or
(b) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
credit months after attaining age fifty-four; or
(c) Completed five service credit years by September 1, 2000, under
the public employees' retirement system plan 2 and who transferred to
plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510;
shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance
computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620.
(2) UNREDUCED RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed the number
of service credit years required in subsection (1) of this section and
for whom the sum of the number of years of the member's age and the
number of years of the member's service credit equals ninety or more
shall be eligible to retire and receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620.
(3) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age
fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be
eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number
of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(((3))) (4) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has
completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age
fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement
allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620, except
that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the
retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the
difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the
attainment of age sixty-five.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---