BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.45.0631 and 2001 c 329 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, ((2001)) 2006, the required contribution rate
for members of the Washington state patrol retirement system shall be
((two percent or equal to the employer rate adopted under RCW 41.45.060
and 41.45.070 for the Washington state patrol retirement system,
whichever is greater)) 3.01 percent and the required basic employer
contribution rate shall be 6.01 percent.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2007, the required Washington state patrol
retirement system contribution rates shall be adopted under RCW
41.45.060 and 41.45.070, subject to the following funding policies:
(a) The member contribution rate shall be one-third of the total
Washington state patrol retirement system contribution rate or seven
percent, whichever is less, and the employer contribution rate shall be
the balance of the total contribution rate. This allocation formula
shall be applied only after the total Washington state patrol
contribution rate has been determined, and the determination shall
include the application of any minimum total contribution rate that may
be in effect for the Washington state patrol retirement system.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2009, a minimum total contribution rate is
established for the Washington state patrol retirement system. The
total Washington state patrol retirement system contribution rate as
adopted by the pension funding council and subject to revision by the
legislature may exceed, but shall not drop below, the established
minimum total contribution rate. The minimum total contribution rate
shall equal the total contribution rate required to fund seventy
percent of the Washington state patrol retirement system's normal cost
as calculated under the entry age normal cost method. Upon completion
of each biennial actuarial valuation, the state actuary shall review
the appropriateness of this minimum total contribution rate and
recommend to the legislature any adjustments as may be needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---