BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.26.100 and 1991 c 343 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
A member upon retirement for service shall receive a monthly
retirement allowance computed according to his or her completed
creditable service credit years of service as follows: Five years but
under ten years, one-twelfth of one percent of his or her final average
salary for each month of service; ten years but under twenty years,
one-twelfth of one and one-half percent of his or her final average
salary for each month of service; and twenty years and over one-twelfth
of two percent of his or her final average salary for each month of
service: PROVIDED, That the recipient of a retirement allowance who
shall return to service as a law enforcement officer or fire fighter
shall be considered to have terminated his or her retirement status and
he or she shall immediately become a member of the retirement system
with the status of membership he or she had as of the date of
retirement. Retirement benefits shall be suspended during the period
of his or her return to service and he or she shall make contributions
and receive service credit. Such a member shall have the right to
again retire at any time and his or her retirement allowance shall be
recomputed, and paid, based upon additional service rendered and any
change in final average salary((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no retirement
allowance paid pursuant to this section shall exceed sixty percent of
final average salary, except as such allowance may be increased by
virtue of RCW 41.26.240, as now or hereafter amended)).

Sec. 2 RCW 41.26.080 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 907 are each
amended to read as follows:
(((1) Except as set forth under subsection (2) of this section,))
The total liability of the plan 1 system shall be funded as follows:
(((a))) (1) Every plan 1 member shall have deducted from each
payroll a sum equal to six percent of his or her basic salary for each
pay period.
(((b))) (2) Every employer shall contribute monthly a sum equal to
six percent of the basic salary of each plan 1 employee who is a member
of this retirement system. The employer shall transmit the employee
and employer contributions with a copy of the payroll to the retirement
system monthly.
(((c))) (3) The remaining liabilities of the plan 1 system shall be
funded as provided in chapter 41.45 RCW.
(((d))) (4) Every member shall be deemed to consent and agree to
the contribution made and provided for herein, and shall receipt in
full for his or her salary or compensation. Payment less said
contributions shall be a complete discharge of all claims and demands
whatsoever for the services rendered by such person during the period
covered by such payments, except his or her claim to the benefits to
which he or she may be entitled under the provisions of this chapter.
(((2) No employer or member contribution is required after June 30,
2000, unless the most recent valuation study for law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 indicates the
plan has unfunded liabilities.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The governor shall establish a joint
executive task force on funding postretirement medical benefits for
members of plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system. The joint task force shall consist of seven
members: The director of the department of retirement systems; the
administrator of the health care authority; the state actuary; one
representative of Washington cities, appointed by the governor; one
representative of Washington counties, appointed by the governor; one
active member of plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system, appointed by the governor; and one retired
member of plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system, appointed by the governor.
(2) The joint task force shall elect one of its members to serve as
chair of the joint task force.
(3) Joint task force members may be reimbursed for travel expenses
as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) It is the intent of the legislature to create a funding vehicle
to assist employers in providing postretirement medical benefits for
members of plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system. To that end, the joint task force is charged with
reviewing private and public funding vehicles that would accept
voluntary tax-advantaged employer contributions and permissible
transfers of excess pension assets. The task force shall select one or
more appropriate funding vehicles and coordinate with all necessary
parties to achieve implementation. To the extent that further
legislative authority is required for the implementation, the task
force shall make its recommendations for proposed legislation to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by no later than December 1,
2006. The task force shall submit its final report to the governor and
appropriate committees of the legislature by no later than December 1,
2007.
(5) This section expires December 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 3 of this act take effect
July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2007.

--- END ---