BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.37.005 and 2004 c 242 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to establish a separate public
safety employees' retirement system for ((those)) certain public
employees whose jobs contain a high degree of physical risk to their
own personal safety and who ((engage in duties contained in this
section. The duties involved in these jobs include providing)) provide
public protection of lives and property, ((the authority and power to
arrest, conducting criminal investigations, enforcing the criminal laws
of the state of Washington, and the authority to carry a firearm as
part of the job. Qualifications and training for these jobs include
passage of a civil service examination and completion of the Washington
criminal justice training commission basic training course or
equivalent. Only those job classes specifically included in RCW
41.37.010(5) by the legislature are public safety employees, and only
for service earned after the effective date of the inclusion of that
job class in RCW 41.37.010(5))) but who are not eligible for membership
in the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.37.010 and 2005 c 327 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Retirement system" means the Washington public safety
employees' retirement system provided for in this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created
in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(3) "State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of
Washington.
(4) "Employer" means the Washington state department of natural
resources, the Washington state department of social and health
services, the Washington state department of corrections, the
Washington state parks and recreation commission, the Washington state
gambling commission, the Washington state patrol, and the Washington
state liquor control board((,)); any county corrections
department((s,)); any city corrections department((s)) not covered
under chapter 41.28 RCW((,)); or other employers employing statewide
elective officials.
(5) "Member" means any employee employed by an employer on a full-time((, fully compensated)) basis ((within the following job classes in
effect as of January 1, 2004: City corrections officers, jailers,
police support officers, custody officers, and bailiffs; county
corrections officers, jailers, custody officers, and sheriffs
corrections officers; county probation officers and probation
counselors; state correctional officers, correctional sergeants, and
community corrections officers; liquor enforcement officers; park
rangers; commercial vehicle enforcement officers; and gambling special
agents)):
(a) Who is in a position that requires completion of a certified
criminal justice training course and is authorized by their employer to
arrest, conduct criminal investigations, enforce the criminal laws of
the state of Washington, and carry a firearm as part of the job;
(b) Whose primary responsibility is to ensure the custody and
security of incarcerated individuals as a corrections officer or
jailer;
(c) Who is a limited authority Washington peace officer, as defined
in RCW 10.93.020, for an employer; or
(d) Whose primary responsibility is to supervise members eligible
under this subsection.
(6)(a) "Compensation earnable" for members, means salaries or wages
earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services,
including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries
deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b),
414(h), and 457 of the United States internal revenue code, but shall
exclude nonmoney maintenance compensation and lump sum or other
payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation,
unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay.
(b) "Compensation earnable" for members also includes the following
actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:
(i) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on
reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer
to an individual in lieu of reinstatement, which are awarded or granted
as the equivalent of the salary or wage which the individual would have
earned during a payroll period shall be considered compensation
earnable to the extent provided in this subsection, and the individual
shall receive the equivalent service credit;
(ii) In any year in which a member serves in the legislature, the
member shall have the option of having such member's compensation
earnable be the greater of:
(A) The compensation earnable the member would have received had
such member not served in the legislature; or
(B) Such member's actual compensation earnable received for
nonlegislative public employment and legislative service combined. Any
additional contributions to the retirement system required because
compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater
than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be
paid by the member for both member and employer contributions;
(iii) Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045,
and 72.09.240;
(iv) Compensation that a member would have received but for a
disability occurring in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW
41.37.070;
(v) Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the
leave sharing program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through
41.04.670; and
(vi) Compensation that a member receives for being in standby
status. For the purposes of this section, a member is in standby
status when not being paid for time actually worked and the employer
requires the member to be prepared to report immediately for work, if
the need arises, although the need may not arise.
(7) "Service" means periods of employment by a member on or after
July 1, 2006, for one or more employers for which compensation earnable
is paid. Compensation earnable earned for ninety or more hours in any
calendar month shall constitute one service credit month. Compensation
earnable earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours
in any calendar month shall constitute one-half service credit month of
service. Compensation earnable earned for less than seventy hours in
any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service credit month of
service. Time spent in standby status, whether compensated or not, is
not service.
Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in
the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits.
(a) Service in any state elective position shall be deemed to be
full-time service.
(b) A member shall receive a total of not more than twelve service
credit months of service for such calendar year. If an individual is
employed in an eligible position by one or more employers the
individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during
any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours
is rendered.
(8) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.
(9) "Service credit month" means a month or an accumulation of
months of service credit which is equal to one.
(10) "Membership service" means all service rendered as a member.
(11) "Beneficiary" means any person in receipt of a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer by another person.
(12) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may
determine.
(13) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all contributions
standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the
regular interest thereon.
(14) "Average final compensation" means the member's average
compensation earnable of the highest consecutive sixty months of
service credit months prior to such member's retirement, termination,
or death. Periods constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be
used in the calculation of average final compensation except under RCW
41.37.290.
(15) "Final compensation" means the annual rate of compensation
earnable by a member at the time of termination of employment.
(16) "Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated
contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(17) "Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions
made by the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(18) "Retirement allowance" means monthly payments to a retiree or
beneficiary as provided in this chapter.
(19) "Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free
from the employer's direction and control over the performance of work.
The department shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection
consistent with common law.
(20) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when
computed upon the basis of such mortality and other tables as may be
adopted by the director.
(21) "Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a
retirement allowance as provided by this chapter.
(22) "Eligible position" means any permanent, full-time, fully
compensated position included in subsection (5) of this section.
(23) "Ineligible position" means any position which does not
conform with the requirements set forth in subsection (22) of this
section.
(24) "Leave of absence" means the period of time a member is
authorized by the employer to be absent from service without being
separated from membership.
(25) "Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer while a member.
(26) "Director" means the director of the department.
(27) "State elective position" means any position held by any
person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed
as a member of the legislature.
(28) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(29) "Plan" means the Washington public safety employees'
retirement system plan 2.
(30) "Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual
average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage
earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor statistics, United States department of labor.
(31) "Index A" means the index for the year prior to the
determination of a postretirement adjustment.
(32) "Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.
(33) "Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index
B.
(34) "Separation from service" occurs when a person has terminated
all employment with an employer.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.04.270 and 2005 c 327 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.28, 41.32,
41.35, 41.37, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW, on and after March 19, 1976, any
member or former member who (a) receives a retirement allowance earned
by ((said)) the former member as deferred compensation from any public
retirement system authorized by the general laws of this state, or (b)
is eligible to receive a retirement allowance from any public
retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030, but chooses not to apply, or
(c) is the beneficiary of a disability allowance from any public
retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030 shall be estopped from
becoming a member of or accruing any contractual rights whatsoever in
any other public retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030: PROVIDED,
That (a) and (b) of this subsection shall not apply to persons who have
accumulated less than fifteen years service credit in any such system.
(2) Nothing in this section is intended to apply to any retirement
system except those listed in RCW 41.50.030 and the city employee
retirement systems for Seattle, Tacoma, and Spokane. Subsection (1)(b)
of this section does not apply to a dual member as defined in RCW
41.54.010.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.04.278 and 2003 c 295 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The select committee on pension policy may form three function-specific subcommittees, as set forth under subsection (2) of this
section, from the members under RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e), as
follows:
(a) A public safety subcommittee with one member from each group
under RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e);
(b) An education subcommittee with one member from each group under
RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e); and
(c) A state and local government subcommittee, with one retiree
member under RCW 41.04.276(1)(d) and two members from each group under
RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (c) and (e).
The retiree members may serve on more than one subcommittee to
ensure representation on each subcommittee.
(2)(a) The public safety subcommittee shall focus on pension issues
affecting public safety employees who are members of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters', public safety employees', and
Washington state patrol retirement systems.
(b) The education subcommittee shall focus on pension issues
affecting educational employees who are members of the public
employees', teachers', and school employees' retirement systems.
(c) The state and local government subcommittee shall focus on
pension issues affecting state and local government employees who are
members of the public employees' retirement system.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.04.393 and 2003 c 32 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Retirement benefits paid under chapter 41.26, 41.37, 41.40, or
43.43 RCW to beneficiaries of public safety officers who die in the
line of duty shall be paid in accordance with Title 26 U.S.C. Sec.
101(h) as amended by the Fallen Hero Survivor Benefit Fairness Act of
2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---