BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Despite sustained efforts at the federal and state level, too
many people in Washington remain without access to appropriate health
care. Particularly alarming is the increase in the number of small
business employees who are uninsured. Without a health home, many low-income and other vulnerable populations are left to inefficiently
navigate a fragmented treatment system that fails to support their
long-term well-being.
(2) In recent years, numerous community-based organizations have
emerged around the state to address health care concerns at a local
level. Through innovation and public/private collaboration, they have
demonstrated great success and show even greater promise in improving
health care access for local residents. Less remote than state and
federal agencies, these organizations have built on local relationships
to increase the availability and affordability of services, and
coordinate care, making efficient use of a wide variety of community
resources to meet community needs.
(3) Many of these organizations have relied on grants from the
healthy communities access program, an initiative of the United States
department of health and human services that provided funding and
technical assistance to support collaborative efforts at the local
level to coordinate and strengthen health services for the uninsured
and underinsured. The program, however, was recently discontinued,
placing these local efforts at risk.
It is therefore the intent of the legislature to enhance and
support the development of collaborative community-based organizations
working at the local level to increase access to health care for
Washington residents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The community health care collaborative
grant program is established to further the efforts of community-based
organizations to increase access to appropriate, affordable health care
for Washington residents, particularly employed low-income persons who
are uninsured and underinsured, through local programs addressing one
or more of the following: (a) Access to medical treatment; (b) the
efficient use of health care resources; or (c) quality of care.
(2) Grants of up to five hundred thousand dollars per organization
shall be awarded pursuant to sections 3 and 4 of this act by the
administrator of the health care authority in consultation with the
secretary of the department of health, the assistant secretary of the
health and recovery services administration within the department of
social and health services, and the insurance commissioner.
(3) The health care authority shall provide administrative support
for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Eligibility for grants shall be limited to
nonprofit organizations established to serve a defined substate
geographic region and having a formal collaborative governance
structure and decision-making process for improving access. The nature
and format of the application, and the application procedure, shall be
determined by the administrator of the health care authority. At a
minimum, each application shall: (1) Identify the geographic region
served by the organization; (2) show how the structure and operation of
the organization reflects the interests of, and is accountable to, this
region; (3) indicate the size of the grant being requested, and how the
money will be spent; and (4) include sufficient information for an
evaluation of the application based on the criteria established in
section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Grants shall be awarded on a competitive
basis based on a determination of which applicant organization will
best serve the purposes of the grant program. In making this
determination, consideration shall be given to the extent to which:
(a) The programs to be supported by the grant are likely to
address, in a measurable fashion, documented health care access needs
within the region to be served;
(b) An applicant organization can be expected to successfully
implement these programs, including the extent to which the application
reflects formal, active collaboration among key community members such
as local governments, school districts, large and small businesses,
nonprofit organizations, carriers, private health care providers, and
public health agencies;
(c) The applicant organization will match the grant with funds from
other sources. Grants may be awarded only to organizations providing
at least two dollars in matching funds for each grant dollar awarded;
(d) The grant will enhance the long-term capacity of the applicant
organization and its partners to serve the region's documented health
care access needs, including the sustainability of the programs to be
supported by the grant;
(e) The programs to be supported by the grant reflect creative,
innovative approaches which complement and enhance existing efforts to
address the needs of the uninsured and underinsured and, if successful,
could be replicated in other areas of the state; and
(f) The programs to be supported by the grant make efficient and
cost-effective use of available funds through administrative
simplification and improvements in the structure and operation of the
health care delivery system.
(2) The administrator shall endeavor to disburse grant funds
throughout the state, supporting organizations and programs of
differing sizes and scales, and serving differing populations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 One-half the total amount of any award shall
be disbursed to an organization upon its selection as a grant
recipient. The remaining half shall be disbursed one year later only
upon receipt by the administrator of the health care authority of a
progress report from the organization, and a determination by the
administrator, in consultation with the secretary of the department of
health, the assistant secretary of the health and recovery services
administration within the department of social and health services, and
the insurance commissioner, that the organization is satisfactorily
serving the purposes of the grant program and meeting the objectives
identified in its application regarding: (1) Access to medical
treatment; (2) the efficient use of health care resources; or (3)
quality of care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 By July 1, 2008, the administrator of the
health care authority shall provide the governor and the legislature
with an evaluation of the community health care collaborative grant
program, describing the organizations and programs funded and the
results achieved. Particularly successful programs shall be
highlighted with recommendations on whether, and how, the programs
could be replicated statewide. The evaluation shall also summarize any
recommendations from the participating organizations regarding ways to
improve the grant program and for the state to otherwise support
community-based organizations working to improve access to health care
for Washington residents, including any changes in state statutes or
regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The health care authority may adopt rules to
implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The community health care collaborative
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for the purposes set forth in this
act. Only the administrator of the health care authority or the
administrator's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act expires June 30, 2009.

--- END ---