BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state's
economy is increasingly dependent on the expansion of knowledge-based
sectors, including the life sciences. The legislature also finds that
commercial enterprises in the life sciences create high-wage,
high-skilled jobs that are part of the state's effort to encourage
economic diversification and stability. However, the legislature also
finds that commercial life sciences businesses, particularly in
biotechnology product and medical device manufacturing, incur
significant costs associated with capital infrastructure and job
training often years before a product is licensed for marketing or a
facility is licensed for manufacturing by governmental agencies in the
United States and abroad. The legislature also finds that current
state tax policy discourages the growth of these companies in two ways:
(1) Washington state's higher rate of taxation compared with other
states and nations encourages the export of intellectual property and
commercial operations out of Washington; and (2) taxing these
businesses before facilities, or products produced therein, are
licensed for marketing by regulatory agencies.
The legislature further finds that targeted tax incentives may
encourage the formation, expansion, and retention of commercial
operations within the life sciences sector. The legislature also finds
that tax incentives should be subject to the same rigorous requirements
for efficiency and accountability as are other expenditure programs,
and that tax incentives should therefore be focused to provide the
greatest possible return on the state's investment.
For these reasons, the legislature hereby establishes a program of
business and occupation tax credits for qualified biotechnology product
and medical device commercial expenditures. The legislature also
hereby establishes a tax deferral program for commercial manufacturing
facilities in this sector. The legislature also hereby provides
preferential tax rates for retailing, wholesaling, and manufacturing
activities related to biotechnology products and medical devices. The
legislature declares that these limited programs serve the vital public
purposes of incenting expenditures in commercial life science
operations and the development of employment opportunities in this
state. The legislature further declares its intent to create a
contract within the meaning of Article I, section 23 of the state
Constitution as to those businesses that make capital investments in
consideration of the tax deferral program established in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Biotechnology" means a technology based on the science of
biology, microbiology, molecular biology, cellular biology,
biochemistry, or biophysics, or any combination of these, and includes,
but is not limited to, recombinant DNA techniques, genetics and genetic
engineering, cell fusion techniques, and new bioprocesses, using living
organisms, or parts of organisms.
(3) "Biotechnology product" means any virus, therapeutic serum,
antibody, protein, toxin, antitoxin, vaccine, blood, blood component or
derivative, allergenic product, or analogous product produced through
the application of biotechnology that is used in the prevention,
treatment, or cure of diseases or injuries to humans.
(4) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(5)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment in
qualified buildings or qualified machinery and equipment, including
labor and services rendered in the planning, installation, and
construction of the project.
(b) The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for
a deferral unless:
(i) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(ii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under section 8 of this act; and
(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(6)(a) "Initiation of construction" means the date that a building
permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031
for:
(i) Construction of the qualified building, if the underlying
ownership of the building vests exclusively with the person receiving
the economic benefit of the deferral;
(ii) Construction of the qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (5)(b)(ii)(A) of this section; or
(iii) Tenant improvements for a qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (5)(b)(ii)(A) of this section.
(b) "Initiation of construction" does not include soil testing,
site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related
activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit
for the construction of the foundation of the building.
(c) If the investment project is a phased project, "initiation of
construction" shall apply separately to each phase.
(7) "Manufacturing" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.120.
(8) "Medical device" means an instrument, apparatus, implement,
machine, contrivance, implant, in vitro reagent, or other similar or
related article, including any component, part, or accessory, that is
designed or developed and:
(a) Recognized in the national formulary, or the United States
pharmacopeia, or any supplement to them;
(b) Intended for use in the diagnosis of disease, or in the cure,
mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease or other conditions in
human beings or other animals; or
(c) Intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of
man or other animals, and which does not achieve any of its primary
intended purposes through chemical action within or on the body of man
or other animals and which is not dependent upon being metabolized for
the achievement of any of its principal intended purposes.
(9) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(10) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures,
and expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of
increasing floor space or production capacity used for biotechnology
product manufacturing or medical device manufacturing activities,
including plant offices, commercial laboratories for process
development, quality assurance and quality control, and warehouses or
other facilities for the storage of raw material or finished goods if
the facilities are an essential or an integral part of a factory,
plant, or laboratory used for biotechnology product manufacturing or
medical device manufacturing. If a building is used partly for
biotechnology product manufacturing or medical device manufacturing and
partly for other purposes, the applicable tax deferral shall be
determined by apportionment of the costs of construction under rules
adopted by the department.
(11) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial
and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an
integral and necessary part of a biotechnology product manufacturing or
medical device manufacturing operation. "Qualified machinery and
equipment" includes: Computers; software; data processing equipment;
laboratory equipment; manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys,
shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures;
and all equipment used to control or operate the machinery.
(12) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Application for deferral of taxes under this
chapter must be made and approved before initiation of the construction
of the investment project or acquisition of equipment or machinery.
The application shall be made to the department in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The application shall contain
information regarding the location of the investment project, the
applicant's average employment in the state for the prior year,
estimated or actual new employment related to the project, estimated or
actual wages of employees related to the project, estimated or actual
costs, time schedules for completion and operation, and other
information required by the department. The department shall rule on
the application within sixty days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department shall issue a sales and
use tax deferral certificate for state and local sales and use taxes
due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW for each eligible
investment project.
(2) No certificate shall be issued for an eligible investment
project under this chapter and chapter 82.60 or 82.63 RCW.
(3) The department shall keep a running total of all deferrals
granted under this chapter during each fiscal biennium.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section and section 8 of this act, taxes deferred under this
chapter need not be repaid.
(2)(a) If, on the basis of the survey under section 8 of this act
or other information, the department finds that an investment project
is used for purposes other than qualified biotechnology product
manufacturing or medical device manufacturing activities at any time
during the calendar year in which the eligible investment project is
certified by the department as having been operationally completed, or
at any time during any of the seven succeeding calendar years, a
portion of deferred taxes shall be immediately due and payable
according to the following schedule:

Year in which use occurs % of deferred taxes due

1 100%

2 87.5%

3 75%

4 62.5%

5 50%

6 37.5%

7 25%

8 12.5%

(b) If a recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual
survey required under section 8 of this act by the date due, the amount
of deferred tax specified in section 8(6) of this act shall be
immediately due and payable. If the economic benefits of the deferral
are passed to a lessee as provided in section 2 of this act, the lessee
is responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has received the
economic benefit.
(3) For a violation of subsection (2)(a) of this section, the
department shall assess interest at the rate provided for delinquent
taxes, but not penalties, retroactively to the date of deferral. The
debt for deferred taxes shall not be extinguished by insolvency or
other failure of the recipient. Transfer of ownership does not
terminate the deferral. The deferral is transferred, subject to the
successor meeting the eligibility requirements of this chapter, for the
remaining periods of the deferral.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, deferred taxes
on the following need not be repaid:
(a) Machinery and equipment, and sales of or charges made for labor
and services, which at the time of purchase would have qualified for
exemption under RCW 82.08.02565; and
(b) Machinery and equipment which at the time of first use would
have qualified for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the
administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Applications, surveys, and any other
information received by the department under this chapter are not
confidential and are subject to disclosure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "biotechnology product and
medical device business tax incentive" or "tax incentive" means the
sales and use tax deferrals under chapter 82.-- RCW (sections 1 through
7 of this act), the preferential tax rates under section 9 of this act,
or the tax credit under section 10 of this act.
(2) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources, the
legislature needs information to evaluate whether the stated goals of
legislation were achieved.
(3) The goals of the biotechnology product and medical device
business tax incentives are to:
(a) Encourage the creation, expansion, and retention of commercial
biotechnology product and medical device manufacturing operations and
related job opportunities; and
(b) Fully mature the life sciences industry by creating a
sustainable commercial sector.
(4)(a) A person who receives the benefit of a biotechnology product
and medical device business tax incentive shall provide an annual
survey to the department. The survey is due by March 31st following
any year in which a tax incentive is claimed or used. The survey shall
not include names of employees. The survey shall include the amount of
the tax incentives claimed or used for the reporting year. The survey
shall also include the following information for employment positions
in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(b) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the tax incentive, to be submitted at the same
time as the survey.
(c) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax incentive claimed or used, is deemed taxpayer
information under RCW 82.32.330 and is not disclosable. Information on
the amount of tax incentive claimed or used is not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(5) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(6) If a person fails to submit an annual survey under subsection
(4)(a) of this section by the due date of the survey, the department
shall declare the amount of taxes credited as provided in section 10 of
this act, or reduced in the case of a preferential business and
occupation tax rate in section 9 of this act, for that year to be
immediately due and payable, and for taxes deferred under chapter 82.--RCW (sections 1 through 7 of this act) 12.5 percent of the deferred tax
from the date of deferral shall be immediately due and payable. Excise
taxes payable under this subsection are subject to interest but not
penalties, as provided under this chapter. This information is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request.
(7) The department shall use the information to study the tax
specified in subsection (1) of this section. The department shall
report to the legislature by December 1, 2009, and December 1, 2015.
The reports shall measure the number of new biotechnology product and
medical device manufacturing facilities established in Washington, the
amount of investment in biotechnology product and medical device
manufacturing facilities, the number of facilities and investment by
firms that utilized the biotechnology product and medical device
business tax incentive, the number of biotechnology product and medical
device manufacturing jobs in these facilities, the wages and benefits
paid for biotechnology product and medical device manufacturing jobs,
and the wages and benefits of biotechnology product and medical device
manufacturing jobs compared to wages and benefits of other
manufacturing jobs and jobs in other economic sectors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW,
to be codified between RCW 82.04.230 and 82.04.298, to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
biotechnology product manufacturing or medical device manufacturing; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall,
in the case of manufacturers be equal to the value of the product
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire be equal to the
gross proceeds of sales, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at wholesale or sales at retail of biotechnology products
or medical devices manufactured by that person; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of biotechnology products or medical devices,
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There may be credited against the tax imposed by this chapter,
the value of state-approved, employer-provided or sponsored job
training services designed to enhance the job-related performance of
employees, for those businesses engaged in biotechnology product
manufacturing or medical device manufacturing.
(2) The value of the state-approved job training services provided
by the employer to the employee, without charge, shall be determined by
the allocation of the cost method using generally accepted accounting
standards.
(3) The credit allowed under this section shall be limited to an
amount equal to twenty percent of the value of the state-approved job
training services determined under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Prior to claiming the credit under this section, the business
must obtain approval of the proposed job training service from the
local work force investment board. The employer's request for approval
must include a description of the proposed job training service, how
the job training will enhance the employee's performance, and the cost
of the proposed job training.
(5) A credit earned during one calendar year may be carried forward
to subsequent calendar years until used. No refunds shall be granted
for credits under this section.
(6) Credit may not be claimed under this section if the business is
taking the credit under RCW 82.04.4333.
(7) This section only applies to training for which an application
is approved on or after July 1, 2006.
(8) "Biotechnology product," "manufacturing," and "medical device"
have the meanings provided in section 2 of this act.
(9) This section expires January 1, 2017.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.04.440 and 2005 c 301 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in activities which are within the purview
of the provisions of two or more of sections RCW 82.04.230 to
82.04.298, inclusive, shall be taxable under each paragraph applicable
to the activities engaged in.
(2) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.2909(2), 82.04.250, 82.04.270,
82.04.294(2), ((or)) 82.04.260 (4), or (((13))) section 9(2) of this
act with respect to selling products in this state shall be allowed a
credit against those taxes for any (a) manufacturing taxes paid with
respect to the manufacturing of products so sold in this state, and/or
(b) extracting taxes paid with respect to the extracting of products so
sold in this state or ingredients of products so sold in this state.
Extracting taxes taken as credit under subsection (3) of this section
may also be taken under this subsection, if otherwise allowable under
this subsection. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the sale of those
products.
(3) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.240 or 82.04.260(1)(b) shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with
respect to extracting the ingredients of the products so manufactured
in this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the manufacturing
of those products.
(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1),
82.04.294(1), ((or)) 82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), (((6),)) or (((13)))
(11), or section 9(1) of this act with respect to extracting or
manufacturing products in this state shall be allowed a credit against
those taxes for any (i) gross receipts taxes paid to another state with
respect to the sales of the products so extracted or manufactured in
this state, (ii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the
manufacturing of products using ingredients so extracted in this state,
or (iii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to manufacturing
activities completed in another state for products so manufactured in
this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the extraction or
manufacturing of those products.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of
business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the
tax an income tax or value added tax; and
(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately
stated from the sales price.
(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the
United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of
such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign
country or political subdivision thereof.
(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and
includes (i) the taxes imposed in RCW 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1),
82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), and (((13))) (11), ((and)) 82.04.294(1), and
section 9(1) of this act; and (ii) similar gross receipts taxes paid to
other states.
(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act
or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes the
tax imposed in RCW 82.04.230 and similar gross receipts taxes paid to
other states.
(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used
in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through
82.04.212, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of
describing taxes imposed by other states.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.32.600 and 2005 c 514 s 1002 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Persons required to file surveys under RCW 82.04.4452 must
electronically file with the department all surveys, returns, and any
other forms or information the department requires in an electronic
format as provided or approved by the department, unless the department
grants relief under subsection (2) of this section. As used in this
section, "returns" has the same meaning as "return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(2) Upon request, the department may relieve a person of the
obligations in subsection (1) of this section if the person's taxes
have been reduced a cumulative total of less than one thousand dollars
from all of the credits, exemptions, or preferential business and
occupation tax rates, for which a person is required to file an annual
survey under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.535, 82.32.545, 82.32.570,
82.32.560, 82.60.070, ((or)) 82.63.020, or section 8 of this act.
(3) Persons who no longer qualify for relief under subsection (2)
of this section will be notified in writing by the department and must
comply with subsection (1) of this section by the date provided in the
notice.
(4) Any survey, return, or any other form or information required
to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---