BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.76 RCW
to read as follows:
Any person who has reason to believe that a person is not
complying, or has not complied, with the requirements of RCW 9A.44.130
and who, with the intent to assist that person in eluding a law
enforcement agency that is seeking to find the person to question him
or her about, or to arrest him or her for, his or her noncompliance
with the requirements of RCW 9A.44.130:
(1) Knowingly provides false information to a law enforcement
agency about the person's noncompliance with the requirements of RCW
9A.44.130, and, if known, the person's whereabouts;
(2) Harbors or attempts to harbor, or assists another in harboring
or attempting to harbor, the person;
(3) Conceals or attempts to conceal, or assists another in
concealing or attempting to conceal, the person; or
(4) Provides information to the law enforcement agency regarding
the person with the knowledge that it is false information
is guilty of failure to cooperate with law enforcement regarding
another's failure to register, which is a class C felony.

--- END ---