BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING CREATED
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The legislature recognizes that:
(a) Parents are their children's first and most important teachers
and decision makers;
(b) Research across disciplines now demonstrates that what happens
in the earliest years makes a critical difference in children's
readiness to succeed in school and life;
(c) Washington's competitiveness in the global economy requires a
world-class education system that starts early and supports life-long
learning;
(d) Washington state currently makes substantial investments in
voluntary child care and early learning services and supports, but
because services are fragmented across multiple state agencies, and
early learning providers lack the supports and incentives needed to
improve the quality of services they provide, many parents have
difficulty accessing high quality early learning services;
(e) A more cohesive and integrated voluntary early learning system
would result in greater efficiencies for the state, increased
partnership between the state and the private sector, improved access
to high quality early learning services, and better employment and
early learning outcomes for families and all children.
(2) The legislature finds that the early years of a child's life
are critical to the child's healthy brain development and that the
quality of caregiving during the early years can significantly impact
the child's intellectual, social, and emotional development.
(3) The purpose of this chapter is:
(a) To establish the department of early learning, the purpose of
which is to coordinate and consolidate child care and early learning
programs;
(b) To safeguard the health, safety, and well-being of children
receiving child care and early learning services, which is paramount
over the right of any person to provide care;
(c) To promote the development of a sufficient number and variety
of adequate child care and early learning facilities, both public and
private; and
(d) To license agencies and to assure the users of such agencies,
their parents, the community at large and the agencies themselves that
adequate minimum standards are maintained by all child care and early
learning facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility that provides child care and early learning
services outside a child's own home and includes the following
irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency:
(a) "Child day care center" means an agency that regularly provides
child day care and early learning services for a group of children for
periods of less than twenty-four hours;
(b) "Family day care provider" means a child day care provider who
regularly provides child day care and early learning services for not
more than twelve children in the provider's home in the family living
quarters;
(c) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community
facility.
(2) "Agency" does not include the following:
(a) Persons related to the child in the following ways:
(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and
including first cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding
generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;
(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;
(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as
well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons,
and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state
law; or
(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (2)(a), even after the marriage is terminated;
(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child;
(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or
children, with or without compensation, where the person providing care
for periods of less than twenty-four hours does not conduct such
activity on an ongoing, regularly scheduled basis for the purpose of
engaging in business, which includes, but is not limited to,
advertising such care;
(d) Parents on a mutually cooperative basis exchange care of one
another's children;
(e) Nursery schools or kindergartens that are engaged primarily in
educational work with preschool children and in which no child is
enrolled on a regular basis for more than four hours per day;
(f) Schools, including boarding schools, that are engaged primarily
in education, operate on a definite school year schedule, follow a
stated academic curriculum, accept only school-age children, and do not
accept custody of children;
(g) Seasonal camps of three months' or less duration engaged
primarily in recreational or educational activities;
(h) Facilities providing care to children for periods of less than
twenty-four hours whose parents remain on the premises to participate
in activities other than employment;
(i) Any agency having been in operation in this state ten years
before June 8, 1967, and not seeking or accepting moneys or assistance
from any state or federal agency, and is supported in part by an
endowment or trust fund;
(j) An agency operated by any unit of local, state, or federal
government or an agency, located within the boundaries of a federally
recognized Indian reservation, licensed by the Indian tribe;
(k) An agency located on a federal military reservation, except
where the military authorities request that such agency be subject to
the licensing requirements of this chapter.
(3) "Department" means the department of early learning.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department.
(5) "Enforcement action" means denial, suspension, revocation,
modification, or nonrenewal of a license pursuant to section 311(1) of
this act or assessment of civil monetary penalties pursuant to section
311(3) of this act.
(6) "Probationary license" means a license issued as a disciplinary
measure to an agency that has previously been issued a full license but
is out of compliance with licensing standards.
(7) "Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard of care
to be maintained by an agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 (1) The department of early learning is
created as an executive branch agency. The department is vested with
all powers and duties transferred to it under this chapter and such
other powers and duties as may be authorized by law.
(2) The primary duties of the department are to set state early
learning policy and to coordinate, consolidate, and integrate child
care and early learning programs in order to administer programs and
funding as efficiently as possible. The department's duties include,
but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To have lead responsibility for the state's early learning
policy;
(b) To improve parent education and support;
(c) To carry out activities to improve the quality of early
learning opportunities for young children including activities in
cooperation with the public-private partnership;
(d) To administer child care and early learning programs;
(e) To standardize internal financial audits, oversight visits,
performance benchmarks, and licensing criteria, so that programs can
function in an integrated fashion;
(f) To assist in the formation of a public-private partnership and
cooperate with that partnership in pursuing its goals; and
(g) To work cooperatively and in coordination with the early
learning council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 (1) The executive head and appointing
authority of the department is the director. The director shall be
appointed by the governor and shall serve at the pleasure of the
governor. The appointment made by the governor is subject to
confirmation by the senate. The director shall be paid a salary to be
fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040. If a vacancy
occurs, it shall be filled by appointment by the governor.
(2) The director may employ staff members, who shall be exempt from
chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are necessary to
administer this chapter. The director may delegate any power or duty
vested in him or her by this chapter, including authority to make final
decisions and enter final orders in hearings conducted under chapter
34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 It is the intent of the legislature
wherever possible to place the internal affairs of the department under
the control of the director in order that the director may institute
therein the flexible, alert, and intelligent management of its business
that changing contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever
the director's authority is not specifically limited by law, the
director has complete charge and supervisory powers over the
department. The director may create such administrative structures as
the director considers appropriate, except as otherwise specified by
law. The director may employ such assistants and personnel as
necessary for the general administration of the department. This
employment shall be in accordance with the state civil service law,
chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 The director may appoint such advisory
committees or councils as may be required by any federal legislation as
a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the department. The
director may also appoint statewide committees or councils on such
subject matters as are or come within the department's
responsibilities. The committees or councils shall be constituted as
required by federal law or as the director may determine.
Members of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid
their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 In furtherance of the policy of the state
to cooperate with the federal government in all of the programs under
the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as may become necessary
to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may be adopted,
unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal
funds. Any section or provision of law dealing with the department
that may be susceptible to more than one construction shall be
interpreted in favor of the construction most likely to comply with
federal laws entitling this state to receive federal funds for the
various programs of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 (1) In addition to other duties under this
chapter, the director shall provide leadership and active participation
in the creation and governance of a nongovernmental public-private
partnership focused on supporting government's investments in early
learning and ensuring that every child in the state is prepared to
succeed in school and in life.
(2) In addition to other powers granted to the director, the
director may:
(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the department to carry out
the purposes of this chapter;
(b) Accept gifts, grants, or other funds for the purposes of this
chapter; and
(c) Adopt, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, rules necessary to
implement this chapter, including rules governing child day care and
early learning programs under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 A new section is added to chapter 41.06
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply in the department of early learning to
the director, the director's personal secretary, and any other exempt
staff members provided for in section 104(2) of this act.

Sec. 110 RCW 43.17.010 and 2005 c 333 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be departments of the state government which shall be
known as (1) the department of social and health services, (2) the
department of ecology, (3) the department of labor and industries, (4)
the department of agriculture, (5) the department of fish and wildlife,
(6) the department of transportation, (7) the department of licensing,
(8) the department of general administration, (9) the department of
community, trade, and economic development, (10) the department of
veterans affairs, (11) the department of revenue, (12) the department
of retirement systems, (13) the department of corrections, (14) the
department of health, (15) the department of financial institutions,
((and)) (16) the department of archaeology and historic preservation,
and (17) the department of early learning, which shall be charged with
the execution, enforcement, and administration of such laws, and
invested with such powers and required to perform such duties, as the
legislature may provide.

Sec. 111 RCW 43.17.020 and 2005 c 333 s 11 and 2005 c 319 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the
director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the
director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the
secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the
director of general administration, (9) the director of community,
trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans affairs,
(11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems,
(13) the secretary of corrections, (14) the secretary of health, (15)
the director of financial institutions, ((and)) (16) the director of
the department of archaeology and historic preservation, and (17) the
director of early learning.
Such officers, except the director of fish and wildlife, shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold
office at the pleasure of the governor. The director of fish and
wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as
prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 112 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2005 c 424 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the director of
the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of
community, trade, and economic development, the secretary of
corrections, the director of early learning, the director of ecology,
the commissioner of employment security, the chair of the energy
facility site evaluation council, the secretary of the state finance
committee, the director of financial management, the director of fish
and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest practices appeals
board, the director of the gambling commission, the director of general
administration, the secretary of health, the administrator of the
Washington state health care authority, the executive secretary of the
health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of the higher
education facilities authority, the executive secretary of the horse
racing commission, the executive secretary of the human rights
commission, the executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence
review board, the director of the department of information services,
the director of the interagency committee for outdoor recreation, the
executive director of the state investment board, the director of labor
and industries, the director of licensing, the director of the lottery
commission, the director of the office of minority and women's business
enterprises, the director of parks and recreation, the director of
personnel, the executive director of the public disclosure commission,
the director of retirement systems, the director of revenue, the
secretary of social and health services, the chief of the Washington
state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the
secretary of transportation, the secretary of the utilities and
transportation commission, the director of veterans affairs, the
president of each of the regional and state universities and the
president of The Evergreen State College, each district and each campus
president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, board of
trustees of each community college, each member of the state board for
community and technical colleges, state convention and trade center
board of directors, committee for deferred compensation, Eastern
Washington University board of trustees, Washington economic
development finance authority, The Evergreen State College board of
trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices appeals board,
forest practices board, gambling commission, life sciences discovery
fund authority board of trustees, Washington health care facilities
authority, each member of the Washington health services commission,
higher education coordinating board, higher education facilities
authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance commission,
human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review board, board of
industrial insurance appeals, information services board, interagency
committee for outdoor recreation, state investment board, commission on
judicial conduct, legislative ethics board, liquor control board,
lottery commission, marine oversight board, Pacific Northwest electric
power and conservation planning council, parks and recreation
commission, personnel appeals board, board of pilotage commissioners,
pollution control hearings board, public disclosure commission, public
pension commission, shorelines hearing board, public employees'
benefits board, salmon recovery funding board, board of tax appeals,
transportation commission, University of Washington board of regents,
utilities and transportation commission, Washington state maritime
commission, Washington personnel resources board, Washington public
power supply system executive board, Washington State University board
of regents, Western Washington University board of trustees, and fish
and wildlife commission.

PART 2
POLICIES AND PROGRAMS TRANSFERRED
Sec. 201 RCW 41.04.385 and 2005 c 490 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that (1) demographic, economic, and social
trends underlie a critical and increasing demand for child care in the
state of Washington; (2) working parents and their children benefit
when the employees' child care needs have been resolved; (3) the state
of Washington should serve as a model employer by creating a supportive
atmosphere, to the extent feasible, in which its employees may meet
their child care needs; and (4) the state of Washington should
encourage the development of partnerships between state agencies, state
employees, state employee labor organizations, and private employers to
expand the availability of affordable quality child care. The
legislature finds further that resolving employee child care concerns
not only benefits the employees and their children, but may benefit the
employer by reducing absenteeism, increasing employee productivity,
improving morale, and enhancing the employer's position in recruiting
and retaining employees. Therefore, the legislature declares that it
is the policy of the state of Washington to assist state employees by
creating a supportive atmosphere in which they may meet their child
care needs. Policies and procedures for state agencies to address
employee child care needs will be the responsibility of the director of
personnel in consultation with the director of the department of early
learning and state employee representatives.

Sec. 202 RCW 74.13.085 and 1989 c 381 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the policy of the state of Washington to:
(1) Recognize the family as the most important social and economic
unit of society and support the central role parents play in child
rearing. All parents are encouraged to care for and nurture their
children through the traditional methods of parental care at home.
However, there has been a dramatic increase in participation of women
in the workforce which has made the availability of quality, affordable
child care a critical concern for the state and its citizens. There
are not enough child care services and facilities to meet the needs of
working parents, the costs of care are often beyond the resources of
working parents, and child care facilities are not located conveniently
to work places and neighborhoods. Parents are encouraged to
participate fully in the effort to improve the quality of child care
services.
(2) Promote a variety of culturally and developmentally appropriate
child care settings and services of the highest possible quality in
accordance with the basic principle of continuity of care. These
settings shall include, but not be limited to, family day care homes,
mini-centers, centers and schools.
(3) Promote the growth, development and safety of children by
working with community groups including providers and parents to
establish standards for quality service, training of child care
providers, fair and equitable monitoring, and salary levels
commensurate with provider responsibilities and support services.
(4) Promote equal access to quality, affordable, socio-economically
integrated child care for all children and families.
(5) Facilitate broad community and private sector involvement in
the provision of quality child care services to foster economic
development and assist industry through the department of early
learning.

Sec. 203 RCW 74.13.0902 and 1989 c 381 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
An employer liaison position is established in the department of
((social and health services to be colocated at the business assistance
center established under RCW 43.31.083)) early learning to be colocated
with the department of community, trade, and economic development. The
employer liaison shall, within appropriated funds:
(1) Staff and assist the child care partnership in the
implementation of its duties ((under RCW 74.13.0901));
(2) Provide technical assistance to employers regarding child care
services, working with and through local resource and referral
organizations whenever possible. Such technical assistance shall
include at a minimum:
(a) Assessing the child care needs of employees and prospective
employees;
(b) Reviewing options available to employers interested in
increasing access to child care for their employees;
(c) Developing techniques to permit small businesses to increase
access to child care for their employees;
(d) Reviewing methods of evaluating the impact of child care
activities on employers; and
(e) Preparing, collecting, and distributing current information for
employers on options for increasing involvement in child care; and
(3) Provide assistance to local child care resource and referral
organizations to increase their capacity to provide quality technical
assistance to employers in their community.

Sec. 204 RCW 74.13.0903 and 2005 c 490 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((office of child care policy is established to operate under
the authority of the department of social and health services. The
duties and responsibilities of the office include, but are not limited
to, the following, within appropriated funds)) department of early
learning shall:
(1) Work in conjunction with the statewide child care resource and
referral network as well as local governments, nonprofit organizations,
businesses, and community child care advocates to create local child
care resource and referral organizations. These organizations may
carry out needs assessments, resource development, provider training,
technical assistance, and parent information and training;
(2) Actively seek public and private money for distribution as
grants to the statewide child care resource and referral network and to
existing or potential local child care resource and referral
organizations;
(3) Adopt rules regarding the application for and distribution of
grants to local child care resource and referral organizations. The
rules shall, at a minimum, require an applicant to submit a plan for
achieving the following objectives:
(a) Provide parents with information about child care resources,
including location of services and subsidies;
(b) Carry out child care provider recruitment and training
programs, including training under RCW 74.25.040;
(c) Offer support services, such as parent and provider seminars,
toy-lending libraries, and substitute banks;
(d) Provide information for businesses regarding child care supply
and demand;
(e) Advocate for increased public and private sector resources
devoted to child care;
(f) Provide technical assistance to employers regarding employee
child care services; and
(g) Serve recipients of temporary assistance for needy families and
working parents with incomes at or below household incomes of one
hundred seventy-five percent of the federal poverty line;
(4) Provide staff support and technical assistance to the statewide
child care resource and referral network and local child care resource
and referral organizations;
(5) Maintain a statewide child care licensing data bank and work
with department ((of social and health services)) licensors to provide
information to local child care resource and referral organizations
about licensed child care providers in the state;
(6) Through the statewide child care resource and referral network
and local resource and referral organizations, compile data about local
child care needs and availability for future planning and development;
(7) Coordinate with the statewide child care resource and referral
network and local child care resource and referral organizations for
the provision of training and technical assistance to child care
providers; and
(8) Collect and assemble information regarding the availability of
insurance and of federal and other child care funding to assist state
and local agencies, businesses, and other child care providers in
offering child care services.

Sec. 205 RCW 74.13.098 and 2005 c 507 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this
specific purpose, the ((division of child care and early learning in
the)) department ((of social and health services)) shall establish a
child care career and wage ladder in licensed child care centers that
meet the following criteria: (a) At least ten percent of child care
slots are dedicated to children whose care is subsidized by the state
or any political subdivision thereof or any local government; (b) the
center agrees to adopt the child care career and wage ladder, which, at
a minimum, shall be at the same pay schedule as existed in the previous
child care career and wage ladder pilot project; and (c) the center
meets further program standards as established by rule pursuant to
section 4 ((of this act)), chapter 507, Laws of 2005.
The child care career and wage ladder shall include wage increments
for levels of education, years of relevant experience, levels of work
responsibility, relevant early childhood education credits, and
relevant requirements in the state training and registry system.
(2) The ((division)) department shall establish procedures for the
allocation of funds to implement the child care career and wage ladder
among child care centers meeting the criteria identified in subsection
(1) of this section. In developing these procedures, the ((division))
department shall:
(a) Review past efforts or administration of the child care career
and wage ladder pilot project in order to take advantage of any
findings, recommendations, or administrative practices that contributed
to that pilot project's success;
(b) Consult with stakeholders, including organizations representing
child care teachers and providers, in developing an allocation formula
that incorporates consideration of geographic and demographic
distribution of child care centers adopting the child care career and
wage ladder; and
(c) Develop a system for prioritizing child care centers interested
in adopting the child care career and wage ladder that is based on the
criteria identified in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (2) of this
section, child care centers meeting the criteria in subsection (1) of
this section located in urban areas of the department of social and
health services region one shall receive a minimum of fifteen percent
of the funds allocated through the child care career and wage ladder,
and of these centers, child care centers meeting the criteria in
subsection (1) of this section participating in the ((department of
social and health services)) Spokane tiered reimbursement pilot project
shall have first priority for child care career and wage ladder
funding.

Sec. 206 RCW 74.13.099 and 2005 c 507 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Child care centers adopting the child care career and wage ladder
established pursuant to RCW 74.13.098 (as recodified by this act) shall
increase wages for child care workers who have earned a high school
diploma or GED certificate, gain additional years of experience, or
accept increasing levels of responsibility in providing child care, in
accordance with the child care career and wage ladder. The adoption of
a child care career and wage ladder shall not prohibit the provision of
wage increases based upon merit. The department ((of social and health
services)) shall pay wage increments for child care workers employed by
child care centers adopting the child care career and wage ladder
established pursuant to RCW 74.13.098 (as recodified by this act) who
earn early childhood education credits or meet relevant requirements in
the state training and registry system, in accordance with the child
care career and wage ladder.

Sec. 207 RCW 74.15.350 and 2005 c 490 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department ((of social and health services))
shall implement the tiered-reimbursement system developed pursuant to
section 6, chapter 490, Laws of 2005. Implementation of the tiered-reimbursement system shall initially consist of two pilot sites in
different geographic regions of the state with demonstrated public-private partnerships, with statewide implementation to follow.
(2) In implementing the tiered-reimbursement system, consideration
shall be given to child care providers who provide staff wage
progression.
(3) The department shall begin implementation of the two pilot
sites by March 30, 2006.

Sec. 208 RCW 74.12.340 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 111 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to ((promulgate)) adopt rules
((and regulations)) governing the provision of day care as a part of
child welfare services when the secretary determines that a need exists
for such day care and that it is in the best interests of the child,
the parents, or the custodial parent and in determining the need for
such day care priority shall be given to geographical areas having the
greatest need for such care and to members of low income groups in the
population: PROVIDED, That where the family is financially able to pay
part or all of the costs of such care, fees shall be imposed and paid
according to the financial ability of the family.
(2) This section does not affect the authority of the department of
early learning to adopt rules governing child day care and early
learning programs.

Sec. 209 RCW 28A.215.110 and 1999 c 350 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 28A.215.100 through 28A.215.200 and
28A.215.900 through 28A.215.908 (as recodified by this act).
(1) "Advisory committee" means the advisory committee under RCW
28A.215.140 (as recodified by this act).
(2) "Department" means the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) early learning.
(3) "Eligible child" means a child not eligible for kindergarten
whose family income is at or below one hundred ten percent of the
federal poverty level, as published annually by the federal department
of health and human services, and includes a child whose family is
eligible for public assistance, and who is not a participant in a
federal or state program providing comprehensive services and may
include children who are eligible under rules adopted by the department
if the number of such children equals not more than ten percent of the
total enrollment in the early childhood program. Priority for
enrollment shall be given to children from families with the lowest
income or to eligible children from families with multiple needs.
(4) "Approved programs" means those state-supported education and
special assistance programs which are recognized by the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) as meeting the minimum
program rules adopted by the department to qualify under RCW
28A.215.100 through 28A.215.200 and 28A.215.900 through 28A.215.908 (as
recodified by this act) and are designated as eligible for funding by
the department under RCW 28A.215.160 and 28A.215.180 (as recodified by
this act).
(5) "Comprehensive" means an assistance program that focuses on the
needs of the child and includes education, health, and family support
services.
(6) "Family support services" means providing opportunities for
parents to:
(a) Actively participate in their child's early childhood program;
(b) Increase their knowledge of child development and parenting
skills;
(c) Further their education and training;
(d) Increase their ability to use needed services in the community;
(e) Increase their self-reliance.

Sec. 210 RCW 28A.215.120 and 1994 c 166 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department ((of community, trade, and economic development))
shall administer a state-supported early childhood education and
assistance program to assist eligible children with educational,
social, health, nutritional, and cultural development to enhance their
opportunity for success in the common school system. Eligible children
shall be admitted to approved early childhood programs to the extent
that the legislature provides funds, and additional eligible children
may be admitted to the extent that grants and contributions from
community sources provide sufficient funds for a program equivalent to
that supported by state funds.

Sec. 211 RCW 43.63A.066 and 1993 c 280 s 58 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))
early learning shall have primary responsibility for providing child
abuse and neglect prevention training to preschool age children
participating in the federal head start program or the early childhood
education and assistance program established under RCW 28A.215.010
through 28A.215.050, 28A.215.100 through 28A.215.200, and 28A.215.900
through 28A.215.908 (as recodified by this act).

PART 3
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING LICENSING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 The director shall have the power and it
shall be the director's duty with regard to licensing:
(1) In consultation and with the advice and assistance of persons
representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, to
designate categories of child care facilities for which separate or
different requirements shall be developed as may be appropriate whether
because of variations in the ages and other characteristics of the
children served, variations in the purposes and services offered or
size or structure of the agencies to be licensed, or because of any
other factor relevant thereto;
(2) In consultation and with the advice and assistance of persons
representative of the various type agencies to be licensed, to adopt
and publish minimum requirements for licensing applicable to each of
the various categories of agencies to be licensed under this chapter.
The minimum requirements shall be limited to:
(a) The size and suitability of a facility and the plan of
operation for carrying out the purpose for which an applicant seeks a
license;
(b) The character, suitability, and competence of an agency and
other persons associated with an agency directly responsible for the
care of children. In consultation with law enforcement personnel, the
director shall investigate the conviction record or pending charges and
dependency record information under chapter 43.43 RCW of each agency
and its staff seeking licensure or relicensure. No unfounded
allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020 may be
disclosed to a provider licensed under this chapter. In order to
determine the suitability of applicants for an agency license,
licensees, their employees, and other persons who have unsupervised
access to children in care, and who have not resided in the state of
Washington during the three-year period before being authorized to care
for children shall be fingerprinted. The fingerprints shall be
forwarded to the Washington state patrol and federal bureau of
investigation for a criminal history records check. The fingerprint
criminal history records checks will be at the expense of the licensee.
The licensee may not pass this cost on to the employee or prospective
employee, unless the employee is determined to be unsuitable due to his
or her criminal history record. The director shall use the information
solely for the purpose of determining eligibility for a license and for
determining the character, suitability, and competence of those persons
or agencies, excluding parents, not required to be licensed who are
authorized to care for children. Criminal justice agencies shall
provide the director such information as they may have and that the
director may require for such purpose;
(c) The number of qualified persons required to render the type of
care for which an agency seeks a license;
(d) The health, safety, cleanliness, and general adequacy of the
premises to provide for the comfort, care, and well-being of children;
(e) The provision of necessary care and early learning, including
food, clothing, supervision, and discipline; physical, mental, and
social well-being; and educational, recreational, and spiritual
opportunities for those served;
(f) The financial ability of an agency to comply with minimum
requirements established under this chapter; and
(g) The maintenance of records pertaining to the care of children;
(3) To issue, revoke, or deny licenses to agencies pursuant to this
chapter. Licenses shall specify the category of care that an agency is
authorized to render and the ages and number of children to be served;
(4) To prescribe the procedures and the form and contents of
reports necessary for the administration of this chapter and to require
regular reports from each licensee;
(5) To inspect agencies periodically to determine whether or not
there is compliance with this chapter and the requirements adopted
under this chapter;
(6) To review requirements adopted under this chapter at least
every two years and to adopt appropriate changes after consultation
with affected groups for child day care requirements; and
(7) To consult with public and private agencies in order to help
them improve their methods and facilities for the care and early
learning of children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 The chief of the Washington state patrol,
through the director of fire protection, shall have the power and it
shall be his or her duty:
(1) In consultation with the director and with the advice and
assistance of persons representative of the various type agencies to be
licensed, to adopt recognized minimum standard requirements pertaining
to each category of agency established pursuant to this chapter
necessary to protect all persons residing therein from fire hazards;
(2) To make or cause to be made such inspections and investigations
of agencies as he or she deems necessary;
(3) To make a periodic review of requirements under section 301(5)
of this act and to adopt necessary changes after consultation as
required in subsection (1) of this section;
(4) To issue to applicants for licenses under this chapter who
comply with the requirements, a certificate of compliance, a copy of
which shall be presented to the department before a license shall be
issued, except that an initial license may be issued as provided in
section 309 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 Licensed child day care centers shall
provide notice of pesticide use to parents or guardians of students and
employees pursuant to chapter 17.21 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 A copy of the articles of incorporation of
any agency or amendments to the articles of existing corporation
agencies shall be sent by the secretary of state to the department at
the time such articles or amendments are filed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 All agencies subject to this chapter shall
accord the department, the chief of the Washington state patrol, and
the director of fire protection, or their designees, the right of
entrance and the privilege of access to and inspection of records for
the purpose of determining whether or not there is compliance with the
provisions of this chapter and the requirements adopted under it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 (1) It is unlawful for any agency to care
for children unless the agency is licensed as provided in this chapter.
(2) A license issued under chapter 74.15 RCW before July 1, 2006,
for an agency subject to this chapter after July 1, 2006, is valid
until its next renewal, unless otherwise suspended or revoked by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 Each agency shall make application for a
license or renewal of license to the department on forms prescribed by
the department. Upon receipt of such application, the department shall
either grant or deny a license within ninety days. A license shall be
granted if the agency meets the minimum requirements set forth in this
chapter and the departmental requirements consistent with the chapter,
except that an initial license may be issued as provided in section 309
of this act. Licenses provided for in this chapter shall be issued for
a period of three years. The licensee, however, shall advise the
director of any material change in circumstances which might constitute
grounds for reclassification of license as to category. The license
issued under this chapter is not transferable and applies only to the
licensee and the location stated in the application. For licensed
family day care homes having an acceptable history of child care, the
license may remain in effect for two weeks after a move.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 If a licensee desires to apply for a
renewal of its license, a request for a renewal shall be filed ninety
days before the expiration date of the license. If the department has
failed to act at the time of the expiration date of the license, the
license shall continue in effect until such time as the department
acts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 The director may, at his or her
discretion, issue an initial license instead of a full license, to an
agency or facility for a period not to exceed six months, renewable for
a period not to exceed two years, to allow such agency or facility
reasonable time to become eligible for full license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 (1) The department may issue a
probationary license to a licensee who has had a license but is
temporarily unable to comply with a rule or has been the subject of
multiple complaints or concerns about noncompliance if:
(a) The noncompliance does not present an immediate threat to the
health and well-being of the children but would be likely to do so if
allowed to continue; and
(b) The licensee has a plan approved by the department to correct
the area of noncompliance within the probationary period.
(2) A probationary license may be issued for up to six months, and
at the discretion of the department it may be extended for an
additional six months. The department shall immediately terminate the
probationary license, if at any time the noncompliance for which the
probationary license was issued presents an immediate threat to the
health or well-being of the children.
(3) The department may, at any time, issue a probationary license
for due cause that states the conditions of probation.
(4) An existing license is invalidated when a probationary license
is issued.
(5) At the expiration of the probationary license, the department
shall reinstate the original license for the remainder of its term,
issue a new license, or revoke the original license.
(6) A right to an adjudicative proceeding shall not accrue to the
licensee whose license has been placed on probationary status unless
the licensee does not agree with the placement on probationary status
and the department then suspends, revokes, or modifies the license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 (1) An agency may be denied a license, or
any license issued pursuant to this chapter may be suspended, revoked,
modified, or not renewed by the director upon proof (a) that the agency
has failed or refused to comply with the provisions of this chapter or
the requirements adopted pursuant to this chapter; or (b) that the
conditions required for the issuance of a license under this chapter
have ceased to exist with respect to such licenses. RCW 43.20A.205
governs notice of a license denial, revocation, suspension, or
modification and provides the right to an adjudicative proceeding.
(2) In any adjudicative proceeding regarding the denial,
modification, suspension, or revocation of any license under this
chapter, the department's decision shall be upheld if it is supported
by a preponderance of the evidence.
(3) The department may assess civil monetary penalties upon proof
that an agency has failed or refused to comply with the rules adopted
under this chapter or that an agency subject to licensing under this
chapter is operating without a license except that civil monetary
penalties shall not be levied against a licensed foster home. Monetary
penalties levied against unlicensed agencies that submit an application
for licensure within thirty days of notification and subsequently
become licensed will be forgiven. These penalties may be assessed in
addition to or in lieu of other disciplinary actions. Civil monetary
penalties, if imposed, may be assessed and collected, with interest,
for each day an agency is or was out of compliance. Civil monetary
penalties shall not exceed seventy-five dollars per violation for a
family day care home and two hundred fifty dollars per violation for
child day care centers. Each day upon which the same or substantially
similar action occurs is a separate violation subject to the assessment
of a separate penalty. The department shall provide a notification
period before a monetary penalty is effective and may forgive the
penalty levied if the agency comes into compliance during this period.
The department may suspend, revoke, or not renew a license for failure
to pay a civil monetary penalty it has assessed pursuant to this
chapter within ten days after such assessment becomes final. Chapter
43.20A RCW governs notice of a civil monetary penalty and provides the
right of an adjudicative proceeding. The preponderance of evidence
standard shall apply in adjudicative proceedings related to assessment
of civil monetary penalties.
(4)(a) In addition to or in lieu of an enforcement action being
taken, the department may place a child day care center or family day
care provider on nonreferral status if the center or provider has
failed or refused to comply with this chapter or rules adopted under
this chapter or an enforcement action has been taken. The nonreferral
status may continue until the department determines that: (i) No
enforcement action is appropriate; or (ii) a corrective action plan has
been successfully concluded.
(b) Whenever a child day care center or family day care provider is
placed on nonreferral status, the department shall provide written
notification to the child day care center or family day care provider.
(5) The department shall notify appropriate public and private
child care resource and referral agencies of the department's decision
to: (a) Take an enforcement action against a child day care center or
family day care provider; or (b) place or remove a child day care
center or family day care provider on nonreferral status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312 (1) The office of administrative hearings
shall not assign nor allow an administrative law judge to preside over
an adjudicative hearing regarding denial, modification, suspension, or
revocation of any license to provide child care under this chapter,
unless such judge has received training related to state and federal
laws and department policies and procedures regarding:
(a) Child abuse, neglect, and maltreatment;
(b) Child protective services investigations and standards;
(c) Licensing activities and standards;
(d) Child development; and
(e) Parenting skills.
(2) The office of administrative hearings shall develop and
implement a training program that carries out the requirements of this
section. The office of administrative hearings shall consult and
coordinate with the department in developing the training program. The
department may assist the office of administrative hearings in
developing and providing training to administrative law judges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 313 The director shall immediately suspend the
license or certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to
RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a
person who is not in compliance with a support order or a residential
or visitation order. If the person has continued to meet all other
requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the
license or certificate shall be automatic upon the director's receipt
of a release issued by the department of social and health services
stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 314 Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit
of any other remedy, the director may, in the manner provided by law,
upon the advice of the attorney general, who shall represent the
department in the proceeding, maintain an action in the name of the
state for injunction or such other relief as he or she may deem
advisable against any agency subject to licensing under the provisions
of this chapter or against any such agency not having a license as
heretofore provided in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 315 Any agency operating without a license
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. This section shall not be
enforceable against an agency until sixty days after the effective date
of new rules, applicable to such agency, have been adopted under this
chapter.

PART 4
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES LICENSING REVISIONS
Sec. 401 RCW 74.15.020 and 2001 c 230 s 1, 2001 c 144 s 1, and
2001 c 137 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For the purpose of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031, and unless
otherwise clearly indicated by the context thereof, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility which receives children, expectant mothers, or
persons with developmental disabilities for control, care, or
maintenance outside their own homes, or which places, arranges the
placement of, or assists in the placement of children, expectant
mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities for foster care or
placement of children for adoption, and shall include the following
irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency or to the
children, expectant mothers or persons with developmental disabilities
for services rendered:
(a) (("Child day-care center" means an agency which regularly
provides care for a group of children for periods of less than twenty-four hours;
(b))) "Child-placing agency" means an agency which places a child
or children for temporary care, continued care, or for adoption;
(((c))) (b) "Community facility" means a group care facility
operated for the care of juveniles committed to the department under
RCW 13.40.185. A county detention facility that houses juveniles
committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185 pursuant to a contract
with the department is not a community facility;
(((d))) (c) "Crisis residential center" means an agency which is a
temporary protective residential facility operated to perform the
duties specified in chapter 13.32A RCW, in the manner provided in RCW
74.13.032 through 74.13.036;
(((e))) (d) "Emergency respite center" is an agency that may be
commonly known as a crisis nursery, that provides emergency and crisis
care for up to seventy-two hours to children who have been admitted by
their parents or guardians to prevent abuse or neglect. Emergency
respite centers may operate for up to twenty-four hours a day, and for
up to seven days a week. Emergency respite centers may provide care
for children ages birth through seventeen, and for persons eighteen
through twenty with developmental disabilities who are admitted with a
sibling or siblings through age seventeen. Emergency respite centers
may not substitute for crisis residential centers or HOPE centers, or
any other services defined under this section, and may not substitute
for services which are required under chapter 13.32A or 13.34 RCW;
(((f) "Family day-care provider" means a child day-care provider
who regularly provides child day care for not more than twelve children
in the provider's home in the family living quarters;
(g))) (e) "Foster-family home" means an agency which regularly
provides care on a twenty-four hour basis to one or more children,
expectant mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities in the
family abode of the person or persons under whose direct care and
supervision the child, expectant mother, or person with a developmental
disability is placed;
(((h))) (f) "Group-care facility" means an agency, other than a
foster-family home, which is maintained and operated for the care of a
group of children on a twenty-four hour basis;
(((i))) (g) "HOPE center" means an agency licensed by the secretary
to provide temporary residential placement and other services to street
youth. A street youth may remain in a HOPE center for thirty days
while services are arranged and permanent placement is coordinated. No
street youth may stay longer than thirty days unless approved by the
department and any additional days approved by the department must be
based on the unavailability of a long-term placement option. A street
youth whose parent wants him or her returned to home may remain in a
HOPE center until his or her parent arranges return of the youth, not
longer. All other street youth must have court approval under chapter
13.34 or 13.32A RCW to remain in a HOPE center up to thirty days;
(((j))) (h) "Maternity service" means an agency which provides or
arranges for care or services to expectant mothers, before or during
confinement, or which provides care as needed to mothers and their
infants after confinement;
(((k))) (i) "Responsible living skills program" means an agency
licensed by the secretary that provides residential and transitional
living services to persons ages sixteen to eighteen who are dependent
under chapter 13.34 RCW and who have been unable to live in his or her
legally authorized residence and, as a result, the minor lived outdoors
or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy by the minor.
Dependent minors ages fourteen and fifteen may be eligible if no other
placement alternative is available and the department approves the
placement;
(((l))) (j) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a
community facility.
(2) "Agency" shall not include the following:
(a) Persons related to the child, expectant mother, or person with
developmental disability in the following ways:
(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and
including first cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding
generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;
(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;
(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as
well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons,
and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state
law;
(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (2)(a), even after the marriage is terminated; or
(v) Extended family members, as defined by the law or custom of the
Indian child's tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, a person
who has reached the age of eighteen and who is the Indian child's
grandparent, aunt or uncle, brother or sister, brother-in-law or
sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin, or stepparent
who provides care in the family abode on a twenty-four-hour basis to an
Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4);
(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child, expectant mother,
or persons with developmental disabilities;
(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or
children, with or without compensation, where((: (i) The person
providing care for periods of less than twenty-four hours does not
conduct such activity on an ongoing, regularly scheduled basis for the
purpose of engaging in business, which includes, but is not limited to,
advertising such care; or (ii))) the parent and person providing care
on a twenty-four-hour basis have agreed to the placement in writing and
the state is not providing any payment for the care;
(d) ((Parents on a mutually cooperative basis exchange care of one
another's children;
(e))) A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that
provides placement or similar services to exchange students or
international student exchange visitors or persons who have the care of
an exchange student in their home;
(((f))) (e) A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity
that provides placement or similar services to international children
who have entered the country by obtaining visas that meet the criteria
for medical care as established by the United States immigration and
naturalization service, or persons who have the care of such an
international child in their home;
(((g) Nursery schools or kindergartens which are engaged primarily
in educational work with preschool children and in which no child is
enrolled on a regular basis for more than four hours per day;
(h))) (f) Schools, including boarding schools, which are engaged
primarily in education, operate on a definite school year schedule,
follow a stated academic curriculum, accept only school-age children
and do not accept custody of children;
(((i) Seasonal camps of three months' or less duration engaged
primarily in recreational or educational activities;
(j))) (g) Hospitals licensed pursuant to chapter 70.41 RCW when
performing functions defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, nursing homes
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW and boarding homes licensed under
chapter 18.20 RCW;
(((k))) (h) Licensed physicians or lawyers;
(((l) Facilities providing care to children for periods of less
than twenty-four hours whose parents remain on the premises to
participate in activities other than employment;
(m))) (i) Facilities approved and certified under chapter 71A.22
RCW;
(((n))) (j) Any agency having been in operation in this state ten
years prior to June 8, 1967, and not seeking or accepting moneys or
assistance from any state or federal agency, and is supported in part
by an endowment or trust fund;
(((o))) (k) Persons who have a child in their home for purposes of
adoption, if the child was placed in such home by a licensed child-placing agency, an authorized public or tribal agency or court or if a
replacement report has been filed under chapter 26.33 RCW and the
placement has been approved by the court;
(((p))) (l) An agency operated by any unit of local, state, or
federal government or an agency, located within the boundaries of a
federally recognized Indian reservation, licensed by the Indian tribe;
(((q))) (m) A maximum or medium security program for juvenile
offenders operated by or under contract with the department;
(((r))) (n) An agency located on a federal military reservation,
except where the military authorities request that such agency be
subject to the licensing requirements of this chapter.
(3) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(4) "Juvenile" means a person under the age of twenty-one who has
been sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the
department under RCW 13.40.185.
(5) "Probationary license" means a license issued as a disciplinary
measure to an agency that has previously been issued a full license but
is out of compliance with licensing standards.
(6) "Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard of care
to be maintained by an agency.
(7) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.
(8) "Street youth" means a person under the age of eighteen who
lives outdoors or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy
by the minor and who is not residing with his or her parent or at his
or her legally authorized residence.
(9) "Transitional living services" means at a minimum, to the
extent funds are available, the following:
(a) Educational services, including basic literacy and
computational skills training, either in local alternative or public
high schools or in a high school equivalency program that leads to
obtaining a high school equivalency degree;
(b) Assistance and counseling related to obtaining vocational
training or higher education, job readiness, job search assistance, and
placement programs;
(c) Counseling and instruction in life skills such as money
management, home management, consumer skills, parenting, health care,
access to community resources, and transportation and housing options;
(d) Individual and group counseling; and
(e) Establishing networks with federal agencies and state and local
organizations such as the United States department of labor, employment
and training administration programs including the job training
partnership act which administers private industry councils and the job
corps; vocational rehabilitation; and volunteer programs.

Sec. 402 RCW 74.15.030 and 2005 c 490 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary shall have the power and it shall be the secretary's
duty:
(1) In consultation with the children's services advisory
committee, and with the advice and assistance of persons representative
of the various type agencies to be licensed, to designate categories of
facilities for which separate or different requirements shall be
developed as may be appropriate whether because of variations in the
ages, sex and other characteristics of persons served, variations in
the purposes and services offered or size or structure of the agencies
to be licensed hereunder, or because of any other factor relevant
thereto;
(2) In consultation with the children's services advisory
committee, and with the advice and assistance of persons representative
of the various type agencies to be licensed, to adopt and publish
minimum requirements for licensing applicable to each of the various
categories of agencies to be licensed.
The minimum requirements shall be limited to:
(a) The size and suitability of a facility and the plan of
operation for carrying out the purpose for which an applicant seeks a
license;
(b) The character, suitability and competence of an agency and
other persons associated with an agency directly responsible for the
care and treatment of children, expectant mothers or developmentally
disabled persons. In consultation with law enforcement personnel, the
secretary shall investigate the conviction record or pending charges
and dependency record information under chapter 43.43 RCW of each
agency and its staff seeking licensure or relicensure. No unfounded
allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020 may be
disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any
other provider licensed under this chapter. In order to determine the
suitability of applicants for an agency license, licensees, their
employees, and other persons who have unsupervised access to children
in care, and who have not resided in the state of Washington during the
three-year period before being authorized to care for children shall be
fingerprinted. The fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Washington
state patrol and federal bureau of investigation for a criminal history
records check. The fingerprint criminal history records checks will be
at the expense of the licensee except that in the case of a foster
family home, if this expense would work a hardship on the licensee, the
department shall pay the expense. The licensee may not pass this cost
on to the employee or prospective employee, unless the employee is
determined to be unsuitable due to his or her criminal history record.
The secretary shall use the information solely for the purpose of
determining eligibility for a license and for determining the
character, suitability, and competence of those persons or agencies,
excluding parents, not required to be licensed who are authorized to
care for children, expectant mothers, and developmentally disabled
persons. Criminal justice agencies shall provide the secretary such
information as they may have and that the secretary may require for
such purpose;
(c) The number of qualified persons required to render the type of
care and treatment for which an agency seeks a license;
(d) The safety, cleanliness, and general adequacy of the premises
to provide for the comfort, care and well-being of children, expectant
mothers or developmentally disabled persons;
(e) The provision of necessary care, including food, clothing,
supervision and discipline; physical, mental and social well-being; and
educational, recreational and spiritual opportunities for those served;
(f) The financial ability of an agency to comply with minimum
requirements established pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW
74.13.031; and
(g) The maintenance of records pertaining to the admission,
progress, health and discharge of persons served;
(3) To investigate any person, including relatives by blood or
marriage except for parents, for character, suitability, and competence
in the care and treatment of children, expectant mothers, and
developmentally disabled persons prior to authorizing that person to
care for children, expectant mothers, and developmentally disabled
persons. However, if a child is placed with a relative under RCW
13.34.065 or 13.34.130, and if such relative appears otherwise suitable
and competent to provide care and treatment the criminal history
background check required by this section need not be completed before
placement, but shall be completed as soon as possible after placement;
(4) On reports of alleged child abuse and neglect, to investigate
agencies in accordance with chapter 26.44 RCW, including child day-care
centers and family day-care homes, to determine whether the alleged
abuse or neglect has occurred, and whether child protective services or
referral to a law enforcement agency is appropriate;
(5) To issue, revoke, or deny licenses to agencies pursuant to
chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031. Licenses shall specify the
category of care which an agency is authorized to render and the ages,
sex and number of persons to be served;
(6) To prescribe the procedures and the form and contents of
reports necessary for the administration of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW
74.13.031 and to require regular reports from each licensee;
(7) To inspect agencies periodically to determine whether or not
there is compliance with chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 and the
requirements adopted hereunder;
(8) To review requirements adopted hereunder at least every two
years and to adopt appropriate changes after consultation ((with
affected groups for child day-care requirements and)) with the
children's services advisory committee for requirements for other
agencies; and
(9) To consult with public and private agencies in order to help
them improve their methods and facilities for the care of children,
expectant mothers and developmentally disabled persons.

Sec. 403 RCW 74.15.100 and 1995 c 302 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each agency shall make application for a license or renewal of
license to the department of social and health services on forms
prescribed by the department. A licensed agency having foster-family
homes under its supervision may make application for a license on
behalf of any such foster-family home. Such a foster home license
shall cease to be valid when the home is no longer under the
supervision of that agency. Upon receipt of such application, the
department shall either grant or deny a license within ninety days
unless the application is for licensure as a foster-family home, in
which case RCW 74.15.040 shall govern. A license shall be granted if
the agency meets the minimum requirements set forth in chapter 74.15
RCW and RCW 74.13.031 and the departmental requirements consistent
herewith, except that an initial license may be issued as provided in
RCW 74.15.120. Licenses provided for in chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW
74.13.031 shall be issued for a period of three years. The licensee,
however, shall advise the secretary of any material change in
circumstances which might constitute grounds for reclassification of
license as to category. The license issued under this chapter is not
transferable and applies only to the licensee and the location stated
in the application. For licensed foster-family ((and family day-care))
homes having an acceptable history of child care, the license may
remain in effect for two weeks after a move, except that ((for the
foster-family home)) this will apply only if the family remains intact.

Sec. 404 RCW 74.15.130 and 2005 c 473 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An agency may be denied a license, or any license issued
pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 may be suspended,
revoked, modified, or not renewed by the secretary upon proof (a) that
the agency has failed or refused to comply with the provisions of
chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 or the requirements promulgated
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031; or
(b) that the conditions required for the issuance of a license under
chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 have ceased to exist with respect
to such licenses. RCW 43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial,
revocation, suspension, or modification and provides the right to an
adjudicative proceeding.
(2) In any adjudicative proceeding regarding the denial,
modification, suspension, or revocation of a foster family home
license, the department's decision shall be upheld if there is
reasonable cause to believe that:
(a) The applicant or licensee lacks the character, suitability, or
competence to care for children placed in out-of-home care, however, no
unfounded report of child abuse or neglect may be used to deny
employment or a license;
(b) The applicant or licensee has failed or refused to comply with
any provision of chapter 74.15 RCW, RCW 74.13.031, or the requirements
adopted pursuant to such provisions; or
(c) The conditions required for issuance of a license under chapter
74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 have ceased to exist with respect to such
licenses.
(3) In any adjudicative proceeding regarding the denial,
modification, suspension, or revocation of any license under this
chapter, other than a foster family home license, the department's
decision shall be upheld if it is supported by a preponderance of the
evidence.
(4) The department may assess civil monetary penalties upon proof
that an agency has failed or refused to comply with the rules adopted
under the provisions of this chapter and RCW 74.13.031 or that an
agency subject to licensing under this chapter and RCW 74.13.031 is
operating without a license except that civil monetary penalties shall
not be levied against a licensed foster home. Monetary penalties
levied against unlicensed agencies that submit an application for
licensure within thirty days of notification and subsequently become
licensed will be forgiven. These penalties may be assessed in addition
to or in lieu of other disciplinary actions. Civil monetary penalties,
if imposed, may be assessed and collected, with interest, for each day
an agency is or was out of compliance. Civil monetary penalties shall
not exceed ((seventy-five dollars per violation for a family day-care
home and)) two hundred fifty dollars per violation for group homes((,
child day-care centers,)) and child-placing agencies. Each day upon
which the same or substantially similar action occurs is a separate
violation subject to the assessment of a separate penalty. The
department shall provide a notification period before a monetary
penalty is effective and may forgive the penalty levied if the agency
comes into compliance during this period. The department may suspend,
revoke, or not renew a license for failure to pay a civil monetary
penalty it has assessed pursuant to this chapter within ten days after
such assessment becomes final. Chapter 43.20A RCW governs notice of a
civil monetary penalty and provides the right of an adjudicative
proceeding. The preponderance of evidence standard shall apply in
adjudicative proceedings related to assessment of civil monetary
penalties.
(((5)(a) In addition to or in lieu of an enforcement action being
taken, the department may place a child day-care center or family day-care provider on nonreferral status if the center or provider has
failed or refused to comply with this chapter or rules adopted under
this chapter or an enforcement action has been taken. The nonreferral
status may continue until the department determines that: (i) No
enforcement action is appropriate; or (ii) a corrective action plan has
been successfully concluded.
(b) Whenever a child day-care center or family day-care provider is
placed on nonreferral status, the department shall provide written
notification to the child day-care center or family day-care provider.
(6) The department shall notify appropriate public and private
child care resource and referral agencies of the department's decision
to: (a) Take an enforcement action against a child day-care center or
family day-care provider; or (b) place or remove a child day-care
center or family day-care provider on nonreferral status.))

PART 5
TRANSFER OF POWERS, DUTIES, AND FUNCTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
department of community, trade, and economic development pertaining to
the early childhood education and assistance (ECEAP) program and the
early reading initiative are transferred to the department of early
learning. All references to the director or the department of
community, trade, and economic development in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the department of
early learning when referring to the functions transferred in this
section.
(2) All powers, duties, and functions of the division of child care
and early learning in the department of social and health services
pertaining to the working connections child care program, child care
licensing, child care quality activities, and the head start
collaboration office are transferred to the department of early
learning. However, eligibility staffing and eligibility payment
functions for the working connections child care program shall not be
transferred to the department of early learning. All references to the
secretary or the department of social and health services in the
Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or
the department of early learning when referring to the functions
transferred in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 All reports, documents, surveys, books,
records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of
social and health services, and the department of community, trade, and
economic development pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred in section 501 of this act shall be delivered to the
custody of the department of early learning. All cabinets, furniture,
office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
department of social and health services, and the department of
community, trade, and economic development in carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the
department of early learning. All funds, credits, or other assets held
in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall
be assigned to the department of early learning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 (1) Any appropriations made to the office
of the superintendent of public instruction or the department of
community, trade, and economic development for carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties transferred in section 501 of this act shall, on
the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
department of early learning;
(2) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health
services for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred to the
department of early learning through an interagency agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 (1) All employees of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the department of social and
health services, and the department of community, trade, and economic
development engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties
transferred in section 501 of this act are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the department of early learning. All employees
classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are
assigned to the department of early learning to perform their usual
duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights,
subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance
with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(2) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 (1) All rules and all pending business
before the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
department of social and health services, and the department of
community, trade, and economic development pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred in section 501 of this act shall be
continued and acted upon by the department of early learning. All
existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall
be performed by the department of early learning.
(2) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department
of social and health services, and the department of community, trade,
and economic development shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(3) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(4) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section and sections 501 through 504 of this
act, the director of financial management shall certify the
apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the
state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and
adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records
in accordance with the certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 By November 15, 2006, the department of
early learning, in collaboration with the early learning council, shall
prepare a report and make recommendations to the governor and
appropriate committees of the legislature detailing:
(1) Coordination and collaboration between the department and the
K-12 system at the state and local levels to ensure appropriate
connections and smooth transitions between early learning and K-12;
(2) Ongoing coordination and collaboration between the department
and other programs not included in the department;
(3) Ways the department will support local communities in
encouraging public-private partnerships, innovative solutions to local
issues, coordination of early learning services, and improved
transitions from early learning to kindergarten;
(4) The relationship between the department and the public-private
partnership;
(5) Internal governance of the department, to be implemented July
1, 2007, upon termination of the early learning council; and
(6) Transition of any additional early learning programs and
responsibilities, including administration of federal child care funds
and subsidy eligibility and payment functions.

PART 6
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 The following sections are each recodified
as new sections in the new chapter created in section 603 of this act:
RCW 74.13.097
RCW 74.13.098
RCW 74.13.099
RCW 74.15.063
RCW 74.15.310
RCW 74.15.320
RCW 74.15.330
RCW 74.15.340
RCW 74.15.350
RCW 28A.215.100
RCW 28A.215.110
RCW 28A.215.120
RCW 28A.215.130
RCW 28A.215.140
RCW 28A.215.150
RCW 28A.215.160
RCW 28A.215.170
RCW 28A.215.180
RCW 28A.215.190
RCW 28A.215.200
RCW 28A.215.900
RCW 28A.215.904
RCW 28A.215.906
RCW 28A.215.908

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 PART HEADINGS NOT LAW. Part headings used
in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 Sections 101 through 108, 301 through 315,
and 501 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---