BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.30920 and 2005 c 216 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that the armed forces license plate
collection has been reviewed and approved by the special license plate
review board.
(2) The department shall issue a special license plate collection,
approved by the special license plate review board and the legislature,
recognizing the contribution of veterans, active duty military
personnel, reservists, and members of the ((Washington)) national
guard. The collection includes six separate designs, each containing
a symbol representing a different branch of the armed forces to include
army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard, and ((Washington))
national guard.
(3) Armed forces special license plates may be used in lieu of
regular or personalized license plates for vehicles required to display
one and two vehicle license plates, excluding vehicles registered under
chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the
department.
(4) Upon request, the department must make available to the
purchaser, at no additional cost, a decal indicating the purchaser's
military status. The department must work with the department of
veterans affairs to establish a list of the decals to be made
available. The list of available decals must include, but is not
limited to, "veteran," "disabled veteran," "reservist," "retiree," or
"active duty." The department may specify where the decal may be
placed on the license plate. Decals are required to be made available
only for standard six-inch by twelve-inch license plates.
(5) Armed forces license plates and decals are available only to
veterans as defined in RCW 41.04.007, active duty military personnel,
reservists, members of the ((Washington)) national guard, and the
spouses of deceased veterans. Upon initial application, any purchaser
requesting an armed forces license plate and decal will be required to
show proof of eligibility by providing: A DD-214 or discharge papers
if a veteran; a military identification or retired military
identification card; or a declaration of fact attesting to the
purchaser's eligibility as required under this section.
(6) The department of veterans affairs must enter into an agreement
with the department to reimburse the department for the costs
associated with providing military status decals described in
subsection (4) of this section.
(7) Armed forces license plates are not available free of charge to
disabled veterans, former prisoners of war, or spouses of deceased
former prisoners of war under the privileges defined in RCW 73.04.110
and 73.04.115.

--- END ---