BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that instruction in
social studies, arts, health, and fitness is important to ensure a
well-rounded and complete education. In particular, the civic mission
of schools is strengthened and enhanced by comprehensive civics
education and assessments. The legislature finds that effective and
accountable democratic government depends upon an informed and engaged
citizenry, and therefore, students should learn their rights and
responsibilities as citizens, where those rights and responsibilities
come from, and how to exercise them.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.095 and 2004 c 19 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By the end of the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall
have in place in elementary schools, middle schools, and high schools
assessments or other strategies to assure that students have an
opportunity to learn the essential academic learning requirements in
social studies, the arts, and health and fitness. Social studies
includes history, geography, civics, economics, and social studies
skills. Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall
annually submit an implementation verification report to the office of
the superintendent of public instruction.
(2) Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall
require students in the fourth or fifth grades, the seventh or eighth
grades, and the eleventh or twelfth grades to each complete at least
one classroom-based assessment in civics. The civics assessment shall
be selected from a list of classroom-based assessments approved by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction. Beginning with the
2008-09 school year, school districts shall annually submit
implementation verification reports to the office of the superintendent
of public instruction documenting the use of the classroom-based
assessments in civics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of twenty-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the superintendent
of public instruction. The superintendent shall use the funds to
provide competitive grants to school districts for curriculum
alignment, development of innovative civics projects, and other
activities that support the civics assessment under this act. As a
condition of grant receipt, districts shall make the products developed
under the grant widely available as examples of best practices.

--- END ---