BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The availability and affordability of quality health care is of
critical importance to the well-being of Washington residents, yet the
cost of health care is increasing at a disproportionately high rate;
(2) These increasing costs are placing quality care beyond the
reach of a growing number of Washington citizens and contributing to
health care expenditures that strain the resources of individuals,
businesses, and public programs;
(3) Efforts by public and private purchasers to control
expenditures, and the stress these efforts place on the stability of
the health care work force and viability of health care facilities,
threaten to reduce access to quality care for all residents of the
state; and
(4) Addressing this issue demands a reasoned and constructive
discussion regarding the objectives of the state's health care system,
and a coordinated, coherent, and sustainable plan to achieve these
objectives.
It is the intent of the legislature, in establishing the blue
ribbon commission on health care cost and access, to provide a forum
for the development and implementation of long-term strategies which
assure access to secure, appropriate, and affordable care for all
Washington residents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The blue ribbon commission on health care
cost and access is established, to include the following fourteen
members:
(1) Two members from each caucus of the senate, appointed by the
president of the senate, and two members from each caucus of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(2) The governor, or her designee, who shall serve as chair of the
commission;
(3) The insurance commissioner, or his designee;
(4) The assistant secretary for health and recovery services in the
department of social and health services;
(5) The medical director of the worker's compensation program in
the department of labor and industries;
(6) The secretary of the department of health; and
(7) The administrator of the health care authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Consistent with funds appropriated
specifically for this purpose, the blue ribbon commission on health
care cost and access may hire staff or contract for professional
assistance. The office of financial management, other state agencies,
the senate, and the house of representatives shall provide staff
support upon request of the commission.
(2) The commission shall establish ad hoc technical advisory
committees as appropriate, to include representatives of business,
employee organizations, health care providers, pharmaceutical
manufacturers, public health officials, health carriers, state
agencies, health policy experts, consumer organizations, community-based regional health care organizations, the Washington health
foundation, the Washington healthcare forum, the general public, and
any others with an interest in or expertise regarding the work of the
commission. Committee members shall not be compensated or reimbursed
for related travel expenses.
(3) In the conduct of its business, the commission shall have
access to all health-related data available to state agencies by
statute. The head of each agency shall provide the commission with all
requested data or other relevant information maintained by the agency
in a timely and easy-to-comprehend manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 By December 1, 2006, the blue ribbon
commission on health care cost and access shall develop a sustainable
five-year plan to substantially improve access to affordable health
care for all Washington residents. The plan shall:
(1) Be based on explicit, measurable goals reflecting a realistic
assessment of the current status of Washington's health care system,
the medical treatment and services to which all Washington residents
should have access, and the financial and other resources available to
provide them;
(2) Identify the most significant factors contributing to
increasingly inaccessible and unaffordable health care and health care
insurance in Washington state;
(3) Include a list of strategies prioritized by their likelihood to
cost-effectively address these factors and achieve the identified
goals;
(4) Identify what must be done, by whom, and by when to assure
implementation of each of the listed strategies, including any
necessary changes in statute or administrative rule;
(5) Estimate the cost to the responsible party of implementing the
listed strategies;
(6) Build a foundation for subsequent long-term plans to assure on-going access for all Washington residents to affordable health care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---