BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that it is critical for the success of
the public school system and for the greatest achievement of each
individual pupil that all educators hold, and act upon, high
expectations for the academic achievement of every student. The
state's education reforms emphasize higher standards and performance,
not just "seat time" in school. No child should graduate from high
school with a diploma if the student is unable to read. Promoting
student from grade to grade without demonstrating appropriate
competencies does no service to our children.
(2) Beginning with the 2006-07 school year, all school boards shall
adopt a policy, or amend any existing local policy, regarding promotion
and retention of pupils.
(3) The district policy shall be adopted at a public meeting of the
school board and shall:
(a) Provide for parental notification when a pupil is identified as
being at risk of retention. This notice shall be provided as early in
the school year, and as early in their school careers, as practicable.
The policy shall provide a pupil's parent or guardian the opportunity
to consult with the teacher or teachers responsible for the decision to
promote or retain the pupil; and
(b) Indicate the manner in which opportunities for remedial
instruction are available to pupils who are recommended for retention
or who are identified as being at risk for retention.

--- END ---