BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.36.100 and 1989 c 101 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every telecommunications company shall file with the commission
and shall print and keep open to public inspection at such points as
the commission may designate, schedules showing the rates, tolls,
rentals, and charges of such companies for messages, conversations and
services rendered and equipment and facilities supplied for messages
and services to be performed within the state between each point upon
its line and all other points thereon, and between each point upon its
line and all points upon every other similar line operated or
controlled by it, and between each point on its line or upon any line
leased, operated or controlled by it and all points upon the line of
any other similar company, whenever a through service and joint rate
shall have been established or ordered between any two such points.
(2) If no joint rate covering a through service has been
established, the several companies in such through service shall file,
print and keep open to public inspection as aforesaid the separately
established rates, tolls, rentals, and charges applicable for such
through service.
(3) The schedules printed as aforesaid shall plainly state the
places between which telecommunications service, or both, will be
rendered, and shall also state separately all charges and all
privileges or facilities granted or allowed, and any rules or
regulations which may in anywise change, affect or determine any of the
aggregate of the rates, tolls, rentals or charges for the service
rendered.
(4) A schedule shall be plainly printed in large type, and a copy
thereof shall be kept by every telecommunications company readily
accessible to and for convenient inspection by the public at such
places as may be designated by the commission, which schedule shall
state the rates charged from such station to every other station on
such company's line, or on any line controlled and used by it within
the state.
(a) All or any of such schedules kept as aforesaid shall be
immediately produced by such telecommunications company upon the demand
of any person.
(b) A notice printed in bold type, and stating that such schedules
are on file and open to inspection by any person, the places where the
same are kept, and that the agent will assist such person to determine
from such schedules any rate, toll, rental, rule or regulation which is
in force shall be kept posted by every telecommunications company in a
conspicuous place in every station or office of such company.
(5) This section does not apply to telecommunications companies
classified as competitive under RCW 80.36.320 or to telecommunications
services classified as competitive under RCW 80.36.330.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.36.110 and 2003 c 189 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, unless
the commission otherwise orders, no change shall be made in any rate,
toll, rental, or charge, that was filed and published by any
telecommunications company in compliance with the requirements of RCW
80.36.100, except after notice as required in this subsection.
(a) For changes to any rate, toll, rental, or charge filed and
published in a tariff, the company shall provide thirty days' notice to
the commission and publication for thirty days as required in the case
of original schedules in RCW 80.36.100. The notice shall plainly state
the changes proposed to be made in the schedule then in force, and the
time when the changed rate, toll, or charge will go into effect, and
all proposed changes shall be shown by printing, filing and publishing
new schedules, or shall be plainly indicated upon the schedules in
force at the time and kept open to public inspection. Proposed changes
may be suspended by the commission within thirty days or before the
stated effective date of the proposed change, whichever is later.
(b) ((For changes to any rate, toll, rental, or charge filed and
published in a price list, the company shall provide ten days' notice
to the commission and customers. The commission shall prescribe the
form of notice.
(c))) The commission for good cause shown may allow changes in
rates, charges, tolls, or rentals without requiring the notice and
publication provided for in (a) ((or (b))) of this subsection, by an
order or rule specifying the change to be made and the time when it
takes effect, and the manner in which the change will be filed and
published.
(((d))) (c) When any change is made in any rate, toll, rental, or
charge, the effect of which is to increase any rate, toll, rental, or
charge then existing, attention shall be directed on the copy filed
with the commission to the increase by some character immediately
preceding or following the item in the schedule, which character shall
be in such a form as the commission may designate.
(2)(a) A telecommunications company may file a tariff that
decreases any rate, charge, rental, or toll with ten days' notice to
the commission and publication without receiving a special order from
the commission when the filing does not contain an offsetting increase
to another rate, charge, rental, or toll, and the filing company agrees
not to file for an increase to any rate, charge, rental, or toll to
recover the revenue deficit that results from the decrease for a period
of one year.
(b) A telecommunications company may file a promotional offering to
be effective, without receiving a special order from the commission,
upon filing with the commission and publication. For the purposes of
this section, "promotional offering" means a tariff ((or price list))
that, for a period of up to ninety days, waives or reduces charges or
conditions of service for existing or new subscribers for the purpose
of retaining or increasing the number of customers who subscribe to or
use a service.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.36.320 and 2003 c 189 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall classify a telecommunications company as
a competitive telecommunications company if the services it offers are
subject to effective competition. Effective competition means that the
company's customers have reasonably available alternatives and that the
company does not have a significant captive customer base. In
determining whether a company is competitive, factors the commission
shall consider include but are not limited to:
(a) The number and sizes of alternative providers of service;
(b) The extent to which services are available from alternative
providers in the relevant market;
(c) The ability of alternative providers to make functionally
equivalent or substitute services readily available at competitive
rates, terms, and conditions; and
(d) Other indicators of market power which may include market
share, growth in market share, ease of entry, and the affiliation of
providers of services.
The commission shall conduct the initial classification and any
subsequent review of the classification in accordance with such
procedures as the commission may establish by rule.
(2) Competitive telecommunications companies shall be subject to
minimal regulation. ((Minimal regulation means that competitive
telecommunications companies may file, instead of tariffs, price
lists.)) The commission may ((also)) waive ((other)) any regulatory
requirement((s)) under this title for competitive telecommunications
companies when it determines that competition will serve the same
purposes as public interest regulation. The commission may waive
different regulatory requirements for different companies if such
different treatment is in the public interest. A competitive
telecommunications company shall at a minimum:
(a) Keep its accounts according to regulations as determined by the
commission;
(b) File financial reports with the commission as required by the
commission and in a form and at times prescribed by the commission; and
(c) ((Keep on file at the commission such current price lists and
service standards as the commission may require; and
(d))) Cooperate with commission investigations of customer
complaints.
(3) ((When a telecommunications company has demonstrated that the
equal access requirements ordered by the federal district court in the
case of U.S. v. AT&T, 552 F. Supp. 131 (1982), or in supplemental
orders, have been met, the commission shall review the classification
of telecommunications companies providing inter-LATA interexchange
services. At that time, the commission shall classify all such
companies as competitive telecommunications companies unless it finds
that effective competition, as defined in subsection (1) of this
section, does not then exist.
(4))) The commission may revoke any waivers it grants and may
reclassify any competitive telecommunications company if the revocation
or reclassification would protect the public interest.
(((5))) (4) The commission may waive the requirements of RCW
80.36.170 and 80.36.180 in whole or in part for a competitive
telecommunications company if it finds that competition will serve the
same purpose and protect the public interest.

Sec. 4 RCW 80.36.330 and 2003 c 189 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may classify a telecommunications service
provided by a telecommunications company as a competitive
telecommunications service if the service is subject to effective
competition. Effective competition means that customers of the service
have reasonably available alternatives and that the service is not
provided to a significant captive customer base. In determining
whether a service is competitive, factors the commission shall consider
include but are not limited to:
(a) The number and size of alternative providers of services;
(b) The extent to which services are available from alternative
providers in the relevant market;
(c) The ability of alternative providers to make functionally
equivalent or substitute services readily available at competitive
rates, terms, and conditions; and
(d) Other indicators of market power, which may include market
share, growth in market share, ease of entry, and the affiliation of
providers of services.
(2) ((When the commission finds that a telecommunications company
has demonstrated that a telecommunications service is competitive, the
commission may permit the service to be provided under a price list.
The commission may adopt procedural rules necessary to implement this
section.)) Competitive telecommunications services are subject to
minimal regulation. The commission may waive any regulatory
requirement under this title for companies offering a competitive
telecommunications service when it determines that competition will
serve the same purposes as public interest regulation. The commission
may waive different regulatory requirements for different companies if
such different treatment is in the public interest. A company offering
a competitive telecommunications service shall at a minimum:
(a) Keep its accounts according to rules adopted by the commission;
(b) File financial reports for competitive telecommunications
services with the commission as required by the commission and in a
form and at times prescribed by the commission; and
(c) Cooperate with commission investigations of customer
complaints.
(3) Prices or rates charged for competitive telecommunications
services shall cover their cost. The commission shall determine proper
cost standards to implement this section, provided that in making any
assignment of costs or allocating any revenue requirement, the
commission shall act to preserve affordable universal
telecommunications service.
(4) The commission may investigate prices for competitive
telecommunications services upon complaint. In any complaint
proceeding initiated by the commission, the telecommunications company
providing the service shall bear the burden of proving that the prices
charged cover cost, and are fair, just, and reasonable.
(5) Telecommunications companies shall provide the commission with
all data it deems necessary to implement this section.
(6) No losses incurred by a telecommunications company in the
provision of competitive services may be recovered through rates for
noncompetitive services. The commission may order refunds or credits
to any class of subscribers to a noncompetitive telecommunications
service which has paid excessive rates because of below cost pricing of
competitive telecommunications services.
(7) The commission may reclassify any competitive
telecommunications service if reclassification would protect the public
interest.
(8) The commission may waive the requirements of RCW 80.36.170 and
80.36.180 in whole or in part for a service classified as competitive
if it finds that competition will serve the same purpose and protect
the public interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Until June 30, 2007, a telecommunications company may continue
to maintain on file with the commission any price list that, pursuant
to RCW 80.36.100, 80.36.320, and 80.36.330, was on file and in effect
before the effective date of this act. The price list is subject to
the statutes and rules in effect immediately before the effective date
of this act.
(2) The commission may, upon petition by a company with a price
list on file before the effective date of this act, extend the deadline
in subsection (1) of this section until June 30, 2008. The commission
may approve an extension only if the petitioning company demonstrates
that it cannot reasonably implement a replacement for its price list by
June 30, 2007, and that the extension of time will not result in harm
to customers or competition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
Each company withdrawing a filed price list shall provide each
customer receiving service under the price list with information about
the rates, terms, and conditions under which the service will continue
to be provided. If the rates, terms, and conditions do not change upon
withdrawal of the price list, such rates, terms, and conditions shall
be binding to the same extent as the price list. If any of the rates,
terms, and conditions do change upon withdrawal of the price list, the
company must provide each customer with a reasonable opportunity to
decide whether to accept the changed rate, term, or condition. If a
customer does not cancel service within thirty days after notice of the
change is given, the customer will be deemed to have accepted all the
rates, terms, and conditions offered by the company.

--- END ---