BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in the 2006-07 school year, the superintendent of
public instruction shall implement three objective alternative
assessment methods as provided in this section for students to
demonstrate achievement of the state standards in content areas in
which the student has not yet met the standard on the high school
Washington assessment of student learning. A student may access any
alternative if the student meets applicable eligibility criteria in RCW
28A.655.061 and any other eligibility criteria established by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "applicant" means a student
seeking to use one of the alternative assessment methods in this
section.
(3) The alternative assessment methods shall include:
(a) A combination of the applicant's grades in applicable courses
and the applicant's highest score on the high school Washington
assessment of student learning, as provided in this subsection.
(i) Using guidelines prepared by the superintendent of public
instruction, a school district shall identify the group of students in
the same school as the applicant who took the same high school courses
as the applicant in the applicable content area. From the group of
students identified in this manner, the district shall select the
comparison cohort that shall be those students who met or slightly
exceeded the state standard on the Washington assessment of student
learning.
(ii) The district shall compare the applicant's grades in high
school courses in the applicable content area to the grades of students
in the comparison cohort for the same high school courses. If the
applicant's grades are equal to or above the mean grades of the
comparison cohort, the applicant shall be deemed to have met the state
standard on the alternative assessment.
(iii) An applicant may not use the alternative assessment under
this subsection (3)(a) if there are fewer than six students in the
comparison cohort.
(b) An evaluation of a collection of work samples prepared and
submitted by the applicant, as provided in this subsection, and for
career and technical applicants, the additional requirements of (c) of
this subsection.
(i) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
guidelines for the types and number of work samples in each content
area that may be submitted as a collection to evidence that the
applicant has met the state standard in that content area. Work
samples may be collected from academic, career and technical, or
remedial courses and may include performance tasks as well as written
products.
(ii) The superintendent shall develop protocols for submission of
the collection of work samples that include affidavits from the
applicant's teachers and school district that the samples are the work
of the applicant and a requirement that a portion of the samples be
prepared under the direct supervision of a classroom teacher.
(iii) The superintendent shall develop uniform scoring criteria for
evaluating the collection of work samples. Collections shall be scored
at the state level or regionally by a panel of educators selected and
trained by the superintendent to ensure objectivity, reliability, and
rigor in the evaluation. An educator may not score work samples
submitted by applicants from the educator's school district. If the
panel awards an applicant's collection of work samples the minimum
required score, the applicant shall be deemed to have met the state
standard on the alternative assessment.
(c) An evaluation of a collection of work samples prepared and
submitted by an applicant who is enrolled in a career and technical
education program approved under section 2 of this act, as provided in
this subsection (3)(c) and (b) of this subsection. To meet the state
standard on the alternative assessment under this subsection (3)(c), an
applicant must also attain the state or nationally recognized
certificate or credential associated with the approved career and
technical program. The superintendent of public instruction shall
develop guidelines for the collection of work samples that evidences
that the collection:
(i) Is relevant to the student's particular career and technical
program;
(ii) Focuses on the application of academic knowledge and skills
within the program;
(iii) Includes completed activities or projects where demonstration
of academic knowledge is inferred; and
(iv) Is related to the essential academic learning requirements and
state standards that students must meet to earn a certificate of
academic achievement or certificate of individual achievement, but also
represents the knowledge and skills that successful individuals in the
career and technical field of the approved program are expected to
possess.
(4) In developing the work samples for subsection (3)(c) of this
section, the superintendent shall consult with community and technical
colleges, employers, the work force training and education coordinating
board, apprenticeship programs, and other regional and national experts
in career and technical education to create an appropriate collection
of work samples and other evidence of a career and technical student's
knowledge and skills on the state academic standards.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall implement:
(a) By June 1, 2006, a process for students to appeal the score
they received on the high school assessments; and
(b) By January 1, 2007, guidelines and appeal processes for waiving
specific requirements in RCW 28A.655.061 pertaining to the certificate
of academic achievement and to the certificate of individual
achievement for students who:
(i) Transfer to a Washington public school in their junior or
senior year with the intent of obtaining a public high school diploma;
or
(ii) Have special, unavoidable circumstances.
(6)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall study the
feasibility of using existing mathematics assessments in languages
other than English as an additional alternative assessment option. The
study shall include an estimation of the cost of translating the tenth
grade mathematics assessment into other languages and scoring the
assessments should they be implemented.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall begin
development of an additional alternative assessment option for
mathematics that: Presents the mathematics essential learnings in
segments for assessment; is comparable in content and rigor to the
tenth grade mathematics assessment when all segments are considered
together; is reliable and valid; and can be used to determine a
student's academic performance level.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to
implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28C.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall develop a list of
approved career and technical education programs that qualify for the
objective alternative assessment for career and technical students
developed under section 1 of this act. Programs on the list must meet
the following minimum criteria:
(1) Lead to a certificate or credential that is state or nationally
recognized by trades, industries, or other professional associations as
necessary for employment or advancement in that field;
(2) Require a sequenced progression of multiple courses, both
exploratory and preparatory, that are vocationally intensive and
rigorous; and
(3) Have a high potential for providing the program completer with
gainful employment or entry into a postsecondary work force training
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the high school graduating class of 2008, a
certificate of academic progress shall be available to students who
have completed all state and local requirements for high school
graduation except obtaining a certificate of academic achievement under
RCW 28A.655.061 or a certificate of individual achievement under RCW
28A.155.045. The certificate of academic progress is not the
equivalent of a high school diploma, but enables students to
participate in commencement ceremonies upon meeting the criteria in
this section.
(2) To be eligible for a certificate of academic progress, a
student must:
(a) Pass all state and local high school graduation requirements
except for obtaining a certificate of academic achievement or a
certificate of individual achievement and must have taken at least one
retake;
(b) Maintain at least a ninety percent attendance level during the
senior year of high school, however the school district superintendent
may waive this requirement upon the student providing documentation of
circumstances such as illness that warrant waiving this requirement;
and
(c) Meet with counselors, teachers, and parents, as appropriate, to
update the student's high school and beyond plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 By January 2007, the superintendent of
public instruction shall report the following, in detail, to the
education committees of the legislature:
(1) The guidelines, protocols, and procedures used by the
superintendent in implementing the alternative assessments,
particularly the collection of evidence;
(2) A description of the training to be provided for school
districts, educators serving on scoring panels, and teachers assisting
students with collections of work samples;
(3) Updated data on the number of students using or likely to be
eligible to use the alternative assessment methods; and
(4) The results of the study in section 1(6)(a) of this act and the
development status of the additional assessment option in section
1(6)(b) of this act.

--- END ---