BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the current
community supervision of sex offenders could be enhanced if the
whereabouts of these offenders could be ascertained twenty-four hours
a day. The legislature further finds that electronic monitoring with
global positioning capability would very significantly enhance the
supervision of sex offenders who do not have permanent addresses. The
legislature intends to require the use of electronic monitoring with
global positioning capability to supervise the most dangerous sex
offenders, if an offender is released back into the community.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.712 and 2005 c 436 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender who is not a persistent offender shall be sentenced
under this section if the offender:
(a) Is convicted of:
(i) Rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape of a
child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion;
(ii) Any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual
motivation: Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the
second degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second
degree, assault of a child in the first degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or
(iii) An attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection
(1)(a);
committed on or after September 1, 2001; or
(b) Has a prior conviction for an offense listed in RCW
9.94A.030(33)(b), and is convicted of any sex offense which was
committed after September 1, 2001.
For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), failure to register is not
a sex offense.
(2) An offender convicted of rape of a child in the first or second
degree or child molestation in the first degree who was seventeen years
of age or younger at the time of the offense shall not be sentenced
under this section.
(3) Upon a finding that the offender is subject to sentencing under
this section, the court shall impose a sentence to a maximum term
consisting of the statutory maximum sentence for the offense and a
minimum term either within the standard sentence range for the offense,
or outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW 9.94A.535, if
the offender is otherwise eligible for such a sentence.
(4) A person sentenced under subsection (3) of this section shall
serve the sentence in a facility or institution operated, or utilized
under contract, by the state.
(5) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department under this section, the court shall, in addition to the
other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody
under the supervision of the department and the authority of the board
for any period of time the person is released from total confinement
before the expiration of the maximum sentence.
(6)(a)(i) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions
of community custody shall include those provided for in RCW
9.94A.700(4). The conditions may also include those provided for in
RCW 9.94A.700(5). The court may also order the offender to participate
in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct
reasonably related to the circumstances of the offense, the offender's
risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community, and the department
and the board shall enforce such conditions pursuant to RCW 9.94A.713,
9.95.425, and 9.95.430.
(ii) If the offense that caused the offender to be sentenced under
this section was an offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section
and the victim of the offense was under eighteen years of age at the
time of the offense, the court shall, as a condition of community
custody, prohibit the offender from residing in a community protection
zone.
(iii) The conditions of community custody shall include active
electronic monitoring that identifies the offender's location and
timely reports or records the offender's presence near or within a
crime scene or in a prohibited area, or the offender's departure from
specified geographic limitations. This condition shall not be waived
by the court.
(b) As part of any sentence under this section, the court shall
also require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the
board under RCW 9.94A.713 and 9.95.420 through 9.95.435.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.712 and 2004 c 176 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender who is not a persistent offender shall be sentenced
under this section if the offender:
(a) Is convicted of:
(i) Rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape of a
child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion;
(ii) Any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual
motivation: Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the
second degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second
degree, assault of a child in the first degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or
(iii) An attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection
(1)(a);
committed on or after September 1, 2001; or
(b) Has a prior conviction for an offense listed in RCW
9.94A.030(32)(b), and is convicted of any sex offense which was
committed after September 1, 2001.
For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), failure to register is not
a sex offense.
(2) An offender convicted of rape of a child in the first or second
degree or child molestation in the first degree who was seventeen years
of age or younger at the time of the offense shall not be sentenced
under this section.
(3) Upon a finding that the offender is subject to sentencing under
this section, the court shall impose a sentence to a maximum term
consisting of the statutory maximum sentence for the offense and a
minimum term either within the standard sentence range for the offense,
or outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW 9.94A.535, if
the offender is otherwise eligible for such a sentence.
(4) A person sentenced under subsection (3) of this section shall
serve the sentence in a facility or institution operated, or utilized
under contract, by the state.
(5) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department under this section, the court shall, in addition to the
other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody
under the supervision of the department and the authority of the board
for any period of time the person is released from total confinement
before the expiration of the maximum sentence.
(6)(a) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions of
community custody shall include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4).
The conditions may also include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(5).
The court may also order the offender to participate in rehabilitative
programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct reasonably related to
the circumstances of the offense, the offender's risk of reoffending,
or the safety of the community, and the department and the board shall
enforce such conditions pursuant to RCW 9.94A.713, 9.95.425, and
9.95.430.
(b) The conditions of community custody shall include active
electronic monitoring that identifies the offender's location and
timely reports or records the offender's presence near or within a
crime scene or in a prohibited area, or the offender's departure from
specified geographic limitations. This condition shall not be waived
by the court.
(c) As part of any sentence under this section, the court shall
also require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the
board under RCW 9.94A.713 and 9.95.420 through 9.95.435.

Sec. 4 RCW 9A.76.120 and 2001 c 287 s 2 and 2001 c 264 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of escape in the second degree if:
(a) He or she knowingly escapes from a detention facility; or
(b) Having been charged with a felony or an equivalent juvenile
offense, he or she knowingly escapes from custody; ((or))
(c) Having been committed under chapter 10.77 RCW for a sex,
violent, or felony harassment offense and being under an order of
conditional release, he or she knowingly leaves or remains absent from
the state of Washington without prior court authorization; or
(d) He or she intentionally alters, tampers with, damages or
destroys any electronic monitoring equipment ordered under RCW
9.94A.712, unless the person is the owner of the equipment, or an agent
of the owner, performing ordinary maintenance and repairs.
(2) It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this
section that uncontrollable circumstances prevented the person from
remaining in custody or in the detention facility or from returning to
custody or to the detention facility, and that the person did not
contribute to the creation of such circumstances in reckless disregard
of the requirement to remain or return, and that the person returned to
custody or the detention facility as soon as such circumstances ceased
to exist.
(3) Escape in the second degree is a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

--- END ---