BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.15.400 and 2001 c 253 s 41 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of wild birds in the
second degree if the person:
(a) Hunts for, takes, or possesses a wild bird and the person does
not have and possess all licenses, tags, stamps, and permits required
under this title;
(b) Maliciously destroys, takes, or harms the eggs or nests of a
wild bird except when authorized by permit;
(c) Violates any rule of the commission or director regarding
seasons, bag or possession limits but less than two times the bag or
possession limit, closed areas, closed times, or other rule addressing
the manner or method of hunting or possession of wild birds; or
(d) Possesses a wild bird taken during a closed season for that
wild bird or taken from a closed area for that wild bird.
(2) A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of wild birds in the
first degree if the person takes or possesses two times or more than
the possession or bag limit for wild birds allowed by rule of the
commission or director.
(3)(a) Unlawful hunting of wild birds in the second degree is a
misdemeanor.
(b) Unlawful hunting of wild birds in the first degree is a gross
misdemeanor.
(4) In addition to the criminal penalties set forth in this
section, if a person violates a rule requiring the use of nontoxic shot
to hunt waterfowl, upon conviction:
(a) The court shall require a payment of one thousand dollars as a
criminal wildlife penalty assessment that must be paid to the clerk of
the court and distributed to the state treasurer for deposit in the
fish and wildlife enforcement reward account. The criminal wildlife
penalty assessment must be imposed regardless of and in addition to any
sentence, fine, or costs imposed for violating this section. The
criminal wildlife penalty assessment must be included by the court in
any pronouncement of sentence and may not be suspended, waived,
modified, or deferred in any respect; and
(b) The department shall revoke the hunting license of the person
and order a suspension of small game hunting privileges for two years.

--- END ---