BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that it is in the public interest of the
state to encourage and facilitate the formation of cooperative
relationships between business and labor and educational institutions
that provide for the development and expansion of programs of
educational skills training consistent with employment needs.
(2) Further, the legislature finds that it is in the state's
interest to make students aware of the educational training programs
and career employment possibilities.
(3) Therefore, the following shall be implemented to expand
opportunities for secondary school students to prepare for technical
careers and related apprenticeships:
(a) Centers of excellence and other colleges with a high density of
apprenticeship programs shall act as brokers of relevant information
and resources as provided for in section 2 of this act;
(b) An educational outreach program coordinated by the Washington
state apprenticeship and training council as provided for in section 3
of this act; and
(c) The development of direct-entry programs for graduating
secondary students, approved and overseen by the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council as provided for in section 4 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Centers of excellence, as designated by the state board for
community and technical colleges, and other colleges with a high
density of apprenticeship programs, shall act as a broker of
information and resources on available grants, scholarship
opportunities, job openings, and industries of growth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state apprenticeship and training council, in
conjunction with individual state-approved apprenticeship training
programs, shall lead and coordinate an educational outreach program for
middle and secondary school students and educators about apprenticeship
and career opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state apprenticeship and training council shall
approve and oversee direct-entry programs for graduating secondary
students into building and construction-related apprenticeships by:
(1) Assisting individual school districts in using and leveraging
existing resources;
(2) Developing guidelines with input from apprenticeship
coordinators, the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
the state board for community and technical colleges, the work force
training and education coordinating board, the governor's policy
office, and other interested stakeholders for direct-entry programs;
and
(3) Awarding ten incentive grants to school districts statewide
solely for personnel to negotiate and implement agreements with local
apprenticeships based upon state apprenticeship use requirements, as
described in RCW 39.04.320, to accept graduating secondary school
students with appropriate training into apprenticeship programs.

--- END ---