BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.120 and 2003 c 168 s 604 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) "To manufacture" embraces all activities of a commercial or
industrial nature wherein labor or skill is applied, by hand or
machinery, to materials so that as a result thereof a new, different or
useful substance or article of tangible personal property is produced
for sale or commercial or industrial use, and shall include: (((1)))
(a) The production or fabrication of special made or custom made
articles; (((2))) (b) the production or fabrication of dental
appliances, devices, restorations, substitutes, or other dental
laboratory products by a dental laboratory or dental technician;
(((3))) (c) cutting, delimbing, and measuring of felled, cut, or taken
trees; and (((4))) (d) crushing and/or blending of rock, sand, stone,
gravel, or ore.
(2) "To manufacture" shall not include: (a) Conditioning of seed
for use in planting; (b) cubing hay or alfalfa; (c) activities which
consist of cutting, grading, or ice glazing seafood which has been
cooked, frozen, or canned outside this state; (d) the growing,
harvesting, or producing of agricultural products; (e) packing of
agricultural products, including sorting, washing, rinsing, grading,
waxing, treating with fungicide, packaging, chilling, or placing in
controlled atmospheric storage; ((or)) (f) the production of computer
software if the computer software is delivered from the seller to the
purchaser by means other than tangible storage media, including the
delivery by use of a tangible storage media where the tangible storage
media is not physically transferred to the purchaser; or (g) the custom
blending of dry fertilizer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to the custom blending of dry
fertilizer. The exemption provided by this section does not apply to
the sale of custom blended dry fertilizer.
(2) As used in this section and RCW 82.04.120, "custom blending of
dry fertilizer" means blending dry fertilizer according to
specifications furnished by the customer prior to blending.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies prospectively only and not
retroactively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act does not affect any existing right
acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the section amended
in this act or under any rule or order adopted under those sections,
nor does it affect any proceeding instituted under those sections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
April 1, 2006.

--- END ---