BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person to:
(a) Grant or award a false academic credential or offer to grant or
award a false academic credential in violation of this section;
(b) Represent that a credit earned or granted by the person, in
violation of this section, can be applied toward a credential offered
by another person; or
(c) Solicit another person to seek a credential or to earn a credit
that is offered in violation of this section.
(2) "False academic credential" has the same definition as in
section 2 of this act.
(3) A violation of this section constitutes an unfair or deceptive
act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce under chapter 19.86
RCW.
(4) In addition to any other venue authorized by law, venue for the
prosecution of an offense under this section is in the county in which
an element of the offense occurs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of issuing a false academic credential if
the person knowingly:
(a) Grants or awards a false academic credential or offers to grant
or award a false academic credential in violation of this section;
(b) Represents that a credit earned or granted by the person in
violation of this section can be applied toward a credential offered by
another person;
(c) Grants or offers to grant a credit for which a representation
as described in (b) of this subsection is made; or
(d) Solicits another person to seek a credential or to earn a
credit the person knows is offered in violation of this section.
(2) A person is guilty of knowingly using a false academic
credential if the person knowingly uses a false academic credential or
falsely claims to have a credential issued by an institution of higher
education that is accredited by an accrediting association recognized
as such by rule of the higher education coordinating board:
(a) In a written or oral advertisement or other promotion of a
business; or
(b) With the intent to:
(i) Obtain employment;
(ii) Obtain a license or certificate to practice a trade,
profession, or occupation;
(iii) Obtain a promotion, compensation or other benefit, or an
increase in compensation or other benefit, in employment or in the
practice of a trade, profession, or occupation;
(iv) Obtain admission to an educational program in this state; or
(v) Gain a position in government with authority over another
person, regardless of whether the person receives compensation for the
position.
(3) "False academic credential" means a document that provides
evidence or demonstrates completion of an academic or professional
course of instruction beyond the secondary level that results in the
attainment of an academic certificate, degree, or rank, and that is not
issued by a person or entity that: (a) Is an entity accredited by an
agency recognized as such by rule of the higher education coordinating
board or has the international equivalents of such accreditation; or
(b) is an entity authorized as a degree-granting institution by the
higher education coordinating board; or (c) is an entity exempt from
the requirements of authorization as a degree-granting institution by
the higher education coordinating board; or (d) is an entity that has
been granted a waiver by the higher education coordinating board from
the requirements of authorization by the board; or (e) is a foreign
degree-granting institution, as defined by chapter 28B.90 RCW. Such
documents include, but are not limited to, academic certificates,
degrees, coursework, degree credits, transcripts, or certification of
completion of a degree.
(4) Issuing a false academic credential is a class C felony.
(5) Knowingly using a false academic credential is a class C
felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
A person who issues or uses a false academic credential is subject
to sections 1 and 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who issues or uses a false academic credential is subject
to sections 1 and 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who issues or uses a false academic credential is subject
to sections 1 and 2 of this act.

--- END ---