BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As a component of basic academic skills education, the
department shall create, by rule, a program to provide offenders who
are United States citizens with the opportunity to participate in
programs designed to educate offenders on American citizenship and
civil rights. The program shall include, but not be limited to, the
following topics:
(a) Responsible citizenship;
(b) Rights lost to felony offenders and restoration, including gun
ownership and possession;
(c) Voting laws and felony voting rights restoration;
(d) Legal financial obligations;
(e) Sex offender registration and community notification; and
(f) Civic participation, including participation in local, state,
and federal government processes, school boards, neighborhood
organizations, and nonprofit or volunteer organizations.
(2) Upon satisfactory completion of a program, the department shall
issue a certificate of completion to an offender.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall provide to offenders, before release into
the community, information regarding community service providers that
provide educational services to offenders.
(2) The department shall work in collaboration with community
service providers that provide educational services to offenders to
develop a standard curriculum for education of offenders released into
the community.

--- END ---