BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.06.022 and 2005 c 511 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A seller of real property ((located within one mile of the property
boundary of a farm or farm operation)) shall make available to the
buyer the following statement: "This notice is to inform ((prospective
residents)) you that the real property ((they)) you are ((about to
acquire lies within one mile of the property boundary of a farm))
considering for purchase may lie in close proximity to a farm. The
operation of a farm ((may generate)) involves the usual and ((ordinary
noise, dust, odors, and other associated conditions, and these
practices)) customary agricultural practices, which are protected
((by)) under RCW 7.48.305, the Washington right to farm act."

--- END ---