BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.008 and 2005 c 243 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this title:
(1) "Ballot" means, as the context implies, either:
(a) The issues and offices to be voted upon in a jurisdiction or
portion of a jurisdiction at a particular primary, general election, or
special election;
(b) A facsimile of the contents of a particular ballot whether
printed on a paper ballot or ballot card or as part of a voting machine
or voting device;
(c) A physical or electronic record of the choices of an individual
voter in a particular primary, general election, or special election;
or
(d) The physical document on which the voter's choices are to be
recorded;
(2) "Paper ballot" means a piece of paper on which the ballot for
a particular election or primary has been printed, on which a voter may
record his or her choices for any candidate or for or against any
measure, and that is to be tabulated manually;
(3) "Ballot card" means any type of card or piece of paper of any
size on which a voter may record his or her choices for any candidate
and for or against any measure and that is to be tabulated on a vote
tallying system;
(4) "Sample ballot" means a printed facsimile of all the issues and
offices on the ballot in a jurisdiction and is intended to give voters
notice of the issues, offices, and candidates that are to be voted on
at a particular primary, general election, or special election;
(5) "Provisional ballot" means a ballot issued to a voter
requesting a replacement absentee or mail ballot or a ballot issued at
the polling place on election day by the precinct election board to a
voter who would otherwise be denied an opportunity to vote a regular
ballot, for any reason authorized by the Help America Vote Act,
including but not limited to the following:
(a) The voter's name does not appear in the poll book but the voter
claims to be registered in the precinct in which the person wishes to
vote;
(b) There is an indication in the poll book that the voter has
requested an absentee ballot, but the voter wishes to vote at the
polling place;
(c) There is a question on the part of the voter concerning the
issues or candidates on which the voter is qualified to vote;
(d) Any other reason allowed by law;
(6) "Party ballot" means a primary election ballot specific to a
particular major political party that lists all partisan offices to be
voted on at that primary, and the candidates for those offices who
affiliate with that same major political party;
(7) "Nonpartisan ballot" means a primary election ballot that lists
all nonpartisan races and ballot measures to be voted on at that
primary.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.04.530 and 2005 c 243 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall:
(1) Establish and operate, or provide by contract, training and
certification programs for state and county elections administration
officials and personnel, including training on the various types of
election law violations and discrimination, and training programs for
political party observers which conform to the rules for such programs
established under RCW 29A.04.630;
(2) Establish uniform guidelines, in consultation with state and
local law enforcement or certified document examiners, for signature
verification processes. All election personnel assigned to verify
signatures must receive training and be certified by the secretary of
state on the uniform guidelines;
(3) Administer tests for state and county officials and personnel
who have received such training and issue certificates to those who
have successfully completed the training and passed such tests;
(4) Maintain a record of those individuals who have received such
training and certificates; and
(5) Provide the staffing and support services required by the board
created under RCW 29A.04.510.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.04.611 and 2004 c 271 s 151 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state as chief election officer shall make
reasonable rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW not inconsistent
with the federal and state election laws to effectuate any provision of
this title and to facilitate the execution of its provisions in an
orderly, timely, and uniform manner relating to any federal, state,
county, city, town, and district elections. To that end the secretary
shall assist local election officers by devising uniform forms and
procedures.
In addition to the rule-making authority granted otherwise by this
section, the secretary of state shall make rules governing the
following provisions:
(1) The maintenance of voter registration records;
(2) The preparation, maintenance, distribution, review, and filing
of precinct maps;
(3) Standards for the design, layout, and production of ballots;
(4) The examination and testing of voting systems for
certification;
(5) The source and scope of independent evaluations of voting
systems that may be relied upon in certifying voting systems for use in
this state;
(6) Standards and procedures for the acceptance testing of voting
systems by counties;
(7) Standards and procedures for testing the programming of vote
tallying software for specific primaries and elections;
(8) Standards and procedures for the preparation and use of each
type of certified voting system including procedures for the operation
of counting centers where vote tallying systems are used;
(9) Standards and procedures to ensure the accurate tabulation and
canvassing of ballots;
(10) Consistency among the counties of the state in the preparation
of ballots, the operation of vote tallying systems, and the canvassing
of primaries and elections;
(11) Procedures to ensure the secrecy of a voter's ballot when a
small number of ballots are counted at the polls or at a counting
center;
(12) The use of substitute devices or means of voting when a voting
device at the polling place is found to be defective, the counting of
votes cast on the defective device, the counting of votes cast on the
substitute device, and the documentation that must be submitted to the
county auditor regarding such circumstances;
(13) Procedures for the transportation of sealed containers of
voted ballots or sealed voting devices;
(14) The acceptance and filing of documents via electronic
facsimile;
(15) Voter registration applications and records;
(16) The use of voter registration information in the conduct of
elections;
(17) The coordination, delivery, and processing of voter
registration records accepted by driver licensing agents or the
department of licensing;
(18) The coordination, delivery, and processing of voter
registration records accepted by agencies designated by the governor to
provide voter registration services;
(19) Procedures to receive and distribute voter registration
applications by mail;
(20) Procedures for a voter to change his or her voter registration
address within a county by telephone;
(21) Procedures for a voter to change the name under which he or
she is registered to vote;
(22) Procedures for canceling dual voter registration records and
for maintaining records of persons whose voter registrations have been
canceled;
(23) Procedures for the electronic transfer of voter registration
records between county auditors and the office of the secretary of
state;
(24) Procedures and forms for declarations of candidacy;
(25) Procedures and requirements for the acceptance and filing of
declarations of candidacy by electronic means;
(26) Procedures for the circumstance in which two or more
candidates have a name similar in sound or spelling so as to cause
confusion for the voter;
(27) Filing for office;
(28) The order of positions and offices on a ballot;
(29) Sample ballots;
(30) Independent evaluations of voting systems;
(31) The testing, approval, and certification of voting systems;
(32) The testing of vote tallying software programming;
(33) Standards and procedures to prevent fraud and to facilitate
the accurate processing and canvassing of absentee ballots and mail
ballots;
(34) Standards and procedures to guarantee the secrecy of absentee
ballots and mail ballots;
(35) Uniformity among the counties of the state in the conduct of
absentee voting and mail ballot elections;
(36) Standards and procedures to accommodate out-of-state voters,
overseas voters, and service voters. Uniformed service voters must be
able to submit a federal write-in absentee ballot and override that
ballot at a later time by submitting a state absentee ballot;
(37) The tabulation of paper ballots before the close of the polls;
(38) The accessibility of polling places and registration
facilities that are accessible to elderly and disabled persons;
(39) The aggregation of precinct results if reporting the results
of a single precinct could jeopardize the secrecy of a person's ballot;
(40) Procedures for conducting a statutory recount;
(41) Procedures for filling vacancies in congressional offices if
the general statutory time requirements for availability of absentee
ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures cannot be
met;
(42) Procedures for the statistical sampling of signatures for
purposes of verifying and canvassing signatures on initiative,
referendum, and recall election petitions;
(43) Standards and deadlines for submitting material to the office
of the secretary of state for the voters' pamphlet;
(44) Deadlines for the filing of ballot titles for referendum bills
and constitutional amendments if none have been provided by the
legislature;
(45) Procedures for the publication of a state voters' pamphlet;
(46) Procedures for conducting special elections regarding nuclear
waste sites if the general statutory time requirements for availability
of absentee ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures
cannot be met;
(47) Procedures for conducting partisan primary elections;
(48) Standards and procedures for the proper conduct of voting
during the early voting period to provide accessability for the blind
or visually impaired;
(49) Standards for voting technology and systems used by the state
or any political subdivision to be accessible for individuals with
disabilities, including nonvisual accessibility for the blind and
visually impaired, in a manner that provides the same opportunity for
access and participation, including privacy and independence, as other
voters;
(50) All data formats for transferring voter registration data on
electronic or machine-readable media for the purpose of administering
the statewide voter registration list required by the Help America Vote
Act (P.L. 107-252);
(51) Defining the interaction of electronic voter registration
election management systems employed by each county auditor to maintain
a local copy of each county's portion of the official state list of
registered voters;
(52) Provisions and procedures to implement the state-based
administrative complaint procedure as required by the Help America Vote
Act (P.L. 107-252); and
(53) Facilitating the payment of local government grants to local
government election officers or vendors.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.40.050 and 2003 c 111 s 1005 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, county auditors shall provide
special absentee ballots to be used for state primary or state general
elections. An auditor shall provide a special absentee ballot only to
a registered voter who completes an application stating that she or he
will be unable to vote and return a regular absentee ballot by normal
mail delivery within the period provided for regular absentee ballots.
The application for a special absentee ballot may not be filed and
may not be accepted by the auditor's office earlier than ninety days
before the applicable state primary or general election. The special
absentee ballot will list the offices and measures, if known, scheduled
to appear on the state primary or general election ballot. The voter
may use the special absentee ballot to write in the name of any
eligible candidate for each office and vote on any measure.
(2) With any special absentee ballot issued under this section, the
county auditor shall include a listing of any candidates who have
((filed)) met the filing requirements of chapter 29A.24 RCW before the
time of the application for offices that will appear on the ballot at
that primary or election and a list of any issues that have been
referred to the ballot before the time of the application.
(3) Write-in votes on special absentee ballots must be counted in
the same manner provided by law for the counting of other write-in
votes. The county auditor shall process and canvass the special
absentee ballots provided under this section in the same manner as
other absentee ballots under this chapter and chapter 29A.60 RCW.
(4) A voter who requests a special absentee ballot under this
section may also request an absentee ballot under RCW 29A.40.020(4).
If the regular absentee ballot is properly voted and returned, the
special absentee ballot is void, and the county auditor shall reject it
in whole when special absentee ballots are canvassed.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.40.061 and 2004 c 271 s 134 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county auditor shall issue an absentee ballot for the
primary or election for which it was requested, or for the next
occurring primary or election when ongoing absentee status has been
requested if the information contained in a request for an absentee
ballot or ongoing absentee status received by the county auditor is
complete and correct and the applicant is qualified to vote under
federal or state law. ((Otherwise,)) If the information is not
complete, the request cannot be accepted even if enough time remains
for the applicant to supply the needed information in time to vote in
the next election. The county auditor shall notify the applicant of
the reason or reasons why the request cannot be accepted. Whenever two
or more candidates have filed for the position of precinct committee
officer for the same party in the same precinct, the contest for that
position must be presented to absentee voters from that precinct by
either including the contest on the regular absentee ballot or a
separate absentee ballot. The ballot must provide space designated for
writing in the name of additional candidates.
(2) A registered voter may obtain a replacement ballot if the
absentee ballot is destroyed, spoiled, lost, or not received by the
voter. For the purposes of this subsection, replacement ballot means
provisional ballot. The voter may obtain the replacement ballot by
telephone request, by mail, electronically, or in person. The county
auditor shall keep a record of each replacement ballot provided under
this subsection.
(3) A copy of the state voters' pamphlet must be sent to registered
voters temporarily outside the state, out-of-state voters, overseas
voters, and service voters along with the absentee ballot if such a
pamphlet has been prepared for the primary or election and is available
to the county auditor at the time of mailing. The county auditor shall
mail all absentee ballots and related material to voters outside the
territorial limits of the United States and the District of Columbia
under 39 U.S.C. 3406.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.40.080 and 2003 c 111 s 1008 are each amended to
read as follows:
The delivery of an absentee ballot for any primary or election
shall be subject to the following qualifications:
(1) Only the registered voter personally, or a member of the
registered voter's immediate family may pick up an absentee ballot for
the voter at the office of the issuing officer unless the voter is a
resident of a health care facility, as defined by RCW 70.37.020(3), on
election day and applies by messenger for an absentee ballot. In this
latter case, the messenger may pick up the voter's absentee ballot but
may not return the voted ballot to the county auditor's office.
(2) Except as noted in subsection (1) of this section, the issuing
officer shall mail or deliver the absentee ballot directly to each
applicant.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.40.110 and 2005 c 243 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The opening and subsequent processing of return envelopes for
any primary or election may begin upon receipt. The tabulation of
absentee ballots must not commence until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of
the primary or election. If a voter returns voting responses by mail
on a form other than the ballot sent by the county auditor, his or her
voting responses may not be tabulated.
(2) All received absentee return envelopes must be placed in secure
locations from the time of delivery to the county auditor until their
subsequent opening. After opening the return envelopes, the county
canvassing board shall place all of the ballots in secure storage until
after 8:00 p.m. of the day of the primary or election. Absentee
ballots that are to be tabulated on an electronic vote tallying system
may be taken from the inner envelopes and all the normal procedural
steps may be performed to prepare these ballots for tabulation.
(3) Before opening a returned absentee ballot, the canvassing
board, or its designated representatives, shall examine the postmark,
statement, and signature on the return envelope that contains the
security envelope and absentee ballot. They shall verify that the
voter's signature on the return envelope is the same as the signature
of that voter in the registration files of the county. For registered
voters casting absentee ballots, the date on the return envelope to
which the voter has attested determines the validity, as to the time of
voting for that absentee ballot if the postmark is missing or is
illegible. For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service
voters stationed in the United States, the date on the return envelope
to which the voter has attested determines the validity as to the time
of voting for that absentee ballot. For any absentee ballot, a
variation between the signature of the voter on the return envelope and
the signature of that voter in the registration files due to the
substitution of initials or the use of common nicknames is permitted so
long as the surname and handwriting are clearly the same.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.40.150 and 2005 c 245 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall produce and furnish envelopes and
instructions for out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service
voters to the county auditors. The information on the envelopes or
instructions must explain that:
(1) For overseas and service voters, return postage is free if the
ballot is mailed through the United States postal service, United
States armed forces postal service, or the postal service of a United
States foreign embassy;
(2) The date of the signature is considered the date of mailing;
(3) The envelope must be signed by election day;
(4) The signed declaration on the envelope is the equivalent of
voter registration;
(5) A voter may fax a voted ballot and the accompanying envelope if
the voter agrees to waive secrecy. The ballot will be counted if the
original documents are received before certification of the election;
and
(6) A voter may obtain a ballot via electronic mail, which the
voter may print out, vote, and return by mail. In order to facilitate
the electronic acquisition of ballots by out-of-state, overseas, and
service voters, the ballot instructions shall include the web site of
the office of the secretary of state.

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.44.020 and 2003 c 111 s 1102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) At any election, general or special, or at any primary, any
political party or committee may designate a person other than a
precinct election officer, for each polling place to check a list of
registered voters of the precinct to determine who has and who has not
voted. The lists must be furnished by the party or committee
concerned.
(2) Activities under this section do not constitute get-out-the-vote campaigns.

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.44.090 and 2003 c 111 s 1109 are each amended to
read as follows:
A registered voter shall not be allowed to vote in the precinct in
which he or she is registered at any election or primary for which that
voter has cast an absentee ballot. A registered voter who has
requested an absentee ballot for a primary or special or general
election but chooses to vote at the voter's precinct polling place in
that primary or election shall cast a provisional ballot. The
canvassing board shall not count the provisional ballot until all
absentee ballots have been counted or if it finds that the voter has
also voted by absentee ballot in that primary or election.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.44.270 and 2003 c 111 s 1126 are each amended to
read as follows:
At each precinct immediately after the last qualified voter has
cast his or her vote, the precinct election officers shall render
unusable and secure in a container all unused ballots, whether wrapped
or unwrapped, for that precinct and return them to the county auditor.

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.48.040 and 2003 c 111 s 1204 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a county auditor conducts an election by mail, the county
auditor shall designate one or more places for the deposit of ballots
not returned by mail. The places designated under this section shall
be open on the date of the election for a period of thirteen hours,
beginning at 7:00 a.m. and ending at 8:00 p.m.
(2) A registered voter may obtain a replacement ballot as provided
in this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, replacement
ballot means provisional ballot. A voter may request a replacement
mail ballot in person, by mail, by telephone, or by other electronic
transmission for himself or herself and for any member of his or her
immediate family. The request must be received by the auditor before
8:00 p.m. on election day. The county auditor shall keep a record of
each replacement ballot issued, including the date of the request.
Replacement mail ballots may be counted in the final tabulation of
ballots only if the original ballot is not received by the county
auditor and the replacement ballot meets all requirements for
tabulation necessary for the tabulation of regular mail ballots.

Sec. 13 RCW 29A.60.125 and 2005 c 243 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
If inspection of the ballot reveals a physically damaged ballot or
a ballot ((that may be otherwise unreadable or uncountable by the
tabulating system)) where the voter has corrected an error in voting
according to instructions issued by election officials, the county
auditor may refer the ballot to the county canvassing board or
duplicate the ballot if so authorized by the county canvassing board.
The voter's original ballot may not be altered. A damaged ballot or a
ballot where the voter has corrected an error in voting may be
duplicated only if the intent of the voter's marks on the ballot is
clear and the electronic voting equipment might not otherwise properly
tally the ballot to reflect the intent of the voter. Ballots must be
duplicated by teams of two or more people working together. When
duplicating ballots, the county auditor shall take the following steps
to create and maintain an audit trail of the action taken:
(1) Each original ballot and duplicate ballot must be assigned the
same unique control number, with the number being marked upon the face
of each ballot, to ensure that each duplicate ballot may be tied back
to the original ballot;
(2) A log must be kept of the ballots duplicated, which must at
least include:
(a) The control number of each original ballot and the
corresponding duplicate ballot;
(b) The initials of at least two people who participated in the
duplication of each ballot; and
(c) The total number of ballots duplicated.
Original and duplicate ballots must be sealed in secure storage at
all times, except during duplication, inspection by the canvassing
board, or tabulation.

--- END ---