BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.44.040 and 1997 c 99 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of Title ((29)) 29A RCW relating to elections
shall govern public hospital districts, except as provided in this
chapter.
A public hospital district shall be created when the ballot
proposition authorizing the creation of the district is approved by a
simple majority vote of the voters of the proposed district voting on
the proposition and the total vote cast upon the proposition exceeds
forty percent of the total number of votes cast in the proposed
district at the preceding state general election.
A public hospital district initially may be created with three,
five, or seven commissioner districts. At the election at which the
proposition is submitted to the voters as to whether a district shall
be formed, three, five, or seven commissioners shall be elected from
either three, five, or seven commissioner districts, or at-large
positions, or both, as determined by resolution of the county
commissioners of the county or counties in which the proposed public
hospital district is located, all in accordance with RCW 70.44.054.
The election of the initial commissioners shall be null and void if the
district is not authorized to be created.
No primary shall be held. A special filing period shall be opened
as provided in RCW ((29.15.170 and 29.15.180)) 29A.24.171 and
29A.24.181. The person receiving the greatest number of votes for the
commissioner of each commissioner district or at-large position shall
be elected as the commissioner of that district. The terms of office
of the initial public hospital district commissioners shall be
staggered, with the length of the terms assigned so that the person or
persons who are elected receiving the greater number of votes being
assigned a longer term or terms of office and each term of an initial
commissioner running until a successor assumes office who is elected at
one of the next three following district general elections the first of
which occurs at least one hundred twenty days after the date of the
election where voters approved the ballot proposition creating the
district, as follows:
(a) If the public hospital district will have three commissioners,
the successor to one initial commissioner shall be elected at such
first following district general election, the successor to one initial
commissioner shall be elected at the second following district general
election, and the successor to one initial commissioner shall be
elected at the third following district general election;
(b) If the public hospital district will have five commissioners,
the successor to one initial commissioner shall be elected at such
first following district general election, the successors to two
initial commissioners shall be elected at the second following district
general election, and the successors to two initial commissioners shall
be elected at the third following district general election;
(c) If the public hospital district will have seven commissioners,
the successors to two initial commissioners shall be elected at such
first following district general election, the successors to ((three
[two])) two initial commissioners shall be elected at the second
following district general election, and the successors to three
initial commissioners shall be elected at the third following district
general election.
The initial commissioners shall take office immediately when they
are elected and qualified. The term of office of each successor shall
be six years. Each commissioner shall serve until a successor is
elected and qualified and assumes office in accordance with RCW
((29.04.170)) 29A.20.040.
(2) Only a registered voter who resides in a commissioner district
may be a candidate for, or hold office as, a commissioner of the
commissioner district. Voters of the entire public hospital district
may vote at a primary or general election to elect a person as a
commissioner of the commissioner district.
If the proposed public hospital district initially will have three
commissioner districts and the public hospital district is county-wide,
and if the county has three county legislative authority districts, the
county legislative authority districts shall be used as public hospital
district commissioner districts. In all other instances the county
auditor of the county in which all or the largest portion of the
proposed public hospital district is located shall draw the initial
public hospital district commissioner districts and designate at-large
positions, if appropriate, as provided in RCW 70.44.054. Each of the
commissioner positions shall be numbered consecutively and associated
with the commissioner district or at-large position of the same number.
The commissioners of a public hospital district that is not
coterminous with the boundaries of a county that has three county
legislative authority districts shall at the times required in chapter
((29.70)) 29A.76 RCW and may from time to time redraw commissioner
district boundaries in a manner consistent with chapter ((29.70))
29A.76 RCW.
(3) No person may hold office as a commissioner while serving as an
employee of the public hospital district.

--- END ---