BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as authorized by law, it is unlawful for any person to
willfully maintain or operate any business knowingly, or under
circumstances where one should reasonably know, that drug paraphernalia
is displayed or distributed at such business.
(2) Except as authorized by law, it is unlawful for any person who
is the owner of a business, an employee thereof, or who works at such
business as an agent of the owner, to willfully display or distribute
drug paraphernalia at such business knowingly, or under circumstances
where one should reasonably know, that it is drug paraphernalia or will
be used as such.
(3) Law enforcement officers may provide verbal or written
notification to any person or business that drug paraphernalia is on
display or being distributed at the business.
(4)(a) For purposes of this section, "business" means any location,
whether indoors or outdoors, at which merchandise is offered for sale.
(b) "Display" means to show to a patron or place in a manner so as
to be available for viewing or inspection by a patron.
(c) "Distribute" means to transfer ownership or a possessory
interest to another, whether for consideration, as a gratuity or gift,
for consignment, or otherwise.
(d) "Drug paraphernalia" means any of the following:
(i) Any item, whether used for nondrug-related purposes or not,
which is displayed, grouped with other items, advertised, or promoted
in a manner to reasonably suggest its usefulness in the growing,
harvesting, processing, manufacturing, preserving, inhaling, injecting,
or ingesting of marijuana, hashish, cocaine, methamphetamine, or any
controlled substance.
(ii) Any item, whether used for nondrug-related purposes or not,
which is designed, decorated, adorned, packaged, or displayed in a
manner to reasonably suggest its usefulness in the growing, harvesting,
processing, inhaling, injecting, or ingesting of marijuana, hashish,
cocaine, methamphetamine, or any controlled substance.
(iii) For purposes of this section, "drug paraphernalia" shall
include, without limitation: All equipment, products, and materials of
any kind, whether used for nondrug-related purposes or not, which are
used, intended for use, or designed for use in planting, propagating,
cultivating, growing, harvesting, manufacturing, compounding,
converting, producing, processing, preparing, testing, analyzing,
packaging, repackaging, storing, containing, concealing, injecting,
ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the human body a
controlled substance. It includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Kits used, intended for use, or designed for use in planting,
propagating, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of any species of
plant which is a controlled substance or from which a controlled
substance can be derived;
(B) Kits used, intended for use, or designed for use in
manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing, or
preparing controlled substances;
(C) Isomerization devices used, intended for use, or designed for
use in increasing the potency of any species of plant which is a
controlled substance;
(D) Testing equipment used, intended for use, or designed for use
in identifying or in analyzing the strength, effectiveness, or purity
of controlled substances;
(E) Scales and balances used, intended for use, or designed for use
in weighing or measuring controlled substances;
(F) Diluents and adulterants, such as quinine hydrochloride,
mannitol, mannite, dextrose, and lactose, used, intended for use, or
designed for use in cutting controlled substances;
(G) Separation gins and sifters used, intended for use, or designed
for use in removing twigs and seeds from, or in otherwise cleaning or
refining, marihuana;
(H) Blenders, bowls, containers, spoons, and mixing devices used,
intended for use, or designed for use in compounding controlled
substances;
(I) Capsules, balloons, envelopes, and other containers used,
intended for use, or designed for use in packaging small quantities of
controlled substances;
(J) Containers and other objects used, intended for use, or
designed for use in storing or concealing controlled substances;
(K) Hypodermic syringes, needles, and other objects used, intended
for use, or designed for use in parenterally injecting controlled
substances into the human body;
(L) Objects used, intended for use, or designed for use in
ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing marihuana, cocaine,
hashish, or hashish oil into the human body, such as: Metal, wooden,
acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or ceramic pipes with or without
screens, permanent screens, hashish heads, or punctured metal bowls;
water pipes; carburetion tubes and devices; smoking and carburetion
masks; roach clips, meaning objects used to hold burning material, such
as a marihuana cigarette, that has become too small or too short to be
held in the hand; miniature cocaine spoons, and cocaine vials; chamber
pipes; carburetor pipes; electric pipes; air-driven pipes; chillums;
bongs; and ice pipes or chillers.
(5) A person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section is
guilty of a misdemeanor.

--- END ---