BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that local
governments, special districts, and utilities that cooperate in
watershed management partnerships are acting in the public interest and
in a manner that is intended to maintain healthy watershed function
while sustaining growing populations and maximum beneficial use of
water in the watershed over time. Therefore, it is the intent of this
act to provide additional funding authority to assist watershed
management partnerships with the implementation of local watershed
plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other revenues used to carry out a watershed
management plan, a watershed management partnership may, for the
purpose of implementing any portion or all elements of that plan,
including the coordination and oversight of plan implementation,
recommend imposition of some or all of the following revenue sources,
as provided in this section, which each of the members of the watershed
management partnership shall impose, collect, and transfer to the
watershed management partnership upon approval of the voters:
(a) A watershed management fee, imposed by the watershed management
partnership as a surcharge on rates, charges, or assessments for the
delivery of water imposed by cities, counties, and special purpose
districts within the boundaries of the members of the watershed
management partnership; and
(b) Ad valorem property tax levies, in excess of the one percent
limitation, for the retirement of voter-approved general obligation
bonds issued by a watershed management partnership or by some or all of
its members, and payable from such taxes, whenever authorized by the
voters in all members' jurisdictions as provided in this section, and
subject to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state Constitution and RCW
84.52.056.
(2) The taxes and fees authorized under subsection (1)(b) of this
section may not be imposed within a member's boundaries without an
affirmative vote of the majority of the voters within the boundaries of
that jurisdiction voting on a ballot proposition to approve imposition
of the tax. A revenue proposal shall be submitted at a special or
general election on the same day in all members' jurisdictions.
Revenues from these taxes and fees may be used only to implement the
watershed management plan as set forth in this chapter. No tax or fee
authorized under this section may be imposed by more than one member
within any geographic area, and the rate of any such tax or fee shall
be uniform throughout the geographic areas of the members of the
watershed management partnership. If the geographic areas of members
overlap, those members shall by written agreement provide for which
entity will impose and collect the tax or fee within that area. A
watershed management partnership and its members may contract with the
state department of revenue or other appropriate entities for
administration and collection of any of the taxes or fees authorized in
this section.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit any member of
a watershed management partnership from imposing or collecting, and
allocating to the purposes of a watershed management partnership, other
taxes, rates, fees, and charges as may be separately authorized by law.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.34.190 and 2003 c 327 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a city or county and the governing
body of any special purpose district enumerated in subsection (2) of
this section may authorize up to ten percent of its water-related
revenues to be expended in the implementation of watershed management
plan projects or activities that are in addition to the county's,
city's, or district's existing water-related services or activities.
Such limitation on expenditures shall not apply to additional revenues
for watershed plan implementation that are authorized by voter approval
under section ((5)) 2 of this act or to water-related revenues of a
public utility district organized according to Title 54 RCW. Water-related revenues include rates, charges, and fees for the provision of
services relating to water supply, treatment, distribution, and
management generally, and those general revenues of the local
government that are expended for water management purposes. A local
government may not expend for this purpose any revenues that were
authorized by voter approval for other specified purposes or that are
specifically dedicated to the repayment of municipal bonds or other
debt instruments.
(2) The following special purpose districts may exercise the
authority provided by this section:
(a) Water districts, sewer districts, and water-sewer districts
organized under Title 57 RCW;
(b) Public utility districts organized under Title 54 RCW;
(c) Irrigation, reclamation, conservation, and similar districts
organized under Titles 87 and 89 RCW;
(d) Port districts organized under Title 53 RCW;
(e) Diking, drainage, and similar districts organized under Title
85 RCW;
(f) Flood control and similar districts organized under Title 86
RCW;
(g) Lake management districts organized under chapter 36.61 RCW;
(h) Aquifer protection areas organized under chapter 36.36 RCW; and
(i) Shellfish protection districts organized under chapter 90.72
RCW.
(3) The authority for expenditure of local government revenues
provided by this section shall be applicable broadly to the
implementation of watershed management plans addressing water supply,
water transmission, water quality treatment or protection, or any other
water-related purposes. Such plans include but are not limited to
plans developed under the following authorities:
(a) Watershed plans developed under chapter 90.82 RCW;
(b) Salmon recovery plans developed under chapter 77.85 RCW;
(c) Watershed management elements of comprehensive land use plans
developed under the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW;
(d) Watershed management elements of shoreline master programs
developed under the shoreline management act, chapter 90.58 RCW;
(e) Nonpoint pollution action plans developed under the Puget Sound
water quality management planning authorities of chapter 90.71 RCW and
chapter 400-12 WAC;
(f) Other comprehensive management plans addressing watershed
health at a WRIA level or sub-WRIA basin drainage level;
(g) Coordinated water system plans under chapter 70.116 RCW and
similar regional plans for water supply; and
(h) Any combination of the foregoing plans in an integrated
watershed management plan.
(4) The authority provided by this section to expend revenues for
watershed management plan implementation shall be construed broadly to
include, but not be limited to:
(a) The coordination and oversight of plan implementation,
including funding a watershed management partnership for this purpose;
(b) Technical support, monitoring, and data collection and
analysis;
(c) The design, development, construction, and operation of
projects included in the plan; and
(d) Conducting activities and programs included as elements in the
plan.

--- END ---