BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the
public interest to establish a market for alternative fuels in
Washington. By requiring a growing percentage of our fuel supply to be
renewable biofuel that meets appropriate fuel quality standards, we
will reduce our dependence on imports of foreign oil, improve the
health and quality of life for Washingtonians, and stimulate the
creation of a new industry that benefits our farmers and rural
communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Special fuel licensees under chapter 82.38 RCW, other than
international fuel tax agreement licensees and special fuel
distributors, shall provide evidence to the department of licensing
that at least two percent of total annual diesel fuel sales are
biodiesel fuel sales, when the director determines that feedstock grown
in Washington state can satisfy a two-percent requirement, or the date
November 30, 2008, has passed.
(2) Special fuel licensees under chapter 82.38 RCW, other than
international fuel tax agreement licensees and special fuel
distributors, shall provide evidence to the department of licensing
that at least five percent of total annual diesel fuel sales are
biodiesel fuel sales, when the director determines that both in-state
oil seed crushing capacity and feedstock grown in Washington state can
satisfy a three-percent requirement.
(3) For the purposes of this chapter, "biodiesel fuel" has the
meaning provided in RCW 82.29A.135.
(4) The director and the director of licensing shall adopt rules
for enforcing and carrying out the purposes of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning December 1, 2008, all gasoline sold or offered for
sale in Washington shall contain at least two percent denatured ethanol
by volume.
(2) If the director of ecology determines that ethanol content
greater than two percent will not jeopardize continued attainment of
the federal clean air act's national ambient air quality standard for
ozone pollution in Washington and the director of agriculture
determines that sufficient raw materials are available within
Washington to support economical production of ethanol at higher
levels, the director of agriculture may require by rule that all
gasoline sold or offered for sale in Washington shall contain up to a
maximum of ten percent of denatured ethanol by volume. The director of
agriculture shall allow blenders and retailers six months to meet the
new minimum content requirement.
(3) The director of agriculture shall adopt rules for enforcing and
carrying out the purposes of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.112.020 and 1990 c 102 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter shall be administered by the director or his or
her authorized agent. ((For the purpose of administering this
chapter,))
(2) The director shall adopt rules for maintaining standards for
biodiesel fuel or fuel blended with biodiesel fuel by adopting all or
part of the standards set forth in the Annual Book of ASTM Standards
and supplements ((thereto, and revisions thereof, are adopted)),
amendments, or revisions thereof, all or part of the standards set
forth in the National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST)
Handbook 130, Uniform Laws and Regulations in the areas of legal
metrology and engine fuel quality rules, and any supplements,
amendments, or revisions thereof, together with applicable federal
environmental protection agency standards. If a conflict exists
between federal environmental protection agency standards, ASTM
standards, or ((state)) NIST standards, for purposes of uniformity,
federal environmental protection agency standards shall take precedence
over ASTM and NIST standards. ((Any state standards adopted must be
consistent with federal environmental protection agency standards and
ASTM standards not in conflict with federal environmental protection
agency standards.)) The department of agriculture shall not exceed ASTM
standards for diesel.
(3) The director may establish a fuel testing laboratory or may
contract with a laboratory for testing. The director may also adopt
rules on false and misleading advertising, labeling and posting of
prices, and the standards for, and identity of, motor fuels. The
director shall require fuel pumps offering biodiesel and ethanol blends
to be identified by a label stating the percentage of biodiesel or
ethanol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 19.112 RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall establish a biofuels advisory committee to
advise the director on implementing or suspending the minimum renewable
fuel content requirements. The committee shall advise the director on
applicability to all users; logistical, technical, and economic issues
of implementation; and how the use of renewable fuel blends greater
than two percent could achieve the goals of this act. The director
shall make recommendations to the legislature and the governor on the
implementation or suspension of this act by September 1, 2007.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.19.642 and 2003 c 17 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All state agencies are encouraged to use a fuel blend of twenty
percent biodiesel and eighty percent petroleum diesel for use in
diesel-powered vehicles and equipment.
(2) Effective June 1, 2006, for agencies complying with the ultra-low sulfur diesel mandate of the United States environmental protection
agency for on-highway diesel fuel, agencies shall use biodiesel as an
additive to ultra-low sulfur diesel for lubricity, provided that the
use of a lubricity additive is warranted and that the use of biodiesel
is comparable in performance and cost with other available lubricity
additives. The amount of biodiesel added to the ultra-low sulfur
diesel fuel shall be not less than two percent.
(3) Effective June 1, 2009, all state agencies are required to use
a minimum of twenty percent biodiesel as compared to total volume of
all diesel purchases made by the agency for the operation of the
agency's diesel-powered vehicles and construction equipment.
(4) All state agencies using biodiesel fuel shall, beginning on
July 1, 2006, file quarterly reports with the department of general
administration documenting any problems encountered with the use of the
fuel and a description of how the problems were resolved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of general administration must assist state
agencies seeking to meet the biodiesel fuel mandates in RCW 43.19.642
by coordinating the purchase and delivery of biodiesel if requested by
any state agency. The department may use long-term contracts of up to
ten years to secure a sufficient and stable supply of biodiesel for use
by state agencies.
(2) The department shall compile and analyze the reports submitted
under RCW 43.19.642(4) and report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and legislature within thirty days from the end of each
reporting period. The governor shall consider these reports in
determining whether to temporarily suspend minimum renewable fuel
content requirements as authorized under section 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 19.112 RCW
to read as follows:
The governor, by executive order, may suspend all or portions of
the minimum renewable fuel content requirements in section 2 or 3 of
this act, or both, based on a determination that such requirements are
temporarily technically or economically infeasible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 19.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By November 30, 2008, the director shall determine whether the
state's diesel fuel supply is comprised of at least ten percent
biodiesel made predominantly from Washington feedstock, and whether the
goals of section 2 of this act have been achieved.
(2) By November 30, 2008, the director shall determine whether the
state's gasoline fuel supply is comprised of at least five percent
ethanol made predominantly from Washington feedstock, without
jeopardizing continued attainment of the federal clean air act's
national ambient air quality standard for ozone pollution, and whether
the goals of section 3 of this act have been achieved.
(3) By December 1, 2008, the director shall notify the governor and
the legislature of the findings in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section.
(4) If the findings from the director indicate that the goals of
section 2 or 3 of this act, or both, have been achieved, then the
governor shall issue an executive order declaring that section 2 or 3
of this act, or both, are no longer applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 19.112
RCW to read as follows:
(1) If either or both of the goals in sections 2 and 3 of this act
are not achieved by November 30, 2008, the director shall monitor the
state's diesel and gasoline fuel supply until such time as those goals,
or either of them, is met.
(2) The director shall report to the governor and the legislature
November 30th of the year in which a goal is met.
(3) Following notification under this section that a goal has been
met, the governor shall prepare executive request legislation repealing
section 2 or 3 of this act, or both, as applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 19.112
RCW to read as follows:
For the purposes of sections 2 through 10 of this act, "diesel"
means special fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020, and dyed special fuel
as defined in 26 C.F.R. Sec. 48.4082-1T as of October 24, 2005.

--- END ---