BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any state agency, city with a population greater than one
hundred thousand, or counties with a population greater than five
hundred thousand executing public works using a competitive bidding
process cannot reject all bids after opening unless there is a
compelling reason.
(2) Every effort shall be made to anticipate changes in a
requirement before the date of opening and to provide reasonable notice
to all prospective bidders of any resulting modification or
cancellation. If, in the opinion of the director or agency head or the
appropriate city or county contract authority, it is not possible to
provide reasonable notice, the published date for receipt of bids may
be postponed and all known bidders notified. This will permit bidders
to change their bids and prevent unnecessary exposure of bid prices.
In addition, every effort shall be made to include realistic,
achievable requirements in a bid solicitation.
(3) After the opening of bids, a solicitation may not be canceled
and resolicited solely because of an increase in requirements for the
items being acquired. Award may be made on the initial solicitation
and an increase in requirements may be treated as a new acquisition.
(4) A solicitation may be canceled and all bids rejected before
award but after bid opening only when, consistent with subsection (1)
of this section, the state, city, or county determines in writing that:
(a) Unavailable, inadequate, ambiguous specifications, terms,
conditions, or requirements were cited in the solicitation;
(b) Specifications, terms, conditions, or requirements have been
revised;
(c) The services being contracted for are no longer required;
(d) The solicitation did not provide for consideration of all
factors of cost to the agency, city, or county;
(e) Bids received indicate that the needs of the state, city, or
county can be satisfied by a less expensive article differing from that
for which the bids were invited;
(f) All otherwise acceptable bids received are at unreasonable
prices or only one bid is received and the agency, city, or county
cannot determine the reasonableness of the bid price;
(g) No responsive bid has been received from a responsible bidder;
or
(h) The bid process was not fair or equitable.
(5) The state agency head or city or county contract authority may
not delegate his or her authority under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.29 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any agency or institution of state government procuring
personal services using a competitive solicitation process cannot
reject all solicitations after opening unless there is a compelling
reason.
(2) Every effort shall be made to anticipate changes in a
requirement before the date of opening and to provide reasonable notice
to all prospective bidders of any resulting modification or
cancellation. If, in the opinion of the director or agency head, it is
not possible to provide reasonable notice, the published date for
receipt of bids may be postponed and all known bidders notified. This
will permit bidders to change their bids and prevent unnecessary
exposure of bid prices. In addition, every effort shall be made to
include realistic, achievable requirements in a solicitation.
(3) After the opening of bids, a solicitation may not be canceled
and resolicited solely because of an increase in requirements for the
items being acquired. Award may be made on the initial solicitation
and an increase in requirements may be treated as a new acquisition.
(4) A solicitation may be canceled and all bids rejected before
award but after bid opening only when, consistent with subsection (1)
of this section, the agency determines in writing that:
(a) Unavailable, inadequate, ambiguous specifications, terms,
conditions, or requirements were cited in the solicitation;
(b) Specifications, terms, conditions, or requirements have been
revised;
(c) The services being contracted for are no longer required;
(d) The solicitation did not provide for consideration of all
factors of cost to the agency;
(e) Bids received indicate that the needs of the agency can be
satisfied by a less expensive article differing from that for which the
bids were invited;
(f) All otherwise acceptable bids received are at unreasonable
prices or only one bid is received and the agency cannot determine the
reasonableness of the bid price;
(g) No responsive bid has been received from a responsible bidder;
or
(h) The bid process was not fair or equitable.
(5) The agency head may not delegate his or her authority under
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board, or other agencies and institutions of state
government the board delegates authority to, when purchasing, leasing,
renting, or otherwise acquiring, disposing of, or maintaining
equipment, proprietary software, or purchased services using a
competitive bidding process cannot reject all bids and cancel the
solicitation after the bid opening unless there is a compelling reason.
(2) Every effort shall be made to anticipate changes in a
requirement before the date of opening and to provide reasonable notice
to all prospective bidders of any resulting modification or
cancellation. If, in the opinion of the director or purchasing agency
head, it is not possible to provide reasonable notice, the published
date for receipt of bids may be postponed and all known bidders
notified. This will permit bidders to change their bids and prevent
unnecessary exposure of bid prices. In addition, every effort shall be
made to include realistic, achievable requirements in a solicitation.
(3) After the opening of bids, a solicitation may not be canceled
and resolicited solely because of an increase in requirements for the
items being acquired. Award may be made on the initial solicitation
and an increase in requirements may be treated as a new acquisition.
(4) A solicitation may be canceled and all bids rejected before
award but after bid opening only when, consistent with subsection (1)
of this section, the board or purchasing agency, determines in writing
that:
(a) Unavailable, inadequate, ambiguous specifications, terms,
conditions, or requirements were cited in the solicitation;
(b) Specifications, terms, conditions, or requirements have been
revised;
(c) The supplies or services being contracted for are no longer
required;
(d) The solicitation did not provide for consideration of all
factors of cost to the board or agency;
(e) Bids received indicate that the needs of the board or agency
can be satisfied by a less expensive article differing from that for
which the bids were invited;
(f) All otherwise acceptable bids received are at unreasonable
prices or only one bid is received and the board or agency cannot
determine the reasonableness of the bid price;
(g) No responsive bid has been received from a responsible bidder;
or
(h) The bid process was not fair or equitable.
(5) The agency head may not delegate his or her authority under
this section.

--- END ---