BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.89.090 and 1991 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county shall have a lien for delinquent ((service)) charges,
including interest, penalties, and costs of foreclosure thereon,
against any property against which they were levied for ((storm water
control facilities)) the purposes authorized by this chapter, which
lien shall be superior to all other liens and encumbrances except
general taxes and local and special assessments. Such lien shall be
effective upon the charges becoming delinquent and shall be enforced
and foreclosed in the same manner as provided for sewerage liens of
cities and towns by RCW 35.67.200 through 35.67.290((: PROVIDED,
That)). However, a county may, by resolution or ordinance, adopt all
or any part of the alternative interest rate, lien, and foreclosure
procedures as set forth in RCW 36.89.092 through 36.89.094 or ((by
RCW)) 36.94.150, or chapters 84.56, 84.60, and 84.64 RCW.

--- END ---