BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the air
quality around idling heavy duty diesel vehicles at truck stops can
contribute to unhealthy conditions. Idling vehicles not only consume
up to one billion gallons of diesel fuel a year, but also contribute to
air pollution by releasing fine particles, volatile organic compounds,
carbon monoxide, carbon dioxide, and nitrogen oxides. These emissions
contribute to deteriorating human health conditions, including asthma,
heart disease, cancer, and aggravated allergies. Idling vehicles also
contribute to driver fatigue through exposure to noise, vibration, and
elevated levels of carbon monoxide and other pollutants.
Washington state seeks to encourage private entities to address
this source of air pollution by providing incentives to those who
provide the infrastructure and services that support the use of
auxiliary power through onboard or stand-alone electrification systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts received from the retail sale, lease, or rental of auxiliary
power to heavy duty diesel vehicles through onboard or stand-alone
electrification systems.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section and sections 3 through 6 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(a) "Heavy duty diesel vehicles" means any diesel vehicle with a
gross vehicle weight rating over fourteen thousand pounds.
(b) "Onboard electrification systems" means the equipment necessary
to provide auxiliary electrical service to heavy duty diesel vehicles
that are equipped with the necessary components to accept electrical
power, including inverters, heat and air systems capable of being
powered by electricity, and hardware to plug into an electrical outlet.
(c) "Stand-alone electrification systems" means an independent
system that supplies a heavy duty diesel vehicle's needs for heating,
ventilation, and air conditioning without modification to the vehicle.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment, or to services rendered in respect to
constructing structures, installing, constructing, repairing, cleaning,
decorating, altering, or improving of structures or machinery and
equipment, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of structures or machinery and equipment, if
the machinery, equipment, or structure is integral and necessary for
the retail sale, lease, or rental of auxiliary power to heavy duty
diesel vehicles through onboard or stand-alone electrification systems.
Structures and machinery and equipment that are used for the retail
sale, lease, or rental of auxiliary power to heavy duty diesel vehicles
through onboard or stand-alone electrification systems are exempt only
on the portion integral and necessary for providing that service.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in section 2
of this act apply.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of machinery and equipment, or to services rendered in respect to
constructing structures, installing, constructing, repairing, cleaning,
decorating, altering, or improving of structures or machinery and
equipment, or tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or
component of structures or machinery and equipment, integral and
necessary for the retail sale, lease, or rental of auxiliary power to
heavy duty diesel vehicles through onboard or stand-alone
electrification systems.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in section 2
of this act apply.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of,
and labor and services rendered in respect to, tangible personal
property installed on a heavy duty diesel vehicle if the property
enables the vehicle to operate, while parked, through the use of an
onboard electrification system. Only parts and other components that
are specific to enabling a heavy duty diesel vehicle to operate, while
parked, with an onboard electrification system are exempt under this
section.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in section 2
of this act apply.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of tangible personal property, labor, or services if the property,
labor, or services enable a heavy duty diesel vehicle to operate, while
parked, through the use of an onboard electrification system. Only
parts and other components that are specific to enabling a heavy duty
diesel vehicle to operate, while parked, with an onboard
electrification system are exempt under this section.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in section 2
of this act apply.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2015.

--- END ---