BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) About seven out of every ten deaths in the United States are
attributable to chronic diseases. About one hundred twenty-five
million people have at least one chronic illness and sixty million
suffer from multiple chronic illnesses. About twenty million children
have at least one chronic health problem;
(b) Chronic illnesses impose enormous health care and other costs
upon Washington. For example, the estimated total cost of asthma in
the state is about four hundred million dollars annually. Special
education for the estimated one hundred twenty thousand children in the
state's schools with learning disabilities costs about four hundred
seventy million dollars each year;
(c) There are an estimated eighty-five thousand chemicals
registered for use today in the United States, with another two
thousand added each year. Toxicological screening data exists for only
seven percent of these chemicals, and more than ninety percent have
never been tested for their effects on human health. Large numbers of
these chemicals are found in cosmetics, personal care products,
pesticides, food dyes, cleaning products, fuels, and plastics. Because
of their ubiquity, Washington residents are commonly exposed to
multiple chemicals every day. Many of these chemicals persist in the
environment, accumulate and remain in body fat, and have been shown to
be toxic. Persistent, bioaccumulative, toxics have been targeted by
the state, the federal government, and other nations for actions to
reduce their impact on human health and the environment;
(d) Biomonitoring data supports public health by establishing
trends in chemical exposures, validating modeling and survey methods,
supporting epidemiological studies, identifying affected communities,
assisting in emergency health responses to unanticipated exposures,
assessing the effectiveness of current regulations, and helping to set
priorities for chemical exposure reduction strategies;
(e) A grant from the federal Centers for Disease Control enabled
the Washington department of health, through the assistance of an
advisory committee of public health professionals, to develop a
biomonitoring plan, completed in 2003, that identifies the highest
priorities for chemicals, environmental settings, and populations for
monitoring. However, Washington did not receive federal funding to
implement this plan, and to date funding has not been identified to
move forward with any portion of it;
(f) The Washington environmental public health tracking network is
working to improve information concerning environmental contaminants,
human exposure to hazards, and potentially related health outcomes.
The program is developing network infrastructure to integrate
environmental and public health information systems, improve the
completeness and timeliness of data systems monitoring health outcomes
attributable to environmental hazards and exposures, and improve access
to information in those systems.
(2) It is therefore the purpose of this chapter to authorize a
biomonitoring program in Washington as an integral part of the
environmental public health tracking network, to secure initial funding
for implementing the highest priorities of the program, and to identify
a long-term funding source for implementing other priorities identified
in 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Biomonitoring" means the process by which the presence and
concentration of synthetic chemicals or their metabolites are
identified within a biospecimen to assess bodily exposure.
(3) "Biospecimen" means a sample taken from a biophysical
substance, that is reasonably available within a human body, for use as
a medium to measure the presence and concentration of toxic chemicals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department shall conduct
biomonitoring as an element of its environmental health tracking
program, in collaboration with the department of ecology, local health
jurisdictions, and other public health agencies, to assist public
health agencies and policymakers in allocating resources to maximize
improvements in environmental health.
(2) The department shall adopt guidelines and model protocols to
guide state and local agencies conducting biomonitoring that are
consistent with the requirements and priorities of this chapter. The
guidelines and model protocols shall address, without limitation:
(a) Ensuring confidentiality and informed consent, and
communicating findings to participants, communities, and the general
public;
(b) Emphasizing that all aspects of the program are culturally
sensitive; and
(c) When communicating with participants regarding the purposes of
biomonitoring and the uses of biomonitoring results and data, providing
a clear explanation of the distinction between exposure data and
analysis of health effects that may occur from exposures.
(3) In selecting biomonitoring measurements, the department shall
accord a priority to:
(a) Measuring the prevalence of elevated levels of toxic substances
in a population group;
(b) Determining levels of exposure in population groups that may be
at increased risk of exposure;
(c) Providing information on levels of human exposure for studies
examining the relationship between exposure to a toxic substance and
adverse health effects;
(d) Tracking trends in levels of exposure of a population group to
specific toxic substances; and
(e) Assessing effectiveness of public health efforts to reduce
exposure of specific populations to toxic substances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 By September 30, 2006, the department of
health shall, in consultation with the department of ecology and local
health jurisdictions, provide recommendations to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives for
funding the biomonitoring program. The recommendations shall provide
a proposed phase-in of the top ten highest priorities identified by the
department of health's 2003 biomonitoring plan, and shall include
recommendations for sharing costs among federal, state, local, and
nongovernmental entities. The department of health's implementation
recommendations shall include the objective of integrating with and
complementing nationwide monitoring programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect
July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2007, from the state toxics control account to the
department of health for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---