BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.19.642 and 2003 c 17 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All state agencies are encouraged to use a fuel blend of twenty
percent biodiesel and eighty percent petroleum diesel for use in
diesel-powered vehicles and equipment.
(2) Effective June 1, 2006, for agencies complying with the ultra-low sulfur diesel mandate of the United States environmental protection
agency for on-highway diesel fuel, agencies shall use biodiesel as an
additive to ultra-low sulfur diesel for lubricity, provided that the
use of a lubricity additive is warranted and that the use of biodiesel
is comparable in performance and cost with other available lubricity
additives. The amount of biodiesel added to the ultra-low sulfur
diesel fuel shall be not less than two percent.
(3) Effective June 1, 2009, all state agencies are required to use
a minimum of twenty percent biodiesel as compared to total volume of
all diesel purchases made by the agency for the operation of the
agency's diesel-powered vehicles and equipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of general administration must assist state agencies
seeking to meet the biodiesel fuel mandates in RCW 43.19.642 by
coordinating the purchase and delivery of biodiesel if requested by any
state agency. The department may use long-term contracts of up to ten
years to secure a sufficient and stable supply of biodiesel for use by
state agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of general administrative shall coordinate a
biodiesel technical assistance team, including representatives from the
department of agriculture, the department of ecology, the department of
community, trade, and economic development's energy policy division,
and Washington State University's energy program. The team shall
provide assistance to fleet managers and recommend best management
practices concerning the use of biodiesel.

--- END ---