BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.31 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) From funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, the
Washington State University energy extension program shall provide
consumer education and outreach regarding the use of biofuels in
transportation, heating, electricity generation, and other
applications. These services must be primarily implemented through
grants allocated on a competitive basis to public agencies, nonprofit
organizations, and business entities that propose education and
outreach programs that further the objectives set forth in subsection
(2) of this section.
(2) The energy extension program and its grant recipients shall
make information available to the public regarding:
(a) The availability of biofuels from retail distributors in their
community or nearby communities;
(b) The processing, refining, and distribution facilities in the
state;
(c) The various types, grades, and blends of biofuels, and their
potential uses;
(d) Obtain information from vehicle and equipment manufacturers and
services regarding the use of biofuels and modifications which may
improve operation on biofuels, and provide such information on the
program's web site;
(e) The role of the state's agricultural and forest products
industries in the supply of biofuel feedstock and the benefits to the
state's farm and forest communities of increasing consumer demand for
biofuel produced from Washington's farms and forests; and
(f) The energy security, air quality, and associated benefits to
the entire state of increasing biofuel uses.
(3) The energy extension program shall provide technical assistance
to public and private entities whose transportation fleet managers seek
to increase the use of biofuels in their fleets.
(4) The energy extension program must provide information to
consumers and producers of renewable energy, including state and
federal tax incentives for renewable energy production, sources of
technical assistance in the installation of production facilities,
information regarding applicable permitting and licensing requirements
for such facilities, and information regarding utility acquisition of
generation from renewable energy facilities.
(5) The energy extension program shall consult with the departments
of agriculture, ecology, and community, trade, and economic development
to maximize the effectiveness of its consumer education and outreach
activities.
(6) The energy extension program shall endeavor to provide
information throughout the state, but may award individual grants for
activities in regional areas of the state.
(7) The energy extension program shall begin program design and
initial implementation of this section in fiscal year 2007, and fully
implement the grant program and provision of information to consumers
and producers beginning in fiscal year 2008.

--- END ---