BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of,
and labor and services rendered in respect to, tangible personal
property installed on a motor vehicle if the property is integral and
necessary for the vehicle to operate using an alternative fuel. Only
parts and other components that are integral and necessary for a motor
vehicle to operate using an alternative fuel are exempt under this
section.
(2) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "alternative fuel" means a
fuel that is at least fifty percent, by volume, alcohol fuel, biodiesel
fuel, biodiesel feedstock, or wood biomass fuel, as these terms are
defined in RCW 82.29A.135.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of tangible personal property, labor, or services if the property,
labor, or services are integral and necessary for the vehicle to
operate using an alternative fuel. Only parts and other components
that are integral and necessary for a motor vehicle to operate using an
alternative fuel are exempt under this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "alternative fuel" means a
fuel that is at least fifty percent, by volume, alcohol fuel, biodiesel
fuel, biodiesel feedstock, or wood biomass fuel, as these terms are
defined in RCW 82.29A.135.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires July 1, 2016.

--- END ---