BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.21F.015 and 1994 c 207 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the policy of the state of Washington that:
(1) The development and use of a diverse array of energy resources
with emphasis on renewable energy resources shall be encouraged;
(2) The supply of energy shall be sufficient to insure the health
and economic welfare of its citizens;
(3) The development and use of energy resources shall be consistent
with the statutory environmental policies of the state;
(4) Energy conservation and elimination of wasteful and uneconomic
uses of energy and materials shall be encouraged, and this conservation
should include, but is not limited to, resource recovery and materials
recycling;
(5) By September 1, 2009, each state agency is encouraged to reduce
its electrical and heating consumption by fifteen percent from fiscal
year 2005, using all practicable, cost-effective means available,
including energy efficiency programs and the use of on-site renewable
resources. The department of general administration, in cooperation
with the state energy office, shall develop standards and formulas to
assist agencies in meeting this goal.
(a) By September 1st of each year, each state agency shall report
to the department of general administration its electrical and heating
reduction efforts for the previous fiscal year. By December 31st of
each year, the department shall summarize the reports and report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature. The summary shall include
details on how each agency was able to reduce its electrical and
heating consumption.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "state agency" means every
state office or department, whether elective or appointive, state
institutions of higher education, and all boards, commissions, or
divisions of state government, however designated;
(6) In energy emergency shortage situations, energy requirements to
maintain the public health, safety, and welfare shall be given priority
in the allocation of energy resources, and citizens and industry shall
be assisted in adjusting to the limited availability of energy in order
to minimize adverse impacts on their physical, social, and economic
well being;
(((6))) (7) State government shall provide a source of impartial
and objective information in order that this energy policy may be
enhanced; and
(((7))) (8) The state energy strategy shall provide primary
guidance for implementation of the state's energy policy.

--- END ---