BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 62A.3 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A payor financial institution shall pay a check drawn on it
against an account with a sufficient balance at par, without regard to
whether the payee holds an account at the financial institution.
"Financial institution" means any institution with an office in the
state of Washington upon which a check is drawn, regardless of where
the account or account holder may be located, and includes all
institutions defined under RCW 30.22.040(12).
(2) This section does not prohibit a financial institution from
requiring commercially reasonable verification of the payee's identity
before settlement of the check.
(3) If a payor financial institution refuses to pay a check drawn
against an account with a sufficient balance at par, the check is
dishonored, as provided for in RCW 62A.3-502.
(4) If a payor financial institution refuses to pay a check drawn
against an account with a sufficient balance at par, due to any fees
that the financial institution wishes to deduct from the funds to be
received by the payee, the drawer of the check and payor financial
institution are jointly and severally liable to the payee for the face
amount of the check, any fees the financial institution wishes to
deduct, additional damages in the sum of five hundred dollars, and
interest on all these amounts at the rate of twelve percent per annum
from the date of dishonor.

--- END ---