BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.13.125 and 1990 c 33 s 565 are each amended to read
as follows:
Proceedings for ((the annexation of)) a city or town to annex
unincorporated territory ((pursuant to)) contiguous to the city or
town, using the procedure specified under RCW 35.13.130((, 35.13.140,
35.13.150, 35.13.160 and)) through 35.13.170 ((shall be commenced)),
may commence as provided in this section.
Prior to ((the circulation of a)) circulating an annexation
petition ((for annexation)), the initiating party or parties ((who,
except as provided in RCW 28A.335.110,)) shall file a written notice
with the legislative body of the city or town indicating their interest
in annexing property to the city or town and indicating whether any
registered voter lives within the area proposed to be annexed. The
written notice must be ((either not less than ten percent of the
residents of the area to be annexed or)) signed by the owners of ((not
less than)) real property in the area proposed to be annexed comprising
at least ten percent ((in value, according to)) of the total assessed
valuation ((for general taxation of the property for which annexation
is petitioned, shall notify the legislative body of the city or town in
writing of their intention to commence annexation proceedings)) of all
real property in the area proposed to be annexed. If the area proposed
to be annexed only includes tax exempt property, including property
owned by a school district, the owners of the tax exempt property may
sign and file the written notice with the legislative body.
The legislative body of the city or town shall set a date, ((not
later than)) within sixty days after the filing of the ((request))
notice, for a meeting with the initiating parties to determine whether
the city or town: (1) Will accept, reject, or geographically modify
the proposed annexation((, whether it)); (2) shall require the
simultaneous adoption of the comprehensive plan, if such a
comprehensive plan for the area proposed to be annexed has been
prepared and filed ((for the area to be annexed as provided for in))
under RCW 35.13.177 and 35.13.178((,)); and ((whether it)) (3) shall
require the ((assumption of)) area to assume all or ((of)) any portion
of existing city or town indebtedness ((by the area to be annexed. If
the legislative body requires the assumption of all or of any portion
of indebtedness and/or the adoption of a comprehensive plan, it shall
record this action in its minutes and the petition for annexation shall
be so drawn as to clearly indicate this fact)).
Approval by the legislative body shall be a condition precedent to
circulation of the annexation petition. There shall be no appeal from
the decision of the legislative body.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.13.130 and 1990 c 33 s 566 are each amended to read
as follows:
A written petition ((for annexation of an)) to annex an
unincorporated area contiguous to a city or town that was approved for
annexation under RCW 35.13.125 may be ((made in writing addressed to
and)) filed with the legislative body of the ((municipality to which
annexation is desired. Except where all the property sought to be
annexed is property of a school district, and the school directors
thereof file the petition for annexation as in RCW 28A.335.110
authorized,)) city or town to which annexation is desired. The
petition must be signed by the owner or owners of ((not less than))
real property located within the area proposed to be annexed comprising
at least seventy-five percent ((in value according to)) of the total
assessed valuation ((for general taxation of the property for which
annexation is petitioned: PROVIDED, That in cities and towns with
populations greater than one hundred sixty thousand located east of the
Cascade mountains)) of all real property in the area proposed to be
annexed. If the area proposed to be annexed only includes tax exempt
property, including property owned by a school district, the owner or
owners of the tax exempt property may sign ((an)) the annexation
petition ((and have the tax exempt property annexed into the city or
town, but the value of the tax exempt property shall not be used in
calculating the sufficiency of the required property owner signatures
unless only tax exempt property is proposed to be annexed into the city
or town)).
The annexation petition shall ((set forth a description of))
describe the property ((according to)) proposed to be annexed using
government legal subdivisions or legal plats ((which is in compliance
with RCW 35.02.170,)) and shall be accompanied by a ((plat which
outlines)) map outlining the boundaries of the property sought to be
annexed. If the legislative body has required ((the assumption of))
all or ((of)) any portion of city or town indebtedness to be assumed by
the area proposed to be annexed, ((and/))or the adoption of a
comprehensive plan for the area to be annexed, these facts((, together
with a quotation of the minute entry of such requirement or
requirements)) shall be set forth in the annexation petition.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.13.140 and 1965 c 7 s 35.13.140 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever ((a)) an annexation petition ((for annexation)) is filed
with the legislative body of the city or town ((council, or commission
in those cities having a commission form of government, which)) that
meets the requirements ((herein)) specified((, of which fact
satisfactory proof may be required by the council or commission)) under
RCW 35.13.125 and 35.13.130, and is sufficient according to the rules
set forth in RCW 35.21.005, the ((council or commission)) legislative
body may ((entertain the same, fix a date for)) consider the proposed
annexation by holding a public hearing ((thereon and cause)) on the
proposal. Notice of the public hearing ((to)) shall be published in
one or more issues of a newspaper of general circulation in the city or
town((. The notice shall also)) and be posted in three public places
within the ((territory proposed for annexation, and)) area proposed to
be annexed. Notices shall specify the date, time, and place of the
public hearing and invite interested persons to appear and voice
approval or disapproval of the annexation. The expense of publication
and posting of the notice shall be borne by the signers of the
petition.

Sec. 4 RCW 35.13.150 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 220 s 9 are each
amended to read as follows:
Following the public hearing, the ((council or commission shall
determine by)) legislative body may adopt an ordinance ((whether
annexation shall be made)) providing for the annexation of a proposed
area. Subject to boundary restrictions provided under RCW 35.02.170,
((they)) the ordinance may annex all or any portion of the proposed
area but may not include ((in the annexation)) any property not
described in the petition. ((Upon passage of the)) If the legislative
body adopts an ordinance to annex all or a portion of the area, it
shall file a certified copy ((shall be filed)) with the ((board of
county commissioners)) legislative authority of the county in which the
annexed property is located. If a boundary review board exists in the
county in which the area proposed to be annexed is located, the
legislative body shall file a notice of the proposed annexation with
that boundary review board as provided under RCW 36.93.090.

Sec. 5 RCW 35.13.160 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 164 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Unless a valid petition for a ballot proposition provided for
in section 6 of this act has been submitted or the jurisdiction of the
boundary review board has been invoked, the area described in the
ordinance shall become part of the city or town effective upon the date
fixed for the annexation in the annexation ordinance ((of annexation
the area annexed shall become part of the city or town)).
(2) If the boundary review board approves the annexation as
submitted and no valid petition for a ballot proposition, provided for
in section 6 of this act, has been submitted, the area described in the
ordinance shall become part of the city or town effective upon the date
fixed for the annexation in an ordinance adopted by the legislative
body.
(3) If the boundary review board modifies and approves the
annexation, the altered area shall become part of the city or town,
upon the date fixed for the modified annexation in a subsequent
ordinance adopted by the legislative body approving the modified
annexation if no registered voter resides in the area, unless a valid
petition for a ballot proposition, provided for in section 6 of this
act, has been submitted.
(4) If the annexation occurs and the annexation petition provides
so, all property within the ((territory hereafter)) area that is
annexed shall((, if the annexation petition so provided,)) be assessed
and taxed at the same rate and on the same basis as the property of
such annexing city or town is assessed and taxed to pay for ((all or
of)) any portion of the then-outstanding indebtedness of the city or
town to which ((said)) the area is annexed, which indebtedness was
approved by ((the)) city or town voters, contracted, or incurred prior
to, or existing at, the date of annexation. If the annexation petition
so provided, all property in the annexed area shall be subject to and
a part of the comprehensive plan as prepared and filed as provided for
in RCW 35.13.177 and 35.13.178.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 35.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A notice of the proposed annexation shall be published in a
newspaper of general circulation in the area proposed to be annexed.
The notice shall be published after all procedural steps have been
taken to annex the property, as described under RCW 35.13.150 and
35.13.160 or 35A.14.140 and 35A.14.150, and shall describe the area
proposed to be annexed and the process under this section how voters
residing in the area proposed to be annexed may file a petition
subjecting the annexation to voter approval.
(2) A ballot proposition authorizing an annexation of the area
under subsection (1) of this section shall be submitted to voters
residing in the area for their approval or rejection if a petition
calling for the submission of such a ballot proposition is filed with
the legislative body of the city or town. The petition must be signed
by at least ten percent of the registered voters residing in the area
to be annexed and must be filed within forty-five days after the
publication of the notice under subsection (1) of this section.
The legislative body shall immediately transfer the petition to the
county auditor of the county in which a majority of the area to be
annexed is located. Within ten days of receiving the petition, the
county auditor shall certify the petition if it contains sufficient
valid signatures. If the auditor certifies that the petition contains
sufficient valid signatures, a ballot proposition authorizing the
annexation shall be submitted to the voters residing in the area
proposed for annexation at a special election called for that purpose
at the next special election date specified under RCW 29A.04.330,
occurring at least forty-five days after the petition is certified as
containing sufficient valid signatures.
If the legislative body of the city or town requires that any
portion of the city or town's indebtedness be assumed by the property
proposed to be annexed, the legislative body shall specify whether a
single ballot proposition authorizing both the annexation and
assumption of indebtedness, or separate ballot propositions authorizing
the annexation and assumption of indebtedness, shall be submitted to
the voters for their approval or rejection. The annexation is
authorized if the ballot proposition that only provides for the
annexation of the area is approved by a simple majority vote. However,
the assumption of indebtedness or both the annexation and assumption of
indebtedness is authorized if the ballot proposition providing for the
assumption of indebtedness, or both the annexation and assumption of
indebtedness, is approved by at least sixty percent of the voters
voting on the petition and the total number of voters voting on the
proposition equals at least forty percent of the number of voters in
the area who voted at the last preceding general election.

Sec. 7 RCW 35A.14.120 and 1989 c 351 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Proceedings for ((initiating annexation of)) a code city to
annex unincorporated territory contiguous to ((a charter code city or
noncharter)) the code city may be commenced by the filing of a petition
((of)) with the legislative body of the code city that is signed by
property owners ((of the territory proposed to be annexed, in the
following manner)). This method of annexation ((shall be)) is an
alternative to other methods provided in this chapter.
(2) Prior to ((the circulation of a)) circulating an annexation
petition ((for annexation)), the initiating party or parties((, who
shall be)) shall file a written notice with the legislative body of the
code city indicating their interest in annexing property to the city
and indicating whether any registered voter resides in the area. The
written notice must be signed by the owners of ((not less than)) real
property in the area proposed to be annexed comprising at least ten
percent ((in value, according to)) of the total assessed valuation
((for general taxation of the property for which annexation is sought,
shall notify the legislative body of the code city in writing of their
intention to commence annexation proceedings)) of all real property in
the area proposed to be annexed. If the area proposed to be annexed
only includes tax exempt property, including property owned by a school
district, the owners of the tax exempt property may file the written
notice with the legislative body.
The legislative body of the code city shall set a date, ((not later
than)) at least sixty days after the filing of the ((request)) notice,
for a meeting with the initiating parties to determine whether the code
city: (a) Will accept, reject, or geographically modify the proposed
annexation((, whether it)); (b) shall require the simultaneous adoption
of a proposed zoning regulation, if such a proposal has been prepared
and filed for the area to be annexed ((as provided for in)) under RCW
35A.14.330 and 35A.14.340((,)); and ((whether it)) (c) shall require
the ((assumption of all or of)) area to assume any portion of existing
city indebtedness ((by the area to be annexed. If the legislative body
requires the assumption of all or of any portion of indebtedness and/or
the adoption of a proposed zoning regulation, it shall record this
action in its minutes and the petition for annexation shall be so drawn
as to clearly indicate these facts)).
Approval by the legislative body shall be a condition precedent to
circulation of the annexation petition. There shall be no appeal from
the decision of the legislative body.
(3) A written petition ((for annexation of)) to annex an
unincorporated area contiguous to a code city, approved for annexation
under subsection (2) of this section, may be filed with the legislative
body of the ((municipality)) code city to which annexation is desired.
((It)) The petition must be signed by the owner or owners, as defined
by RCW 35A.01.040(9) (a) through (d), of ((not less than)) real
property located within the area proposed to be annexed comprising at
least sixty percent ((in value, according to)) of the total assessed
valuation ((for general taxation of the property for which annexation
is petitioned: PROVIDED, That)) of all real property in the area
proposed to be annexed. If the area proposed to be annexed only
includes tax exempt property, including property owned by a school
district, the owner or owners of the tax exempt property may sign the
annexation petition.
However, a petition ((for annexation of)) to annex an area
((having)), with boundaries that are at least eighty percent ((of the
boundaries of such area)) contiguous with a portion of the boundaries
of the code city, ((not including that portion of the boundary of the
area proposed to be annexed that is coterminous with a portion of the
boundary between two counties in this state,)) need only be signed by
((only)) the owner or owners of ((not less than)) real property located
within the area proposed to be annexed comprising at least fifty
percent ((in value according to the assessed valuation for general
taxation)) of all the real property ((for which the annexation is
petitioned)) in that area. Any portion of the boundary of such an area
that is coterminous with the boundaries of two counties in this state
shall not be included in determining whether at least eighty percent of
the boundaries of the area proposed to be annexed are contiguous with
a portion of the code city's boundaries.
((Such)) The annexation petition shall ((set forth a description of
the property according to)) describe the property proposed to be
annexed using government legal subdivisions or legal plats and
((shall)) be accompanied by a map ((which outlines)) outlining the
boundaries of the property ((sought)) proposed to be annexed. If the
legislative body has required ((the assumption of all or)) any portion
of city indebtedness to be assumed by the area proposed to be annexed
or the adoption of a proposed zoning regulation for the area to be
annexed, these facts((, together with a quotation of the minute entry
of such requirement, or requirements,)) shall also be set forth in the
annexation petition.

Sec. 8 RCW 35A.14.130 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.130 are each
amended to read as follows:
Whenever such a petition for annexation is filed with the
legislative body of a code city((, which petition)) and meets the
requirements ((herein specified)) under RCW 35A.14.120 and ((is
sufficient according to)) satisfies the rules set forth in RCW
35A.01.040, the legislative body may ((entertain the same, fix a date
for)) consider the proposed annexation by holding a public hearing
((thereon and cause)) on the proposal. Notice of the public hearing
((to)) shall be published in one or more issues of a newspaper of
general circulation in the code city((. The notice shall also)) and be
posted in three public places within the ((territory proposed for
annexation, and)) area proposed to be annexed. Notices shall specify
the date, time, and place of the public hearing and invite interested
persons to appear and voice approval or disapproval of the annexation.
The expense of publication and posting shall be borne by the signers of
the petition.

Sec. 9 RCW 35A.14.140 and 1986 c 234 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
Following the public hearing, ((if)) the legislative body may adopt
an ordinance providing for the annexation if it determines ((to
effect)) the annexation((, they shall do so by ordinance)) should be
made. Subject to boundary restrictions under RCW 35.02.170, the
ordinance may annex ((all or)) any portion of the proposed area ((but
may not include in the annexation any property not)) described in the
petition. ((Upon passage of the annexation)) If the legislative body
adopts an ordinance to annex all or a portion of the area, it shall
file a certified copy ((shall be filed)) of the ordinance with the
((board of county commissioners)) county legislative authority of the
county in which the annexed property is located. If a boundary review
board exists in the county in which the area proposed to be annexed is
located, the legislative body shall also file a notice of the proposed
annexation with that boundary review board under RCW 36.93.090.

Sec. 10 RCW 35A.14.150 and 1979 ex.s. c 124 s 9 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Unless a valid petition for a ballot proposition provided for
in section 6 of this act has been submitted or the jurisdiction of the
boundary review board has been invoked, the area described in the
ordinance shall become part of the code city effective upon the date
fixed for the annexation in the annexation ordinance ((of annexation
the area annexed shall become part of the city)).
(2) If the boundary review board approves the annexation as
submitted and a valid petition for a ballot proposition provided for in
section 6 of this act has not been submitted, the area described in the
ordinance shall become part of the code city effective upon the date
fixed for the annexation in an ordinance adopted by the legislative
body.
(3) If the boundary review board modifies and approves the
annexation, the altered area shall become part of the code city upon
the date fixed for the modified annexation in a subsequent ordinance
adopted by the legislative body approving the modified annexation if no
registered voter resides in the area, unless a valid petition for a
ballot proposition provided for in section 6 of this act has been
submitted.
(4) If the annexation occurs and the annexation petition provides
so, all property within the ((territory hereafter)) area that is
annexed shall((, if the annexation petition so provided,)) be assessed
and taxed at the same rate and on the same basis as the property of
such annexing code city is assessed and taxed to pay for the portion of
any then-outstanding indebtedness of the code city to which ((said))
the area is annexed, which indebtedness ((has been)) was approved by
((the)) code city voters, contracted for, or incurred prior to, or
existing at, the date of annexation ((and that the city has required to
be assumed)). If the annexation petition provides so ((provided)), all
property in the annexed area shall be subject to and a part of the
proposed zoning regulation as prepared and filed ((as provided for in))
under RCW 35A.14.330 and 35A.14.340.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RCW 28A.335.110 (Real property -- Annexation
to city or town) and 1971 c 69 s 3 are each repealed.

--- END ---