BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.093 and 2003 c 123 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An out-of-state political committee organized for the purpose
of supporting or opposing candidates or ballot propositions in another
state that is not otherwise required to report under RCW 42.17.040
through 42.17.090 shall report as required in this section when it
makes an expenditure supporting or opposing a Washington state
candidate or political committee. The committee shall file with the
commission a statement disclosing:
(a) Its name and address;
(b) The purposes of the out-of-state committee;
(c) The names, addresses, and titles of its officers or, if it has
no officers, the names, addresses, and the titles of its responsible
leaders;
(d) The name, office sought, and party affiliation of each
candidate in the state of Washington whom the out-of-state committee is
supporting or opposing and, if such committee is supporting or opposing
the entire ticket of any party, the name of the party;
(e) The ballot proposition supported or opposed in the state of
Washington, if any, and whether such committee is in favor of or
opposed to such proposition;
(f) The name ((and)), address, and employer of each person
((residing in the state of Washington)) or corporation ((which has a
place of business in the state of Washington)) who has made one or more
contributions in the aggregate of more than ((twenty-five)) one
thousand three hundred fifty dollars to the out-of-state committee
during the current calendar year, together with the money value and
date of such contributions;
(g) The name and address of each person in the state of Washington
to whom an expenditure was made by the out-of-state committee with
respect to a candidate or political committee in the aggregate amount
of more than fifty dollars, the amount, date, and purpose of such
expenditure, and the total sum of such expenditures; and
(h) Such other information as the commission may prescribe by rule
in keeping with the policies and purposes of this chapter.
(2) Each statement shall be filed in the manner and no later than
the ((twentieth day of the month following any month in which a
contribution or other expenditure reportable under subsection (1) of
this section is made. An out-of-state committee incurring an
obligation to file additional statements in a calendar year may satisfy
the obligation by timely filing reports that supplement previously
filed information)) dates set forth as required in RCW 42.17.080 and
42.17.105.
(3) A political committee required to file campaign reports with
the federal election commission or its successor is exempt from
reporting under this section if the federal report contains the
information otherwise required by a state filing and the report is
available for public inspection on or before the date that a state
filing would be required.
(4) All in-state contribution limits apply to all out-of-state
organizations participating in any election at any level within
Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---