BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person under the age of twenty-one to
engage in the wagering activities allowed by this chapter when such
activities are conducted in any portion of a facility under the
ownership or management control of the holder of a license issued by
the liquor control board if: (a) Alcohol for on-site consumption is
sold anywhere in the facility; or (b) the on-site consumption of
alcohol is allowed anywhere in the facility. A violation of this
subsection is a misdemeanor.
(2) It is unlawful for any person twenty-one years of age or older
to assist, participate with, or knowingly allow a person under the age
of twenty-one years to engage in any wagering activity allowed by this
chapter when such activities are conducted in any portion of a facility
under the ownership or management control of the holder of a license
issued by the liquor control board if: (a) Alcohol for on-site
consumption is sold anywhere in the facility; or (b) the on-site
consumption of alcohol is allowed anywhere in the facility. A
violation of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.46.110 and 1999 c 221 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county, city-county, city, or
town, by local law and ordinance, and in accordance with the provisions
of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter, may provide for
the taxing of any gambling activity authorized by this chapter within
its jurisdiction, the tax receipts to go to the county, city-county,
city, or town so taxing the activity. Any such tax imposed by a county
alone shall not apply to any gambling activity within a city or town
located in the county but the tax rate established by a county, if any,
shall constitute the tax rate throughout the unincorporated areas of
such county.
(2) The operation of punch boards and pull-tabs are subject to the
following conditions:
(a) Chances may only be sold to adults;
(b) The price of a single chance may not exceed one dollar;
(c) No punch board or pull-tab license may award as a prize upon a
winning number or symbol being drawn the opportunity of taking a chance
upon any other punch board or pull-tab;
(d) All prizes available to be won must be described on an
information flare. All merchandise prizes must be on display within
the immediate area of the premises in which any such punch board or
pull-tab is located. Upon a winning number or symbol being drawn, a
merchandise prize must be immediately removed from the display and
awarded to the winner. All references to cash or merchandise prizes,
with a value over twenty dollars, must be removed immediately from the
information flare when won, or such omission shall be deemed a fraud
for the purposes of this chapter; and
(e) When any person wins money or merchandise from any punch board
or pull-tab over an amount determined by the commission, every licensee
shall keep a public record of the award for at least ninety days
containing such information as the commission shall deem necessary.
(3)(a) Taxation of bingo and raffles shall never be in an amount
greater than five percent of the gross receipts from a bingo game or
raffle less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise prizes.
(b) ((Taxation of amusement games shall only be in an amount
sufficient to pay the actual costs of enforcement of the provisions of
this chapter by the county, city or town law enforcement agency and in
no event shall such taxation exceed two percent of the gross receipts
from the amusement game less the amount awarded as prizes.
(c))) No tax shall be imposed under the authority of this chapter
on bingo or amusement games when such activities or any combination
thereof are conducted by any bona fide charitable or nonprofit
organization as defined in this chapter, which organization has no paid
operating or management personnel and has gross receipts from bingo or
amusement games, or a combination thereof, not exceeding five thousand
dollars per year, less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise
prizes.
(((d))) (c) No tax shall be imposed on the first ten thousand
dollars of gross receipts less the amount awarded as cash or
merchandise prizes from raffles conducted by any bona fide charitable
or nonprofit organization as defined in this chapter.
(((e))) (d) Taxation of punch boards and pull-tabs for bona fide
charitable or nonprofit organizations is based on gross receipts from
the operation of the games less the amount awarded as cash or
merchandise prizes, and shall not exceed a rate of ten percent. At the
option of the county, city-county, city, or town, the taxation of punch
boards and pull-tabs for commercial stimulant operators may be based on
gross receipts from the operation of the games, and may not exceed a
rate of five percent, or may be based on gross receipts from the
operation of the games less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise
prizes, and may not exceed a rate of ten percent.
(((f))) (e) Taxation of social card games may not exceed twenty
percent of the gross revenue from such games.
(4) Taxes imposed under this chapter become a lien upon personal
and real property used in the gambling activity in the same manner as
provided for under RCW 84.60.010. The lien shall attach on the date
the tax becomes due and shall relate back and have priority against
real and personal property to the same extent as ad valorem taxes.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.46.0321 and 1987 c 4 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
Bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit organizations organized
primarily for purposes other than the conduct of such activities are
hereby authorized to conduct bingo((,)) and raffles((, and amusement
games,)) without obtaining a license to do so from the commission but
only when:
(1) Such activities are held in accordance with all other
requirements of this chapter, other applicable laws, and rules of the
commission;
(2) Said activities are, alone or in any combination, conducted no
more than twice each calendar year and over a period of no more than
twelve consecutive days each time, notwithstanding the limitations of
RCW 9.46.0205: PROVIDED, That a raffle conducted under this subsection
may be conducted for a period longer than twelve days;
(3) Only bona fide members of that organization, who are not paid
for such services, participate in the management or operation of the
activities;
(4) Gross revenues to the organization from all the activities
together do not exceed five thousand dollars during any calendar year;
(5) All revenue therefrom, after deducting the cost of prizes and
other expenses of the activity, is devoted solely to the purposes for
which the organization qualifies as a bona fide charitable or nonprofit
organization;
(6) The organization gives notice at least five days in advance of
the conduct of any of the activities to the local police agency of the
jurisdiction within which the activities are to be conducted of the
organization's intent to conduct the activities, the location of the
activities, and the date or dates they will be conducted; and
(7) The organization conducting the activities maintains records
for a period of one year from the date of the event which accurately
show at a minimum the gross revenue from each activity, details of the
expenses of conducting the activities, and details of the uses to which
the gross revenue therefrom is put.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.285 and 2005 c 369 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
operating contests of chance; as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to the business of operating contests of chance is equal
to the gross income of the business derived from contests of chance
multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed on those persons subject to tax in
subsection (1) of this section. The amount of the additional tax with
respect to the business of operating contests of chance is equal to the
gross income of the business derived from contests of chance multiplied
by the rate of 0.1 percent through June 30, 2006, and 0.13 percent
thereafter. The money collected under this subsection (2) shall be
deposited in the problem gambling account created in RCW 43.20A.892.
This subsection does not apply to businesses operating contests of
chance when the gross income from the operation of contests of chance
is less than fifty thousand dollars per year.
(3) For the purpose of this section, "contests of chance" means any
contests, games, gaming schemes, or gaming devices, other than the
state lottery as defined in RCW 67.70.010, in which the outcome depends
in a material degree upon an element of chance, notwithstanding that
skill of the contestants may also be a factor in the outcome. The term
includes social card games, bingo, raffle, and punchboard games, and
pull-tabs as defined in chapter 9.46 RCW. The term does not include
race meets for the conduct of which a license must be secured from the
Washington horse racing commission((, or "amusement game" as defined in
RCW 9.46.0201)).
(4) "Gross income of the business" does not include the monetary
value or actual cost of any prizes that are awarded, amounts paid to
players for winning wagers, accrual of prizes for progressive jackpot
contests, or repayment of amounts used to seed guaranteed progressive
jackpot prizes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 9.46.0201 ("Amusement game") and 1987 c 4 s 2; and
(2) RCW 9.46.0331 (Amusement games authorized -- Minimum rules) and
1991 c 287 s 1 & 1987 c 4 s 30.

--- END ---