BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.470 and 2005 c 412 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The fees specified in this section shall be collected by the
department in advance of the requested action.
(1) For the examination of an application for a permit to
appropriate water, a minimum fee of fifty dollars must be remitted with
the application. For an amount of water exceeding one-half cubic foot
per second, the examination fee shall be assessed upon the consumptive
portion of the proposed appropriation at the rate of one dollar per one
hundredth cubic foot per second. In no case will the examination fee
be less than fifty dollars or more than twenty-five thousand dollars.
No fee is required under this subsection (1) for an application filed
by a party to a cost reimbursement agreement made under RCW 90.03.265.
(2) For the examination of an application to store water, a fee of
two dollars for each acre foot of storage proposed shall be charged,
but a minimum fee of fifty dollars must be remitted with the
application. In no case will the examination fee for a storage project
be less than fifty dollars or more than twenty-five thousand dollars.
No fee is required under this subsection (2) for an application filed
by a party to a cost reimbursement agreement made under RCW 90.03.265.
(3)(a) For the examination of an application to transfer, change,
or amend a water right certificate, permit, or claim as authorized by
RCW 90.44.100, 90.44.105, or 90.03.380, a minimum fee of fifty dollars
must be remitted with the application. For an application for change
involving an amount of water exceeding one cubic foot per second, the
total examination fee shall be assessed upon the consumptive portion of
the proposed transfer, change, or amendment at the rate of fifty cents
per one hundredth cubic foot per second. For an application for change
of a storage water right, the total examination fee shall be assessed
at the rate of one dollar for each acre foot of water involved in the
change. The fee shall be based on the amount of water subject to
change as proposed in the application, not on the total amount of water
reflected in the water right certificate, permit, or claim. In no case
will the examination fee charged for a change application be less than
fifty dollars or more than twelve thousand five hundred dollars.
(b) The examination fee for a temporary or seasonal change under
RCW 90.03.390 is fifty dollars and must be remitted with the
application.
(c) No fee is required under this subsection (3) for:
(i) An application to process a change relating to donation of a
trust water right to the state;
(ii) An application to process a change when the department
otherwise acquires a trust water right for purposes of improving
instream flows or for other public purposes;
(iii) An application filed with a water conservancy board according
to chapter 90.80 RCW or for the review of a water conservancy board's
record of decision submitted to the department according to chapter
90.80 RCW; or
(iv) An application filed by a party to a cost reimbursement
agreement made under RCW 90.03.265.
(d) For a change, transfer, or amendment involving a single project
operating under more than one water right, including related secondary
diversion rights, or involving the consolidation of multiple water
rights, only one examination fee and one certificate fee are required
to be paid.
(4) The fifty-dollar minimum fee payable with the application shall
be a credit to the total amount whenever the examination fee totals
more than fifty dollars under the schedule specified in subsections (1)
through (3) of this section and in such case the further fee due shall
be the total computed amount, less the amount previously paid. Within
five working days from receipt of an application, the department shall
notify the applicant by registered mail of any additional fees due
under subsections (1) through (3) of this section.
(5) The fees specified in subsections (1) through (3) of this
section do not apply to any filings for emergency withdrawal
authorizations or temporary drought-related water right changes
authorized under RCW 43.83B.410 that are received by the department
while a drought condition order issued under RCW 43.83B.405 is in
effect.
(6) For applying for each extension of time for beginning
construction work under a permit to appropriate water, for completion
of construction work, or for completing application of water to a
beneficial use, a fee of fifty dollars is required. These fees also
apply to similar extensions of time requested under a change or
transfer authorization.
(7) For the inspection of any hydraulic works to insure safety to
life and property, a fee based on the actual cost of the inspection,
including the expense incident thereto, is required except as follows:
(a) For any hydraulic works less than ten years old, that the
department examined and approved the construction plans and
specifications as to its safety when required under RCW 90.03.350,
there shall be no fee charged; or (b) for any hydraulic works more than
ten years old, but less than twenty years old, that the department
examined and approved the construction plans and specifications as to
its safety when required under RCW 90.03.350, the fee charged shall not
exceed the fee for a significant hazard dam.
(8) For the examination of plans and specifications as to safety of
controlling works for storage of ten acre feet or more of water, a
minimum fee of ten dollars, or a fee equal to the actual cost, is
required.
(9) For recording an assignment either of a permit to appropriate
water or of an application for such a permit, a fee of fifty dollars is
required.
(10) For preparing and issuing all water right certificates, a fee
of fifty dollars is required.
(11) For filing and recording a formal protest against granting any
application, a fee of fifty dollars is required. No fee is required to
submit a comment, by mail or otherwise, regarding an application.
(12) For filing an application to amend a water right claim filed
under chapter 90.14 RCW, a fee of fifty dollars is required.
(13) An application or request for an action as provided for under
this section is incomplete unless accompanied by the fee or the minimum
fee. If no fee or an amount less than the minimum fee accompanies an
application or other request for an action as provided under this
section, the department shall return the application or request to the
applicant with advice as to the fee that must be remitted with the
application or request for it to be accepted for processing. If
additional fees are due, the department shall provide timely
notification by certified mail with return receipt requested to the
applicant. No action may be taken by the department until the fee is
paid in full. Failure to remit fees within sixty days of the
department's notification is grounds for rejecting the application or
request or canceling the permit. Cash shall not be accepted. Fees
must be paid by check or money order and are nonrefundable.
(14) For purposes of calculating fees for ground water filings, one
cubic foot per second shall be regarded as equivalent to four hundred
fifty gallons per minute.
(15) Eighty percent of the fees collected by the department under
this section shall be deposited in the state general fund. Twenty
percent of the fees collected by the department under this section
shall be deposited in the water rights tracking system account
established in RCW 90.14.240.
(16) Except for the fees relating to the inspection of hydraulic
works and the examination of plans and specifications of controlling
works provided for in subsections (7) and (8) of this section, nothing
in this section is intended to grant authority to the department to
amend the fees in this section by adoption of rules or otherwise.

--- END ---