BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.08.010 and 2005 c 246 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter: "Information required for voter
registration" means the minimum information provided on a voter
registration application that is required by the county auditor in
order to place a voter registration applicant on the voter registration
rolls. This information includes:
(1) Name;
(2) Residential address;
(3) Date of birth;
(4) Washington state driver's license number or Washington state
identification card number, or the last four digits of the applicant's
Social Security number if the applicant does not have a Washington
state driver's license or Washington state identification card;
(5)(a) A signature attesting to the truth of the information
provided on the application; or
(b) Affirmative acceptance of the information on an electronic
voter registration application as true and a signature obtained from
the department of licensing; and
(6) A check or indication in the box confirming the individual is
a United States citizen.
If the individual does not have a driver's license, state
identification card, or Social Security number, the registrant must be
issued a unique voter registration number in order to be placed on the
voter registration rolls. All other information supplied is ancillary
and not to be used as grounds for not registering an applicant to vote.
Modification of the language of the official Washington state voter
registration form by the voter will not be accepted and will cause the
rejection of the registrant's application.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.08.110 and 2005 c 246 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An application is considered complete only if it contains:
(a) The applicant's name((,));
(b) The applicant's complete valid residence address((,));
(c) The applicant's date of birth((,));
(d) A signature attesting to the truth of the information provided,
or, in the case of an electronic application, affirmative acceptance of
the information as true and a signature obtained from the department of
licensing;
(e) A mark in the check-off box confirming United States
citizenship((,)); and
(f) An indication that the provided driver's license number, state
identification card number, or Social Security number has been
confirmed by the secretary of state.
If ((it)) the application is not complete, the auditor shall
promptly mail a verification notice of the deficiency to the applicant.
This verification notice shall require the applicant to provide the
missing information. If the verification notice is not returned by the
applicant within forty-five days or is returned as undeliverable, the
name of the applicant shall not be placed on the official list of
registered voters. If the applicant provides the required verified
information, the applicant shall be registered to vote as of the
original date of mailing or date of delivery, whichever is applicable.
(2) If the information required in subsection (1) of this section
is complete, the applicant is considered to be registered to vote as of
the original date of mailing ((or)), date of delivery, ((whichever is
applicable)) or date of submission in the case of an electronic
application. The auditor shall record the appropriate precinct
identification, taxing district identification, and date of
registration on the voter's record in the state voter registration
list. Within forty-five days after the receipt of an application but
no later than seven days before the next primary, special election, or
general election, the auditor shall send to the applicant, by first
class mail, an acknowledgement notice identifying the registrant's
precinct and containing such other information as may be required by
the secretary of state. The postal service shall be instructed not to
forward a voter registration card to any other address and to return to
the auditor any card which is not deliverable.
(3) If an acknowledgement notice card is properly mailed as
required by this section to the address listed by the voter as being
the voter's mailing address and the notice is subsequently returned to
the auditor by the postal service as being undeliverable to the voter
at that address, the auditor shall promptly send the voter a
confirmation notice. The auditor shall place the voter's registration
on inactive status pending a response from the voter to the
confirmation notice.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.08.107 and 2005 c 246 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of state must review the information provided by
each voter registration applicant to ensure that the provided driver's
license number, state identification card number, or last four digits
of the Social Security number match the information maintained by the
Washington department of licensing or the Social Security
administration. If a match cannot be made, the secretary of state or
county auditor must correspond with the applicant to resolve the
discrepancy.
(2) If the applicant submitted an electronic voter registration
application, the secretary of state must obtain a digital copy of the
applicant's driver's license or state identification card signature
from the department of licensing.
(3) If the applicant fails to respond to any correspondence
required in this section to confirm information provided on a voter
registration application within forty-five days, the applicant will not
be registered to vote. The secretary of state shall forward the
application to the appropriate county auditor for document storage.
(((3))) (4) Only after the secretary of state has confirmed that
the provided driver's license number, state identification card number,
or last four digits of the applicant's Social Security number match
existing records with the Washington department of licensing or the
Social Security administration, or determined that the applicant does
not have a driver's license number, state identification card number,
or Social Security number may the applicant be placed on the official
list of registered voters.
(((4))) (5) In order to prevent duplicate registration records, all
complete voter registration applications must be screened against
existing voter registration records in the official statewide voter
registration list. If a match of an existing record is found in the
official list, the record must be updated with the new information
provided on the application. If the new information indicates that the
voter has changed his or her county of residence, the application must
be forwarded to the voter's new county of residence for processing.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.08.145 and 2005 c 246 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
This section establishes a special procedure which an elector may
use to register to vote or transfer a voter registration by changing
his or her address during the period beginning after the closing of
registration for voting at the polls under RCW 29A.08.140 and ending on
the fifteenth day before a primary, special election, or general
election. A qualified elector in the state may register to vote or
change his or her registration address in person in the office of the
county auditor of the county in which the applicant resides, or at a
voter registration location specifically designated for this purpose by
the county auditor or secretary of state, and apply for an absentee
ballot for that primary or election. The auditor or registration
assistant shall register that individual in the manner provided in this
chapter. The application for an absentee ballot executed by the newly
registered or transferred voter for the primary or election that
follows the execution of the registration shall be promptly transmitted
to the auditor with the completed voter registration form. An elector
may not register to vote under this section using an electronic voter
registration application.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.08.210 and 2005 c 246 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
An applicant for voter registration shall complete an application
providing the following information concerning his or her
qualifications as a voter in this state:
(1) The address of the last former registration of the applicant as
a voter in the state;
(2) The applicant's full name;
(3) The applicant's date of birth;
(4) The address of the applicant's residence for voting purposes;
(5) The mailing address of the applicant if that address is not the
same as the address in subsection (4) of this section;
(6) The sex of the applicant;
(7) The applicant's Washington state driver's license number or
Washington state identification card number, or the last four digits of
the applicant's Social Security number if he or she does not have a
Washington state driver's license or Washington state identification
card;
(8) A check box for the applicant to indicate that he or she does
not have a Washington state driver's license, Washington state
identification card, or Social Security number;
(9) A check box allowing the applicant to indicate that he or she
is a member of the armed forces, national guard, or reserves, or that
he or she is an overseas voter;
(10) A check box allowing the applicant to confirm that he or she
((is)) will be at least eighteen years of age before the next election;
(11) Clear and conspicuous language, designed to draw the
applicant's attention, stating that the applicant must be a United
States citizen in order to register to vote;
(12) A check box and declaration confirming that the applicant is
a citizen of the United States;
(13) The following warning:
"If you knowingly provide false information on this voter
registration form or knowingly make a false declaration about your
qualifications for voter registration you will have committed a class
C felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to five years, a
fine of up to ten thousand dollars, or both."
(14) The following affirmation by the applicant:
"By signing this document, I hereby assert, under penalty of
perjury, that I am legally eligible to vote. If I am found to have
voted illegally, I may be prosecuted and/or fined for this illegal act.
In addition, I hereby acknowledge that my name and last known address
will be forwarded to the appropriate state and/or federal authorities
if I am found to have voted illegally."
(15) The following oath ((required by RCW 29A.08.230 and a)):

"I declare that the facts on this voter registration form are true.
I am a citizen of the United States, I am not presently denied my civil
rights as a result of being convicted of a felony, I will have lived in
Washington at this address for thirty days immediately before the next
election at which I vote, and I will be at least eighteen years old
when I vote."

(16) A space for the applicant's signature, or, in the case of an
electronic application, affirmative acceptance of the information on
the application as true and assent to use of the applicant's driver's
license or state identification card signature for voter registration
purposes; and
(((16))) (17) Any other information that the secretary of state
determines is necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and
prevent duplicate or fraudulent voter registrations.
This information shall be recorded on a single registration form to
be prescribed by the secretary of state. The information may be
recorded on an electronic voter registration application provided on
the secretary of state's web site. In order to submit an electronic
voter registration application, the applicant must have a Washington
state driver's license or Washington state identification card, and
must agree to use of the driver's license or state identification card
signature for voter registration purposes.
If the applicant fails to provide the information required for
voter registration, the auditor shall send the applicant a verification
notice. The applicant may not be registered until the required
information is provided. If a verification notice is returned as
undeliverable or the applicant fails to respond to the notice within
forty-five days, the applicant shall not be registered to vote.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.08.230 (Oath of applicant) and 2003 c 111 s 218, 1994
c 57 s 12, 1990 c 143 s 8, 1973 1st ex.s. c 21 s 4, 1971 ex.s. c 202 s
10, & 1965 c 9 s 29.07.080; and
(2) RCW 29A.72.220 (Petitions -- Signature checking -- Registration
information file) and 2003 c 111 s 1801.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect January 1, 2007.

--- END ---