BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 25.15 RCW
under Article VIII to read as follows:
The dissolution of a limited liability company does not take away
or impair any remedy available against that limited liability company,
its managers, or its members for any right or claim existing, or any
liability incurred at any time, whether prior to or after dissolution,
unless an action or other proceeding thereon is not commenced within
three years after the effective date of dissolution. Such an action or
proceeding against the limited liability company may be defended by the
limited liability company in its own name.

--- END ---