BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The superintendent of public instruction
shall request the United States department of education to provide
flexibility to local school districts in selecting the assessments
administered in grades three, five, six, and eight in reading and
mathematics as required by P.L. 107-110. The superintendent shall
request the flexibility to incorporate a combination of statewide and
locally selected assessments to provide options for school district
boards of directors to use in grades three, five, six, and eight.
(2) In developing the proposal to request flexibility, the
superintendent of public instruction shall work with local school
directors, school districts, school administrators, teachers,
principals, other school staff, and parents.
(3) After receiving approval from the United States department of
education, the superintendent of public instruction shall revise the
Washington state accountability plan required under section 1111 of
P.L. 107-110, the no child left behind act of 2001, to incorporate the
flexibility into the plan.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit the
revised Washington state accountability plan to the education
committees of the legislature for review no later than the 2007
legislative session.

--- END ---