BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed to a buyer of syrup to be used by the buyer in making
carbonated beverages that are sold by the buyer if the tax imposed by
RCW 82.64.020 has been paid in respect to the syrup. The amount of the
credit shall be equal to fifty percent of the taxes imposed under RCW
82.64.020 in respect to the syrup purchased by the buyer.
(2) Credit under this section shall be earned, and claimed against
taxes due under this chapter, for the tax reporting period in which the
syrup was purchased by the person claiming credit under this section.
The credit shall not exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter
for the tax reporting period. Unused credit may be carried over and
used in subsequent tax reporting periods, except that no credit may be
claimed more than twelve months from the end of the tax reporting
period in which the credit was earned. No refunds shall be granted for
credits under this section.
(3) No credit is available under this section for taxes paid under
RCW 82.64.020 before the effective date of this act.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "carbonated beverage,"
"previously taxed syrup," and "syrup" have the same meanings as
provided in RCW 82.64.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---