BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds it necessary to
regulate the practice of offering to reunite the apparent owner or
heirs with unclaimed property for a fee. The legislature intends that
only individuals who obtain a license under this chapter may represent
themselves in this state as heir finders or asset or unclaimed property
locators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) No person may represent himself or
herself as an unclaimed property locator without first obtaining a
license as required by this chapter.
(2) A person represents himself or herself to be an unclaimed
property locator when the person adopts or uses any title or
description of services that incorporates one or more of the following
or substantially similar terms: Property locator, asset locator, or
heir finder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(2) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.
(3) "Unclaimed property locator" means a person or business entity
that offers to reunite the apparent owners or heirs with unclaimed
property for a fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In addition to any other authority provided
by law, the director may:
(1) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW that are
necessary to implement this chapter;
(2) Set all renewal, late renewal, duplicate, and verification fees
by rule;
(3) Establish the forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(4) Issue a license to any applicant who has met the requirements
for licensure;
(5) Hire clerical and administrative staff as needed to implement
and administer this chapter;
(6) Maintain the official departmental record of all applicants and
license holders;
(7) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of a failure to
obtain a license; and
(8) Set the criteria for meeting the standard required for
licensure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The director and individuals acting on the
director's behalf are not civilly liable for any act performed in good
faith in the course of their duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 An applicant must meet the following minimum
requirements to obtain an unclaimed property locator license:
(1) Be at least eighteen years of age;
(2) Be a citizen of the United States or a resident alien;
(3) Not have been convicted of a crime in any jurisdiction, if the
director determines that the applicant's particular crime directly
relates to his or her capacity to perform the duties of an unclaimed
property locator, and the director determines that the license should
be withheld to protect the citizens of Washington state. The director
shall make her or his determination to withhold a license because of
previous convictions notwithstanding the restoration of employment
rights act, chapter 9.96A RCW;
(4) Pay the required nonrefundable fee for each application; and
(5) Submit a fully completed application that includes proper
identification on a form prescribed by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Applications for a license must be submitted
on forms provided by the department. The department may require
information and documentation to determine whether the applicant meets
the standard for a license as provided in this chapter. Each applicant
shall pay a fee determined by the director in rule which shall
accompany the application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The director shall establish by rule the
requirements and the renewal and late renewal fees for a license.
Failure to renew the license on or before the expiration date cancels
all privileges granted by the license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 An unclaimed property locator may charge a
maximum fee of two and one-half percent of the property value
successfully returned or fifty dollars, whichever is greater. An
unclaimed property locator may not separately bill for the costs of
postage, photocopies, attorney or consultant fees, consultation visits,
and other offered services connected with locating or returning the
property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The director or the director's designee may
at any time examine and investigate the business and examine the books,
accounts, records, and files, or other information, wherever located,
of any licensee or person who the director has reason to believe is
engaging in the business governed by this chapter. For these purposes,
the director or the director's designee may require the attendance of
and examine under oath all persons whose testimony may be required
about the business or the subject matter of the investigation. The
director or the director's designee may require the production of
original books, accounts, records, files, or other information, or may
make copies of such original books, accounts, records, files, or other
information. The director or the director's designee may issue a
subpoena or subpoena duces tecum requiring attendance and testimony, or
the production of the books, accounts, records, files, or other
information. The director shall collect from the licensee the actual
cost of the examination or investigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The director may issue and serve upon
a licensee or applicant a statement of charges if, in the opinion of
the director, any licensee or applicant:
(a) Is engaging or has engaged in an unsafe or unsound financial
practice in conducting the business of an unclaimed property locator
governed by this chapter;
(b) Is violating or has violated this chapter, including rules,
orders, or subpoenas, adopted under this chapter or any condition
imposed in writing by the director or the director's designee in
connection with the granting of any application or other request by the
licensee or any written agreement made with the director;
(c) Is about to do the acts prohibited in (a) or (b) of this
subsection when the opinion that the threat exists is based upon
reasonable cause;
(d) Obtains a license by means of fraud, misrepresentation,
concealment, or through mistake or inadvertence of the director;
(e) Provides false statements or omissions of material information
on the application that, if known, would have allowed the director to
deny the application for the original license;
(f) Fails to pay a fee required by the director;
(g) Commits a crime against the laws of the state of Washington or
any other state or government involving moral turpitude, financial
misconduct, or dishonest dealings;
(h) Knowingly commits or is a party to any material fraud,
misrepresentation, concealment, conspiracy, collusion, trick, scheme,
or device whereby any other person relying upon the word,
representation, or conduct acts to his or her injury or damage;
(i) Converts any money or its equivalent to his or her own use or
to the use of his or her principal or of any other person;
(j) Fails, upon demand by the director or the director's designee,
to disclose any information within his or her knowledge to, or to
produce any document, book, or record in his or her possession for
inspection of, the director or the director's designee;
(k) Commits any act of fraudulent or dishonest dealing, and a
certified copy of the final holding of any court, tribunal, agency, or
administrative body of competent jurisdiction regarding that act is
conclusive evidence in any hearing under this chapter; or
(l) Commits an act or engages in conduct that demonstrates
incompetence or untrustworthiness, or is a source of injury and loss to
the public.
(2) The statement of charges shall be issued under chapter 34.05
RCW. The director or the director's designee may impose the following
sanctions against any licensee or applicant, or any director, officer,
sole proprietor, partner, controlling person, or employee of a licensee
or applicant:
(a) Deny, revoke, suspend, or condition the license;
(b) Order the licensee to cease and desist from practices in
violation of this chapter or practices that constitute unsafe and
unsound financial practices;
(c) Impose a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars per day for
each day's violation of this chapter;
(d) Order restitution to clients or other parties damaged by the
licensee's violation of this chapter or take other affirmative action
as necessary to comply with this chapter; and
(e) Remove from office or ban from participation in the affairs of
any licensee any director, officer, sole proprietor, partner,
controlling person, or employee of a licensee.
(3) The proceedings to impose the sanctions described in subsection
(2) of this section, including any hearing or appeal of the statement
of charges, are governed by chapter 34.05 RCW.
Unless the licensee personally appears at the hearing or is
represented by a duly authorized representative, the licensee is deemed
to have consented to the statement of charges and the sanctions imposed
in the statement of charges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Whenever the director determines that the
acts specified in section 11 of this act or their continuation is
likely to cause substantial injury to the public, the director may also
issue a temporary cease and desist order requiring the licensee to
cease and desist from the violation or practice. The order becomes
effective upon service upon the licensee and remains effective unless
set aside, limited, or suspended by a court under section 13 of this
act pending the completion of the administrative proceedings under the
notice and until such time as the director dismisses the charges
specified in the notice or until the effective date of the cease and
desist order issued against the licensee under section 11 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Within ten days after a licensee has been
served with a temporary cease and desist order, the licensee may apply
to the superior court in the county of its principal place of business
for an injunction setting aside, limiting, or suspending the order
pending the completion of the administrative proceedings pursuant to
the notice served under section 12 of this act. The superior court has
jurisdiction to issue the injunction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 In the case of a violation or threatened
violation of a temporary cease and desist order issued under section 12
of this act, the director may apply to the superior court of the county
of the principal place of business of the licensee for an injunction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Whenever as a result of an examination or
report it appears to the director that:
(1) Any licensee is conducting its business in such an unsafe or
unsound manner as to render its further operations hazardous to the
public;
(2) Any licensee has refused to submit its books, papers, and
affairs to the inspection of the director or the director's examiner;
(3) Any officer of any licensee refuses to be examined under oath
regarding the business of the licensee; or
(4) Any licensee neglects or refuses to comply with any order of
the director made under this chapter unless the enforcement of such an
order is restrained in a proceeding brought by the licensee;
the director may immediately take possession of the property and
business of the licensee and retain possession until the licensee
resumes business. The licensee may resume business upon such terms as
the director may prescribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The legislature finds and declares that any
violation of this chapter substantially affects the public interest and
is an unfair and deceptive act or practice and an unfair method of
competition in the conduct of trade or commerce as set forth in RCW
19.86.020. Remedies available under chapter 19.86 RCW shall not affect
any other remedy the injured party may have.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The director has the power, and broad
administrative discretion, to administer and interpret the provisions
of this chapter to ensure the protection of the public.

Sec. 18 RCW 63.29.350 and 1983 c 179 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is unlawful for any person to seek or receive from any person or
contract with any person for any fee or compensation for locating or
purporting to locate any property which he or she knows has been
reported or paid or delivered to the department of revenue pursuant to
this chapter in excess of ((five)) two and one-half percent or fifty
dollars, whichever is greater, of the value thereof returned to such
owner. Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor
and shall be fined not less than the amount of the fee or charge he has
sought or received or contracted for, and not more than ten times such
amount, or imprisoned for not more than thirty days, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 1 through 17 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---