BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A city with a population of five hundred
thousand or greater has sixty days from the effective date of this
section to negotiate a lease of aquatic lands with the department. If
the city fails to negotiate the lease of aquatic lands, the department
of natural resources may impose the lease conditions of a county with
a population of one million or greater.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of natural resources and the
city with a population of five hundred thousand or greater may utilize
the services of a mediator to ensure the successful negotiation of the
leases referenced in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A city with a population of five hundred
thousand or greater may not be granted, nor may it spend, any aquatic
lands enhancement account funds until all leases referenced in this act
are signed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires June 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---