BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.801 and 2005 c 355 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative youth advisory council is established to
examine issues of importance to youth, including but not limited to
education, employment, strategies to increase youth participation in
state and municipal government, safe environments for youth, substance
abuse, emotional and physical health, foster care, poverty,
homelessness, and youth access to services on a statewide and municipal
basis.
(2) The council consists of twenty-two members as provided in this
subsection who, at the time of appointment, are aged ((fourteen))
twelve to eighteen. The council shall select a chair from among its
members.
(a) Five members shall be selected by each of the two major
caucuses in the senate, appointed by the secretary of the senate.
(b) Five members shall be selected by each of the two major
caucuses in the house of representatives, appointed by the chief clerk
of the house of representatives.
(c) The governor shall appoint two members.
(3) Except for initial members, members shall serve two-year terms,
and if eligible, may be reappointed for subsequent two-year terms.
One-half of the initial members shall be appointed to one-year terms,
and these appointments shall be made in such a way as to preserve
overall representation on the committee.
(4) The council shall have the following duties:
(a) Advising the legislature on proposed and pending legislation,
including state budget expenditures and policy matters relating to
youth;
(b) Advising the standing committees of the legislature and study
commissions, committees, and task forces regarding issues relating to
youth;
(c) Conducting periodic seminars for its members regarding
leadership, government, and the legislature; and
(d) Reporting annually by December 1 to the legislature on its
activities, including proposed legislation that implements
recommendations of the council.
(5) In carrying out its duties under subsection (4) of this
section, the council may meet at least three times but not more than
six times per year, including not more than two public hearings on
issues of importance to youth.
(6) Members shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(7) The office of superintendent of public instruction shall
provide administration, coordination, and facilitation assistance to
the council. The senate and house of representatives may provide
policy and fiscal briefings and assistance with drafting proposed
legislation. The senate and the house of representatives shall each
develop internal policies relating to staff assistance provided to the
council. Such policies may include applicable internal personnel and
practices guidelines, resource use and expense reimbursement
guidelines, and applicable ethics mandates. Provision of funds,
resources, and staff, as well as the assignment and direction of staff,
remains at all times within the sole discretion of the chamber making
the provision.
(8) The office of superintendent of public instruction, the
legislature, any agency of the legislature, and any official or
employee of such office or agency are immune from liability for any
injury that is incurred by or caused by a member of the youth advisory
council and that occurs while the member of the council is performing
duties of the council or is otherwise engaged in activities or
receiving services for which reimbursement is allowed under subsection
(6) of this section. The immunity provided by this subsection does not
apply to an injury intentionally caused by the act or omission of an
employee or official of the superintendent of public instruction or the
legislature or any agency of the legislature.
(((9) This section expires June 30, 2007.))

--- END ---