BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The holder of a license to manufacture wine
issued by this state or another state may ship its wine to a person who
is a resident of Washington and is twenty-one years of age or older for
that person's personal use and not for resale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Before wine may be shipped by a domestic
winery or an out-of-state winery to a person who is a resident of
Washington, the winery must:
(1) Obtain a wine shipper's permit under procedures prescribed by
the board by rule and pay a fee established by the board, if the winery
is located outside the state; or
(2) Be licensed as a domestic winery by the board and have paid the
annual license fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) An applicant for a wine shipper's permit
under section 2 of this act must:
(a) Operate a winery located in the United States;
(b) Provide the board a copy of its valid license to manufacture
wine issued by another state;
(c) Certify that it holds all state and federal licenses and
permits necessary to operate a winery; and
(d) Register with the department of revenue under RCW 82.32.030.
(2) Holders of a winery certificate of approval under RCW
66.24.206(1)(a) are deemed to hold a wine shipper's permit without
further application or fee, if the holder meets all requirements for a
wine shipper's permit. A winery certificate of approval holder who
wants to ship wine under its wine shipper's permit privilege must
notify the liquor control board in a manner determined by the board
before shipping any wine to a Washington consumer.
(3) Holders of a wine shipper's permit must:
(a) Pay the tax under RCW 66.24.210 for sales of wine to Washington
state residents; and
(b) Collect and remit to the department of revenue all applicable
state and local sales and use taxes imposed by or under the authority
of chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on all sales of wine delivered
to buyers in this state, regardless of whether the permit holder has a
physical presence in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A domestic winery or a wine shipper's
permit holder must clearly label all wine cases or outside shipping
packages of wine sent into or out of this state under this act to
indicate that the package cannot be delivered to a person under twenty-one years of age or to an intoxicated person.
(2) A domestic winery or a wine shipper's permit holder must ensure
that the private carrier used to deliver wine (a) obtains the signature
of the person who receives the wine upon delivery, (b) verifies the age
of the recipient, and (c) verifies that the recipient does not appear
intoxicated at the time of delivery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A wine shipper's permit holder and a
domestic winery must report to the board, on or before the twentieth
day of each month, all shipments of wine made during the preceding
calendar month directly to Washington consumers under a wine shipper's
permit or a domestic winery license in effect for all or any portion of
the preceding year. All reports will be on forms prescribed by the
board.
(2) A wine shipper's permit holder, a winery certificate of
approval holder, or domestic winery who advertises or offers wine for
direct shipment to customers within this state must clearly and
conspicuously display the permit or license number in its advertising.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A fee for a wine shipper's permit may be
established by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Holders of a wine shipper's permit are
deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of Washington concerning
enforcement of this act and all laws, rules, and regulations related to
the shipment of wine from wine manufacturers directly to consumers.
(2)(a) A permit issued under this act to a wine manufacturer
located outside this state who fails to comply with the provisions of
this act shall be suspended or revoked.
(b) The privilege to ship wine directly to Washington consumers
under a domestic winery license shall be suspended or revoked if the
domestic winery fails to comply with the provisions of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 66.24.210 and 2001 c 124 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby imposed upon all wines except cider sold to
wine distributors and the Washington state liquor control board, within
the state a tax at the rate of twenty and one-fourth cents per liter.
There is hereby imposed on all cider sold to wine distributors and the
Washington state liquor control board within the state a tax at the
rate of three and fifty-nine one-hundredths cents per liter: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That wine sold or shipped in bulk from one winery to another
winery shall not be subject to such tax. The tax provided for in this
section shall be collected by direct payments based on wine purchased
by wine distributors. Except as provided in subsection (7) of this
section, every person purchasing wine under the provisions of this
section shall on or before the twentieth day of each month report to
the board all purchases during the preceding calendar month in such
manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board, and with
such report shall pay the tax due from the purchases covered by such
report unless the same has previously been paid. Any such purchaser of
wine whose applicable tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth
day following the month of purchase will be assessed a penalty at the
rate of two percent a month or fraction thereof. The board may require
that every such person shall execute to and file with the board a bond
to be approved by the board, in such amount as the board may fix,
securing the payment of the tax. If any such person fails to pay the
tax when due, the board may forthwith suspend or cancel the license
until all taxes are paid.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section. All revenues collected during any month from this additional
tax shall be transferred to the state general fund by the twenty-fifth
day of the following month.
(3) An additional tax is imposed on wines subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section, at the rate of one-fourth of one cent
per liter for wine sold after June 30, 1987. After June 30, 1996, such
additional tax does not apply to cider. An additional tax of five one-hundredths of one cent per liter is imposed on cider sold after June
30, 1996. All revenues collected under this subsection (3) shall be
disbursed quarterly to the Washington wine commission for use in
carrying out the purposes of chapter 15.88 RCW.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all wine subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to twenty-three and forty-four one-hundredths cents per liter on fortified wine
as defined in RCW 66.04.010(((38))) (39) when bottled or packaged by
the manufacturer, one cent per liter on all other wine except cider,
and eighteen one-hundredths of one cent per liter on cider. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(5)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all cider subject to tax
under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to
two and four one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June
30, 1996, and before July 1, 1997, and is equal to four and seven one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1997.
(b) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (5) shall be deposited in the health services account
under RCW 43.72.900.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "cider" means table wine that
contains not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume and
not more than seven percent of alcohol by volume and is made from the
normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe apples or
pears. "Cider" includes, but is not limited to, flavored, sparkling,
or carbonated cider and cider made from condensed apple or pear must.
(7) For the purposes of this section, out-of-state wineries shall
pay taxes under this section on wine sold and shipped directly to
Washington state residents in a manner consistent with the requirements
of a wine distributor under subsections (1) through (4) of this
section, except wineries shall be responsible for the tax and not the
resident purchaser.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 7 of this act are each
added to chapter 66.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 66.12.190 (Wine shipments from out of state -- Limitations)
and 1991 c 149 s 1;
(2) RCW 66.12.200 (Out-of-state wine shipments -- Labeling) and 1991
c 149 s 2;
(3) RCW 66.12.210 (Wine shipments from out of state from unlicensed
shipper -- Penalties) and 1994 c 70 s 1 & 1991 c 149 s 3; and
(4) RCW 66.12.220 (Out-of-state wine shipper's license -- Revocation)
and 1991 c 149 s 4.

--- END ---