BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.73.090 and 2000 c 195 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of RCW 9.73.030 through 9.73.080 shall not apply
to police, fire, emergency medical service, emergency communication
center, and poison center personnel in the following instances:
(a) Recording incoming telephone calls to police and fire stations,
licensed emergency medical service providers, emergency communication
centers, and poison centers;
(b) Video and/or sound recordings may be made of arrested persons
by police officers responsible for making arrests or holding persons in
custody before their first appearance in court. Such video and/or
sound recordings shall conform strictly to the following:
(i) The arrested person shall be informed that such recording is
being made and the statement so informing him shall be included in the
recording;
(ii) The recording shall commence with an indication of the time of
the beginning thereof and terminate with an indication of the time
thereof;
(iii) At the commencement of the recording the arrested person
shall be fully informed of his constitutional rights, and such
statements informing him shall be included in the recording;
(iv) The recordings shall only be used for valid police or court
activities;
(c) Sound recordings that correspond to video images recorded by
video cameras mounted in law enforcement vehicles. All law enforcement
officers wearing a sound recording device that makes recordings
corresponding to videos recorded by video cameras mounted in law
enforcement vehicles must be in uniform. A sound recording device
((which)) that makes a recording pursuant to this subsection (1)(c)
((may only)) must be operated simultaneously with the video camera when
the operating system has been activated for an event. No sound
recording device may be intentionally turned off by the law enforcement
officer during the ((operation of the video camera)) recording of an
event. Once the event has been captured, the officer may turn off the
audio recording and place the system back into "pre-event" mode.
No sound or video recording made under this subsection (1)(c) may
be duplicated and made available to the public by a law enforcement
agency subject to this section until final disposition of any criminal
or civil litigation which arises from the incident or incidents which
were recorded. Such sound recordings shall not be divulged or used by
any law enforcement agency for any commercial purpose.
A law enforcement officer shall inform any person being recorded by
sound under this subsection (1)(c) that a sound recording is being made
and the statement so informing the person shall be included in the
sound recording, except that the law enforcement officer is not
required to inform the person being recorded if the person is being
recorded under exigent circumstances. A law enforcement officer is not
required to inform a person being recorded by video under this
subsection (1)(c) that the person is being recorded by video.
(2) It shall not be unlawful for a law enforcement officer acting
in the performance of the officer's official duties to intercept,
record, or disclose an oral communication or conversation where the
officer is a party to the communication or conversation or one of the
parties to the communication or conversation has given prior consent to
the interception, recording, or disclosure: PROVIDED, That prior to
the interception, transmission, or recording the officer shall obtain
written or telephonic authorization from a judge or magistrate, who
shall approve the interception, recording, or disclosure of
communications or conversations with a nonconsenting party for a
reasonable and specified period of time, if there is probable cause to
believe that the nonconsenting party has committed, is engaged in, or
is about to commit a felony: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That if such
authorization is given by telephone the authorization and officer's
statement justifying such authorization must be electronically recorded
by the judge or magistrate on a recording device in the custody of the
judge or magistrate at the time transmitted and the recording shall be
retained in the court records and reduced to writing as soon as
possible thereafter.
Any recording or interception of a communication or conversation
incident to a lawfully recorded or intercepted communication or
conversation pursuant to this subsection shall be lawful and may be
divulged.
All recordings of communications or conversations made pursuant to
this subsection shall be retained for as long as any crime may be
charged based on the events or communications or conversations
recorded.
(3) Communications or conversations authorized to be intercepted,
recorded, or disclosed by this section shall not be inadmissible under
RCW 9.73.050.
(4) Authorizations issued under subsection (2) of this section
shall be effective for not more than seven days, after which period the
issuing authority may renew or continue the authorization for
additional periods not to exceed seven days.
(5) If the judge or magistrate determines that there is probable
cause to believe that the communication or conversation concerns the
unlawful manufacture, delivery, sale, or possession with intent to
manufacture, deliver, or sell, controlled substances as defined in
chapter 69.50 RCW, or legend drugs as defined in chapter 69.41 RCW, or
imitation controlled substances as defined in chapter 69.52 RCW, the
judge or magistrate may authorize the interception, transmission,
recording, or disclosure of communications or conversations under
subsection (2) of this section even though the true name of the
nonconsenting party, or the particular time and place for the
interception, transmission, recording, or disclosure, is not known at
the time of the request, if the authorization describes the
nonconsenting party and subject matter of the communication or
conversation with reasonable certainty under the circumstances. Any
such communication or conversation may be intercepted, transmitted,
recorded, or disclosed as authorized notwithstanding a change in the
time or location of the communication or conversation after the
authorization has been obtained or the presence of or participation in
the communication or conversation by any additional party not named in
the authorization.
Authorizations issued under this subsection shall be effective for
not more than fourteen days, after which period the issuing authority
may renew or continue the authorization for an additional period not to
exceed fourteen days.

--- END ---