BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.12.030 and 2005 c 173 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The application for a certificate of ownership shall be upon a
form furnished or approved by the department and shall contain:
(a) A full description of the vehicle, which shall contain the
proper vehicle identification number, the number of miles indicated on
the odometer at the time of delivery of the vehicle, and any
distinguishing marks of identification;
(b) The name and address of the person who is to be the registered
owner of the vehicle and, if the vehicle is subject to a security
interest, the name and address of the secured party;
(c) Such other information as the department may require.
(2) The department may in any instance, in addition to the
information required on the application, require additional information
and a physical examination of the vehicle or of any class of vehicles,
or either.
(3)(a)(i) A physical examination of the vehicle is mandatory if it
has been rebuilt after surrender of the certificate of ownership to the
department under RCW 46.12.070 due to the vehicle's destruction or
declaration as a total loss. The inspection must verify that the
vehicle identification number is genuine and agrees with the number
shown on the title and registration certificate. The inspection must
be made by a member of the Washington state patrol or other person
authorized by the department to make such inspections.
(ii) A vehicle that has been rebuilt after surrender of the
certificate of ownership to the department under RCW 46.12.070 due to
the vehicle's destruction as a total loss is not required to be
presented for a physical inspection when the registered owner of the
vehicle at the time of the vehicle's destruction or declaration as a
total loss retains possession of the vehicle and applies for title
reissuance.
(b)(i) A physical examination of the vehicle is mandatory if the
vehicle was declared totaled or salvage under the laws of this state,
or the vehicle is presented with documents from another state showing
the vehicle was totaled or salvage and has not been reissued a valid
registration from that state after the declaration of total loss or
salvage.
(ii) The inspection must verify that the vehicle identification
number is genuine and agrees with the number shown on the original
documents supporting the vehicle purchase or ownership.
(iii) A Washington state patrol VIN specialist must ensure that all
major component parts used for the reconstruction of a salvage or
rebuildable vehicle were obtained legally. Original invoices for new
and used parts must be from a vendor that is registered with the
department of revenue for the collection of retail sales or use taxes
or comparable agency in the jurisdiction where the major component
parts were purchased. The invoices must include the name and address
of the business, a description of the part or parts sold, the date of
sale, and the amount of sale to include all taxes paid unless exempted
by the department of revenue or comparable agency in the jurisdiction
where the major component parts were purchased. Original invoices for
used parts must be from a vehicle wrecker licensed under chapter 46.80
RCW or a comparable business in the jurisdiction outside Washington
state where the major component part was purchased. If the parts or
components were purchased from a private individual, the private
individual must have title to the vehicle the parts were taken from,
except as provided by RCW 46.04.3815, and the bill of sale for the
parts must be notarized. The bills of sale must include the names and
addresses of the sellers and purchasers, a description of the vehicle,
the part or parts being sold, including the make, model, year, and
identification or serial number, that date of sale, and the purchase
price of the vehicle or part or parts. If the presenter is unable to
provide an acceptable release of interest or proof of ownership for a
vehicle or major component part as described above, an inspection must
be completed for ownership-in-doubt purposes as prescribed by WAC 308-56A-210.
(iv) A vehicle presented for inspection must have all damaged major
component parts replaced or repaired to meet RCW and WAC requirements
before inspection of the salvage vehicle by the Washington state
patrol.
(4) Rebuilt or salvage vehicles licensed in Washington must meet
the requirements found under chapter 46.37 RCW to be driven upon public
roadways.
(5) The application shall be subscribed by the person applying to
be the registered owner and be sworn to by that applicant in the manner
described by RCW 9A.72.085. The department shall retain the
application in either the original, computer, or photostatic form.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.12.040 and 2004 c 200 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The application for an original certificate of ownership
accompanied by a draft, money order, certified bank check, or cash for
five dollars, together with the last preceding certificates or other
satisfactory evidence of ownership, shall be forwarded to the director.
(2) The fee shall be in addition to any other fee for the license
registration of the vehicle. The certificate of ownership shall not be
required to be renewed annually, or at any other time, except as by law
provided.
(3) In addition to the application fee and any other fee for the
license registration of a vehicle, the department shall collect from
the applicant a fee of fifteen dollars for vehicles previously
registered in any other state or country. The proceeds from the fee
shall be deposited in accordance with RCW 46.68.020. For vehicles
((requiring a physical examination, the inspection)) declared a total
loss or otherwise requiring an inspection, a fifty-dollar fee shall be
((fifty dollars)) collected upon application for title reissuance and
shall be deposited in accordance with RCW 46.68.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---