BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.04.274 and 1996 c 87 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Limousine" means a category of for hire, chauffeur-driven,
unmetered, unmarked luxury motor vehicles ((that meets one of the
following definitions:
(1) "Stretch limousine" means an automobile with a seating capacity
of not more than twelve passengers in the rear seating area. The
wheelbase has been factory or otherwise altered beyond the original
manufacturer's specifications and meets standards of the United States
department of transportation. The automobile is equipped with
amenities in the rear seating area not normally found in passenger
cars. These amenities may include, but are not limited to a
television, musical sound system, telephone, ice storage, power-operated dividers, or additional interior lighting. The term "stretch
limousine" excludes trucks, auto transportation companies, excursion
buses, charter buses, minibuses, vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66
RCW, taxicabs, executive sedans, funeral home vehicles, station wagons,
executive vans, vans, minivans, and courtesy vans.
(2) "Executive sedan" means a four-door sedan automobile having a
seating capacity of not more than three passengers behind the driver
and a minimum wheelbase of 114.5 inches. An executive sedan is
equipped with standard factory amenities, and the wheelbase may not be
altered. The term "executive sedan" excludes trucks, auto
transportation companies, excursion buses, minibuses, charter buses,
vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW, taxicabs, stretch
limousines, funeral home vehicles, station wagons, executive vans,
vans, minivans, and courtesy vans.
(3) "Executive van" means a van, minivan, or minibus having a
seating capacity of not less than seven passengers and not more than
fourteen passengers behind the driver. The term "executive van"
excludes trucks, auto transportation companies, excursion buses,
charter buses, vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW, taxicabs,
stretch limousines, executive sedans, funeral home vehicles, station
wagons, and courtesy vans.
(4) "Classic car" means a fine or distinctive, American or foreign
automobile that is thirty years old or older)). The director in
consultation with the Washington state patrol will by rule define the
categories of limousines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect November 1, 2006.

--- END ---