BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.270 and 2005 c 288 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any person is convicted of any offense for which this
title makes mandatory the withholding of the driving privilege of such
person by the department, the court in which such conviction is had
shall forthwith mark the person's Washington state driver's license or
permit to drive, if any, in a manner authorized by the department. A
valid driver's license or permit to drive marked under this subsection
shall remain in effect until the person's driving privilege is withheld
by the department pursuant to notice given under RCW 46.20.245, unless
the license or permit expires or otherwise becomes invalid prior to the
effective date of this action. Perfection of notice of appeal shall
stay the execution of sentence including the withholding of the driving
privilege.
(2) Every court having jurisdiction over offenses committed under
this chapter, or any other act of this state or municipal ordinance
adopted by a local authority regulating the operation of motor vehicles
on highways, or any federal authority having jurisdiction over offenses
substantially the same as those set forth in Title 46 RCW which occur
on federal installations within this state, shall immediately forward
to the department ((within ten days of)) a forfeiture of bail or
collateral deposited to secure the defendant's appearance in court, a
payment of a fine ((or)), penalty, or court cost, a plea of guilty or
nolo contendere or a finding of guilt, or a finding that any person has
committed a traffic infraction an abstract of the court record in the
form prescribed by rule of the supreme court, showing the conviction of
any person or the finding that any person has committed a traffic
infraction in said court for a violation of any said laws other than
regulations governing standing, stopping, parking, and pedestrian
offenses.
(3) Every state agency or municipality having jurisdiction over
offenses committed under this chapter, or under any other act of this
state or municipal ordinance adopted by a state or local authority
regulating the operation of motor vehicles on highways, may forward to
the department within ten days of failure to respond, failure to pay a
penalty, failure to appear at a hearing to contest the determination
that a violation of any statute, ordinance, or regulation relating to
standing, stopping, parking, or other infraction issued under RCW
46.63.030(1)(d) has been committed, or failure to appear at a hearing
to explain mitigating circumstances, an abstract of the citation record
in the form prescribed by rule of the department, showing the finding
by such municipality that two or more violations of laws governing
standing, stopping, and parking or one or more other infractions issued
under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d) have been committed and indicating the nature
of the defendant's failure to act. Such violations or infractions may
not have occurred while the vehicle is stolen from the registered owner
or is leased or rented under a bona fide commercial vehicle lease or
rental agreement between a lessor engaged in the business of leasing
vehicles and a lessee who is not the vehicle's registered owner. The
department may enter into agreements of reciprocity with the duly
authorized representatives of the states for reporting to each other
violations of laws governing standing, stopping, and parking.
(4) For the purposes of Title 46 RCW the term "conviction" means a
final conviction in a state or municipal court or by any federal
authority having jurisdiction over offenses substantially the same as
those set forth in Title 46 RCW which occur on federal installations in
this state, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to
secure a defendant's appearance in court, the payment of a fine or
court cost, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, or a finding of guilt
on a traffic law violation charge, regardless of whether the imposition
of sentence or sanctions are deferred or the penalty is suspended, but
not including entry into a deferred prosecution agreement under chapter
10.05 RCW.
(5) For the purposes of Title 46 RCW the term "finding that a
traffic infraction has been committed" means a failure to respond to a
notice of infraction or a determination made by a court pursuant to
this chapter. Payment of a monetary penalty made pursuant to RCW
46.63.070(2) is deemed equivalent to such a finding.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.25.010 and 2005 c 325 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Alcohol" means any substance containing any form of alcohol,
including but not limited to ethanol, methanol, propanol, and
isopropanol.
(2) "Alcohol concentration" means:
(a) The number of grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of
blood; or
(b) The number of grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of
breath.
(3) "Commercial driver's license" (CDL) means a license issued to
an individual under chapter 46.20 RCW that has been endorsed in
accordance with the requirements of this chapter to ((an individual
that authorizes)) authorize the individual to drive a class of
commercial motor vehicle.
(4) The "commercial driver's license information system" (CDLIS) is
the information system established pursuant to the CMVSA to serve as a
clearinghouse for locating information related to the licensing and
identification of commercial motor vehicle drivers.
(5) "Commercial driver's instruction permit" means a permit issued
under RCW 46.25.060(5).
(6) "Commercial motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle designed or
used to transport passengers or property:
(a) If the vehicle has a gross vehicle weight rating of 26,001 or
more pounds;
(b) If the vehicle is designed to transport sixteen or more
passengers, including the driver;
(c) If the vehicle is transporting hazardous materials as defined
in this section; or
(d) If the vehicle is a school bus regardless of weight or size.
(7) "Conviction" ((has the definition set forth in RCW 46.20.270))
means an unvacated adjudication of guilt, or a determination that a
person has violated or failed to comply with the law in a court of
original jurisdiction or by an authorized administrative tribunal, an
unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure the
person's appearance in court, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
accepted by the court, the payment of a fine or court cost, or
violation of a condition of release without bail, regardless of whether
or not the penalty is rebated, suspended, or probated.
(8) "Disqualification" means a prohibition against driving a
commercial motor vehicle.
(9) "Drive" means to drive, operate, or be in physical control of
a motor vehicle in any place open to the general public for purposes of
vehicular traffic. For purposes of RCW 46.25.100, 46.25.110, and
46.25.120, "drive" includes operation or physical control of a motor
vehicle anywhere in the state.
(10) "Drugs" are those substances as defined by RCW 69.04.009,
including, but not limited to, those substances defined by 49 C.F.R.
40.3.
(11) "Employer" means any person, including the United States, a
state, or a political subdivision of a state, who owns or leases a
commercial motor vehicle, or assigns a person to drive a commercial
motor vehicle.
(12) "Gross vehicle weight rating" (GVWR) means the value specified
by the manufacturer as the maximum loaded weight of a single ((or a
combination or articulated)) vehicle((, or the registered gross weight,
where this value cannot be determined)). The GVWR of a combination or
articulated vehicle, commonly referred to as the "gross combined weight
rating" or GCWR, is the GVWR of the power unit plus the GVWR of the
towed unit or units. If the GVWR of any unit cannot be determined, the
actual gross weight will be used. If a vehicle with a GVWR of less
than 11,794 kilograms (26,001 pounds or less) has been structurally
modified to carry a heavier load, then the actual gross weight capacity
of the modified vehicle, as determined by RCW 46.44.041 and 46.44.042,
will be used as the GVWR.
(13) "Hazardous materials" means any material that has been
designated as hazardous under 49 U.S.C. Sec. 5103 and is required to be
placarded under subpart F of 49 C.F.R. part 172 or any quantity of a
material listed as a select agent or toxin in 42 C.F.R. part 73.
(14) "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or
semitrailer propelled or drawn by mechanical power used on highways, or
any other vehicle required to be registered under the laws of this
state, but does not include a vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or
semitrailer operated exclusively on a rail.
(15) "Out-of-service order" means a ((temporary prohibition against
driving a commercial motor vehicle)) declaration by an authorized
enforcement officer of a federal, state, Canadian, Mexican, or local
jurisdiction that a driver, a commercial motor vehicle, or a motor
carrier operation is out-of-service pursuant to 49 C.F.R. 386.72,
392.5, 395.13, 396.9, or compatible laws, or the North American uniform
out-of-service criteria.
(16) "Positive alcohol confirmation test" means an alcohol
confirmation test that:
(a) Has been conducted by a breath alcohol technician under 49
C.F.R. 40; and
(b) Indicates an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more.
A report that a person has refused an alcohol test, under
circumstances that constitute the refusal of an alcohol test under 49
C.F.R. 40, will be considered equivalent to a report of a positive
alcohol confirmation test for the purposes of this chapter.
(17) "School bus" means a commercial motor vehicle used to
transport preprimary, primary, or secondary school students from home
to school, from school to home, or to and from school-sponsored events.
School bus does not include a bus used as a common carrier.
(18) "Serious traffic violation" means:
(a) Excessive speeding, defined as fifteen miles per hour or more
in excess of the posted limit;
(b) Reckless driving, as defined under state or local law;
(c) A violation of a state or local law relating to motor vehicle
traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection
with an accident or collision resulting in death to any person;
(d) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without obtaining a
commercial driver's license;
(e) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without a commercial
driver's license in the driver's possession; however, any individual
who provides proof to the court by the date the individual must appear
in court or pay any fine for such a violation, that the individual held
a valid CDL on the date the citation was issued, is not guilty of a
"serious traffic offense";
(f) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without the proper class of
commercial driver's license endorsement or endorsements for the
specific vehicle group being operated or for the passenger or type of
cargo being transported; and
(g) Any other violation of a state or local law relating to motor
vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, that the
department determines by rule to be serious.
(19) "State" means a state of the United States and the District of
Columbia.
(20) "Substance abuse professional" means an alcohol and drug
specialist meeting the credentials, knowledge, training, and continuing
education requirements of 49 C.F.R. 40.281.
(21) "Tank vehicle" means a vehicle that is designed to transport
a liquid or gaseous material within a tank that is either permanently
or temporarily attached to the vehicle or the chassis. Tank vehicles
include, but are not limited to cargo tanks and portable tanks.
However, this definition does not include portable tanks having a rated
capacity under one thousand gallons.
(22) "United States" means the fifty states and the District of
Columbia.
(23) "Verified positive drug test" means a drug test result or
validity testing result from a laboratory certified under the authority
of the federal department of health and human services that:
(a) Indicates a drug concentration at or above the cutoff
concentration established under 49 C.F.R. 40.87; and
(b) Has undergone review and final determination by a medical
review officer.
A report that a person has refused a drug test, under circumstances
that constitute the refusal of a federal department of transportation
drug test under 49 C.F.R. 40, will be considered equivalent to a report
of a verified positive drug test for the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.25.050 and 1995 c 393 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Drivers of commercial motor vehicles shall obtain a
commercial driver's license as required under this chapter by April 1,
1992. The director shall establish a program to convert all qualified
commercial motor vehicle drivers by that date. After April 1, 1992,))
Except when driving under a commercial driver's instruction permit and
a valid automobile or classified license and accompanied by the holder
of a commercial driver's license valid for the vehicle being driven, no
person may drive a commercial motor vehicle unless the person holds and
is in immediate possession of a commercial driver's license and
applicable endorsements valid for the vehicle they are driving.
However, this requirement does not apply to any person:
(a) Who is the operator of a farm vehicle, and the vehicle is:
(i) Controlled and operated by a farmer;
(ii) Used to transport either agricultural products, which in this
section include Christmas trees and wood products harvested from
private tree farms and transported by vehicles weighing no more than
forty thousand pounds licensed gross vehicle weight, farm machinery,
farm supplies, or any combination of those materials to or from a farm;
(iii) Not used in the operations of a common or contract motor
carrier; and
(iv) Used within one hundred fifty miles of the person's farm; or
(b) Who is a fire fighter or law enforcement officer operating
emergency equipment, and:
(i) The fire fighter or law enforcement officer has successfully
completed a driver training course approved by the director; and
(ii) The fire fighter or law enforcement officer carries a
certificate attesting to the successful completion of the approved
training course; or
(c) Who is operating a recreational vehicle for noncommercial
purposes. As used in this section, "recreational vehicle" includes a
vehicle towing a horse trailer for a noncommercial purpose; or
(d) Who is operating a commercial motor vehicle for military
purposes. This exemption is applicable to active duty military
personnel; members of the military reserves; members of the national
guard on active duty, including personnel on full-time national guard
duty, personnel on part-time national guard training, and national
guard military technicians (civilians who are required to wear military
uniforms); and active duty United States coast guard personnel. This
exception is not applicable to United States reserve technicians.
(2) No person may drive a commercial motor vehicle while his or her
driving privilege is suspended, revoked, or canceled, while subject to
disqualification, or in violation of an out-of-service order.
Violations of this subsection shall be punished in the same way as
violations of RCW 46.20.342(1).

Sec. 4 RCW 46.25.090 and 2005 c 325 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of not less than one year if a report has been
received by the department pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 or 46.25.120, or
if the person has been convicted of a first violation, within this or
any other jurisdiction, of:
(a) Driving a motor vehicle under the influence of alcohol or any
drug;
(b) Driving a commercial motor vehicle while the alcohol
concentration in the person's system is 0.04 or more, or driving a
noncommercial motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration in the
person's system is 0.08 or more, or is 0.02 or more if the person is
under age twenty-one, as determined by any testing methods approved by
law in this state or any other state or jurisdiction;
(c) Leaving the scene of an accident involving a motor vehicle
driven by the person;
(d) Using a motor vehicle in the commission of a felony;
(e) Refusing to submit to a test or tests to determine the driver's
alcohol concentration or the presence of any drug while driving a motor
vehicle;
(f) Driving a commercial motor vehicle when, as a result of prior
violations committed while operating a commercial motor vehicle, the
driver's commercial driver's license is revoked, suspended, or
canceled, or the driver is disqualified from operating a commercial
motor vehicle;
(g) Causing a fatality through the negligent operation of a
commercial motor vehicle, including but not limited to the crimes of
vehicular homicide and negligent homicide.
If any of the violations set forth in this subsection occurred
while transporting hazardous material, the person is disqualified for
a period of not less than three years.
(2) A person is disqualified for life if it has been determined
that the person has committed or has been convicted of two or more
violations of any of the offenses specified in subsection (1) of this
section, or any combination of those offenses, arising from two or more
separate incidents.
(3) The department may adopt rules, in accordance with federal
regulations, establishing guidelines, including conditions, under which
a disqualification for life under subsection (2) of this section may be
reduced to a period of not less than ten years.
(4) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for life who uses a motor vehicle in the commission of a felony
involving the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of a controlled
substance, as defined by chapter 69.50 RCW, or possession with intent
to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance, as
defined by chapter 69.50 RCW.
(5)(a) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of:
(((a))) (i) Not less than sixty days if:
(((i))) (A) Convicted of or found to have committed a second
serious traffic violation while driving a commercial motor vehicle; or
(((ii))) (B) Convicted of reckless driving, where there has been a
prior serious traffic violation; or
(((b))) (ii) Not less than one hundred twenty days if:
(((i))) (A) Convicted of or found to have committed a third or
subsequent serious traffic violation while driving a commercial motor
vehicle; or
(((ii))) (B) Convicted of reckless driving, where there has been
two or more prior serious traffic violations.
(b) The disqualification period under (a)(ii) of this subsection
must be in addition to any other previous period of disqualification.
(c) For purposes of determining prior serious traffic violations
under this subsection, each conviction of or finding that a driver has
committed a serious traffic violation while driving a commercial motor
vehicle or noncommercial motor vehicle, arising from a separate
incident occurring within a three-year period, must be counted.
(6) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of:
(a) Not less than ninety days nor more than one year if convicted
of or found to have committed a first violation of an out-of-service
order while driving a commercial vehicle;
(b) Not less than one year nor more than five years if, during a
ten-year period, the person is convicted of or is found to have
committed two violations of out-of-service orders while driving a
commercial motor vehicle in separate incidents;
(c) Not less than three years nor more than five years if, during
a ten-year period, the person is convicted of or is found to have
committed three or more violations of out-of-service orders while
driving commercial motor vehicles in separate incidents;
(d) Not less than one hundred eighty days nor more than two years
if the person is convicted of or is found to have committed a first
violation of an out-of-service order while transporting hazardous
materials, or while operating motor vehicles designed to transport
sixteen or more passengers, including the driver. A person is
disqualified for a period of not less than three years nor more than
five years if, during a ten-year period, the person is convicted of or
is found to have committed subsequent violations of out-of-service
orders, in separate incidents, while transporting hazardous materials,
or while operating motor vehicles designed to transport sixteen or more
passengers, including the driver.
(7) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle if a report has been received by the department under RCW
46.25.125 that the person has received a verified positive drug test or
positive alcohol confirmation test as part of the testing program
conducted under 49 C.F.R. 40. A disqualification under this subsection
remains in effect until the person undergoes a drug and alcohol
assessment by a substance abuse professional meeting the requirements
of 49 C.F.R. 40, and the person presents evidence of satisfactory
participation in or successful completion of a drug or alcohol
treatment and/or education program as recommended by the substance
abuse professional, and until the person has met the requirements of
RCW 46.25.100. The substance abuse professional shall forward a
diagnostic evaluation and treatment recommendation to the department of
licensing for use in determining the person's eligibility for driving
a commercial motor vehicle. Persons who are disqualified under this
subsection more than twice in a five-year period are disqualified for
life.
(8)(a) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for the period of time specified in (b) of this subsection if
he or she is convicted of or is found to have committed one of the
following six offenses at a railroad-highway grade crossing while
operating a commercial motor vehicle in violation of a federal, state,
or local law or regulation:
(i) For drivers who are not required to always stop, failing to
slow down and check that the tracks are clear of an approaching train;
(ii) For drivers who are not required to always stop, failing to
stop before reaching the crossing, if the tracks are not clear;
(iii) For drivers who are always required to stop, failing to stop
before driving onto the crossing;
(iv) For all drivers, failing to have sufficient space to drive
completely through the crossing without stopping;
(v) For all drivers, failing to obey a traffic control device or
the directions of an enforcement officer at the crossing;
(vi) For all drivers, failing to negotiate a crossing because of
insufficient undercarriage clearance.
(b) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of:
(i) Not less than sixty days if the driver is convicted of or is
found to have committed a first violation of a railroad-highway grade
crossing violation;
(ii) Not less than one hundred twenty days if the driver is
convicted of or is found to have committed a second railroad-highway
grade crossing violation in separate incidents within a three-year
period;
(iii) Not less than one year if the driver is convicted of or is
found to have committed a third or subsequent railroad-highway grade
crossing violation in separate incidents within a three-year period.
(9) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for not more than one year if a report has been received by the
department from the federal motor carrier safety administration that
the person's driving has been determined to constitute an imminent
hazard as defined by 49 C.F.R. 383.5. A person who is simultaneously
disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle under this
subsection and under other provisions of this chapter, or under 49
C.F.R. 383.52, shall serve those disqualification periods concurrently.
(10) Within ten days after suspending, revoking, or canceling a
commercial driver's license or disqualifying a driver from operating a
commercial motor vehicle, the department shall update its records to
reflect that action.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.25.120 and 2002 c 272 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who drives a commercial motor vehicle within this
state is deemed to have given consent, subject to RCW 46.61.506, to
take a test or tests of that person's blood or breath for the purpose
of determining that person's alcohol concentration or the presence of
other drugs.
(2) A test or tests may be administered at the direction of a law
enforcement officer, who after stopping or detaining the commercial
motor vehicle driver, has probable cause to believe that driver was
driving a commercial motor vehicle while having alcohol in his or her
system or while under the influence of any drug.
(3) The law enforcement officer requesting the test under
subsection (1) of this section shall warn the person requested to
submit to the test that a refusal to submit will result in that person
being disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle under RCW
46.25.090.
(4) If the person refuses testing, or submits to a test that
discloses an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more, the law enforcement
officer shall submit a sworn report to the department certifying that
the test was requested pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and
that the person refused to submit to testing, or submitted to a test
that disclosed an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more.
(5) Upon receipt of the sworn report of a law enforcement officer
under subsection (4) of this section, the department shall disqualify
the driver from driving a commercial motor vehicle under RCW 46.25.090,
subject to the hearing provisions of RCW 46.20.329 and 46.20.332. The
hearing shall be conducted in the county of the arrest. For the
purposes of this section, the hearing shall cover the issues of whether
a law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person
had been driving or was in actual physical control of a commercial
motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in the person's
system or while under the influence of any drug, whether the person
refused to submit to the test or tests upon request of the officer
after having been informed that the refusal would result in the
disqualification of the person from driving a commercial motor vehicle,
and, if the test was administered, whether the results indicated an
alcohol concentration of 0.04 percent or more. The department shall
order that the disqualification of the person either be rescinded or
sustained. Any decision by the department disqualifying a person from
driving a commercial motor vehicle is stayed and does not take effect
while a formal hearing is pending under this section or during the
pendency of a subsequent appeal to superior court so long as there is
no conviction for a moving violation or no finding that the person has
committed a traffic infraction that is a moving violation during the
pendency of the hearing and appeal. If the disqualification of the
person is sustained after the hearing, the person who is disqualified
may file a petition in the superior court of the county of arrest to
review the final order of disqualification by the department in the
manner provided in RCW 46.20.334.
(6) If a motor carrier or employer who is required to have a
testing program under 49 C.F.R. 382 knows that a commercial driver in
his or her employ has refused to submit to testing under this section
and has not been disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle,
the employer may notify law enforcement or his or her medical review
officer or breath alcohol technician that the driver has refused to
submit to the required testing.
(7) The hearing provisions of this section do not apply to those
persons disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle under RCW
46.25.090(7).

Sec. 6 RCW 46.52.101 and 1999 c 86 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every district court, municipal court, and clerk of a superior
court shall keep or cause to be kept a record of every traffic
complaint, traffic citation, notice of infraction, or other legal form
of traffic charge deposited with or presented to the court or a traffic
violations bureau, and shall keep a record of every official action by
the court or its traffic violations bureau regarding the charge,
including but not limited to a record of every conviction, forfeiture
of bail, judgment of acquittal, finding that a traffic infraction has
been committed, dismissal of a notice of infraction, and the amount of
fine, forfeiture, or penalty resulting from every traffic charge
deposited with or presented to the court or traffic violations bureau.
In the case of a record of a conviction for a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, and notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the court shall maintain the record permanently.
(2) ((Within fourteen days)) After the conviction, forfeiture of
bail, or finding that a traffic infraction was committed for a
violation of any provisions of this chapter or other law regulating the
operating of vehicles on highways, the clerk of the court in which the
conviction was had, bail was forfeited, or the finding of commission
was made shall prepare and immediately forward to the director of
licensing at Olympia an abstract of the court record covering the case.
Report need not be made of a finding involving the illegal parking or
standing of a vehicle.
(3) The abstract must be made upon a form or forms furnished by the
director and must include the name and address of the party charged,
the number, if any, of the party's driver's or chauffeur's license, the
registration number of the vehicle involved if required by the
director, the nature of the offense, the date of hearing, the plea, the
judgment, whether the offense was an alcohol-related offense as defined
in RCW 46.01.260(2), whether the incident that gave rise to the offense
charged resulted in a fatality, whether bail was forfeited, whether the
determination that a traffic infraction was committed was contested,
and the amount of the fine, forfeiture, or penalty, as the case may be.
(4) In courts where the judicial information system or other secure
method of electronic transfer of information has been implemented
between the court and the department of licensing, the court may
electronically provide the information required in subsections (2),
(3), and (5) of this section.
(5) The superior court clerk shall also forward a like report to
the director upon the conviction of a person of a felony in the
commission of which a vehicle was used.
(6) The director shall keep all abstracts received under this
section at the director's office in Olympia. The abstracts must be
open to public inspection during reasonable business hours.
(7) The officer, prosecuting attorney, or city attorney signing the
charge or information in a case involving a charge of driving under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug shall immediately request
from the director an abstract of convictions and forfeitures. The
director shall furnish the requested abstract.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.63.070 and 2004 c 187 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who receives a notice of traffic infraction shall
respond to such notice as provided in this section within fifteen days
of the date of the notice.
(2) If the person determined to have committed the infraction does
not contest the determination the person shall respond by completing
the appropriate portion of the notice of infraction and submitting it,
either by mail or in person, to the court specified on the notice. A
check or money order in the amount of the penalty prescribed for the
infraction must be submitted with the response. When a response which
does not contest the determination is received, an appropriate order
shall be entered in the court's records, and a record of the response
and order shall be furnished to the department in accordance with RCW
46.20.270.
(3) If the person determined to have committed the infraction
wishes to contest the determination the person shall respond by
completing the portion of the notice of infraction requesting a hearing
and submitting it, either by mail or in person, to the court specified
on the notice. The court shall notify the person in writing of the
time, place, and date of the hearing, and that date shall not be sooner
than seven days from the date of the notice, except by agreement.
(4) If the person determined to have committed the infraction does
not contest the determination but wishes to explain mitigating
circumstances surrounding the infraction the person shall respond by
completing the portion of the notice of infraction requesting a hearing
for that purpose and submitting it, either by mail or in person, to the
court specified on the notice. The court shall notify the person in
writing of the time, place, and date of the hearing.
(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, in
hearings conducted pursuant to subsections (3) and (4) of this section,
the court may defer findings, or in a hearing to explain mitigating
circumstances may defer entry of its order, for up to one year and
impose conditions upon the defendant the court deems appropriate. Upon
deferring findings, the court may assess costs as the court deems
appropriate for administrative processing. If at the end of the
deferral period the defendant has met all conditions and has not been
determined to have committed another traffic infraction, the court may
dismiss the infraction.
(b) A person may not receive more than one deferral within a seven-year period for traffic infractions for moving violations and more than
one deferral within a seven-year period for traffic infractions for
nonmoving violations.
(c) A person who is the holder of a commercial driver's license or
who was operating a commercial motor vehicle at the time of the
violation may not receive a deferral under this section.
(6) If any person issued a notice of traffic infraction:
(a) Fails to respond to the notice of traffic infraction as
provided in subsection (2) of this section; or
(b) Fails to appear at a hearing requested pursuant to subsection
(3) or (4) of this section;
the court shall enter an appropriate order assessing the monetary
penalty prescribed for the traffic infraction and any other penalty
authorized by this chapter and shall notify the department in
accordance with RCW 46.20.270, of the failure to respond to the notice
of infraction or to appear at a requested hearing.

--- END ---