BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.01.101 and 2005 c 319 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary shall ((have the authority and it shall be his or her
duty)):
(1) ((To)) Serve as chief executive officer of the department with
full administrative authority to direct all its activities;
(2) ((To)) Organize the department as he or she may deem necessary
to carry out the work and responsibilities of the department
effectively;
(3) ((To)) Designate and establish such transportation district or
branch offices as may be necessary or convenient, and ((to)) appoint
assistants and delegate any powers, duties, and functions to them or
any officer or employee of the department as deemed necessary to
administer the department efficiently. Every ten years, beginning
December 1, 2006, the secretary shall present to the legislative
transportation committees of the house of representatives and senate a
proposed reorganization of the department's regions. If appropriate,
the reorganization proposal shall recommend new regional boundaries,
determined geographically, accounting for projects and other workload
funded in the next sixteen years. Where appropriate, projects along
the same corridor shall be kept within a single region;
(4) ((To)) Direct and coordinate the programs of the various
divisions of the department to assure that they achieve the greatest
possible mutual benefit, produce a balanced overall effort, and
eliminate unnecessary duplication of activity;
(5) ((To)) Adopt all department rules that are subject to the
adoption procedures contained in the state administrative procedure
act, except rules subject to adoption by the commission pursuant to
statute;
(6) ((To)) Maintain and safeguard the official records of the
department, including the commission's recorded resolutions and orders;
(7) ((To)) Provide, under contract or interagency agreement, full
staff support to the commission to assist it in carrying out its
functions, powers, and duties;
(8) ((To)) Execute and implement the biennial operating budget for
the operation of the department in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW
and with legislative appropriation;
(9) ((To)) Advise the governor and the legislature with respect to
matters under the jurisdiction of the department; and
(10) ((To)) Exercise all other powers and perform all other duties
as are now or hereafter provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature intends that this act will
result in periodic reviews of the department of transportation's
regional boundaries. The department should review resources and
outputs (such as projects and maintenance work) within each region and
determine if changes to regional boundaries would benefit the
department and, therefore, the public. As growth and other economic
changes occur in Washington state, it may be appropriate to change the
size and/or number of departmental regions.

--- END ---