BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.110 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The municipal research council shall contract for the provision
of research and services to special purpose districts. A contract
shall be made with a state agency, educational institution, or private
consulting firm, that in the judgment of council members is qualified
to provide such research and services.
(2) Research and services to special purpose districts shall
consist of: (a) Studying and researching issues relating to special
purpose district government; (b) acquiring, preparing, and distributing
publications related to special purpose districts; and (c) furnishing
legal, technical, consultative, and field services to special purpose
districts concerning issues relating to special purpose district
government.
(3) The activities, programs, and services of the municipal
research council to special purpose districts shall be carried on in
cooperation with the associations representing the various special
purpose districts. Services to special purpose districts shall be
based upon the moneys appropriated to the municipal research council
from the special purpose district research services account under
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.110 RCW
to read as follows:
A special account is created in the state treasury to be known as
the special purpose district research services account. The account
shall consist of all money transferred or appropriated to the account
by the legislature. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. The account is subject to the allotment process under
chapter 43.88 RCW.
Moneys in the special purpose district research services account
may be expended only to finance the costs of special purpose district
research and services.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.08.190 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 927 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except for revenues generated by the 2003 surcharge of
$0.42/liter on retail sales of spirits that shall be distributed to the
state general fund during the 2003-2005 biennium, when excess funds are
distributed, all moneys subject to distribution shall be disbursed as
follows:
(a) Three-tenths of one percent to border areas under RCW
66.08.195; and
(b) From the amount remaining after distribution under (a) of this
subsection, (i) fifty percent to the general fund of the state, (ii)
ten percent to the counties of the state, and (iii) forty percent to
the incorporated cities and towns of the state.
(2) During the months of June, September, December, and March of
each year, prior to disbursing the distribution to incorporated cities
and towns under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the treasurer shall
deduct from that distribution an amount that will fund that quarter's
allotments under RCW 43.88.110 from any legislative appropriation from
the city and town research services account. The treasurer shall
deposit the amount deducted into the city and town research services
account.
(3) During the months of June, September, December, and March of
each year, prior to disbursing the distribution to the general fund of
the state under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the treasurer shall
deduct from that distribution an amount that will fund that quarter's
allotments under RCW 43.88.110 from any legislative appropriation from
the special purpose district research services account. The treasurer
shall deposit the amount deducted into the special purpose district
research services account.
(4) The governor may notify and direct the state treasurer to
withhold the revenues to which the counties and cities are entitled
under this section if the counties or cities are found to be in
noncompliance pursuant to RCW 36.70A.340.

--- END ---