BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
On June 30th of each odd-numbered year, the state treasurer shall
transfer from the general fund to the state parks renewal and
stewardship account created in RCW 79A.05.215 the sum of eight million
dollars.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.05.215 and 1995 c 211 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state parks renewal and stewardship account is created in the
state treasury. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all
receipts from user fees, concessions, leases, transfers from the
general fund under section 1 of this act, and other state park-based
activities shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used for operating state parks, developing and
renovating park facilities, undertaking deferred maintenance, enhancing
park stewardship, and other state park purposes. Expenditures from the
account may be made only after appropriation by the legislature.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.05.070 and 2003 c 186 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission may:
(1) Make rules and regulations for the proper administration of its
duties;
(2) Accept any grants of funds made with or without a matching
requirement by the United States, or any agency thereof, for purposes
in keeping with the purposes of this chapter; accept gifts, bequests,
devises and endowments for purposes in keeping with such purposes;
enter into cooperative agreements with and provide for private
nonprofit groups to use state park property and facilities to raise
money to contribute gifts, grants, and support to the commission for
the purposes of this chapter. The commission may assist the nonprofit
group in a cooperative effort by providing necessary agency personnel
and services, if available. However, none of the moneys raised may
inure to the benefit of the nonprofit group, except in furtherance of
its purposes to benefit the commission as provided in this chapter.
The agency and the private nonprofit group shall agree on the nature of
any project to be supported by such gift or grant prior to the use of
any agency property or facilities for raising money. Any such gifts
may be in the form of recreational facilities developed or built in
part or in whole for public use on agency property, provided that the
facility is consistent with the purposes of the agency;
(3) Require certification by the commission of all parks and
recreation workers employed in state aided or state controlled
programs;
(4) Act jointly, when advisable, with the United States, any other
state agencies, institutions, departments, boards, or commissions in
order to carry out the objectives and responsibilities of this chapter;
(5) Grant franchises and easements for any legitimate purpose on
parks or parkways, for such terms and subject to such conditions and
considerations as the commission shall specify;
(6) Charge such fees for services, utilities, and use of facilities
as the commission shall deem proper. The commission may not charge, on
a system-wide basis, fees for park day-use access or parking. Fees for
park day-use access or parking may only be charged when the proceeds
are dedicated to deferred maintenance or capital projects within the
park at which the fees are charged;
(7) Enter into agreements whereby individuals or companies may rent
undeveloped parks or parkway land for grazing, agricultural, or mineral
development purposes upon such terms and conditions as the commission
shall deem proper, for a term not to exceed forty years;
(8) Determine the qualifications of and employ a director of parks
and recreation who shall receive a salary as fixed by the governor in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040 and determine the
qualifications and salary of and employ such other persons as may be
needed to carry out the provisions hereof; and
(9) Without being limited to the powers hereinbefore enumerated,
the commission shall have such other powers as in the judgment of a
majority of its members are deemed necessary to effectuate the purposes
of this chapter: PROVIDED, That the commission shall not have power to
supervise directly any local park or recreation district, and no funds
shall be made available for such purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1,
2007.

--- END ---