BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW,
to be codified between RCW 82.04.230 and 82.04.298, to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, upon every
person engaging within this state in the business of motion picture or
video production or providing production services; as to such persons
the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(b) The business of receiving royalties or charges in the nature of
royalties as defined in RCW 82.04.2907 shall continue to be taxable
under RCW 82.04.2907.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Motion picture or video production" means the creation of a
recorded audio-visual production, other than one or more segments of a
newscast or sporting event, intended for distribution to theaters, DVD,
video, or the internet, or television, or one or more episodes of a
single television series, or a commercial produced for broadcast
television.
(b) "Production services" means motion picture and video
processing, printing, editing, duplicating, animation, graphics,
special effects, negative cutting, conversions to other formats or
media, stock footage, sound mixing, rerecording, sound sweetening,
sound looping, sound effects, and automatic dialog replacement, when
these activities are provided in respect to a motion picture or video
production.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2016.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.460 and 2004 c 174 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person rendering services taxable under RCW 82.04.290,
section 1 of this act, other than services defined as a retail sale
when rendered to or for consumers, or RCW 82.04.2908 and maintaining
places of business both within and without this state which contribute
to the rendition of such services shall, for the purpose of computing
tax liability under RCW 82.04.290, section 1 of this act, or RCW
82.04.2908, apportion to this state that portion of the person's gross
income which is derived from services rendered within this state.
Where such apportionment cannot be accurately made by separate
accounting methods, the taxpayer shall apportion to this state that
proportion of the taxpayer's total income which the cost of doing
business within the state bears to the total cost of doing business
both within and without the state.
(2) Notwithstanding the provision of subsection (1) of this
section, persons doing business both within and without the state who
receive gross income from service charges, as defined in RCW 63.14.010
(relating to amounts charged for granting the right or privilege to
make deferred or installment payments) or who receive gross income from
engaging in business as financial institutions within the scope of
chapter 82.14A RCW (relating to city taxes on financial institutions)
shall apportion or allocate gross income taxable under RCW 82.04.290 to
this state pursuant to rules promulgated by the department consistent
with uniform rules for apportionment or allocation developed by the
states.
(3) The department shall by rule provide a method or methods of
apportioning or allocating gross income derived from sales of telephone
services taxed under this chapter, if the gross proceeds of sales
subject to tax under this chapter do not fairly represent the extent of
the taxpayer's income attributable to this state. The rules shall be,
so far as feasible, consistent with the methods of apportionment
contained in this section and shall require the consideration of those
facts, circumstances, and apportionment factors as will result in an
equitable and constitutionally permissible division of the services.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.0315 and 1997 c 61 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Production equipment" means the following when used in motion
picture ((or video)) production or postproduction: Grip and lighting
equipment, cameras, camera mounts including tripods, jib arms,
steadicams, and other camera mounts, cranes, dollies, generators,
helicopter mounts, helicopters rented for motion picture or video
production, walkie talkies, vans, trucks, and other vehicles
specifically equipped for motion picture or video production or used
solely for production activities, wardrobe and makeup trailers, special
effects and stunt equipment, video assists, videotape recorders, cables
and connectors, ((telepromoters [teleprompters])) teleprompters, sound
recording equipment, and editorial equipment.
(b) "Production services" means motion picture and video
processing, printing, editing, duplicating, animation, graphics,
special effects, negative cutting, conversions to other formats or
media, stock footage, sound mixing, rerecording, sound sweetening,
sound looping, sound effects, and automatic dialog replacement.
(c) "Motion picture or video production business" means a person
engaged in the ((production of motion pictures and video tapes for
exhibition, sale, or for broadcast by a person other than the person
producing the motion picture or video tape)) creation of a recorded
audio-visual production, other than one or more segments of a newscast
or sporting event, intended for distribution to theaters, DVD, video,
or the internet, or television, or one or more episodes of a single
television series, or a commercial produced for broadcast television.
(2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the rental of
production equipment, or the sale of production services, to a motion
picture or video production business.
(3) The exemption provided for in this section shall not apply to
rental of production equipment, or the sale of production services, to
a motion picture or video production business that is engaged, to any
degree, in the production of erotic material, as defined in RCW
9.68.050.
(4) In order to claim an exemption under this section, the
purchaser must provide the seller with an exemption certificate in a
form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain
a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

--- END ---