BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the motion
picture industry in Washington as a valuable commodity contributing
greatly to the economic vitality of the state and the cultural
integrity of our communities. The legislature further recognizes the
production of in-state motion pictures, television programs, and
television commercials creates a marked increase in tourism, family
wage jobs, and the sale of local goods and services generating revenue
for the state. Furthermore, with captive national and international
audiences, the world is introduced to the state's pristine scenic
venues and reminded that the Pacific Northwest is a great place to live
and raise a family. The legislature also recognizes the inherent
educational value of promoting arts and culture as well as the benefits
of training young motion picture professionals who will build a
fruitful industry for years to come.
The legislature finds in recent years that the state has realized
a drastic decline in motion picture production that precludes economic
expansion and threatens the state's reputation as a production
destination. With the emergence of tax incentives in thirty states
nationwide, in-state producers are taking their projects to more
competitive economic climates, such as Oregon and Vancouver, British
Columbia, where compelling tax incentive packages and subsidies are
already in effect.
The legislature also finds that in recent years increasingly
workers in Washington state are without health insurance coverage and
retirement income protections, causing hardships on workers and their
families and higher costs to the state.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to recognize both
national and international competition in the motion picture production
marketplace. The legislature is committed to leveling the competitive
playing field and interested in a partnership with the private sector
to regain Washington's place as a premier destination to make motion
pictures, television, and television commercials. While at the same
time the legislature is committed to ensuring that workers in the
motion picture and television industry are covered under health
insurance and retirement income plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following definitions apply to this
chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Approved motion picture competitiveness program" means a
nonprofit organization under the internal revenue code, section
501(c)(6), with the sole purpose of revitalizing the state's economic,
cultural, and educational standing in the national and international
market of motion picture production by recommending and awarding
financial assistance for costs associated with motion pictures in the
state of Washington.
(2) "Contribution" means cash contributions.
(3) "Costs" means actual expenses of production and postproduction
expended in Washington state for the production of motion pictures,
including but not limited to payments made for salaries, wages, and
health insurance and retirement benefits, the rental costs of machinery
and equipment and the purchase of services, food, property, lodging,
and permits for work conducted in Washington state.
(4) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(5) "Motion picture" means a recorded audio-visual production
intended for distribution to theaters, DVD, video, or the internet, or
television, or one or more episodes of a single television series,
television pilots or presentations, or a commercial. "Motion picture"
does not mean production of a television commercial of an amount less
than two hundred fifty thousand dollars in actual total investment or
one or more segments of a newscast or sporting event.
(6) "Funding assistance" means cash expenditures from an approved
motion picture competitiveness program.
(7) "Person" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department shall adopt criteria for
an approved motion picture competitiveness program with the sole
purpose of revitalizing the state's economic, cultural, and educational
standing in the national and international market of motion picture
production. Rules adopted by the department shall allow the program,
within the established criteria, to provide funding assistance only
when it captures economic opportunities for Washington's communities
and businesses and shall only be provided under a contractual
arrangement with a private entity. In establishing the criteria, the
department shall consider:
(a) The additional income and tax revenue to be retained in the
state for general purposes;
(b) The creation and retention of family wage jobs which provide
health insurance and payments into a retirement plan;
(c) The impact of motion picture projects to maximize in-state
labor and the use of in-state film production and film postproduction
companies;
(d) The impact upon the local economies and the state economy as a
whole, including multiplier effects;
(e) The intangible impact on the state and local communities that
comes with motion picture projects;
(f) The regional, national, and international competitiveness of
the motion picture filming industry;
(g) The revitalization of the state as a premier venue for motion
picture production and national television commercial campaigns;
(h) Partnerships with the private sector to bolster film production
in the state and serve as an educational and cultural purpose for its
citizens;
(i) The vitality of the state's motion picture industry as a
necessary and critical factor in promoting the state as a premier
tourist and cultural destination;
(j) Giving preference to additional seasons of television series
that have previously qualified;
(k) Other factors the department may deem appropriate for the
implementation of this chapter.
(2) The board of directors created under section 4 of this act
shall create and administer an account for carrying out the purposes of
subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Money received by an approved motion picture competitiveness
program shall be used only for: (a) Health insurance and payments into
a retirement plan, and other costs associated with film production; (b)
a tax credit marketer to market the tax credits authorized under
section 5 of this act; and (c) staff and related expenses to maintain
the program's proper administration and operation.
(4) Maximum funding assistance from an approved motion picture
competitiveness program is limited to:
(a) Twenty percent of a total actual investment in the state of at
least five hundred thousand dollars, for a single feature film produced
in Washington state;
(b) Twenty percent of a total actual investment in the state of at
least three hundred thousand dollars per television episode produced in
Washington state; or
(c) Twenty percent of a total actual investment in the state of at
least two hundred fifty thousand dollars for an infomercial or
television commercial associated with a national or regional
advertisement campaign produced in Washington state.
(5) No single motion picture production or episodic television
project may be awarded an amount greater than one million dollars from
an approved motion picture competitiveness program.
(6) Funding assistance approval must be determined by the approved
motion picture competitiveness program within a maximum of thirty
calendar days from when the application is received, if the application
is submitted after August 15, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A Washington motion picture
competitiveness program under this chapter shall be administered by a
board of directors appointed by the governor, and the appointments
shall be made within sixty days following enactment. The department,
after consulting with the board, shall adopt rules for the standards
that shall be used to evaluate the applications for funding assistance
prior to June 30, 2006.
(2) The board shall evaluate and award financial assistance to
motion picture projects under rules set forth under section 3 of this
act.
(3) The board shall consist of the following members:
(a) One member representing the Washington motion picture
production industry;
(b) One member representing the Washington motion picture
postproduction industry;
(c) Two members representing labor unions affiliated with
Washington motion picture production;
(d) One member representing the Washington visitors and convention
bureaus;
(e) One member representing the Washington tourism industry;
(f) One member representing the Washington restaurant, hotel, and
airline industry; and
(g) A chairperson, chosen at large, shall serve at the pleasure of
the governor.
(4) The term of the board members, other than the chair, is four
years. A board member appointed by the governor may be removed by the
governor for cause under RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080.
(5) Five members of the board constitute a quorum.
(6) The board shall elect a treasurer and secretary annually, and
other officers as the board members determine necessary, and may adopt
bylaws or rules for its own government.
(7) The board shall make any information available at the request
of the department to administer this chapter.
(8) Contributions received by a board shall be deposited into the
account described in section 3(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in this section, a credit is allowed
against the tax imposed under this chapter for contributions made by a
person to a Washington motion picture competitiveness program.
(2) The person must make the contribution before claiming a credit
authorized under this section. Credits earned under this section may
be claimed against taxes due for the calendar year in which the
contribution is made. The amount of credit claimed for a reporting
period shall not exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
that reporting period. No person may claim more than one million
dollars of credit in any calendar year, including credit carried over
from a previous calendar year. No refunds may be granted for any
unused credits.
(3) The maximum credit that may be earned for each calendar year
under this section for a person is limited to the lesser of:
(a) An amount equal to the contributions made by the person to a
program during the calendar year; or
(b) One million dollars.
(4) Except as provided under subsection (5) of this section, a tax
credit claimed under this section may not be carried over to another
year.
(5) Any amount of tax credit otherwise allowable under this section
not claimed by the person in any calendar year may be carried over and
claimed against the person's tax liability for the next succeeding
calendar year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding
calendar year may be carried forward and claimed against the person's
tax liability for the second succeeding calendar year; and any credit
not used in that second succeeding calendar year may be carried over
and claimed against the person's tax liability for the third succeeding
calendar year, but may not be carried over for any calendar year
thereafter.
(6) Credits are available on a first in-time basis. The department
shall disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would cause the
total amount of credits claimed under this section during any calendar
year to exceed five million dollars. If this limitation is reached,
the department shall notify all Washington motion picture
competitiveness programs that the annual statewide limit has been met.
In addition, the department shall provide written notice to any person
who has claimed tax credits in excess of the five million dollar
limitation in this subsection. The notice shall indicate the amount of
tax due and shall provide that the tax be paid within thirty days from
the date of such notice. The department shall not assess penalties and
interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount due in the
initial notice if the amount due is paid by the due date specified in
the notice, or any extension thereof.
(7) To claim a credit under this section, a person must
electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and any
other information required by the department, in an electronic format
as provided or approved by the department. Any return, form, or
information required to be filed in an electronic format under this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format. As used in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(8) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section.
(9) A Washington motion picture competitiveness program shall
provide to the department, upon request, such information needed to
verify eligibility for credit under this section, including information
regarding contributions received by the program.
(10) The department shall not allow any credit under this section
before July 1, 2006.
(11) For the purposes of this section, "Washington motion picture
competitiveness program" or "program" means an organization established
pursuant to chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 4 of this act).
(12) No credit may be earned for contributions made on or after
July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The provisions of section 5 of this act are
subject to review by the joint legislative audit and review committee.
The joint legislative audit and review committee will make a
recommendation to the house finance committee and the senate ways and
means committee by December 1, 2010, regarding the effectiveness of the
motion picture competitiveness program including, but not limited to,
the amount of state revenue generated, the amount of family wages jobs
with benefits created, adherence to the criteria in section 3 of this
act, and any other factors deemed appropriate by the joint legislative
audit and review committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 4 and 6 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---