BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the previously declared public policy
of the state to assist in making affordable and decent housing
available throughout the state. The legislature recognizes that
despite ongoing efforts there is still a lack of affordable housing in
many areas. To ensure further aid, the legislature hereby establishes
tax credits for persons who make financial contributions to low-income
housing assistance programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax credit under this
chapter.
(2) "Contribution" means cash or in-kind contributions.
(3) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(4) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(5) "Program" means a nonprofit organization under internal revenue
code section 501(c)(3) which builds homes and provides homeownership
opportunities for persons of low-income as defined in RCW 35.81.015.
(6) "Housing trust fund" means the Washington housing trust fund
created in RCW 43.185.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Application for tax credits under this
chapter must be made to the department before making a contribution to
a program or the housing trust fund. The application shall be made to
the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
application shall contain information regarding the proposed amount of
contribution to a program or the housing trust fund, and other
information required by the department to determine eligibility under
this act. The department shall rule on the application within forty-five days. Applications shall be approved on a first-come basis.
(2) The person must make the contribution described in the approved
application by the end of the calendar year in which the application is
approved to claim a credit allowed under section 4 of this act.
(3) The department shall not accept any applications before January
1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Subject to the limitations in this
chapter, a credit is allowed against the tax imposed by chapters 82.04
and 82.16 RCW for approved contributions that are made by a person to
a program or the housing trust fund.
(2) The credit allowed under this section is limited to an amount
equal to:
(a) Seventy-five percent of the approved contribution made by a
person to a program; or
(b) Fifty percent of the approved contribution made by a person to
the housing trust fund.
(3) The department shall keep a running total of all credits
approved under this chapter for each calendar year. The department
shall not approve any credits under this section that would cause the
total amount of approved credits statewide to exceed one million five
hundred thousand dollars in any calendar year.
(4) The total credits allowed under this chapter for contributions
made to each program may not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars
in a calendar year. The total credits allowed under this chapter for
a person may not exceed five hundred thousand dollars in a calendar
year.
(5) The credit may be claimed against any tax due under chapters
82.04 and 82.16 RCW only in the calendar year immediately following the
calendar year in which the credit was approved by the department and
the contribution was made to the program or the housing trust fund.
Credits may not be carried over to subsequent years. No refunds may be
granted for credits under this chapter.
(6) The total amount of the credit claimed in any calendar year by
a person may not exceed the lesser amount of the approved credit, or
seventy-five percent of the amount of the contribution that is made by
the person to a program and fifty percent of the amount of the
contribution that is made by the person to the housing trust fund, in
the prior calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 To claim a credit under this chapter, a
person must electronically file with the department all returns, forms,
and other information the department requires in an electronic format
as provided or approved by the department. Any return, form, or
information required to be filed in an electronic format under this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format. As used in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the
administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

--- END ---