BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.160.085 and 2002 c 242 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The public works assistance account shall annually transfer
funds to the public facilities construction loan revolving account in
amounts as follows: In fiscal year 2003, twelve percent of eighteen
million eight hundred ninety thousand seven hundred seventy-five
dollars, the total outstanding principal and interest associated with
the loans issued by the public works board under the timber and rural
natural resources programs; and in each ((of)) fiscal year((s)) from
2004((, 2005, 2006, and 2007,)) onward, twenty-two percent of the
principal and interest associated with the timber and rural natural
resources programs. In no event may this transfer exceed four million
five hundred thousand dollars per year.
(((2) This section expires June 30, 2007.))

--- END ---