BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.87.240 and 2004 c 66 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person, firm, public agency, or company wishing to engage
in the business of performing conveyance work within the state must
apply for an elevator contractor license with the department on a form
provided by the department and be a registered general or specialty
contractor under chapter 18.27 RCW.
(2) Except as provided by RCW 70.87.270, any person wishing to
perform conveyance work within the state must apply for an elevator
mechanic license with the department on a form provided by the
department.
(3) An elevator contractor license may not be granted to any person
or firm who does not possess the following qualifications:
(a) Five years' experience performing conveyance work, as verified
by current and previous elevator contractors licensed to do business;
or
(b) Satisfactory completion of a written examination administered
by the department on this chapter and the rules adopted under this
chapter.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, RCW
70.87.305, and 70.87.245, an elevator mechanic license may not be
granted to any person who does not possess the following
qualifications:
(a) Satisfactory completion of a written examination administered
by the department on this chapter and the rules adopted under this
chapter; and
(b) An acceptable combination of documented experience and
education credits:
(i) Not less than three years' experience performing conveyance
work, as verified by current and previous employers licensed to do
business in this state or public agency employers; ((and)) or
(((b) Satisfactory completion of a written examination administered
by the department on this chapter and the rules adopted under this
chapter))
(ii) Not less than three years' experience performing conveyance
work, as verified by current and previous employers licensed to do
business in the location where the work was performed or public agency
employers, at least one year of which must be conveyance work performed
within the state of Washington. In evaluating an application that is
based in part on work performed outside the state of Washington, the
department shall determine whether the work performed outside the state
of Washington was performed in a state having standards substantially
equal to this chapter and shall consult with its counterpart agency in
the state where the work was performed to determine whether the
applicant's employer, or its successor in interest, is an entity in
good standing under the laws of the state where the work was performed.
The department may consider the employer's reputation, its compliance
with the laws of the state, whether it has outstanding violations of
state or federal law, and whether those violations are related to the
work performed by the applicant. The department may deny an
application based on work performed outside the state if the employer's
past performance is unsatisfactory or cannot be determined, or if the
employee's past work history cannot be verified.
(5) Any person who furnishes the department with acceptable proof
that he or she has performed conveyance work in the category for which
a license is sought shall upon making application for a license and
paying the license fee receive a license without an examination. The
person must have:
(a) Worked without direct and immediate supervision for a general
or specialty contractor registered under chapter 18.27 RCW and engaged
in the business of performing conveyance work in this state. This
employment may not be less than each and all of the three years
immediately before March 1, 2004. The person must apply within ninety
days after the effective date of rules adopted under this chapter
establishing licensing requirements;
(b) Worked without direct and immediate supervision for an owner
exempt from licensing requirements under RCW 70.87.270 or a public
agency as an individual responsible for maintenance of conveyances
owned by the owner exempt from licensing requirements under RCW
70.87.270 or the public agency. This employment may not be less than
each and all of the three years immediately before March 1, 2004. The
person must apply within ninety days after the effective date of rules
adopted under this chapter establishing licensing requirements;
(c) Obtained a certificate of completion and successfully passed
the mechanic examination of a nationally recognized training program
for the elevator industry such as the national elevator industry
educational program or its equivalent; or
(d) Obtained a certificate of completion of an apprenticeship
program for an elevator mechanic, having standards substantially equal
to those of this chapter, and registered with the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council.
(6) A license must be issued to an individual holding a valid
license from a state having entered into a reciprocal agreement with
the department and having standards substantially equal to those of
this chapter, upon application and without examination.

--- END ---