BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of community, trade, and
economic development, in conjunction with the department of ecology and
the department of fish and wildlife, shall, by means of a pilot
project, study and develop implementation recommendations for an
alternative means that can be adopted in statute for cities and
counties to use in order to fulfill growth management act goals for
protection of critical areas. This alternative means shall be known as
a "safe harbor agreement." The pilot project shall identify scientific
and landscape planning methods for protecting critical areas,
nonregulatory mechanisms for achieving the protection to the maximum
extent those mechanisms may be used, additional regulatory mechanisms
that are needed, and the way that all of these methods and mechanisms
may be used for purposes of a safe harbor agreement, as provided in
subsection (2) of this section. The pilot project must be conducted on
a basin scale at one location in Kittitas county and one location
selected by the department of community, trade, and economic
development in either Thurston or Lewis county. The pilot project must
be completed and the results reported to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2008.
(2) The elements of a safe harbor agreement under this act include
the following:
(a) The safe harbor agreement must be developed collaboratively and
seek creative and locally appropriate solutions based on voluntary
participation in government programs that offer financial incentives or
other assistance and encourage voluntary legal commitments that protect
or enhance critical areas;
(b) Local stakeholders and property owners, including the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the
department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, and any
other federal, state, or tribal authorities with jurisdiction over
critical areas, must be invited to participate;
(c) Detailed components to be incorporated in a safe harbor
agreement include, at a minimum: (i) The goals it establishes, such as
the amount of miles or acres to be protected; (ii) information to
balance with growth management act goals and requirements in order to
achieve locally appropriate implementation; (iii) binding legal
commitments for voluntary projects or actions, such as buffers,
dedications, conservation easements, transfer of development rights,
management plans, best management practices, and adaptive management
strategies; (iv) state and local programs, such as clustering,
mitigation banking, monitoring, and public investments; (v) regulatory
requirements and permits; and (vi) state and federal agencies and
processes that are consulted; and
(d) Appropriate administrative procedures for implementation and
enforcement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---