BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.687 and 2005 c 415 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a child who is less than sixteen years of age is being
transported in a motor vehicle that is in operation and that is
required by RCW 46.37.510 to be equipped with a safety belt system in
a passenger seating position, or is being transported in a neighborhood
electric vehicle that is in operation, the driver of the vehicle shall
keep the child properly restrained as follows:
(a) If the child is less than six years old and/or sixty pounds and
the passenger seating position equipped with a safety belt system
allows sufficient space for installation, then the child will be
restrained in a child restraint system that complies with standards of
the United States department of transportation and that is secured in
the vehicle in accordance with instructions of the manufacturer of the
child restraint system;
(b) If the child is less than one year of age or weighs less than
twenty pounds, the child shall be properly restrained in a rear-facing
infant seat;
(c) If the child is more than one but less than four years of age
or weighs less than forty pounds but at least twenty pounds, the child
shall be properly restrained in a forward facing child safety seat
restraint system;
(d) If the child is less than six but at least four years of age or
weighs less than sixty pounds but at least forty pounds, the child
shall be properly restrained in a child booster seat;
(e) If the child is six years of age or older or weighs more than
sixty pounds, the child shall be properly restrained with the motor
vehicle's safety belt properly adjusted and fastened around the child's
body or an appropriately fitting booster seat; and
(f) Enforcement of (a) through (e) of this subsection is subject to
a visual inspection by law enforcement to determine if the child
restraint system in use is appropriate for the child's individual
height, weight, and age. The visual inspection for usage of a forward
facing child safety seat must ensure that the seat in use is equipped
with a four-point shoulder harness system. The visual inspection for
usage of a booster seat must ensure that the seat belt properly fits
across the child's lap and the shoulder strap crosses the center of the
child's chest. The visual inspection for the usage of a seat belt by
a child must ensure that the lap belt properly fits across the child's
lap and the shoulder strap crosses the center of the child's chest. In
determining violations, consideration to the above criteria must be
given in conjunction with the provisions of (a) through (e) of this
subsection. The driver of a vehicle transporting a child who is under
the age of six years old or weighs less than sixty pounds, when the
vehicle is equipped with a passenger side air bag supplemental
restraint system, and the air bag system is activated, shall transport
the child in the back seat positions in the vehicle where it is
practical to do so.
(2) A person violating subsection (1)(a) through (e) of this
section may be issued a notice of traffic infraction under chapter
46.63 RCW. If the person to whom the notice was issued presents proof
of acquisition of an approved child passenger restraint system or a
child booster seat, as appropriate, within seven days to the
jurisdiction issuing the notice and the person has not previously had
a violation of this section dismissed, the jurisdiction shall dismiss
the notice of traffic infraction.
(3) Failure to comply with ((the)) any requirements of this section
((shall not constitute negligence by a parent or legal guardian; nor
shall failure to use a child restraint system)) may be admissible ((as
evidence of negligence)) in any civil action.
(4) This section does not apply to: (a) For hire vehicles, (b)
vehicles designed to transport sixteen or less passengers, including
the driver, operated by auto transportation companies, as defined in
RCW 81.68.010, (c) vehicles providing customer shuttle service between
parking, convention, and hotel facilities, and airport terminals, and
(d) school buses.
(5) As used in this section "child booster seat" means a child
passenger restraint system that meets the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety
Standards set forth in 49 C.F.R. 571.213 that is designed to elevate a
child to properly sit in a federally approved lap/shoulder belt system.
(6) The requirements of subsection (1)(a) through (e) of this
section do not apply in any seating position where there is only a lap
belt available and the child weighs more than forty pounds.
(7)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a person who
has a current national certification as a child passenger safety
technician and who in good faith provides inspection, adjustment, or
educational services regarding child passenger restraint systems is not
liable for civil damages resulting from any act or omission in
providing the services, other than acts or omissions constituting gross
negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
(b) The immunity provided in this subsection does not apply to a
certified child passenger safety technician who is employed by a
retailer of child passenger restraint systems and who, during his or
her hours of employment and while being compensated, provides
inspection, adjustment, or educational services regarding child
passenger restraint systems.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.687 and 2005 c 415 s 1 and 2005 c 132 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Whenever a child who is less than sixteen years of age is being
transported in a motor vehicle that is in operation and that is
required by RCW 46.37.510 to be equipped with a safety belt system in
a passenger seating position, or is being transported in a neighborhood
electric vehicle that is in operation, the driver of the vehicle shall
keep the child properly restrained as follows:
(a) A child must be restrained in a child restraint system, if the
passenger seating position equipped with a safety belt system allows
sufficient space for installation, until the child is eight years old,
unless the child is four feet nine inches or taller. The child
restraint system must comply with standards of the United States
department of transportation and must be secured in the vehicle in
accordance with instructions of the vehicle manufacturer and the child
restraint system manufacturer.
(b) A child who is eight years of age or older or four feet nine
inches or taller shall be properly restrained with the motor vehicle's
safety belt properly adjusted and fastened around the child's body or
an appropriately fitting child restraint system.
(c) The driver of a vehicle transporting a child who is under
thirteen years old shall transport the child in the back seat positions
in the vehicle where it is practical to do so.
(2) Enforcement of subsection (1) of this section is subject to a
visual inspection by law enforcement to determine if the child
restraint system in use is appropriate for the child's individual
height, weight, and age. The visual inspection for usage of a child
restraint system must ensure that the child restraint system is being
used in accordance with the instruction of the vehicle and the child
restraint system manufacturers. The driver of a vehicle transporting
a child who is under thirteen years old shall transport the child in
the back seat positions in the vehicle where it is practical to do so.
(3) A person violating subsection (1) of this section may be issued
a notice of traffic infraction under chapter 46.63 RCW. If the person
to whom the notice was issued presents proof of acquisition of an
approved child passenger restraint system or a child booster seat, as
appropriate, within seven days to the jurisdiction issuing the notice
and the person has not previously had a violation of this section
dismissed, the jurisdiction shall dismiss the notice of traffic
infraction.
(4) Failure to comply with ((the)) any requirements of this section
((shall not constitute negligence by a parent or legal guardian.
Failure to use a child restraint system shall not)) may be admissible
((as evidence of negligence)) in any civil action.
(5) This section does not apply to: (a) For hire vehicles, (b)
vehicles designed to transport sixteen or less passengers, including
the driver, operated by auto transportation companies, as defined in
RCW 81.68.010, (c) vehicles providing customer shuttle service between
parking, convention, and hotel facilities, and airport terminals, and
(d) school buses.
(6) As used in this section, "child restraint system" means a child
passenger restraint system that meets the Federal Motor Vehicle Safety
Standards set forth in 49 C.F.R. 571.213.
(7) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section do not apply
in any seating position where there is only a lap belt available and
the child weighs more than forty pounds.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a person who
has a current national certification as a child passenger safety
technician and who in good faith provides inspection, adjustment, or
educational services regarding child passenger restraint systems is not
liable for civil damages resulting from any act or omission in
providing the services, other than acts or omissions constituting gross
negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
(b) The immunity provided in this subsection does not apply to a
certified child passenger safety technician who is employed by a
retailer of child passenger restraint systems and who, during his or
her hours of employment and while being compensated, provides
inspection, adjustment, or educational services regarding child
passenger restraint systems.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.61.688 and 2003 c 353 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, the term "motor vehicle"
includes:
(a) "Buses," meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except
trailers, designed to carry more than ten passengers;
(b) "Multipurpose passenger vehicles," meaning motor vehicles with
motive power, except trailers, designed to carry ten persons or less
that are constructed either on a truck chassis or with special features
for occasional off-road operation;
(c) "Neighborhood electric vehicle," meaning a self-propelled,
electrically powered four-wheeled motor vehicle whose speed attainable
in one mile is more than twenty miles per hour and not more than
twenty-five miles per hour and conforms to federal regulations under
Title 49 C.F.R. Part 571.500;
(d) "Passenger cars," meaning motor vehicles with motive power,
except multipurpose passenger vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers,
designed for carrying ten passengers or less; and
(e) "Trucks," meaning motor vehicles with motive power, except
trailers, designed primarily for the transportation of property.
(2) This section only applies to motor vehicles that meet the
manual seat belt safety standards as set forth in federal motor vehicle
safety standard 208 and to neighborhood electric vehicles. This
section does not apply to a vehicle occupant for whom no safety belt is
available when all designated seating positions as required by federal
motor vehicle safety standard 208 are occupied.
(3) Every person sixteen years of age or older operating or riding
in a motor vehicle shall wear the safety belt assembly in a properly
adjusted and securely fastened manner.
(4) No person may operate a motor vehicle unless all child
passengers under the age of sixteen years are either: (a) Wearing a
safety belt assembly or (b) are securely fastened into an approved
child restraint device.
(5) A person violating this section shall be issued a notice of
traffic infraction under chapter 46.63 RCW. A finding that a person
has committed a traffic infraction under this section shall be
contained in the driver's abstract but shall not be available to
insurance companies or employers.
(6) Failure to comply with ((the)) any requirements of this section
((does not constitute negligence, nor may failure to wear a safety belt
assembly)) may be admissible ((as evidence of negligence)) in any civil
action.
(7) This section does not apply to an operator or passenger who
possesses written verification from a licensed physician that the
operator or passenger is unable to wear a safety belt for physical or
medical reasons.
(8) The state patrol may adopt rules exempting operators or
occupants of farm vehicles, construction equipment, and vehicles that
are required to make frequent stops from the requirement of wearing
safety belts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 1 of this act expires June 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act takes effect June 1,
2007.

--- END ---