BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that independent
nonprofit schools, colleges, and universities are vital educational
resources to the state of Washington. For the state to be competitive
in a global economy, all educational resources must be competitive and
provide high-quality programs and services for students.
The legislature recognizes that independent nonprofit schools,
colleges, and universities are important economic drivers in their
communities, and encourages institutions to support local communities,
to provide public benefit, and to respond to community expectations
that they share facilities, offer programs, and attract students on par
with Washington's publicly owned institutions and out-of-state schools
and colleges. Further, the legislature encourages innovative programs
and educational opportunities, sustainable practices, and increased use
of facilities so that operations of institutions can be more cost-effective.
The legislature wishes to remove barriers that discourage
institutions from being more collaborative, that make it more difficult
to provide high-quality services and necessities to their students, and
that discourage appropriate and beneficial use of institutional
facilities by the broader community. To this end, the legislature
seeks to provide consistent, predictable, and easily administrable
rules for reference by the state department of revenue and schools and
colleges.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.36.050 and 2001 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following property is exempt from taxation:
(1) Property owned or used by or for any nonprofit school or
college in this state for educational purposes or cultural or art
educational programs as defined in RCW 82.04.4328. Real property so
exempt shall not exceed four hundred acres in extent and, except as
provided in RCW 84.36.805, shall be used exclusively for college or
campus purposes ((including but not limited to, buildings and grounds
designed for the educational, athletic, or social programs of the
institution, the housing of students, the housing of religious faculty,
the housing of the chief administrator, athletic buildings and all
other school or college facilities)), the need for which would be
nonexistent but for the presence of the school or college and which are
principally designed to further the educational functions of the
college or schools. If the property is leased to the nonprofit school
or college by another person or entity, the benefit of the exemption
must inure to the user;
(2) Real or personal property owned by a not-for-profit foundation
that is established for the exclusive support of an institution of
higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016. The property is exempt
if it is leased to and used by the institution exclusively for college
or campus purposes and is principally designed to further the
educational functions of the institution. The exemption is only
available for property actively utilized by currently enrolled
students. The benefit of the exemption must inure to the user.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "used exclusively for college
or campus purposes" includes the use of real or personal property in a
manner that is in furtherance of or consistent with school or college
purposes, including, but not limited to, all school or college property
used for any of the following:
(a) The educational, athletic, recreational, social, employee and
other similar programs of the school or college, including the support
or administration of such programs and including, but not limited to,
programs for reputation enhancing, alumni relations, relations with
community members and community organizations, student services, and
employee compensation and benefits;
(b) Residential facilities for students, religious faculty, or the
president or chief administrator;
(c) Any activity by any person using the exempt property without
charge, that is consistent with the educational, athletic, or social
programs of the school or college;
(d) The loan or rental by the school or college to students, staff,
or alumni, of exempt property for educational, athletic, or social
activities that are consistent with school or college programs;
(e) The loan or rental by the school or college to third parties,
of exempt property for educational or athletic activities conducted by
the third parties that are consistent with school or college programs;
(f) Any use of school or college property by third parties for
pecuniary gain or to promote business, for not more than a total of
seven days for all such activities by third parties, where such third
party use is measured separately with respect to each specific venue or
location located on such property, in one calendar year. However, any
use of school or college property described in (a) through (e) of this
subsection is not subject to the limitation of this subsection (3)(f),
whether or not a third party uses such property for pecuniary gain or
to promote business.
(4) The amount of any rent or donations received by the school or
college with respect to loans or rentals under subsection (3)(d) or (e)
of this section must be reasonable and not exceed maintenance and
operation expenses attributable to the portion of the property loaned
or rented. The requirements set forth in RCW 84.36.805(2)(a)(ii) shall
not apply for purposes of determining eligibility for the exemption
provided under this section with respect to uses of the property set
forth in subsection (3)(a) through (f) of this section.
(5) The exemption under this section is not nullified by an
inadvertent use of the property in a manner inconsistent with the
purpose for which exemption is granted, if the inadvertent use is not
part of a pattern of use. A pattern of use is presumed when an
inadvertent use is repeated in the same assessment year or in two or
more successive assessment years.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.36.805 and 2003 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to qualify for an exemption under this chapter, the
nonprofit organizations, associations, or corporations must satisfy the
conditions in this section.
(2) The property must be used exclusively for the actual operation
of the activity for which exemption is granted, unless otherwise
provided, and does not exceed an amount reasonably necessary for that
purpose, except:
(a) The loan or rental of the property does not subject the
property to tax if:
(i) The rents and donations received for the use of the portion of
the property are reasonable and do not exceed the maintenance and
operation expenses attributable to the portion of the property loaned
or rented; and
(ii) Except for the exemptions under RCW 84.36.030(4), 84.36.037,
84.36.050, and 84.36.060(1) (a) and (b), the property would be exempt
from tax if owned by the organization to which it is loaned or rented;
(b) The use of the property for fund-raising activities does not
subject the property to tax if the fund-raising activities are
consistent with the purposes for which the exemption is granted.
(3) The property must be irrevocably dedicated to the purpose for
which exemption has been granted, and on the liquidation, dissolution,
or abandonment by said organization, association, or corporation, said
property will not inure directly or indirectly to the benefit of any
shareholder or individual, except a nonprofit organization,
association, or corporation which too would be entitled to property tax
exemption. This property need not be irrevocably dedicated if it is
leased or rented to those qualified for exemption under this chapter or
RCW 84.36.560 for leased property, but only if under the terms of the
lease or rental agreement the nonprofit organization, association, or
corporation receives the benefit of the exemption.
(4) The facilities and services must be available to all regardless
of race, color, national origin or ancestry.
(5) The organization, association, or corporation must be duly
licensed or certified where such licensing or certification is required
by law or regulation.
(6) Property sold to organizations, associations, or corporations
with an option to be repurchased by the seller shall not qualify for
exempt status. This subsection does not apply to property sold to a
nonprofit entity, as defined in RCW 84.36.560(7), by:
(a) A nonprofit as defined in RCW 84.36.800 that is exempt from
income tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code;
(b) A governmental entity established under RCW 35.21.660,
35.21.670, or 35.21.730;
(c) A housing authority created under RCW 35.82.030;
(d) A housing authority meeting the definition in RCW
35.82.210(2)(a); or
(e) A housing authority established under RCW 35.82.300.
(7) The department shall have access to its books in order to
determine whether the nonprofit organization, association, or
corporation is exempt from taxes under this chapter.
(8) This section does not apply to exemptions granted under RCW
84.36.020, 84.36.032, 84.36.250, and 84.36.260.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2007 and thereafter.

--- END ---