BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.20.100 and 1998 c 95 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of the University of Washington shall be vested
in a board of regents to consist of ten members, one of whom shall be
a student. The governor shall select the student member from a list of
candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by the
governing body of the associated students. They shall be appointed by
the governor with the consent of the senate, and, except for the
student member, shall hold their offices for a term of six years from
the first day of October and until their successors shall be appointed
and qualified. The student member shall hold his or her office for a
term of one year from the first day of ((June)) July until the first
day of July of the following year or until his or her successor is
appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The student member shall
be a full-time student in good standing at the university at the time
of appointment.
(2) Six members of said board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In the case of a vacancy, or when an
appointment is made after the date of the expiration of a term, the
governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the
regent whose office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.30.100 and 1998 c 95 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of Washington State University shall be vested
in a board of regents to consist of ten members one of whom shall be a
student. The governor shall select the student member from a list of
candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by the
governing body of the associated students. They shall be appointed by
the governor, by and with the consent of the senate and, except for the
student member, shall hold their offices for a term of six years from
the first day of October and until their successors are appointed and
qualified. The student member shall hold his or her office for a term
of one year from the first day of ((June)) July until the first day of
July of the following year or until his or her successor is appointed
and qualified, whichever is later. The student member shall be a full-time student in good standing at the university at the time of
appointment.
(2) Six members of said board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In the case of a vacancy or when an
appointment is made after the date of the expiration of a term, the
governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the
regent whose office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) Each regent shall, before entering upon the discharge of his
respective duties as such, execute a good and sufficient bond to the
state of Washington, with two or more sufficient sureties, residents of
the state, or with a surety company licensed to do business within the
state, in the penal sum of not less than five thousand dollars,
conditioned for the faithful performance of his duties as such regent:
PROVIDED, That the university shall pay any fees incurred for any such
bonds for their board members.
(5) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.35.100 and 1998 c 95 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of each of the regional universities shall be
vested in a board of trustees consisting of eight members, one of whom
shall be a student. The governor shall select the student member from
a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than five,
submitted by the governing body of the associated students. They shall
be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate and, except
for the student member, shall hold their offices for a term of six
years from the first day of October and until their successors are
appointed and qualified. The student member shall hold his or her
office for a term of one year from the first day of ((June)) July and
until the first day of July of the following year or until his or her
successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The student
member shall be a full-time student in good standing at the respective
university at the time of appointment.
(2) Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In case of a vacancy, or when an appointment
is made after the date of expiration of the term, the governor shall
fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the trustee whose
office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.40.100 and 1998 c 95 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of The Evergreen State College shall be vested
in a board of trustees consisting of eight members, one of whom shall
be a student. The governor shall select the student member from a list
of candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by
the student body. They shall be appointed by the governor with the
consent of the senate and, except for the student member, shall hold
their offices for a term of six years from the first day of October and
until their successors are appointed and qualified. The student member
shall hold his or her office for a term of one year from the first day
of ((June)) July and until the first day of July of the following year
or until his or her successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is
later. The student member shall be a full-time student in good
standing at the college at the time of appointment.
(2) Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In case of a vacancy, or when an appointment
is made after the date of expiration of the term, the governor shall
fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the trustee whose
office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.

--- END ---