BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.52.117 and 2005 c 481 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person commits the crime of animal fighting if the person
knowingly does any of the following:
(a) Owns, possesses, keeps, breeds, trains, buys, sells, or
advertises or offers for sale any animal with the intent that the
animal shall be engaged in an exhibition of fighting with another
animal;
(b) Knowingly or with the intent to, promotes, organizes, conducts,
participates in, is a spectator, advertises, prepares, or performs any
service in the furtherance of an exhibition of animal fighting,
transports spectators to an animal fight, or provides or serves as a
stakeholder for any money wagered on an animal fight at any place or
building;
(c) Keeps or uses any place for the purpose of animal fighting, or
manages or accepts payment of admission to any place kept or used for
the purpose of animal fighting;
(d) Suffers or permits any place over which the person has
possession or control to be occupied, kept, or used for the purpose of
an exhibition of animal fighting; or
(e) Takes, leads away, possesses, confines, sells, transfers, or
receives a stray animal or a pet animal, with the intent to deprive the
owner of the pet animal, and with the intent of using the stray animal
or pet animal for animal fighting, or for training or baiting for the
purpose of animal fighting.
(2) A person who violates this section is guilty of a class C
felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.
(3) Nothing in this section prohibits the following:
(a) The use of dogs in the management of livestock, as defined by
chapter 16.57 RCW, by the owner of the livestock or the owner's
employees or agents or other persons in lawful custody of the
livestock;
(b) The use of dogs in hunting as permitted by law; or
(c) The training of animals or the use of equipment in the training
of animals for any purpose not prohibited by law.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "animal" means dogs or male
chickens.

--- END ---