BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to protect the use
and value of private property while providing for a healthy environment
and ensuring that government agencies do not damage the use or value of
private property, except if necessary to protect the public health and
safety. The legislature also intends to recognize and promote the
unique interests, knowledge, and abilities private property owners have
to protect the environment and land. To this end, government agencies
must be required to identify and encourage participation in voluntary
cooperative environmental enhancement programs with willing property
owners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 8.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Eminent domain may not be used by state or local agencies to
provide property for private use, but eminent domain is limited to the
purpose of obtaining property for physical use by the public, such as
for the physical siting of public facilities.
(2) Prior to transferring any property acquired by government
agencies through eminent domain to private persons or entities, the
government agency shall offer to sell the property to the person,
persons, or entities from whom the property was acquired at the amount
he or she received from the agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 64.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To avoid unnecessarily damaging the use and value of private
property, prior to taking any action which may damage the use or value
of private property, an agency must consider the purpose of the
regulation; any actual harm or public nuisance that is to be prevented
by the regulation; the parcels of property that will be affected by the
regulation; estimated damage to the use and value of the affected
parcels; and steps the agency has taken or will take to accomplish the
intended purpose by encouraging participation in voluntary cooperative
environmental enhancement programs with willing property owners.
(2) For purposes of this section and section 4 of this act, the
following definitions apply unless the context clearly requires
otherwise:
(a) "Private property" means an interest in: Land or improvements
thereon; vested water rights; and crops, forest products, minerals, or
other natural resources that are owned by a nongovernmental entity.
(b) "Damage" means to:
(i) Divert water either above or below the surface onto private
property from a source constructed or maintained by an agency, without
explicit written permission of the property owner;
(ii) Prohibit or restrict any use or size, scope, and intensity of
any use legally existing or allowed by local ordinance as of January 1,
1996, unless such use is otherwise exempted from the definition of
"damage" in this section;
(iii) Prohibit actions by a private property owner reasonably
required to prevent or mitigate harm from fire, flooding, erosion, or
other natural disasters or conditions that would impair the use or
value of private property;
(iv) Implement buffer restrictions on private property where there
is no substantial documented evidence of: Actual environmental harm on
the site at issue; a nuisance as defined in RCW 7.48.010; or a public
nuisance as defined in RCW 9.66.010;
(v) Prohibit maintenance or removal of trees that threaten to cause
harm to people, animals, or buildings or to obstruct views;
(vi) Prohibit the continued operation, maintenance, or repair of
existing tidegates or other infrastructure reasonably required for the
protection of the use or value of private property;
(vii) Prohibit or restrict operations and maintenance of structures
necessary for the operation of irrigation facilities including, but not
limited to, diversions, operation structures, canals, drainage ditches,
delivery systems, or the full beneficial use of water rights associated
with these structures.
"Damage" does not include adoption or enforcement of public health
and safety laws or regulations to preserve or protect human life,
including fire and building code restrictions; structural requirements
to prevent harm from earthquakes, flooding, or other natural disasters;
limitations on the operation of sex offender housing or adult
entertainment; requiring adherence to chemical use restrictions adopted
by the United States environmental protection agency; worker health and
safety laws or regulations; wage and hour laws; dairy nutrient
management restrictions in chapter 90.64 RCW; or regulations or
abatement orders necessary to prevent nuisances as defined in RCW
7.48.010 or public nuisances as defined in RCW 9.66.010.
(c) "Damages" means compensation equal to the amount that the fair
market value of the affected property has been decreased by the action,
plus any costs and attorneys' fees incurred by the property owner in
seeking to enforce this act.
(d) "Action" means to enact or adopt ordinances, regulations, or
rules, enforce or apply ordinances, regulations, or rules to private
property, or to make decisions to undertake physical actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 64.40 RCW
to read as follows:
If, after completing the considerations in section 3(1) of this
act, the agency decides to take action, other than enacting or adopting
ordinances, regulations, or rules, which will damage the use or value
of private property, the agency shall first pay the property owner
damages as defined in section 3 of this act. This section shall not be
construed to limit agencies' ability to waive, or issue variances from,
other legal requirements. An agency which chooses not to take action
which will damage the use or value of private property is not liable
under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 64.40 RCW
to read as follows:
In considering whether to waive or grant a variance from an
ordinance, regulation, or rule in order to avoid responsibility of
paying damages as provided in section 4 of this act, an agency may not
charge a fee to the property owner in excess of fifty dollars.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.70A.060 and 2005 c 423 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in RCW 36.70A.1701, each county that is
required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, and each city within
such county, shall adopt development regulations on or before September
1, 1991, to assure the conservation of agricultural, forest, and
mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations
adopted under this ((subsection may)) chapter shall not prohibit uses
legally existing on any parcel prior to their adoption and shall
((remain in effect until the county or city adopts development
regulations pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040)) not interfere with duties
under chapter 64.40 RCW. Such regulations shall assure that the use of
lands adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands shall
not interfere with the continued use, in the accustomed manner and in
accordance with best management practices, of these designated lands
for the production of food, agricultural products, or timber, or for
the extraction of minerals.
(b) Counties and cities shall require that all plats, short plats,
development permits, and building permits issued for development
activities on, or within five hundred feet of, lands designated as
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands, contain a
notice that the subject property is within or near designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands on which a
variety of commercial activities may occur that are not compatible with
residential development for certain periods of limited duration. The
notice for mineral resource lands shall also inform that an application
might be made for mining-related activities, including mining,
extraction, washing, crushing, stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and
recycling of minerals.
(2) Each county and city shall adopt development regulations that
protect critical areas that are required to be designated under RCW
36.70A.170. For counties and cities that are required or choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be
adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the
counties and cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on
or before March 1, 1992.
(3) Such counties and cities shall review these designations and
development regulations when adopting their comprehensive plans under
RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development regulations under RCW
36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and development regulations
to insure consistency.
(4) Forest land and agricultural land located within urban growth
areas shall not be designated by a county or city as forest land or
agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW
36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a program authorizing
transfer or purchase of development rights.

Sec. 7 RCW 36.70A.172 and 1995 c 347 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In designating and protecting critical areas under this
chapter, counties and cities shall include the best available science
in developing policies and development regulations to protect the
functions and values of critical areas. ((In addition,)) Counties and
cities shall give special consideration to voluntary conservation or
protection measures necessary to preserve or enhance anadromous
fisheries, provided that no city, county, or state agency shall compel
participation by a private property owner in a voluntary conservation
or protection program as a condition of receiving any other permit or
approval under this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be
construed to authorize an interference with the duties in chapter 64.40
RCW.
(2) If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts
is necessary or will be of substantial assistance in reaching its
decision, a growth management hearings board may retain scientific or
other expert advice to assist in reviewing a petition under RCW
36.70A.290 that involves critical areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The provisions of this act are to be
liberally construed to effectuate the intent, policies, and purpose of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Nothing in this act shall diminish any other
remedy provided under the United States or Washington state
Constitutions, or federal or state law, and this act is not intended to
modify or replace any such remedy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---