BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.540 and 2002 c 118 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county sheriff shall (1) forward the information, photographs,
and fingerprints obtained pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130, including the sex
offender's risk level classification and any notice of change of
address, to the Washington state patrol within five working days; and
(2) upon implementation of RCW 4.24.550(5)(a), the Washington state
patrol will forward ((any)) the information ((obtained pursuant to RCW
9A.44.130 that is)) necessary to operate the registered sex offender
web site described in RCW 4.24.550(5)(a) to the Washington association
of sheriffs and police chiefs within five working days of receiving the
information, including any notice of change of address or change in
risk level notification. The state patrol shall maintain a central
registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders required to register
under RCW 9A.44.130 and shall adopt rules consistent with chapters
10.97, 10.98, and 43.43 RCW as are necessary to carry out the purposes
of RCW 9A.44.130, 9A.44.140, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 46.20.187,
70.48.470, and 72.09.330. The Washington state patrol shall reimburse
the counties for the costs of processing the offender registration,
including taking the fingerprints and the photographs.

--- END ---