BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall convene a work group to develop a model policy
for schools to follow when they receive notification pursuant to RCW
9A.44.130. The model policy must address, among other issues:
(a) The designation of appropriate school personnel to receive
notification of information received pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130;
(b) Identification of school personnel who are in a position to
recognize high-risk situations or factors that may indicate the
offender is encountering difficulty in controlling his or her behavior;
(c) Whether some portion of the records received from the juvenile
rehabilitation administration or court personnel is confidential or
otherwise protected;
(d) To whom some portion of the information received must or should
be disclosed;
(e) How to assist juvenile offenders in making a safe and
successful transition from institutional schools to public schools;
(f) How to work with juvenile probation and juvenile parole
professionals in implementing a safety plan;
(g) What actions school authorities may take when they identify
high-risk situations, both for the short-term and long-term safety of
other students; and
(h) Variations in approaches depending on the offender level of the
enrolled offender.
(2) In carrying out its duties under this section, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall consult, as appropriate,
with representatives from other agencies and professional
organizations, including:
(a) The Washington state school directors association;
(b) The department of corrections;
(c) County sheriffs' offices;
(d) Prosecuting attorneys;
(e) Juvenile probation counselors;
(f) Juvenile court administrators;
(g) The juvenile rehabilitation administration of the department of
social and health services;
(h) Elementary and secondary school districts;
(i) Educational service districts;
(j) The Washington association of school administrators;
(k) The Washington state parent-teacher association;
(l) Parents and guardians of school-age children;
(m) Washington coalition of sexual assault programs; and
(n) Other individuals with related experience as deemed
appropriate.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
submit to appropriate committees of the legislature a final report and
recommendations by November 15, 2006.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The Washington coalition of sexual assault
programs, in consultation with the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys,
and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall
develop educational materials to be made available throughout the state
to inform parents and other interested community members about:
(1) The laws related to sex offenses, including registration,
community notification and the classification of sex offenders based on
an assessment of the risk of reoffending;
(2) How to recognize behaviors characteristic of sex offenses and
sex offenders;
(3) How to prevent victimization, particularly that of young
children;
(4) How to take advantage of community resources for victims of
sexual assault; and
(5) Other information as deemed appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 2 of this act, referencing section 2 of this act by bill or
chapter number and section number is not provided by June 30, 2006, in
the omnibus appropriations act, section 2 of this act is null and void.

--- END ---