BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2005 c 488 s 330 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (06-2-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $12,000,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for projects and water right acquisitions to support
watershed planning efforts and achieving instream flows subject to the
following project types, conditions, and limitations:
(1) Up to $1,353,172 of the appropriation is provided to improve
irrigation efficiency and to achieve associated flow improvements in
the Twisp and Methow rivers by providing for cleaning and lining and/or
piping of 30,943 linear feet of the irrigation canal within the lower
(downstream) seven miles of the Methow Valley irrigation district's
west canal. Of this amount, up to $100,000 is provided for a neutral
independent consultant to provide management assistance to the Methow
Valley irrigation district for purposes of identifying structural and
operational improvements to increase overall system water use
efficiency.
(2) Up to $200,000 of the appropriation is provided for a portion
of the costs of the project level environmental impact statement for
the Ahtanum creek watershed restoration program, including construction
of the Pine Hollow reservoir, provided there is agreement among the
Yakama nation, Ahtanum irrigation district, and other jurisdictional
federal, state, and local agencies and entities to proceed with the
environmental impact statement.
(3) Up to $75,000 of the appropriation is provided to formalize the
Ahtanum creek watershed restoration program, including identification
of site specific habitat improvement projects and determination of the
most appropriate restoration program alternative to implement.
(4) Up to $1,500,000 of the appropriation is provided to reduce
diversions from the Dungeness river through pipeline projects
identified in the Dungeness river comprehensive irrigation district
management plan. For at least one year from the effective date of this
section, while the parties seek resolution of the court action filed in
Thurston county superior court, No. 04-2-00078-2, none of these funds
may be allocated to any projects in the Dungeness river basin that are
within the area that is the zone of contribution for ground and surface
water infiltration to the existing Graysmarsh wetland.
(5) $100,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to the city of
Normandy Park to implement the basin plan for the Miller/Walker and
Salmon creek basins.
(6) Water storage grants for the development of plans, engineering
and financing reports, acquiring lands and facilities, and other
preconstruction activities associated with the development of water
storage and groundwater storage and recovery projects. Proposed
projects should be consistent with the recommendations of the water
storage task force. The department of ecology would issue grants in
consultation with the departments of agriculture and fish and wildlife.
(7) Infrastructure improvement projects and other water management
actions that benefit stream flows and enhance water supply to resolve
conflicts among water needs for municipal water supply, agriculture
water supply, and fish restoration. The stream flow improvements and
other public benefits secured from these projects should be
commensurate with the investment of state funds.
(8) Projects for planning, acquisition, construction, and
improvement of agriculture water supply facilities and achieving water
conservation and water use efficiency improvements.
(9) Financial assistance to purchase and install water measuring
devices at points of diversion and withdrawal. Preference would be
given to fish-critical basins, to areas participating in the department
of fish and wildlife fish screening and cooperative compliance
programs, and to basins where watershed planning has determined
additional water diversion and withdrawal information is needed.
(10) Funding for acquisition of either water or water rights, or
both, for instream flow achievement and establishment of water
accounts. The appropriation is provided for either the purchase or
lease, or both, of water rights. It is also provided for the purpose
of improving stream and river flows in fish critical basins under the
trust water rights program under chapters 90.42 and 90.38 RCW.
(11) The department shall provide small grants to watershed
councils that have completed watershed plans. The grants are intended
to support periodic meetings of the councils so that they can monitor
the implementation of watershed plans.
(12) $250,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to the department
of ecology to work with interested parties to study instream flows in
the Hanford Reach and their impact on the ecological condition of the
Hanford Reach especially as it relates to the needs of salmon and
steelhead in the Hanford Reach. The department shall submit to the
office of the governor and to the appropriate fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature a report of its findings by July 1, 2007.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000

--- END ---