BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall establish a Washington state parks golden age
pass that entitles the holder to free access and free use of all state
parks. The pass costs a one-time fee of ten dollars. The pass allows
a senior, and others in their private vehicle, into the park.
The commission must adopt rules for the implementation and use of
the state parks golden age pass. The commission must submit a yearly
report to the legislature concerning the use and cost of the state
parks golden age pass.
For the purposes of this section and rules adopted under this
section, "senior" means a person age sixty-two or older.

--- END ---