BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.104.160 and 2003 c 1 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
An agency may impose a sales and use tax solely for the purpose of
providing high capacity transportation service, in addition to the tax
authorized by RCW 82.14.030, upon retail car rentals within the
agency's jurisdiction that are taxable by the state under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of tax shall not exceed 2.172 percent.
The base of the tax shall be the selling price in the case of a sales
tax or the rental value of the vehicle used in the case of a use tax.
An agency imposing the motor vehicle excise tax under this section
as it existed prior to December 5, 2002, shall not collect the tax from
an indigent person. "Indigent person" means a person receiving an
annual income, after taxes, of one hundred twenty-five percent or less
of the current federally established poverty level.
Any motor vehicle excise tax previously imposed under the
provisions of RCW 81.104.160(1) shall be repealed, terminated, and
expire on December 5, 2002.

--- END ---