BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Mortgage lenders doing business in
Washington state shall prominently display on their statements to
consumers:
(1) A valid mailing address for consumers to use in contacting the
business; and
(2) A telephone number that enables a consumer to talk to a live
person, in the event that voice mail selections fail to resolve the
consumer's issues or adequately answer the consumer's questions. The
telephone number that connects to a live person must, at a minimum, be
staffed during regular business hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Credit card issuers doing business in
Washington state shall prominently display on their statements to
consumers:
(1) A valid mailing address for consumers to use in contacting the
business; and
(2) A telephone number that enables a consumer to talk to a live
person, in the event that voice mail selections fail to resolve the
consumer's issues or adequately answer the consumer's questions. The
telephone number that connects to a live person must, at a minimum, be
staffed during regular business hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---