BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.23 RCW
to read as follows:
A second class city, by ordinance, may adopt a policy for the
payment of claims or other obligations of the city, which are payable
out of solvent funds, electing to pay such obligations by warrant or by
check. However, when the applicable fund is not solvent at the time
payment is ordered, a warrant shall be issued. When checks are to be
used, the legislative body shall designate the qualified public
depositary, upon which such checks are to be drawn, and the officers
authorized or required to sign such checks. Wherever a reference is
made to warrants in this title, such term shall include checks where
authorized by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.27 RCW
to read as follows:
A town, by ordinance, may adopt a policy for the payment of claims
or other obligations of the town, which are payable out of solvent
funds, electing to pay such obligations by warrant or by check.
However, when the applicable fund is not solvent at the time payment is
ordered, a warrant shall be issued. When checks are to be used, the
legislative body shall designate the qualified public depositary, upon
which such checks are to be drawn, and the officers authorized or
required to sign such checks. Wherever a reference is made to warrants
in this title, such term shall include checks where authorized by this
section.

--- END ---