BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there is a
large, unmet need for affordable housing in the cities and counties of
Washington that is increasing every year. The legislature further
finds that many single-family residential neighborhoods were developed
at an earlier time at densities less than the maximum allowable under
current zoning regulations. The legislature further finds that the
growth management act requires increased densities in single-family
areas, and that the rising costs of public facilities to accommodate
growth coupled with insufficient revenues available for such facilities
make infill housing within existing developed areas an economic
necessity. The legislature concludes that allowing reasonable
development of underutilized parcels of land within urban growth areas
has significant potential to provide much-needed affordable ownership
housing while also providing resources to existing property owners and
their communities.
(2) The legislature declares that it is the purpose of this act to:
(a) Increase the supply of affordable housing without government
subsidies or the provision of additional public facilities; (b)
encourage moderately priced for-sale housing in single-family
neighborhoods and increase housing opportunities for people in a
variety of life cycle stages; and (c) provide homeowners with an
additional option for the portion of their property that is not
required for the use of the existing residential unit.

Sec. 2 RCW 58.17.060 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 51 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a city, town, or county shall adopt
regulations and procedures, and appoint administrative personnel for
the summary approval of short plats and short subdivisions or
alteration or vacation thereof. When an alteration or vacation
involves a public dedication, the alteration or vacation shall be
processed as provided in RCW 58.17.212 or 58.17.215. Such regulations
shall be adopted by ordinance and shall provide that a short plat and
short subdivision may be approved only if written findings that are
appropriate, as provided in RCW 58.17.110, are made by the
administrative personnel, and may contain wholly different requirements
than those governing the approval of preliminary and final plats of
subdivisions and may require surveys and monumentations and shall
require filing of a short plat, or alteration or vacation thereof, for
record in the office of the county auditor: PROVIDED, That such
regulations must contain a requirement that land in short subdivisions
may not be further divided in any manner within a period of five years
without the filing of a final plat, except that when the short plat
contains fewer than four parcels, nothing in this section shall prevent
the owner who filed the short plat from filing an alteration within the
five-year period to create up to a total of four lots within the
original short plat boundaries: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such
regulations are not required to contain a penalty clause as provided in
RCW 36.32.120 and may provide for wholly injunctive relief.
An ordinance requiring a survey shall require that the survey be
completed and filed with the application for approval of the short
subdivision.
(2) Cities, towns, and counties shall include in their short plat
regulations and procedures pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
provisions for considering sidewalks and other planning features that
assure safe walking conditions for students who walk to and from
school.
(3)(a) Cities, towns, and counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040
shall provide in their regulations and procedures for the review and
approval of short plats and short subdivisions or alteration or
vacation thereof that any lot or parcel within a residential zoning
district located within an urban growth area as designated under RCW
36.70A.110 that is two or more times the minimum lot size required in
the applicable zoning regulation may be divided into two or more lots
of regular or irregular shape, provided that:
(i) The averaged area of all lots created shall not be less than
the applicable minimum lot size;
(ii) All lots created shall have adequate provision for access to
a public street, either by direct frontage or easement, and an averaged
width and depth of at least fifty percent of the applicable minimum
requirements for such lots, if any;
(iii) All other applicable regulations and procedures shall apply;
and
(iv) All lots created shall be recognized as legal and conforming
for purposes of improvement.
(b) Any other city, town, or county may adopt the provisions of
this subsection.
(4)(a) Cities, towns, and counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040
shall provide in their regulations and procedures for the review and
approval of short plats and short subdivisions or alteration or
vacation thereof that the adjustment of boundary lines between abutting
lots or parcels in the same ownership within a residential zoning
district and located within an urban growth area as designated under
RCW 36.70A.110 may result in one or more lots or parcels that contain
insufficient area or dimension to meet minimum area or dimension
requirements for a building site but that the resulting lots or parcels
shall be recognized as legal and conforming for purposes of
improvement, provided that:
(i) The averaged area of all resulting lots or parcels shall not be
less than the applicable minimum lot size;
(ii) All resulting lots or parcels shall have adequate provision
for access to a public street, either by direct frontage or easement,
and an averaged width and depth of at least fifty percent of the
applicable minimum requirements for such lots or parcels, if any; and
(iii) No additional lots or parcels are thereby created.
(b) Any other city, town, or county may adopt the provisions of
this subsection.

--- END ---