BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.21A.900 and 2002 c 198 s 906 are each amended to
read as follows:
This act takes effect ((six months after the amendment by congress
to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(f) authorizing or mandating states to adopt this
version of the uniform interstate family support act)) January 1, 2007.

--- END ---