BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
DEFINITIONS
Sec. 101 RCW 82.32.020 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 13 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) The meaning attributed in chapters 82.01 through 82.27 RCW to
the words and phrases "tax year," "taxable year," "person," "company,"
"gross proceeds of sales," "gross income of the business," "business,"
"engaging in business," "successor," "gross operating revenue," "gross
income," "taxpayer," "retail sale," "seller," "buyer," "purchaser,"
"extended warranty," and "value of products" shall apply equally to the
provisions of this chapter.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Agreement" means the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.
(b) "Associate member" means a petitioning state that is found to
be in compliance with the agreement and changes to its laws, rules, or
other authorities necessary to bring it into compliance are not in
effect, but are scheduled to take effect on or before January 1, 2008.
The petitioning states, by majority vote, may also grant associate
member status to a petitioning state that does not receive an
affirmative vote of three-fourths of the petitioning states upon a
finding that the state has achieved substantial compliance with the
terms of the agreement as a whole, but not necessarily each required
provision, measured qualitatively, and there is a reasonable
expectation that the state will achieve compliance by January 1, 2008.
(c) "Certified automated system" means software certified under the
agreement to calculate the tax imposed by each jurisdiction on a
transaction, determine the amount of tax to remit to the appropriate
state, and maintain a record of the transaction.
(d) "Certified service provider" means an agent certified under the
agreement to perform all of the seller's sales and use tax functions,
other than the seller's obligation to remit tax on its own purchases.
(e)(i) "Member state" means a state that:
(A) Has petitioned for membership in the agreement and submitted a
certificate of compliance; and
(B) Before the effective date of the agreement, has been found to
be in compliance with the requirements of the agreement by an
affirmative vote of three-fourths of the other petitioning states; or
(C) After the effective date of the agreement, has been found to be
in compliance with the agreement by a three-fourths vote of the entire
governing board of the agreement.
(ii) Membership by reason of (e)(i)(A) and (B) of this subsection
is effective on the first day of a calendar quarter at least sixty days
after at least ten states comprising at least twenty percent of the
total population, as determined by the 2000 federal census, of all
states imposing a state sales tax have petitioned for membership and
have either been found in compliance with the agreement or have been
found to be an associate member under section 704 of the agreement.
(iii) Membership by reason of (e)(i)(A) and (C) of this subsection
is effective on the state's proposed date of entry or the first day of
the calendar quarter after its petition is approved by the governing
board, whichever is later, and is at least sixty days after its
petition is approved.
(f) "Model 1 seller" means a seller that has selected a certified
service provider as its agent to perform all the seller's sales and use
tax functions, other than the seller's obligation to remit tax on its
own purchases.
(g) "Model 2 seller" means a seller that has selected a certified
automated system to perform part of its sales and use tax functions,
but retains responsibility for remitting the tax.
(h) "Model 3 seller" means a seller that has sales in at least five
member states, has total annual sales revenue of at least five hundred
million dollars, has a proprietary system that calculates the amount of
tax due each jurisdiction, and has entered into a performance agreement
with the member states that establishes a tax performance standard for
the seller. As used in this subsection (2)(h), a seller includes an
affiliated group of sellers using the same proprietary system.
(i) "Source" means the location in which the sale or use of
tangible personal property, an extended warranty, or a service, subject
to tax under chapter 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, or 82.14B RCW, is deemed to
occur.

Sec. 102 RCW 82.08.037 and 2004 c 153 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A seller is entitled to a credit or refund for sales taxes
previously paid on bad debts, as that term is used in 26 U.S.C. Sec.
166, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003.
(2) For purposes of this section, "bad debts" does not include:
(a) Amounts due on property that remains in the possession of the
seller until the full purchase price is paid;
(b) Expenses incurred in attempting to collect debt; and
(c) Repossessed property.
(3) If a credit or refund of sales tax is taken for a bad debt and
the debt is subsequently collected in whole or in part, the tax on the
amount collected must be paid and reported on the return filed for the
period in which the collection is made.
(4) Payments on a previously claimed bad debt are applied first
proportionally to the taxable price of the property or service and the
sales or use tax thereon, and secondly to interest, service charges,
and any other charges.
(5) If the seller uses a certified service provider as defined in
RCW ((82.58.010)) 82.32.020 to administer its sales tax
responsibilities, the certified service provider may claim, on behalf
of the seller, the credit or refund allowed by this section. The
certified service provider must credit or refund the full amount
received to the seller.
(6) The department shall allow an allocation of bad debts among
member states to the streamlined sales tax agreement, as defined in RCW
82.58.010(1), if the books and records of the person claiming bad debts
support the allocation.

Sec. 103 RCW 82.12.037 and 2004 c 153 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A seller is entitled to a credit or refund for use taxes
previously paid on bad debts, as that term is used in 26 U.S.C. Sec.
166, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003.
(2) For purposes of this section, "bad debts" does not include:
(a) Amounts due on property that remains in the possession of the
seller until the full purchase price is paid;
(b) Expenses incurred in attempting to collect debt; and
(c) Repossessed property.
(3) If a credit or refund of use tax is taken for a bad debt and
the debt is subsequently collected in whole or in part, the tax on the
amount collected must be paid and reported on the return filed for the
period in which the collection is made.
(4) Payments on a previously claimed bad debt are applied first
proportionally to the taxable price of the property or service and the
sales or use tax thereon, and secondly to interest, service charges,
and any other charges.
(5) If the seller uses a certified service provider as defined in
RCW ((82.58.010)) 82.32.020 to administer its use tax responsibilities,
the certified service provider may claim, on behalf of the seller, the
credit or refund allowed by this section. The certified service
provider must credit or refund the full amount received to the seller.
(6) The department shall allow an allocation of bad debts among
member states to the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, as
defined in RCW 82.58.010(1), if the books and records of the person
claiming bad debts support the allocation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW, to be codified between RCW 82.32.020 and 82.32.030, to read as
follows:
For purposes of compliance with the requirements of the agreement
only, and unless the context requires otherwise, the terms "product"
and "products" refer to tangible personal property, services, extended
warranties, and anything else that can be sold or used.

Sec. 105 RCW 82.02.210 and 2003 c 168 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature that Washington join as a
member state in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement referred to
in chapter 82.58 RCW. The agreement provides for a simpler and more
uniform sales and use tax structure among states that have sales and
use taxes. The intent of the legislature is to bring Washington's
sales and use tax system into compliance with the agreement so that
Washington may join as a member state and have a voice in the
development and administration of the system, and to substantially
reduce the burden of tax compliance on sellers.
(2) Chapter 168, Laws of 2003 does not include changes to
Washington law that may be required in the future and that are not
fully developed under the agreement. These include, but are not
limited to, changes relating to on-line registration, reporting, and
remitting of payments by businesses for sales and use tax purposes,
monetary allowances for sellers and their agents, sourcing, and amnesty
for businesses registering under the agreement.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that the provisions of
((chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW)) this title relating to the
administration and collection of state and local sales and use taxes be
interpreted and applied consistently with the agreement.
(4) The department of revenue shall report to the fiscal committees
of the legislature on January 1, 2004, and each January 1st thereafter,
on the development of the agreement and shall recommend changes to the
sales and use tax structure and propose legislation as may be necessary
to keep Washington in compliance with the agreement.

PART II
REGISTRATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A seller, by written agreement, may appoint a person to
represent the seller as its agent. The seller's agent has authority to
register the seller with the department under RCW 82.32.030. An agent
may also be a certified service provider, with authority to perform all
the seller's sales and use tax functions, except that the seller
remains responsible for remitting the tax on its own purchases.
(2) The seller or its agent must provide the department with a copy
of the written agreement upon request.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.32.030 and 1996 c 111 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
if any person engages in any business or performs any act upon which a
tax is imposed by the preceding chapters, he or she shall, under such
rules as the department of revenue shall prescribe, apply for and
obtain from the department a registration certificate. Such
registration certificate shall be personal and nontransferable and
shall be valid as long as the taxpayer continues in business and pays
the tax accrued to the state. In case business is transacted at two or
more separate places by one taxpayer, a separate registration
certificate for each place at which business is transacted with the
public shall be required. Each certificate shall be numbered and shall
show the name, residence, and place and character of business of the
taxpayer and such other information as the department of revenue deems
necessary and shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the place of
business for which it is issued. Where a place of business of the
taxpayer is changed, the taxpayer must return to the department the
existing certificate, and a new certificate will be issued for the new
place of business. No person required to be registered under this
section shall engage in any business taxable hereunder without first
being so registered. The department, by rule, may provide for the
issuance of certificates of registration to temporary places of
business.
(2) Unless the person is a dealer as defined in RCW 9.41.010,
registration under this section is not required if the following
conditions are met:
(a) A person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross
income of the business, from all business activities taxable under
chapter 82.04 RCW, is less than twelve thousand dollars per year;
(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities
taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than twelve thousand dollars
per year;
(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department
of revenue any other tax or fee which the department is authorized to
collect; and
(d) The person is not otherwise required to obtain a license
subject to the master application procedure provided in chapter 19.02
RCW.
(3) All persons who agree to collect and remit sales and use tax to
the department under the agreement must register through the central
registration system authorized under the agreement. Persons required
to register under subsection (1) of this section are not relieved of
that requirement because of registration under this subsection (3).

PART III
MONETARY ALLOWANCES AND VENDOR COMPENSATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt by rule monetary allowances for
certified service providers, model 2 sellers, and model 3 sellers and
all other sellers that are not model 1 or model 2 sellers. The
department may be guided by the provisions for monetary allowances
adopted by the governing board of the agreement to determine the amount
of the allowances and the conditions under which they are allowed. The
monetary allowances must be reasonable and provide adequate incentive
for certified service providers and sellers to collect and remit sales
and use taxes under the agreement. Monetary allowances will be funded
solely from state sales and use taxes.
(2) For certified service providers, the monetary allowance may
include a base rate that applies to taxable transactions processed by
the certified service provider. Additionally, for a period not to
exceed twenty-four months following a seller's registration under RCW
82.32.030(3), the monetary allowance may include a percentage of tax
revenue generated by the seller.
(3) For model 2 sellers, the monetary allowance may include a base
rate and a percentage of revenue generated by a seller registering
under RCW 82.32.030(3), but shall not exceed a period of twenty-four
months.
(4) For model 3 sellers and all other sellers that are not model 1
sellers or model 2 sellers, the monetary allowance may include a
percentage of tax revenue generated by a seller registering under RCW
82.32.030(3), but shall not exceed a period of twenty-four months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department may adopt by rule vendor compensation for
sellers collecting and remitting sales and use taxes. The vendor
compensation may include a base rate or a percentage of tax revenue
collected by the seller, and may vary by type of seller. The
department may be guided by the findings of the cost of collection
study performed under the agreement, by cost of collection studies
performed by the department, and by vendor compensation provided by
other states, to determine reasonable vendor compensation for sellers
for the costs to collect and remit sales and use taxes. Vendor
compensation will be funded solely from state sales and use taxes.
(2) A seller is not entitled to vendor compensation while the
seller or its certified service provider receives a monetary allowance
under section 301 of this act.

PART IV
AMNESTY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) No assessment for taxes imposed or authorized under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, or related penalties or interest, may be
made by the department against a seller who:
(a) Within twelve months of the effective date of this state
becoming a member state of the agreement, registers under RCW
82.32.030(3) to collect and remit to the department the applicable
taxes imposed or authorized under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW
on sales made to buyers in this state in accordance with the terms of
the agreement, if the seller was not otherwise registered in this state
in the twelve-month period preceding the effective date of this state
becoming a member state of the agreement; and
(b) Continues to be registered and continues to collect and remit
to the department the applicable taxes imposed or authorized under
chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW for a period of at least thirty-six months, absent the seller's fraud or intentional misrepresentation
of a material fact.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section preclude an
assessment for taxes imposed or authorized under chapters 82.08, 82.12,
and 82.14 RCW for sales made to buyers during the period the seller was
not registered in this state.
(3) The provisions of this section do not apply to any seller with
respect to:
(a) Any matter or matters for which the seller, before registering
to collect and remit the applicable taxes imposed or authorized under
chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, received notice from the
department of the commencement of an audit and which audit is not yet
finally resolved including any related administrative and judicial
processes;
(b) Taxes imposed or authorized under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and
82.14 RCW and collected or remitted to the department by the seller; or
(c) That seller's liability for taxes imposed or authorized under
chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW in that seller's capacity as a
buyer.
(4) The limitation periods for making an assessment or correction
of an assessment prescribed in RCW 82.32.050(3) and 82.32.100(3) do not
run during the thirty-six month period in subsection (1)(b) of this
section.

PART V
SOURCING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (5), (6), (7), and (8) of
this section, for purposes of collecting or paying sales or use taxes
to the appropriate jurisdictions, all sales at retail shall be sourced
in accordance with this subsection and subsections (2) through (4) of
this section.
(a) When tangible personal property, an extended warranty, or a
service defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 is received by the
purchaser at a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to
that business location.
(b) When the tangible personal property, extended warranty, or a
service defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 is not received by
the purchaser at a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced
to the location where receipt by the purchaser or the purchaser's
donee, designated as such by the purchaser, occurs, including the
location indicated by instructions for delivery to the purchaser or
donee, known to the seller.
(c) When (a) and (b) of this subsection do not apply, the sale is
sourced to the location indicated by an address for the purchaser that
is available from the business records of the seller that are
maintained in the ordinary course of the seller's business when use of
this address does not constitute bad faith.
(d) When (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection do not apply, the
sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the
purchaser obtained during the consummation of the sale, including the
address of a purchaser's payment instrument, if no other address is
available, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith.
(e) When (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection do not apply,
including the circumstance where the seller is without sufficient
information to apply those provisions, then the location shall be
determined by the address from which tangible personal property was
shipped, from which the digital good or the computer software delivered
electronically was first available for transmission by the seller, or
from which the extended warranty or service defined as a retail sale
under RCW 82.04.050 was provided, disregarding for these purposes any
location that merely provided the digital transfer of the product sold.
(2) The lease or rental of tangible personal property, other than
property identified in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, shall be
sourced as provided in this subsection.
(a) For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic
payments, the first periodic payment is sourced the same as a retail
sale in accordance with subsection (1) of this section. Periodic
payments made subsequent to the first payment are sourced to the
primary property location for each period covered by the payment. The
primary property location shall be as indicated by an address for the
property provided by the lessee that is available to the lessor from
its records maintained in the ordinary course of business, when use of
this address does not constitute bad faith. The property location is
not altered by intermittent use at different locations, such as use of
business property that accompanies employees on business trips and
service calls.
(b) For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic
payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
(c) This subsection (2) does not affect the imposition or
computation of sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump
sum or accelerated basis, or on the acquisition of property for lease.
(3) The lease or rental of motor vehicles, trailers, semitrailers,
or aircraft that do not qualify as transportation equipment shall be
sourced as provided in this subsection.
(a) For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic
payments, each periodic payment is sourced to the primary property
location. The primary property location is as indicated by an address
for the property provided by the lessee that is available to the lessor
from its records maintained in the ordinary course of business, when
use of this address does not constitute bad faith. This location is
not altered by intermittent use at different locations.
(b) For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic
payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
(c) This subsection does not affect the imposition or computation
of sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump sum or
accelerated basis, or on the acquisition of property for lease.
(4) The retail sale, including lease or rental, of transportation
equipment shall be sourced the same as a retail sale in accordance with
subsection (1) of this section.
(5)(a) A purchaser that is a business and is not a holder of a
direct pay permit that knows at the time of purchase of a digital good,
computer software, or a service that the digital good, computer
software, or service will be concurrently available for use in more
than one jurisdiction shall either deliver to the seller in conjunction
with its purchase an exemption certificate claiming multiple points of
use or meet the requirements of subsection (5)(b) or (c) of this
section. Computer software, for purposes of this subsection, includes,
but is not limited to, computer software delivered electronically, by
load and leave, or in tangible form. Computer software received in
person by a business purchaser at a business location of the seller is
not included.
(i) Upon receipt of an exemption certificate claiming multiple
points of use, the seller is relieved of all obligation to collect,
pay, or remit the applicable tax and the purchaser is obligated to
collect, pay, or remit the applicable tax to the appropriate
jurisdiction.
(ii) A purchaser delivering an exemption certificate claiming
multiple points of use may use any reasonable, but consistent and
uniform, method of apportionment that is supported by the purchaser's
books and records as they exist at the time the transaction is reported
for sales or use tax purposes.
(iii) A purchaser delivering an exemption certificate claiming
multiple points of use shall report and pay the appropriate tax to each
jurisdiction where concurrent use occurs. The tax due will be
calculated as if the apportioned amount of the digital good, computer
software, or service had been delivered to each jurisdiction to which
the sale is apportioned pursuant to (a)(ii) of this subsection.
(iv) The exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use
shall remain in effect for all future sales by the seller to the
purchaser, except as to the subsequent sales' specific apportionment
that is governed by the principles of (a)(ii) and (iii) of this
subsection, until it is revoked in writing.
(b) When the seller knows that the product will be concurrently
available for use in more than one jurisdiction, but the purchaser does
not provide an exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use as
provided in (a) of this subsection, the seller may work with the
purchaser to produce the correct apportionment. The purchaser and
seller may use any reasonable, but consistent and uniform, method of
apportionment that is supported by the seller's and purchaser's
business records as they exist at the time the transaction is reported
for sales or use tax purposes. If the purchaser certifies to the
accuracy of the apportionment and the seller accepts the certification,
the seller shall collect and remit the tax pursuant to (a)(iii) of this
subsection. In the absence of bad faith, the seller is relieved of any
further obligation to collect tax on any transaction where the seller
has collected tax pursuant to the information certified by the
purchaser.
(c) When the seller knows that the product will be concurrently
available for use in more than one jurisdiction and the purchaser does
not have a direct pay permit and does not provide the seller with an
exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use as provided in
(a) of this subsection, or certification pursuant to (b) of this
subsection, the seller shall collect and remit the tax based on
subsections (1) through (4) of this section.
(d) A holder of a direct pay permit shall not be required to
deliver an exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use to the
seller. A direct pay permit holder shall follow (a)(ii) and (iii) of
this subsection in apportioning the tax due on the sale or use of a
digital good, computer software, or service that will be concurrently
available for use in more than one jurisdiction.
(e) This section does not limit a person's obligation for sales or
use tax to any state in which the qualifying purchases are concurrently
available for use, nor does it limit a person's ability under local,
state, federal, or constitutional law to claim a credit for sales or
use taxes legally due and paid to other jurisdictions.
(6)(a) A purchaser of direct mail that is not a holder of a direct
pay permit shall provide to the seller in conjunction with the purchase
either a direct mail form or information that shows the jurisdictions
to which the direct mail is delivered to recipients.
(i) Upon receipt of the direct mail form, the seller is relieved of
all obligations to collect, pay, or remit the applicable tax and the
purchaser is obligated to pay or remit the applicable tax on a direct
pay basis. A direct mail form shall remain in effect for all future
sales of direct mail by the seller to the purchaser until it is revoked
in writing.
(ii) Upon receipt of information from the purchaser showing the
jurisdictions to which the direct mail is delivered to recipients, the
seller shall collect the tax according to the delivery information
provided by the purchaser. In the absence of bad faith, the seller is
relieved of any further obligation to collect tax on any transaction
where the seller has collected tax pursuant to the delivery information
provided by the purchaser.
(b) If the purchaser of direct mail does not have a direct pay
permit and does not provide the seller with either a direct mail form
or delivery information as required by (a) of this subsection, the
seller shall collect the tax according to subsection (1)(e) of this
section. This subsection does not limit a purchaser's obligation for
sales or use tax to any state to which the direct mail is delivered.
(c) If a purchaser of direct mail provides the seller with
documentation of direct pay authority, the purchaser is not required to
provide a direct mail form or delivery information to the seller.
(7) The following are sourced to the location at or from which
delivery is made to the consumer:
(a) A retail sale of watercraft;
(b) A retail sale of a modular home, manufactured home, or mobile
home;
(c) A retail sale, excluding the lease and rental, of a motor
vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or aircraft, that do not qualify as
transportation equipment; and
(d) Until January 1, 2008, a retail sale of tangible personal
property made by a person engaged in the business of selling flowers.
The rules for the sourcing of retail sales of flowers delivered with
telegraphic instructions in WAC 458-20-158, as effective on July 1,
1970, shall remain in effect until January 1, 2008.
(8) A retail sale of the providing of telecommunications services
shall be sourced in accordance with RCW 82.32.520.
(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Delivered electronically" means delivered to the purchaser by
means other than tangible storage media.
(b) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed
by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or
to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the
direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed
directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal
property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct
mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed
material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed
material delivered to a single address.
(c) "Receive" and "receipt" mean taking possession of tangible
personal property, making first use of services, or taking possession
or making first use of digital goods, whichever comes first. "Receive"
and "receipt" do not include possession by a shipping company on behalf
of the purchaser.
(d) "Transportation equipment" means:
(i) Locomotives and railcars that are used for the carriage of
persons or property in interstate commerce;
(ii) Trucks and truck tractors with a gross vehicle weight rating
of ten thousand one pounds or greater, trailers, semitrailers, or
passenger buses that are:
(A) Registered through the international registration plan; and
(B) Operated under authority of a carrier authorized and
certificated by the United States department of transportation or
another federal authority to engage in the carriage of persons or
property in interstate commerce;
(iii) Aircraft that are operated by air carriers authorized and
certificated by the United States department of transportation or
another federal or foreign authority to engage in the carriage of
persons or property in interstate or foreign commerce; or
(iv) Containers designed for use on and component parts attached or
secured on the items described in (d)(i) through (iii) of this
subsection.
(10) In those instances where there is no obligation on the part of
a seller to collect or remit sales or use tax, the use of tangible
personal property or of a service, subject to use tax, is sourced to
the place of first use. The definition of use in RCW 82.12.010 applies
to this subsection.

Sec. 502 RCW 82.14.020 and 2005 c 514 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) ((A retail sale consisting solely of the sale of tangible
personal property shall be deemed to have occurred at the retail outlet
at or from which delivery is made to the consumer;
(2) A retail sale consisting essentially of the performance of
personal, business, or professional services shall be deemed to have
occurred at the place at which such services were primarily performed,
except that for the performance of a tow truck service, as defined in
RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed to have occurred at the
place of business of the operator of the tow truck service;
(3) A retail sale consisting of the rental of tangible personal
property shall be deemed to have occurred (a) in the case of a rental
involving periodic rental payments, at the place of primary use by the
lessee during the period covered by each payment, or (b) in all other
cases, at the place of first use by the lessee;
(4) A retail sale within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a
retail sale of taxable personal property to be installed by the seller
shall be deemed to have occurred at the place where the labor and
services involved were primarily performed;
(5)(a) A retail sale consisting of the providing to a consumer of
telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than a sale of
tangible personal property under subsection (1) of this section or a
rental of tangible personal property under subsection (3) of this
section or a sale of mobile telecommunications services, shall be
deemed to have occurred at the situs of the telephone or other
instrument through which the telephone service is rendered;
(b) A retail sale consisting of the providing of telecommunications
services shall be sourced in accordance with RCW 82.32.520;
(6) A retail sale of linen and uniform supply services is deemed to
occur as provided in RCW 82.08.0202;
(7) A retail sale consisting of an extended warranty shall be
deemed to have occurred at the business location of the seller if the
extended warranty is received by the purchaser at that location. If an
extended warranty is not received by the purchaser at the business
location of the seller, a retail sale of an extended warranty shall be
deemed to have occurred at the location where receipt by the buyer
occurs;
(8))) "City" means a city or town;
(((9))) (2) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters
82.04, 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, insofar as
applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under authority of this chapter;
(((10))) (3) "Taxable event" shall mean any retail sale, or any
use, upon which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08 or
82.12 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That the term shall not include a retail sale taxable pursuant
to RCW 82.08.150, as now or hereafter amended;
(((11))) (4) "Treasurer or other legal depository" shall mean the
treasurer or legal depository of a county or city.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
Sales and use taxes authorized under this chapter shall be sourced
in accordance with section 501 of this act.

PART VI
CONFIDENTIALITY AND PRIVACY PROTECTIONS FOR PERSONS USING
CERTIFIED SERVICE PROVIDERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A fundamental precept of allowing the use of a certified
service provider is to preserve the privacy of consumers by protecting
their anonymity. With very limited exceptions, a certified service
provider shall perform its tax calculation, remittance, and reporting
functions without retaining the personally identifiable information of
consumers.
(2) The department shall provide public notification to consumers,
including purchasers claiming exemption from tax, of its practices
relating to the collection, use, and retention of personally
identifiable information.
(3) When personally identifiable information that has been
collected and retained is no longer required to ensure the validity of
exemptions from taxation by reason of the consumer's status or the
intended use of the goods or services purchased, the information shall
no longer be retained by the state of Washington.
(4) When personally identifiable information regarding an
individual is retained by or on behalf of the state of Washington, this
state shall provide reasonable access for the individual to his or her
own information and a right to correct any inaccurately recorded
information.
(5) If anyone other than a member state of the agreement, or other
than a person authorized by Washington law or the agreement, seeks to
discover personally identifiable information, the state of Washington
shall make a reasonable and timely effort to notify the individual of
the request.
(6) The provisions of this section may be enforced by petitioning
the superior court of Thurston county for injunctive relief.

PART VII
TAXABILITY MATRIX
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department shall complete a taxability matrix maintained by
the member states of the agreement in downloadable format. The matrix
contains terms defined in the agreement. The department shall provide
notice of changes in the taxability of products or services listed in
the matrix.
(2) Sellers and certified service providers are relieved from
liability to the state and to local jurisdictions for having charged or
collected the incorrect amount of sales or use tax if the error
resulted from reliance on erroneous information provided by the
department in the taxability matrix.

PART VIII
DELIVERY CHARGES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
When computing the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020, if a shipment
consists of taxable tangible personal property and nontaxable tangible
personal property, and delivery charges are included in the sales
price, the seller must collect and remit tax on the percentage of
delivery charges allocated to the taxable tangible personal property,
but does not have to collect and remit tax on the percentage allocated
to exempt tangible personal property. The seller may use either of the
following percentages to determine the taxable portion of the delivery
charges:
(1) A percentage based on the total sales price of the taxable
tangible personal property compared to the total sales price of all
tangible personal property in the shipment; or
(2) A percentage based on the total weight of the taxable tangible
personal property compared to the total weight of all tangible personal
property in the shipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
When computing the tax levied by RCW 82.12.020, if a shipment
consists of taxable tangible personal property and nontaxable tangible
personal property, and delivery charges are included in the purchase
price, the consumer must remit tax or the retailer must collect and
remit tax on the percentage of delivery charges allocated to the
taxable tangible personal property, but does not have to remit or
collect and remit tax on the percentage allocated to exempt tangible
personal property. The consumer or retailer may use either of the
following percentages to determine the taxable portion of the delivery
charges:
(1) A percentage based on the total purchase price of the taxable
tangible personal property compared to the total purchase price of all
tangible personal property in the shipment; or
(2) A percentage based on the total weight of the taxable tangible
personal property compared to the total weight of all tangible personal
property in the shipment.

PART IX
SALES AND USE TAX MITIGATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 (1) The legislature finds and declares
that:
(a) Washington state's participation as a member state in the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement benefits the state, all its
local taxing jurisdictions, and its retailing industry, by increasing
state and local revenues, improving the state's business climate, and
standardizing and simplifying the state's tax structure;
(b) Participation in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement is
a matter of statewide concern and is in the best interests of the
state, the general public, and all local jurisdictions that impose a
sales and use tax under applicable law;
(c) Participation in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement
requires the adoption of the agreement's sourcing provisions, which
changes the location in which a retail sale of delivered tangible
personal property occurs from the point of origin to the point of
destination;
(d) Changes in the state's sourcing law provisions to conform with
the streamlined sales and use tax agreement will cause sales and use
tax revenues to shift among local taxing jurisdictions. The
legislature finds that there will be an unintended adverse impact on
local taxing jurisdictions that receive less revenues because local tax
revenues will be redistributed, with revenue increases for some
jurisdictions and reductions for others, due solely to changes in state
sales tax sourcing rules to be implemented under sections 501 and 503
of this act, even though no local taxing jurisdiction has changed its
tax rate or tax base;
(e) The purpose of providing mitigation to such jurisdictions is to
mitigate the unintended revenue redistribution effect of the sourcing
law changes among local governments;
(f) It is in the best interest of the state and all its
subdivisions to mitigate the adverse effects of amending the state's
sales and use tax sourcing provisions to be in conformance with the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement;
(g) Additionally, changes in sourcing laws may have negative
implications for industry sectors such as warehousing and
manufacturing, as well as jurisdictions that house a concentration of
these industries and have made zoning decisions, infrastructure
investments, bonding decisions, and land use policy decisions based on
point of origin sales tax rules in place before the effective date of
this section, and the mitigation provided by sections 901 through 905
of this act is intended to help offset those negative implications; and
(h) It is important that the state of Washington maintain its
supply of industrial land for present and future economic development
activities, and local governments taking advantage of the mitigation
provided by sections 901 through 905 of this act should strive to
maintain the supply of industrial land available for economic
development efforts.
(2) The legislature intends that the streamlined sales and use tax
mitigation account established in section 902 of this act have the sole
objective of mitigating, for negatively affected local taxing
jurisdictions, the net local sales and use tax revenue reductions
incurred as a result of sections 501 and 503 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account is created
in the state treasury. The state treasurer shall transfer into the
account from the general fund amounts as directed in section 903 of
this act. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purpose of
mitigating the negative fiscal impacts to local taxing jurisdictions as
a result of sections 501 and 503 of this act.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2007, the state treasurer, as directed by the
department, shall distribute the funds in the streamlined sales and use
tax mitigation account to local taxing jurisdictions in accordance with
section 903 of this act.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section, RCW 82.14.390, and section 903 of this act.
(a) "Agreement" means the same as in RCW 82.32.020.
(b) "Local taxing jurisdiction" means counties, cities,
transportation authorities under RCW 82.14.045, public facilities
districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57 RCW, public transportation
benefit areas under RCW 82.14.440, and regional transit authorities
under chapter 81.112 RCW, that impose a sales and use tax.
(c) "Loss" or "losses" means the local sales and use tax revenue
reduction to a local taxing jurisdiction resulting from the sourcing
provisions in section 501 of this act.
(d) "Net loss" or "net losses" means a loss offset by any voluntary
compliance revenue.
(e) "Voluntary compliance revenue" means the local sales and use
tax revenue gain to each local taxing jurisdiction reported to the
department from persons registering through the central registration
system authorized under the agreement.
(f) "Working day" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.45.180.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In order to mitigate local sales and use tax revenue net losses
as a result of the sourcing provisions of the streamlined sales and use
tax agreement under this title, the state treasurer shall transfer into
the streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account from the general
fund the sum of twenty-eight million dollars, subject to appropriation,
on July 1, 2007. On July 1, 2008, and each July 1st thereafter, the
state treasurer shall transfer into the streamlined sales and use tax
mitigation account from the general fund the sum required to mitigate
actual net losses as determined under this section.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2007, and continuing until the department
determines annual losses under subsection (3) of this section, the
department shall determine the amount of local sales and use tax net
loss each local taxing jurisdiction experiences as a result of the
sourcing provisions of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement
under this title each calendar quarter. The department shall determine
losses by analyzing and comparing data from tax return information and
tax collections for each local taxing jurisdiction before and after the
effective date of this section on a calendar quarter basis. The
department's analysis may be revised and supplemented in consultation
with the oversight committee as provided in subsection (4) of this
section. To determine net losses, the department shall reduce losses
by the amount of voluntary compliance revenue for the calendar quarter
analyzed. Beginning December 31, 2007, distributions shall be made
quarterly from the streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account by
the state treasurer, as directed by the department, to each local
taxing jurisdiction, other than public facilities districts for losses
in respect to taxes imposed under the authority of RCW 82.14.390, in an
amount representing its net losses for the previous calendar quarter.
Distributions shall be made on the last working day of each calendar
quarter.
(3) By December 31, 2008, or such later date the department in
consultation with the oversight committee determines that sufficient
data is available, the department shall determine each local taxing
jurisdiction's annual loss. The department shall determine annual
losses by comparing at least twelve months of data from tax return
information and tax collections for each local taxing jurisdiction
before and after the effective date of this section. Beginning the
calendar quarter in which the department determines annual losses, and
each calendar quarter thereafter, distributions shall be made from the
streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account by the state treasurer
on the last working day of the calendar quarter, as directed by the
department, to each local taxing jurisdiction, other than public
facilities districts for losses in respect to taxes imposed under the
authority of RCW 82.14.390, in an amount representing one-fourth of the
jurisdiction's annual loss reduced by voluntary compliance revenue
reported during the previous calendar quarter. The department's
analysis of annual losses shall be reviewed by December 1st of each
year and may be revised and supplemented in consultation with the
oversight committee as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The department shall convene an oversight committee to assist
in the determination of losses. The committee shall include one
representative of one city whose revenues are increased, one
representative of one city whose revenues are reduced, one
representative of one county whose revenues are increased, one
representative of one county whose revenues are decreased, one
representative of one transportation authority under RCW 82.14.045
whose revenues are increased, and one representative of one
transportation authority under RCW 82.14.045 whose revenues are
reduced, as a result of sections 501 and 503 of this act. Beginning
July 1, 2007, the oversight committee shall meet quarterly with the
department to review and provide additional input and direction on the
department's analyses of losses. Local taxing jurisdictions may also
present to the oversight committee additional information to improve
the department's analyses of the jurisdiction's loss. Beginning
January 1, 2009, the oversight committee shall meet at least annually
with the department by December 1st.
(5) The rule-making provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW do not apply to
this section.
(6) No distributions may be made under this section unless funds
are appropriated as required by section 902(1) of this act.

Sec. 904 RCW 82.14.390 and 2002 c 363 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (((6))) (7) of this section,
the governing body of a public facilities district created before July
31, 2002, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that commences construction
of a new regional center, or improvement or rehabilitation of an
existing new regional center, before January 1, 2004, may impose a
sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the public facilities district. The rate of tax shall not
exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
(2)(a) The governing body of a public facilities district imposing
a sales and use tax under the authority of this section may increase
the rate of tax up to 0.037 percent if, within three fiscal years of
the effective date of this section, the department determines that, as
a result of sections 501 and 503 of this act, a public facilities
district's sales and use tax collections for fiscal years after the
effective date of this section have been reduced by a net loss of at
least 0.50 percent from the fiscal year before the effective date of
this section. The fiscal year in which this section becomes effective
is the first fiscal year after the effective date of this section.
(b) The department shall determine sales and use tax collection net
losses under this section as provided in section 903 (2) and (3) of
this act. The department shall provide written notice of its
determinations to public facilities districts. Determinations by the
department of a public facilities district's sales and use tax
collection net losses as a result of sections 501 and 503 of this act
are final and not appealable.
(c) A public facilities district may increase its rate of tax after
it has received written notice from the department as provided in (b)
of this subsection. The increase in the rate of tax must be made in
0.001 percent increments and must be the least amount necessary to
mitigate the net loss in sales and use tax collections as a result of
sections 501 and 503 of this act. The increase in the rate of tax is
subject to RCW 82.14.055.
(3) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public facilities
district.
(((3))) (4) No tax may be collected under this section before
August 1, 2000. The tax imposed in this section shall expire when the
bonds issued for the construction of the regional center and related
parking facilities are retired, but not more than twenty-five years
after the tax is first collected.
(((4))) (5) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used
for the purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched with an
amount from other public or private sources equal to thirty-three
percent of the amount collected under this section, provided that
amounts generated from nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter
35.57 RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 36.100
RCW shall not constitute a public or private source. For the purpose
of this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited
to cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development
or improvement of the regional center, land that is donated and used
for the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind contributions
from public or private foundations, or amounts attributed to private
sector partners as part of a public and private partnership agreement
negotiated by the public facilities district.
(((5))) (6) The combined total tax levied under this section shall
not be greater than ((0.033)) 0.037 percent. If both a public
facilities district created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public
facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under
this section, the tax imposed by a public facilities district created
under chapter 35.57 RCW shall be credited against the tax imposed by a
public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.
(((6))) (7) A public facilities district created under chapter
36.100 RCW is not eligible to impose the tax under this section if the
legislative authority of the county where the public facilities
district is located has imposed a sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 A new section is added to chapter 44.28
RCW to read as follows:
(1) During calendar year 2009, the joint legislative audit and
review committee shall review the mitigation provisions for local
taxing jurisdictions under RCW 82.14.390 and section 903 of this act to
determine the extent to which the mitigation provisions address the
needs of local taxing jurisdictions for which the sourcing provisions
in sections 501 and 503 of this act had the greatest fiscal impact. In
conducting the study, the committee shall solicit input from the
oversight committee created in section 903 of this act and additional
local taxing jurisdictions as the committee determines. The department
of revenue and the state treasurer shall provide the committee with any
data within their purview that the committee considers necessary to
conduct the review. The committee shall report to the legislature the
results of its findings, and any recommendations for changes to the
mitigation provisions under RCW 82.14.390 and section 903 of this act,
by December 31, 2009.
(2) The definitions in section 902 of this act apply to this
section.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2010.

PART X
TELECOMMUNICATIONS PROVISIONS
Sec. 1001 RCW 82.32.520 and 2004 c 153 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for the defined telecommunications services listed in
subsection (3) of this section, the sale of ((telephone))
telecommunications service as defined in RCW 82.04.065 sold on a call-by-call basis shall be sourced to (a) each level of taxing jurisdiction
where the call originates and terminates in that jurisdiction or (b)
each level of taxing jurisdiction where the call either originates or
terminates and in which the service address is also located.
(2) Except for the defined telecommunications services listed in
subsection (3) of this section, a sale of ((telephone))
telecommunications service as defined in RCW 82.04.065 sold on a basis
other than a call-by-call basis, is sourced to the customer's place of
primary use.
(3) The sales of ((telephone)) telecommunications service as
defined in RCW 82.04.065 that are listed in subsection (3) of this
section shall be sourced to each level of taxing jurisdiction as
follows:
(a) A sale of mobile telecommunications services, other than air-ground radiotelephone service and prepaid calling service, is sourced
to the customer's place of primary use as required by RCW 82.08.066.
(b) A sale of postpaid calling service is sourced to the
origination point of the telecommunications signal as first identified
by either (i) the seller's telecommunications system, or (ii)
information received by the seller from its service provider, where the
system used to transport such signals is not that of the seller.
(c) A sale of prepaid calling service or a sale of a prepaid
wireless calling service is sourced as follows:
(i) When a prepaid calling service is received by the purchaser at
a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to that business
location;
(ii) When a prepaid calling service is not received by the
purchaser at a business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to
the location where receipt by the purchaser or the purchaser's donee,
designated as such by the purchaser, occurs, including the location
indicated by instructions for delivery to the purchaser or donee, known
to the seller;
(iii) When (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection do not apply, the
sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the
purchaser that is available from the business records of the seller
that are maintained in the ordinary course of the seller's business
when use of this address does not constitute bad faith;
(iv) When (c)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this subsection do not apply,
the sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the
purchaser obtained during the consummation of the sale, including the
address of a purchaser's payment instrument, if no other address is
available, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith;
(v) When (c)(i), (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this subsection do not
apply, including the circumstance where the seller is without
sufficient information to apply those provisions, then the location
shall be determined by the address from which tangible personal
property was shipped, from which the digital good or the computer
software delivered electronically was first available for transmission
by the seller, or from which the service defined as a retail sale under
RCW 82.04.050 was provided, disregarding for these purposes any
location that merely provided the digital transfer of the product sold;
(vi) In the case of a sale of ((mobile telecommunications service
that is a prepaid telecommunications)) prepaid wireless calling
service, (c)(v) of this subsection shall include as an option the
location associated with the mobile telephone number.
(d) A sale of a private communication service is sourced as
follows:
(i) Service for a separate charge related to a customer channel
termination point is sourced to each level of jurisdiction in which
such customer channel termination point is located.
(ii) Service where all customer termination points are located
entirely within one jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction is sourced
in such jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination points
are located.
(iii) Service for segments of a channel between two customer
channel termination points located in different jurisdictions and which
segment of channel are separately charged is sourced fifty percent in
each level of jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination
points are located.
(iv) Service for segments of a channel located in more than one
jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction and which segments are not
separately billed is sourced in each jurisdiction based on the
percentage determined by dividing the number of customer channel
termination points in the jurisdiction by the total number of customer
channel termination points.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
chapter.
(a) "Air-ground radiotelephone service" means air-ground radio
service, as defined in 47 C.F.R. Sec. 22.99, as amended or renumbered
as of January 1, 2003, in which common carriers are authorized to offer
and provide radio telecommunications service for hire to subscribers in
aircraft.
(b) "Call-by-call basis" means any method of charging for
telecommunications services where the price is measured by individual
calls.
(c) "Communications channel" means a physical or virtual path of
communications over which signals are transmitted between or among
customer channel termination points.
(d) "Customer" means the person or entity that contracts with the
seller of telecommunications services. If the end user of
telecommunications services is not the contracting party, the end user
of the telecommunications service is the customer of the
telecommunications service. "Customer" does not include a reseller of
telecommunications service or for mobile telecommunications service of
a serving carrier under an agreement to serve the customer outside the
home service provider's licensed service area.
(e) "Customer channel termination point" means the location where
the customer either inputs or receives the communications.
(f) "End user" means the person who uses the telecommunications
service. In the case of an entity, the term end user means the
individual who uses the service on behalf of the entity.
(g) "Home service provider" means the same as that term is defined
in RCW 82.04.065.
(h) "Mobile telecommunications service" means the same as that term
is defined in RCW 82.04.065.
(i) "Place of primary use" means the street address representative
of where the customer's use of the telecommunications service primarily
occurs, which must be the residential street address or the primary
business street address of the customer. In the case of mobile
telecommunications services, "place of primary use" must be within the
licensed service area of the home service provider.
(j) "Postpaid calling service" means the telecommunications service
obtained by making a payment on a call-by-call basis either through the
use of a credit card or payment mechanism such as a bank card, travel
card, credit card, or debit card, or by charge made to which a
telephone number that is not associated with the origination or
termination of the telecommunications service. A postpaid calling
service includes a telecommunications service, except a prepaid
wireless calling service, that would be a prepaid calling service
except it is not exclusively a telecommunications service.
(k) "Prepaid calling service" means the right to access exclusively
telecommunications services, which must be paid for in advance and
which enables the origination of calls using an access number and/or
authorization code, whether manually or electronically dialed, and that
is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines
with use in a known amount.
(l) "Prepaid wireless calling service" means a telecommunications
service that provides the right to use mobile wireless service as well
as other nontelecommunications services, including the download of
digital products delivered electronically, content, and ancillary
services, which must be paid for in advance that is sold in
predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in
a known amount.
(m) "Private communication service" means a telecommunications
service that entitles the customer to exclusive or priority use of a
communications channel or group of channels between or among
termination points, regardless of the manner in which such channel or
channels are connected, and includes switching capacity, extension
lines, stations, and any other associated services that are provided in
connection with the use of such channel or channels.
(((m))) (n) "Service address" means:
(i) The location of the telecommunications equipment to which a
customer's call is charged and from which the call originates or
terminates, regardless of where the call is billed or paid;
(ii) If the location in (((m))) (n)(i) of this subsection is not
known, the origination point of the signal of the telecommunications
services first identified by either the seller's telecommunications
system or in information received by the seller from its service
provider, where the system used to transport such signals is not that
of the seller;
(iii) If the locations in (((m))) (n)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection are not known, the location of the customer's place of
primary use.

Sec. 1002 RCW 82.04.065 and 2002 c 67 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) "Competitive telephone service" means the providing by any
person of telecommunications equipment or apparatus, or service related
to that equipment or apparatus such as repair or maintenance service,
if the equipment or apparatus is of a type which can be provided by
persons that are not subject to regulation as telephone companies under
Title 80 RCW and for which a separate charge is made.
(2) (("Network telephone service" means the providing by any person
of access to a telephone network, telephone network switching service,
toll service, or coin telephone services, or the providing of
telephonic, video, data, or similar communication or transmission for
hire, via a telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave,
or similar communication or transmission system. "Network telephone
service" includes the provision of transmission to and from the site of
an internet provider via a telephone network, toll line or channel,
cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system.
"Network telephone service" does not include the providing of
competitive telephone service, the providing of cable television
service, the providing of broadcast services by radio or television
stations, nor the provision of internet service as defined in RCW
82.04.297, including the reception of dial-in connection, provided at
the site of the internet service provider.
(3) "Telephone service" means competitive telephone service or
network telephone service, or both, as defined in subsections (1) and
(2) of this section.
(4) "Telephone business" means the business of providing network
telephone service, as defined in subsection (2) of this section. It
includes cooperative or farmer line telephone companies or associations
operating an exchange.
(5))) "Ancillary services" means services that are associated with
or incidental to the provision of "telecommunications services,"
including but not limited to "detailed telecommunications billing,"
"directory assistance," "vertical service," and "voice mail services."
(3) "Conference-bridging service" means an ancillary service that
links two or more participants of an audio or video conference call and
may include the provision of a telephone number. "Conference-bridging
service" does not include the telecommunications services used to reach
the conference bridge.
(4) "Detailed telecommunications billing service" means an
ancillary service of separately stating information pertaining to
individual calls on a customer's billing statement.
(5) "Directory assistance" means an ancillary service of providing
telephone number information, and/or address information.
(6) "Vertical service" means an ancillary service that is offered
in connection with one or more telecommunications services, that offers
advanced calling features that allow customers to identify callers and
to manage multiple calls and call connections, including conference-bridging services.
(7) "Voice mail service" means an ancillary service that enables
the customer to store, send, or receive recorded messages. "Voice mail
service" does not include any vertical services that the customer may
be required to have in order to use the voice mail service.
(8) "Telecommunications service" means the electronic transmission,
conveyance, or routing of voice, data, audio, video, or any other
information or signals to a point, or between or among points.
"Telecommunications service" includes such transmission, conveyance, or
routing in which computer processing applications are used to act on
the form, code, or protocol of the content for purposes of
transmission, conveyance, or routing without regard to whether such
service is referred to as voice over internet protocol services or is
classified by the federal communications commission as enhanced or
value added. "Telecommunications service" does not include:
(a) Data processing and information services that allow data to be
generated, acquired, stored, processed, or retrieved and delivered by
an electronic transmission to a purchaser where such purchaser's
primary purpose for the underlying transaction is the processed data or
information;
(b) Installation or maintenance of wiring or equipment on a
customer's premises;
(c) Tangible personal property;
(d) Advertising, including but not limited to directory
advertising;
(e) Billing and collection services provided to third parties;
(f) Internet access service;
(g) Radio and television audio and video programming services,
regardless of the medium, including the furnishing of transmission,
conveyance, and routing of such services by the programming service
provider. Radio and television audio and video programming services
include but are not limited to cable service as defined in 47 U.S.C.
Sec. 522(6) and audio and video programming services delivered by
commercial mobile radio service providers, as defined in section 20.3,
Title 47 C.F.R.;
(h) Ancillary services; or
(i) Digital products delivered electronically, including but not
limited to software, music, video, reading materials, or ring tones.
(9) "800 service" means a telecommunications service that allows a
caller to dial a toll-free number without incurring a charge for the
call. The service is typically marketed under the name "800," "855,"
"866," "877," and "888" toll-free calling, and any subsequent numbers
designated by the federal communications commission.
(10) "900 service" means an inbound toll telecommunications service
purchased by a subscriber that allows the subscriber's customers to
call in to the subscriber's prerecorded announcement or live service.
"900 service" does not include the charge for: Collection services
provided by the seller of the telecommunications services to the
subscriber, or services or products sold by the subscriber to the
subscriber's customer. The service is typically marketed under the
name "900" service, and any subsequent numbers designated by the
federal communications commission.
(11) "Fixed wireless service" means a telecommunications service
that provides radio communication between fixed points.
(12) "Mobile wireless service" means a telecommunications service
that is transmitted, conveyed, or routed regardless of the technology
used, whereby the origination and/or termination points of the
transmission, conveyance, or routing are not fixed, including, by way
of example only, telecommunications services that are provided by a
commercial mobile radio service provider.
(13) "Paging service" means a telecommunications service that
provides transmission of coded radio signals for the purpose of
activating specific pagers; these transmissions may include messages
and/or sounds.
(14) "Prepaid calling service" means the right to access
exclusively telecommunications services, which must be paid for in
advance and which enable the origination of calls using an access
number or authorization code, whether manually or electronically
dialed, and that is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the
number declines with use in a known amount.
(15) "Prepaid wireless calling service" means a telecommunications
service that provides the right to use mobile wireless service as well
as other nontelecommunications services including the download of
digital products delivered electronically, content, and ancillary
services, which must be paid for in advance and that is sold in
predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in
a known amount.
(16) "Private communications service" means a telecommunications
service that entitles the customer to exclusive or priority use of a
communications channel or group of channels between or among
termination points, regardless of the manner in which the channel or
channels are connected, and includes switching capacity, extension
lines, stations, and any other associated services that are provided in
connection with the use of the channel or channels.
(17) "Value-added nonvoice data service" means a service that
otherwise meets the definition of telecommunications services in which
computer processing applications are used to act on the form, content,
code, or protocol of the information or data primarily for a purpose
other than transmission, conveyance, or routing.
(18) "Charges for mobile telecommunications services" means any
charge for, or associated with, the provision of commercial mobile
radio service, as defined in section 20.3, Title 47 C.F.R. as in effect
on June 1, 1999, or any charge for, or associated with, a service
provided as an adjunct to a commercial mobile radio service, regardless
of whether individual transmissions originate or terminate within the
licensed service area of the mobile telecommunications service
provider.
(((6))) (19) "Customer" means: (a) The person or entity that
contracts with the home service provider for mobile telecommunications
services; or (b) the end user of the mobile telecommunications service,
if the end user of mobile telecommunications services is not the
contracting party, but this subsection (((6))) (19)(b) applies only for
the purpose of determining the place of primary use. The term does not
include a reseller of mobile telecommunications service, or a serving
carrier under an arrangement to serve the customer outside the home
service provider's licensed service area.
(((7))) (20) "Designated data base provider" means a person
representing all the political subdivisions of the state that is:
(a) Responsible for providing an electronic data base prescribed in
4 U.S.C. Sec. 119(a) if the state has not provided an electronic data
base; and
(b) Approved by municipal and county associations or leagues of the
state whose responsibility it would otherwise be to provide a data base
prescribed by 4 U.S.C. Secs. 116 through 126.
(((8))) (21) "Enhanced zip code" means a United States postal zip
code of nine or more digits.
(((9))) (22) "Home service provider" means the facilities-based
carrier or reseller with whom the customer contracts for the provision
of mobile telecommunications services.
(((10))) (23) "Licensed service area" means the geographic area in
which the home service provider is authorized by law or contract to
provide commercial mobile radio service to the customer.
(((11))) (24) "Mobile telecommunications service" means commercial
mobile radio service, as defined in section 20.3, Title 47 C.F.R. as in
effect on June 1, 1999.
(((12))) (25) "Mobile telecommunications service provider" means a
home service provider or a serving carrier.
(((13))) (26) "Place of primary use" means the street address
representative of where the customer's use of the mobile
telecommunications service primarily occurs, which must be:
(a) The residential street address or the primary business street
address of the customer; and
(b) Within the licensed service area of the home service provider.
(((14))) (27) "Prepaid telephone calling service" means the right
to purchase exclusively telecommunications services that must be paid
for in advance, that enables the origination of calls using an access
number, authorization code, or both, whether manually or electronically
dialed, if the remaining amount of units of service that have been
prepaid is known by the provider of the prepaid service on a continuous
basis.
(((15))) (28) "Reseller" means a provider who purchases
telecommunications services from another telecommunications service
provider and then resells, uses as a component part of, or integrates
the purchased services into a mobile telecommunications service.
"Reseller" does not include a serving carrier with whom a home service
provider arranges for the services to its customers outside the home
service provider's licensed service area.
(((16))) (29) "Serving carrier" means a facilities-based carrier
providing mobile telecommunications service to a customer outside a
home service provider's or reseller's licensed service area.
(((17))) (30) "Taxing jurisdiction" means any of the several
states, the District of Columbia, or any territory or possession of the
United States, any municipality, city, county, township, parish,
transportation district, or assessment jurisdiction, or other political
subdivision within the territorial limits of the United States with the
authority to impose a tax, charge, or fee.

Sec. 1003 RCW 82.04.065 and 1997 c 304 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) "Competitive telephone service" means the providing by any
person of telecommunications equipment or apparatus, or service related
to that equipment or apparatus such as repair or maintenance service,
if the equipment or apparatus is of a type which can be provided by
persons that are not subject to regulation as telephone companies under
Title 80 RCW and for which a separate charge is made.
(2) (("Network telephone service" means the providing by any person
of access to a local telephone network, local telephone network
switching service, toll service, or coin telephone services, or the
providing of telephonic, video, data, or similar communication or
transmission for hire, via a local telephone network, toll line or
channel, cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission
system. "Network telephone service" includes interstate service,
including toll service, originating from or received on
telecommunications equipment or apparatus in this state if the charge
for the service is billed to a person in this state. "Network
telephone service" includes the provision of transmission to and from
the site of an internet provider via a local telephone network, toll
line or channel, cable, microwave, or similar communication or
transmission system. "Network telephone service" does not include the
providing of competitive telephone service, the providing of cable
television service, the providing of broadcast services by radio or
television stations, nor the provision of internet service as defined
in RCW 82.04.297, including the reception of dial-in connection,
provided at the site of the internet service provider.
(3) "Telephone service" means competitive telephone service or
network telephone service, or both, as defined in subsections (1) and
(2) of this section.
(4) "Telephone business" means the business of providing network
telephone service, as defined in subsection (2) of this section. It
includes cooperative or farmer line telephone companies or associations
operating an exchange)) "Ancillary services" means services that are
associated with or incidental to the provision of "telecommunications
services," including but not limited to "detailed telecommunications
billing," "directory assistance," "vertical service," and "voice mail
services."
(3) "Conference-bridging service" means an ancillary service that
links two or more participants of an audio or video conference call and
may include the provision of a telephone number. "Conference-bridging
service" does not include the telecommunications services used to reach
the conference bridge.
(4) "Detailed telecommunications billing service" means an
ancillary service of separately stating information pertaining to
individual calls on a customer's billing statement.
(5) "Directory assistance" means an ancillary service of providing
telephone number information, and/or address information.
(6) "Vertical service" means an ancillary service that is offered
in connection with one or more telecommunications services, that offers
advanced calling features that allow customers to identify callers and
to manage multiple calls and call connections, including conference-bridging services.
(7) "Voice mail service" means an ancillary service that enables
the customer to store, send, or receive recorded messages. "Voice mail
service" does not include any vertical services that the customer may
be required to have in order to use the voice mail service.
(8) "Telecommunications service" means the electronic transmission,
conveyance, or routing of voice, data, audio, video, or any other
information or signals to a point, or between or among points.
"Telecommunications service" includes such transmission, conveyance, or
routing in which computer processing applications are used to act on
the form, code, or protocol of the content for purposes of
transmission, conveyance, or routing without regard to whether such
service is referred to as voice over internet protocol services or is
classified by the federal communications commission as enhanced or
value added. "Telecommunications service" does not include:
(a) Data processing and information services that allow data to be
generated, acquired, stored, processed, or retrieved and delivered by
an electronic transmission to a purchaser where such purchaser's
primary purpose for the underlying transaction is the processed data or
information;
(b) Installation or maintenance of wiring or equipment on a
customer's premises;
(c) Tangible personal property;
(d) Advertising, including but not limited to directory
advertising;
(e) Billing and collection services provided to third parties;
(f) Internet access service;
(g) Radio and television audio and video programming services,
regardless of the medium, including the furnishing of transmission,
conveyance, and routing of such services by the programming service
provider. Radio and television audio and video programming services
include but are not limited to cable service as defined in 47 U.S.C.
Sec. 522(6) and audio and video programming services delivered by
commercial mobile radio service providers, as defined in section 20.3,
Title 47 C.F.R.;
(h) Ancillary services; or
(i) Digital products delivered electronically, including but not
limited to software, music, video, reading materials, or ring tones.
(9) "800 service" means a telecommunications service that allows a
caller to dial a toll-free number without incurring a charge for the
call. The service is typically marketed under the name "800," "855,"
"866," "877," and "888" toll-free calling, and any subsequent numbers
designated by the federal communications commission.
(10) "900 service" means an inbound toll "telecommunications
service" purchased by a subscriber that allows the subscriber's
customers to call in to the subscriber's prerecorded announcement or
live service. "900 service" does not include the charge for:
Collection services provided by the seller of the telecommunications
services to the subscriber, or services or products sold by the
subscriber to the subscriber's customer. The service is typically
marketed under the name "900" service, and any subsequent numbers
designated by the federal communications commission.
(11) "Fixed wireless service" means a telecommunications service
that provides radio communication between fixed points.
(12) "Mobile wireless service" means a telecommunications service
that is transmitted, conveyed, or routed regardless of the technology
used, whereby the origination and/or termination points of the
transmission, conveyance, or routing are not fixed, including, by way
of example only, telecommunications services that are provided by a
commercial mobile radio service provider.
(13) "Paging service" means a telecommunications service that
provides transmission of coded radio signals for the purpose of
activating specific pagers; these transmissions may include messages
and/or sounds.
(14) "Prepaid calling service" means the right to access
exclusively telecommunications services, which must be paid for in
advance and which enable the origination of calls using an access
number or authorization code, whether manually or electronically
dialed, and that is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the
number declines with use in a known amount.
(15) "Prepaid wireless calling service" means a telecommunications
service that provides the right to use mobile wireless service as well
as other nontelecommunications services including the download of
digital products delivered electronically, content, and ancillary
services, which must be paid for in advance and that is sold in
predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in
a known amount.
(16) "Private communications service" means a telecommunications
service that entitles the customer to exclusive or priority use of a
communications channel or group of channels between or among
termination points, regardless of the manner in which the channel or
channels are connected, and includes switching capacity, extension
lines, stations, and any other associated services that are provided in
connection with the use of the channel or channels.
(17) "Value-added nonvoice data service" means a service that
otherwise meets the definition of telecommunications services in which
computer processing applications are used to act on the form, content,
code, or protocol of the information or data primarily for a purpose
other than transmission, conveyance, or routing.

Sec. 1004 RCW 82.04.050 and 2005 c 515 s 2 and 2005 c 514 s 101
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible
personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:
(a) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(b) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(c) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(d) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; (([or])) or
(e) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of tangible personal
property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the
performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail
sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as provided in
(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use. The
term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons
engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and
(7), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908; or
(f) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or
for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities,
and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and shall also include the sale of services or charges
made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The charge for labor and services rendered in respect to
constructing, repairing, or improving any structure upon, above, or
under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by
title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such
construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such
construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then
reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original
owner;
(d) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to the cleaning, fumigating, razing or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but shall not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging and
all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel,
trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real
property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real
property, and it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real property
for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same.
For the purposes of this subsection, it shall be presumed that the sale
of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous
period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real
property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The sale of or charge made for tangible personal property,
labor and services to persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e),
and (f) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property,
labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by
such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at
retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services
may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection shall be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4)(a) The term shall also include:
(i) The renting or leasing of tangible personal property to
consumers; and
(ii) Providing tangible personal property along with an operator
for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this
is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to
perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (4)(a)(ii), an
operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible
personal property.
(b) The term shall not include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of
sublease or subrent.
(5) The term shall also include the providing of "competitive
telephone service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary
services," as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6) The term shall also include the sale of prewritten computer
software other than a sale to a person who presents a resale
certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the method of delivery
to the end user, but shall not include custom software or the
customization of prewritten computer software.
(7) The term shall also include the sale of or charge made for an
extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection,
"extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to
perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no
additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property,
labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or
repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of
specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an
agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in
this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and
the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the
tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of
this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.010.
(8) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(9) The term shall also not include sales of chemical sprays or
washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for
the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it include
sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or the Washington state department of
fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that
the farmer owns or leases.
(10) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for
labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and
nuclear research and development.
(11) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for
labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements
providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway
equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the
labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency,
as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.

Sec. 1005 RCW 82.08.0289 and 2002 c 67 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of:
(a) ((Network telephone service, other than toll service, to
residential customers;
(b) Network telephone service which is paid for by inserting coins
in coin-operated telephones)) Local service;
(b) Coin-operated telephone service; and
(c) Mobile telecommunications services, including any toll service,
provided to a customer whose place of primary use is outside this
state.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.04.065, as well as the definitions in
this subsection, apply to this section.
(a) (("Residential customer" means an individual subscribing to a
residential class of telephone service)) "Local service" means
ancillary services and telecommunications service, other than toll
service, provided to an individual subscribing to a residential class
of telephone service.
(b) "Toll service" does not include customer access line charges
for access to a toll calling network.
(c) "Coin-operated telephone service" means a telecommunications
service paid for by inserting money into a telephone accepting direct
deposits of money to operate.

Sec. 1006 RCW 82.08.0289 and 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 30 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of:
(a) ((Network telephone service, other than toll service, to
residential customers.
(b) Network telephone service which is paid for by inserting coins
in coin-operated telephones)) Local service; and
(b) Coin-operated telephone service.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) (("Network telephone service" has the meaning given in RCW
82.04.065.
(b) "Residential customer" means an individual subscribing to a
residential class of telephone service)) "Local service" means
ancillary services and telecommunications service, as those terms are
defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than toll service, provided to an
individual subscribing to a residential class of telephone service.
(((c))) (b) "Toll service" does not include customer access line
charges for access to a toll calling network.
(c) "Coin-operated telephone service" means a telecommunications
service paid for by inserting money into a telephone accepting direct
deposits of money to operate.

Sec. 1007 RCW 82.04.060 and 2005 c 514 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Sale at wholesale" or "wholesale sale" means: (1) Any sale of
tangible personal property, any sale of services defined as a retail
sale in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), any sale of amusement or recreation
services as defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), any sale of canned
software, any sale of an extended warranty as defined in RCW
82.04.050(7), or any sale of ((telephone)) ancillary services or
telecommunications service as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065,
which is not a sale at retail; and (2) any charge made for labor and
services rendered for persons who are not consumers, in respect to real
or personal property, if such charge is expressly defined as a retail
sale by RCW 82.04.050 when rendered to or for consumers: PROVIDED,
That the term "real or personal property" as used in this subsection
shall not include any natural products named in RCW 82.04.100.

Sec. 1008 RCW 82.04.190 and 2005 c 514 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Consumer" means the following:
(1) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any
article of tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the
person's business and including, among others, without limiting the
scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve,
construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers
other than for the purpose (a) of resale as tangible personal property
in the regular course of business or (b) of incorporating such property
as an ingredient or component of real or personal property when
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving,
constructing, or decorating such real or personal property of or for
consumers or (c) of consuming such property in producing for sale a new
article of tangible personal property or a new substance, of which such
property becomes an ingredient or component or as a chemical used in
processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a
chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new
article being produced for sale or (d) of consuming the property
purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in
producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property
is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an
ingredient of ferrosilicon or (e) of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7),
if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or
component of property covered by the extended warranty without
intervening use by such person;
(2)(a) Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.290 or 82.04.2908; (b) any person who purchases, acquires, or
uses any ((telephone)) ancillary services or telecommunications service
as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than for resale in
the regular course of business; (c) any person who purchases, acquires,
or uses any service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), other than for
resale in the regular course of business or for the purpose of
satisfying the person's obligations under an extended warranty as
defined in RCW 82.04.050(7); (d) any person who purchases, acquires, or
uses any amusement and recreation service defined in RCW
82.04.050(3)(a), other than for resale in the regular course of
business; (e) any person who is an end user of software; and (f) any
person who purchases or acquires an extended warranty as defined in RCW
82.04.050(7) other than for resale in the regular course of business;
(3) Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the
building, repairing or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington or by
the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or
vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind as
defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of
such publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right of
way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle by installing, placing or spreading the property in
or upon the right of way of such street, place, road, highway,
easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in or upon the site of such
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility;
(4) Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of
possession to or an easement in real property which is being
constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or otherwise altered by a
person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal corporations
or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and services
rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road
purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and
county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82
RCW in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property.
Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this definition
shall be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";
(5) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession to personal property which is being constructed, repaired,
improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered by a person engaged
in business;
(6) Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created
pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing land
and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality
thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to
chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person shall be a consumer within the
meaning of this subsection in respect to tangible personal property
incorporated into, installed in, or attached to such building or other
structure by such person, except that consumer does not include any
person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating,
or improving new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon,
or above real property of or for the United States, or any
instrumentality thereof, if the investment project would qualify for
sales and use tax deferral under chapter 82.63 RCW if undertaken by a
private entity;
(7) Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the
rental of which is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under
RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or charge made for
tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the
machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful
life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other
subsection of this section shall be construed to modify any other
definition of "consumer";
(8) Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other
byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and development;
and
(9) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession of tangible personal property that, under the terms of an
extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), has been repaired or
is replacement property, but only with respect to the sale of or charge
made for the repairing of the tangible personal property or the
replacement property.

Sec. 1009 RCW 82.14B.020 and 2002 c 341 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Emergency services communication system" means a multicounty,
countywide, or districtwide radio or landline communications network,
including an enhanced 911 telephone system, which provides rapid public
access for coordinated dispatching of services, personnel, equipment,
and facilities for police, fire, medical, or other emergency services.
(2) "Enhanced 911 telephone system" means a public telephone system
consisting of a network, data base, and on-premises equipment that is
accessed by dialing 911 and that enables reporting police, fire,
medical, or other emergency situations to a public safety answering
point. The system includes the capability to selectively route
incoming 911 calls to the appropriate public safety answering point
that operates in a defined 911 service area and the capability to
automatically display the name, address, and telephone number of
incoming 911 calls at the appropriate public safety answering point.
(3) "Switched access line" means the telephone service line which
connects a subscriber's main telephone(s) or equivalent main
telephone(s) to the local exchange company's switching office.
(4) "Local exchange company" has the meaning ascribed to it in RCW
80.04.010.
(5) "Radio access line" means the telephone number assigned to or
used by a subscriber for two-way local wireless voice service available
to the public for hire from a radio communications service company.
Radio access lines include, but are not limited to, radio-telephone
communications lines used in cellular telephone service, personal
communications services, and network radio access lines, or their
functional and competitive equivalent. Radio access lines do not
include lines that provide access to one-way signaling service, such as
paging service, or to communications channels suitable only for data
transmission, or to nonlocal radio access line service, such as
wireless roaming service, or to a private telecommunications system.
(6) "Radio communications service company" has the meaning ascribed
to it in RCW 80.04.010, except that it does not include radio paging
providers. It does include those persons or entities that provide
commercial mobile radio services, as defined by 47 U.S.C. Sec.
332(d)(1), and both facilities-based and nonfacilities-based resellers.
(7) "Private telecommunications system" has the meaning ascribed to
it in RCW 80.04.010.
(8) "Subscriber" means the retail purchaser of telephone service as
telephone service is defined in RCW ((82.04.065(3))) 82.16.010.
(9) "Place of primary use" has the meaning ascribed to it in ((the
federal mobile telecommunications sourcing act, P.L. 106-252)) RCW
82.04.065.

Sec. 1010 RCW 82.72.010 and 2004 c 254 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Switched access line" has the meaning provided in RCW
82.14B.020.
(2) "Local exchange company" has the meaning provided in RCW
80.04.010.
(3) "Subscriber" means the retail purchaser of telephone service as
telephone service is defined in RCW ((82.04.065(3))) 82.16.010.
(4) "Telephone program excise taxes" means the taxes on switched
access lines imposed by RCW 43.20A.725 and 80.36.430.

Sec. 1011 RCW 82.32.555 and 2004 c 76 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
If a taxing jurisdiction does not subject some charges for
((telephone)) ancillary services or telecommunications service, as
those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to taxation, but these
charges are aggregated with and not separately stated from charges that
are subject to taxation, then the charges for nontaxable ((telephone))
ancillary services or telecommunications service, as those terms are
defined in RCW 82.04.065, may be subject to taxation unless the
((telephone)) telecommunications service ((or)) provider or ancillary
services provider can reasonably identify charges not subject to the
tax, charge, or fee from its books and records that are kept in the
regular course of business and for purposes other than merely
allocating the sales price of an aggregated charge to the individually
aggregated items.

Sec. 1012 RCW 35A.82.055 and 2002 c 179 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any code city which imposes a license fee or tax upon the business
activity of engaging in the telephone business, as defined in RCW
((82.04.065)) 82.16.010, which is measured by gross receipts or gross
income from the business shall impose the tax at a uniform rate on all
persons engaged in the telephone business in the code city.
This section does not apply to the providing of competitive
telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065 or to the providing of
payphone service as defined in RCW 35.21.710.

Sec. 1013 RCW 35A.82.060 and 2002 c 67 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any code city which imposes a license fee or tax upon the
business activity of engaging in the telephone business which is
measured by gross receipts or gross income may impose the fee or tax,
if it desires, on one hundred percent of the total gross revenue
derived from intrastate toll telephone services subject to the fee or
tax: PROVIDED, That the city shall not impose the fee or tax on that
portion of network telephone service which represents charges to
another telecommunications company, as defined in RCW 80.04.010, for
connecting fees, switching charges, or carrier access charges relating
to intrastate toll telephone services, or for access to, or charges
for, interstate services, or charges for network telephone service that
is purchased for the purpose of resale, or charges for mobile
telecommunications services provided to customers whose place of
primary use is not within the city.
(2) Any city that imposes a license tax or fee under subsection (1)
of this section has the authority, rights, and obligations of a taxing
jurisdiction as provided in RCW 82.32.490 through 82.32.510.
(3) The definitions in RCW 82.04.065 and 82.16.010 apply to this
section.

Sec. 1014 RCW 35A.82.060 and 1989 c 103 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any code city which imposes a license fee or tax upon the business
activity of engaging in the telephone business, as defined in RCW
((82.04.065)) 82.16.010, which is measured by gross receipts or gross
income may impose the fee or tax, if it desires, on one hundred percent
of the total gross revenue derived from intrastate toll telephone
services subject to the fee or tax: PROVIDED, That the city shall not
impose the fee or tax on that portion of network telephone service, as
defined in RCW ((82.04.065)) 82.16.010, which represents charges to
another telecommunications company, as defined in RCW 80.04.010, for
connecting fees, switching charges, or carrier access charges relating
to intrastate toll telephone services, or for access to, or charges
for, interstate services, or charges for network telephone service that
is purchased for the purpose of resale.

Sec. 1015 RCW 35A.82.065 and 1989 c 103 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding RCW 35.21.714 or 35A.82.060, any city or town which
imposes a tax upon business activities measured by gross receipts or
gross income from sales, may impose such tax on that portion of network
telephone service, as defined in RCW ((82.04.065)) 82.16.010, which
represents charges to another telecommunications company, as defined in
RCW 80.04.010, for connecting fees, switching charges, or carrier
access charges relating to intrastate toll services, or charges for
network telephone service that is purchased for the purpose of resale.
Such tax shall be levied at the same rate as is applicable to other
competitive telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065.

Sec. 1016 RCW 35.21.712 and 2002 c 179 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any city which imposes a license fee or tax upon the business
activity of engaging in the telephone business, as defined in RCW
((82.04.065)) 82.16.010, which is measured by gross receipts or gross
income from the business shall impose the tax at a uniform rate on all
persons engaged in the telephone business in the city.
This section does not apply to the providing of competitive
telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065 or to the providing of
payphone service as defined in RCW 35.21.710.

Sec. 1017 RCW 35.21.714 and 2002 c 67 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any city which imposes a license fee or tax upon the business
activity of engaging in the telephone business which is measured by
gross receipts or gross income may impose the fee or tax, if it
desires, on one hundred percent of the total gross revenue derived from
intrastate toll telephone services subject to the fee or tax:
PROVIDED, That the city shall not impose the fee or tax on that portion
of network telephone service which represents charges to another
telecommunications company, as defined in RCW 80.04.010, for connecting
fees, switching charges, or carrier access charges relating to
intrastate toll telephone services, or for access to, or charges for,
interstate services, or charges for network telephone service that is
purchased for the purpose of resale, or charges for mobile
telecommunications services provided to customers whose place of
primary use is not within the city.
(2) Any city that imposes a license tax or fee under subsection (1)
of this section has the authority, rights, and obligations of a taxing
jurisdiction as provided in RCW 82.32.490 through 82.32.510.
(3) The definitions in RCW 82.04.065 and 82.16.010 apply to this
section.

Sec. 1018 RCW 35.21.714 and 1989 c 103 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any city which imposes a license fee or tax upon the business
activity of engaging in the telephone business, as defined in RCW
((82.04.065)) 82.16.010, which is measured by gross receipts or gross
income may impose the fee or tax, if it desires, on one hundred percent
of the total gross revenue derived from intrastate toll telephone
services subject to the fee or tax: PROVIDED, That the city shall not
impose the fee or tax on that portion of network telephone service, as
defined in RCW ((82.04.065)) 82.16.010, which represents charges to
another telecommunications company, as defined in RCW 80.04.010, for
connecting fees, switching charges, or carrier access charges relating
to intrastate toll telephone services, or for access to, or charges
for, interstate services, or charges for network telephone service that
is purchased for the purpose of resale.

Sec. 1019 RCW 35.21.715 and 1989 c 103 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding RCW 35.21.714 or 35A.82.060, any city or town which
imposes a tax upon business activities measured by gross receipts or
gross income from sales, may impose such tax on that portion of network
telephone service, as defined in RCW ((82.04.065)) 82.16.010, which
represents charges to another telecommunications company, as defined in
RCW 80.04.010, for connecting fees, switching charges, or carrier
access charges relating to intrastate toll services, or charges for
network telephone service that is purchased for the purpose of resale.
Such tax shall be levied at the same rate as is applicable to other
competitive telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065.

Sec. 1020 RCW 35.21.860 and 2000 c 83 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No city or town may impose a franchise fee or any other fee or
charge of whatever nature or description upon the light and power, or
gas distribution businesses, as defined in RCW 82.16.010, or telephone
business, as defined in RCW ((82.04.065)) 82.16.010, or service
provider for use of the right of way, except:
(a) A tax authorized by RCW 35.21.865 may be imposed;
(b) A fee may be charged to such businesses or service providers
that recovers actual administrative expenses incurred by a city or town
that are directly related to receiving and approving a permit, license,
and franchise, to inspecting plans and construction, or to the
preparation of a detailed statement pursuant to chapter 43.21C RCW;
(c) Taxes permitted by state law on service providers;
(d) Franchise requirements and fees for cable television services
as allowed by federal law; and
(e) A site-specific charge pursuant to an agreement between the
city or town and a service provider of personal wireless services
acceptable to the parties for:
(i) The placement of new structures in the right of way regardless
of height, unless the new structure is the result of a mandated
relocation in which case no charge will be imposed if the previous
location was not charged;
(ii) The placement of replacement structures when the replacement
is necessary for the installation or attachment of wireless facilities,
and the overall height of the replacement structure and the wireless
facility is more than sixty feet; or
(iii) The placement of personal wireless facilities on structures
owned by the city or town located in the right of way. However, a
site-specific charge shall not apply to the placement of personal
wireless facilities on existing structures, unless the structure is
owned by the city or town.
A city or town is not required to approve the use permit for the
placement of a facility for personal wireless services that meets one
of the criteria in this subsection absent such an agreement. If the
parties are unable to agree on the amount of the charge, the service
provider may submit the amount of the charge to binding arbitration by
serving notice on the city or town. Within thirty days of receipt of
the initial notice, each party shall furnish a list of acceptable
arbitrators. The parties shall select an arbitrator; failing to agree
on an arbitrator, each party shall select one arbitrator and the two
arbitrators shall select a third arbitrator for an arbitration panel.
The arbitrator or arbitrators shall determine the charge based on
comparable siting agreements involving public land and rights of way.
The arbitrator or arbitrators shall not decide any other disputed
issues, including but not limited to size, location, and zoning
requirements. Costs of the arbitration, including compensation for the
arbitrator's services, must be borne equally by the parties
participating in the arbitration and each party shall bear its own
costs and expenses, including legal fees and witness expenses, in
connection with the arbitration proceeding.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit franchise fees
imposed on an electrical energy, natural gas, or telephone business, by
contract existing on April 20, 1982, with a city or town, for the
duration of the contract, but the franchise fees shall be considered
taxes for the purposes of the limitations established in RCW 35.21.865
and 35.21.870 to the extent the fees exceed the costs allowable under
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 1021 RCW 35.102.020 and 2003 c 79 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Chapter 79, Laws of 2003 does not apply to taxes on any service
that historically or traditionally has been taxed as a utility business
for municipal tax purposes, such as:
(1) A light and power business or a natural gas distribution
business, as defined in RCW 82.16.010;
(2) A telephone business, as defined in RCW ((82.04.065))
82.16.010;
(3) Cable television services;
(4) Sewer or water services;
(5) Drainage services;
(6) Solid waste services; or
(7) Steam services.

Sec. 1022 RCW 82.04.530 and 2004 c 153 s 410 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter, a ((telephone business))
telecommunications service provider other than a mobile
telecommunications service provider must calculate gross proceeds of
((retail)) sales in a manner consistent with the sourcing rules
provided in RCW 82.32.520. The department may adopt rules to implement
this section, including rules that provide a formulary method of
determining gross proceeds that reasonably approximates the taxable
activity of a telephone business.

Sec. 1023 RCW 82.16.010 and 1996 c 150 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the
context:
(1) "Railroad business" means the business of operating any
railroad, by whatever power operated, for public use in the conveyance
of persons or property for hire. It shall not, however, include any
business herein defined as an urban transportation business.
(2) "Express business" means the business of carrying property for
public hire on the line of any common carrier operated in this state,
when such common carrier is not owned or leased by the person engaging
in such business.
(3) "Railroad car business" means the business of operating stock
cars, furniture cars, refrigerator cars, fruit cars, poultry cars, tank
cars, sleeping cars, parlor cars, buffet cars, tourist cars, or any
other kinds of cars used for transportation of property or persons upon
the line of any railroad operated in this state when such railroad is
not owned or leased by the person engaging in such business.
(4) "Water distribution business" means the business of operating
a plant or system for the distribution of water for hire or sale.
(5) "Light and power business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the generation, production or distribution of
electrical energy for hire or sale and/or for the wheeling of
electricity for others.
(6) "Telegraph business" means the business of affording
telegraphic communication for hire.
(7) "Gas distribution business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the production or distribution for hire or sale of
gas, whether manufactured or natural.
(8) "Motor transportation business" means the business (except
urban transportation business) of operating any motor propelled vehicle
by which persons or property of others are conveyed for hire, and
includes, but is not limited to, the operation of any motor propelled
vehicle as an auto transportation company (except urban transportation
business), common carrier or contract carrier as defined by RCW
81.68.010 and 81.80.010: PROVIDED, That "motor transportation
business" shall not mean or include the transportation of logs or other
forest products exclusively upon private roads or private highways.
(9) "Urban transportation business" means the business of operating
any vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or property for
hire, insofar as (a) operating entirely within the corporate limits of
any city or town, or within five miles of the corporate limits thereof,
or (b) operating entirely within and between cities and towns whose
corporate limits are not more than five miles apart or within five
miles of the corporate limits of either thereof. Included herein, but
without limiting the scope hereof, is the business of operating
passenger vehicles of every type and also the business of operating
cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including in such services the
collection and distribution of property arriving from or destined to a
point within or without the state, whether or not such collection or
distribution be made by the person performing a local or interstate
line-haul of such property.
(10)(a) "Public service business" means any of the businesses
defined in ((subdivisions)) subsections (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6),
(7), (8), and (9) of this section or any business subject to control by
the state, or having the powers of eminent domain and the duties
incident thereto, or any business hereafter declared by the legislature
to be of a public service nature, except telephone business ((as
defined in RCW 82.04.065)) and low-level radioactive waste site
operating companies as redefined in RCW 81.04.010. It includes, among
others, without limiting the scope hereof: Airplane transportation,
boom, dock, ferry, pipe line, toll bridge, toll logging road, water
transportation and wharf businesses.
(b) The definitions in this subsection (10)(b) apply throughout
this subsection (10).
(i) "Competitive telephone service" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.065.
(ii) "Network telephone service" means the providing by any person
of access to a telephone network, telephone network switching service,
toll service, or coin telephone services, or the providing of
telephonic, video, data, or similar communication or transmission for
hire, via a telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave,
or similar communication or transmission system. "Network telephone
service" includes the provision of transmission to and from the site of
an internet provider via a telephone network, toll line or channel,
cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system.
"Network telephone service" does not include the providing of
competitive telephone service, the providing of cable television
service, the providing of broadcast services by radio or television
stations, nor the provision of internet service as defined in RCW
82.04.297, including the reception of dial-in connection, provided at
the site of the internet service provider.
(iii) "Telephone business" means the business of providing network
telephone service. It includes cooperative or farmer line telephone
companies or associations operating an exchange.
(iv) "Telephone service" means competitive telephone service or
network telephone service, or both, as defined in (b)(i) and (ii) of
this subsection.
(11) "Tugboat business" means the business of operating tugboats,
towboats, wharf boats or similar vessels in the towing or pushing of
vessels, barges or rafts for hire.
(12) "Gross income" means the value proceeding or accruing from the
performance of the particular public service or transportation business
involved, including operations incidental thereto, but without any
deduction on account of the cost of the commodity furnished or sold,
the cost of materials used, labor costs, interest, discount, delivery
costs, taxes, or any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued and
without any deduction on account of losses.
(13) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the term "tax
year," "person," "value proceeding or accruing," "business," "engaging
in business," "in this state," "within this state," "cash discount" and
"successor" shall apply equally in the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 1024 RCW 82.14B.030 and 2002 c 341 s 8 and 2002 c 67 § 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county may impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of switched access lines in an
amount not exceeding fifty cents per month for each switched access
line. The amount of tax shall be uniform for each switched access
line. Each county shall provide notice of such tax to all local
exchange companies serving in the county at least sixty days in advance
of the date on which the first payment is due.
(2) The legislative authority of a county may also impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of radio access lines whose place of
primary use is located within the county in an amount not exceeding
fifty cents per month for each radio access line. The amount of tax
shall be uniform for each radio access line. ((The location of a radio
access line is the customer's place of primary use as defined in RCW
82.04.065.)) The county shall provide notice of such tax to all radio
communications service companies serving in the county at least sixty
days in advance of the date on which the first payment is due. Any
county imposing this tax shall include in its ordinance a refund
mechanism whereby the amount of any tax ordered to be refunded by the
judgment of a court of record, or as a result of the resolution of any
appeal therefrom, shall be refunded to the radio communications service
company or local exchange company that collected the tax, and those
companies shall reimburse the subscribers who paid the tax. The
ordinance shall further provide that to the extent the subscribers who
paid the tax cannot be identified or located, the tax paid by those
subscribers shall be returned to the county.
(3) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all switched
access lines in the state. The amount of tax shall not exceed twenty
cents per month for each switched access line. The tax shall be
uniform for each switched access line. The tax imposed under this
subsection shall be remitted to the department of revenue by local
exchange companies on a tax return provided by the department. Tax
proceeds shall be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911
account created in RCW 38.52.540.
(4) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all radio access
lines whose place of primary use is located within the state in an
amount of twenty cents per month for each radio access line. The tax
shall be uniform for each radio access line. The tax imposed under
this section shall be remitted to the department of revenue by radio
communications service companies, including those companies that resell
radio access lines, on a tax return provided by the department. Tax
proceeds shall be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911
account created in RCW 38.52.540. The tax imposed under this section
is not subject to the state sales and use tax or any local tax.
(5) By August 31st of each year the state enhanced 911 coordinator
shall recommend the level for the next year of the state enhanced 911
excise tax imposed by subsection (3) of this section, based on a
systematic cost and revenue analysis, to the utilities and
transportation commission. The commission shall by the following
October 31st determine the level of the state enhanced 911 excise tax
for the following year.

PART XI
DURABLE MEDICAL EQUIPMENT
Sec. 1101 RCW 82.08.0283 and 2004 c 153 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of:
(a) Prosthetic devices prescribed, fitted, or furnished for an
individual by a person licensed under the laws of this state to
prescribe, fit, or furnish prosthetic devices, and the components of
such prosthetic devices;
(b) Medicines of mineral, animal, and botanical origin prescribed,
administered, dispensed, or used in the treatment of an individual by
a person licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW; ((and))
(c) ((Medically prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to,
oxygen concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid oxygen
systems, and)) Durable medical equipment, and the components of durable
medical equipment, for home use and prescribed by a person licensed
under the laws of this state to prescribe such equipment; and
(d) Gaseous((,)) or liquid bottled oxygen ((systems)) used with
durable medical equipment prescribed for an individual by a person
licensed under ((chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW)) the laws of this state
for use in the medical treatment of ((that)) an individual for home
use.
(2) In addition, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to the
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of any of the items
exempted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The exemption in subsection (1) of this section shall not apply
to sales of ((durable medical equipment or)) mobility enhancing
equipment.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Prosthetic device" means a replacement, corrective, or
supportive device, including repair and replacement parts for a
prosthetic device, worn on or in the body to:
(i) Artificially replace a missing portion of the body;
(ii) Prevent or correct a physical deformity or malfunction; or
(iii) Support a weak or deformed portion of the body.
(b) "Durable medical equipment" means equipment, including repair
and replacement parts for durable medical equipment that:
(i) Can withstand repeated use;
(ii) Is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose;
(iii) Generally is not useful to a person in the absence of illness
or injury; and
(iv) ((Does not work)) Is not worn in or on the body.
(c) "Mobility enhancing equipment" means equipment, including
repair and replacement parts for mobility enhancing equipment that:
(i) Is primarily and customarily used to provide or increase the
ability to move from one place to another and that is appropriate for
use either in a home or a motor vehicle;
(ii) Is not generally used by persons with normal mobility; and
(iii) Does not include any motor vehicle or equipment on a motor
vehicle normally provided by a motor vehicle manufacturer.
(d) The terms "durable medical equipment" and "mobility enhancing
equipment" are mutually exclusive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1102 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) An exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 in the form
of a refund is provided for sales of:
(a) Medically prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to,
oxygen concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid oxygen
systems, and gaseous, bottled oxygen systems prescribed for an
individual by a person licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW for
use in the medical treatment of that individual for other than home
use;
(b) Repair, replacement, and component parts for medically
prescribed oxygen for other than home use; and
(c) Labor and services rendered in respect to the repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving of medically prescribed oxygen for
other than home use.
(2) Sellers shall collect tax on sales subject to this exemption.
The buyer shall apply for a refund directly from the department in a
form and manner prescribed by the department.

Sec. 1103 RCW 82.12.0277 and 2004 c 153 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of:
(a) Prosthetic devices prescribed, fitted, or furnished for an
individual by a person licensed under the laws of this state to
prescribe, fit, or furnish prosthetic devices, and the components of
such prosthetic devices;
(b) Medicines of mineral, animal, and botanical origin prescribed,
administered, dispensed, or used in the treatment of an individual by
a person licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW; ((and))
(c) ((Medically prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to,
oxygen concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid oxygen
systems, and)) Durable medical equipment, and the components of durable
medical equipment, for home use and prescribed by a person licensed
under the laws of this state to prescribe such equipment; and
(d) Gaseous((,)) or liquid bottled oxygen ((systems)) used with
durable medical equipment prescribed for an individual by a person
licensed under ((chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW)) the laws of this state
for use in the medical treatment of ((that)) an individual for home
use.
(2) In addition, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in
respect to the use of labor and services rendered in respect to the
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of any of the items
exempted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The exemption provided by subsection (1) of this section shall
not apply to the use of ((durable medical equipment or)) mobility
enhancing equipment.
(4) "Prosthetic device," "durable medical equipment," and "mobility
enhancing equipment" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.08.0283.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1104 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of:
(a) Medically prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to,
oxygen concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid oxygen
systems, and gaseous, bottled oxygen systems prescribed for an
individual by a person licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW for
use in the medical treatment of that individual for other than home
use;
(b) Repair, replacement, and component parts for medically
prescribed oxygen; and
(c) Labor and services rendered in respect to the repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving of medically prescribed oxygen.
(2) Sellers obligated to collect use tax shall collect tax on sales
subject to this exemption. The buyer shall apply for a refund directly
from the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

Sec. 1105 RCW 82.08.803 and 2004 c 153 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to)) (1) An
exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 in the form of a refund
is provided for sales of nebulizers for other than home use, including
repair ((and)), replacement, and component parts for such nebulizers,
for human use pursuant to a prescription. In addition, the tax levied
by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to the repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
of nebulizers for other than home use. "Nebulizer" means a device, not
a building fixture, that converts a liquid medication into a mist so
that it can be inhaled.
(2) Sellers shall collect tax on sales subject to this exemption.
The buyer shall apply for a refund directly from the department in a
form and manner prescribed by the department.

Sec. 1106 RCW 82.12.803 and 2004 c 153 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of nebulizers for other than home use, including repair
((and)), replacement, and component parts for such nebulizers, for
human use pursuant to a prescription. In addition, the provisions of
this chapter shall not apply in respect to labor and services rendered
in respect to the repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of
nebulizers for other than home use. "Nebulizer" has the same meaning
as in RCW 82.08.803.
(2) Sellers obligated to collect use tax shall collect tax on sales
subject to this exemption. The buyer shall apply for a refund directly
from the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

Sec. 1107 RCW 82.08.945 and 2004 c 153 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to)) (1) An
exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 in the form of a refund
is provided for sales of kidney dialysis devices for other than home
use, including repair ((and)), replacement, and component parts, for
human use pursuant to a prescription. In addition, the tax levied by
RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to the repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
of kidney dialysis devices for other than home use.
(2) Sellers shall collect tax on sales subject to this exemption.
The buyer shall apply for a refund directly from the department in a
form and manner prescribed by the department.

Sec. 1108 RCW 82.12.945 and 2004 c 153 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the use of
kidney dialysis devices for other than home use, including repair
((and)), replacement, and component parts, for human use pursuant to a
prescription. In addition, the provisions of this chapter shall not
apply in respect to the use of labor and services rendered in respect
to the repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of kidney dialysis
devices for other than home use.
(2) Sellers obligated to collect use tax shall collect tax on sales
subject to this exemption. The buyer shall apply for a refund directly
from the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

PART XII
EXEMPTION ADMINISTRATION
Sec. 1201 RCW 82.04.470 and 2003 c 168 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless a seller has taken from the buyer a resale certificate,
the burden of proving that a sale of tangible personal property, or of
services, was not a sale at retail shall be upon the person who made
it.
(2) If a seller does not receive a resale certificate at the time
of the sale, have a resale certificate on file at the time of the sale,
or obtain a resale certificate from the buyer within a reasonable time
after the sale, the seller shall remain liable for the tax as provided
in RCW 82.08.050, unless the seller can demonstrate facts and
circumstances according to rules adopted by the department of revenue
that show the sale was properly made without payment of sales tax.
(3) ((Resale certificates shall be valid for a period of four years
from the date the certificate is provided to the seller.
(4))) The department may provide by rule for suggested forms for
resale certificates or equivalent documents containing the information
that will be accepted as resale certificates. The department shall
provide by rule the categories of items or services that must be
specified on resale certificates and the business classifications that
may use a blanket resale certificate.
(((5))) (4) As used in this section, "resale certificate" means
documentation provided by a buyer to a seller stating that the purchase
is for resale in the regular course of business, or that the buyer is
exempt from retail sales tax, and containing the following information:
(a) The name and address of the buyer;
(b) The uniform business identifier or revenue registration number
of the buyer, if the buyer is required to be registered;
(c) The type of business engaged in;
(d) The categories of items or services to be purchased for resale
or that are exempt, unless the buyer ((is in a business classification
that may)) presents a blanket resale certificate ((as provided by the
department by rule));
(e) The date on which the certificate was provided;
(f) A statement that the items or services purchased either: (i)
Are purchased for resale in the regular course of business; or (ii) are
exempt from tax pursuant to statute;
(g) A statement that the buyer acknowledges that the buyer is
solely responsible for purchasing within the categories specified on
the certificate and that misuse of the resale or exemption privilege
claimed on the certificate subjects the buyer to a penalty of fifty
percent of the tax due, in addition to the tax, interest, and any other
penalties imposed by law;
(h) The name of the individual authorized to sign the certificate,
printed in a legible fashion;
(i) The signature of the authorized individual; and
(j) The name of the seller.
(((6))) (5) Subsection (((5))) (4)(h), (i), and (j) of this section
does not apply if the certificate is provided in a format other than
paper. If the certificate is provided in a format other than paper,
the name of the individual providing the certificate must be included
in the certificate.

Sec. 1202 RCW 82.08.050 and 2003 c 168 s 203, 2003 c 76 s 3, and
2003 c 53 s 400 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax hereby imposed shall be paid by the buyer to the
seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the full amount of
the tax payable in respect to each taxable sale in accordance with the
schedule of collections adopted by the department pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 82.08.060.
(2) The tax required by this chapter, to be collected by the
seller, shall be deemed to be held in trust by the seller until paid to
the department, and any seller who appropriates or converts the tax
collected to his or her own use or to any use other than the payment of
the tax to the extent that the money required to be collected is not
available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(3) In case any seller fails to collect the tax herein imposed or,
having collected the tax, fails to pay it to the department in the
manner prescribed by this chapter, whether such failure is the result
of his or her own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond his
or her control, he or she shall, nevertheless, be personally liable to
the state for the amount of the tax, unless the seller has taken from
the buyer a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470, a copy of a direct
pay permit issued under RCW 82.32.087, an exemption certificate
claiming multiple points of use under section 501(5) of this act, a
direct mail form under section 501(6) of this act, or other information
required under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, or
information required under rules adopted by the department.
(4) Sellers shall not be relieved from personal liability for the
amount of the tax unless they maintain proper records of exempt
transactions and provide them to the department when requested.
(((4))) (5) Sellers are not relieved from personal liability for
the amount of tax if they fraudulently fail to collect the tax or if
they solicit purchasers to participate in an unlawful claim of
exemption.
(6) Sellers are not relieved from personal liability for the amount
of tax if they accept an exemption certificate from a purchaser
claiming an entity-based exemption if:
(a) The subject of the transaction sought to be covered by the
exemption certificate is actually received by the purchaser at a
location operated by the seller in Washington; and
(b) Washington provides an exemption certificate that clearly and
affirmatively indicates that the claimed exemption is not available in
Washington. Graying out exemption reason types on a uniform form and
posting it on the department's web site is a clear and affirmative
indication that the grayed out exemptions are not available.
(7) Sellers are not relieved from personal liability for the amount
of tax if they accept an exemption certificate claiming multiple points
of use for tangible personal property other than computer software for
which an exemption certificate claiming multiple points of use is
acceptable under section 501(5) of this act.
(8)(a) Sellers are relieved from personal liability for the amount
of tax if they obtain a fully completed exemption certificate or
capture the relevant data elements required under the streamlined sales
and use tax agreement within ninety days, or a longer period as may be
provided by rule by the department, subsequent to the date of sale.
(b) If the seller has not obtained an exemption certificate or all
relevant data elements required under the streamlined sales and use tax
agreement within the period allowed subsequent to the date of sale, the
seller may, within one hundred twenty days, or a longer period as may
be provided by rule by the department, subsequent to a request for
substantiation by the department, either prove that the transaction was
not subject to tax by other means or obtain a fully completed exemption
certificate from the purchaser, taken in good faith.
(c) Sellers are relieved from personal liability for the amount of
tax if they obtain a blanket exemption certificate for a purchaser with
which the seller has a recurring business relationship. The department
may not request from a seller renewal of blanket certificates or
updates of exemption certificate information or data elements if there
is a recurring business relationship between the buyer and seller. For
purposes of this subsection (8)(c), a "recurring business relationship"
means at least one sale transaction within a period of twelve
consecutive months.
(9) The amount of tax, until paid by the buyer to the seller or to
the department, shall constitute a debt from the buyer to the seller
and any seller who fails or refuses to collect the tax as required with
intent to violate the provisions of this chapter or to gain some
advantage or benefit, either direct or indirect, and any buyer who
refuses to pay any tax due under this chapter is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
(((5))) (10) The tax required by this chapter to be collected by
the seller shall be stated separately from the selling price in any
sales invoice or other instrument of sale. On all retail sales through
vending machines, the tax need not be stated separately from the
selling price or collected separately from the buyer. For purposes of
determining the tax due from the buyer to the seller and from the
seller to the department it shall be conclusively presumed that the
selling price quoted in any price list, sales document, contract or
other agreement between the parties does not include the tax imposed by
this chapter, but if the seller advertises the price as including the
tax or that the seller is paying the tax, the advertised price shall
not be considered the selling price.
(((6))) (11) Where a buyer has failed to pay to the seller the tax
imposed by this chapter and the seller has not paid the amount of the
tax to the department, the department may, in its discretion, proceed
directly against the buyer for collection of the tax, in which case a
penalty of ten percent may be added to the amount of the tax for
failure of the buyer to pay the same to the seller, regardless of when
the tax may be collected by the department; and all of the provisions
of chapter 82.32 RCW, including those relative to interest and
penalties, shall apply in addition; and, for the sole purpose of
applying the various provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW, the twenty-fifth
day of the month following the tax period in which the purchase was
made shall be considered as the due date of the tax.
(((7))) (12) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (((6))) (11)
of this section, any person making sales is not obligated to collect
the tax imposed by this chapter if:
(a) The person's activities in this state, whether conducted
directly or through another person, are limited to:
(i) The storage, dissemination, or display of advertising;
(ii) The taking of orders; or
(iii) The processing of payments; and
(b) The activities are conducted electronically via a web site on
a server or other computer equipment located in Washington that is not
owned or operated by the person making sales into this state nor owned
or operated by an affiliated person. "Affiliated persons" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.424.
(((8))) (13) Subsection (((7))) (12) of this section expires when:
(a) The United States congress grants individual states the authority
to impose sales and use tax collection duties on remote sellers; or (b)
it is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a judgment
not subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use tax
collection duties on remote sellers.

PART XIII
SALES PRICE
Sec. 1301 RCW 82.08.010 and 2005 c 514 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Selling price" includes "sales price." "Sales price" means
the total amount of consideration, except separately stated trade-in
property of like kind, including cash, credit, property, and services,
for which tangible personal property, extended warranties, or services
defined as a "retail sale" under RCW 82.04.050 are sold, leased, or
rented, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise. No
deduction from the total amount of consideration is allowed for the
following: (a) The seller's cost of the property sold; (b) the cost of
materials used, labor or service cost, interest, losses, all costs of
transportation to the seller, all taxes imposed on the seller, and any
other expense of the seller; (c) charges by the seller for any services
necessary to complete the sale, other than delivery and installation
charges; (d) delivery charges; and (e) installation charges((; and (f)
the value of exempt tangible personal property given to the purchaser
where taxable and exempt tangible personal property have been bundled
together and sold by the seller as a single product or piece of
merchandise)).
When tangible personal property is rented or leased under
circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a
reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the
"selling price" shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.
"Selling price" or "sales price" does not include: Discounts,
including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third
party that are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale;
interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the
sale of tangible personal property, extended warranties, or services,
if the amount is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or
similar document given to the purchaser; and any taxes legally imposed
directly on the consumer that are separately stated on the invoice,
bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser;
(2) "Seller" means every person, including the state and its
departments and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to
a buyer, purchaser, or consumer, whether as agent, broker, or
principal, except "seller" does not mean the state and its departments
and institutions when making sales to the state and its departments and
institutions;
(3) "Buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" include, without limiting
the scope hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in
bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club,
company, joint stock company, business trust, corporation, association,
society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual,
cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise, municipal corporation,
quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its departments and
institutions and all political subdivisions thereof, irrespective of
the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed, and
also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;
(4) "Delivery charges" means charges by the seller of personal
property or services for preparation and delivery to a location
designated by the purchaser of personal property or services including,
but not limited to, transportation, shipping, postage, handling,
crating, and packing;
(5) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed
by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or
to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the
direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed
directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal
property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct
mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed
material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed
material delivered to a single address;
(6) The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax
year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "sale," "sale at retail,"
"retail sale," "sale at wholesale," "wholesale," "business," "engaging
in business," "cash discount," "successor," "consumer," "in this state"
and "within this state" shall apply equally to the provisions of this
chapter;
(7) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and
under chapter 82.12 RCW, "tangible personal property" means personal
property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched, or that
is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. Tangible personal
property includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten
computer software;
(8) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.050(7).

Sec. 1302 RCW 82.08.010 and 2005 c 514 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1)(a) "Selling price" includes "sales price." "Sales price" means
the total amount of consideration, except separately stated trade-in
property of like kind, including cash, credit, property, and services,
for which tangible personal property, extended warranties, or services
defined as a "retail sale" under RCW 82.04.050 are sold, leased, or
rented, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise. No
deduction from the total amount of consideration is allowed for the
following: (((a))) (i) The seller's cost of the property sold; (((b)))
(ii) the cost of materials used, labor or service cost, interest,
losses, all costs of transportation to the seller, all taxes imposed on
the seller, and any other expense of the seller; (((c))) (iii) charges
by the seller for any services necessary to complete the sale, other
than delivery and installation charges; (((d))) (iv) delivery charges;
(((e))) and (v) installation charges((; and (f) the value of exempt
tangible personal property given to the purchaser where taxable and
exempt tangible personal property have been bundled together and sold
by the seller as a single product or piece of merchandise)).
When tangible personal property is rented or leased under
circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a
reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the
"selling price" shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.
(b) "Selling price" or "sales price" does not include: Discounts,
including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third
party that are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale;
interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the
sale of tangible personal property, extended warranties, or services,
if the amount is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or
similar document given to the purchaser; and any taxes legally imposed
directly on the consumer that are separately stated on the invoice,
bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser;
(c) "Selling price" or "sales price" includes consideration
received by the seller from a third party if:
(i) The seller actually receives consideration from a party other
than the purchaser, and the consideration is directly related to a
price reduction or discount on the sale;
(ii) The seller has an obligation to pass the price reduction or
discount through to the purchaser;
(iii) The amount of the consideration attributable to the sale is
fixed and determinable by the seller at the time of the sale of the
item to the purchaser: and
(iv) One of the criteria in this subsection (1)(c)(iv) is met:
(A) The purchaser presents a coupon, certificate, or other
documentation to the seller to claim a price reduction or discount
where the coupon, certificate, or documentation is authorized,
distributed, or granted by a third party with the understanding that
the third party will reimburse any seller to whom the coupon,
certificate, or documentation is presented;
(B) The purchaser identifies himself or herself to the seller as a
member of a group or organization entitled to a price reduction or
discount, however a "preferred customer" card that is available to any
patron does not constitute membership in such a group; or
(C) The price reduction or discount is identified as a third party
price reduction or discount on the invoice received by the purchaser or
on a coupon, certificate, or other documentation presented by the
purchaser.
(2) "Seller" means every person, including the state and its
departments and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to
a buyer, purchaser, or consumer, whether as agent, broker, or
principal, except "seller" does not mean the state and its departments
and institutions when making sales to the state and its departments and
institutions;
(3) "Buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" include, without limiting
the scope hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in
bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club,
company, joint stock company, business trust, corporation, association,
society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual,
cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise, municipal corporation,
quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its departments and
institutions and all political subdivisions thereof, irrespective of
the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed, and
also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;
(4) "Delivery charges" means charges by the seller of personal
property or services for preparation and delivery to a location
designated by the purchaser of personal property or services including,
but not limited to, transportation, shipping, postage, handling,
crating, and packing;
(5) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed
by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or
to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the
direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed
directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal
property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct
mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed
material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed
material delivered to a single address;
(6) The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax
year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "sale," "sale at retail,"
"retail sale," "sale at wholesale," "wholesale," "business," "engaging
in business," "cash discount," "successor," "consumer," "in this state"
and "within this state" shall apply equally to the provisions of this
chapter;
(7) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this chapter and
under chapter 82.12 RCW, "tangible personal property" means personal
property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched, or that
is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. Tangible personal
property includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten
computer software;
(8) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.050(7).

PART XIV
BUNDLED TRANSACTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1401 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Bundled transaction" means the retail sale of two or more
products, except real property and services to real property, where:
(i) The products are otherwise distinct and identifiable; and
(ii) The products are sold for one nonitemized price.
(b) A bundled transaction does not include the sale of any products
in which the sales price varies, or is negotiable, based on the
selection by the purchaser of the products included in the transaction.
(2) "Distinct and identifiable products" does not include:
(a) Packaging such as containers, boxes, sacks, bags, and bottles,
or other materials such as wrapping, labels, tags, and instruction
guides, that accompany the retail sale of the products and are
incidental or immaterial to the retail sale thereof. Examples of
packaging that are incidental or immaterial include grocery sacks,
shoeboxes, dry cleaning garment bags, and express delivery envelopes
and boxes;
(b) A product provided free of charge with the required purchase of
another product. A product is provided free of charge if the sales
price of the product purchased does not vary depending on the inclusion
of the product provided free of charge; or
(c) Items included in the definition of sales price in RCW
82.08.010.
(3) "One nonitemized price" does not include a price that is
separately identified by product on binding sales or other supporting
sales-related documentation made available to the customer in paper or
electronic form including, but not limited to, an invoice, bill of
sale, receipt, contract, service agreement, lease agreement, periodic
notice of rates and services, rate card, or price list.
(4) A transaction that otherwise meets the definition of a bundled
transaction is not a bundled transaction if it is:
(a) The retail sale of tangible personal property and a service
where the tangible personal property is essential to the use of the
service, and is provided exclusively in connection with the service,
and the true object of the transaction is the service; or
(b) The retail sale of services where one service is provided that
is essential to the use or receipt of a second service and the first
service is provided exclusively in connection with the second service
and the true object of the transaction is the second service; or
(c) A transaction that includes taxable products and nontaxable
products and the purchase price or sales price of the taxable products
is de minimis;
(i) As used in this subsection (4)(c), de minimis means the
seller's purchase price or sales price of the taxable products is ten
percent or less of the total purchase price or sales price of the
bundled products;
(ii) Sellers shall use either the purchase price or the sales price
of the products to determine if the taxable products are de minimis;
(iii) Sellers shall use the full term of a service contract to
determine if the taxable products are de minimis; or
(d) The retail sale of exempt tangible personal property and
taxable tangible personal property where:
(i) The transaction includes food and food ingredients, drugs,
durable medical equipment, mobility enhancing equipment, over-the-counter drugs, prosthetic devices, all as defined in this chapter, or
medical supplies; and
(ii) Where the seller's purchase price or sales price of the
taxable tangible personal property is fifty percent or less of the
total purchase price or sales price of the bundled tangible personal
property. Sellers may not use a combination of the purchase price and
sales price of the tangible personal property when making the fifty
percent determination for a transaction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1402 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A bundled transaction is subject to the tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020 if the retail sale of any of its component products would be
subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020.
(2) The transactions described in section 1401(4) (a) and (b) of
this act are subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 if the service
that is the true object of the transaction is subject to the tax
imposed by RCW 82.08.020. If the service that is the true object of
the transaction is not subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020, the
transaction is not subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020.
(3) The transaction described in section 1401(4)(c) of this act is
not subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020.
(4) The transaction described in section 1401(4)(d) of this act is
not subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020.
(5) In the case of a bundled transaction that includes any of the
following: Telecommunications service, ancillary service, internet
access, or audio or video programming service:
(a) If the price is attributable to products that are taxable and
products that are not taxable, the portion of the price attributable to
the nontaxable products are subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020
unless the seller can identify by reasonable and verifiable standards
the portion from its books and records that are kept in the regular
course of business for other purposes, including, but not limited to,
nontax purposes;
(b) If the price is attributable to products that are subject to
tax at different tax rates, the total price is attributable to the
products subject to the tax at the highest tax rate unless the seller
can identify by reasonable and verifiable standards the portion of the
price attributable to the products subject to the tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020 at the lower rate from its books and records that are kept in
the regular course of business for other purposes, including, but not
limited to, nontax purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1403 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The use of each product acquired in a bundled transaction is
subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 if the use of any of its
component products is subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020.
(2) The use of each product acquired in a transaction described in
section 1401(4) (a) or (b) of this act is subject to the tax imposed by
RCW 82.12.020 if the service that is the true object of the transaction
is subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020. If the service that is
the true object of the transaction is not subject to the tax imposed by
RCW 82.12.020, the use of each product acquired in the transaction is
not subject to the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020.
(3) The use of each product acquired in a transaction described in
section 1401(4)(c) of this act is not subject to the tax imposed by RCW
82.12.020.
(4) The use of each product in a transaction described in section
1401(4)(d) of this act is not subject to the tax imposed by RCW
82.12.020.
(5) The definitions in section 1401 of this act apply to this
section.

PART XV
GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM
Sec. 1501 RCW 82.32.430 and 2003 c 168 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who collects and remits sales or use tax to the
department and who calculates the tax using geographic information
system technology developed and provided by the department shall be
held harmless and is not liable for the difference in amount due nor
subject to penalties or interest in regards to rate calculation errors
resulting from the proper use of such technology.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the
department shall notify sellers who collect and remit sales or use tax
to the department of changes in boundaries and rates to taxes imposed
((by)) under the authority of chapter 82.14 RCW no later than sixty
days before the effective date of the change.
(3) The department shall notify sellers who collect and remit sales
or use tax to the department and make sales from printed catalogs of
changes, as to such sales, of boundaries and rates to taxes imposed
((by)) under the authority of chapter 82.14 RCW no later than one
hundred twenty days before the effective date of the change.
(4) Sellers who have not received timely notice of rate and
boundary changes under subsections (2) and (3) of this section due to
actions or omissions of the department are not liable for the
difference in the amount due until they have received the appropriate
period of notice. Purchasers are liable for any uncollected amounts of
tax.
(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, sellers
registered with the department under RCW 82.32.030(3) and certified
service providers must use the address-based geographic information
technology system developed and provided by the department to calculate
the tax to be collected and remitted to the department and to determine
the appropriate local jurisdictions entitled to the tax.
(b)(i) Upon a showing that using the address-based geographic
information technology system would cause undue hardship, a seller may
be temporarily held harmless and not liable for the difference in
amount due nor subject to penalties or interest in regards to rate
calculation errors resulting from the proper use of zip code-based
technology provided by the department for the period in which relief is
granted. The department shall notify local taxing jurisdictions of the
identity of sellers granted relief under this section and the period
for which relief is granted.
(ii) The department shall reimburse local taxing jurisdictions for
differences in amount due on account of such rate calculation errors
occurring during the period in which relief is granted. Purchasers are
liable for any uncollected amounts of tax. The department shall retain
amounts collected from purchasers that have been reimbursed to local
taxing jurisdictions under this subsection (5)(b)(ii).

Sec. 1502 RCW 82.32.330 and 2005 c 326 s 1 and 2005 c 274 s 361
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Disclose" means to make known to any person in any manner
whatever a return or tax information;
(b) "Return" means a tax or information return or claim for refund
required by, or provided for or permitted under, the laws of this state
which is filed with the department of revenue by, on behalf of, or with
respect to a person, and any amendment or supplement thereto, including
supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are supplemental to,
or part of, the return so filed;
(c) "Tax information" means (i) a taxpayer's identity, (ii) the
nature, source, or amount of the taxpayer's income, payments, receipts,
deductions, exemptions, credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax
liability deficiencies, overassessments, or tax payments, whether taken
from the taxpayer's books and records or any other source, (iii)
whether the taxpayer's return was, is being, or will be examined or
subject to other investigation or processing, (iv) a part of a written
determination that is not designated as a precedent and disclosed
pursuant to RCW 82.32.410, or a background file document relating to a
written determination, and (v) other data received by, recorded by,
prepared by, furnished to, or collected by the department of revenue
with respect to the determination of the existence, or possible
existence, of liability, or the amount thereof, of a person under the
laws of this state for a tax, penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or
other imposition, or offense: PROVIDED, That data, material, or
documents that do not disclose information related to a specific or
identifiable taxpayer do not constitute tax information under this
section. Except as provided by RCW 82.32.410, nothing in this chapter
shall require any person possessing data, material, or documents made
confidential and privileged by this section to delete information from
such data, material, or documents so as to permit its disclosure;
(d) "State agency" means every Washington state office, department,
division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency;
(e) "Taxpayer identity" means the taxpayer's name, address,
telephone number, registration number, or any combination thereof, or
any other information disclosing the identity of the taxpayer; and
(f) "Department" means the department of revenue or its officer,
agent, employee, or representative.
(2) Returns and tax information shall be confidential and
privileged, and except as authorized by this section, neither the
department of revenue nor any other person may disclose any return or
tax information.
(3) This section does not prohibit the department of revenue from:
(a) Disclosing such return or tax information in a civil or
criminal judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:
(i) In respect of any tax imposed under the laws of this state if
the taxpayer or its officer or other person liable under Title 82 RCW
is a party in the proceeding; or
(ii) In which the taxpayer about whom such return or tax
information is sought and another state agency are adverse parties in
the proceeding;
(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the
director shall prescribe by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW, such return or tax information regarding a taxpayer to such
taxpayer or to such person or persons as that taxpayer may designate in
a request for, or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person,
at the taxpayer's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a
request for information or assistance made by the taxpayer to such
other person: PROVIDED, That tax information not received from the
taxpayer shall not be so disclosed if the director determines that such
disclosure would compromise any investigation or litigation by any
federal, state, or local government agency in connection with the civil
or criminal liability of the taxpayer or another person, or that such
disclosure would identify a confidential informant, or that such
disclosure is contrary to any agreement entered into by the department
that provides for the reciprocal exchange of information with other
government agencies which agreement requires confidentiality with
respect to such information unless such information is required to be
disclosed to the taxpayer by the order of any court;
(c) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been either issued or filed and remains outstanding for
a period of at least ten working days. The department shall not be
required to disclose any information under this subsection if a
taxpayer: (i) Has been issued a tax assessment; (ii) has been issued
a warrant that has not been filed; and (iii) has entered a deferred
payment arrangement with the department of revenue and is making
payments upon such deficiency that will fully satisfy the indebtedness
within twelve months;
(d) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been filed with a court of record and remains
outstanding;
(e) Publishing statistics so classified as to prevent the
identification of particular returns or reports or items thereof;
(f) Disclosing such return or tax information, for official
purposes only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state
agency, or to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing
with matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of
industry or the professions;
(g) Permitting the department of revenue's records to be audited
and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and
employees;
(h) Disclosing any such return or tax information to a peace
officer as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for
official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a
search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure
is for the purpose of criminal tax enforcement. A peace officer or
county prosecuting attorney who receives the return or tax information
may disclose that return or tax information only for use in the
investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the court
proceeding for which the return or tax information originally was
sought;
(i) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the proper
officer of the internal revenue service of the United States, the
Canadian government or provincial governments of Canada, or to the
proper officer of the tax department of any state or city or town or
county, for official purposes, but only if the statutes of the United
States, Canada or its provincial governments, or of such other state or
city or town or county, as the case may be, grants substantially
similar privileges to the proper officers of this state;
(j) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the Department
of Justice, the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco ((and)), Firearms ((of)) and
Explosives within the Department of ((the Treasury)) Justice, the
Department of Defense, the United States Customs Service, the Coast
Guard of the United States, and the United States Department of
Transportation, or any authorized representative thereof, for official
purposes;
(k) Publishing or otherwise disclosing the text of a written
determination designated by the director as a precedent pursuant to RCW
82.32.410;
(l) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other tax
information, the taxpayer name, entity type, business address, mailing
address, revenue tax registration numbers, North American industry
classification system or standard industrial classification code of a
taxpayer, and the dates of opening and closing of business. This
subsection shall not be construed as giving authority to the department
to give, sell, or provide access to any list of taxpayers for any
commercial purpose;
(m) Disclosing such return or tax information that is also
maintained by another Washington state or local governmental agency as
a public record available for inspection and copying under the
provisions of chapter 42.17 RCW or is a document maintained by a court
of record not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;
(n) Disclosing such return or tax information to the United States
department of agriculture for the limited purpose of investigating food
stamp fraud by retailers;
(o) Disclosing to a financial institution, escrow company, or title
company, in connection with specific real property that is the subject
of a real estate transaction, current amounts due the department for a
filed tax warrant, judgment, or lien against the real property;
(p) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted
liability as a successor under RCW 82.32.140 return or tax information
pertaining to the specific business of the taxpayer to which the person
has succeeded; ((or))
(q) Disclosing such return or tax information in the possession of
the department relating to the administration or enforcement of the
real estate excise tax imposed under chapter 82.45 RCW, including
information regarding transactions exempt or otherwise not subject to
tax; or
(r) Disclosing to local taxing jurisdictions the identity of
sellers granted relief under RCW 82.32.430(5)(b)(i) and the period for
which relief is granted.
(4)(a) The department may disclose return or taxpayer information
to a person under investigation or during any court or administrative
proceeding against a person under investigation as provided in this
subsection (4). The disclosure must be in connection with the
department's official duties relating to an audit, collection activity,
or a civil or criminal investigation. The disclosure may occur only
when the person under investigation and the person in possession of
data, materials, or documents are parties to the return or tax
information to be disclosed. The department may disclose return or tax
information such as invoices, contracts, bills, statements, resale or
exemption certificates, or checks. However, the department may not
disclose general ledgers, sales or cash receipt journals, check
registers, accounts receivable/payable ledgers, general journals,
financial statements, expert's workpapers, income tax returns, state
tax returns, tax return workpapers, or other similar data, materials,
or documents.
(b) Before disclosure of any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4), the department shall, through written
correspondence, inform the person in possession of the data, materials,
or documents to be disclosed. The correspondence shall clearly
identify the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The
department may not disclose any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4) until the time period allowed in (c) of this
subsection has expired or until the court has ruled on any challenge
brought under (c) of this subsection.
(c) The person in possession of the data, materials, or documents
to be disclosed by the department has twenty days from the receipt of
the written request required under (b) of this subsection to petition
the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides for
injunctive relief. The court shall limit or deny the request of the
department if the court determines that:
(i) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure are
cumulative or duplicative, or are obtainable from some other source
that is more convenient, less burdensome, or less expensive;
(ii) The production of the data, materials, or documents sought
would be unduly burdensome or expensive, taking into account the needs
of the department, the amount in controversy, limitations on the
petitioner's resources, and the importance of the issues at stake; or
(iii) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure
contain trade secret information that, if disclosed, could harm the
petitioner.
(d) The department shall reimburse reasonable expenses for the
production of data, materials, or documents incurred by the person in
possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed.
(e) Requesting information under (b) of this subsection that may
indicate that a taxpayer is under investigation does not constitute a
disclosure of tax return or tax information under this section.
(5) Any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information
in the course of his or her employment with the department of revenue
and any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information as
provided under subsection (3)(f), (g), (h), (i), (j), or (n) of this
section, who discloses any such return or tax information to another
person not entitled to knowledge of such return or tax information
under the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If
the person guilty of such violation is an officer or employee of the
state, such person shall forfeit such office or employment and shall be
incapable of holding any public office or employment in this state for
a period of two years thereafter.

PART XVI
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
Sec. 1601 2004 c 153 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) If a court of competent jurisdiction enters a final judgment on
the merits that is based on federal or state law, is no longer subject
to appeal, and substantially limits or impairs the essential elements
of P.L. 106-252, 4 U.S.C. Secs. 116 through 126, or chapter 67, Laws of
2002, then sections 1 through 6, 8 through 17, and 19, chapter 67, Laws
of 2002 ((is)) are null and void in ((its)) their entirety.
(2) ((If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
section 502, chapter 168, Laws of 2003 is null and void.
(3))) If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
section 410, chapter 153, Laws of 2004 is null and void.
(3) If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
sections 1002, 1005, 1013, 1017, 1022, and 1024 of this act are null
and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1602 Part headings used in this act are not
any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1603 This act does not affect any existing
right acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the sections
amended or repealed in this act or under any rule or order adopted
under those sections, nor does it affect any proceeding instituted
under those sections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1604 Sections 301, 1301, and 1602 of this act
take effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1605 Sections 101 through 105, 201, 202, 401,
501 through 503, 601, 701, 801, 802, 901 through 905, 1001, 1002, 1004,
1005, 1007 through 1013, 1015 through 1017, 1019 through 1024, 1101
through 1108, 1201, 1202, 1302, 1401 through 1403, 1501, and 1502 of
this act take effect July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1606 (1) Section 302 of this act takes effect
when:
(a) The United States congress grants individual states the
authority to impose sales and use tax collection duties on remote
sellers; or
(b) It is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a
judgment not subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use
tax collection duties on remote sellers.
(2) The department of revenue shall provide notice to affected
taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed appropriate by the
department, if either of the contingencies in this section occurs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1607 Section 1301 of this act expires July 1,
2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1608 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---