BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Patients are not at optimum levels of safety while being
lifted, transferred, or repositioned manually. Mechanical lift
programs can reduce skin tears suffered by patients by threefold.
Nurses, thirty-eight percent of whom have previous back injuries, can
drop patients if their pain thresholds are triggered.
(b) Health care workers lead the nation in work-related
musculoskeletal disorders. In 1999, the bureau of labor statistics
identified "health care patient" as the source of fifty-nine thousand
such injuries.
(c) According to the bureau of labor statistics, hospitals in
Washington have a nonfatal employee injury incidence rate that exceeds
the rate of construction, agriculture, manufacturing, and
transportation.
(d) The physical demands of the nursing profession lead many nurses
to leave the profession. Research shows that the annual prevalence
rate for nursing back injury is over forty percent and many nurses who
suffer a back injury do not return to nursing. Considering the present
nursing shortage in Washington, measures must be taken to protect
nurses from disabling injury.
(e) Between 1993 and 2001, self-insured hospitals have led the
state in compensable lost-time back injury claims and compensable
lost-time back, neck, and upper extremity claims with four thousand
three hundred fourteen and nine thousand seven hundred fifty-four,
respectively.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(b) "Hospital" means hospitals as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW and
state hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010.
(c) "Lift team" means hospital employees specially trained to
conduct patient lifts, transfers, and repositioning.
(d) "No manual lift policy" means hospital protocols to replace the
manual lifting, transferring, and repositioning of patients identified
by the process established in subsection (4)(c) of this section with
lift teams using mechanical lifting devices, engineering controls, and
equipment to accomplish these tasks.
(e) "Safe patient handling" means the use of engineering controls,
transfer aids, or assistive devices instead of manual lifting to
perform the acts of lifting, transferring, and repositioning healthcare
patients and residents.
(f) "Musculoskeletal disorders" means conditions that involve the
nerves, tendons, muscles, and supporting structures of the body.
(3) By December 1, 2006, each hospital must establish a safe
patient handling committee. At least half of the members of the safe
patient handling committee shall be frontline nonmanagerial employees
who provide direct care to patients involved in patient care handling
activities.
(4) By July 1, 2007, each hospital must establish a written patient
care activities program that addresses patient handling with input from
the safe patient handling committee to prevent musculoskeletal
disorders among health care workers and injuries to patients. As part
of this program, a hospital must:
(a) Implement a no manual lift policy for all shifts and units of
the hospital;
(b) Conduct a patient handling hazard assessment. This assessment
should consider such variables as patient-handling tasks, types of
nursing units, patient populations, and the physical environment of
patient care areas;
(c) Develop a process to identify the appropriate use of the no
manual lift policy based on the patient's physical and medical
condition. However, in limited circumstances applying the no manual
lift policy may be contraindicated for a particular patient. In such
cases hospitals must document the reasons for the exemption. Such
documents shall be retained by the hospital and made available for
review by the safe patient handling committee and the department; and
(d) Implement and conduct an annual performance evaluation of the
program to prevent musculoskeletal disorders to determine the program's
effectiveness according to the reduction of musculoskeletal disorder
claims and days of lost work for musculoskeletal disorder purposes and
make recommendations to increase the program's effectiveness.
(5) By July 1, 2008, each hospital must acquire needed equipment
and train staff on policies, equipment, and devices before
implementation and at least annually or as changes are made to the
patient care activities program or type or make of equipment being
used.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes lift team members from
performing other duties as assigned during their shift.
(7) A hospital employee who refuses a patient care activity due to
concerns about either employee or patient safety or the lack of trained
lift team personnel or equipment may not, based upon the refusal, be
the subject of disciplinary action by the hospital or hospital managers
or employees.

--- END ---