BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.60.025 and 2004 c 165 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A receiver may be appointed by the superior court of this state
in the following instances, but except in any case in which a
receiver's appointment is expressly required by statute, or any case in
which a receiver's appointment is sought by a state agent whose
authority to seek the appointment of a receiver is expressly conferred
by statute, or any case in which a receiver's appointment with respect
to real property is sought under (b)(ii) of this subsection, a receiver
shall be appointed only if the court additionally determines that the
appointment of a receiver is reasonably necessary and that other
available remedies either are not available or are inadequate:
(a) On application of any party, when the party is determined to
have a probable right to or interest in property that is a subject of
the action and in the possession of an adverse party, or when the
property or its revenue-producing potential is in danger of being lost
or materially injured or impaired. A receiver may be appointed under
this subsection (1)(a) whether or not the application for appointment
of a receiver is combined with, or is ancillary to, an action seeking
a money judgment or other relief;
(b) Provisionally, during the pendency of any action to foreclose
upon any lien against or for forfeiture of any interest in real or
personal property, or after notice of a trustee's sale has been given
under RCW 61.24.040, or after notice of forfeiture has been given under
RCW 61.30.040, on application of any person, when the interest in the
property that is the subject of foreclosure or forfeiture of the person
seeking the receiver's appointment is determined to be probable and
either:
(i) The property or its revenue-producing potential is in danger of
being lost or materially injured or impaired; or
(ii) The appointment of a receiver with respect to the real or
personal property that is the subject of the action, the notice of
trustee's sale or notice of forfeiture is provided for by agreement or
is reasonably necessary to effectuate or enforce an assignment of rents
or other revenues from the property;
(c) After judgment, in order to give effect to the judgment;
(d) To dispose of property according to provisions of a judgment
dealing with its disposition;
(e) To the extent that property is not exempt from execution, at
the instance of a judgment creditor either before or after the issuance
of any execution, to preserve or protect it, or prevent its transfer;
(f) If and to the extent that property is subject to execution to
satisfy a judgment, to preserve the property during the pendency of an
appeal, or when an execution has been returned unsatisfied, or when an
order requiring a judgment debtor to appear for proceedings
supplemental to judgment has been issued and the judgment debtor fails
to submit to examination as ordered;
(g) Upon an attachment of real or personal property when the
property attached is of a perishable nature or is otherwise in danger
of waste, impairment, or destruction, or where the abandoned property's
owner has absconded with, secreted, or abandoned the property, and it
is necessary to collect, conserve, manage, control, or protect it, or
to dispose of it promptly, or when the court determines that the nature
of the property or the exigency of the case otherwise provides cause
for the appointment of a receiver;
(h) In an action by a transferor of real or personal property to
avoid or rescind the transfer on the basis of fraud, or in an action to
subject property or a fund to the payment of a debt;
(i) In an action against any person who is not an individual if the
object of the action is the dissolution of that person, or if that
person has been dissolved, or if that person is insolvent or is not
generally paying the person's debts as those debts become due unless
they are the subject of bona fide dispute, or if that person is in
imminent danger of insolvency;
(j) In accordance with RCW 7.08.030 (4) and (6), in cases in which
a general assignment for the benefit of creditors has been made;
(k) In quo warranto proceedings under chapter 7.56 RCW;
(l) As provided under RCW 11.64.022;
(m) In an action by the department of licensing under RCW
18.35.220(3) with respect to persons engaged in the business of
dispensing of hearing aids, RCW 18.85.350 in the case of persons
engaged in the business of a real estate broker, associate real estate
broker, or real estate salesperson, or RCW 19.105.470 with respect to
persons engaged in the business of camping resorts;
(n) In an action under RCW 18.44.470 or 18.44.490 in the case of
persons engaged in the business of escrow agents;
(o) Upon a petition with respect to a nursing home in accordance
with and subject to receivership provisions under chapter 18.51 RCW;
(p) Under RCW 19.40.071(3), in connection with a proceeding for
relief with respect to a transfer fraudulent as to a creditor or
creditors;
(q) Under RCW 19.100.210(1), in an action by the attorney general
or director of financial institutions to restrain any actual or
threatened violation of the franchise investment protection act;
(r) In an action by the attorney general or by a prosecuting
attorney under RCW 19.110.160 with respect to a seller of business
opportunities;
(s) In an action by the director of financial institutions under
RCW 21.20.390 in cases involving actual or threatened violations of the
securities act of Washington or under RCW 21.30.120 in cases involving
actual or threatened violations of chapter 21.30 RCW with respect to
certain businesses and transactions involving commodities;
(t) In an action for or relating to dissolution of a business
corporation under section 10 of this act, RCW 23B.14.300, 23B.14.310,
or 23B.14.320, for dissolution of a nonprofit corporation under RCW
24.03.270, for dissolution of a mutual corporation under RCW 24.06.305,
or in any other action for the dissolution or winding up of any other
entity provided for by Title 23, 23B, 24, or 25 RCW;
(u) In any action in which the dissolution of any public or private
entity is sought, in any action involving any dispute with respect to
the ownership or governance of such an entity, or upon the application
of a person having an interest in such an entity when the appointment
is reasonably necessary to protect the property of the entity or its
business or other interests;
(v) Under RCW 25.05.215, in aid of a charging order with respect to
a partner's interest in a partnership;
(w) Under and subject to RCW 30.44.100, 30.44.270, and 30.56.030,
in the case of a bank or trust company or, under and subject to RCW
32.24.070 through 32.24.090, in the case of a mutual savings bank;
(x) Under and subject to RCW 31.12.637 and 31.12.671 through
31.12.724, in the case of credit unions;
(y) Upon the application of the director of financial institutions
under RCW 31.35.090 in actions to enforce chapter 31.35 RCW applicable
to agricultural lenders, under RCW 31.40.120 in actions to enforce
chapter 31.40 RCW applicable to entities engaged in federally
guaranteed small business loans, under RCW 31.45.160 in actions to
enforce chapter 31.45 RCW applicable to persons licensed as check
cashers or check sellers, or under RCW 19.230.230 in actions to enforce
chapter 19.230 RCW applicable to persons licensed under the uniform
money services act;
(z) Under RCW 35.82.090 or 35.82.180, with respect to a housing
project;
(aa) Under RCW 39.84.160 or 43.180.360, in proceedings to enforce
rights under any revenue bonds issued for the purpose of financing
industrial development facilities or bonds of the Washington state
housing finance commission, or any financing document securing any such
bonds;
(bb) Under and subject to RCW 43.70.195, in an action by the
secretary of health or by a local health officer with respect to a
public water system;
(cc) As contemplated by RCW 61.24.030, with respect to real
property that is the subject of nonjudicial foreclosure proceedings
under chapter 61.24 RCW;
(dd) As contemplated by RCW 61.30.030(3), with respect to real
property that is the subject of judicial or nonjudicial forfeiture
proceedings under chapter 61.30 RCW;
(ee) Under RCW 64.32.200(2), in an action to foreclose upon a lien
for common expenses against a dwelling unit subject to the horizontal
property regimes act, chapter 64.32 RCW;
(ff) Under RCW 64.34.364(10), in an action by a unit owners'
association to foreclose a lien for nonpayment of delinquent
assessments against condominium units;
(gg) Upon application of the attorney general under RCW
64.36.220(3), in aid of any writ or order restraining or enjoining
violations of chapter 64.36 RCW applicable to timeshares;
(hh) Under RCW 70.95A.050(3), in aid of the enforcement of payment
or performance of municipal bonds issued with respect to facilities
used to abate, control, or prevent pollution;
(ii) Upon the application of the department of social and health
services under RCW 74.42.580, in cases involving nursing homes;
(jj) Upon the application of the utilities and transportation
commission under RCW 80.28.040, with respect to a water company that
has failed to comply with an order of such commission within the time
deadline specified therein;
(kk) Under RCW 87.56.065, in connection with the dissolution of an
irrigation district;
(ll) Upon application of the attorney general or the department of
licensing, in any proceeding that either of them are authorized by
statute to bring to enforce Title 18 or 19 RCW; the securities act of
Washington, chapter 21.20 RCW; the Washington commodities act, chapter
21.30 RCW; the land development act, chapter 58.19 RCW; or under
chapter 64.36 RCW relating to the regulation of timeshares;
(mm) Upon application of the director of financial institutions in
any proceeding that the director of financial institutions is
authorized to bring to enforce chapters 31.35, 31.40, and 31.45 RCW; or
(nn) In such other cases as may be provided for by law, or when, in
the discretion of the court, it may be necessary to secure ample
justice to the parties.
(2) The superior courts of this state shall appoint as receiver of
property located in this state a person who has been appointed by a
federal or state court located elsewhere as receiver with respect to
the property specifically or with respect to the owner's property
generally, upon the application of the person or of any party to that
foreign proceeding, and following the appointment shall give effect to
orders, judgments, and decrees of the foreign court affecting the
property in this state held by the receiver, unless the court
determines that to do so would be manifestly unjust or inequitable.
The venue of such a proceeding may be any county in which the person
resides or maintains any office, or any county in which any property
over which the receiver is to be appointed is located at the time the
proceeding is commenced.
(3) At least seven days' notice of any application for the
appointment of a receiver shall be given to the owner of property to be
subject thereto and to all other parties in the action, and to other
parties in interest as the court may require. If any execution by a
judgment creditor under Title 6 RCW or any application by a judgment
creditor for the appointment of a receiver, with respect to property
over which the receiver's appointment is sought, is pending in any
other action at the time the application is made, then notice of the
application for the receiver's appointment also shall be given to the
judgment creditor in the other action. The court may shorten or expand
the period for notice of an application for the appointment of a
receiver upon good cause shown.
(4) The order appointing a receiver in all cases shall reasonably
describe the property over which the receiver is to take charge, by
category, individual items, or both if the receiver is to take charge
of less than all of the owner's property. If the order appointing a
receiver does not expressly limit the receiver's authority to
designated property or categories of property of the owner, the
receiver is a general receiver with the authority to take charge over
all of the owner's property, wherever located.
(5) The court may condition the appointment of a receiver upon the
giving of security by the person seeking the receiver's appointment, in
such amount as the court may specify, for the payment of costs and
damages incurred or suffered by any person should it later be
determined that the appointment of the receiver was wrongfully
obtained.

Sec. 2 RCW 23B.06.400 and 1990 c 178 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A board of directors may authorize and the corporation may make
distributions to its shareholders subject to restriction by the
articles of incorporation and the limitation in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) No distribution may be made if, after giving it effect:
(a) The corporation would not be able to pay its ((debts))
liabilities as they become due in the usual course of business; or
(b) The corporation's total assets would be less than the sum of
its total liabilities plus, unless the articles of incorporation permit
otherwise, the amount that would be needed, if the corporation were to
be dissolved at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the
preferential rights upon dissolution of shareholders whose preferential
rights are superior to those receiving the distribution.
(3) For purposes of determinations under subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) The board of directors may base a determination that a
distribution is not prohibited under subsection (2) of this section
either on financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting
practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances or on
a fair valuation or other method that is reasonable in the
circumstances; and
(b) Indebtedness of a corporation, including indebtedness issued as
a distribution, is not considered a liability if its terms provide that
payment of principal and interest are made only if and to the extent
that payment of a distribution to shareholders could then be made under
this section.
(4) The effect of a distribution under subsection (2) of this
section is measured:
(a) In the case of a distribution of indebtedness, the terms of
which provide that payment of principal and interest are made only if
and to the extent that payment of a distribution to shareholders could
then be made under this section, each payment of principal or interest
is treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the
date the payment is actually made; or
(b) In the case of any other distribution:
(i) If the distribution is by purchase, redemption, or other
acquisition of the corporation's shares, the effect of the distribution
is measured as of the earlier of the date any money or other property
is transferred or debt incurred by the corporation, or the date the
shareholder ceases to be a shareholder with respect to the acquired
shares;
(ii) If the distribution is of indebtedness other than that
described in subsection (4) (a) and (b)(i) of this section, the effect
of the distribution is measured as of the date the indebtedness is
distributed; and
(iii) In all other cases, the effect of the distribution is
measured as of the date the distribution is authorized if payment
occurs within one hundred twenty days after the date of authorization,
or the date the payment is made if it occurs more than one hundred
twenty days after the date of authorization.
(5) A corporation's indebtedness to a shareholder incurred by
reason of a distribution made in accordance with this section is at
parity with the corporation's indebtedness to its general, unsecured
creditors except to the extent provided otherwise by agreement.
(6) In circumstances to which this section and related sections of
this title are applicable, such provisions supersede the applicability
of any other statutes of this state with respect to the legality of
distributions.
(7) A transfer of the assets of a dissolved corporation to a trust
or other successor entity of the type described in RCW 23B.14.030(4)
constitutes a distribution subject to subsection (2) of this section
only when and to the extent that the trust or successor entity
distributes assets to shareholders.

Sec. 3 RCW 23B.08.310 and 1989 c 165 s 98 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A director who votes for or assents to a distribution made in
violation of RCW 23B.06.400 or the articles of incorporation is
personally liable to the corporation for the amount of the distribution
that exceeds ((what)) the amount that could have been distributed
without violating RCW 23B.06.400 or the articles of incorporation if it
is established that the director did not perform the director's duties
in compliance with RCW 23B.08.300. In any proceeding commenced under
this section, a director has all of the defenses ordinarily available
to a director.
(2) A director held liable under subsection (1) of this section for
an unlawful distribution is entitled to contribution:
(a) From every other director who could be held liable under
subsection (1) of this section for the unlawful distribution; and
(b) From each shareholder for the amount the shareholder accepted
knowing the distribution was made in violation of RCW 23B.06.400 or the
articles of incorporation.
(3) A shareholder who accepts a distribution made in violation of
RCW 23B.06.400 or the articles of incorporation is personally liable to
the corporation for the amount of any distribution received by the
shareholder to the extent it exceeds the amount that could have been
distributed to the shareholder without violating RCW 23B.06.400 or the
articles of incorporation, if it is established that the shareholder
accepted the distribution knowing that it was made in violation of RCW
23B.06.400 or the articles of incorporation.
(4) A shareholder held liable under subsection (3) of this section
for an unlawful distribution is entitled to contribution from every
other shareholder who could be held liable under subsection (3) of this
section for the unlawful distribution.
(5) A proceeding under this section is barred unless it is
commenced ((within)) prior to the earlier of (a) the expiration of two
years after the date on which the effect of the distribution was
measured under RCW 23B.06.400(4), or (b) the expiration of the survival
period specified in RCW 23B.14.340.

Sec. 4 RCW 23B.12.010 and 1990 c 178 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A corporation may on the terms and conditions and for the
consideration determined by the board of directors:
(a) Sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or
substantially all, of its property in the usual ((and regular)) course
of business; or
(b) Mortgage, pledge, dedicate to the repayment of indebtedness,
whether with or without recourse, or otherwise encumber any or all of
its property whether or not any of these actions are in the usual ((and
regular)) course of business.
(2) Unless the articles of incorporation require it, approval by
the shareholders of a transaction described in subsection (1) of this
section is not required.
(3) A dedication of a corporation's assets to the repayment of its
creditors may be effected by the board of directors through an
assignment for the benefit of creditors in accordance with chapter 7.08
RCW or by obtaining the appointment of a general receiver in accordance
with chapter 7.60 RCW, and the assumption of control over the
corporation's assets by an assignee for the benefit of creditors or by
a general receiver relieves the directors of any further duties with
respect to the liquidation of the corporation's assets or the
application of any assets or proceeds toward satisfaction of the claims
of creditors.

Sec. 5 RCW 23B.14.010 and 1989 c 165 s 154 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A majority of the initial directors, or, if initial directors
were not named in the articles of incorporation and have not been
elected, a majority of the incorporators, of a corporation that
((either)) has not issued shares ((or has not commenced business)) may
((dissolve)) authorize dissolution of the corporation ((by delivering
to the secretary of state for filing:
(1) A copy of a revenue clearance certificate issued pursuant to
RCW 82.32.260; and
(2) Articles of dissolution that set forth:
(a) The name of the corporation;
(b) The date of its incorporation;
(c) Either (i) that none of the corporation's shares have been
issued or (ii) that the corporation has not commenced business;
(d) That no debt of the corporation remains unpaid;
(e) That the net assets of the corporation remaining after winding
up have been distributed to the shareholders, if shares were issued;
and
(f) That a majority of the initial directors authorized the
dissolution, or that initial directors were not named in the articles
of incorporation and have not been elected and a majority of
incorporators authorized the dissolution)).
(2) Unless prohibited by the articles of incorporation, a majority
of the board of directors may authorize dissolution of the corporation
without approval by the shareholders, upon a finding by the board of
directors that:
(a) The corporation is not able to pay its liabilities as they
become due in the usual course of business, or the corporation's assets
are less than the sum of its total liabilities; and
(b) Ten or more days have elapsed since the corporation gave notice
to all shareholders, whether or not they would otherwise be entitled to
vote under RCW 23B.14.020, of the intent of the board of directors to
authorize dissolution under this subsection.

Sec. 6 RCW 23B.14.020 and 2003 c 35 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A corporation's board of directors may propose dissolution for
submission to the shareholders.
(2) For a proposal to dissolve to be adopted:
(a) The board of directors must recommend dissolution to the
shareholders unless the board of directors determines that because of
conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should make no
recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the
shareholders; and
(b) The shareholders entitled to vote must approve the proposal to
dissolve as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(3) The board of directors may condition its submission of the
proposal for dissolution on any basis, including the affirmative vote
of holders of a specified percentage of shares held by any group of
shareholders not otherwise entitled under this title or the articles of
incorporation to vote as a separate voting group on the proposed
dissolution.
(4) The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not
entitled to vote, of the proposed dissolution either (a) by giving
notice of a shareholders' meeting in accordance with RCW 23B.07.050((.
The notice must also state)) and stating that the purpose((,)) or one
of the purposes((,)) of the meeting is to consider dissolving the
corporation, or (b) in accordance with the requirements of RCW
23B.07.040 for taking action on the proposal without a meeting.
(5) In addition to any other voting conditions imposed by the board
of directors under subsection (3) of this section, the proposal to
dissolve must be approved by two-thirds of the voting group comprising
all the votes entitled to be cast on the proposal, and of each other
voting group entitled under the articles of incorporation to vote
separately on the proposal. The articles of incorporation may require
a greater or lesser vote than provided in this subsection, or a greater
or lesser vote by any separate voting groups provided for in the
articles of incorporation, so long as the required vote is not less
than a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the proposal
and of each other voting group entitled to vote separately on the
proposal.

Sec. 7 RCW 23B.14.030 and 1989 c 165 s 156 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) At any time after dissolution is authorized under RCW
23B.14.010 or 23B.14.020, the corporation may dissolve by delivering to
the secretary of state for filing:
(a) A copy of a revenue clearance certificate issued pursuant to
RCW 82.32.260; and
(b) Articles of dissolution setting forth:
(i) The name of the corporation;
(ii) The date dissolution was authorized; and
(iii) ((If shareholder approval was required for dissolution,)) A
statement that dissolution was duly authorized by the initial
directors, the incorporators, or the board of directors in accordance
with RCW 23B.14.010, or was duly proposed by the board of directors and
approved by the shareholders in accordance with RCW 23B.14.020.
(2) A corporation is dissolved upon the effective date of its
articles of dissolution.
(3) A dissolved corporation shall, within thirty days after the
effective date of its articles of dissolution, publish notice of its
dissolution and request that persons with claims against the dissolved
corporation present them in accordance with the notice. The notice
must be published once a week for three consecutive weeks in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county where the dissolved
corporation's principal office (or, if none in this state, its
registered office) is or was last located. The notice must also
describe the information that must be included in a claim, provide a
mailing address where a claim may be sent, and state that claims
against the dissolved corporation may be barred in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter if not timely asserted. A dissolved
corporation's failure to publish notice in accordance with this
subsection does not affect the validity or the effective date of its
dissolution.
(4) For purposes of this chapter, "dissolved corporation" means a
corporation whose dissolution has been authorized in accordance with
RCW 23B.14.010 or 23B.14.020 and whose articles of dissolution have
become effective, and includes any trust or other successor entity to
which the remaining assets of such a corporation are transferred
subject to its liabilities for purposes of liquidation in accordance
with RCW 23B.14.050.

Sec. 8 RCW 23B.14.050 and 1989 c 165 s 158 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A dissolved corporation continues its corporate existence but
may not carry on any business except that appropriate to wind up and
liquidate its business and affairs, including:
(a) Collecting its assets;
(b) Disposing of its properties that will be applied toward
satisfaction or making reasonable provision for satisfaction of its
liabilities or will otherwise not be distributed in kind to its
shareholders, but in any case subject to applicable liens and security
interests as well as any applicable contractual restrictions on the
disposition of its properties;
(c) ((Discharging)) Satisfying or making reasonable provision for
((discharging)) satisfying its liabilities, in accordance with their
priorities as established by law, and on a pro rata basis within each
class of liabilities;
(d) Subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 23B.06.400,
distributing its remaining property among its shareholders according to
their interests; and
(e) Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its
business and affairs.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, dissolution of a
corporation does not:
(a) Transfer title to the corporation's property;
(b) Prevent transfer of its shares or securities, although the
authorization to dissolve may provide for closing the corporation's
share transfer records;
(c) Subject its directors or officers to standards of conduct
different from those prescribed in chapter 23B.08 RCW;
(d) Change quorum or voting requirements for its board of directors
or shareholders; change provisions for selection, resignation, or
removal of its directors or officers or both; or change provisions for
amending its bylaws;
(e) Prevent commencement of a proceeding by or against the
corporation in its corporate name;
(f) Abate or suspend a proceeding pending by or against the
corporation on the effective date of dissolution; or
(g) Terminate the authority of the registered agent of the
corporation.
(3) A dissolved corporation's board of directors may make a
determination that reasonable provision for the satisfaction of any
liability, whether arising in tort or by contract, statute, or
otherwise, and whether matured or unmatured, contingent, or
conditional, has been made by means of a purchase of insurance
coverage, provision of security therefor, contractual assumption
thereof by a solvent person, or any other means, that the board of
directors determines is reasonably calculated to provide for
satisfaction of the reasonably estimated amount of such liability.
Upon making such a determination, the board of directors shall, for
purposes of determining whether a subsequent distribution to
shareholders is prohibited under RCW 23B.06.400(2), be entitled to
treat such liability as fully satisfied by the assets used or committed
in order to make such provision. In making determinations under RCW
23B.06.400(2), the board of directors of a dissolved corporation may
also disregard, and make no provision for the satisfaction of, any
liabilities that are barred in accordance with RCW 23B.14.060(2), or
that may exceed any provision for their satisfaction ordered by a
superior court pursuant to section 10 of this act, or that the board of
directors does not consider, based on the facts known to it, reasonably
likely to arise prior to expiration of the survival period specified in
RCW 23B.14.340.
(4) The board of directors of a dissolved corporation may at any
time petition to have the dissolution continued under court supervision
in accordance with RCW 23B.14.300, or, upon a finding that the
corporation is not able to pay its liabilities as they become due in
the usual course of business or that its assets are less than the sum
of its total liabilities, may dedicate the corporation's assets to the
repayment of its creditors by making an assignment for the benefit of
creditors in accordance with chapter 7.08 RCW or obtaining the
appointment of a general receiver in accordance with chapter 7.60 RCW.
The assumption of control over the corporation's assets by a court, an
assignee for the benefit of creditors, or a general receiver relieves
the directors of any further duties with respect to the liquidation of
the corporation's assets or the application of any assets or proceeds
toward satisfaction of its liabilities.
(5) Actions and decisions to be taken by a corporation that has
been dissolved under RCW 23B.14.030 or 23B.14.210, which are within the
scope of activities permitted in this chapter, may be taken by the
corporation's board of directors and, if required, by its shareholders,
membership in both groups determined as of the effective date of the
dissolution. If vacancies in the board of directors occur after the
effective date of dissolution, the shareholders, or the remaining
directors, even if less than a quorum of the board, may fill the
vacancies. A special meeting of the shareholders for purposes of
authorizing any action required or permitted to be authorized by
shareholders, or for purposes of electing directors, may be called by
any person who was an officer, director, or shareholder of the
corporation at the effective date of the dissolution.

Sec. 9 RCW 23B.14.060 and 1989 c 165 s 159 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A dissolved corporation that has published notice of its
dissolution in accordance with RCW 23B.14.030(3) may dispose of any or
all of the known claims against it by ((following the procedure
described in this section.
(2) The dissolved corporation shall notify its known claimants in
writing of the dissolution)) giving written notice of its dissolution
to the holders of the known claims at any time after ((its)) the
effective date of dissolution. The written notice of dissolution must:
(a) ((Describe information that must be included in a claim))
Provide, for each known claim of the holder to whom the notice is
addressed that is sought to be disposed of under this section, either
(i) a general description of the known facts specified in subsection
(3)(b)(i) or (ii) of this section relating to a matured and legally
assertable claim or liability, or (ii) an identification of the
executory contract with respect to which unmatured, conditional, or
contingent claims or liabilities are sought to be disposed of under
this section;
(b) Provide a mailing address where a notice of claim may be sent;
(c) State the deadline, which may not be fewer than one hundred
twenty days from the effective date of the written notice of
dissolution, by which a written notice of claim must be delivered to
the dissolved corporation ((must receive the claim)); ((and))
(d) State that the known claim will be barred if a written notice
of claim describing the known claim with reasonable particularity is
not ((received)) delivered to the dissolved corporation by the
deadline; and
(e) State that the known claim or any executory contract on which
the known claim is based may be rejected by the dissolved corporation,
in which case the holder of the known claim will have a limited period
of ninety days from the effective date of the rejection notice in which
to commence a proceeding to enforce the known claim.
(((3))) (2) A known claim against the dissolved corporation is
barred:
(a) If ((a claimant)) the holder of the known claim who was given
written notice of dissolution under subsection (((2))) (1) of this
section does not deliver the written notice of claim to the dissolved
corporation by the deadline; or
(b) If a ((claimant whose)) holder of a known claim that was
rejected by the dissolved corporation does not commence a proceeding to
enforce the known claim within ninety days from the effective date of
the rejection notice.
(((4) For purposes of this section, "claim" does not include a
contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the
effective date of dissolution.))
(3) For purposes of this section, "known claim" means any claim or
liability:
(a) That either: (i) Has matured sufficiently, before or after the
effective date of the dissolution, to be legally capable of assertion
against the dissolved corporation, whether or not the amount of the
claim or liability is known or determinable; or (ii) is unmatured,
conditional, or otherwise contingent but may subsequently arise under
any executory contract to which the dissolved corporation is a party,
other than under an implied or statutory warranty as to any product
manufactured, sold, distributed, or handled by the dissolved
corporation; and
(b) As to which the dissolved corporation has knowledge of the
identity and the mailing address of the holder of the claim or
liability and, in the case of a matured and legally assertable claim or
liability, actual knowledge of existing facts that either (i) could be
asserted to give rise to, or (ii) indicate an intention by the holder
to assert, such a matured claim or liability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 23B.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A dissolved corporation that has published notice of its
dissolution in accordance with RCW 23B.14.030(3) may file an
application, with the superior court of the county where its principal
office or, if none in this state, its registered office is located, for
a determination of:
(a) The amount and form of reasonable provision to be made for the
satisfaction of any one or more claims or liabilities, known or
unknown, arising in tort or by contract, statute or otherwise, matured
or unmatured, contingent or conditional, that have arisen or are
reasonably likely to arise prior to expiration of the survival period
specified in RCW 23B.14.340; or
(b) Whether the provision made or proposed to be made by the board
of directors for the satisfaction of any one or more claims or
liabilities is reasonable.
Any determination under this subsection is conclusive for purposes
of determining the legality of any subsequent distributions under RCW
23B.06.400 and 23B.14.050(3).
(2) Within ten days after filing the application, the dissolved
corporation shall give written notice of the judicial proceeding to
each person to whom written notice has been given pursuant to RCW
23B.14.060 and each other person whose claim or potential claim,
identity, and mailing address are known to the dissolved corporation.
However, written notice of the judicial proceeding need not be given to
any person whose claim or potential claim is not sought to be
determined under the application filed by the dissolved corporation.
(3) The superior court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent
all persons whose claims or potential claims are sought to be
determined in the judicial proceeding but whose identities or mailing
addresses are not known to the dissolved corporation. The reasonable
fees and expenses of the guardian, including all reasonable expert
witness fees, shall be paid by the dissolved corporation.
(4) Provision by the dissolved corporation for satisfaction of
claims or potential claims in the amount and form ordered by the
superior court shall satisfy the dissolved corporation's obligations
with respect to those claims or potential claims, and any further or
greater claims based on the same facts, dealings, or contract shall be
barred.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 23B.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The holder of an unpaid claim against a dissolved corporation
that is not barred under RCW 23B.14.060(2) or section 10(4) of this act
or by expiration of the survival period specified in RCW 23B.14.340
may, within the statute of limitations applicable to the claim,
commence a proceeding against the dissolved corporation to collect the
amount of the claim from any remaining undistributed assets of the
corporation. If the undistributed assets of the corporation are not or
may not be sufficient to satisfy the amount of the unpaid claim, and
there have been distributions to shareholders as to which the
limitations period specified in RCW 23B.08.310(5) has not expired at
the time the proceeding is commenced, the holder of the unpaid claim
may include as a part of the relief claimed against the dissolved
corporation a petition to compel the dissolved corporation to collect
any amounts owing to it by directors or shareholders under RCW
23B.08.310 and to apply the collections toward payment of the claim.
The filing of such a petition to compel the corporation to collect
unlawfully distributed amounts from directors or shareholders tolls the
limitations periods specified in RCW 23B.08.310(5) and 23B.14.340 with
respect to the unpaid claim, as to directors and shareholders who may
be liable under RCW 23B.08.310. If the dissolved corporation fails,
within a reasonable period of time after the filing of such a petition
to compel it to collect amounts owing under RCW 23B.08.310, to join
those directors and shareholders who may be liable for the amounts, the
holder of the unpaid claim may join those directors and shareholders as
additional defendants in the proceeding. The holder of the unpaid
claim may also join all directors and shareholders who may be liable
under RCW 23B.08.310 as additional defendants in the proceeding, at any
time upon establishing to the satisfaction of the court that any of
such shareholders, with intent to delay or defraud or place property
beyond the reach of the corporation's creditors, has removed or is
about to remove from this state, or has assigned, secreted, or disposed
of, or is about to assign, secrete, or dispose of, any of the property
distributed by the corporation as to which the shareholder may be
liable under RCW 23B.08.310(3). Except as permitted by this section,
the holder of the unpaid claim may not, by means of any proceeding or
otherwise, seek to enforce the claim directly against any of the
dissolved corporation's officers or directors in those capacities, or
against any of its shareholders on account of their receipt of
distributions after the effective date of dissolution.
(2) Claims against a dissolved corporation that are barred under
RCW 23B.14.060(2) or section 10(4) of this act or by expiration of the
survival period specified in RCW 23B.14.340 may not be enforced against
the dissolved corporation, any of its officers or directors in those
capacities, or any of its shareholders on account of their receipt of
distributions after the effective date of dissolution.

Sec. 12 RCW 23B.14.210 and 1989 c 165 s 161 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the secretary of state determines that one or more grounds
exist under RCW 23B.14.200 or 23B.14.203 for dissolving a corporation,
the secretary of state shall give the corporation written notice of the
determination by first-class mail, postage prepaid.
(2) If the corporation does not correct each ground for dissolution
or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state
that each ground determined by the secretary of state does not exist
within sixty days after notice is effective, the secretary of state
shall administratively dissolve the corporation and give the
corporation written notice of the dissolution that recites the ground
or grounds therefor and its effective date.
(3) A corporation administratively dissolved continues its
corporate existence but may not carry on any business except that
necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs ((under))
in a manner consistent with RCW 23B.14.050 ((and notify claimants under
RCW 23B.14.060)).
(4) The administrative dissolution of a corporation does not
terminate the authority of its registered agent.

Sec. 13 RCW 23B.14.220 and 1995 c 47 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A corporation administratively dissolved under RCW 23B.14.210
may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement within five years
after the effective date of dissolution. The application must:
(a) Recite the name of the corporation and the effective date of
its administrative dissolution;
(b) State that the ground or grounds for dissolution either did not
exist or have been eliminated; and
(c) State that the corporation's name satisfies the requirements of
RCW 23B.04.010.
(2) If the secretary of state determines that the application
contains the information required by subsection (1) of this section and
that the name is available, the secretary of state shall reinstate the
corporation and give the corporation written notice of the
reinstatement that recites the effective date of reinstatement. If the
name is not available, the corporation must file articles of amendment
changing its name with its application for reinstatement.
(3) When the reinstatement is effective, it relates back to and
takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution
and the corporation resumes carrying on its business as if the
administrative dissolution had never occurred.
(((4) The application must be authorized either by action of the
shareholders, or of the corporation's board of directors, membership in
both groups determined as of the date of administrative dissolution.
If vacancies in the board of directors occur after the date of
dissolution, the shareholders, or the remaining directors, even if less
than a quorum of the board, may fill the vacancies. A special meeting
of the shareholders for purposes of authorizing the application for
reinstatement, or for purposes of electing directors, may be called by
any person who was an officer, director, or shareholder of the
corporation at the time of administrative dissolution.))

Sec. 14 RCW 23B.14.300 and 1995 c 47 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The superior courts may dissolve a corporation:
(1) In a proceeding by the attorney general if it is established
that:
(a) The corporation obtained its articles of incorporation through
fraud; or
(b) The corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority
conferred upon it by law;
(2) In a proceeding by a shareholder if it is established that:
(a) The directors are deadlocked in the management of the corporate
affairs, the shareholders are unable to break the deadlock, and
irreparable injury to the corporation is threatened or being suffered,
or the business and affairs of the corporation can no longer be
conducted to the advantage of the shareholders generally, because of
the deadlock;
(b) The directors or those in control of the corporation have
acted, are acting, or will act in a manner that is illegal, oppressive,
or fraudulent;
(c) The shareholders are deadlocked in voting power and have
failed, for a period that includes at least two consecutive annual
meeting dates, to elect successors to directors whose terms have
expired, and irreparable injury to the corporation is threatened or
being suffered, or the business and affairs of the corporation can no
longer be conducted to the advantage of the shareholders generally,
because of the deadlock;
(d) The corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted; or
(e) The corporation has ceased all business activity and has
failed, within a reasonable time, to dissolve, to liquidate its assets,
or to distribute its remaining assets among its shareholders;
(3) In a proceeding by a creditor if it is established that:
(a) The creditor's claim has been reduced to judgment, the
execution on the judgment was returned unsatisfied, and the corporation
is ((insolvent)) not able to pay its liabilities as they become due in
the usual course of business or its assets are less than the sum of its
total liabilities; or
(b) The corporation has admitted in writing that the creditor's
claim is due and owing and the corporation is ((insolvent; or)) not
able to pay its liabilities as they become due in the usual course of
business or its assets are less than the sum of its total liabilities.
(((4))) The superior courts may also assume control over a
dissolved corporation's assets and the process for winding up and
liquidating its business and affairs, in a proceeding instituted by the
dissolved corporation to have its voluntary dissolution continued under
court supervision.

Sec. 15 RCW 23B.14.310 and 1989 c 165 s 164 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Venue for any proceeding to dissolve a corporation or to
supervise a voluntary dissolution brought by any party named in RCW
23B.14.300 lies in the county where a corporation's registered office
is or was last located.
(2) It is not necessary to make shareholders or directors parties
to a proceeding to dissolve a corporation or to supervise a voluntary
dissolution unless relief is sought against them individually.
(3) A court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation or to
supervise a voluntary dissolution may issue injunctions, appoint a
general or custodial receiver ((or custodian pendente lite)) with all
powers and duties the court directs, and take other action required to
preserve the corporate assets wherever located((, and)). A court in a
proceeding brought to dissolve a corporation may also carry on the
business of the corporation until a full hearing can be held.

Sec. 16 RCW 23B.14.320 and 2004 c 165 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) A court in a judicial proceeding brought ((to dissolve a
corporation)) under RCW 23B.14.300 may appoint one or more general
receivers to wind up and liquidate((, or one or more custodians to
manage,)) the business and affairs of the corporation, or, if the
corporation is not yet dissolved, may appoint one or more custodial
receivers to manage its business and affairs. The court shall hold a
hearing, after notifying all parties to the proceeding and any
interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a general
or custodial receiver ((or custodian)). The hearing, and any resulting
receivership, shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 7.60 RCW.
(((2) The court may appoint an individual or a domestic or foreign
corporation, authorized to transact business in this state, as a
receiver or custodian. The court may require the receiver or custodian
to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.
(3) The receiver or custodian may exercise all of the powers of the
corporation, through or in place of its board of directors or officers,
to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the corporation in the
best interests of its shareholders and creditors.
(4) The court, during a receivership, may redesignate the receiver
a custodian, and during a custodianship may redesignate the custodian
a receiver, if doing so is in the best interests of the corporation,
its shareholders, and creditors.
(5) The court from time to time during the receivership or
custodianship may order compensation paid and expense disbursements or
reimbursements made to the receiver or custodian and counsel from the
assets of the corporation or proceeds from the sale of the assets.))

Sec. 17 RCW 23B.14.340 and 1995 c 47 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The dissolution of a corporation either((:)) (1) by the filing
((by)) with the secretary of state of its articles of dissolution, (2)
by administrative dissolution by the secretary of state, (3) by a
decree of court, or (4) by expiration of its period of duration shall
not take away or impair any remedy available against such corporation,
its directors, officers, or shareholders, for any right or claim
existing, or any liability incurred, prior to such dissolution ((if))
or arising thereafter, unless action or other proceeding thereon is not
commenced within two years after the effective date of ((such)) any
dissolution that was effective prior to the effective date of this
section or within three years after the effective date of any
dissolution that is effective on or after the effective date of this
section. Any such action or proceeding against the corporation may be
defended by the corporation in its corporate name.

Sec. 18 RCW 23B.14.400 and 1989 c 165 s 168 are each amended to
read as follows:
Following its dissolution, the assets of a ((dissolved))
corporation that should be transferred to a creditor, claimant, or
shareholder of the corporation who cannot be found or who is not
competent to receive them may be reduced to cash and deposited with the
state treasurer for safekeeping. If assets are transferred to the
state treasurer, and if the creditor, claimant, or shareholder
furnishes satisfactory proof of entitlement to the amount deposited,
the state treasurer or other appropriate state official shall pay such
person or such person's representative that amount.

--- END ---