BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.104A.040 and 2002 c 345 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(a)(1) In this section, "beneficiary" means a person who has an
interest in the trust to be converted and who has the legal capacity to
act in his, her, or its own right with respect to all actions that such
person may take under this section.
(2) In this section, "unitrust" means both a trust converted into
a unitrust under this section and a trust initially established as a
unitrust. Unless inconsistent with the terms of the trust or will,
subsections (f), (g), (h), (i), and (m) of this section apply to the
unitrust initially so established.
(b) Unless expressly prohibited by the terms of the trust, a
trustee may release the power to make adjustments under RCW 11.104A.020
and convert a trust into a unitrust as described in this section if all
of the following apply:
(1) The trustee determines that the conversion will enable the
trustee better to carry out the intent of the settlor or testator and
the purposes of the trust.
(2) The trustee gives written notice of the trustee's intention to
release the power to adjust and to convert the trust into a unitrust
and of how the unitrust will operate, including what initial decisions
the trustee will make under this section, to ((all beneficiaries)) each
beneficiary who, on the date the notice is given:
(i) ((Who are currently eligible to receive income from the trust))
Is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or
principal; or
(ii) ((Who would receive, if no powers of appointment were
exercised, a distribution of principal if the trust were to terminate
immediately before the notice is given)) Would be a distributee or
permissible distributee of trust principal if the interests of the
distributees described in (2)(i) of this subsection terminated and the
trust then terminated immediately before the notice was given and if no
powers of appointment were exercised.
(3) There is at least one beneficiary under (2)(i) of this
subsection and at least one other person who is a beneficiary under
(2)(ii) of this subsection.
(4) No beneficiary objects to the conversion to a unitrust in a
writing delivered to the trustee within sixty days after the notice is
given under (2) of this subsection.
(c) The parties, as defined by RCW 11.96A.030(4), may agree to
convert a trust to or from a unitrust by means of a binding agreement
under chapter 11.96A RCW.
(d)(1) The trustee may petition the court under chapter 11.96A RCW
to order a conversion to a unitrust if either of the following apply:
(i) A party, as defined by RCW 11.96A.030(4), timely objects to the
conversion to a unitrust; or
(ii) There are no beneficiaries under (2)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection.
(2) A party, as defined by RCW 11.96A.030(4), may request a trustee
to convert to a unitrust. If the trustee does not convert, the party,
as defined by RCW 11.96A.030(4), may petition the court to order the
conversion.
(3) The court shall approve the conversion or direct the requested
conversion if the court concludes that the conversion will enable the
trustee to better carry out the intent of the settlor or testator and
the purposes of the trust.
(e) In deciding whether to exercise a power to convert to a
unitrust under this section, a trustee may consider, among other
things, the factors set forth in RCW 11.104A.020(b).
(f) After a trust is converted to a unitrust, all of the following
apply:
(1) The trustee shall follow an investment policy seeking a total
return for the investments held by the trust, whether the return is to
be derived:
(i) From appreciation of principal;
(ii) From earnings and distributions from principal; or
(iii) From both.
(2) The trustee shall make regular distributions in accordance with
the terms of the trust, or the terms of the will, as the case may be,
construed in accordance with the provisions of this section.
(3) Unless expressly prohibited by the terms of the trust, the term
"income" in the terms of a trust or a will means an annual
distribution, the "unitrust distribution," equal to the percentage, the
"payout percentage," that is no less than three percent and no more
than five percent and that the trustee may determine in the trustee's
discretion from time to time, or, if the trustee makes no
determination, that shall be four percent((, the "payout percentage,"))
of the net fair market value of the trust's assets, whether such assets
would be considered income or principal under other provisions of this
chapter, averaged over the lesser of:
(i) The three preceding years; or
(ii) The period during which the trust has been in existence.
(g) The trustee may in the trustee's discretion from time to time
determine all of the following:
(1) The effective date of a conversion to a unitrust.
(2) The provisions for prorating a unitrust distribution for a
short year in which a beneficiary's right to payments commences or
ceases.
(3) The frequency of unitrust distributions during the year.
(4) The effect of other payments from or contributions to the trust
on the trust's valuation.
(5) Whether to value the trust's assets annually or more
frequently.
(6) What valuation dates to use.
(7) How frequently to value nonliquid assets and whether to
estimate their value.
(8) Whether to omit from the calculations trust property occupied
or possessed by a beneficiary.
(9) Any other matters necessary for the proper functioning of the
unitrust.
(h)(1) Expenses which would be deducted from income if the trust
were not a unitrust may not be deducted from the unitrust distribution.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by the terms of the trust, the
unitrust distribution shall be paid from net income, as such term would
be determined if the trust were not a unitrust. To the extent net
income is insufficient, the unitrust distribution shall be paid from
net realized short-term capital gains. To the extent net income and
net realized short-term capital gains are insufficient, the unitrust
distribution shall be paid from net realized long-term capital gains.
To the extent net income and net realized short-term and long-term
capital gains are insufficient, the unitrust distribution shall be paid
from the principal of the trust.
(3) To the extent necessary to cause gains from the sale or
exchange of unitrust assets to be treated as income under any federal,
state, or local income tax (for example, section 643 of the Internal
Revenue Code and its regulations, including Treasury Regulation §
1.643(b)-1, as amended or renumbered), the trustee has the
discretionary power to allocate the gains to income, so long as the
power is reasonably and impartially exercised.
(i) The trustee or, if the trustee declines to do so, a beneficiary
may petition the court:
(1) To ((select a)) change the payout percentage ((different than
four percent)).
(2) To provide for a distribution of net income, as would be
determined if the trust were not a unitrust, in excess of the unitrust
distribution if such distribution is necessary to preserve a tax
benefit.
(3) To average the valuation of the trust's net assets over a
period other than three years.
(4) To reconvert from a unitrust.
(j) Upon a reconversion, the power to adjust under RCW 11.104A.020
is revived.
(k) A conversion to a unitrust does not affect a provision in the
terms of a trust directing or authorizing the trustee to distribute
principal or authorizing a beneficiary to withdraw a portion or all of
the principal.
(l) A trustee may not possess or exercise any power under this
section in any of the following circumstances:
(1) The unitrust distribution would be made from any amount that is
permanently set aside for charitable purposes under the terms of a
trust and for which a charitable deduction from a federal gift or
estate tax has been taken unless both income and principal are so set
aside.
(2) The possession or exercise of the power would cause an
individual to be treated as the owner of all or part of the trust for
federal income tax purposes and the individual would not be treated as
the owner if the trustee did not possess or exercise the power.
(3) The possession or exercise of the power would cause all or any
part of the trust estate to be subject to any federal gift or estate
tax with respect to the individual and the trust estate would not be
subject to such taxation if the trustee did not possess or exercise the
power.
(4) The possession or exercise of the power would result in the
disallowance of a federal gift or estate tax marital deduction which
would be allowed if the trustee did not have the power.
(5) The trustee is a beneficiary of the trust.
(m) If subsection (l)(2), (3), or (5) of this section applies to a
trustee and there is more than one trustee or an additional trustee who
is appointed by a court order, a binding agreement, or otherwise under
chapter 11.96A RCW, a cotrustee to whom subsection (l)(2), (3), or (5)
of this section does not apply may possess and exercise the power
unless the possession or exercise of the power by the remaining trustee
or trustees is not permitted by the terms of the trust. If subsection
(l)(2), (3), or (5) of this section restricts all trustees from
possessing or exercising a power under this section, the trustee may
petition a court under chapter 11.96A RCW for the court to effect the
intended conversion or action.
(n) A trustee may release any power conferred by this section if
any of the following applies:
(1) The trustee is uncertain about whether possessing or exercising
the power will cause a result described in subsection (l)(2), (3), or
(4) of this section.
(2) The trustee determines that possessing or exercising the power
will or may deprive the trust of a tax benefit or impose a tax burden
not described in subsection (l) of this section.
The release may be permanent or for a specified period, including
a period measured by the life of an individual.

Sec. 2 RCW 11.104A.050 and 2002 c 345 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
After a decedent dies, and subject to chapter 11.10 RCW, in the
case of an estate, or after an income interest in a trust ends, the
following rules apply:
(1) A fiduciary of an estate or of a terminating income interest
shall determine the amount of net income and net principal receipts
received from property specifically given to a beneficiary under the
rules in Articles 3 through 5 of this chapter which apply to trustees
and the rules in subsection (5) of this section. The fiduciary shall
distribute the net income and net principal receipts to the beneficiary
who is to receive the specific property.
(2) A fiduciary shall determine the remaining net income of a
decedent's estate or a terminating income interest under the rules in
Articles 3 through 5 of this chapter which apply to trustees, except to
the extent that the following apply:
(i) The fiduciary shall include in net income all income from
property used to discharge liabilities;
(ii) The fiduciary shall pay from income or principal, in the
fiduciary's discretion, family allowances; fees of attorneys,
accountants, and fiduciaries; court costs and other expenses of
administration; and interest on death taxes, but the fiduciary may pay
those expenses from income of property passing to a trust for which the
fiduciary claims an estate tax marital or charitable deduction only to
the extent that the payment of those expenses from income will not
cause the reduction or loss of the deduction; and
(iii) The fiduciary shall pay from principal all other
disbursements made or incurred in connection with the settlement of a
decedent's estate or the winding up of a terminating income interest,
including debts, funeral expenses, disposition of remains, and death
taxes and related penalties that are apportioned to the estate or
terminating income interest by the will, the terms of the trust, or
applicable law.
(3) A fiduciary shall distribute to a beneficiary who receives a
pecuniary amount outright the interest or any other amount provided by
the will, the terms of a trust, or applicable law from net income
determined under subsection (2) of this section or from principal to
the extent that net income is insufficient. Otherwise, no outright
gift of a pecuniary amount whether under a will, or under a trust after
an income interest ends shall receive interest or any other income.
(4) A fiduciary shall distribute the net income remaining after
distributions required by subsection (3) of this section in the manner
described in RCW 11.104A.060 to all other beneficiaries, including a
beneficiary who receives a pecuniary amount in trust, even if the
beneficiary holds an unqualified power to withdraw assets from the
trust or other presently exercisable general power of appointment over
the trust.
(5) A fiduciary may not reduce principal or income receipts from
property described in subsection (1) of this section because of a
payment described in RCW 11.104A.250 or 11.104A.260 to the extent that
the will, the terms of the trust, or applicable law requires the
fiduciary to make the payment from assets other than the property or to
the extent that the fiduciary recovers or expects to recover the
payment from a third party. The net income and principal receipts from
the property are determined by including all of the amounts the
fiduciary receives or pays with respect to the property, whether those
amounts accrued or became due before, on, or after the date of a
decedent's death or an income interest's terminating event, and by
making a reasonable provision for amounts that the fiduciary believes
the estate or terminating income interest may become obligated to pay
after the property is distributed.

Sec. 3 RCW 11.108.010 and 1997 c 252 s 81 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) The term "pecuniary bequest" means a gift in a governing
instrument which either is expressly stated as a fixed dollar amount or
is a gift of a dollar amount determinable by the governing instrument,
and a gift expressed in terms of a "sum" or an "amount," unless the
context dictates otherwise, is a gift of a dollar amount.
(2) As the context might require, the term "marital deduction"
means either the federal or state estate tax deduction or the federal
gift tax deduction allowed for transfers to spouses under the Internal
Revenue Code or applicable state law.
(3) The term "maximum marital deduction" means the maximum amount
qualifying for the marital deduction.
(4) The term "marital deduction gift" means a gift intended to
qualify for the marital deduction as indicated by a preponderance of
the evidence including the governing instrument and extrinsic evidence
whether or not the governing instrument is found to be ambiguous.
(5) The term "governing instrument" includes, but is not limited
to: Will and codicils; revocable trusts and amendments or addenda to
revocable trusts; irrevocable trusts; beneficiary designations under
life insurance policies, annuities, employee benefit plans, and
individual retirement accounts; payable-on-death, trust, or joint with
right of survivorship bank or brokerage accounts; transfer on death
designations or transfer on death or pay on death securities; and
documents exercising powers of appointment.
(6) The term "fiduciary" means trustee or personal representative.
Reference to a fiduciary in the singular includes the plural where the
context requires.
(7) The term "gift" refers to all gifts, legacies, devises, and
bequests made in a governing instrument, whether outright or in trust,
and whether made during the life of the transferor or as a result of
the transferor's death.
(8) The term "transferor" means the testator, donor, grantor, or
other person making a gift.
(9) The term "spouse" includes the transferor's surviving spouse in
the case of a deceased transferor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 11.108 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the citizens and residents of the
state, and nonresidents of the state having property located in
Washington, desire to take full advantage of the exemptions,
exclusions, deductions, and credits allowable under the federal estate,
gift, income, and generation-skipping transfer taxes, and the
Washington counterparts to those taxes, if any, unless the facts and
circumstances indicate otherwise, or the transferor has expressed a
contrary intent in the governing instrument.
(2) In interpreting, construing, or administering a governing
instrument, absent a clear expression of intent by the transferor to
the contrary, the following presumptions apply and may only be rebutted
by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence to the contrary, but these
presumptions of intent do not require the making of any particular
voluntary tax election:
(a) The transferor intended to take advantage of the maximum
benefit of tax deductions, exemptions, exclusions, or credits;
(b) The transferor intended any gift to a spouse made outright and
free of trust is to qualify for the gift or estate tax marital
deduction and to be a marital deduction gift; and
(c) If the governing instrument refers to a trust as a marital
trust, QTIP trust, or spousal trust, or refers to qualified terminal
terminable interest property, QTIP, or QTIP property, sections 2044,
2056, and 2523 of the Internal Revenue Code or similar provisions of
applicable state law, the transferor intended the property passing to
such a trust and the trust to qualify for the applicable gift or estate
tax martial deduction, and for the gift to qualify for a marital
deduction gift.
(3) References in this chapter to provisions of the Internal
Revenue Code include references to similar provisions, if any, of
applicable state law.

Sec. 5 RCW 11.108.025 and 1997 c 252 s 83 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless a governing instrument directs to the contrary:
(1) The fiduciary shall have the power to make elections, in whole
or in part, to qualify property for the marital deduction as qualified
terminable interest property under section 2056(b)(7) or 2523(f) of the
Internal Revenue Code or, if the surviving spouse is not a citizen of
the United States, under section 2056A of the Internal Revenue Code.
Further, the fiduciary shall have the power to make generation-skipping
transfer tax allocations under section 2632 of the Internal Revenue
Code.
(2) The fiduciary making an election under section 2056(b)(7),
2523(f), or 2056A of the Internal Revenue Code or making an allocation
under section 2632 of the Internal Revenue Code may benefit personally
from the election or allocation, with no duty to reimburse any other
person interested in the election or allocation. The fiduciary shall
have no duty to make any equitable adjustment and shall have no duty to
treat interested persons impartially in respect of the election or
allocation.
(3) The fiduciary of a trust, if an election is made under section
2056(b)(7), 2523(f), or 2056A of the Internal Revenue Code, if an
allocation is made under section 2632 of the Internal Revenue Code, or
if division of a trust is of benefit to the persons interested in the
trust, may divide the trust into two or more separate trusts, of equal
or unequal value, if:
(a) The terms of the separate trusts which result are substantially
identical to the terms of the trust before division;
(b) In the case of a trust otherwise qualifying for the marital
deduction under the Internal Revenue Code, the division shall not
prevent a separate trust for which the election is made from qualifying
for the marital deduction; and
(c) The allocation of assets shall be based upon the fair market
value of the assets at the time of the division.
(4) For state and federal estate tax purposes, a fiduciary may make
inconsistent elections under section 2056(b)(7) or 2056A of the
Internal Revenue Code and under similar provisions of applicable state
law.

Sec. 6 RCW 11.108.060 and 1999 c 44 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For an estate that exceeds the amount exempt from state or federal
tax by virtue of the credit under section 2010 of the Internal Revenue
Code, if taking into account applicable adjusted taxable gifts as
defined in section 2001(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, any marital
deduction gift that is conditioned upon the transferor's spouse
surviving the transferor for a period of more than six months, is
governed by the following:
(1) A survivorship requirement expressed in the governing
instrument in excess of six months or which may exceed six months,
other than survival by a spouse of a common disaster resulting in the
death of the transferor, does not apply to property passing under the
marital deduction gift, and for the gift, the survivorship requirement
((is limited to a six-month period beginning with the transferor's
death)) may not exceed the period ending six months following the
transferor's date of death, as established under section 2056(b)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) If the property that is the subject of the marital deduction
gift is passing or is to be held in trust, as opposed to passing
outright, it must be held in a trust meeting the requirements of
section 2056(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code the corpus of which
must: (a) Pass as though the spouse failed to survive the transferor
if the spouse, in fact, fails to survive the term specified in the
governing instrument; and (b) pass to the spouse under the terms of the
governing instrument if the spouse, in fact, survives the term
specified in the governing instrument.

Sec. 7 RCW 11.108.900 and 1999 c 42 s 631 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies to all estates, trusts, and governing
instruments in existence on or any time after March 7, 1984, and to all
proceedings with respect thereto after that date, whether the
proceedings commenced before or after that date, and including
distributions made after that date. This chapter shall not apply to
any governing instrument the terms of which expressly or by necessary
implication make this chapter inapplicable. The judicial and
nonjudicial dispute resolution procedures of chapter 11.96A RCW apply
to this chapter.
(2) Sections 3 through 6, chapter -- (this act), Laws of 2006 are
remedial in nature and shall be liberally applied in order to achieve
the purposes of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 11.95.070 and 1985 c 30 s 37 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to any power as trustee described
in and subject to RCW 11.98.019.
(2) This chapter does not apply to the powers of a personal
representative of the estate of a decedent when acting in the capacity
of personal representative.
(3) Sections 33 through 36, 38, and 39, chapter 149, Laws of 1984
and the 1984 recodification of RCW 64.24.050 as RCW 11.95.050 apply as
of January 1, 1985, to all existing or subsequently created powers of
appointment, but not to any power of appointment that expressly or by
necessary implication ((make[s])) makes those 1984 changes
inapplicable.

Sec. 9 RCW 11.24.020 and 1965 c 145 s 11.24.020 are each amended
to read as follows:
Upon the filing of the petition referred to in RCW 11.24.010, ((a
citation shall be issued)) notice shall be given as provided in RCW
11.96A.100 to the executors who have taken upon themselves the
execution of the will, or to the administrators with the will annexed,
((and)) to all legatees named in the will ((residing in the state,)) or
to their guardians if any of them are minors, or their personal
representatives if any of them are dead, ((requiring them to appear
before the court, on a day therein specified, to show cause why the
petition should not be granted)) and to all persons interested in the
matter, as defined in RCW 11.96A.030(5).

Sec. 10 RCW 11.96A.030 and 2002 c 66 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Matter" includes any issue, question, or dispute involving:
(a) The determination of any class of creditors, devisees,
legatees, heirs, next of kin, or other persons interested in an estate,
trust, nonprobate asset, or with respect to any other asset or property
interest passing at death;
(b) The direction of a personal representative or trustee to do or
to abstain from doing any act in a fiduciary capacity;
(c) The determination of any question arising in the administration
of an estate or trust, or with respect to any nonprobate asset, or with
respect to any other asset or property interest passing at death, that
may include, without limitation, questions relating to: (i) The
construction of wills, trusts, community property agreements, and other
writings; (ii) a change of personal representative or trustee; (iii) a
change of the situs of a trust; (iv) an accounting from a personal
representative or trustee; or (v) the determination of fees for a
personal representative or trustee;
(d) The grant to a personal representative or trustee of any
necessary or desirable power not otherwise granted in the governing
instrument or given by law;
(e) The amendment, reformation, or conformation of a will or a
trust instrument to comply with statutes and regulations of the United
States internal revenue service in order to achieve qualification for
deductions, elections, and other tax requirements, including the
qualification of any gift thereunder for the benefit of a surviving
spouse who is not a citizen of the United States for the estate tax
marital deduction permitted by federal law, including the addition of
mandatory governing instrument requirements for a qualified domestic
trust under section 2056A of the internal revenue code, the
qualification of any gift thereunder as a qualified conservation
easement as permitted by federal law, or the qualification of any gift
for the charitable estate tax deduction permitted by federal law,
including the addition of mandatory governing instrument requirements
for a charitable remainder trust; and
(f) With respect to any nonprobate asset, or with respect to any
other asset or property interest passing at death, including joint
tenancy property, property subject to a community property agreement,
or assets subject to a pay on death or transfer on death designation:
(i) The ascertaining of any class of creditors or others for
purposes of chapter 11.18 or 11.42 RCW;
(ii) The ordering of a qualified person, the notice agent, or
resident agent, as those terms are defined in chapter 11.42 RCW, or any
combination of them, to do or abstain from doing any particular act
with respect to a nonprobate asset;
(iii) The ordering of a custodian of any of the decedent's records
relating to a nonprobate asset to do or abstain from doing any
particular act with respect to those records;
(iv) The determination of any question arising in the
administration under chapter 11.18 or 11.42 RCW of a nonprobate asset;
(v) The determination of any questions relating to the abatement,
rights of creditors, or other matter relating to the administration,
settlement, or final disposition of a nonprobate asset under this
title;
(vi) The resolution of any matter referencing this chapter,
including a determination of any questions relating to the ownership or
distribution of an individual retirement account on the death of the
spouse of the account holder as contemplated by RCW 6.15.020(6);
(vii) The resolution of any other matter that could affect the
nonprobate asset.
(2) "Notice agent" has the meanings given in RCW 11.42.010.
(3) "Nonprobate assets" has the meaning given in RCW 11.02.005.
(4) "Party" or "parties" means each of the following persons who
has an interest in the subject of the particular proceeding and whose
name and address are known to, or are reasonably ascertainable by, the
petitioner:
(a) The trustor if living;
(b) The trustee;
(c) The personal representative;
(d) An heir;
(e) A beneficiary, including devisees, legatees, and trust
beneficiaries;
(f) The surviving spouse of a decedent with respect to his or her
interest in the decedent's property;
(g) A guardian ad litem;
(h) A creditor;
(i) Any other person who has an interest in the subject of the
particular proceeding;
(j) The attorney general if required under RCW 11.110.120;
(k) Any duly appointed and acting legal representative of a party
such as a guardian, special representative, or attorney in fact;
(l) Where applicable, the virtual representative of any person
described in this subsection the giving of notice to whom would meet
notice requirements as provided in RCW 11.96A.120;
(m) Any notice agent, resident agent, or a qualified person, as
those terms are defined in chapter 11.42 RCW; and
(n) The owner or the personal representative of the estate of the
deceased owner of the nonprobate asset that is the subject of the
particular proceeding, if the subject of the particular proceeding
relates to the beneficiary's liability to a decedent's estate or
creditors under RCW 11.18.200.
(5) "Persons interested in the estate or trust" means the trustor,
if living, all persons beneficially interested in the estate or trust,
persons holding powers over the trust or estate assets, the attorney
general in the case of any charitable trust where the attorney general
would be a necessary party to judicial proceedings concerning the
trust, and any personal representative or trustee of the estate or
trust.
(6) "Principal place of administration of the trust" means the
trustee's usual place of business where the day-to-day records
pertaining to the trust are kept, or the trustee's residence if the
trustee has no such place of business.
(7) The "situs" of a trust means the place where the principal
place of administration of the trust is located, unless otherwise
provided in the instrument creating the trust.
(8) "Trustee" means any acting and qualified trustee of the trust.
(9) "Representative" and other similar terms refer to a person who
virtually represents another under RCW 11.96A.120.
(10) "Citation" or "cite" and other similar terms, when required of
a person interested in the estate or trust or a party to a petition,
means to give notice as required under RCW 11.96A.100. "Citation" or
"cite" and other similar terms, when required of the court, means to
order, as authorized under RCW 11.96A.020 and 11.96A.060, and as
authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 11.96A
RCW to read as follows:
In all matters governed by this title, discovery shall be permitted
only in the following matters:
(1) A judicial proceeding that places one or more specific issues
in controversy that has been commenced under RCW 11.96A.100, in which
case discovery shall be conducted in accordance with the superior court
civil rules and applicable local rules; or
(2) A matter in which the court orders that discovery be permitted
on a showing of good cause, in which case discovery shall be conducted
in accordance with the superior court civil rules and applicable local
rules unless otherwise limited by the order of the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 11.95 RCW
to read as follows:
A person shall not be treated as having made a disposition in trust
for the use of that individual by reason of a lapse of a power of
withdrawal over the income or corpus of a trust created by another
person. For this purpose, notification to the trustee of the trust of
an intent not to exercise the power of withdrawal shall not be treated
as a release of the power of withdrawal, but shall be treated as a
lapse of the power.

Sec. 13 RCW 6.32.250 and 1987 c 442 s 1115 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter does not authorize the seizure of, or other
interference with, (1) any property which is expressly exempt by law
from levy and sale by virtue of an execution, attachment, or
garnishment; or (2) any money, thing in action or other property held
in trust for a judgment debtor where the trust has been created by, or
the fund so held in trust has proceeded from, a person other than the
judgment debtor; or (3) the earnings of the judgment debtor for
personal services to the extent they would be exempt against
garnishment of the employer under RCW 6.27.150. For purposes of this
section, a person shall not be treated as having made a disposition in
trust for the use of that person by reason of a lapse of a power of
withdrawal over the income or corpus of a trust created by another
person. For this purpose, notification to the trustee of the trust of
an intent not to exercise the power of withdrawal shall not be treated
as a release of the power of withdrawal, but shall be treated as a
lapse of the power.

Sec. 14 RCW 19.36.020 and Code 1881 s 2324 are each amended to
read as follows:
That all deeds of gift, all conveyances, and all transfers or
assignments, verbal or written, of goods, chattels or things in action,
made in trust for the use of the person making the same, shall be void
as against the existing or subsequent creditors of such person. For
purposes of this section, a person shall not be treated as having made
a disposition in trust for the use of that person by reason of a lapse
of a power of withdrawal over the income or corpus of a trust created
by another person. For this purpose, notification to the trustee of
the trust of an intent not to exercise the power of withdrawal shall
not be treated as a release of the power of withdrawal, but shall be
treated as a lapse of the power.

Sec. 15 RCW 11.62.005 and 1994 c 21 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the
meanings indicated.
(1) "Personal property" shall include any tangible personal
property, any instrument evidencing a debt, obligation, stock, chose in
action, license or ownership, any debt or any other intangible
property.
(2)(a) "Successor" and "successors" shall mean (subject to
subsection (2)(b) of this section):
(i) That person or those persons who are entitled to the claimed
property pursuant to the terms and provisions of the last will and
testament of the decedent or by virtue of the laws of intestate
succession contained in this title; and/or
(ii) The surviving spouse of the decedent to the extent that the
surviving spouse is entitled to the property claimed as his or her
undivided one-half interest in the community property of said spouse
and the decedent; and/or
(iii) The department of social and health services, to the extent
of funds expended or paid, in the case of claims provided under RCW
43.20B.080; and/or
(iv) This state, in the case of escheat property.
(b) Any person claiming to be a successor solely by reason of being
a creditor of the decedent or of the decedent's estate, except for the
state as set forth in (a)(iii) and (iv) of this subsection, shall be
excluded from the definition of "successor".
(3) "Person" shall mean any individual or organization((.
(4) "Organization" shall include a)), specifically including but
not limited to a bank, credit union, brokerage firm or stock transfer
agent, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency,
business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, two or more
persons having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or
commercial entity.

Sec. 16 RCW 11.62.010 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 60 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) At any time after forty days from the date of a decedent's
death, any person who is indebted to or who has possession of any
personal property belonging to the decedent or to the decedent and his
or her surviving spouse as a community, which debt or personal property
is an asset which is subject to probate, shall pay such indebtedness or
deliver such personal property, or so much of either as is claimed, to
a person claiming to be a successor of the decedent upon receipt of
proof of death and of an affidavit made by said person which meets the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section.
(2) An affidavit which is to be made pursuant to this section shall
state:
(a) The claiming successor's name and address, and that the
claiming successor is a "successor" as defined in RCW 11.62.005;
(b) That the decedent was a resident of the state of Washington on
the date of his or her death;
(c) That the value of the decedent's entire estate subject to
probate, not including the surviving spouse's community property
interest in any assets which are subject to probate in the decedent's
estate, wherever located, less liens and encumbrances, does not exceed
((sixty)) one hundred thousand dollars;
(d) That forty days have elapsed since the death of the decedent;
(e) That no application or petition for the appointment of a
personal representative is pending or has been granted in any
jurisdiction;
(f) That all debts of the decedent including funeral and burial
expenses have been paid or provided for;
(g) A description of the personal property and the portion thereof
claimed, together with a statement that such personal property is
subject to probate;
(h) That the claiming successor has given written notice, either by
personal service or by mail, identifying his or her claim, and
describing the property claimed, to all other successors of the
decedent, and that at least ten days have elapsed since the service or
mailing of such notice; and
(i) That the claiming successor is either personally entitled to
full payment or delivery of the property claimed or is entitled to full
payment or delivery thereof on the behalf and with the written
authority of all other successors who have an interest therein.
(3) A transfer agent of any security shall change the registered
ownership of the security claimed from the decedent to the person
claiming to be the successor with respect to such security upon the
presentation of proof of death and of an affidavit made by such person
which meets the requirements of subsection (2) of this section. Any
governmental agency required to issue certificates of ownership or of
license registration to personal property shall issue a new certificate
of ownership or of license registration to a person claiming to be a
successor of the decedent upon receipt of proof of death and of an
affidavit made by such person which meets the requirements of
subsection (2) of this section.
(4) No release from any Washington state or local taxing authority
may be required before any assets or debts are paid or delivered to a
successor of a decedent as required under this section.
(5) A copy of the affidavit, including the decedent's social
security number, shall be mailed to the state of Washington, department
of social and health services, office of financial recovery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act clarifies and declares the
existing laws of this state. This act is enforceable as to all persons
and all trusts regardless of when the trust was created.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---