BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any county composed entirely of islands, any of which are
connected with the mainland by state highway, may, after the effective
date of this section, allow shooting on county-owned lands that contain
a trail system constructed or maintained for purposes of outdoor
recreation or on county-owned waterfront property surrounded on all
sides by homes only where:
(a) The county sheriff's office is provided with the resources
necessary to secure the safety of all persons and property on and
around such county-owned lands available for shooting;
(b) The board of county commissioners holds, at least annually, a
public hearing on the issue of shooting on such county-owned lands; and
(c) Notice of the dates and specific county-owned lands on which
shooting will be allowed is given by publication in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county at least one week prior to, and
weekly during, the use of such lands for shooting.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a county
composed entirely of islands, any of which are connected with the
mainland by state highway, may not, after the effective date of this
section, allow shooting on county-owned lands that contain a trail
system constructed or maintained for purposes of outdoor recreation or
on county-owned waterfront property surrounded on all sides by homes
where the county sheriff makes a written finding that the sheriff's
office has not been provided with the resources necessary to secure the
safety of all persons and property on and around such county-owned
lands available for shooting and provides copies of such a written
finding to the county clerk and the county commissioners.
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1)(a), (1)(b), and (2) of this
section, a county composed entirely of islands, any of which are
connected with the mainland by state highway, may allow shooting on
county-owned lands that contain a trail system constructed or
maintained for purposes of outdoor recreation or on county-owned
waterfront property surrounded on all sides by homes in coordination
with a special hunt authorized by the department under RCW 77.12.150,
upon a written finding by both the department and the county that a
game animal population poses a danger to persons, property, or habitat
within the county and after providing notice pursuant to subsection
(1)(c) of this section.

--- END ---