BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.011 and 2002 c 212 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that this chapter is intended to
recognize the importance of rural lands and rural character to
Washington's economy, its people, and its environment, while respecting
regional differences. Rural lands and rural-based economies enhance
the economic desirability of the state, help to preserve traditional
economic activities, and contribute to the state's overall quality of
life.
The legislature finds that to retain and enhance the job base in
rural areas, rural counties must have flexibility to create
opportunities for business development. Further, the legislature finds
that rural counties must have the flexibility to retain existing
businesses and allow them to expand. The legislature recognizes that
not all business developments in rural counties require an urban level
of services; and that many businesses in rural areas fit within the
definition of rural character identified by the local planning unit.
Finally, the legislature finds that in defining its rural element
under RCW 36.70A.070(5), a county should foster land use patterns and
develop a local vision of rural character that will: Help preserve
rural-based economies and traditional rural lifestyles; encourage the
economic prosperity of rural residents; foster opportunities for small-scale, rural-based employment and self-employment; permit the operation
of rural-based agricultural, commercial, recreational, and tourist
businesses that are consistent with existing and planned land use
patterns; be compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and for
fish and wildlife habitat; foster the private stewardship of the land
and preservation of open space; and enhance the rural sense of
community and quality of life.
(2) For a planning area that is coterminous with an island, is
designated entirely for rural uses under RCW 36.70A.070(5), and is
located in a county consisting entirely of islands and having a
population density greater than one hundred persons per square mile,
nothing in this chapter requires a maximum residential density.

--- END ---