BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The vehicle weight fee imposed under RCW 46.17.010 does not
apply to a vehicle with an empty scale weight of less than ten thousand
pounds if the vehicle is: (a) Registered to a person with a
disability; and (b) modified to include a wheelchair ramp, wheelchair
lift, or other equipment needed or used solely for disability access to
a vehicle.
(2) Application for exemption under this section must be made to
the department in a form and manner required by the department. The
exemption shall apply to registration periods occurring on or after the
date of application for exemption.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect September 1, 2006.

--- END ---