BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The isolating nature of deafness presents
major challenges to our educational system. Children who are deaf or
hard-of-hearing have unique cultural, linguistic, and academic needs
that make them different from other groups of children, with or without
disabilities. These unique student needs pose a special challenge for
developing appropriate education programming and support. Students who
use an interpreter can only access a portion of their education through
that interpreter. The limitations of the interpreter therefore magnify
the limitations of the student. In 2003, the legislature directed the
superintendent of public instruction to conduct a comprehensive review
and make recommendations regarding the qualifications and competencies
required for educational interpreters who assist deaf and hearing-impaired students. The legislature supports the findings and
recommendations of the superintendent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, "educational interpreter" means
a school district employee who provides sign language translation and
further explanation of concepts introduced by teachers for students who
are deaf, deaf-blind, or hard-of-hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2010, each school district shall have each
educational interpreter working within the district, who has not
already achieved national certification, assessed using a nationally
recognized performance assessment to evaluate the receptive and
expressive interpreting skills of the educational interpreter. School
districts shall provide additional training for those educational
interpreters who do not meet the standards to achieve the national
certification.
(2) By December 2006, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall partner with other states to build and enhance a
network of support for the successful implementation of the nationally
recognized performance assessment of the educational interpreters
working in Washington schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
School districts are encouraged to hire only educational
interpreters who are deemed qualified for the grade and subject to
which they are assigned and hold national certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall retain the services of a professional meeting
facilitator to plan and conduct a series of meetings examining the
strengths and weaknesses of educational services available to deaf and
hard of hearing children throughout the state. The goal of the process
is to develop a set of recommendations that would establish an
integrated system of instructional and support programs that would
provide deaf and hard of hearing children the knowledge and skills
necessary for them to be successful in their adult lives and the
"hearing" world of work.
(2) Meeting participants shall include parents and representatives
of organizations that are directly providing educational and support
services to deaf and hard of hearing children and their families. They
shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of deaf parents,
the deaf community, public schools, private schools, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, Washington school for the deaf,
the Washington sensory disabilities service, and the departments of
social and health services and vocational rehabilitation.
(3) The participants shall identify the gaps in the current
delivery system and other barriers that impair deaf and hard of hearing
children's ability to develop the skills necessary for success in the
world of work. Of particular importance is the analysis of the
challenges faced by public schools and other agencies that provide
direct instruction to deaf and hard of hearing children. The
participants also shall identify programs and services that are
necessary to achieve the goal and propose alternatives for how programs
and services can be organized and delivered in ways that assure all
deaf and hard of hearing children will have access to them regardless
of where they live in the state. Such proposals shall identify how
various agencies and organizations can work together most effectively
to assure that deaf and hard of hearing children have access to an
integrated educational system. To assist the participants in their
work, the Washington state institute for public policy shall use its
research resources to gather data necessary for the analysis.
(4) The institute shall transmit the recommendations of the study
group to the legislature no later than June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
cooperation with the state board for community and technical colleges
and the higher education coordinating board, shall create an advisory
committee that includes certified educational interpreters, tactile
interpreters, interpreter educators, deaf leaders, public school
administrators, parents of deaf and deaf-blind children, and other
interested parties to advise the superintendent of public instruction,
the state board for community and technical colleges, and the higher
education coordinating board on issues of deaf education and
educational interpreting in each of the educational sectors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
As part of the needs assessment process conducted by the higher
education coordinating board in accordance with RCW 28B.76.230, the
board shall assess the need for a baccalaureate degree program in
Washington state that provides educational sign language interpreter
training. If the board determines that there is a need for such a
program, the board shall encourage the appropriate institutions or
institutional sector to create a program.

--- END ---