BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are no
current standards for educational interpreters for students who are
deaf or hard of hearing. Establishing standards will improve the
quality of educational interpreters in our schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) To the extent funds are appropriated, by January 15, 2007, the
superintendent of public instruction must develop standards for
educational interpreters of students who are deaf or hard of hearing.
The standards must be focused on the specific skills and knowledge
necessary to serve the communication needs of these students. By
January 15, 2007, the superintendent must report to the education
committees of the legislature and also recommend an implementation
schedule for the standards. The superintendent of public instruction
must obtain formal legislative approval through legislation before the
implementation of any standards for educational interpreters.
(2) When developing the standards, the superintendent of public
instruction must convene and consult with an advisory committee
including, but not limited to, representatives of: (a) Nationally
certificated educational interpreters; (b) tactile interpreters; (c)
interpreter educators; (d) district program coordinators of deaf
programs; (e) leaders in the deaf community; and (f) parents of deaf
children and of deaf-blind children.

--- END ---