BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No later than May 1, 2007, the state board of health shall
adopt rules requiring any person applying a pesticide with the signal
words "Danger/Poison" to notify adjacent schools, hospitals, nursing
homes, or state-licensed child or adult day care centers at least two
facility business days before the start of applications.
(2) The rules shall specify the manner of notification, which shall
include fascimile or electronic mail. The rules shall specify a single
facility manager or other personnel to whom the notification must be
directed. The applicator or other responsible person managing the
application site shall provide the notification. The rules shall allow
agreements between facilities and managers of application sites for the
methods of providing the required notification.
(3) The rules shall specify:
(a) Information required to be in the notification, including
without limitation, the product name, active ingredient, federal
environmental protection agency pesticide registration number, type of
pesticide being applied, the intended date and time of the application;
(b) Web site address where more information on the pesticide may be
obtained from the national pesticide information center; and
(c) The contact name and telephone number of the applicator or
responsible person.
(4) The rules shall require notification if:
(a) The application method is by aircraft, airblast sprayer,
fumigation, or overhead chemigation;
(b) The application site is contiguous with the property boundary
of the school, hospital, nursing home, or state-licensed day care
center; and
(c) The application site is within one-half mile of the property
boundary of the facility.
(5) If the school, school grounds, or day care will not be in use
the day of the application and for at least two consecutive days after
the application, notification is not required.
(6) The board may integrate these rules or portions of these rules
with facility-specific rules that it is developing concurrently or has
already adopted.

--- END ---