BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 50.20 RCW
to read as follows:
An individual shall be disqualified from benefits if he or she has
been discharged or suspended because he or she is incarcerated and
fails to report for work as scheduled and fails to notify the employer
within twenty-four hours of his or her failure to report for work. The
disqualification begins with the first day of the calendar week in
which he or she has been discharged or suspended and continues for
seven calendar weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in
employment covered by this title and earned wages in that employment
equal to seven times his or her weekly benefit amount.

--- END ---