BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Puget Sound and
the other waters of Washington state contain an abundance of varied and
unique marine life and other natural attractions that are of interest
to divers and other recreationalists from all over the world. The
legislature further finds that in addition to the usual benefits from
tourism, the promotion of underwater viewing tourism in the waters of
Washington state will enhance efforts to protect Puget Sound by
assisting in educating residents and nonresidents as to the value of
the marine environment. The legislature therefore finds that
Washington state's efforts to promote nature-based tourism should
include the natural wonder of underwater Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.330.090 and 2005 c 136 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall work with private sector organizations,
local governments, local associate development organizations, and
higher education and training institutions to assist in the development
of strategies to diversify the economy, facilitate technology transfer
and diffusion, and increase value-added production by focusing on
targeted sectors. The targeted sectors may include, but are not
limited to, software, forest products, biotechnology, environmental
industries, recycling markets and waste reduction, aerospace, food
processing, tourism, film and video, microelectronics, new materials,
robotics, and machine tools. The department shall, on a continuing
basis, evaluate the potential return to the state from devoting
additional resources to a targeted sector's approach to economic
development and including additional sectors in its efforts. The
department shall use information gathered in each service delivery
region in formulating its sectoral strategies and in designating new
targeted sectors.
(2) The department shall pursue a coordinated program to expand the
tourism industry throughout the state in cooperation with the public
and private tourism development organizations. The department, in
operating its tourism program, shall:
(a) Promote Washington as a tourism destination to national and
international markets to include nature-based and wildlife viewing
tourism, which includes underwater viewing tourism;
(b) Provide information to businesses and local communities on
tourism opportunities that could expand local revenues;
(c) Assist local communities to strengthen their tourism
partnerships, including their relationships with state and local
agencies;
(d) Provide leadership training and assistance to local communities
to facilitate the development and implementation of local tourism
plans;
(e) Coordinate the development of a statewide tourism and marketing
plan. The department's tourism planning efforts shall be carried out
in conjunction with public and private tourism development
organizations including the department of fish and wildlife, the
department of natural resources, the state parks and recreation
commission, the interagency committee for outdoor recreation, and other
appropriate agencies. The plan shall specifically address mechanisms
for: (i) Funding national and international marketing and nature-based
tourism efforts; (ii) interagency cooperation; and (iii) integrating
the state plan with local tourism plans.
(3) The department may, in carrying out its efforts to expand the
tourism industry in the state:
(a) Solicit and receive gifts, grants, funds, fees, and endowments,
in trust or otherwise, from tribal, local or other governmental
entities, as well as private sources, and may expend the same or any
income therefrom for tourism purposes. All revenue received for
tourism purposes shall be deposited into the tourism development and
promotion account created in RCW 43.330.094;
(b) Host conferences and strategic planning workshops relating to
the promotion of nature-based and wildlife viewing tourism, which
includes underwater viewing tourism;
(c) Conduct or contract for tourism-related studies;
(d) Contract with individuals, businesses, or public entities to
carry out its tourism-related activities under this section;
(e) Provide tourism-related organizations with marketing and other
technical assistance;
(f) Evaluate and make recommendations on proposed tourism-related
policies.
(4)(a) The department shall promote, market, and encourage growth
in the production of films and videos, as well as television
commercials within the state; to this end the department is directed to
assist in the location of a film and video production studio within the
state.
(b) The department may, in carrying out its efforts to encourage
film and video production in the state, solicit and receive gifts,
grants, funds, fees, and endowments, in trust or otherwise, from
tribal, local, or other governmental entities, as well as private
sources, and may expend the same or any income therefrom for the
encouragement of film and video production. All revenue received for
such purposes shall be deposited into the film and video promotion
account created in RCW 43.330.092.
(5) In assisting in the development of a targeted sector, the
department's activities may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Conducting focus group discussions, facilitating meetings, and
conducting studies to identify members of the sector, appraise the
current state of the sector, and identify issues of common concern
within the sector;
(b) Supporting the formation of industry associations, publications
of association directories, and related efforts to create or expand the
activities or industry associations;
(c) Assisting in the formation of flexible networks by providing
(i) agency employees or private sector consultants trained to act as
flexible network brokers and (ii) funding for potential flexible
network participants for the purpose of organizing or implementing a
flexible network;
(d) Helping establish research consortia;
(e) Facilitating joint training and education programs;
(f) Promoting cooperative market development activities;
(g) Analyzing the need, feasibility, and cost of establishing
product certification and testing facilities and services; and
(h) Providing for methods of electronic communication and
information dissemination among firms and groups of firms to facilitate
network activity.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.12.065 and 2003 c 183 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall manage wildlife and habitat programs,
including underwater wildlife and habitat programs, in a manner that
provides for public opportunities to view wildlife and underwater life
and supports wildlife and underwater viewing tourism without impairing
the state's wildlife resources or their natural habitats.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.105.050 and 2005 c 155 s 141 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall foster the commercial and recreational use of
the aquatic environment for production of food, fibre, income, and
public enjoyment from state-owned aquatic lands and from associated
waters, including opportunities for underwater viewing in naturally
occurring aquatic habitat, and to this end the department may develop
and improve production and harvesting of seaweeds and sealife attached
to or growing on aquatic land or contained in aquaculture containers,
but nothing in this section alters the responsibility of other state
agencies for their normal management of fish, shellfish, game, and
water.

Sec. 5 RCW 79A.05.360 and 1999 c 249 s 1301 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission may establish a system of underwater parks to
provide for diverse recreational diving opportunities and to conserve
and protect unique marine resources of the state of Washington. In
establishing and maintaining an underwater park system, the commission
may:
(1) Plan, construct, and maintain underwater parks;
(2) Acquire property and enter management agreements with other
units of state government for the management of lands, tidelands, and
bedlands as underwater parks;
(3) Construct artificial reefs and other underwater features to
enhance marine life and recreational uses of an underwater park;
(4) Accept gifts and donations for the benefit of underwater parks;
(5) Facilitate private efforts to construct artificial reefs and
underwater parks;
(6) Work with the federal government, local governments and other
appropriate agencies of state government, including but not limited to:
The department of natural resources, the department of fish and
wildlife and the natural heritage council to carry out the purposes of
this chapter; and
(7) Contract with other state agencies or local governments for the
management of an underwater park unit.
The commission may also take such actions as appropriate to support
underwater viewing tourism.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) In several locations throughout the
world, the use of ships as dive attractions has helped promote
underwater viewing tourism. To the extent funds are made available,
the department of fish and wildlife shall commission an independent
study on the use of ships as dive attractions. The department of fish
and wildlife, the department of natural resources, the state parks and
recreation commission, the department of ecology, and the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall establish a work group
on the use of ships as dive attractions to delineate elements of this
study. Among the topics that the study should address are:
(a) Assessing the availability of appropriate locations in Puget
Sound at the appropriate depths after the elimination of existing areas
reserved for shipping lanes, shellfish beds, sensitive areas, areas
with water quality concerns that would preclude placement of a vessel,
commercial fishing areas, and areas with restrictions due to national
security concerns or national defense activity;
(b) What are the possible long-term environmental consequences,
including those to habitat and marine life, of the use of ships as dive
attractions, and what steps would need to be taken prior to the state
allowing the sinking of a ship to be used as a dive attraction. At a
minimum, this should include an assessment of:
(i) Water quality impacts and the residual impacts to the
underlying land, over time, as the vessel breaks down, such as
accumulation of contaminants in the sediment;
(ii) Potential impacts that sinking a ship would have on predation
of juvenile salmonid and other state or federally listed species;
(c) What are the possible long-term economic consequences and what
are the costs, both capital and operating, of the use of ships as dive
attractions, including the costs of cleaning a ship to appropriate
environmental standards;
(d) What funding would need to be secured prior to the state
allowing the sinking of a ship to be used as a dive attraction and what
sources of funding are, or can be made, available for this purpose; and
(e) What are the legal liabilities and exposures for the state in
using ships as dive attractions.
(2) Once the study is complete, the work group shall develop final
recommendations based on its findings, to be submitted to the
appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 15,
2007. The objectives of the work group shall be to:
(a) Review the best available information regarding the
environmental, economic, funding, liability, and other issues involved
in the use of ships as dive attractions; and
(b) Consider the appropriate roles for each agency and the roles of
other federal, state, and local agencies in the planning, permitting,
construction, maintenance, and operation of ships as dive attractions.
(3) The agencies shall work with interested local governments,
other state agencies, tribes, visitor and convention bureaus, the
hospitality industry, tourism development organizations, tour operators
and other private sector interests, marine and underwater recreation
interests, educators, and conservation organizations in conducting this
review.

--- END ---