BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that certain service
contracts involving providers of home heating fuel and homeowners are
in the public interest. The legislature further finds that the
existing statutory provisions regulating service contracts are more
burdensome than is necessary to safeguard homeowners from the risk that
a contract obligor will close or be unable to fulfill their contract
obligations. The legislature declares that it is necessary to
establish separate standards that will safeguard certain homeowners
from possible losses arising from the cessation of business of a home
heating fuel company or the mismanagement of funds paid for home
heating fuel service contracts. The purpose of this chapter is to
create a legal framework within which home heating fuel service
contracts may be sold in this state and set forth requirements for
conducting a service contract business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the person who is responsible for the
administration of the service contracts or the service contracts plan.
(2) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of this state.
(3) "Consumer" means an individual who buys any tangible personal
property that is primarily for personal, family, or household use.
(4) "Home heating fuel service contract" means a contract or
agreement for a separately stated consideration for a specific duration
to perform the repair, replacement, or maintenance of a home heating
fuel supply system including the fuel tank and all visible pipes, caps,
lines, and associated parts or the indemnification for repair,
replacement, or maintenance for operational or structural failure due
to a defect in materials or workmanship, or normal wear and tear.
(5) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
incorporated or unincorporated association, joint stock company,
reciprocal insurer, syndicate, or any similar entity or combination of
entities acting in concert.
(6) "Premium" means the consideration paid to an insurer for a
reimbursement insurance policy.
(7) "Provider fee" means the consideration paid by a consumer for
a home heating fuel service contract.
(8) "Reimbursement insurance policy" means a policy of insurance
that is issued to a service contract provider to provide reimbursement
to the service contract provider or to pay on behalf of the service
contract provider all contractual obligations incurred by the service
contract provider under the terms of the insured service contracts
issued or sold by the service contract provider.
(9) "Home heating fuel service contract holder" or "contract
holder" means a person who is the purchaser or holder of a home heating
fuel service contract.
(10) "Home heating fuel service contract provider" or "contract
provider" means a person who is contractually obligated to the home
heating fuel service contract holder under the terms of the service
contract.
(11) "Home heating fuel service contract seller" means the person
who sells the home heating fuel service contract to the consumer.
(12) "Warranty" means a warranty made solely by the manufacturer,
importer, or seller of property or services without consideration; that
is not negotiated or separated from the sale of the product and is
incidental to the sale of the product; and that guarantees indemnity
for defective parts, mechanical or electrical breakdown, labor, or
other remedial measures, such as repair or replacement of the property
or repetition of services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A person shall not act as, or offer to
act as, or hold himself or herself out to be a home heating fuel
service contract provider in this state, nor may a home heating fuel
service contract be sold to a consumer in this state, unless the
contract provider has a valid registration as a home heating fuel
service contract provider issued by the commissioner.
(2) Applicants to be a home heating fuel service contract provider
shall make an application to the commissioner upon a form to be
furnished by the commissioner. The application must include or be
accompanied by the following information and documents:
(a) All basic organizational documents of the home heating fuel
service contract provider, including any articles of incorporation,
articles of association, partnership agreement, trade name certificate,
trust agreement, shareholder agreement, bylaws, and other applicable
documents, and all amendments to those documents;
(b) The identities of the contract provider's executive officer or
officers directly responsible for the contract provider's home heating
fuel service contract business;
(c) Annual financial statements or other financial reports
acceptable to the commissioner for the two most recent years which
prove that the applicant is solvent and any information the
commissioner may require in order to review the current financial
condition of the applicant;
(d) An application fee of one hundred dollars, which must be
deposited into the general fund; and
(e) Any other pertinent information required by the commissioner.
(3) The commissioner may refuse to issue a registration if the
commissioner determines that the home heating fuel service contract
provider, or any individual responsible for the conduct of the affairs
of the contract provider under subsection (2)(b) of this section, is
not competent, trustworthy, or financially responsible.
(4) A registration issued under this section is valid, unless
surrendered, suspended, or revoked by the commissioner, or not renewed
for so long as the service contract provider continues in business in
this state and remains in compliance with this chapter. A registration
is subject to renewal annually on July 1st upon application of the home
heating fuel service contract provider and payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars, which must be deposited into the insurance commissioner's
regulatory account under RCW 48.02.190. If not so renewed, the
registration expires on July 31st of that year.
(5) A home heating fuel service contract provider shall keep
current the information required to be disclosed in its registration
under this section by reporting all material changes or additions
within thirty days after the end of the month in which the change or
addition occurs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Every registered home heating fuel
service contract provider that is assuring its faithful performance of
its obligations to its contract holders by complying with section
5(2)(b) of this act shall file an annual report for the preceding
calendar year with the commissioner on or before March 1st of each
year, or within any extension of time the commissioner for good cause
may grant. The report must be in the form and contain those matters as
the commissioner prescribes and must be verified by at least two
officers of the home heating fuel service contract provider.
(2) As part of an investigation by the commissioner, the
commissioner may require a home heating fuel service contract provider
to file monthly financial reports whenever, in the commissioner's
discretion, there is a need to more closely monitor the financial
activities of the service contract provider. Monthly financial
statements must be filed in the commissioner's office no later than the
twenty-fifth day of the month following the month for which the
financial report is being filed. These monthly financial reports must
be the internal financial statements of the service contract provider.
The monthly financial reports that are filed with the commissioner
constitute information that might be damaging to the service contract
provider if made available to its competitors, and therefore shall be
kept confidential by the commissioner. This information may not be
made public or be subject to subpoena, other than by the commissioner
and then only for the purpose of enforcement actions taken by the
commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Home heating fuel service contracts may
not be issued, sold, or offered for sale in this state or sold to
consumers in this state unless the contract provider has:
(a) Provided a receipt for, or other written evidence of, the
purchase of the home heating fuel service contract to the contract
holder; and
(b) Provided a copy of the home heating fuel service contract to
the service contract holder within a reasonable period of time from the
date of purchase.
(2) In order to assure the faithful performance of a home heating
fuel service contract provider's obligations to its contract holders,
every home heating fuel service contract provider is responsible for
complying with the requirements of one of the following:
(a) Insure all home heating fuel service contracts under a
reimbursement insurance policy issued by an insurer holding a
certificate of authority from the commissioner; or
(b)(i) Maintain a funded reserve account for its obligations under
its home heating service contracts issued and outstanding in this
state. The reserves may not be less than forty percent of the gross
consideration received, less claims paid, on the sale of the home
heating fuel service contract for all in-force contracts. The reserve
account is subject to examination and review by the insurance
commissioner; and
(ii) Place in trust with the commissioner a financial security
deposit, having a value of not less than five percent of the gross
consideration received, less claims paid, on the sale of the service
contract for all service contracts issued and in force, but not less
than ten thousand dollars, consisting of one of the following:
(A) A surety bond issued by an insurer holding a certificate of
authority from the commissioner;
(B) Securities of the type eligible for deposit by authorized
insurers in this state;
(C) Cash;
(D) An evergreen letter of credit issued by a qualified financial
institution; or
(E) Another form of security prescribed by rule by the
commissioner;
(3) Home heating fuel service contracts must require the contract
provider to permit the contract holder to return the home heating fuel
service contract within thirty days of the date the home heating fuel
service contract was delivered to the contract holder, or within a
longer time period permitted under the home heating fuel service
contract. Upon return of the home heating fuel service contract to the
contract provider within the applicable period, if no claim has been
made under the home heating fuel service contract prior to the return
to the contract provider, the home heating fuel service contract is
void and the contract provider shall refund to the contract holder, or
credit the account of the contract holder with the full purchase price
of the home heating fuel service contract. The right to void the home
heating fuel service contract provided in this subsection is not
transferable and applies only to the original contract purchaser. A
ten percent penalty per month must be added to a refund of the purchase
price that is not paid or credited within thirty days after return of
the home heating fuel service contract to the contract provider.
(4) Except for home heating fuel service contract providers,
persons marketing, selling, or offering to sell home heating service
contracts for providers are exempt from the registration requirements
of this chapter.
(5) The marketing, sale, offering for sale, issuance, making,
proposing to make, and administration of home heating fuel service
contracts by contract providers and related contract sellers,
administrators, and other persons complying with this chapter are
exempt from the other provisions of this title, except chapter 48.04
RCW and as otherwise provided in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Reimbursement insurance policies
insuring home heating fuel service contracts issued, sold, or offered
for sale in this state or sold to consumers in this state must state
that the insurer that issued the reimbursement insurance policy shall
reimburse or pay on behalf of the contract provider all sums the
contract provider is legally obligated to pay, including but not
limited to the refund of the full purchase price of the contract to the
contract holder or shall provide the service which the contract
provider is legally obligated to perform according to the contract
provider's contractual obligations under the home heating fuel service
contracts issued or sold by the contract provider.
(2) The reimbursement insurance policy must fully insure the
obligations of the contract provider, rather than partially insure, or
insure only in the event of contract provider default.
(3) The reimbursement insurance policy must state that the contract
holder is entitled to apply directly to the reimbursement insurance
company.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Home heating fuel service contracts
marketed, sold, offered for sale, issued, made, proposed to be made, or
administered in this state or sold to residents of this state must be
written, printed, or typed in clear, understandable language that is
easy to read, and disclose the requirements set forth in this section,
as applicable.
(2) Home heating fuel service contracts insured under a
reimbursement insurance policy must not be issued, sold, or offered for
sale in this state or sold to residents of this state unless the home
heating fuel service contract conspicuously contains a statement in
substantially the following form: "Obligations of the home heating
fuel service contract provider under this contract are insured under a
contract reimbursement insurance policy." The home heating fuel
service contract must also conspicuously state the name and address of
the issuer of the reimbursement insurance policy and state that the
contract holder is entitled to apply directly to the reimbursement
insurance company.
(3) Service contracts not insured under a reimbursement insurance
policy must contain a statement in substantially the following form:
"Obligations of the home heating fuel service contract provider under
this contract are backed by the full faith and credit of the home
heating fuel service contract provider."
(4) Home heating fuel service contracts must state the name and
address of the contract provider and must identify any administrator if
different from the contract provider, the contract seller, and the
contract holder to the extent that the name of the contract holder has
been furnished by the contract holder. The identities of the parties
are not required to be preprinted on the home heating fuel service
contract and may be added to the home heating fuel service contract at
the time of sale.
(5) Home heating fuel service contracts must state the purchase
price of the contract and the terms under which the home heating fuel
service contract is sold. The purchase price is not required to be
preprinted on the home heating fuel service contract and may be
negotiated at the time of sale.
(6) Home heating fuel service contracts must state the procedure to
obtain service or to file a claim, including but not limited to the
procedures for obtaining prior approval for repair work, the toll-free
telephone number if prior approval is necessary for service, and the
procedure for obtaining emergency repairs performed outside of normal
business hours or provide for twenty-four hour telephone assistance.
(7) Home heating fuel service contracts must state the existence of
any deductible amount, if applicable.
(8) Home heating fuel service contracts must specify the
merchandise and services to be provided and any limitations,
exceptions, or exclusions.
(9) Home heating fuel service contracts must state any restrictions
governing the transferability of the service contract, if applicable.
(10) Home heating fuel service contracts must state the terms,
restrictions, or conditions governing cancellation of the home heating
fuel service contract prior to the termination or expiration date of
the home heating fuel service contract by either the contract provider
or by the contract holder, which rights can be no more restrictive than
provided in section 5 of this act. The contract provider of the home
heating fuel service contract shall mail a written notice to the
contract holder at the last known address of the contract holder
contained in the records of the contract provider at least twenty-one
days prior to cancellation by the contract provider. The notice must
state the effective date of the cancellation and the true and actual
reason for the cancellation.
(11) Home heating fuel service contracts must set forth the
obligations and duties of the contract holder, including but not
limited to the duty to protect against any further damage and any
requirement to follow owner's manual instructions.
(12) Home heating fuel service contracts must state whether or not
the home heating fuel service contract provides for or excludes
consequential damages or preexisting conditions.
(13) Home heating fuel service contracts must not contain a
provision that requires that any civil action brought in connection
with the home heating fuel service contract must be brought in the
courts of a jurisdiction other than this state. Home heating service
contracts that authorize binding arbitration to resolve claims or
disputes may allow for arbitration proceedings to be held at a location
in closest proximity to the contract holder's permanent residence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A home heating fuel service contract
provider shall not use in its name the words insurance, casualty,
guaranty, surety, mutual, or any other words descriptive of the
insurance, casualty, guaranty, or surety business; or a name
deceptively similar to the name or description of any insurance or
surety corporation, or to the name of any other home heating fuel
service contract provider. This subsection does not apply to a company
that was using any of the prohibited language in its name prior to the
effective date of this section. However, a company using the
prohibited language in its name shall conspicuously disclose in its
home heating fuel service contracts the following statement: "This
agreement is not an insurance contract."
(2) Every home heating fuel service contract provider shall conduct
its business in its own legal name, unless the commissioner has
approved the use of another name.
(3) A home heating fuel service contract provider or its
representative shall not in its contracts or literature make, permit,
or cause to be made any false or misleading statement, or deliberately
omit any material statement that would be considered misleading if
omitted.
(4) A person, such as a bank, savings and loan association, lending
institution, manufacturer, or seller shall not require the purchase of
a home heating fuel service contract as a condition of a loan or a
condition for the sale of any property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The home heating fuel service contract
provider shall keep accurate accounts, books, and records concerning
transactions regulated under this chapter.
(2) The contract provider's accounts, books, and records must
include the following:
(a) Copies of each type of home heating fuel service contract sold;
(b) The name and address of each contract holder, to the extent
that the name and address have been furnished by the contract holder;
and
(c) Written claim files that contain at least the dates, amounts,
and descriptions of claims related to the service contracts.
(3) The records required under this chapter may be, but are not
required to be, maintained on a computer disk or other recordkeeping
technology. If the records are maintained in other than hard copy, the
records must be capable of duplication to legible hard copy.
(4) A home heating fuel service contract provider discontinuing
business in this state shall maintain its records until it furnishes
the commissioner satisfactory proof that it has discharged all
obligations to service contract holders in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 As applicable, an insurer that issued a
reimbursement insurance policy shall not terminate the policy until a
notice of termination in accordance with RCW 48.18.290 has been given
to the home heating fuel service contract provider and has been
delivered to the commissioner. The termination of a reimbursement
insurance policy does not reduce the issuer's responsibility for home
heating fuel service contracts issued by contract providers prior to
the effective date of the termination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Home heating fuel service contract
providers are the agent of the insurer that issued the reimbursement
insurance policy for purposes of obligating the insurer to contract
holders in accordance with the home heating fuel service contract and
this chapter. Payment of the provider fee by the consumer to the home
heating fuel service contract seller, contract provider, or
administrator constitutes payment by the consumer to the home heating
fuel service contract provider and to the insurer that issued the
reimbursement insurance policy. In cases when a contract provider is
acting as an administrator and enlists other contract providers, the
contract provider acting as the administrator shall notify the insurer
of the existence and identities of the other contract providers.
(2) This chapter does not prevent or limit the right of an insurer
that issued a reimbursement insurance policy to seek indemnification or
subrogation against a home heating fuel service contract provider if
the issuer pays or is obligated to pay the contract holder sums that
the contract provider was obligated to pay under the provisions of the
home heating fuel service contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The commissioner may conduct
investigations of home heating fuel service contract providers,
administrators, home heating fuel service contract sellers, insurers,
and other persons to enforce this chapter and protect home heating fuel
service contract holders in this state. Upon request of the
commissioner, the contract provider shall make all accounts, books, and
records concerning home heating fuel service contracts sold by the
contract provider available to the commissioner that are necessary to
enable the commissioner to determine compliance or noncompliance with
this chapter.
(2) The commissioner may take actions under RCW 48.02.080 or
48.04.050 that are necessary or appropriate to enforce this chapter and
the commissioner's rules and orders, and to protect home heating fuel
service contract holders in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The commissioner may, subject to
chapter 48.04 RCW, deny, suspend, or revoke the registration of a home
heating fuel service contract provider if the commissioner finds that
the contract provider:
(a) Has violated this chapter or the commissioner's rules and
orders;
(b) Has refused to be investigated or to produce its accounts,
records, and files for investigation, or if any of its officers have
refused to give information with respect to its affairs or refused to
perform any other legal obligation as to an investigation, when
required by the commissioner;
(c) Has, without just cause, refused to pay proper claims or
perform services arising under its contracts or has, without just
cause, caused home heating fuel service contract holders to accept less
than the amount due them or caused home heating fuel service contract
holders to employ attorneys or bring suit against the contract provider
to secure full payment or settlement of claims;
(d) Is affiliated with or under the same general management or
interlocking directorate or ownership as another home heating fuel
service contract provider that unlawfully transacts business in this
state without having a registration;
(e) At any time fails to meet any qualification for which issuance
of the registration could have been refused had that failure then
existed and been known to the commissioner;
(f) Is under suspension or revocation in another state with respect
to its home heating fuel service contract business;
(g) Has made a material misstatement in its application for
registration;
(h) Has obtained or attempted to obtain a registration through
misrepresentation or fraud;
(i) Has, in the transaction of business under its registration,
used fraudulent, coercive, or dishonest practices;
(j) Has failed to pay any judgment rendered against it in this
state regarding a home heating fuel service contract within sixty days
after the judgment has become final; or
(k) Has been convicted of, or has entered a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere to, a property or finance-related felony.
(2) The commissioner may, without advance notice or hearing
thereon, immediately suspend the registration of a home heating fuel
service contract provider if the commissioner finds that any of the
following circumstances exist:
(a) The provider is insolvent;
(b) A proceeding for receivership, conservatorship, rehabilitation,
or other delinquency proceeding regarding the home heating fuel service
contract provider has been commenced in any state; or
(c) The financial condition or business practices of the home
heating fuel service contract provider otherwise pose an imminent
threat to the public health, safety, or welfare of the residents of
this state.
(3) If the commissioner finds that grounds exist for the suspension
or revocation of a registration issued under this chapter, the
commissioner may, in lieu of suspension or revocation, impose a fine
upon the home heating fuel service contract provider in an amount not
more than one thousand dollars per violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The commissioner may adopt rules to
implement and administer this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This chapter applies to all home heating
fuel service contracts sold or offered for sale after October 1, 2006.

Sec. 16 RCW 48.110.015 and 2000 c 208 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following are exempt from this title:
(a) Warranties;
(b) Maintenance agreements; and
(c) Service contracts:
(i) Paid for with separate and additional consideration;
(ii) Issued at the point of sale, or within sixty days of the
original purchase date of the property; and
(iii) On tangible property when the tangible property for which the
service contract is sold has a purchase price of fifty dollars or less,
exclusive of sales tax.
(2) This chapter does not apply to:
(a) Vehicle service contracts which are governed under chapter
48.96 RCW;
(b) Vehicle mechanical breakdown insurance; ((and))
(c) Service contracts on tangible personal property purchased by
persons who are not consumers; and
(d) Home heating fuel service contracts offered by home heating
energy providers.

Sec. 17 RCW 48.110.020 and 2000 c 208 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Administrator" means the person who is responsible for the
administration of the service contracts or the service contracts plan.
(2) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of this state.
(3) "Consumer" means an individual who buys any tangible personal
property that is primarily for personal, family, or household use.
(4) "Maintenance agreement" means a contract of limited duration
that provides for scheduled maintenance only.
(5) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
incorporated or unincorporated association, joint stock company,
reciprocal insurer, syndicate, or any similar entity or combination of
entities acting in concert.
(6) "Premium" means the consideration paid to an insurer for a
reimbursement insurance policy.
(7) "Provider fee" means the consideration paid by a consumer for
a service contract.
(8) "Reimbursement insurance policy" means a policy of insurance
that is issued to a service contract provider to provide reimbursement
to the service contract provider or to pay on behalf of the service
contract provider all contractual obligations incurred by the service
contract provider under the terms of the insured service contracts
issued or sold by the service contract provider.
(9) "Service contract" means a contract or agreement for a
separately stated consideration for a specific duration to perform the
repair, replacement, or maintenance of property or the indemnification
for repair, replacement, or maintenance for operational or structural
failure due to a defect in materials or workmanship, or normal wear and
tear. Service contracts may provide for the repair, replacement, or
maintenance of property for damage resulting from power surges and
accidental damage from handling, with or without additional provision
for indemnity payments for incidental damages to other property
directly caused by the failure of the property which is the subject of
the service contract, provided the indemnity payment per incident does
not exceed the purchase price of the property that is the subject of
the service contract.
(10) "Service contract holder" or "contract holder" means a person
who is the purchaser or holder of a service contract.
(11) "Service contract provider" means a person who is
contractually obligated to the service contract holder under the terms
of the service contract.
(12) "Service contract seller" means the person who sells the
service contract to the consumer.
(13) "Warranty" means a warranty made solely by the manufacturer,
importer, or seller of property or services without consideration; that
is not negotiated or separated from the sale of the product and is
incidental to the sale of the product; and that guarantees indemnity
for defective parts, mechanical or electrical breakdown, labor, or
other remedial measures, such as repair or replacement of the property
or repetition of services.
(14) "Home heating fuel service contract" means a contract or
agreement for a separately stated consideration for a specific duration
to perform the repair, replacement, or maintenance of a home heating
fuel supply system including the fuel tank and all visible pipes, caps,
lines, and associated parts or the indemnification for repair,
replacement, or maintenance for operational or structural failure due
to a defect in materials or workmanship, or normal wear and tear.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 1 through 15 and 18 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

--- END ---