BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the policy of this state to prohibit
all forms and means of gambling, except where carefully and
specifically authorized and regulated. With the advent of the internet
and other technologies and means of communication that were not
contemplated when either the gambling act was enacted in 1973, or the
lottery commission was created in 1982, it is appropriate for this
legislature to reaffirm the policy prohibiting gambling that exploits
such new technologies.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.46.240 and 1991 c 261 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whoever knowingly transmits or receives gambling information by
telephone, telegraph, radio, semaphore, the internet, a
telecommunications transmission system, or similar means, or knowingly
installs or maintains equipment for the transmission or receipt of
gambling information shall be guilty of a ((gross misdemeanor)) class
C felony subject to the penalty set forth in RCW 9A.20.021((:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). However, this section shall not apply to
such information transmitted or received or equipment installed or
maintained relating to activities authorized by this chapter or to any
act or acts in furtherance thereof when conducted in compliance with
the provisions of this chapter and in accordance with the rules ((and
regulations)) adopted ((pursuant thereto)) under this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.70.040 and 1994 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall have the power, and it shall be its duty:
(1) To ((promulgate such)) adopt rules governing the establishment
and operation of a state lottery as it deems necessary and desirable in
order that such a lottery be initiated at the earliest feasible and
practicable time, and in order that such lottery produce the maximum
amount of net revenues for the state consonant with the dignity of the
state and the general welfare of the people. Such rules shall include,
but shall not be limited to, the following:
(a) The type of lottery to be conducted which may include the
selling of tickets or shares, but such tickets or shares may not be
sold over the internet. The use of electronic or mechanical devices or
video terminals which allow for individual play against such devices or
terminals shall be prohibited. An affirmative vote of sixty percent of
both houses of the legislature is required before offering any game
allowing or requiring a player to become eligible for a prize or to
otherwise play any portion of the game by interacting with any device
or terminal involving digital, video, or other electronic
representations of any game of chance, including scratch tickets, pull-tabs, bingo, poker or other cards, dice, roulette, keno, or slot
machines. Approval of the legislature shall be required before
entering any agreement with other state lotteries to conduct shared
games;
(b) The price, or prices, of tickets or shares in the lottery;
(c) The numbers and sizes of the prizes on the winning tickets or
shares;
(d) The manner of selecting the winning tickets or shares, except
as limited by (a) of this subsection;
(e) The manner and time of payment of prizes to the holder of
winning tickets or shares which, at the director's option, may be paid
in lump sum amounts or installments over a period of years;
(f) The frequency of the drawings or selections of winning tickets
or shares. Approval of the legislature is required before conducting
any on-line game in which the drawing or selection of winning tickets
occurs more frequently than once every twenty-four hours;
(g) Without limit as to number, the type or types of locations at
which tickets or shares may be sold;
(h) The method to be used in selling tickets or shares, except as
limited by (a) of this subsection;
(i) The licensing of agents to sell or distribute tickets or
shares, except that a person under the age of eighteen shall not be
licensed as an agent;
(j) The manner and amount of compensation, if any, to be paid
licensed sales agents necessary to provide for the adequate
availability of tickets or shares to prospective buyers and for the
convenience of the public;
(k) The apportionment of the total revenues accruing from the sale
of lottery tickets or shares and from all other sources among: (i) The
payment of prizes to the holders of winning tickets or shares, which
shall not be less than forty-five percent of the gross annual revenue
from such lottery, (ii) transfers to the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260, and (iii) transfer to the state's general
fund. Transfers to the state general fund shall be made in compliance
with RCW 43.01.050;
(l) Such other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and
economical operation and administration of the lottery and for the
convenience of the purchasers of tickets or shares and the holders of
winning tickets or shares.
(2) To ensure that in each place authorized to sell lottery tickets
or shares, on the back of the ticket or share, and in any advertising
or promotion there shall be conspicuously displayed an estimate of the
probability of purchasing a winning ticket.
(3) To amend, repeal, or supplement any such rules from time to
time as it deems necessary or desirable.
(4) To advise and make recommendations to the director for the
operation and administration of the lottery.

--- END ---