BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Hunting is prohibited within one mile of a public or private
school serving students in preschool through the 12th grade. The
prohibition on hunting is in effect during school hours and during any
scheduled school activity or event. The department may authorize a
special hunting season if it determines that there is a need to hunt
animals that pose a threat to human safety.
(2) This section applies only to counties with population densities
of greater than one hundred persons per square mile, as determined by
the office of financial management, or any county if adopted by the
legislative authority of that county.

--- END ---