BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In 1993 the Washington legislature laid out
a vision of a revitalized school system in Washington state.
Envisioned was a comprehensive assessment system committed to high
academic standards for all of its students. The Washington assessment
of student learning was created as a tool to measure whether students
were reaching the high academic standards. The legislature continues
to support this assessment as a part of a comprehensive assessment
system. Recently some alternative assessments have been developed.
The legislature finds that there is interest in exploring why some
students have not been able to meet the state standards and whether
additional alternative methods, options, procedures, or performance
measures could be used to augment the current system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall conduct a study to explore options to augment the
current system of assessments to provide additional opportunities for
students to demonstrate that they have met the state learning
standards. The study is limited to:
(a) A review and statistical analysis of Washington assessment of
student learning data to profile the students who did not meet the
standard in one or more areas of assessment, identify the
characteristics of those students, and identify possible barriers to
student success or possible causes of the lack of success;
(b) A review and identification of additional alternative
assessment options that could be used to augment the current assessment
system. In identifying the alternative assessment options, the
institute shall include a review of alternative assessments used in
other states as well as those that have been developed and those that
have been proposed in Washington. The institute shall examine the use
of national tests as well as career skill certification exams in their
review of possible alternative assessment options. For each of the
identified alternative assessment options, the study shall at a minimum
include:
(i) An estimation of the costs for implementation;
(ii) A review of the cultural appropriateness;
(iii) Whether the alternative assessment reliably measures a
student's ability to meet state learning standards in one or more of
the required content areas;
(iv) Whether the alternative assessment is in compliance with RCW
28A.655.061(1); and
(v) Any challenges to implementation for each of the identified
alternative assessment options, including any legislative action
necessary for implementation;
(c) A review and identification of additional alternative methods,
procedures, or combinations of performance measures, including those
proposed in Washington, to assess whether students have met the state
learning standards. For each of the identified alternative methods,
procedures, or performance measures, the study shall at a minimum
include:
(i) An estimation of the costs for implementation;
(ii) A review of the cultural appropriateness;
(iii) Whether the method, procedure, or performance measure
reliably measures a student's ability to meet state learning standards
in one or more of the required content areas;
(iv) Whether the method, procedure, or performance measure is in
compliance with RCW 28A.655.061(1);
(v) Any challenges to implementation for each of the identified
methods, procedures, or performance measures, including any legislative
action necessary for implementation; and
(vi) Whether the procedures or methods could be standardized across
the state.
(2) The Washington state institute for public policy shall provide
an interim report to the legislature by December 1, 2006, and a final
report by December 1, 2007. The interim report shall include a
preliminary statistical analysis of the information required under
subsection (1)(a) of this section and shall include recommendations on
at least two alternative assessment options, alternative methods,
procedures, or performance measures that were reviewed under subsection
(1)(b) and (c) of this section. The final study shall include
suggestions for any follow-up studies that the legislature could
undertake to continue to build on the information obtained in this
study.
(3) The institute shall consult, at a minimum, with nationally
recognized experts on assessments including representatives from
nationally recognized centers for multicultural education,
representatives of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, educators, counselors, parents, the business community,
classified employees, career and technical organizations,
representatives of Washington tribes, representatives of cultural,
linguistic, and racial minority groups, and the community of persons
with disabilities in developing the initial list of possible
alternative assessment options, alternative assessment methods,
procedures, or performance measures to be reviewed under subsection
(1)(b) and (c) of this section.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and
school districts shall provide the institute with access to all
necessary data to conduct the studies in this act.

--- END ---