BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is important
to recognize that students have multiple learning styles and that too
often a single, high stakes test does not accommodate all learning
styles. It is important to have high academic standards and the
Washington assessment of student learning can be an effective tool to
assist districts in achieving them. The Washington assessment of
student learning, however, may not adequately challenge our high
performing students and it takes valuable time and resources away from
essential learning for all students. Therefore, it is the intent of
the legislature to eliminate the use of the Washington assessment of
student learning as a graduation requirement.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2004 c 19 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but ((need))
not be limited to the Washington assessment of student learning,
opportunities for a student to retake the content areas of the
assessment in which the student was not successful, and if approved by
the legislature pursuant to subsection (((11))) (10) of this section,
one or more objective alternative assessments for a student to
demonstrate achievement of state academic standards. The objective
alternative assessments for each content area shall be comparable in
rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on
the Washington assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement ((shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and)) is evidence that the students have successfully
met the state standard in the content areas included in the
certificate. ((With the exception of students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, acquisition of the certificate is
required for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.))
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a
student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more
content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement,
then the student may retake the assessment in the content area up to
four times at no cost to the student. If the student successfully
meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the
student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Once
objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection
(((11))) (10) of this section, a student may use the objective
alternative assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully
meets the state standards for that content area if the student has
retaken the Washington assessment of student learning at least once.
If the student successfully meets the state standards on the objective
alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement. ((The student's transcript shall note whether
the certificate of academic achievement was acquired by means of the
Washington assessment of student learning or by an alternative
assessment.))
(4) Beginning with the graduating class of 2010, a student must
meet the state standards in science in addition to the other content
areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the Washington
assessment of student learning or the objective alternative assessments
in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) ((Beginning with the graduating class of 2006, the highest
scale score and level achieved in each content area on the high school
Washington assessment of student learning shall be displayed on a
student's transcript. In addition, beginning with the graduating class
of 2008, each student shall receive a scholar's designation on his or
her transcript for each content area in which the student achieves
level four the first time the student takes that content area
assessment.
(8))) Beginning in 2006, school districts must make available to
students the following options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(((9))) (8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of
the high school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall
pay for retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(((10))) (9) Subject to available funding, the superintendent shall
pilot opportunities for retaking the high school assessment beginning
in the 2004-05 school year. Beginning no later than September 2006,
opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year shall be
available to each school district.
(((11))) (10) The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop options for implementing objective
alternative assessments, which may include an appeals process, for
students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic standards.
The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable in rigor to
the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the
Washington assessment of student learning and be objective in its
determination of student achievement of the state standards. Before
any objective alternative assessments are used by a student to
demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in a content
area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall formally
approve the use of any objective alternative assessments through the
omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution.
(((12))) (11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives
and senate education committees shall obtain information and
conclusions from recognized, independent, national assessment experts
regarding the validity and reliability of the high school Washington
assessment of student learning for making individual student high
school graduation determinations.
(((13))) (12) To help assure continued progress in academic
achievement as a foundation for high school graduation and to assure
that students are on track for high school graduation, each school
district shall prepare plans for students as provided in this
subsection (((13))) (12).
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content
areas of the Washington assessment for student learning during the
previous school year. The plan shall include the courses,
competencies, and other steps needed to be taken by the student to meet
state academic standards and stay on track for graduation. This
requirement shall be phased in as follows:
(i) Beginning no later than the 2004-05 school year ninth grade
students as described in this subsection (((13))) (12)(a) shall have a
plan.
(ii) Beginning no later than the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter eighth grade students as described in this subsection
(((13))) (12)(a) shall have a plan.
(iii) The parent or guardian shall be notified, preferably through
a parent conference, of the student's results on the Washington
assessment of student learning, actions the school intends to take to
improve the student's skills in any content area in which the student
was unsuccessful, strategies to help them improve their student's
skills, and the content of the student's plan.
(iv) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.
(b) Beginning with the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter, all fifth grade students who were not successful in one or
more of the content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment of
student learning shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of a student described in this
subsection (((13))) (12)(b) shall be notified, preferably through a
parent conference, of the student's results on the Washington
assessment of student learning, actions the school intends to take to
improve the student's skills in any content area in which the student
was unsuccessful, and provide strategies to help them improve their
student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.155.045 and 2004 c 19 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, students served under
this chapter, who are not appropriately assessed by the high school
Washington assessment system as defined in RCW 28A.655.061, even with
accommodations, may earn a certificate of individual achievement. The
certificate may be earned using multiple ways to demonstrate skills and
abilities commensurate with their individual education programs. The
determination of whether the high school assessment system is
appropriate shall be made by the student's individual education program
team. ((For these students, the certificate of individual achievement
is required for graduation from a public high school, but need not be
the only requirement for graduation.)) When measures other than the
high school assessment system as defined in RCW 28A.655.061 are used,
the measures shall be in agreement with the appropriate educational
opportunity provided for the student as required by this chapter. The
superintendent of public instruction shall develop the guidelines for
determining which students should not be required to participate in the
high school assessment system and which types of assessments are
appropriate to use.
When measures other than the high school assessment system as
defined in RCW 28A.655.061 are used for high school graduation
purposes, the student's high school transcript shall note whether that
student has earned a certificate of individual achievement.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny a student the
right to participation in the high school assessment system as defined
in RCW 28A.655.061, and, upon successfully meeting the high school
standard, receipt of the certificate of academic achievement.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2005 c 205 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) ((The certificate of academic achievement requirements under
RCW 28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement
requirements under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a
public high school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c))) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of
education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

--- END ---