BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to income received by a nonprofit
corporation organized under chapter 24.03 RCW from the state or any
county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation,
port district, or public corporation for the promotion of conventions
and tourism.

--- END ---