BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.34.067 and 1999 c 176 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Where appropriate, an investigation by the department may
include a private interview with the vulnerable adult regarding the
alleged abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect.
(2) In conducting the investigation, the department shall interview
the complainant, unless anonymous, and shall use its best efforts to
interview the vulnerable adult or adults harmed, and, consistent with
the protection of the vulnerable adult shall interview facility staff,
any available independent sources of relevant information, including if
appropriate the family members of the vulnerable adult.
(3) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with: (a) Those persons or agencies required to report
under this chapter or submit a report under this chapter; (b)
consultants designated by the department; and (c) designated
representatives of Washington Indian tribes if client information
exchanged is pertinent to cases under investigation or the provision of
protective services. Information considered privileged by statute and
not directly related to reports required by this chapter must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(4) The department shall prepare and keep on file a report of each
investigation conducted by the department for a period of time in
accordance with policies established by the department.
(5) If the department determines that the vulnerable adult has
suffered from abuse, neglect, self-neglect, abandonment, or financial
exploitation, and lacks the ability or capacity to consent, and needs
the protection of a guardian, the department may bring a guardianship
action under chapter 11.88 RCW as an interested person.
(6) When the investigation is completed and the department
determines that an incident of abandonment, abuse, financial
exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect has occurred, the department
shall inform the vulnerable adult of their right to refuse protective
services, and ensure that, if necessary, appropriate protective
services are provided to the vulnerable adult, with the consent of the
vulnerable adult. The vulnerable adult has the right to withdraw or
refuse protective services.
(7) The department may photograph a vulnerable adult or their
environment for the purpose of providing documentary evidence of the
physical condition of the vulnerable adult or his or her environment.
When photographing the vulnerable adult, the department shall obtain
permission from the vulnerable adult or his or her legal representative
unless immediate photographing is necessary to preserve evidence.
However, if the legal representative is alleged to have abused,
neglected, abandoned, or exploited the vulnerable adult, consent from
the legal representative is not necessary. No such consent is
necessary when photographing the physical environment.
(((8) When the investigation is complete and the department
determines that the incident of abandonment, abuse, financial
exploitation, or neglect has occurred, the department shall inform the
facility in which the incident occurred, consistent with
confidentiality requirements concerning the vulnerable adult,
witnesses, and complainants.))

Sec. 2 RCW 74.34.095 and 2000 c 87 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following information is confidential and not subject to
disclosure, except as provided in this section:
(a) A report of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or
neglect made under this chapter;
(b) The identity of the person making the report; and
(c) All files, reports, records, communications, and working papers
used or developed in the investigation or provision of protective
services.
(2) Information considered confidential ((may)) shall be disclosed
((only for a purpose consistent with this chapter or)):
(a) As authorized by chapter 18.20, 18.51, 70.128, or 74.39A RCW,
or as authorized by the long-term care ombudsman programs under federal
law or state law, chapter 43.190 RCW((.));
(((3))) (b) In the following circumstances:
(i) Upon request, the department shall disclose the fact that a
report was received and the status of any investigation, unless the
department has a reason to believe disclosing such information may
compromise the safety or well-being of a vulnerable adult. The status
of the investigation provided by the department must include, at a
minimum, whether or not an investigator has been assigned, whether the
investigation is completed or ongoing, and an estimate for when the
investigation will be completed;
(ii) Upon request, the department shall provide a written report of
the outcome of the completed investigation to an agency, program, or
provider serving a vulnerable adult. The name of the alleged
perpetrator may be disclosed. The report on the outcome of an
investigation must include, at a minimum, a determination by the
department as to whether or not an incident of abuse, neglect,
abandonment, or financial exploitation has occurred. The department
shall not disclose the identity of the person making the report to the
department or any witness without such individual's written permission.
The term "witness" does not include the alleged perpetrator. The
agency, program, or provider receiving a written report of the outcome
of the completed investigation shall be informed whether the finding is
subject to the alleged perpetrator's right to an administrative appeal
or is final;
(iii) Upon request of a legislator or a director of a state agency
as defined in RCW 42.17.020 serving vulnerable adults or children, the
department will disclose the outcome of a completed investigation under
this chapter. In cases where the department determines that an
incident of abuse, abandonment, neglect, or financial exploitation has
occurred, the requestor shall be informed whether the finding is
subject to the alleged perpetrator's right to an administrative appeal
or is final;
(iv) The department shall provide a written investigation report to
the appropriate state or local government authorities responsible for
licensing, certification, or registration of the agencies, programs, or
providers serving the vulnerable adult. Upon request, the department
must provide the appropriate state or local governmental authority with
information or documents obtained in the course of its investigation;
and
(v) When the investigation is complete and the department
determines that the incident of abandonment, abuse, financial
exploitation, or neglect has occurred, the department shall inform the
facility in which the incident occurred of the completed investigation
including the outcome of the investigation.
(3) In cases where the department finds a report of abuse,
abandonment, neglect, or financial exploitation has occurred, the
department shall notify the alleged perpetrator in writing. The
notification may identify the vulnerable adult, but shall not disclose
the identity of the person who made the report, or the identity of any
witness. The term "witness" does not include the alleged perpetrator.
The notification must contain information on administrative appeal
rights.
(4) A court or presiding officer in an administrative proceeding
may order disclosure of confidential information only if the court, or
presiding officer in an administrative proceeding, determines that
disclosure is essential to the administration of justice and will not
endanger the life or safety of the vulnerable adult or individual who
made the report. The court or presiding officer in an administrative
hearing may place restrictions on such disclosure as the court or
presiding officer deems proper.
(5) The department shall adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.34 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall establish by rule a state registry that
contains identifying information provided under this chapter about
individuals found to have abused, abandoned, neglected, or financially
exploited a vulnerable adult. Identifying information under this
section is limited to postdue process findings made by the department
under this chapter. The department shall make readily available to the
public a means to query the state registry to determine if an
individual has been found by the department to have abused, abandoned,
neglected, or financially exploited a vulnerable adult.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 74.34.068 (Investigation results--Report -- Rules) and 2001 c 233 s 2 are each repealed.

--- END ---