BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to amounts derived from sales of
chemotherapy and anticancer drugs for infusion or injection for human
use pursuant to a prescription sold at the then current federal rate by
licensed physicians. The federal rate means the rate at or below which
the federal government or its agents reimburse providers for
prescription drugs administered to cancer patients as provided for in
the medicare, part B, drugs average sales price information resource as
published by the United States department of health and human services,
or any successor index thereto.

--- END ---