BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79A.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The habitat and recreation lands coordinating group is
established. The habitat and recreation lands coordinating group must
include representatives from the committee, the state parks and
recreation commission, the department of natural resources, and the
Washington state department of fish and wildlife. The members of the
habitat and recreation lands coordinating group must have subject
matter expertise with the issues presented in this section.
Representatives from appropriate stakeholder organizations and local
government must also be considered for participation on the habitat and
recreation lands coordinating group.
(2) To ensure timely completion of the duties assigned to the
habitat and recreation lands coordinating group, yearly progress
reports to either the office of financial management or the director
are required.
(3) The habitat and recreation lands coordinating group must:
(a) Develop language to amend agency land acquisition, management,
and disposal plans and policies to help provide for statewide
coordination of habitat and recreation land acquisitions and disposals;
(b) Develop standards for producing an interagency, statewide
biennial forecast of habitat and recreation land acquisitions and
disposals;
(c) Establish procedures for submitting the biennial acquisition
and disposal plans;
(d) Develop and convene an annual forum for agencies to coordinate
their near-term acquisition and disposal plans;
(e) Develop a recommended standard for interagency geographic
information system-based documentation of habitat and recreation lands
in cooperation with other state agencies using geographic information
systems;
(f) Standardize acquisition and disposal recordkeeping;
(g) Identify a preferred process for centralizing acquisition data;
(h) Develop an approach for monitoring the success of acquisitions;
(i) Identify and commence a dialogue with key state and federal
partners to develop an inventory of potential public lands for transfer
into habitat and recreation land management status;
(j) Review existing and proposed habitat conservation plans on a
regular basis to achieve statewide coordination and save costs.
(4) The committee shall revisit the committee's and Washington
wildlife and recreation program's planning requirements to determine
whether coordination of state agency habitat and recreation land
acquisition and disposal could be improved by modifying those
requirements.
(5) The committee must develop options for centralizing
coordination of habitat and recreation land acquisition made with funds
from federal grants. The advantages and drawbacks of the following
options, at a minimum, must be developed:
(a) Requiring agencies simply to provide early communication on the
status of federal grant applications to the committee, the office of
financial management, or directly to the legislature;
(b) Establishing a centralized pass-through agency for federal
funds, where individual agencies would be the primary applicants.

--- END ---