BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.50.020 and 2002 c 323 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In every construction defect action brought against a
construction professional, the claimant shall, no later than forty-five
days before filing an action, serve written notice of claim on the
construction professional. The notice of claim shall state that the
claimant asserts a construction defect claim against the construction
professional and shall describe the claim in reasonable detail
sufficient to determine the general nature of the defect.
(2) Within twenty-one days after service of the notice of claim,
the construction professional shall serve a written response on the
claimant by registered mail or personal service. The written response
shall:
(a) Propose to inspect the residence that is the subject of the
claim and to complete the inspection within a specified time frame.
The proposal shall include the statement that the construction
professional shall, based on the inspection, offer to remedy the
defect, compromise by payment, or dispute the claim;
(b) Offer to compromise and settle the claim by monetary payment
without inspection. A construction professional's offer under this
subsection (2)(b) to compromise and settle a homeowner's claim may
include, but is not limited to, an express offer to purchase the
claimant's residence that is the subject of the claim, and to pay the
claimant's reasonable relocation costs; or
(c) State that the construction professional disputes the claim and
will neither remedy the construction defect nor compromise and settle
the claim.
(3)(a) If the construction professional disputes the claim or does
not respond to the claimant's notice of claim within the time stated in
subsection (2) of this section, the claimant may bring an action
against the construction professional for the claim described in the
notice of claim without further notice.
(b) If the claimant rejects the inspection proposal or the
settlement offer made by the construction professional pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section, the claimant shall serve written notice
of the claimant's rejection on the construction professional. After
service of the rejection, the claimant may bring an action against the
construction professional for the construction defect claim described
in the notice of claim. If the construction professional has not
received from the claimant, within thirty days after the claimant's
receipt of the construction professional's response, either an
acceptance or rejection of the inspection proposal or settlement offer,
then at anytime thereafter the construction professional may terminate
the proposal or offer by serving written notice to the claimant, and
the claimant may thereafter bring an action against the construction
professional for the construction defect claim described in the notice
of claim.
(4)(a) If the claimant elects to allow the construction
professional to inspect in accordance with the construction
professional's proposal pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section,
the claimant shall provide the construction professional and its
contractors or other agents reasonable access to the claimant's
residence during normal working hours to inspect the premises and the
claimed defect.
(b) Within fourteen days following completion of the inspection,
the construction professional shall serve on the claimant:
(i) A written offer to remedy the construction defect at no cost to
the claimant, including a report of the scope of the inspection, the
findings and results of the inspection, a description of the additional
construction necessary to remedy the defect described in the claim, and
a timetable for the completion of such construction;
(ii) A written offer to compromise and settle the claim by monetary
payment pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section; or
(iii) A written statement that the construction professional will
not proceed further to remedy the defect.
(c) If the construction professional does not proceed further to
remedy the construction defect within the agreed timetable, or if the
construction professional fails to comply with the provisions of (b) of
this subsection, the claimant may bring an action against the
construction professional for the claim described in the notice of
claim without further notice.
(d) If the claimant rejects the offer made by the construction
professional pursuant to (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection to either
remedy the construction defect or to compromise and settle the claim by
monetary payment, the claimant shall serve written notice of the
claimant's rejection on the construction professional. After service
of the rejection notice, the claimant may bring an action against the
construction professional for the construction defect claim described
in the notice of claim. If the construction professional has not
received from the claimant, within thirty days after the claimant's
receipt of the construction professional's response, either an
acceptance or rejection of the offer made pursuant to (b)(i) or (ii) of
this subsection, then at anytime thereafter the construction
professional may terminate the offer by serving written notice to the
claimant.
(5)(a) Any claimant accepting the offer of a construction
professional to remedy the construction defect pursuant to subsection
(4)(b)(i) of this section shall do so by serving the construction
professional with a written notice of acceptance within a reasonable
time period after receipt of the offer, and no later than thirty days
after receipt of the offer. The claimant shall provide the
construction professional and its contractors or other agents
reasonable access to the claimant's residence during normal working
hours to perform and complete the construction by the timetable stated
in the offer.
(b) The claimant and construction professional may, by written
mutual agreement, alter the extent of construction or the timetable for
completion of construction stated in the offer, including, but not
limited to, repair of additional defects.
(6) Any action commenced by a claimant prior to compliance with the
requirements of this section shall be subject to dismissal without
prejudice, and may not be recommenced until the claimant has complied
with the requirements of this section. If an action is dismissed
without prejudice under this section, the applicable statute of
limitations for the claims shall be tolled from the earlier of the
commencement of the dismissed action or the service of the original
notice of claim, and shall remain tolled until sixty days after the
period of time during which the filing of a subsequent action is barred
under this section.
(7) Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent a claimant
from commencing an action on the construction defect claim described in
the notice of claim if the construction professional fails to perform
the construction agreed upon, fails to remedy the defect, or fails to
perform by the timetable agreed upon pursuant to subsection (2)(a) or
(5) of this section.
(8) Prior to commencing any action alleging a construction defect,
or after the dismissal of any action without prejudice pursuant to
subsection (6) of this section, the claimant may amend the notice of
claim to include construction defects discovered after the service of
the original notice of claim, and must otherwise comply with the
requirements of this section for the additional claims. The service of
an amended notice of claim shall relate back to the original notice of
claim for purposes of tolling statutes of limitations and repose.
Claims for defects discovered after the commencement or recommencement
of an action may be added to such action only after providing notice to
the construction professional of the defect and allowing for response
under subsection (2) of this section.

--- END ---