BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a
shortage of skilled workers in Washington state. The shortage of
qualified applicants is greatest for jobs requiring postsecondary
education.
Providing the opportunity to temporary assistance for needy
families recipients to pursue postsecondary education will help bridge
the skilled worker shortage gap.
With that goal in mind, the legislature intends to provide working
connections child care for temporary assistance for needy families
recipients, so that they can complete postsecondary education, while
also meeting their work requirements, in order to secure careers to
benefit themselves, their families, and society.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
If a temporary assistance for needy families participant is meeting
his or her individual responsibility plan employment or work
requirements, and is eligible for working connections child care, the
participant shall be eligible for working connections child care for
all the hours the participant is working and enrolled in a vocational,
educational, or training program.

--- END ---