BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of social and health services
is providing a structured, therapeutic environment for persons who are
eligible for placement in the community protection program in order for
them to live safely and successfully in the community while minimizing
the risk to public safety.
The legislature approves of steps already taken by the department
to create a community protection program within the division of
developmental disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Sections 3 through 9 of this act apply to a
person:
(1)(a) Who: (i)(A) Has been charged with or convicted of a crime
of sexual violence as defined in chapter 9A.44 or 71.09 RCW, including,
but not limited to, rape, rape of a child, and child molestation; or
(B) has been charged with or convicted of one or more violent offenses,
as defined by RCW 9.94A.030; and (ii) constitutes a current risk to
others as determined by a qualified professional. Charges or crimes
that resulted in acquittal must be excluded, except where admission to
the community protection program is initiated by the individual; or
(b) Who has not been charged with and/or convicted of a crime, but
has a history of stalking, sexually violent, predatory, and/or
opportunistic behavior, which demonstrates a likelihood to commit a
sexually violent and/or predatory act based on current behaviors, and
constitutes a current risk to others as determined by a qualified
professional; and
(2) Who has been determined to have a developmental disability as
defined by RCW 71A.10.020(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Assessment" means the written opinion of a qualified
professional stating, at a minimum:
(a) Whether a person meets the criteria established in section 2 of
this act;
(b) What restrictions are necessary.
(2) "Certified community protection program intensive supported
living services" means access to twenty-four-hour supervision,
instruction, and support services as identified in the person's plan of
care.
(3) "Community protection program" means services specifically
designed to support persons who meet the criteria of section 2 of this
act.
(4) "Constitutes a risk to others" means a determination of a
person's risk and/or dangerousness based upon a thorough assessment by
a qualified professional.
(5) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(6) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW
71A.10.020(3).
(7) "Disclosure" means providing copies of professional
assessments, incident reports, legal documents, and other information
pertaining to community protection issues to ensure the provider has
all relevant information. Polygraph and plethysmograph reports are
excluded from disclosure.
(8) "Division" means the division of developmental disabilities.
(9) "Managed successfully" means that a person supported by a
community protection program does not engage in the behavior identified
in section 2 of this act.
(10) "Opportunistic behavior" means an act committed on impulse,
which is not premeditated.
(11) "Predatory" means acts directed toward strangers, individuals
with whom a relationship has been established or promoted for the
primary purpose of victimization, or casual acquaintances with whom no
substantial personal relationship exists. Predatory behavior may be
characterized by planning and/or rehearsing the act, stalking, and/or
grooming the victim.
(12) "Qualified professional" means a person with at least three
years' prior experience working with individuals with developmental
disabilities, and: (a) If the person being assessed has demonstrated
sexually aggressive or sexually violent behavior, that person must be
assessed by a qualified professional who is a certified sex offender
treatment provider, or affiliate sex offender treatment provider
working under the supervision of a certified sex offender treatment
provider; or (b) If the person being assessed has demonstrated violent,
dangerous, or aggressive behavior, that person must be assessed by a
licensed psychologist or psychiatrist who has received specialized
training in the treatment of or has at least three years' prior
experience treating violent or aggressive behavior.
(13) "Treatment team" means the program participant and the group
of people responsible for the development, implementation, and
monitoring of the person's individualized supports and services. This
group may include, but is not limited to, the case resource manager,
therapist, residential provider, employment/day program provider, and
the person's legal representative and/or family, provided the person
consents to the family member's involvement.
(14) "Violent offense" means any felony defined as a violent
offense in RCW 9.94A.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Prior to receiving services through the
community protection program, a person must first receive an assessment
of risk and/or dangerousness by a qualified professional. The
assessment must be consistent with the guidelines for risk assessments
and psychosexual evaluations developed by the department. The person
requesting services and the person's legal representative have the
right to choose the qualified professional who will perform the
assessment from a list of state contracted qualified professionals.
The assessment must contain, at a minimum, a determination by the
qualified professional whether the person can be managed successfully
in the community with reasonably available safeguards and that lesser
restrictive residential placement alternatives have been considered and
would not be reasonable for the person seeking services. The
department may request an additional evaluation by a qualified
professional evaluator who is contracted with the state.
(2) Any person being considered for placement in the community
protection program and his or her legal representative must be informed
in writing of the following: (a) Limitations regarding the services
that will be available due to the person's community protection issues;
(b) disclosure requirements as a condition of receiving services other
than case management; (c) the requirement to engage in therapeutic
treatment may be a condition of receiving certain services; (d)
anticipated restrictions that may be provided including, but not
limited to intensive supervision, limited access to television viewing,
reading material, videos; (e) the right to accept or decline services;
(f) the anticipated consequences of declining services such as the loss
of existing services and removal from waiver services; (g) the right to
an administrative fair hearing in accordance with department and
division policy; (h) the requirement to sign a preplacement agreement
as a condition of receiving community protection intensive supported
living services; (i) the right to retain current services during the
pendency of any challenge to the department's decision; (j) the right
to refuse to participate in the program.
(3)(a) If the department determines that a person is appropriate
for placement in the community protection program, the individual and
his or her legal representative shall receive in writing a
determination by the department that the person meets the criteria for
placement within the community protection program.
(b) If the department determines that a person cannot be managed
successfully in the community protection program with reasonably
available safeguards, the department must notify the person and his or
her legal representative in writing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Individuals receiving services through
the department's community protection waiver retain all appeal rights
provided for in RCW 71A.10.050. In addition, such individuals have a
right to an administrative hearing pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW to
appeal the following decisions by the department:
(a) Termination of community protection waiver eligibility;
(b) Assignment of the applicant to the community protection waiver;
(c) Denial of a request for less restrictive community residential
placement.
(2) Final administrative decisions may be appealed pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 34.05.510.
(3) The secretary shall adopt rules concerning the procedure
applicable to requests for hearings under this section and governing
the conduct thereof.
(4) When the department takes any action described in subsection
(1) of this section it shall give notice as provided by RCW 71A.10.060.
The notice must include a statement advising the person enrolled on the
community protection waiver of the right to an adjudicative proceeding
and the time limits for filing an application for an adjudicative
proceeding. Notice must also include a statement advising the
recipient of the right to file a petition for judicial review of a
final administrative decision as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(5) Nothing in this section creates an entitlement to placement on
the community protection waiver nor does it create a right to an
administrative hearing on department decisions denying placement on the
community protection waiver.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Community protection program
participants shall have appropriate opportunities to receive services
in the least restrictive manner and in the least restrictive
environments possible. When considering requests or recommendations
for lessening program restrictions, reducing supervision, or
terminating services, careful consideration to the safety and welfare
of both the individual and the community must be given.
(2) There must be a review by the treatment team every ninety days
to assess each participant's progress, evaluate use of less restrictive
measures, and make changes in the participant's program as necessary.
The team must review all restrictions and recommend reductions if
appropriate. The therapist must write a report annually evaluating the
participant's risk of offense and/or risk of behaviors that are
dangerous to self or others. The department shall have rules in place
describing this process. If a treatment team member has reason to be
concerned that circumstances have changed significantly, the team
member may request that a complete reassessment be conducted at any
time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A participant who demonstrates success in
complying with reduced restrictions and remains free of offenses that
may indicate a relapse for at least twelve months, may be considered
for placement in a less restrictive community residential setting. The
participant must show, at a minimum that he or she is complying with
reduced restrictions and remains free of offense that would indicate
relapse for at least twelve months.
The process to move a participant to a less restrictive residential
placement shall include:
(1) Written verification of the person's treatment progress,
assessment of low risk of reoffense, and a recommendation as to
suitable placement by the treatment team;
(2) Development of a gradual phase out plan by the treatment team,
projected over a reasonable period of time and includes specific
criteria for evaluating reductions in restrictions, especially
supervision;
(3) The absence of any incidents that may indicate relapse for a
minimum of twelve months;
(4) A written plan that details what supports and services,
including the level of supervision the person will receive from the
division upon exiting the community protection program;
(5) An assessment consistent with the guidelines for risk
assessments and psychosexual evaluations developed by the division,
conducted by a qualified professional, evaluating the participant's
risk of reoffense and/or dangerousness, including an opinion as to
whether or not the person can be managed successfully in a less
restrictive community residential setting;
(6) Recommendation by the treatment team that the participant is
ready to move to a less restrictive community residential placement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The department is authorized to take one
or more of the enforcement actions listed in subsection (2) of this
section when the department finds that a provider of residential
services and support with whom the department entered into an agreement
with under this chapter has:
(a) Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or the rules adopted under it;
(b) Failed or refused to cooperate with the certification process;
(c) Prevented or interfered with a certification, inspection, or
investigation by the department;
(d) Failed to comply with any applicable requirements regarding
vulnerable adults under chapter 74.34 RCW;
(e) Knowingly, or with reason to know, made a false statement of
material fact related to certification or contracting with the
department or in any matter under investigation by the department.
(2) The department may:
(a) Decertify or refuse to renew the certification of a provider;
(b) Impose conditions on the provider's certification;
(c) Suspend department referrals to the provider;
(d) Impose civil penalties of not more than three hundred dollars
per day per violation. Each day during which the same or similar
action or inaction occurs constitutes a separate violation; or
(e) Require a provider to implement a plan of correction developed
by the department, and to cooperate with subsequent monitoring of the
provider's progress.
(3) When determining the appropriate enforcement action or actions
to take under subsection (2) of this section, the department must
select actions commensurate with the seriousness of the harm or threat
of harm, to the persons being served by the provider. Further, the
department may take enforcement actions that are more severe for
violations that are uncorrected, repeated, pervasive, or present a
serious threat of harm to the health, safety, or welfare of persons
served by the provider.
(4) The provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW apply to enforcement
actions under this section. Except for the imposition of civil
penalties, the effective date of enforcement actions shall not be
delayed or suspended pending any hearing or informal review.
(5) The enforcement actions authorized in this section are not
exclusive and nothing in this section prohibits the department from
taking any other action authorized in statute or rule or under the
terms of a contract with the provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The department shall develop and maintain
rules, guidelines, or policy manuals, as appropriate, for implementing
and maintaining the community protection program under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 2 through 9 of this act are each
added to chapter 71A.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---