BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Washington state patrol officers may request that an extended
authority commission be granted by the chief of the Washington state
patrol.
(2) State patrol officers who desire an extended authority
commission shall request and complete an extended authority commission
packet and satisfy the following requirements:
(a) Acquire a Washington state-approved first aid certification
card valid through the year of extended authority;
(b) Qualify with their firearm in accordance with Washington state
patrol rules or guidelines;
(c) Must be under the age limit specified in RCW 43.43.250; and
(d) Pay a fee of fifty dollars to the Washington state patrol.
(3) If the state patrol officer satisfies the requirements under
subsection (2) of this section, the Washington state patrol shall
photograph the officer and issue him or her a Washington state patrol
commission card that will expire January 15th of the following year.
However, an officer may renew his or her state patrol commission card
in accordance with Washington state patrol rules or guidelines.
(4) A state patrol officer, who is granted extended authority by
the chief of the Washington state patrol, may be issued a badge set,
gun, and handcuffs, and any additional uniform requirements, if the
officer pays a cash deposit equal to the value of the equipment
selected or a sum determined by the Washington state patrol. The
Washington state patrol shall refund any cash deposit in full upon
return of the equipment in good condition.
(5) A state patrol officer must provide proof of liability
insurance issued for and paid entirely by the officer within one month
after being granted extended authority commission.
(6) The chief of the Washington state patrol may revoke the grant
of extended authority commission for any reason.

--- END ---