BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the current
system in this state of allowing hospitals without on-site open heart
surgery programs to perform emergency but not nonemergency angioplasty
and stent placements, also known as percutaneous coronary intervention,
is an inefficient system and is impacting access to and quality of
cardiac services in many communities throughout the state. Negative
consequences of the current system include:
(a) An inability for many communities to recruit and retain
cardiologists resulting in a shortage of cardiologists that impacts the
availability, accessibility, and quality of comprehensive cardiac
services;
(b) Duplication of diagnostic tests, evaluations, and other
procedures, which leads to increased patient risk; and
(c) Higher costs associated with duplication, transfers, and longer
hospital stays.
(2) While advancements in technology have expanded the availability
of nonemergency percutaneous coronary interventions at many hospitals
without on-site open heart surgery programs both nationally and
internationally, Washington state only allows hospitals without on-site
open heart surgery programs to perform percutaneous coronary
interventions on an emergency basis. The number of hospitals
performing nonemergency percutaneous coronary interventions without
on-site open heart surgery programs continues to grow in the United
States. These interventions are also being performed in every
industrialized country in Europe, and this practice is approved by the
European society for cardiology. Despite this growing trend, concerns
regarding whether nonemergency percutaneous coronary interventions can
be performed safely and effectively in hospitals without on-site open
heart surgery programs continue to be raised because existing data is
gathered from registries, not randomized trials.
(3) The Johns Hopkins cardiovascular patient outcomes research team
elective angioplasty study, conducted in partnership with nationally
renowned cardiologists and researchers from the nation's top research
institutions, is a randomized clinical trial comparing nonemergency
percutaneous coronary interventions performed at hospitals with and
without on-site open heart surgery programs. The Johns Hopkins study
is designed to gather the highest quality evidence-based data to answer
the concerns raised.
(4) It is the intent of the legislature that Washington state allow
qualified hospitals to participate in the Johns Hopkins study, without
certificate of need review. The study will ensure that future
decisions on cardiac service delivery in Washington are made on
evidence-based data, and where possible, such data shall include data
specific to Washington state. The legislature finds that participation
in the study is in the best interests of our citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) As used in sections 1 through 3 of this
act and RCW 70.38.105, "Johns Hopkins study" means the Johns Hopkins
cardiovascular patient outcomes research team elective angioplasty
study.
(2) The department, in selecting Washington state hospitals to
participate in the Johns Hopkins study, shall require that each
hospital:
(a) Develop and maintain an agreement with another hospital that
has an existing on-site open heart surgery program and agrees to accept
emergency and nonemergency transfers of patients for additional
intervention, cardiac surgery, or other medical care from the
participating hospital;
(b) Develop and maintain agreements with emergency transfer or
ambulance services capable of providing advanced life support,
including an intra-aortic balloon pump;
(c) Currently operate an emergency percutaneous coronary
intervention program;
(d) Demonstrate the ability to perform a minimum of two hundred
nonemergency and emergency percutaneous coronary interventions per
year. Hospitals shall provide documentation on current diagnostic
catheterization procedures and emergency percutaneous coronary
intervention volumes, as well as current cardiologist procedure
volumes. The department shall, in consultation with Johns Hopkins,
determine if the documentation is sufficient to meet this criterion;
and
(e) Meet all Johns Hopkins study criteria, be accepted for
participation in the Johns Hopkins study, and agree to abide by the
Johns Hopkins study protocols.
(3) The department, in consultation with Johns Hopkins, shall not
approve any hospital to participate in the Johns Hopkins study if:
(a) Participation would reduce the number of emergency and
nonemergency percutaneous coronary interventions at any hospital with
an existing open heart surgery program that currently performs more
than three hundred total interventions annually to below three hundred
interventions per year;
(b) Participation would reduce the number of emergency and
nonemergency percutaneous coronary interventions at any hospital with
an existing open heart surgery program that currently performs less
than three hundred emergency and nonemergency percutaneous coronary
interventions annually to below two hundred twenty interventions per
year; or
(c) Another hospital located within a two-mile radius of a hospital
being considered for participation submits a written objection to such
participation.
(4) Any hospital that meets the requirements of this section shall
be selected by the department for participation in the Johns Hopkins
study up to a maximum of three. If qualified, at least one hospital
shall be from a rural area.
(5) Those hospitals selected to participate in the Johns Hopkins
study shall be allowed to perform nonemergency percutaneous coronary
interventions without on-site open heart surgery programs and shall not
be subject to the certificate of need review requirements in RCW
70.38.105 (3) and (4) only for the specific time period and purpose of
the Johns Hopkins study. This limited exemption from certificate of
need review is in the public interest and is necessary to the conduct
of the study.
(6) The department shall monitor the outcomes of the Johns Hopkins
study, obtain quarterly reports from Johns Hopkins, and send those
reports to the chairs of the house of representatives and senate health
committees.
(7) The department may terminate any hospital's participation in
the study if, after consultation with Johns Hopkins, it finds that the
hospital's participation is endangering the health and safety of
Washington citizens. The department may also terminate Washington
state participation in the Johns Hopkins study if, after consultation
with Johns Hopkins, it finds that the study is endangering the health
and safety of Washington citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department shall require hospitals
participating in the Johns Hopkins study to submit an application fee
to the department to cover appropriate costs, not covered by the Johns
Hopkins study, for the administration of the Johns Hopkins study by the
department.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.38.105 and 2004 c 261 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is authorized and directed to implement the
certificate of need program in this state pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter.
(2) There shall be a state certificate of need program which is
administered consistent with the requirements of federal law as
necessary to the receipt of federal funds by the state.
(3) No person shall engage in any undertaking which is subject to
certificate of need review under subsection (4) of this section without
first having received from the department either a certificate of need
or an exception granted in accordance with this chapter.
(4) Except for nonemergency percutaneous coronary interventions
performed at hospitals selected by the department to participate in the
Johns Hopkins study as provided in sections 1 through 3 of this act,
the following shall be subject to certificate of need review under this
chapter:
(a) The construction, development, or other establishment of a new
health care facility;
(b) The sale, purchase, or lease of part or all of any existing
hospital as defined in RCW 70.38.025;
(c) Any capital expenditure for the construction, renovation, or
alteration of a nursing home which substantially changes the services
of the facility after January 1, 1981, provided that the substantial
changes in services are specified by the department in rule;
(d) Any capital expenditure for the construction, renovation, or
alteration of a nursing home which exceeds the expenditure minimum as
defined by RCW 70.38.025. However, a capital expenditure which is not
subject to certificate of need review under (a), (b), (c), or (e) of
this subsection and which is solely for any one or more of the
following is not subject to certificate of need review:
(i) Communications and parking facilities;
(ii) Mechanical, electrical, ventilation, heating, and air
conditioning systems;
(iii) Energy conservation systems;
(iv) Repairs to, or the correction of, deficiencies in existing
physical plant facilities which are necessary to maintain state
licensure, however, other additional repairs, remodeling, or
replacement projects that are not related to one or more deficiency
citations and are not necessary to maintain state licensure are not
exempt from certificate of need review except as otherwise permitted by
(d)(vi) of this subsection or RCW 70.38.115(13);
(v) Acquisition of equipment, including data processing equipment,
which is not or will not be used in the direct provision of health
services;
(vi) Construction or renovation at an existing nursing home which
involves physical plant facilities, including administrative, dining
areas, kitchen, laundry, therapy areas, and support facilities, by an
existing licensee who has operated the beds for at least one year;
(vii) Acquisition of land; and
(viii) Refinancing of existing debt;
(e) A change in bed capacity of a health care facility which
increases the total number of licensed beds or redistributes beds among
acute care, nursing home care, and boarding home care if the bed
redistribution is to be effective for a period in excess of six months,
or a change in bed capacity of a rural health care facility licensed
under RCW 70.175.100 that increases the total number of nursing home
beds or redistributes beds from acute care or boarding home care to
nursing home care if the bed redistribution is to be effective for a
period in excess of six months. A health care facility certified as a
critical access hospital under 42 U.S.C. 1395i-4 may increase its total
number of licensed beds to the total number of beds permitted under 42
U.S.C. 1395i-4 for acute care and may redistribute beds permitted under
42 U.S.C. 1395i-4 among acute care and nursing home care without being
subject to certificate of need review. If there is a nursing home
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW within twenty-seven miles of the
critical access hospital, the critical access hospital is subject to
certificate of need review except for:
(i) Critical access hospitals which had designated beds to provide
nursing home care, in excess of five swing beds, prior to December 31,
2003; or
(ii) Up to five swing beds.
Critical access hospital beds not subject to certificate of need
review under this subsection (4)(e) will not be counted as either acute
care or nursing home care for certificate of need review purposes. If
a health care facility ceases to be certified as a critical access
hospital under 42 U.S.C. 1395i-4, the hospital may revert back to the
type and number of licensed hospital beds as it had when it requested
critical access hospital designation;
(f) Any new tertiary health services which are offered in or
through a health care facility or rural health care facility licensed
under RCW 70.175.100, and which were not offered on a regular basis by,
in, or through such health care facility or rural health care facility
within the twelve-month period prior to the time such services would be
offered;
(g) Any expenditure for the construction, renovation, or alteration
of a nursing home or change in nursing home services in excess of the
expenditure minimum made in preparation for any undertaking under
subsection (4) of this section and any arrangement or commitment made
for financing such undertaking. Expenditures of preparation shall
include expenditures for architectural designs, plans, working
drawings, and specifications. The department may issue certificates of
need permitting predevelopment expenditures, only, without authorizing
any subsequent undertaking with respect to which such predevelopment
expenditures are made; and
(h) Any increase in the number of dialysis stations in a kidney
disease center.
(5) The department is authorized to charge fees for the review of
certificate of need applications and requests for exemptions from
certificate of need review. The fees shall be sufficient to cover the
full cost of review and exemption, which may include the development of
standards, criteria, and policies.
(6) No person may divide a project in order to avoid review
requirements under any of the thresholds specified in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act expire
December 31, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 70.38 RCW.

--- END ---