BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.61.130 and 1969 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A metropolitan park district has the right of eminent domain,
and may purchase, acquire and condemn lands lying within or without the
boundaries of said park district, for public parks, parkways,
boulevards, aviation landings and playgrounds, and may condemn such
lands to widen, alter and extend streets, avenues, boulevards,
parkways, aviation landings and playgrounds, to enlarge and extend
existing parks, and to acquire lands for the establishment of new
parks, boulevards, parkways, aviation landings and playgrounds. The
right of eminent domain shall be exercised and instituted pursuant to
resolution of the board of park commissioners and conducted in the same
manner and under the same procedure as is or may be provided by law for
the exercise of the power of eminent domain by incorporated cities and
towns of the state of Washington in the acquisition of property rights:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, Funds to pay for condemnation allowed by this
section shall be raised only as specified in this chapter.
(2) The board of park commissioners shall have power to employ
counsel, and to regulate, manage and control the parks, parkways,
boulevards, streets, avenues, aviation landings and playgrounds under
its control, and to provide for park ((policemen)) police, for a
secretary of the board of park commissioners and for all necessary
employees, to fix their salaries and duties.
(3) The board of park commissioners shall have power to improve,
acquire, extend and maintain, open and lay out, parks, parkways,
boulevards, avenues, aviation landings and playgrounds, within or
without the park district, and to authorize, conduct and manage the
letting of boats, or other amusement apparatus, the operation of bath
houses, the purchase and sale of foodstuffs or other merchandise, the
giving of vocal or instrumental concerts or other entertainments, the
establishment and maintenance of aviation landings and playgrounds, and
generally the management and conduct of such forms of recreation or
business as it shall judge desirable or beneficial for the public, or
for the production of revenue for expenditure for park purposes; and
may pay out moneys for the maintenance and improvement of any such
parks, parkways, boulevards, avenues, aviation landings and playgrounds
as now exist, or may hereafter be acquired, within or without the
limits of said city and for the purchase of lands within or without the
limits of said city, whenever it deems the purchase to be for the
benefit of the public and for the interest of the park district, and
for the maintenance and improvement thereof and for all expenses
incidental to its duties: PROVIDED, That all parks, boulevards,
parkways, aviation landings and playgrounds shall be subject to the
police regulations of the city within whose limits they lie.
(4) For all employees, volunteers, or independent contractors,
hired or appointed after the effective date of this section, who may,
in the course of their work or volunteer activity with the park
district, have unsupervised access to children or vulnerable adults, or
be responsible for collecting or disbursing cash or processing
credit/debit card transactions, park districts shall require a record
check through the Washington state patrol criminal identification
system under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.834, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050
and through the federal bureau of investigation before hiring or
appointing the employee, volunteer, or independent contractor. The
record check shall include a fingerprint check using a complete
Washington state criminal identification fingerprint card. The park
district shall provide a copy of the record report to the prospective
employee, volunteer, or independent contractor. When necessary, as
determined by the park district, prospective employees, volunteers, or
independent contractors may be employed on a conditional basis pending
completion of the investigation. If the prospective employee,
volunteer, or independent contractor has had a record check within the
previous twelve months, the park district may waive the requirement
upon receiving a copy of the record. The park district may in its
discretion require that the prospective employee, volunteer, or
independent contractor pay the costs associated with the record check.

--- END ---