BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.33.045 and 1995 c 270 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An adoption shall not be delayed or denied on the basis of the
race, color, or national origin of the adoptive parent or the child
involved. ((However,))
(2) When ((the department or an agency considers)) considering
whether a placement option is in a child's best interests, the
department or agency may consider the cultural, ethnic, or racial
background of the child and the capacity of prospective adoptive
parents to meet the needs of a child of this background if:
(a) A particular child presents specific compelling special
circumstances; and
(b) Consideration of the child's cultural, ethnic, or racial
background is the only way to achieve the best interest of that child.
((This))
(3) The department shall create standardized training to be
provided to all department or agency employees involved in the
placement of a child to assure compliance with Title VI of the civil
rights act of 1964 and the multiethnic placement act of 1994, as
amended by the interethnic adoption provisions of the small business
job protection act of 1996.
(4) The provisions of this section shall not apply to or affect the
application of the Indian child welfare act of 1978, 25 U.S.C. Sec.
1901 et seq.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.33 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and maintain, by rule, a
schedule of standard adoption-related fees that may be charged. The
fee schedule shall be established in consultation with:
(a) Adoption advocates;
(b) Agency representatives;
(c) Adoption attorneys;
(d) Child welfare advocates;
(e) Birth and adoptive parents and adoptees;
(f) Federally recognized tribes; and
(g) Superior court judges.
(2) Each adoption petition filed pursuant to RCW 26.33.150 seeking
adoption of a minor child shall be accompanied by a written disclosure
statement containing an itemized accounting of all moneys paid or
estimated to be paid by the petitioner for fees, costs, and expenses
related to the adoption. The form of the disclosure statement shall be
prescribed by the department in consultation with approved adoption
agencies licensed in this state.
(3) If any adoption-related fees disclosed in an adoption
proceeding are in excess of those established pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section, the court may forward a copy of the written
disclosure statement to the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 26.33 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall, in consultation with adoption advocates,
representatives of adoption agencies, adoption attorneys, child-placing
agencies, birth and adoptive parents and adoptees, federally recognized
tribes, and representatives of the superior court judges, review the
fees associated with children adopted out of the foster care system who
are dependents of the state of Washington. The review shall include a
determination of whether fees or any other factors are barriers to
adoptions of children out of the foster care system. The department
shall brief the legislature by December 1, 2006, on recommendations
related to reducing any barriers that may exist pertaining to the
adoption of children who are dependents of the state of Washington.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.33.190 and 1991 c 136 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person may at any time request an agency, the department,
an individual approved by the court, or a qualified salaried court
employee to prepare a preplacement report. A certificate signed under
penalty of perjury by the person preparing the report specifying his or
her qualifications as required in this chapter shall be attached to or
filed with each preplacement report and shall include a statement of
training or experience that qualifies the person preparing the report
to discuss relevant adoption issues. A person may have more than one
preplacement report prepared. All preplacement reports shall be filed
with the court in which the petition for adoption is filed.
(2) The preplacement report shall be a written document setting
forth all relevant information relating to the fitness of the person
requesting the report as an adoptive parent. The report shall be based
on a study which shall include an investigation of the home
environment, family life, health, facilities, and resources of the
person requesting the report. The report shall include a list of the
sources of information on which the report is based. The report shall
include a recommendation as to the fitness of the person requesting the
report to be an adoptive parent. The report shall also verify that the
following issues were discussed with the prospective adoptive parents:
(a) The concept of adoption as a lifelong developmental process and
commitment;
(b) The potential for the child to have feelings of identity
confusion and loss regarding separation from the birth parents;
(c) Disclosure of the fact of adoption to the child;
(d) The child's possible questions about birth parents and
relatives; and
(e) The relevance of the child's racial, ethnic, and cultural
heritage, if considered pursuant to RCW 26.33.045.
(3) All preplacement reports shall include an investigation of the
conviction record, pending charges, or disciplinary board final
decisions of prospective adoptive parents. The investigation shall
include an examination of state and national criminal identification
data provided by the Washington state patrol criminal identification
system as described in chapter 43.43 RCW.
(4) An agency, the department, or a court approved individual may
charge a reasonable fee based on the time spent in conducting the study
and preparing the preplacement report. The court may set a reasonable
fee for conducting the study and preparing the report when a court
employee has prepared the report. An agency, the department, a court
approved individual, or the court may reduce or waive the fee if the
financial condition of the person requesting the report so warrants.
An agency's, the department's, or court approved individual's, fee is
subject to review by the court upon request of the person requesting
the report.
(5) The person requesting the report shall designate to the agency,
the department, the court approved individual, or the court in writing
the county in which the preplacement report is to be filed. If the
person requesting the report has not filed a petition for adoption, the
report shall be indexed in the name of the person requesting the report
and a cause number shall be assigned. A fee shall not be charged for
filing the report. The applicable filing fee may be charged at the
time a petition governed by this chapter is filed. Any subsequent
preplacement reports shall be filed together with the original report.
(6) A copy of the completed preplacement report shall be delivered
to the person requesting the report.
(7) A person may request that a report not be completed. A
reasonable fee may be charged for the value of work done.

Sec. 5 RCW 26.33.240 and 1987 c 170 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After the reports required by section 2 of this act and RCW
26.33.190 and 26.33.200 have been filed, the court shall schedule a
hearing on the petition for adoption upon request of the petitioner for
adoption. Notice of the date, time, and place of hearing shall be
given to the petitioner and any person or agency whose consent to
adoption is required under RCW 26.33.160, unless the person or agency
has waived in writing the right to receive notice of the hearing. If
the child is an Indian child, notice shall also be given to the child's
tribe. Notice shall be given in the manner prescribed by RCW
26.33.310.
(2) Notice of the adoption hearing shall also be given to any
person who or agency which has prepared a preplacement report. The
notice shall be given in the manner prescribed by RCW 26.33.230.
(3) If the court determines, after review of the petition,
((preplacement and post-placement)) reports, and other evidence
introduced at the hearing, that all necessary consents to adoption are
valid or have been dispensed with pursuant to RCW 26.33.170 and that
the adoption is in the best interest of the adoptee, and, in the case
of an adoption of an Indian child, that the adoptive parents are within
the placement preferences of 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915 or good cause to the
contrary has been shown on the record, the court shall enter a decree
of adoption pursuant to RCW 26.33.250.
(4) If the court determines the petition should not be granted
because the adoption is not in the best interest of the child, the
court shall make appropriate provision for the care and custody of the
child.

Sec. 6 RCW 26.33.400 and 1991 c 136 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, "advertisement"
means communication by newspaper, radio, television, handbills,
placards or other print, broadcast, or the electronic medium. This
definition applies throughout this section.
(2) No person or entity shall cause to be published for
circulation, or broadcast on a radio or television station, within the
geographic borders of this state, an advertisement of a child or
children offered or wanted for adoption, or shall hold himself or
herself out through such advertisement as having the ability to place,
locate, dispose, or receive a child or children for adoption unless
such person or entity is:
(a) A duly authorized agent, contractee, or employee of the
department or a children's agency or institution licensed by the
department to care for and place children;
(b) A person who has a completed preplacement report as set forth
in RCW 26.33.190 (1) and (2) or chapter 26.34 RCW with a favorable
recommendation as to the fitness of the person to be an adoptive
parent, or such person's duly authorized uncompensated agent, or such
person's attorney who is licensed to practice in the state.
Verification of compliance with the requirements of this section shall
consist of a written declaration by the person or entity who prepared
the preplacement report.
Nothing in this section prohibits an attorney licensed to practice
in Washington state from advertising his or her availability to
practice or provide services related to the adoption of children.
(3)(a) A violation of subsection (2) of this section is a matter
affecting the public interest ((for the purpose of applying chapter
19.86 RCW. A violation of subsection (2) of this section is not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business.
A violation of subsection (2) of this section)) and constitutes an
unfair or deceptive act or practice in trade or commerce for the
purpose of applying chapter 19.86 RCW.
(b) The attorney general may bring an action in the name of the
state against any person violating the provisions of this section in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 19.86.080.
(c) Nothing in this section applies to any radio or television
station or any publisher, printer, or distributor of any newspaper,
magazine, billboard, or other advertising medium which accepts
advertising in good faith without knowledge of its violation of any
provision of this section after an attempt to verify the advertising is
in compliance with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 26.33 RCW
to read as follows:
It is prohibited in the state of Washington for any entity engaged
in any service related to the adoption of children to operate as a for-profit entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act take effect
January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The secretary of the department of social
and health services may take the necessary steps to ensure that this
act is implemented on its effective date.

--- END ---