BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.99C.045 and 1991 c 363 s 121 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to legislative appropriation, all principal proceeds of the
bonds and bond anticipation notes authorized in this chapter shall be
administered by the state department of social and health services
exclusively for the purposes specified in this chapter and for the
payment of expenses incurred in connection with the sale and issuance
of the bonds and bond anticipation notes.
In carrying out the purposes of this chapter all counties of the
state shall be eligible to participate in the distribution of the bond
proceeds. The share coming to each county shall be determined by a
division among all counties according to the relation which the
population of each county, as shown by the last federal or official
state census, whichever is the later, bears to the total combined
population of all counties, as shown by such census; except that, each
county with a population of less than twelve thousand shall receive an
aggregate amount of up to seventy-five thousand dollars if, through a
procedure established in rule, the department has determined there is
a demonstrated need and the share determined for such county is less
than seventy-five thousand dollars. No single project in a county with
a population of one million or more shall be eligible for more than
fifteen percent of such county's total distribution of bond proceeds.
In carrying out the purposes specified in this chapter, the
department may use or permit the use of the proceeds by direct
expenditures, grants, or loans to any public body, including but not
limited to grants to a public body as matching funds in any case where
federal, local, or other funds are made available on a matching basis
for purposes specified in this chapter.
In carrying out the purpose of this chapter, fixed assets acquired
under this chapter, and no longer utilized by the program having
custody of the assets, may be transferred to other public bodies either
in the same county or another county. Prior to such transfer the
department shall first determine if the assets can be used by another
program as designated by the department of social and health services
in RCW 43.99C.020. Such programs shall have priority in obtaining the
assets to ensure the purpose of this chapter is carried out.
After twenty years of continual use for the purposes specified in
this chapter, a municipality may transfer fixed assets acquired under
this chapter to other public bodies either in the same municipality or
another municipality, or to a private or public nonprofit organization
having custody of the assets which provides a program carrying out one
or more purposes of this chapter. The provisions of RCW 43.09.210 and
chapter 36.34 RCW shall not apply to such transfer. In the event the
nonprofit organization ceases to carry out one or more purposes of this
chapter, the property or the fair market value of the property shall be
returned to the municipality.

--- END ---