BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.128.120 and 2002 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each adult family home provider and each resident manager shall
have the following minimum qualifications, except that only providers
are required to meet the provisions of subsection (10) of this section:
(1) Twenty-one years of age or older;
(2) For those applying after September 1, 2001, to be licensed as
providers, and for resident managers whose employment begins after
September 1, 2001, a United States high school diploma or general
educational development (GED) certificate or any English or translated
government documentation of the following:
(a) Successful completion of government-approved public or private
school education in a foreign country that includes an annual average
of one thousand hours of instruction over twelve years or no less than
twelve thousand hours of instruction;
(b) A foreign college, foreign university, or United States
community college two-year diploma;
(c) Admission to, or completion of coursework at, a foreign
university or college for which credit was granted;
(d) Admission to, or completion of coursework at, a United States
college or university for which credits were awarded;
(e) Admission to, or completion of postgraduate coursework at, a
United States college or university for which credits were awarded; or
(f) Successful passage of the United States board examination for
registered nursing, or any professional medical occupation for which
college or university education preparation was required;
(3) Good moral and responsible character and reputation;
(4) Literacy in the English language, however, a person not
literate in the English language may meet the requirements of this
subsection by assuring that there is a person on staff and available
who is able to communicate or make provisions for communicating with
the resident in his or her primary language and capable of
understanding and speaking English well enough to be able to respond
appropriately to emergency situations and be able to read and
understand resident care plans;
(5) Management and administrative ability to carry out the
requirements of this chapter;
(6) Satisfactory completion of department-approved basic training
and continuing education training as specified by the department in
rule, based on recommendations of the community long-term care training
and education steering committee and working in collaboration with
providers, consumers, caregivers, advocates, family members, educators,
and other interested parties in the rule-making process;
(7) Satisfactory completion of department-approved, or equivalent,
special care training before a provider may provide special care
services to a resident;
(8) Not been convicted of any crime listed in RCW 43.43.830 and
43.43.842; ((and))
(9) For those applying after September 1, 2001, to be licensed as
providers, and for resident managers whose employment begins after
September 1, 2001, at least three hundred twenty hours of successful,
direct caregiving experience obtained after age eighteen to vulnerable
adults in a licensed or contracted setting prior to operating or
managing an adult family home; and
(10) Prior to being granted a license, providers applying after
July 1, 2006, must complete a department-approved forty-eight hour
adult family home administration and business planning class.

--- END ---