BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.128.010 and 2001 c 319 s 6 and 2001 c 319 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adult family home" means a residential home in which a person
or persons provide personal care, special care, room, and board to more
than one but not more than six adults who are not related by blood or
marriage to the person or persons providing the services, except that
the licensed capacity of an adult family home may be exceeded by one
resident to allow a married couple to reside together.
(2) "Provider" means any person who is licensed under this chapter
to operate an adult family home. For the purposes of this section,
"person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, association,
or limited liability company.
(3) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(4) "Resident" means an adult in need of personal or special care
in an adult family home who is not related to the provider.
(5) "Adults" means persons who have attained the age of eighteen
years.
(6) "Home" means an adult family home.
(7) "Imminent danger" means serious physical harm to or death of a
resident has occurred, or there is a serious threat to resident life,
health, or safety.
(8) "Special care" means care beyond personal care as defined by
the department, in rule.
(9) "Capacity" means the maximum number of persons in need of
personal or special care permitted in an adult family home at a given
time. This number shall include related children or adults in the home
and who received special care.
(10) "Resident manager" means a person employed or designated by
the provider to manage the adult family home.

--- END ---