BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that children with disabilities and
special needs have received and are receiving a better education thanks
to special education educators who have devoted themselves, heart and
soul, to the schooling of these students. The legislature further
finds that special education has accomplished a great deal for children
with disabilities in Washington state in the past and can accomplish
more in the future if the educators are able to receive help from
experts outside of the field of education but related to the needs of
these students.
(2) The special education ombudsman created in section 507, chapter
518, Laws of 2005, shall form a state interdisciplinary team of experts
or regional teams of experts to assist school districts that request
assistance in conducting an initial evaluation or a reevaluation of a
student who is suspected or has been found to have a disability that
adversely affects the student's educational performance. The team
shall include qualified physicians and psychologists who can identify
the appropriate medical and psychological services that the child will
need outside of and within the school setting in order to be able to
benefit from the specially designed instruction provided by the
educators in the school. Additionally, the ombudsman's team shall
assist school districts to develop an individualized education program
for the student.
(3) A school district may request assistance from the special
education ombudsman interdisciplinary team or teams when conducting an
evaluation or reevaluation of a student and when developing an
individualized education program for a student. A school district
shall request assistance from the ombudsman if it appears that the
student may need medical or psychological services.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW to implement this
section. The rules shall require minimal paperwork for school
districts to access the assistance of the ombudsman's team of experts.

--- END ---