BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter prohibits a state employee from
distributing communications from an employee organization or charitable
organization to other state employees if the communications do not
support or oppose a ballot proposition or candidate for state or local
public office.

--- END ---