BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there are
factors unique to the relationship between a manufactured/mobile home
owner and a manufactured/mobile home park owner. Once occupancy has
commenced, the difficulty and expense in moving and relocating a
manufactured/mobile home can affect the operation of market forces, and
lead to an inequality of the bargaining position of the parties. Once
occupancy has commenced, a homeowner may be subject to violations of
the manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act or unfair practices
without a timely and cost-effective conflict resolution process.
Although a homeowner, landlord, or park owner may take legal action as
prescribed in the manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act, the
judicial process is often time and cost prohibitive. This act is
created for the purpose of protecting the public, fostering fair and
honest competition, and regulating the factors unique to the
relationship between the manufactured/mobile home owner and park owner.
(2) The legislature finds that taking legal action against a park
owner for violations of the manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant
act can be a costly and lengthy process, and that many people cannot
afford to pursue a court process to vindicate statutory rights. Park
owners similarly are impacted by legal fees and lengthy proceedings
resulting from pursuing a remedy through the legal system and would
also, therefore, benefit from having access to an appropriate,
effective process that resolves disputes quickly and efficiently.
(3) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to provide a
less costly and more efficient way for manufactured/mobile home owners
and park owners to resolve disputes, and to provide a mechanism for
state authorities to quickly locate owners of manufactured housing
communities. The legislature further intends to authorize the
department of community, trade, and economic development to:
(a) Register mobile home parks or manufactured housing communities;
(b) Maintain and update its current ombudsman program by retaining
the necessary staffing level of hired or contracted persons used to
operate and implement the program under chapter 429, Laws of 2005; and
(c) Collect and report upon data related to conflicts and
violations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(3) "Mobile home park" or "manufactured housing community" means
any real property that is rented or held out for rent to others for the
placement of two or more mobile homes, manufactured homes, park models,
or recreational vehicles for the primary purpose of production of
income, except when the real property is rented or held out for rent
for seasonal recreational purposes only and is not used for year-round
occupancy.
(4) "Landlord" or "park owner" means the owner of a mobile home
park or a manufactured housing community and includes the agents of the
landlord.
(5) "Mobile home lot" means a portion of a mobile home park or
manufactured housing community designated as the location of one mobile
home, manufactured home, or park model and its accessory buildings, and
intended for the exclusive use as a primary residence by the occupants
of that mobile home, manufactured home, or park model.
(6) "Tenant" or "homeowner" means any person, except a transient,
who rents or occupies a mobile home lot.
(7) "Owner" means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in
whom is vested:
(a) All or part of the legal title to the real property; or
(b) All or part of the beneficial ownership, and a right to present
use and enjoyment of the real property.
(8) "Park model" means a recreational vehicle intended for
permanent or semipermanent installation and is used as a primary
residence.
(9) "Recreational vehicle" means a travel trailer, motor home,
truck camper, or camping trailer that is primarily used as a primary
residence located in a mobile home park or manufactured housing
community.
(10) "Unfair practice" means any act that would constitute an
unfair or deceptive act or practice under chapter 19.86 RCW.
(11) "Complainant" means a landlord, park owner, tenant, or
homeowner, who has a complaint alleging an unfair practice or violation
of chapter 59.20 RCW.
(12) "Respondent" means a landlord, park owner, tenant, or
homeowner, alleged to have committed an unfair practice or violation of
chapter 59.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A complainant has the right to file a
complaint with the department alleging an unfair practice or a
violation of chapter 59.20 RCW.
(2) Upon receiving a complaint under this chapter, the department
must:
(a) Inform the complainant of the time frame to remedy the
complaint under RCW 59.20.080 for tenant violations or RCW 59.20.200
for landlord violations; and
(b) Encourage the complainant to notify the respondent of the
complaint.
(3) After receiving a complaint under this chapter, the department
may:
(a) Investigate the alleged violations at its discretion upon
receipt of a complaint alleging unfair practices or violations of
chapter 59.20 RCW;
(b) Utilize investigative ombudsman staff or contractors to
investigate and evaluate complaints alleging unfair practices or
violations of chapter 59.20 RCW;
(c) Discuss the issues surrounding or relating to the complaint
with the complainant, respondent, or any witnesses, either individually
or jointly;
(d) Explain options available to the complainant or respondent,
including the involvement of other agencies; and
(e) Negotiate an agreement that is agreed upon by both the
complainant and the respondent.
(4) The department may require or permit any person to file a
complaint or statement in writing or otherwise as the department
determines, as to the facts and circumstances concerning a matter to be
investigated.
(5) The department has the power to employ investigative,
administrative, and clerical staff as necessary for administration of
this chapter.
(6)(a) Complainants and respondents shall cooperate with the
department in the course of an investigation by:
(i) Furnishing any papers or documents requested;
(ii) Furnishing in writing an explanation covering the matter
contained in a complaint when requested by the department; and
(iii) Allowing authorized access to department representatives for
inspection of mobile home parks/manufactured housing community
facilities relevant to the alleged violation being investigated.
(b) Failure to cooperate with the department in the course of an
investigation is a violation of this chapter.
(7) After the department has completed its investigation and other
duties, the department shall provide the interested parties to the
dispute with documentation of the complaint process and documentation
on the resolution of the complaint investigation. The department may
make or issue written findings, conclusions, decisions, or rulings on
whether there was a violation of chapter 59.20 or 19.86 RCW.
(8) The department shall ensure that notice of the ombudsman
complaint resolution program is given to each mobile/manufactured home
landlord or park owner upon completed registration. The landlord shall
post an easily visible notice in all common areas of
mobile/manufactured home communities, including in each clubhouse,
summarizing mobile home park tenant rights and responsibilities, in a
style and format to be determined by the department, and including
information on how to file a complaint with the office of manufactured
housing and a toll-free telephone number that mobile home park owners
and tenants can use to seek additional information and communicate
complaints.
(9) This section is not exclusive and does not limit the right of
landlords or tenants to take legal action against another party as
provided in chapter 59.20 RCW or otherwise. Exhaustion of this
ombudsman remedy process is not required before bringing legal action.
This section does not apply to unlawful detainer actions initiated
under chapters 59.20, 59.12, and 59.18 RCW; however, a tenant is not
precluded from seeking relief under this chapter if the complaint
claims the notice of termination violates RCW 59.20.080. Filing a
complaint with the department is not a defense nor shall it in any way
delay or otherwise affect an unlawful detainer action.
Department-written reports documenting the process and resolution of
the complaint investigation, any written explanation covering the
matter requested by the department, any other documents or papers
requested or produced by the department, or any other record of the
complaint may be admissible only for purposes of impeachment in any
unlawful detainer or other administrative or legal action in regard to
chapter 59.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The director or individuals acting on the
director's behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or
criminal, based upon any disciplinary actions or other official acts
performed in the course of their duties under this chapter, except
their intentional or willful misconduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) All mobile home parks and manufactured
housing communities must be registered with the department.
(2) To apply for registration, the owner of a mobile home park or
manufactured housing community must file with the department an
application for registration on a form prescribed by the department.
The application must include, but is not limited to:
(a) The name and address of the owner of the mobile home park or
manufactured housing community;
(b) The name and address of the mobile home park or manufactured
housing community;
(c) The name and address of the manager of the mobile home park or
manufactured housing community; and
(d) The number of lots within the mobile home park or manufactured
housing community that are subject to chapter 59.20 RCW.
(3) Registration is effective on the date determined by the
department. All registrations must be assigned an expiration date by
the department. The department must:
(a) Establish a process for the annual renewal of registrations;
and
(b) Mail annually a letter with the effective registration and
expiration date to each owner of a mobile home park or manufactured
housing community, who has been registered by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department must:
(1) Compile, update, and maintain the most accurate list possible
of all the mobile home parks or manufactured housing communities in the
state, the number of lots subject to chapter 59.20 RCW located in each
mobile home park or manufactured housing community, and the names and
addresses of the owners of these parks. The department is encouraged
to work with groups including, but not limited to: The office of
community development, mobile homeowners' associations, tenant advocacy
groups, park owners' associations, and county assessors to generate the
list;
(2) Send out notifications to all known mobile home park owners or
manufactured housing community owners regarding the due date of the
assessment under section 7 of this act. These notifications must
include information about late fees and passing costs on to tenants;
and
(3) Collect the registration assessment due from all mobile home
park owners or manufactured housing community owners, and allow ninety
days to pass before sending notices of late fees to noncomplying owners
as provided in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The owner of each mobile home park or
manufactured housing community shall pay to the department a
registration assessment of five dollars for each mobile home or
manufactured home that is subject to chapter 59.20 RCW within a park or
community to fund the costs associated with administering this chapter.
Manufactured housing community owners or mobile home park owners may
pass on no more than two dollars and fifty cents of this assessment to
tenants.
(2) If an owner fails to pay the assessment before the registration
expiration date, a late fee shall be assessed, as provided in this
subsection for each mobile home or manufactured home that is subject to
chapter 59.20 RCW. The owner is not entitled to any reimbursement of
this fee from the tenants.
(a) A late fee shall be assessed at fifty percent of the total
amount due for registration, if the fee is received by the department
more than thirty, but less than sixty days after the registration fee
due date.
(b) A late fee shall be assessed at one hundred percent of the
total amount due for registration, if the fee is received by the
department more than sixty days late.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) In order to provide general assistance
to mobile home resident organizations, park owners, and landlords and
tenants, the department shall establish an office of manufactured
housing affairs which serves as the coordinating office within state
government for matters relating to mobile homes or manufactured
housing.
This office shall provide an ombudsman service to mobile home park
owners and mobile home tenants with respect to problems and disputes
between park owners and park residents and provide technical assistance
to resident organizations or persons in the process of forming a
resident organization under chapter 59.22 RCW. The office shall keep
records of its activities in this area.
(2) The office shall perform all the consumer complaint and related
functions of the state administrative agency that are required for
purposes of complying with this chapter and the regulations established
by the federal department of housing and urban development for
manufactured housing, including the preparation and submission of the
state administrative plan.
(3) The office shall administer the mobile home relocation
assistance program established in chapter 59.21 RCW, including
verifying the eligibility of tenants for relocation assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The office of manufactured housing shall
administer the mobile/manufactured home community registration program
including the collection of assessments, associated late fees, and the
compilation of data related to the number of communities and number of
lots within the community that are subject to chapter 59.20 RCW.

Sec. 10 RCW 59.22.070 and 1995 c 399 s 156 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created in the custody of the state treasurer a
special account known as the ((mobile home affairs)) office of
manufactured housing account.
Disbursements from this special account shall be as follows:
(((1))) (a) For the two-year period beginning July 1, 1988, forty
thousand dollars, or so much thereof as may be necessary for costs
incurred in registering landlords and collecting fees, and thereafter
five thousand dollars per year for that purpose.
(((2))) (b) All remaining amounts shall be remitted to the
department for the purpose of implementing RCW 59.22.050 ((and
59.22.060)).
(2) All funds collected by the department under section 7 of this
act shall be transferred to the state treasurer for deposit into the
office of manufactured housing account.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used only for the costs
associated with administering this chapter. Only the director or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 11 RCW 59.20.090 and 2003 c 7 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Unless otherwise agreed rental agreements shall be for a
term of one year. Any rental agreement of whatever duration shall be
automatically renewed for the term of the original rental agreement,
unless a different specified term is agreed upon.
(b) If a different specified term is agreed upon:
(i) It must be in writing in a document separate and distinct from
the original rental agreement; and
(ii) It must be signed by all parties to the rental agreement.
(2) A landlord seeking to increase the rent upon expiration of the
term of a rental agreement of any duration shall notify the tenant in
writing three months prior to the effective date of any increase in
rent.
(3) A tenant shall notify the landlord in writing one month prior
to the expiration of a rental agreement of an intention not to renew.
(4)(a) The tenant may terminate the rental agreement upon thirty
days written notice whenever a change in the location of the tenant's
employment requires a change in his residence, and shall not be liable
for rental following such termination unless after due diligence and
reasonable effort the landlord is not able to rent the mobile home lot
at a fair rental. If the landlord is not able to rent the lot, the
tenant shall remain liable for the rental specified in the rental
agreement until the lot is rented or the original term ends.
(b) Any tenant who is a member of the armed forces, including the
national guard and armed forces reserves, or that tenant's spouse or
dependent, may terminate a rental agreement with less than thirty days
notice if the tenant receives reassignment or deployment orders which
do not allow greater notice. The tenant shall provide notice of the
reassignment or deployment order to the landlord no later than seven
days after receipt.

Sec. 12 RCW 59.20.130 and 1999 c 359 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the duty of the landlord to:
(1) Comply with codes, statutes, ordinances, and administrative
rules applicable to the mobile home park;
(2) Maintain the common premises and prevent the accumulation of
stagnant water and to prevent the detrimental effects of moving water
when such condition is not the fault of the tenant;
(3) Keep any shared or common premises reasonably clean, sanitary,
and safe from defects to reduce the hazards of fire or accident;
(4) Keep all common premises of the mobile home park, and vacant
mobile home lots, not in the possession of tenants, free of weeds or
plant growth noxious and detrimental to the health of the tenants and
free from potentially injurious or unsightly objects and condition;
(5) Exterminate or make a reasonable effort to exterminate rodents,
vermin, or other pests dangerous to the health and safety of the tenant
whenever infestation exists on the common premises or whenever
infestation occurs in the interior of a mobile home, manufactured home,
or park model as a result of infestation existing on the common
premises;
(6) Maintain and protect all utilities provided to the mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model in good working condition.
Maintenance responsibility shall be determined at that point where the
normal mobile home, manufactured home, or park model utilities "hook-ups" connect to those provided by the landlord or utility company;
(7) Respect the privacy of the tenants and shall have no right of
entry to a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model without the
prior written consent of the occupant, except in case of emergency or
when the occupant has abandoned the mobile home, manufactured home, or
park model. Such consent may be revoked in writing by the occupant at
any time. The ownership or management shall have a right of entry upon
the land upon which a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model is
situated for maintenance of utilities, to insure compliance with
applicable codes, statutes, ordinances, administrative rules, and the
rental agreement and the rules of the park, and protection of the
mobile home park at any reasonable time or in an emergency, but not in
a manner or at a time which would interfere with the occupant's quiet
enjoyment. The ownership or management shall ((make a reasonable
effort to)) notify the tenant of their intention of entry upon the land
which a mobile home, manufactured home, ((or)) park model, or
recreational vehicle is located prior to entry as provided in this
subsection.
(a) The landlord may not abuse the right of access or use it to
harass the tenant. Except in the case of emergency or if it is
impracticable to do so, the landlord shall give the tenant at least two
days' notice of his or her intent to enter and may enter only at
reasonable times. The tenant may not unreasonably withhold consent to
the landlord to enter the dwelling unit at a specified time when the
landlord has given at least one days' notice of intent to enter to
exhibit the dwelling unit to prospective or actual purchasers or
tenants. A landlord may not unreasonably interfere with a tenant's
enjoyment of the rented dwelling unit by excessively exhibiting the
dwelling unit.
(b) The landlord has no other right of access except by court
order, arbitrator, or by consent of the tenant.
(c) This section does not abrogate or modify in any way any common
law right or privilege;
(8) Allow tenants freedom of choice in the purchase of goods and
services, and not unreasonably restrict access to the mobile home park
for such purposes;
(9) Maintain roads within the mobile home park in good condition;
((and))
(10) Notify each tenant within five days after a petition has been
filed by the landlord for a change in the zoning of the land where the
mobile home park is located and make a description of the change
available to the tenant;
(11) Hold a meeting with tenants on any proposed changes to the
rules of the park. Each tenant must be given written notice of date,
time, location, and proposed changes two weeks prior to the meeting
date. A landlord must also post an easily visible notice of the
meeting two weeks prior to the meeting date in all common areas of
mobile/manufactured home communities, including in each clubhouse.
Tenants are entitled to provide both written and oral comment to the
landlord on any proposed changes to the rules of the park at the
meeting.
A landlord shall not have a duty to repair a defective condition
under this section, nor shall any defense or remedy be available to the
tenant under this chapter, if the defective condition complained of was
caused by the conduct of the tenant, the tenant's family, invitee, or
other person acting under the tenant's control, or if a tenant
unreasonably fails to allow the landlord access to the property for
purposes of repair.

Sec. 13 RCW 59.20.050 and 1999 c 359 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except under this section, no landlord may offer a mobile home
lot for rent to anyone without offering a written rental agreement for
a term of one year or more. No landlord may offer to anyone any rental
agreement for a term of one year or more for which the monthly rental
is greater, or the terms of payment or other material conditions more
burdensome to the tenant, than any month-to-month rental agreement also
offered to such tenant or prospective tenant.
(2) Anyone who desires to occupy a mobile home lot for other than
a term of one year or more may have the option to be on a month-to-month basis but must waive, in writing, the right to such one year or
more term((: PROVIDED, That)). However, annually, at any anniversary
date of the tenancy the tenant may require that the landlord provide a
written rental agreement for a term of one year. ((No))
(3) A landlord ((shall)) may not allow a mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model to be moved into a mobile home park in this state
until a written rental agreement has been signed by and is in the
possession of the parties((: PROVIDED, That)). However, if the
landlord allows the tenant to move a mobile home, manufactured home, or
park model into a mobile home park without obtaining a written rental
agreement for a term of one year or more, or a written waiver of the
right to a one-year term or more, the term of the tenancy ((shall be))
is deemed to be for one year from the date of occupancy of the mobile
home lot, unless a tenancy for less than a year is offered subject to
the following conditions:
(a) A landlord may offer a partial-year lease to new tenants
beginning a lease after the start of a new year for the remainder of
the lease year; and
(b) A landlord that offers a partial-year lease under this
subsection must then offer a tenancy for a term of one year or more at
the end of the initial partial-year lease, as otherwise provided in
this section;
(((2))) (4) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section
((shall)) do not apply if:
(a) The mobile home park or part thereof has been acquired or is
under imminent threat of condemnation for a public works project, or
(b) An employer-employee relationship exists between a landlord and
tenant;
(((3))) (5) The provisions of this section shall apply to any
tenancy upon expiration of the term of any oral or written rental
agreement governing such tenancy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 59 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---