BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.09.180 and 1977 ex.s. c 220 s 15 are each amended
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this chapter, any city,
county, or other political subdivision of this state, or any state
agency, may regulate the operation of nonhighway vehicles on public
lands, waters, and other properties under its jurisdiction, and on
streets or highways within its boundaries by adopting regulations or
ordinances of its governing body, provided such regulations are not
less stringent than the provisions of this chapter. However, cities
with a population of less than three thousand persons may adopt
regulations allowing for the operation of off-road vehicles on streets
or highways within its boundaries, even if the regulations are less
stringent than the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.37.010 and 2005 c 213 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a traffic infraction for any person to drive or move or
for the owner to cause or knowingly permit to be driven or moved on any
highway any vehicle or combination of vehicles which is in such unsafe
condition as to endanger any person, or which does not contain those
parts or is not at all times equipped with such lamps and other
equipment in proper condition and adjustment as required in this
chapter or in regulations issued by the chief of the Washington state
patrol, or which is equipped in any manner in violation of this chapter
or the state patrol's regulations, or for any person to do any act
forbidden or fail to perform any act required under this chapter or the
state patrol's regulations.
(2) Nothing contained in this chapter or the state patrol's
regulations shall be construed to prohibit the use of additional parts
and accessories on any vehicle not inconsistent with the provisions of
this chapter or the state patrol's regulations.
(3) The provisions of the chapter and the state patrol's
regulations with respect to equipment on vehicles shall not apply to
implements of husbandry, road machinery, road rollers, or farm tractors
except as herein made applicable.
(4) No owner or operator of a farm tractor, self-propelled unit of
farm equipment, or implement of husbandry shall be guilty of a crime or
subject to penalty for violation of RCW 46.37.160 as now or hereafter
amended unless such violation occurs on a public highway.
(5) It is a traffic infraction for any person to sell or offer for
sale vehicle equipment which is required to be approved by the state
patrol as prescribed in RCW 46.37.005 unless it has been approved by
the state patrol.
(6) The provisions of this chapter with respect to equipment
required on vehicles shall not apply to motorcycles or motor-driven
cycles except as herein made applicable.
(7) This chapter does not apply to off-road vehicles used on
nonhighway roads or used on streets or highways as authorized under RCW
46.09.180.
(8) This chapter does not apply to vehicles used by the state parks
and recreation commission exclusively for park maintenance and
operations upon public highways within state parks.
(9) Notices of traffic infraction issued to commercial drivers
under the provisions of this chapter with respect to equipment required
on commercial motor vehicles shall not be considered for driver
improvement purposes under chapter 46.20 RCW.
(10) Whenever a traffic infraction is chargeable to the owner or
lessee of a vehicle under subsection (1) of this section, the driver
shall not be arrested or issued a notice of traffic infraction unless
the vehicle is registered in a jurisdiction other than Washington
state, or unless the infraction is for an offense that is clearly
within the responsibility of the driver.
(11) Whenever the owner or lessee is issued a notice of traffic
infraction under this section the court may, on the request of the
owner or lessee, take appropriate steps to make the driver of the
vehicle, or any other person who directs the loading, maintenance, or
operation of the vehicle, a codefendant. If the codefendant is held
solely responsible and is found to have committed the traffic
infraction, the court may dismiss the notice against the owner or
lessee.

--- END ---