BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 7.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To provide Washington leaders the information needed to respond
comprehensively and efficiently to the crime of human trafficking and
to provide services to victims of human trafficking, there is created
the Washington state task force against the trafficking of persons.
(2) The task force shall be authorized from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2011, and shall be administered and chaired by the department
of community, trade, and economic development's office of crime victims
advocacy.
(3) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(a) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development, or the director's designee;
(b) The secretary of the department of health, or the secretary's
designee;
(c) The secretary of the department of social and health services,
or the secretary's designee;
(d) The director of the department of labor and industries, or the
director's designee;
(e) The commissioner of the employment security department, or the
commissioner's designee;
(f) Five members, selected by the director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development, who represent public and
private sector organizations that provide assistance to persons who are
victims of human trafficking;
(g) A representative of the Washington state supreme court gender
and justice commission designated by the administrative office of the
courts;
(h) A representative of an organization providing immigration
advocacy services;
(i) An attorney representing an organization providing immigration
legal services;
(j) The attorney general or the attorney general's designee;
(k) A member designated by the Washington association of criminal
defense lawyers or the Washington defender association;
(l) A member designated by the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys;
(m) A member designated by the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs;
(n) A member designated by the Washington coalition of sexual
assault programs;
(o) A member designated by the administrative office of the courts;
(p) A member designated by the Washington state coalition against
domestic violence;
(q) A member designated by the Washington state patrol; and
(r) A member designated by the Washington state advisory committee
on trafficking.
(4) The task force shall carry out the following activities:
(a) Identify available federal, state, and local programs that
provide services to victims of human trafficking that include, but are
not limited to health care, human services, housing, education, legal
assistance, job training or preparation, interpreting services, English
as a second language classes, and victim's compensation;
(b) Make recommendations on methods to provide a coordinated system
of support and assistance to persons who are victims of human
trafficking;
(c) Examine model state human trafficking legislation;
(d) Review mandatory reporting laws as they may apply to victims of
human trafficking;
(e) Measure and evaluate the progress of the state in human
trafficking prevention activities;
(f) Oversee the ongoing efforts of state agencies to develop human
trafficking protocols; and
(g) Address and consider other topics relevant to trafficking of
persons.
(5) The task force shall present an interim report, including
recommendations and any proposed legislation related to the activities
listed in subsection (4)(a) through (d) of this section, to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1,
2008, and present a final report by June 30, 2011.
(6) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall provide necessary administrative and clerical support to the task
force.
(7) The members of the task force shall serve without compensation,
but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 2 RCW 40.24.030 and 2001 c 28 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An adult person, a parent or guardian acting on behalf of a
minor, or a guardian acting on behalf of an incapacitated person, as
defined in RCW 11.88.010, may apply to the secretary of state to have
an address designated by the secretary of state serve as the person's
address or the address of the minor or incapacitated person. The
secretary of state shall approve an application if it is filed in the
manner and on the form prescribed by the secretary of state and if it
contains:
(a) A sworn statement by the applicant that the applicant has good
reason to believe (i) that the applicant, or the minor or incapacitated
person on whose behalf the application is made, is a victim of domestic
violence, sexual assault, ((or)) stalking, or human trafficking; and
(ii) that the applicant fears for his or her safety or his or her
children's safety, or the safety of the minor or incapacitated person
on whose behalf the application is made;
(b) A designation of the secretary of state as agent for purposes
of service of process and for the purpose of receipt of mail;
(c) The mailing address where the applicant can be contacted by the
secretary of state, and the phone number or numbers where the applicant
can be called by the secretary of state;
(d) The new address or addresses that the applicant requests not be
disclosed for the reason that disclosure will increase the risk of
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking;
(e) The signature of the applicant and of any individual or
representative of any office designated in writing under RCW 40.24.080
who assisted in the preparation of the application, and the date on
which the applicant signed the application.
(2) Applications shall be filed with the office of the secretary of
state.
(3) Upon filing a properly completed application, the secretary of
state shall certify the applicant as a program participant. Applicants
shall be certified for four years following the date of filing unless
the certification is withdrawn or invalidated before that date. The
secretary of state shall by rule establish a renewal procedure.
(4) A person who falsely attests in an application that disclosure
of the applicant's address would endanger the applicant's safety or the
safety of the applicant's children or the minor or incapacitated person
on whose behalf the application is made, or who knowingly provides
false or incorrect information upon making an application, shall be
punishable under RCW 40.16.030 or other applicable statutes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 1 of this act, referencing this act and section 1 of this act
by bill or chapter number and section number, is not provided by June
30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, section 1 of this act is
null and void.

--- END ---