BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.63.030 and 2005 c 167 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A law enforcement officer has the authority to issue a notice
of traffic infraction:
(a) When the infraction is committed in the officer's presence;
(b) When the officer is acting upon the request of a law
enforcement officer in whose presence the traffic infraction was
committed;
(c) If an officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle
accident has reasonable cause to believe that the driver of a motor
vehicle involved in the accident has committed a traffic infraction;
(d) When the ((notice of)) infraction is detected through the use
of a photo enforcement system under RCW 46.63.160; or
(e) When the ((notice of)) infraction is detected through the use
of an automated traffic safety camera under RCW 46.63.170.
(2) A court may issue a notice of traffic infraction upon receipt
of a written statement of the officer that there is reasonable cause to
believe that an infraction was committed.
(3) If any motor vehicle without a driver is found parked,
standing, or stopped in violation of this title or an equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution, the officer finding the vehicle shall take its registration
number and may take any other information displayed on the vehicle
which may identify its user, and shall conspicuously affix to the
vehicle a notice of traffic infraction.
(4) In the case of failure to redeem an abandoned vehicle under RCW
46.55.120, upon receiving a complaint by a registered tow truck
operator that has incurred costs in removing, storing, and disposing of
an abandoned vehicle, an officer of the law enforcement agency
responsible for directing the removal of the vehicle shall send a
notice of infraction by certified mail to the last known address of the
person responsible under RCW 46.55.105. The notice must be entitled
"Littering -- Abandoned Vehicle" and give notice of the monetary penalty.
The officer shall append to the notice of infraction, on a form
prescribed by the department of licensing, a notice indicating the
amount of costs incurred as a result of removing, storing, and
disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less any amount realized at
auction, and a statement that monetary penalties for the infraction
will not be considered as having been paid until the monetary penalty
payable under this chapter has been paid and the court is satisfied
that the person has made restitution in the amount of the deficiency
remaining after disposal of the vehicle.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.63.160 and 2004 c 231 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies only to traffic infractions issued under
RCW 46.61.690 for toll collection evasion.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer
from issuing a notice of traffic infraction to a person in control of
a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a),
(b), or (c).
(3) Toll collection systems include manual cash collection,
electronic toll collection, and photo enforcement systems.
(4) "Electronic toll collection system" means a system of
collecting tolls or charges that is capable of charging the account of
the toll patron the appropriate toll or charge by electronic
transmission from the motor vehicle to the toll collection system,
which information is used to charge the appropriate toll or charge to
the patron's account.
(5) "Photo enforcement system" means a vehicle sensor installed to
work in conjunction with an electronic toll collection system that
automatically produces one or more photographs, one or more
microphotographs, a videotape, or other recorded images of a vehicle
operated in violation of an infraction under this chapter.
(6) The use of a toll collection system is subject to the following
requirements:
(a) The department of transportation shall adopt rules that allow
an open standard for automatic vehicle identification transponders used
for electronic toll collection to be compatible with other electronic
payment devices or transponders from the Washington state ferry system,
other public transportation systems, or other toll collection systems
to the extent that technology permits. The rules must also allow for
multiple vendors providing electronic payment devices or transponders
as technology permits.
(b) The department of transportation may not sell, distribute, or
make available in any way, the names and addresses of electronic toll
collection system account holders.
(7) The use of a photo enforcement system for issuance of notices
of infraction is subject to the following requirements:
(a) Photo enforcement systems may take photographs, digital
photographs, microphotographs, videotapes, or other recorded images of
the vehicle and vehicle license plate only. The picture must not
reveal the face of the driver or of passengers in the vehicle.
(b) A notice of infraction must be mailed to the registered owner
of the vehicle or to the renter of a vehicle within sixty days of the
violation. The law enforcement officer issuing the notice of
infraction shall include with it a certificate or facsimile thereof,
based upon inspection of photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or
other recorded images produced by a photo enforcement system, stating
the facts supporting the notice of infraction. This certificate or
facsimile is prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it and is
admissible in a proceeding charging a violation under this chapter.
The photographs, digital photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or
other recorded images evidencing the violation must be available for
inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to adjudicate
the liability for the infraction.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs,
digital photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or other recorded
images prepared under this chapter are for the exclusive use of the
tolling agency and law enforcement in the discharge of duties under
this section and are not open to the public and may not be used in a
court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding
relates to a violation under this chapter. No photograph, digital
photograph, microphotograph, videotape, or other recorded image may be
used for any purpose other than enforcement of violations under this
chapter nor retained longer than necessary to enforce this chapter or
verify that tolls are paid.
(d) All locations where a photo enforcement system is used must be
clearly marked by placing signs in locations that clearly indicate to
a driver that he or she is entering a zone where traffic laws are
enforced by a photo enforcement system.
(8) Infractions detected through the use of photo enforcement
systems are not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW
46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, infractions generated by the
use of photo enforcement systems under this section shall be processed
in the same manner as parking infractions, including for the purposes
of RCW 3.46.120, 3.50.100, 35.20.220, 46.16.216, and 46.20.270(3).
(9) The penalty for infractions issued under this section shall be
forty dollars.
(10) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business the department of transportation or a law enforcement agency
shall, before a notice of infraction being issued under this section,
provide a written notice to the rental car business that a notice of
infraction may be issued to the rental car business if the rental car
business does not, within eighteen days of the mailing of the written
notice, provide to the issuing agency by return mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine
who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction
occurred; or
(c) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car
business may pay the applicable toll and fee.
Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
chapter for the notice of infraction.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.216 and 2004 c 231 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To renew a vehicle license, an applicant shall satisfy all
listed standing, stopping, and parking violations((, and other
infractions issued under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d))) for the vehicle incurred
while the vehicle was registered in the applicant's name and forwarded
to the department pursuant to RCW 46.20.270(3). For the purposes of
this section, "listed" standing, stopping, and parking violations((,
and other infractions issued under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d))) include only
those violations for which notice has been received from state or local
agencies or courts by the department one hundred twenty days or more
before the date the vehicle license expires and that are placed on the
records of the department. Notice of such violations received by the
department later than one hundred twenty days before that date that are
not satisfied shall be considered by the department in connection with
any applications for license renewal in any subsequent license year.
The renewal application may be processed by the department or its
agents only if the applicant:
(a) Presents a preprinted renewal application showing no listed
standing, stopping, or parking violations((, or other infractions
issued under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d))), or in the absence of such
presentation, the agent verifies the information that would be
contained on the preprinted renewal application; or
(b) If listed standing, stopping, or parking violations((, or other
infractions issued under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d))) exist, presents proof of
payment and pays a fifteen dollar surcharge.
(2) The surcharge shall be allocated as follows:
(a) Ten dollars shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund to be
used exclusively for the administrative costs of the department of
licensing; and
(b) Five dollars shall be retained by the agent handling the
renewal application to be used by the agent for the administration of
this section.
(3) If there is a change in the registered owner of the vehicle,
the department shall forward the information regarding the change to
the state or local charging jurisdiction and release any hold on the
renewal of the vehicle license resulting from parking violations ((or
other infractions issued under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d))) incurred while the
certificate of license registration was in a previous registered
owner's name.
(4) The department shall send to all registered owners of vehicles
who have been reported to have outstanding listed parking violations
((or other infractions issued under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d))), at the time
of renewal, a statement setting out the dates and jurisdictions in
which the violations occurred as well as the amounts of unpaid fines
and penalties relating to them and the surcharge to be collected.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.270 and 2005 c 288 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any person is convicted of any offense for which this
title makes mandatory the withholding of the driving privilege of such
person by the department, the court in which such conviction is had
shall forthwith mark the person's Washington state driver's license or
permit to drive, if any, in a manner authorized by the department. A
valid driver's license or permit to drive marked under this subsection
shall remain in effect until the person's driving privilege is withheld
by the department pursuant to notice given under RCW 46.20.245, unless
the license or permit expires or otherwise becomes invalid prior to the
effective date of this action. Perfection of notice of appeal shall
stay the execution of sentence including the withholding of the driving
privilege.
(2) Every court having jurisdiction over offenses committed under
this chapter, or any other act of this state or municipal ordinance
adopted by a local authority regulating the operation of motor vehicles
on highways, or any federal authority having jurisdiction over offenses
substantially the same as those set forth in Title 46 RCW which occur
on federal installations within this state, shall forward to the
department within ten days of a forfeiture of bail or collateral
deposited to secure the defendant's appearance in court, a payment of
a fine or penalty, a plea of guilty or a finding of guilt, or a finding
that any person has committed a traffic infraction an abstract of the
court record in the form prescribed by rule of the supreme court,
showing the conviction of any person or the finding that any person has
committed a traffic infraction in said court for a violation of any
said laws other than regulations governing standing, stopping, parking,
and pedestrian offenses.
(3) Every state agency or municipality having jurisdiction over
offenses committed under this chapter, or under any other act of this
state or municipal ordinance adopted by a state or local authority
regulating the operation of motor vehicles on highways, may forward to
the department within ten days of failure to respond, failure to pay a
penalty, failure to appear at a hearing to contest the determination
that a violation of any statute, ordinance, or regulation relating to
standing, stopping, or parking((, or other infraction issued under RCW
46.63.030(1)(d))) has been committed, or failure to appear at a hearing
to explain mitigating circumstances, an abstract of the citation record
in the form prescribed by rule of the department, showing the finding
by such municipality that two or more violations of laws governing
standing, stopping, and parking ((or one or more other infractions
issued under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d))) have been committed and indicating
the nature of the defendant's failure to act. Such violations or
infractions may not have occurred while the vehicle is stolen from the
registered owner or is leased or rented under a bona fide commercial
vehicle lease or rental agreement between a lessor engaged in the
business of leasing vehicles and a lessee who is not the vehicle's
registered owner. The department may enter into agreements of
reciprocity with the duly authorized representatives of the states for
reporting to each other violations of laws governing standing,
stopping, and parking.
(4) For the purposes of Title 46 RCW the term "conviction" means a
final conviction in a state or municipal court or by any federal
authority having jurisdiction over offenses substantially the same as
those set forth in Title 46 RCW which occur on federal installations in
this state, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to
secure a defendant's appearance in court, the payment of a fine, a plea
of guilty, or a finding of guilt on a traffic law violation charge,
regardless of whether the imposition of sentence or sanctions are
deferred or the penalty is suspended, but not including entry into a
deferred prosecution agreement under chapter 10.05 RCW.
(5) For the purposes of Title 46 RCW the term "finding that a
traffic infraction has been committed" means a failure to respond to a
notice of infraction or a determination made by a court pursuant to
this chapter. Payment of a monetary penalty made pursuant to RCW
46.63.070(2) is deemed equivalent to such a finding.

--- END ---