BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.14.010 and 1988 c 109 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of this chapter is to provide a supplemental
retirement benefit to judges who are elected or appointed under chapter
2.04, 2.06, or 2.08 RCW and who are not members of the ((public
employees')) judicial retirement system ((for their service as a
judge)) authorized by chapter 2.10 RCW.
(2) This chapter may be known and cited as the judicial retirement
account act.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.14.030 and 1988 c 109 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The judicial retirement account plan is established for judges
appointed or elected under chapter 2.04, 2.06, or 2.08 RCW and who are
not members of the ((public employees')) judicial retirement system
((for their service as a judge)) authorized by chapter 2.10 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 2.14.040 and 1998 c 245 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator for the courts, under the direction of the board
for judicial administration, shall administer the plan. The
administrator shall:
(1) Deposit or invest contributions to the plan consistent with RCW
2.14.080;
(2) Credit investment earnings or interest to individual judicial
retirement accounts consistent with RCW ((2.14.070)) 2.14.060;
(3) Keep or cause to be kept full and adequate accounts and records
of the assets, obligations, transactions, and affairs of any judicial
retirement accounts created under this chapter; and
(4) Adopt rules necessary to carry out this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 2.14.060 and 1988 c 109 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
The judicial retirement principal account is created in the state
treasury. Any deficiency in the judicial retirement administrative
account caused by an excess of administrative expenses disbursed from
that account over earnings of investments of balances credited to that
account shall be transferred to that account from the principal
account.
The contributions under ((section 19 of this act)) RCW 2.14.090
shall be paid into the principal account and shall be sufficient to
cover costs of administration and staffing in addition to such other
amounts as determined by the administrator for the courts. The
principal account shall be used to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 2.14.080 and 1996 c 39 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) The administrator for the courts shall:
(a) Deposit or invest the contributions under RCW 2.14.090 in a
credit union, savings and loan association, bank, or mutual savings
bank;
(b) Purchase life insurance, shares of an investment company, or
fixed and/or variable annuity contracts from any insurance company or
investment company licensed to contract business in this state; or
(c) Invest in any of the class of investments described in RCW
43.84.150.
(2))) The state investment board or the department of retirement
systems, at the request of the administrator for the courts, may invest
moneys in the principal account. Moneys invested by the investment
board shall be invested in accordance with RCW ((43.84.150))
43.33A.140. Moneys invested by the department of retirement systems
shall be invested in accordance with applicable law. Except as
provided in RCW 43.33A.160 or as necessary to pay a pro rata share of
expenses incurred by the department of retirement systems, one hundred
percent of all earnings from these investments, exclusive of investment
income pursuant to RCW 43.84.080, shall accrue directly to the
principal account.

Sec. 6 RCW 2.14.100 and 1988 c 109 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member who separates from judicial service for any reason is
entitled to receive a lump sum distribution of the member's accumulated
contributions. The administrator for the courts may adopt rules
establishing other payment options, in addition to lump sum
distributions, if the other payment options conform to the requirements
of the federal internal revenue code.
(2) The right of a person to receive a payment under this chapter
and the moneys in the accounts created under this chapter are exempt
from any state, county, municipal, or other local tax and are not
subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of
bankruptcy or insolvency law, or any other process of law whatsoever
and is not assignable, except as is otherwise specifically provided in
this section.
(3) If a judgment, decree or other order, including a
court-approved property settlement agreement, that relates to the
provision of child support, spousal maintenance, or the marital
property rights of a spouse or former spouse, child, or other dependent
of a member is made pursuant to the domestic relations law of the state
of Washington or such order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction
in another state or country, that has been registered or otherwise made
enforceable in this state, then the amount of the member's accumulated
contributions shall be paid in the manner and to the person or persons
so directed in the domestic relations order. However, this subsection
does not permit or require a benefit to be paid or to be provided that
is not otherwise available under the terms of this chapter or any rules
adopted under this chapter. The administrator for the courts shall
establish reasonable procedures for determining the status or any such
decree or order and for effectuating distribution pursuant to the
domestic relations order.
(4) The administrator for the courts may pay from a member's
accumulated contributions the amount that the administrator finds is
lawfully demanded under a levy issued by the internal revenue service
with respect to that member or is sought to be collected by the United
States government under a judgment resulting from an unpaid tax
assessment against the member.

Sec. 7 RCW 2.14.110 and 2005 c 282 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a member dies, the amount of the accumulated contributions
standing to the member's credit at the time of the member's death,
subject to the provisions of chapter 26.16 RCW, shall be paid to the
member's estate, or such person or persons, trust, or organization as
the member has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed
with the administrative office of the courts. If there is no such
designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's
death, the member's accumulated contributions shall be paid to the
member's surviving spouse as if in fact the spouse had been nominated
by written designation or, if there is no such surviving spouse, then
to the member's legal representatives.

--- END ---