BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.303 and 2001 c 296 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) School districts, educational service districts, the state
school for the deaf, the state school for the blind, and their
contractors hiring employees who will have regularly scheduled
unsupervised access to children shall require a record check through
the Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW
43.43.830 through 43.43.834, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050 and through the
federal bureau of investigation before hiring an employee. The record
check shall include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington
state criminal identification fingerprint card. The requesting entity
shall provide a copy of the record report to the applicant. When
necessary, applicants may be employed on a conditional basis pending
completion of the investigation. If the applicant has had a record
check within the previous two years, the district, the state school for
the deaf, the state school for the blind, or contractor may waive the
requirement. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
district, pursuant to chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW, the state school for
the deaf, the state school for the blind, or contractor hiring the
employee shall determine who shall pay costs associated with the record
check.
(2) Employees and applicants for employment of federal bureau of
Indian affairs-funded schools may use the process in subsection (1) of
this section for record checks. Any costs incurred under this
subsection shall be borne by the requesting entity.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.400.305 and 2001 c 296 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules as
necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW on record check information. The
rules shall include, but not be limited to the following:
(1) Written procedures providing a school district, state school
for the deaf, ((or)) state school for the blind, or federal bureau of
Indian affairs-funded school employee or applicant for certification or
employment access to and review of information obtained based on the
record check required under RCW 28A.400.303; and
(2) Written procedures limiting access to the superintendent of
public instruction record check data base to only those individuals
processing record check information at the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, the appropriate school district or districts,
the state school for the deaf, the state school for the blind, ((and))
the appropriate educational service district or districts, and the
appropriate federal bureau of Indian affairs-funded schools.

--- END ---