BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In the twenty-first century, members of the
legislature are confronted with increased complexity of issues facing
the legislature, increased demands for their time, increased
accountability standards, and the resulting difficulty in meeting
public obligations while having to earn a second income to support
their families.
In order for service in the state legislature to remain open to all
segments of society, and in order for legislators to have the time to
develop expertise in the complex areas addressed by the legislature, a
full-time state legislature is needed. A full-time state legislature
will allow members to devote their talents and energies to
accomplishing the work of the people, and avoid conflicts or apparent
conflicts between the member's private interests and official
responsibilities.
This act is not intended to extend or otherwise change the current
length or frequency of regular sessions, or of interim committee
meeting schedules. It is also not intended to increase staff size. It
is intended to give the members the financial freedom to commit their
time completely to their public duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The offices of state senator and state representative are full-time
positions and no member of the Washington state legislature may hold
any office, position, or employment that would decrease the ability of
the legislator to give the equivalent of full-time employment attention
to the business of the legislature. This section is not intended to
completely preclude a legislator from having other employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2007, if the
Washington citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials has
adopted a salary for state senators and state representatives effective
no later than September 1, 2007, that is at least twice the salary for
state senators and state representatives in effect September 1, 2006,
and if no referendum petition has been filed under Article XXVIII,
section 1 of the state Constitution. If such a salary is adopted and
such a referendum is validly submitted to and approved by the voters,
this act takes effect on the thirtieth day after the election at which
the referendum is approved. If such a salary has not been adopted or
if such a referendum is validly submitted to and disapproved by the
voters, this act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---