BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares that:
(1) Marketing is a dynamic and changing part of Washington
agriculture and a vital element in expanding the state economy;
(2) The sale in this state and export to other states and abroad of
beer made in this state contribute substantial benefits to the economy
of the state and provide a large number of jobs and sizeable tax
revenues;
(3) The production of beer in this state is a new and important
segment of Washington agriculture that has potential for greater
contribution to the economy of the state if it undergoes continued
development; and
(4) The general welfare of the people of this state will be served
by continued development of the activities of the production of beer,
that will improve the tax bases of local communities where agricultural
land and processing facilities are located, and reduce the need for
state and federal funding of local services. The industries are
therefore affected with the public interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affected producer" means any producer who is subject to this
chapter.
(2) "Beer" means any malt beverage or malt liquor as the terms are
defined in chapter 66.04 RCW.
(3) "Commission" means the Washington beer commission.
(4) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning with
January 1st of any year and ending December 31st.
(5) "Producer" means any person or other entity licensed under
Title 66 RCW to produce beer within Washington state and who produces
less than one hundred thousand barrels of beer annually per location.
(6) "Referendum" means a vote by affected producers that is
conducted by secret ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The history, economy, culture, and future of
Washington state's agriculture involve the beer industry. In order to
develop and promote beer as part of an existing comprehensive scheme to
regulate those products, the legislature declares that:
(1) It is vital to the continued economic well-being of the
citizens of this state and their general welfare that beer produced in
Washington state be properly promoted;
(2) It is in the overriding public interest that support for the
Washington beer industry be clearly expressed and that beer be promoted
individually, and as part of a comprehensive industry to:
(a) Enhance the reputation and image of Washington state's
agriculture industry;
(b) Protect the public by educating the public in reference to the
quality, care, and methods used in the production of beer;
(c) Increase the knowledge of the qualities and value of
Washington's beer; and
(d) Support and engage in programs or activities that benefit the
production, handling, processing, marketing, and uses of beer;
(3) This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police powers of
this state to protect the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of
the people of this state; and
(4) The production and marketing of beer is a highly regulated
industry and this chapter and the rules adopted under it are only one
aspect of the regulated industry. Other laws applicable to the beer
industry include:
(a) The organic food products act, chapter 15.86 RCW;
(b) The wholesale distributors and suppliers of malt beverages,
chapter 19.126 RCW;
(c) Weights and measures, chapter 19.94 RCW;
(d) Title 66 RCW, alcoholic beverage control;
(e) Title 69 RCW, food, drugs, cosmetics, and poisons;
(f) 21 C.F.R. as it relates to general manufacturing practices,
food labeling, food standards, food additives, and pesticide
tolerances;
(g) Chapter 69.07 RCW, Washington food processing act;
(h) 27 U.S.C. Secs. 201 through 211, 213 through 219a, and 122A;
(i) 27 C.F.R. Parts 1, 6, 9, 10, 12, 16, 240, 251, and 252; and
(j) Rules under Title 314 WAC.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Subject to the referendum conducted
under section 5 of this act, there is created an agricultural commodity
commission, to be known as the Washington beer commission. The
commission shall be comprised of seven voting members; six members
shall be producers and one voting member shall be the director.
(2) Five voting members of the commission constitute a quorum for
the transaction of any commission business.
(3) Each producer member shall be a citizen and resident of this
state and over the age of twenty-one. Each producer member must be
engaged in producing beer, and must, during his or her term of office,
derive a substantial portion of income from the production of beer, or
have a substantial investment in the production of beer as an owner,
lessee, partner, or the manager or executive officer of such a
corporation. No more than one board member may be part of the same
person as defined by RCW 15.04.010. These qualifications apply
throughout each member's term of office but do not apply to the
director.
(4) The producer members shall serve three-year terms. Of the
initial voting members, two members shall be appointed for a one-year
term, two members shall be appointed for a two-year term, and two
members shall be appointed for a three-year term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Upon receipt of a petition containing
the signatures of five beer producers from a statewide Washington state
craft brewing trade association or other affected producers to
implement this chapter and to determine producer participation in the
commission and assessment under this chapter, the director shall:
(a) Conduct a referendum of beer producers. The requirements of
assent or approval of the referendum are met if:
(i) At least fifty-one percent by numbers of affected producers
participating in the referendum vote affirmatively; and
(ii) Thirty percent of the affected producers and thirty percent of
the production have been represented in the referendum to determine
assent or approval of participation and assessment. The referendum
shall be conducted within sixty days of receipt of the petition; and
(b) Establish a list of beer producers from information provided by
the petitioners, by obtaining information on beer producers from
applicable producer organizations or associations or other sources
identified as maintaining the information. In establishing a current
list of beer producers and their individual production, the director
shall use the beer producer's name, mailing address, and production by
the producer in the preceding fiscal year. Information on each
producer shall be mailed to each beer producer on record with the
director for verification. All corrections shall be filed with the
director within twenty days from the date of mailing. The list of
affected producers shall be kept in a file by the director. The list
shall be certified as a true representation of the referendum mailing
list. Inadvertent failure to notify an affected producer does not
invalidate a proceeding conducted under this chapter. The director
shall provide the commission the list of affected producers after
assent in a referendum as provided in this section.
(2) If the director determines that the requisite assent has been
given in the referendum conducted under subsection (1) of this section,
the director shall:
(a) Within sixty days after assent of the referendum held, appoint
the members of the commission; and
(b) Direct the commission to put into force the assessment as
provided for in section 14 of this act.
(3) If the director determines that the requisite assent has not
been given in the referendum conducted under subsection (1) of this
section, the director shall take no further action to implement or
enforce this chapter.
(4) Upon completion of the referendum conducted under subsection
(1) of this section, the department shall tally the results of the vote
and provide the results to affected producers. If an affected producer
disputes the results of a vote, that producer within sixty days from
the announced results, shall provide in writing a statement of why the
vote is disputed and request a recount. Once the vote is tallied and
distributed, all disputes are resolved, and all matters in a vote are
finalized, the individual ballots may be destroyed.
(5) Before conducting the referendum provided for in subsection (1)
of this section, the director may require the petitioners to deposit
with him or her an amount of money as the director deems necessary to
defray the expenses of conducting the referendum. The director shall
provide the petitioners an estimate of expenses that may be incurred to
conduct a referendum before any service takes place. Petitioners shall
deposit funds with the director to pay for expenses incurred by the
department. The commission shall reimburse petitioners the amount paid
to the department when funds become available. However, if for any
reason the referendum process is discontinued, the petitioners shall
reimburse the department for expenses incurred by the department up
until the time the process is discontinued.
(6) The director is not required to hold a referendum under
subsection (1) of this section more than once in any twelve-month
period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The director shall appoint the producer
members of the commission. In making appointments, no later than
ninety days before an expiration of a commission member's term, the
director shall call for recommendations for commission member
positions, and the director shall take into consideration
recommendations made by a statewide Washington state craft brewing
trade association or other affected producers. In appointing persons
to the commission, the director shall seek a balanced representation on
the commission that reflects the composition of the beer producers
throughout the state on the basis of beer produced and geographic
location. Information on beer production by geographic location shall
be provided by the commission upon the director's request.
(2) If a position on the commission becomes vacant due to
resignation, disqualification, death, or for any other reason, the
commission shall notify the director and the unexpired term shall
immediately be filled by appointment by the director.
(3) Each member or employee of the commission shall be reimbursed
for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out this chapter as
defined by the commission in rule. Otherwise if not defined in rule,
reimbursement for travel expenses shall be at the rates allowed by RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Obligations incurred by the commission and
any other liabilities or claims against the commission shall be
enforced only against the assets of the commission and, except to the
extent of such assets, no liability for the debts or actions of the
commission exists against either the state of Washington or any
subdivision or instrumentality thereof or against any member, employee,
or agent of the commission or the state of Washington in his or her
individual capacity. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter,
neither the commission members, nor its employees, may be held
individually responsible for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other
acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, person, or
employee, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime.
No person or employee may be held individually responsible for any act
or omission of any other commission members. The liability of the
commission members shall be several and not joint, and no member is
liable for the default of any other member. This provision confirms
that commission members have been and continue to be, state officers or
volunteers for purposes of RCW 4.92.075 and are entitled to the
defenses, indemnifications, limitations of liability, and other
protections and benefits of chapter 4.92 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The commission shall:
(1) Elect a chair and officers. The officers must include a
treasurer who is responsible for all receipts and disbursements by the
commission and the faithful discharge of whose duties shall be
guaranteed by a bond at the sole expense of the commission. The
commission must adopt rules for its own governance that provide for the
holding of an annual meeting for the election of officers and the
transaction of other business and for other meetings the commission may
direct;
(2) Do all things reasonably necessary to effect the purposes of
this chapter. However, the commission has no rule-making power except
as provided in this chapter;
(3) Employ and discharge managers, secretaries, agents, attorneys,
and employees and engage the services of independent contractors;
(4) Retain, as necessary, the services of private legal counsel to
conduct legal actions on behalf of the commission. The retention of a
private attorney is subject to review by the office of the attorney
general;
(5) Receive donations of beer from producers for promotional
purposes under subsections (6) and (7) of this section and for fund-raising purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Donations of
beer for promotional purposes may only be disseminated without charge;
(6) Engage directly or indirectly in the promotion of Washington
beer, including, without limitation, the acquisition in any lawful
manner and the dissemination without charge of beer. This
dissemination is not deemed a sale for any purpose and the commission
is not deemed a producer, supplier, or manufacturer, or the clerk,
servant, or agent of a producer, supplier, distributor, or
manufacturer. This dissemination without charge shall be for
agricultural development or trade promotion, and not for fund-raising
purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Dissemination for
promotional purposes may include promotional hosting and must in the
good faith judgment of the commission be in the aid of the marketing,
advertising, sale of beer, or of research related to such marketing,
advertising, or sale;
(7) Promote Washington beer by conducting unique beer tastings
without charge;
(8) Fund the Washington beer commission through sponsorship of up
to twelve beer festivals annually at which beer may be sold to festival
participants. For this purpose, the commission would qualify for issue
of a special occasion license as an exception to WAC 314-05-020 but
must comply with laws under Title 66 RCW and rules adopted by the
liquor control board under which such events may be conducted. If
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6838, promoting Washington's craft beer
industry by conducting beer festivals, is enacted during the 2006
regular legislative session, the commission may not conduct beer
festivals before July 1, 2007;
(9) Participate in international, federal, state, and local
hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production,
regulation, distribution, sale, or use of beer including activities
authorized under RCW 42.17.190, including the reporting of those
activities to the public disclosure commission;
(10) Acquire and transfer personal and real property, establish
offices, incur expenses, and enter into contracts, including contracts
for the creation and printing of promotional literature. The contracts
are not subject to chapter 43.78 RCW, and are cancelable by the
commission unless performed under conditions of employment that
substantially conform to the laws of this state and the rules of the
department of labor and industries. The commission may create debt and
other liabilities that are reasonable for proper discharge of its
duties under this chapter;
(11) Maintain accounts with one or more qualified public
depositories as the commission may direct, for the deposit of money,
and expend money for purposes authorized by this chapter by drafts made
by the commission upon such institutions or by other means;
(12) Cause to be kept and annually closed, in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles, accurate records of all
receipts, disbursements, and other financial transactions, available
for audit by the state auditor;
(13) Create and maintain a list of producers and disseminate
information among and solicit the opinions of producers with respect to
the discharge of the duties of the commission, directly or by
arrangement with trade associations or other instrumentalities;
(14) Employ, designate as an agent, act in concert with, and enter
into contracts with any person, council, commission, or other entity to
promote the general welfare of the beer industry and particularly to
assist in the sale and distribution of Washington beer in domestic and
foreign commerce. The commission shall expend money necessary or
advisable for this purpose and to pay its proportionate share of the
cost of any program providing direct or indirect assistance to the sale
and distribution of Washington beer in domestic or foreign commerce,
employing and paying for vendors of professional services of all kinds;
(15) Sue and be sued as a commission, without individual liability
for acts of the commission within the scope of the powers conferred
upon it by this chapter; and
(16) Serve as liaison with the liquor control board on behalf of
the commission and not for any individual producer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The commission shall develop and submit
to the director for approval any plans, programs, and projects
concerning the following:
(a) The establishment, issuance, effectuation, and administration
of appropriate programs or projects for advertising, promotion, and
education programs related to beer; and
(b) The establishment and effectuation of market research projects,
market development projects, or both to the end that the marketing of
beer may be encouraged, expanded, improved, or made more efficient.
(2) The director shall review the commission's advertising or
promotion program to ensure that no false claims are being made
concerning beer.
(3) The commission, before the beginning of its fiscal year, shall
prepare and submit to the director for approval its research plan, its
commodity-related education and training plan, and its budget on a
fiscal period basis.
(4) The director shall strive to review and make a determination of
all submissions described in this section in a timely manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The commission exists primarily for the
benefit of the people of the state of Washington and its economy. The
legislature hereby charges the commission, with oversight by the
director, to speak on behalf of the Washington state government with
regard to the marketing and promotion of Washington produced beer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The commission may create, provide for, and
conduct a comprehensive and extensive research, promotional, and
educational campaign as sales and market conditions reasonably require.
It shall investigate and ascertain the needs of producers, conditions
of markets, and degree of public awareness of products, and take into
account this information in the discharge of its duties under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The commission shall adopt as major
objectives of its research, promotional, and educational campaign goals
that serve the needs of producers. The goals may include efforts to:
(1) Establish Washington beer as a major factor in markets
everywhere;
(2) Promote Washington breweries as tourist attractions;
(3) Encourage favorable reporting of Washington beer and breweries
in the press throughout the world;
(4) Establish Washington beer in markets everywhere as a major
source of premium beer;
(5) Encourage favorable legislative and regulatory treatment of
Washington beer in markets everywhere;
(6) Encourage promotion of Washington agriculture related to beer
production, specifically hops, malting barley, and wheat grown in the
state; and
(7) Foster economic conditions favorable to investment in the
production of Washington beer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The commission shall prepare a list of
all affected producers from information available from the liquor
control board, the department, or the producers' association. This
list must contain the names and addresses of affected producers within
this state and the amount, by barrelage, of beer produced during the
period designated by the commission. A qualified person may, at any
time, have his or her name placed upon the list by delivering or
mailing the information to the commission. This list shall be
corrected and brought up-to-date in accordance with evidence and
information available to the commission by December 31st of each year.
For the purposes of giving notice and holding referendums, the list
updated before the date for issuing notices or ballots is the list of
all producers entitled to notice, to assent or dissent, or to vote.
Inadvertent failure to notify a producer does not invalidate a
proceeding conducted under this chapter.
(2) It is the responsibility of affected producers to ensure that
their correct address is filed with the commission. It is also the
responsibility of affected producers to submit production data to the
commission as prescribed by this chapter.
(3) The commission shall develop a reporting system to document
that the affected producers in this state are reporting quantities of
beer produced and are paying the assessment as provided in section 14
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) Pursuant to referendum in accordance
with section 5 of this act, there is levied, and the commission shall
collect, upon beer produced by an affected producer, an annual
assessment of ten cents per barrel of beer produced, up to ten thousand
barrels per location.
(2) The commission shall adopt rules prescribing the time, place,
and method for payment and collection of this assessment and provide
for the collection of assessments from affected producers who ship
directly out-of-state.
(3) The commission may reduce the assessment per affected producer
based upon in-kind contributions to the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The commission shall deposit money
collected under section 14 of this act in a separate account in the
name of the commission in any bank that is a state depositary. All
expenditures and disbursements made from this account under this
chapter may be made without the necessity of a specific legislative
appropriation. RCW 43.01.050 does not apply to this account or to the
money received, collected, or expended as provided in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 An assessment levied in an amount
determined by the commission under section 14 of this act constitutes
a personal debt of every person assessed or who otherwise owes the
assessment, and the assessment is due and payable to the commission
when payment is called for by the commission. If a producer fails to
pay the commission the full amount of the assessment by the date due,
the commission may add to the unpaid assessment an amount not exceeding
ten percent of the assessment to defray the cost of enforcing its
collection. If the person fails to pay an assessment, the commission
may bring a civil action for collection against the person or persons
in a court of competent jurisdiction. The action shall be tried and
judgment rendered as in any other cause of action for a debt due and
payable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) Under RCW 42.56.380, certain
agricultural business records, commission records, and department of
agriculture records relating to the commission and producers of
agricultural commodities are exempt from public disclosure.
(2) Financial and commercial information and records submitted to
either the department or the commission for the purpose of
administering this chapter may be shared between the department and the
commission. They may also be used, if required, in any suit or
administrative hearing involving this chapter.
(3) This section does not prohibit:
(a) The issuance of general statements based upon the reports of
persons subject to this chapter as long as the statements do not
identify the information furnished by any person; or
(b) The publication by the director or the commission of the name
of any person violating this chapter and a statement of the manner of
the violation by that person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) All costs incurred by the department,
including the adoption of rules and other actions necessary to carry
out this chapter, shall be reimbursed by the commission.
(2) The director may provide by rule for a method to fund staff
support for all commodity boards or commissions in accordance with RCW
43.23.033 if a position is not directly funded by the legislature and
costs are related to the specific activity undertaken on behalf of an
individual commodity board or commission. The commission shall provide
funds to the department according to the rules adopted by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 County and state law enforcement officers,
the liquor control board and its enforcement agents, and employees of
the department shall enforce this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1) Any prosecution brought under this
chapter may be instituted in any county in which the defendant or any
defendant resides, or in which the violation was committed, or in which
the defendant or any defendant has his or her principal place of
business.
(2) The superior courts may enforce this chapter and the rules and
regulations of the commission issued hereunder, and may prevent and
restrain violations thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 This act shall be liberally construed to
effectuate its purposes.

Sec. 22 RCW 66.44.800 and 1987 c 452 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Nothing contained in chapter 15.88 RCW shall affect the
compliance by the Washington wine commission with this chapter.
(2) Nothing contained in chapter 15.-- RCW (sections 1 through 21
of this act) shall affect the compliance by the Washington beer
commission with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 66.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington beer commission created under section 4 of this act
may purchase or receive donations of beer or malt beverages from any
brewery, in any state, or in any country and may use such beer or malt
beverages for any promotional purposes as outlined in section 8 of this
act. Beer and malt beverages that are furnished to the commission
under this section that are used within the state are subject to the
taxes imposed under RCW 66.24.290. No license, permit, or bond is
required of the Washington beer commission under this title for
promotional activities conducted under chapter 15.-- RCW (sections 1
through 21 of this act).

Sec. 24 RCW 15.04.200 and 1987 c 452 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Under the authority of Article VIII of the state Constitution
as amended, agricultural commodity commission expenditures for
agricultural development or trade promotion and promotional hosting by
an agricultural commodities commission under chapters 15.24, 15.28,
15.44, 15.65, 15.66, 15.88, 15.-- (sections 1 through 21 of this act),
and 16.67 RCW shall be pursuant to specific budget items as approved by
the agricultural commodity commission at the annual public hearings on
the agricultural commodity commission budget.
(2) Agricultural commodity commissions shall adopt rules governing
promotional hosting expenditures by agricultural commodity commission
employees, agents or commissioners. The rules shall identify officials
and agents authorized to make expenditures and the objectives of the
expenditures. Individual agricultural commodity commission
commissioners shall make promotional hosting expenditures, or seek
reimbursements for these expenditures, only in those instances where
the expenditures have been approved by the agricultural commodity
commission. All payments and reimbursements shall be identified and
supported on vouchers.
(3) Agricultural commodity commissions shall be exempt from the
requirements of RCW 43.01.090 and 43.19.500 and chapter 43.82 RCW.

Sec. 25 RCW 42.17.31907 and 2002 c 313 s 66 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following agricultural business records and commodity board and
commission records are exempt from the disclosure requirements of this
chapter:
(1) Production or sales records required to determine assessment
levels and actual assessment payments to commodity boards and
commissions formed under chapters 15.24, 15.26, 15.28, 15.44, 15.65,
15.66, 15.74, 15.88, 15.100, 15.-- (sections 1 through 21 of this act),
and 16.67 RCW or required by the department of agriculture to
administer these chapters or the department's programs;
(2) Consignment information contained on phytosanitary certificates
issued by the department of agriculture under chapters 15.13, 15.49,
and 15.17 RCW or federal phytosanitary certificates issued under 7
C.F.R. 353 through cooperative agreements with the animal and plant
health inspection service, United States department of agriculture, or
on applications for phytosanitary certification required by the
department of agriculture; and
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
persons (a) to the department of agriculture for the purpose of
conducting a referendum for the potential establishment of a commodity
board or commission; (b) to the department of agriculture or commodity
boards or commissions formed under chapter 15.24, 15.28, 15.44, 15.65,
15.66, 15.74, 15.88, 15.100, 15.-- (sections 1 through 21 of this act),
or 16.67 RCW with respect to domestic or export marketing activities or
individual producer's production information.

Sec. 26 RCW 42.56.380 and 2005 c 274 s 418 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following information relating to agriculture and livestock is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Business-related information under RCW 15.86.110;
(2) Information provided under RCW 15.54.362;
(3) Production or sales records required to determine assessment
levels and actual assessment payments to commodity boards and
commissions formed under chapters 15.24, 15.26, 15.28, 15.44, 15.65,
15.66, 15.74, 15.88, 15.100, 15.-- (sections 1 through 21 of this act),
and 16.67 RCW or required by the department of agriculture to
administer these chapters or the department's programs;
(4) Consignment information contained on phytosanitary certificates
issued by the department of agriculture under chapters 15.13, 15.49,
and 15.17 RCW or federal phytosanitary certificates issued under 7
C.F.R. 353 through cooperative agreements with the animal and plant
health inspection service, United States department of agriculture, or
on applications for phytosanitary certification required by the
department of agriculture;
(5) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
persons (a) to the department of agriculture for the purpose of
conducting a referendum for the potential establishment of a commodity
board or commission; or (b) to the department of agriculture or
commodity boards or commissions formed under chapter 15.24, 15.28,
15.44, 15.65, 15.66, 15.74, 15.88, 15.100, 15.-- (sections 1 through 21
of this act), or 16.67 RCW with respect to domestic or export marketing
activities or individual producer's production information;
(6) Except under RCW 15.19.080, information obtained regarding the
purchases, sales, or production of an individual American ginseng
grower or dealer;
(7) Information that can be identified to a particular business and
that is collected under section 3(1), chapter 235, Laws of 2002; and
(8) Financial statements provided under RCW 16.65.030(1)(d).

Sec. 27 RCW 43.23.033 and 2002 c 313 s 78 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director may provide by rule for a method to fund staff
support for all commodity boards and commissions if a position is not
directly funded by the legislature.
(2) Staff support funded under this section and RCW
15.65.047(1)(c), 15.66.055(3), 15.24.215, 15.26.265, 15.28.320,
15.44.190, 15.88.180, section 18 of this act, and 16.67.190 shall be
limited to one-half full-time equivalent employee for all commodity
boards and commissions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 Sections 1 through 21 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 Section 25 of this act expires July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 Section 26 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

--- END ---