BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.608 and 1975 c 62 s 46 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All motorcycles are entitled to full use of a lane and no motor
vehicle shall be driven in such a manner as to deprive any motorcycle
of the full use of a lane. This subsection shall not apply to
motorcycles operated two abreast in a single lane.
(2) The operator of a motorcycle shall not overtake and pass in the
same lane occupied by the vehicle being overtaken. However, when
traffic is stopped or slowed to less than ten miles per hour, an
operator of a motorcycle may overtake and pass slowed or stopped
vehicles by use of a breakdown or access lane at a speed not exceeding
twenty miles per hour. When using a breakdown lane or access lane
under these circumstances, the operator of a motorcycle shall yield to
both emergency vehicles and disabled vehicles.
(3) No person shall operate a motorcycle between lanes of traffic
or between adjacent lines or rows of vehicles.
(4) Motorcycles shall not be operated more than two abreast in a
single lane.
(5) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not apply to
police officers in the performance of their official duties.

--- END ---