BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares that:
(1) There is credible evidence that children of divorce are at
greater risk for observable behavior and adjustment problems; parental
divorce has been found to predict unhealthy behaviors such as smoking,
drug use, and poor psychological adjustment; and children of divorced
parents face a greater mortality risk than people whose parents
remained married until they reached age twenty-one;
(2) Strong family relationships result in stronger communities and
place less of a fiscal burden on the state; and
(3) Relationship skills can be learned, and once learned these
skills can facilitate communication and assist couples in avoiding
conflict. In addition, effective relationship skills are utilized in
parenting, the workplace, schools, neighborhoods, and other
relationships.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The secretary of the department of
health shall establish a pilot program to provide merit checks of no
more than one hundred dollars to no more than four hundred fifty
couples who complete a family preparation course. Matching funds may
be used to increase the number of participants in the pilot program.
The pilot program must begin no later than January 1, 2007, and
continue for no more than five years, in a county with a population
between seven hundred twenty thousand and one million. Under the pilot
program, a man and a woman who intend to apply for a marriage license
may, together or separately, complete a family preparation course of
not less than four hours with a family preparation course provider
registered with the clerk of the county. The county auditor shall
provide to couples interested in applying for a marriage license in the
county, or to a qualified instructor, certificate of completion forms
for the family preparation course and information that includes a brief
explanation of the course of required instruction, the required length
of time of the course, and an explanation of the qualified instructor
requirements. Upon applying for a marriage license, either applicant
may verify completion of a family preparation course by filing with the
county auditor a valid certificate of completion from a registered
course provider. Completed forms must include names and addresses of
participants, the name and work address of the course provider,
signatures of participants attesting to the completion of the required
coursework and the required length of instruction, and the signature of
the qualified instructor attesting to being a qualified instructor and
providing the required coursework and time requirement for the
participants.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a family preparation course
must include instruction regarding:
(a) Conflict management;
(b) Communication skills;
(c) Financial responsibilities in a marriage; and
(d) Children and parenting responsibilities.
(3) The family preparation course must be at least four hours in
length and must be taken from a qualified instructor who is a:
(a) Licensed psychologist;
(b) Certified social worker;
(c) Certified marriage and family therapist;
(d) Certified mental health counselor;
(e) Registered counselor with relevant training or coursework;
(f) Provider designated by a family court judge or commissioner; or
(g) Official representative of a religious institution, if the
representative has relevant training.
(4) Any costs of the family preparation course must be paid by the
applicant. Upon receipt of a certificate of completion by the county
auditor, the county auditor shall forward along with the marriage
certificate the individual's name and address and a copy of the
certificate of completion to the department of health's statistics
center for the purposes of issuing merit checks as provided under this
section. The county auditor shall also send to the department of
health's statistics center information on divorced or annulled couples
who had previously participated in a family preparation course.
(5) When the department of health receives a marriage certificate
from the county auditor that includes a certificate of completion of a
family preparation course issued by a qualified instructor consistent
with this section, the department shall, within sixty days, issue a
merit check to the couple, not to exceed one hundred dollars per
married couple.
(6) The department of health shall report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature five years after the completion of the
pilot program. The committees shall make recommendations on whether
the program should be initiated statewide based on the results of the
number of participants who are still married as opposed to the average
divorce rate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of forty-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the department of health
for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---