BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.18.545 and 2002 c 360 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Adverse action" has the same meaning as defined in the fair
credit reporting act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq. Adverse actions
include, but are not limited to:
(i) Cancellation, denial, or nonrenewal of personal insurance
coverage;
(ii) Charging a higher insurance premium for personal insurance
than would have been offered if the credit history or insurance score
had been more favorable, whether the charge is by:
(A) Application of a rating rule;
(B) Assignment to a rating tier that does not have the lowest
available rates; or
(C) Placement with an affiliate company that does not offer the
lowest rates available to the consumer within the affiliate group of
insurance companies; or
(iii) Any reduction, adverse, or unfavorable change in the terms of
coverage or amount of any personal insurance due to a consumer's credit
history or insurance score. A reduction, adverse, or unfavorable
change in the terms of coverage occurs when:
(A) Coverage provided to the consumer is not as broad in scope as
coverage requested by the consumer but available to other insureds of
the insurer or any affiliate; or
(B) The consumer is not eligible for benefits such as dividends
that are available through affiliate insurers.
(b) "Affiliate" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.31B.005(1).
(c) "Consumer" means an individual policyholder or applicant for
insurance.
(d) "Consumer report" has the same meaning as defined in the fair
credit reporting act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.
(e) "Credit history" means any written, oral, or other
communication of any information by a consumer reporting agency bearing
on a consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity
that is used or expected to be used, or collected in whole or in part,
for the purpose of serving as a factor in determining personal
insurance premiums or eligibility for coverage.
(f) "Insurance score" means a number or rating that is derived from
an algorithm, computer application, model, or other process that is
based in whole or in part on credit history.
(g) "Personal insurance" means:
(i) Private passenger automobile coverage;
(ii) Homeowner's coverage, including mobile homeowners,
manufactured homeowners, condominium owners, and renter's coverage;
(iii) Dwelling property coverage;
(iv) Earthquake coverage for a residence or personal property;
(v) Personal liability and theft coverage;
(vi) Personal inland marine coverage; and
(vii) Mechanical breakdown coverage for personal auto or home
appliances.
(h) "Tier" means a category within a single insurer into which
insureds with substantially like insuring, risk or exposure factors,
and expense elements are placed for purposes of determining rate or
premium.
(2) An insurer that takes adverse action against a consumer based
in whole or in part on credit history or insurance score shall provide
written notice to the applicant or named insured. The notice must
state the significant factors of the credit history or insurance score
that resulted in the adverse action. The insurer shall also inform the
consumer that the consumer is entitled to a free copy of their consumer
report under the fair credit reporting act.
(3) An insurer shall not cancel or nonrenew personal insurance
based in whole or in part on a consumer's credit history or insurance
score. An offer of placement with an affiliate insurer does not
constitute cancellation or nonrenewal under this section.
(4) An insurer may use credit history to deny personal insurance
only in combination with other substantive underwriting factors. For
the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Deny" means an insurer refuses to offer insurance coverage to
a consumer;
(b) An offer of placement with an affiliate insurer does not
constitute denial of coverage; and
(c) An insurer may reject an application when coverage is not bound
or cancel an insurance contract within the first sixty days after the
effective date of the contract.
(5) Insurers shall not deny personal insurance coverage based on:
(a) The absence of credit history or the inability to determine the
consumer's credit history, if the insurer has received accurate and
complete information from the consumer;
(b) The number of credit inquiries;
(c) Credit history or an insurance score based on collection
accounts identified with a medical industry code;
(d) The initial purchase or finance of a vehicle or house that adds
a new loan to the consumer's existing credit history, if evident from
the consumer report; however, an insurer may consider the bill payment
history of any loan, the total number of loans, or both;
(e) The consumer's use of a particular type of credit card, charge
card, or debit card; ((or))
(f) The consumer's total available line of credit; however, an
insurer may consider the total amount of outstanding debt in relation
to the total available line of credit; or
(g) The consumer's status as a victim of identity theft as defined
in RCW 9.35.005(5).
(6)(a) If disputed credit history is used to determine eligibility
for coverage and a consumer is placed with an affiliate that charges
higher premiums or offers less favorable policy terms:
(i) The insurer shall reissue or rerate the policy retroactive to
the effective date of the current policy term; and
(ii) The policy, as reissued or rerated, shall provide premiums and
policy terms the consumer would have been eligible for if accurate
credit history had been used to determine eligibility.
(b) This subsection only applies if the consumer resolves the
dispute under the process set forth in the fair credit reporting act
and notifies the insurer in writing that the dispute has been resolved.
(7) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section.
(8) This section applies to all personal insurance policies issued
or renewed after January 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A consumer may elect to place a security freeze on his or her
credit report by making a request in writing by certified mail to a
consumer credit reporting agency. "Security freeze" means a notice
placed in a consumer's credit report, at the request of the consumer
and subject to certain exceptions, that prohibits the consumer credit
reporting agency from releasing the consumer's credit report or any
information from it without the express authorization of the consumer.
If a security freeze is in place, information from a consumer's credit
report may not be released to a third party without prior express
authorization from the consumer. This subsection does not prevent a
consumer credit reporting agency from advising a third party that a
security freeze is in effect with respect to the consumer's credit
report.
(2) A consumer credit reporting agency shall place a security
freeze on a consumer's credit report no later than five business days
after receiving a written request from the consumer.
(3) The consumer credit reporting agency shall send a written
confirmation of the security freeze to the consumer within ten business
days and shall provide the consumer with a unique personal
identification number or password to be used by the consumer when
providing authorization for the release of his or her credit for a
specific party or period of time.
(4) If the consumer wishes to allow his or her credit report to be
accessed for a specific party or period of time while a freeze is in
place, he or she shall contact the consumer credit reporting agency,
request that the freeze be temporarily lifted, and provide the
following:
(a) Proper identification, which means that information generally
deemed sufficient to identify a person. Only if the consumer is unable
to reasonably identify himself or herself, may a consumer credit
reporting agency require additional information concerning the
consumer's employment and personal or family history in order to verify
his or her identity;
(b) The unique personal identification number or password provided
by the credit reporting agency under subsection (3) of this section;
and
(c) The proper information identifying the third party who is to
receive the credit report or the time period for which the report is
available to users of the credit report.
(5) A consumer credit reporting agency that receives a request from
a consumer to temporarily lift a freeze on a credit report under
subsection (4) of this section, shall comply with the request no later
than three business days after receiving the request.
(6) A consumer credit reporting agency may develop procedures
involving the use of telephone, fax, the internet, or other electronic
media to receive and process a request from a consumer to temporarily
lift a freeze on a credit report under subsection (4) of this section
in an expedited manner.
(7) A consumer credit reporting agency shall remove or temporarily
lift a freeze placed on a consumer's credit report only in the
following cases:
(a) Upon consumer request, under subsection (4) or (10) of this
section; and
(b) When the consumer's credit report was frozen due to a material
misrepresentation of fact by the consumer. When a consumer credit
reporting agency intends to remove a freeze upon a consumer's credit
report under this subsection, the consumer credit reporting agency
shall notify the consumer in writing thirty days prior to removing the
freeze on the consumer's credit report.
(8) When a third party requests access to a consumer credit report
on which a security freeze is in effect, and this request is in
connection with an application for credit or any other use, and the
consumer does not allow his or her credit report to be accessed for
that specific party or period of time, the third party may treat the
application as incomplete.
(9) When a consumer requests a security freeze, the consumer credit
reporting agency shall disclose the process of placing and temporarily
lifting a freeze, and the process for allowing access to information
from the consumer's credit report for a specific party or period of
time while the freeze is in place.
(10) A security freeze remains in place until the consumer requests
that the security freeze be removed. A consumer credit reporting
agency shall remove a security freeze within three business days of
receiving a request for removal from the consumer, who provides both of
the following:
(a) Proper identification, as defined in subsection (4)(a) of this
section; and
(b) The unique personal identification number or password provided
by the credit reporting agency under subsection (3) of this section.
(11) This section does not apply to the use of a consumer credit
report by any of the following:
(a) A person or entity, or a subsidiary, affiliate, or agent of
that person or entity, or an assignee of a financial obligation owing
by the consumer to that person or entity, or a prospective assignee of
a financial obligation owing by the consumer to that person or entity
in conjunction with the proposed purchase of the financial obligation,
with which the consumer has or had prior to assignment an account or
contract, including a demand deposit account, or to whom the consumer
issued a negotiable instrument, for the purposes of reviewing the
account or collecting the financial obligation owing for the account,
contract, or negotiable instrument. For purposes of this subsection,
"reviewing the account" includes activities related to account
maintenance, monitoring, credit line increases, and account upgrades
and enhancements;
(b) A subsidiary, affiliate, agent, assignee, or prospective
assignee of a person to whom access has been granted under subsection
(4) of this section for purposes of facilitating the extension of
credit or other permissible use;
(c) Any state or local agency, law enforcement agency, or trial
court, or a private collection agency acting under a court order,
warrant, or subpoena;
(d) A child support agency acting under Title IV-D of the social
security act (42 U.S.C. et seq.);
(e) The department of social and health services acting to
investigate benefits fraud;
(f) The internal revenue service acting to investigate or collect
delinquent taxes or unpaid court orders or to fulfill any of its other
statutory responsibilities;
(g) The use of credit information for the purposes of prescreening
as provided for by the federal fair credit reporting act;
(h) Any person or entity administering a credit file monitoring
subscription service to which the consumer has subscribed; and
(i) Any person or entity for the purpose of providing a consumer
with a copy of his or her credit report upon the consumer's request.
(12) This section and sections 3 through 8 of this act, do not
prevent a consumer credit reporting agency from charging a fee of no
more than ten dollars to a consumer for each freeze, removal of the
freeze, or temporary lift of the freeze for a period of time, except
that a consumer credit reporting agency may not charge a fee to a
victim of identity theft, as defined in RCW 9.35.005(5), who has
submitted a valid police report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
If a security freeze is in place, a consumer credit reporting
agency may not change any of the following official information in a
consumer credit report without sending a written confirmation of the
change to the consumer within thirty days of the change being posted to
the consumer's file: Name, date of birth, social security number, and
address. Written confirmation is not required for technical
modifications of a consumer's official information, including name and
street abbreviations, complete spellings, or transposition of numbers
or letters. In the case of an address change, the written confirmation
shall be sent to both the new address and to the former address.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
Sections 2 and 3 of this act do not apply to a consumer credit
reporting agency that acts only as a reseller of credit information by
assembling and merging information contained in the data base of
another consumer credit reporting agency or multiple consumer credit
reporting agencies, and does not maintain a permanent data base of
credit information from which new consumer credit reports are produced.
The consumer credit reporting agency that receives the request for a
security freeze must forward the request to each of the other major
credit reporting agencies within five business days. Each consumer
credit reporting agency must honor any security freeze placed on a
consumer credit report by another consumer credit reporting agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
The following entities are not required to place a security freeze
in a credit report under section 2 of this act:
(1) A check services or fraud prevention services company, which
issues reports on incidents of fraud or authorizations for the purpose
of approving or processing negotiable instruments, electronic funds
transfers, or similar methods of payments; and
(2) A deposit account information service company, which issues
reports regarding account closures due to fraud, substantial
overdrafts, ATM abuse, or similar negative information regarding a
consumer, to inquiring banks or other financial institutions for use
only in reviewing a consumer request for a deposit account at the
inquiring bank or financial institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
A consumer may elect that his or her name be removed from any list
that a consumer credit reporting agency furnishes for credit card
solicitations, by notifying the consumer credit reporting agency, by
telephone or in writing, under the notification system maintained by
the consumer credit reporting agency. The election is effective for a
minimum of two years, unless otherwise specified by the consumer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
A consumer credit reporting agency may furnish to a governmental
agency a consumer's name, address, former address, places of
employment, or former places of employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
A consumer credit reporting agency that maintains a website on the
internet, for use by consumers, shall make available information for
consumers regarding how to implement a credit security freeze. The
information shall be prominently displayed and easily accessible, and
shall include, at a minimum, a definition of a security freeze, how to
obtain and utilize one, costs involved, and a toll-free telephone
number for more information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
Credit reporting agencies shall provide data to the attorney
general on an annual basis regarding the number of Washington state
consumers who utilize a security freeze. The attorney general must
make this data available to the legislature and the public upon
request, in a manner selected by the attorney general.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---