BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.160.020 and 2006 c 2 s 2 (Initiative Measure No.
901) are each amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(1) "Smoke" or "smoking" means the carrying or smoking of any kind
of lighted pipe, cigar, cigarette, or any other lighted smoking
equipment.
(2) "Public place" means that portion of any building or vehicle
used by and open to the public, regardless of whether the building or
vehicle is owned in whole or in part by private persons or entities,
the state of Washington, or other public entity, and regardless of
whether a fee is charged for admission, and includes a presumptively
reasonable minimum distance, as set forth in RCW 70.160.075, of
((twenty-five)) ten feet from entrances, exits, windows that open, and
ventilation intakes that serve an enclosed area where smoking is
prohibited. A public place does not include a private residence unless
the private residence is used to provide licensed child care, foster
care, adult care, or other similar social service care on the premises.
Public places include, but are not limited to: Schools, elevators,
public conveyances or transportation facilities, museums, concert
halls, theaters, auditoriums, exhibition halls, indoor sports arenas,
hospitals, nursing homes, health care facilities or clinics, enclosed
shopping centers, retail stores, retail service establishments,
financial institutions, educational facilities, ticket areas, public
hearing facilities, state legislative chambers and immediately adjacent
hallways, public restrooms, libraries, restaurants, waiting areas,
lobbies, bars, taverns, bowling alleys, skating rinks, casinos,
reception areas, and no less than seventy-five percent of the sleeping
quarters within a hotel or motel that are rented to guests. A public
place does not include a private residence. This chapter is not
intended to restrict smoking in private facilities which are
occasionally open to the public except upon the occasions when the
facility is open to the public.
(3) "Place of employment" means any area under the control of a
public or private employer which employees are required to pass through
during the course of employment, including, but not limited to:
Entrances and exits to the places of employment, and including a
presumptively reasonable minimum distance, as set forth in RCW
70.160.075, of ((twenty-five)) ten feet from entrances, exits, windows
that open, and ventilation intakes that serve an enclosed area where
smoking is prohibited; work areas; restrooms; conference and
classrooms; break rooms and cafeterias; and other common areas. A
private residence or home-based business, unless used to provide
licensed child care, foster care, adult care, or other similar social
service care on the premises, is not a place of employment.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.160.075 and 2006 c 2 s 6 (Initiative Measure No.
901) are each amended to read as follows:
Smoking is prohibited within a presumptively reasonable minimum
distance of ((twenty-five)) ten feet from entrances, exits, windows
that open, and ventilation intakes that serve an enclosed area where
smoking is prohibited so as to ensure that tobacco smoke does not enter
the area through entrances, exits, open windows, or other means.
Owners, operators, managers, employers, or other persons who own or
control a public place or place of employment may seek to rebut the
presumption that ((twenty-five)) ten feet is a reasonable minimum
distance by making application to the director of the local health
department or district in which the public place or place of employment
is located. The presumption will be rebutted if the applicant can show
by clear and convincing evidence that, given the unique circumstances
presented by the location of entrances, exits, windows that open,
ventilation intakes, or other factors, smoke will not infiltrate or
reach the entrances, exits, open windows, or ventilation intakes or
enter into such public place or place of employment and, therefore, the
public health and safety will be adequately protected by a lesser
distance.

--- END ---