BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.18.012 and 2005 c 457 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is subject to division
with the state for deposit in the public safety and education account
under RCW 36.18.025.
(2) The party filing a transcript or abstract of judgment or
verdict from a United States court held in this state, or from the
superior court of another county or from a district court in the county
of issuance, shall pay at the time of filing a fee of twenty dollars.
(3) The clerk shall collect a fee of twenty dollars for: Filing a
paper not related to or a part of a proceeding, civil or criminal, or
a probate matter, required or permitted to be filed in the clerk's
office for which no other charge is provided by law.
(4) If the defendant serves or files an answer to an unlawful
detainer complaint under chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW, the plaintiff
shall pay before proceeding with the unlawful detainer action one
hundred twelve dollars.
(5) Any party filing a counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party
claim in an unlawful detainer action under chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW
shall pay the equivalent to the total filing fee of an unlawful
detainer action pursuant to RCW 36.18.020, including the fee for an
unlawful detainer answer pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.
(6) For a restrictive covenant for filing a petition to strike
discriminatory provisions in real estate under RCW 49.60.227 a fee of
twenty dollars must be charged.
(((6))) (7) A fee of twenty dollars must be charged for filing a
will only, when no probate of the will is contemplated.
(((7))) (8) A fee of twenty dollars must be charged for filing a
petition, written agreement, or written memorandum in a nonjudicial
probate dispute under RCW 11.96A.220, if it is filed within an existing
case in the same court.
(((8))) (9) A fee of thirty-five dollars must be charged for filing
a petition regarding a common law lien under RCW 60.70.060.
(((9) For certification of delinquent taxes by a county treasurer
under RCW 84.64.190, a fee of five dollars must be charged.))
(10) For the filing of a tax warrant for unpaid taxes or
overpayment of benefits by any agency of the state of Washington, a fee
of five dollars on or after July 22, 2001, and for the filing of such
a tax warrant or overpayment of benefits on or after July 1, 2003, a
fee of twenty dollars, of which forty-six percent of the first five
dollars is directed to the public safety and education account
established under RCW 43.08.250.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.18.016 and 2005 c 457 s 18, 2005 c 374 s 2, and
2005 c 202 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is not subject to division
under RCW 36.18.025 or 27.24.070.
(2)(a) For the filing of a petition for modification of a decree of
dissolution or paternity, within the same case as the original action,
and any party filing a counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim
in any such action, a fee of thirty-six dollars must be paid.
(b) The party filing the first or initial petition for dissolution,
legal separation, or declaration concerning the validity of marriage
shall pay, at the time and in addition to the filing fee required under
RCW 36.18.020, a fee of thirty dollars. The clerk of the superior
court shall transmit monthly twenty-four dollars of the thirty-dollar
fee collected under this subsection to the state treasury for deposit
in the domestic violence prevention account. The remaining six dollars
shall be retained by the county for the purpose of supporting
community-based services within the county for victims of domestic
violence, except for five percent of the six dollars, which may be
retained by the court for administrative purposes.
(3)(a) The party making a demand for a jury of six in a civil
action shall pay, at the time, a fee of one hundred twenty-five
dollars; if the demand is for a jury of twelve, a fee of two hundred
fifty dollars. If, after the party demands a jury of six and pays the
required fee, any other party to the action requests a jury of twelve,
an additional one hundred twenty-five dollar fee will be required of
the party demanding the increased number of jurors.
(b) Upon conviction in criminal cases a jury demand charge of one
hundred twenty-five dollars for a jury of six, or two hundred fifty
dollars for a jury of twelve may be imposed as costs under RCW
10.46.190.
(4) For preparing a certified copy of an instrument on file or of
record in the clerk's office, for the first page or portion of the
first page, a fee of five dollars, and for each additional page or
portion of a page, a fee of one dollar must be charged. For
authenticating or exemplifying an instrument, a fee of two dollars for
each additional seal affixed must be charged. For preparing a copy of
an instrument on file or of record in the clerk's office without a
seal, a fee of fifty cents per page must be charged. When copying a
document without a seal or file that is in an electronic format, a fee
of twenty-five cents per page must be charged. For copies made on a
compact disc, an additional fee of twenty dollars for each compact disc
must be charged.
(5) For executing a certificate, with or without a seal, a fee of
two dollars must be charged.
(6) For a garnishee defendant named in an affidavit for garnishment
and for a writ of attachment, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.
(7) For filing a supplemental proceeding, a fee of twenty dollars
must be charged.
(8) For approving a bond, including justification on the bond, in
other than civil actions and probate proceedings, a fee of two dollars
must be charged.
(9) For the issuance of a certificate of qualification and a
certified copy of letters of administration, letters testamentary, or
letters of guardianship, there must be a fee of two dollars.
(10) For the preparation of a passport application, the clerk may
collect an execution fee as authorized by the federal government.
(11) For clerk's services such as processing ex parte orders,
performing historical searches, compiling statistical reports, and
conducting exceptional record searches, the clerk may collect a fee not
to exceed twenty dollars per hour or portion of an hour.
(12) For duplicated recordings of court's proceedings there must be
a fee of ten dollars for each audio tape and twenty-five dollars for
each video tape or other electronic storage medium.
(13) For registration of land titles, Torrens Act, under RCW
65.12.780, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.
(14) For the issuance of extension of judgment under RCW 6.17.020
and chapter 9.94A RCW, a fee of two hundred dollars must be charged.
When the extension of judgment is at the request of the clerk, the two
hundred dollar charge may be imposed as court costs under RCW
10.46.190.
(15) A facilitator surcharge of up to twenty dollars must be
charged as authorized under RCW 26.12.240.
(16) For filing a water rights statement under RCW 90.03.180, a fee
of twenty-five dollars must be charged.
(17) For filing a claim of frivolous lien under RCW 60.04.081, a
fee of thirty-five dollars must be charged.
(18) For preparation of a change of venue, a fee of twenty dollars
must be charged by the originating court in addition to the per page
charges in subsection (4) of this section.
(19) A service fee of three dollars for the first page and one
dollar for each additional page must be charged for receiving faxed
documents, pursuant to Washington state rules of court, general rule
17.
(20) For preparation of clerk's papers under RAP 9.7, a fee of
fifty cents per page must be charged.
(21) For copies and reports produced at the local level as
permitted by RCW 2.68.020 and supreme court policy, a variable fee must
be charged.
(22) Investment service charge and earnings under RCW 36.48.090
must be charged.
(23) Costs for nonstatutory services rendered by clerk by authority
of local ordinance or policy must be charged.
(24) For filing a request for mandatory arbitration, a filing fee
may be assessed against the party filing a statement of arbitrability
not to exceed two hundred twenty dollars as established by authority of
local ordinance. This charge shall be used solely to offset the cost
of the mandatory arbitration program.
(25) For filing a request for trial de novo of an arbitration
award, a fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars as established by
authority of local ordinance must be charged.
(26) A public agency may not charge a fee to a law enforcement
agency, for preparation, copying, or mailing of certified copies of the
judgment and sentence, information, affidavit of probable cause, and/or
the notice of requirement to register, of a sex offender convicted in
a Washington court, when such records are necessary for risk
assessment, preparation of a case for failure to register, or
maintenance of a sex offender's registration file.
(27) For the filing of a will or codicil under the provisions of
chapter 11.12 RCW, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.
The revenue to counties from the fees established in this section
shall be deemed to be complete reimbursement from the state for the
state's share of benefits paid to the superior court judges of the
state prior to July 24, 2005, and no claim shall lie against the state
for such benefits.

Sec. 3 RCW 60.04.081 and 1992 c 126 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any owner of real property subject to a recorded claim of lien
under this chapter, or contractor, subcontractor, lender, or lien
claimant who believes the claim of lien to be frivolous and made
without reasonable cause, or clearly excessive may apply by motion to
the superior court for the county where the property, or some part
thereof is located, for an order directing the lien claimant to appear
before the court at a time no earlier than six nor later than fifteen
days following the date of service of the application and order on the
lien claimant, and show cause, if any he or she has, why the relief
requested should not be granted. The motion shall state the grounds
upon which relief is asked, and shall be supported by the affidavit of
the applicant or his or her attorney setting forth a concise statement
of the facts upon which the motion is based.
(2) The order shall clearly state that if the lien claimant fails
to appear at the time and place noted the lien shall be released, with
prejudice, and that the lien claimant shall be ordered to pay the costs
requested by the applicant including reasonable attorneys' fees.
(3) If no action to foreclose the lien claim has been filed, the
clerk of the court shall assign a cause number to the application and
obtain from the applicant a filing fee ((of thirty-five dollars))
pursuant to RCW 36.18.016. If an action has been filed to foreclose
the lien claim, the application shall be made a part of that action.
(4) If, following a hearing on the matter, the court determines
that the lien is frivolous and made without reasonable cause, or
clearly excessive, the court shall issue an order releasing the lien if
frivolous and made without reasonable cause, or reducing the lien if
clearly excessive, and awarding costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to
the applicant to be paid by the lien claimant. If the court determines
that the lien is not frivolous and was made with reasonable cause, and
is not clearly excessive, the court shall issue an order so stating and
awarding costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to the lien claimant to
be paid by the applicant.
(5) Proceedings under this section shall not affect other rights
and remedies available to the parties under this chapter or otherwise.

Sec. 4 RCW 60.70.060 and 1995 c 19 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person whose real or personal property is subject to a
recorded claim of common law lien who believes the claim of lien is
invalid, may petition the superior court of the county in which the
claim of lien has been recorded for an order, which may be granted ex
parte, directing the lien claimant to appear before the court at a time
no earlier than six nor later than twenty-one days following the date
of service of the petition and order on the lien claimant, and show
cause, if any, why the claim of lien should not be stricken and other
relief provided for by this section should not be granted. The
petition shall state the grounds upon which relief is requested, and
shall be supported by the affidavit of the petitioner or his or her
attorney setting forth a concise statement of the facts upon which the
motion is based. The order shall be served upon the lien claimant by
personal service, or, where the court determines that service by mail
is likely to give actual notice, the court may order that service be
made by any person over eighteen years of age, who is competent to be
a witness, other than a party, by mailing copies of the petition and
order to the lien claimant at his or her last known address or any
other address determined by the court to be appropriate. Two copies
shall be mailed, postage prepaid, one by ordinary first class mail and
the other by a form of mail requiring a signed receipt showing when and
to whom it was delivered. The envelopes must bear the return address
of the sender.
(2) The order shall clearly state that if the lien claimant fails
to appear at the time and place noted, the claim of lien shall be
stricken and released and that the lien claimant shall be ordered to
pay the costs incurred by the petitioner, including reasonable
attorneys' fees.
(3) The clerk of the court shall assign a cause number to the
petition and obtain from the petitioner a filing fee ((of thirty-five
dollars)) pursuant to RCW 36.18.012.
(4) If, following a hearing on the matter, the court determines
that the claim of lien is invalid, the court shall issue an order
striking and releasing the claim of lien and awarding costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees to the petitioner to be paid by the lien
claimant. If the court determines that the claim of lien is valid, the
court shall issue an order so stating and may award costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees to the lien claimant to be paid by the
petitioner.

--- END ---