BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that motor vehicle
sales between private parties often involve transactions of motor
vehicles where sales or use tax has already been paid. The legislature
further finds that requiring the payment of use tax whenever a transfer
of ownership for a motor vehicle occurs is multiple taxation on the
same product. This act is intended to reduce the use tax burden on
sales of motor vehicles between private parties by requiring that the
purchase price be used for measure of use tax liability.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.010 and 2005 c 514 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Purchase price" means the same as sales price as defined in
RCW 82.08.010((.));
(2)(a) "Value of the article used" shall be the purchase price for
the article of tangible personal property, the use of which is taxable
under this chapter. The term also includes, in addition to the
purchase price, the amount of any tariff or duty paid with respect to
the importation of the article used. ((In case)) Unless expressly
provided otherwise, if the article used is acquired by lease or by gift
or is extracted, produced, or manufactured by the person using the same
or is sold under conditions wherein the purchase price does not
represent the true value thereof, the value of the article used shall
be determined as nearly as possible according to the retail selling
price at place of use of similar products of like quality and character
under such rules as the department may prescribe.
(b) In case the articles used are acquired by bailment, the value
of the use of the articles so used shall be in an amount representing
a reasonable rental for the use of the articles so bailed, determined
as nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places
of use of similar products of like quality and character under such
rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such
articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the
construction, repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become
or are to become an ingredient or component of, new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or
for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city
housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing or attaching of any such articles therein or thereto,
whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by
virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such articles so
used shall be determined according to the retail selling price of such
articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of
similar products of like quality and character or, in the absence of
either of these selling price measures, such value may be determined
upon a cost basis, in any event under such rules as the department of
revenue may prescribe.
(c) In the case of articles owned by a user engaged in business
outside the state which are brought into the state for no more than one
hundred eighty days in any period of three hundred sixty-five
consecutive days and which are temporarily used for business purposes
by the person in this state, the value of the article used shall be an
amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the articles,
unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW
upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this
subsection.
(d) In the case of articles manufactured or produced by the user
and used in the manufacture or production of products sold or to be
sold to the department of defense of the United States, the value of
the articles used shall be determined according to the value of the
ingredients of such articles.
(e) In the case of an article manufactured or produced for purposes
of serving as a prototype for the development of a new or improved
product, the value of the article used shall be determined by: (i) The
retail selling price of such new or improved product when first offered
for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into the
prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered
for sale.
(f) In the case of an article purchased with a direct pay permit
under RCW 82.32.087, the value of the article used shall be determined
by the purchase price of such article if, but for the use of the direct
pay permit, the transaction would have been subject to sales tax.
(g) In the case of a motor vehicle purchased within or without the
state, the value of the article used shall be the purchase price,
regardless of whether the purchase price represents the true value of
the motor vehicle;
(3) "Value of the service used" means the purchase price for the
service, the use of which is taxable under this chapter. If the
service is received by gift or under conditions wherein the purchase
price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of the
service used shall be determined as nearly as possible according to the
retail selling price at place of use of similar services of like
quality and character under rules the department may prescribe;
(4) "Value of the extended warranty used" means the purchase price
for the extended warranty, the use of which is taxable under this
chapter. If the extended warranty is received by gift or under
conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
of the extended warranty, the value of the extended warranty used shall
be determined as nearly as possible according to the retail selling
price at place of use of similar extended warranties of like quality
and character under rules the department may prescribe;
(5) "Use," "used," "using," or "put to use" shall have their
ordinary meaning, and shall mean:
(a) With respect to tangible personal property, the first act
within this state by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or
control over the article of tangible personal property (as a consumer),
and include installation, storage, withdrawal from storage,
distribution, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or
consumption within this state;
(b) With respect to a service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), the
first act within this state after the service has been performed by
which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the
article of tangible personal property upon which the service was
performed (as a consumer), and includes installation, storage,
withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to
subsequent actual use or consumption of the article within this state;
and
(c) With respect to an extended warranty, the first act within this
state after the extended warranty has been acquired by which the
taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of
tangible personal property to which the extended warranty applies, and
includes installation, storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution,
or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption of
the article within this state;
(6) "Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included within
the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word "consumer" as defined in
chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;
(7) "Retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and
every person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal
property at retail and every person required to collect from purchasers
the tax imposed under this chapter;
(8) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.050(7);
(9) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and
82.08 RCW, insofar as applicable, shall have full force and effect with
respect to taxes imposed under the provisions of this chapter.
"Consumer," in addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04
and 82.08 RCW insofar as applicable, shall also mean any person who
distributes or displays, or causes to be distributed or displayed, any
article of tangible personal property, except newspapers, the primary
purpose of which is to promote the sale of products or services. With
respect to property distributed to persons within this state by a
consumer as defined in this subsection (9), the use of the property
shall be deemed to be by such consumer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of motor
vehicles acquired by gift if the gift includes the entire value of the
vehicle.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.12.045 and 2003 c 361 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In the collection of the use tax on motor vehicles, the
department of revenue may designate the county auditors of the several
counties of the state as its collecting agents. Upon such designation,
it shall be the duty of each county auditor to collect the tax at the
time an applicant applies for the registration of, and transfer of
title to, the motor vehicle, except in the following instances:
(a) Where the applicant exhibits a dealer's report of sale showing
that the retail sales tax has been collected by the dealer;
(b) Where the application is for the renewal of registration;
(c) Where the applicant presents a written statement signed by the
department of revenue, or its duly authorized agent showing that no use
tax is legally due; or
(d) Where the applicant presents satisfactory evidence showing that
the retail sales tax or the use tax has been paid by the applicant on
the vehicle in question.
(2) The term "motor vehicle," as used in this section means and
includes all motor vehicles, trailers and semitrailers used, or of a
type designed primarily to be used, upon the public streets and
highways, for the convenience or pleasure of the owner, or for the
conveyance, for hire or otherwise, of persons or property, including
fixed loads, facilities for human habitation, and vehicles carrying
exempt licenses.
(3) It shall be the duty of every applicant for registration and
transfer of certificate of title who is subject to payment of tax under
this section to declare upon the application the value of the vehicle
for which application is made, which shall consist of the consideration
paid or contracted to be paid therefor. The county auditor shall
calculate the tax due based on the purchase price declared by the
applicant for registration and transfer of certificate of title, under
penalty of perjury, on a bill of sale form provided by the department
of revenue. The department of revenue shall make the bill of sale form
available electronically on its web site and at all department of
licensing vehicle licensing offices, including each county auditor and
appointed subagents of the director of licensing.
(4) Each county auditor who acts as agent of the department of
revenue shall at the time of remitting license fee receipts on motor
vehicles subject to the provisions of this section pay over and account
to the state treasurer for all use tax revenue collected under this
section, after first deducting as a collection fee the sum of two
dollars for each motor vehicle upon which the tax has been collected.
All revenue received by the state treasurer under this section shall be
credited to the general fund. The auditor's collection fee shall be
deposited in the county current expense fund. A duplicate of the
county auditor's transmittal report to the state treasurer shall be
forwarded forthwith to the department of revenue.
(5) Any applicant who has paid use tax to a county auditor under
this section may apply to the department of revenue for refund thereof
if he or she has reason to believe that such tax was not legally due
and owing. No refund shall be allowed unless application therefor is
received by the department of revenue within the statutory period for
assessment of taxes, penalties, or interest prescribed by RCW
82.32.050(3). Upon receipt of an application for refund the department
of revenue shall consider the same and issue its order either granting
or denying it and if refund is denied the taxpayer shall have the right
of appeal as provided in RCW 82.32.170, 82.32.180 and 82.32.190.
(6) The provisions of this section shall be construed as cumulative
of other methods prescribed in chapters 82.04 to 82.32 RCW, inclusive,
for the collection of the tax imposed by this chapter. The department
of revenue shall have power to promulgate such rules as may be
necessary to administer the provisions of this section. Any duties
required by this section to be performed by the county auditor may be
performed by the director of licensing but no collection fee shall be
deductible by said director in remitting use tax revenue to the state
treasurer.
(7) The use tax revenue collected on the rate provided in RCW
82.08.020(3) shall be deposited in the multimodal transportation
account under RCW 47.66.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department of licensing and the
department of revenue are authorized to prescribe rules to implement
sections 1 through 4 of this act. In prescribing rules, the
departments of licensing and revenue shall use the kelley blue book
value for determining the value of the vehicle when auditing bill of
sale forms. The departments of licensing and revenue shall submit a
report to the senate and house transportation committees by December 1,
2006, detailing how rules created pursuant to this section are
consistent with the legislative intent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act may be known and cited as the
vehicle purchaser's tax fairness act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---