BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.128.005 and 2001 c 319 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that adult family homes are an important part
of the state's long-term care system. Adult family homes provide an
alternative to institutional care ((and)), promote a high degree of
independent living for residents, and help integrate the residents into
the general community. Persons with functional limitations have
broadly varying service needs. Adult family homes that can meet those
needs are an essential component of a long-term system. The
legislature further finds that different populations living in adult
family homes, such as the developmentally disabled and the elderly,
often have significantly different needs and capacities from one
another.
It is the legislature's intent that department rules and policies
relating to the licensing and operation of adult family homes recognize
and accommodate the different needs and capacities of the various
populations served by the homes. Furthermore, the development and
operation of adult family homes that can provide quality personal care
and special care services should be encouraged.
The legislature finds that many residents of community-based long-term care facilities are vulnerable and their health and well-being are
dependent on their caregivers. The quality, skills, and knowledge of
their caregivers are the key to good care. The legislature finds that
the need for well-trained caregivers is growing as the state's
population ages and residents' needs increase. The legislature intends
that current training standards be enhanced.
The legislature finds that the state of Washington has a compelling
interest in protecting and promoting the health, welfare, and safety of
vulnerable adults residing in adult family homes. The health, safety,
and well-being of vulnerable adults must be the paramount concern in
determining whether to issue a license to an applicant, whether to
suspend or revoke a license, or whether to take other licensing
actions.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.128.007 and 2001 c 319 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purposes of this chapter are to:
(1) Encourage the establishment and maintenance of adult family
homes that provide a humane, safe, and residential home environment for
persons with functional limitations who need personal and special care;
(2) Establish standards for regulating adult family homes that:
(a) Adequately protect residents; and
(b) Avoid over-concentration of adult family homes which would be
in inconsistent with the objective of integrating residents into the
general community;
(3) Encourage consumers, families, providers, municipalities where
adult family homes are located, and the public to become active in
assuring their full participation in development of adult family homes
that provide high quality and cost-effective care;
(4) Provide for appropriate care of residents in adult family homes
by requiring that each resident have a care plan that promotes the most
appropriate level of physical, mental, and psychosocial well-being
consistent with client choice; and
(5) Accord each resident the right to participate in the
development of the care plan and in other major decisions involving the
resident and their care.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.128.040 and 1995 c 260 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules and standards with respect to
adult family homes and the operators thereof to be licensed under this
chapter to carry out the purposes and requirements of this chapter.
The rules and standards relating to applicants and operators shall
address the differences between individual providers and providers that
are partnerships, corporations, associations, or companies. The
department shall consult with the municipalities to develop rules and
standards appropriate to the infrastructure and basic services
available in the municipalities, communities, and neighborhoods in
which adult family homes are located, and the setting of adult family
homes. The rules and standards shall also recognize and be appropriate
to the different needs and capacities of the various populations served
by adult family homes such as but not limited to the developmentally
disabled and the elderly. In developing rules and standards the
department shall recognize the residential family-like nature of adult
family homes and not develop rules and standards which by their
complexity serve as an overly restrictive barrier to the development of
the adult family homes in the state. Procedures and forms established
by the department shall be developed so they are easy to understand and
comply with. Paper work requirements shall be minimal. Easy to
understand materials shall be developed for applicants and providers
explaining licensure requirements and procedures.
(2) In developing the rules and standards, the department shall
consult with all divisions and administrations within the department
serving the various populations living in adult family homes, including
the division of developmental disabilities and the aging and adult
services administration. Involvement by the divisions and
administration shall be for the purposes of assisting the department to
develop rules and standards appropriate to the different needs and
capacities of the various populations served by adult family homes.
During the initial stages of development of proposed rules, the
department shall provide notice of development of the rules to
organizations representing adult family homes and their residents, and
other groups that the department finds appropriate. The notice shall
state the subject of the rules under consideration and solicit written
recommendations regarding their form and content.
(3) Except where provided otherwise, chapter 34.05 RCW shall govern
all department rule-making and adjudicative activities under this
chapter.

--- END ---