BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Article 9 of the Washington state Constitution provides that
education is the paramount duty of the state, and state law requires
minors to attend schools;
(2) When students are attending public school, the school officials
and staff act in loco parentis;
(3) Activities permitted on school grounds during school hours
should support the educational mission of the public school system, be
consistent with the state's duties as in loco parentis guardians of the
students, and honor parental and guardianship rights, to the extent
practical within the state educational mission;
(4) Student records and data are private and confidential, and
should not be released to those outside the school system, except with
parental consent or as required by law;
(5) Recruitment of students by educational, vocational, career,
military, and other recruiters can be in the interest of students;
(6) School districts have an obligation to protect the students in
their care from potential sexual predators and other criminals;
(7) School districts have an obligation to assure that recruiters
do not undermine the fundamental state educational duty by encouraging
students to discontinue their education, skip school, drop out, or
flunk out;
(8) School districts have an obligation to protect children in
their care from dishonest, unscrupulous, or deceptive recruiting
practices;
(9) In providing recruiters access to students, schools must, to
the extent possible and practical, honor parental and guardian choices
for their children; and
(10) Parents and guardians should have the ultimate authority over
which recruiters have access to their children and who has access to
their student's private data in school district records.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Directory information" means information defined in 50 U.S.C.
1232g (a)(5)(A).
(2) "Recruiter" means one who seeks to solicit a public school
student to: (a) Attend or apply to an educational or vocational
establishment; (b) apply for employment with a private or public
employer or the military; (c) volunteer for service with an
organization; or (d) otherwise solicit public school students for off-campus or nonschool activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The board of directors of each school
district shall by September 1, 2006, establish policies and procedures
for:
(1) Allowing parents or guardians to prohibit the release of their
student's directory information, records, and data to public and
private institutions, organizations, and employers. This policy shall
extend to the students' names, addresses, phone numbers, social
security numbers, birthdates, directory information, and other
identifying data;
(2) Providing, at a minimum, separate "opt out" categories for
release of directory information, data, and records for educational,
vocational, career, military, and volunteer recruitment purposes.
Parents and guardians shall be provided with an "opt out" form within
the first fifteen days of a new school year;
(3) Providing thirty days from delivery of the "opt out" form to
parents and guardians in allowing parents and guardians to return their
choices to the school district. School districts are prohibited from
releasing student directory information, data, or records to recruiting
organizations from the close of the previous school year until forty-five days after the release of the "opt out" form to parents and
guardians. Separate comparable provisions shall be made for summer
school enrollees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The board of directors of each school
district shall by September 1, 2006, establish a policy and procedure
requiring on-campus or visiting recruiters to either provide in advance
for an adult school staff person or volunteer to be present when the
recruiter is with the individual student, or submit a criminal records
background check from both the Washington state police and federal
bureau of investigation consistent with RCW 28A 400.303. In the case
of military recruiters, the background check shall also require a
letter from the department of defense relating to the recruiters'
record under the uniform code of military justice and crimes recorded
under other jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The board of directors of each school
district shall by September 1, 2006, establish a policy and procedure
for disciplining recruiters who engage in dishonest, unscrupulous, or
deceptive recruiting practices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The board of directors of each school
district shall by September 1, 2006, establish a policy and procedure
prohibiting recruiters from taking students off-campus during school
hours or meeting students after school hours without written parental
or guardian consent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Recruiters who take students off-campus
during school hours without parental or guardian consent, or arrange to
meet students after school hours without parental or guardian consent,
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

--- END ---