BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The council on mentally ill offenders is hereby established
within the department of corrections. The council shall be composed of
thirteen members, one of whom shall be the secretary of the department
of corrections or designee, who shall be designated as a cochairperson.
One member shall be the director of the health and recovery services
administration or designee, one the director of the juvenile
rehabilitation administration or designee, another a representative of
the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and nine
members shall be appointed as follows:
(a) The governor shall appoint five members, one representing
community mental health interests. A representative of the jail
commander's association, one current or former superior court judge,
one current or former court of limited jurisdiction judge, and one
other member with interest or expertise related to the treatment of
mentally ill offenders with co-occurring disorders.
(b) The president of the senate shall appoint two members, one
representing community mental health interests, and one member with
interest or expertise related to the treatment of mentally ill
offenders.
(c) The speaker of the house shall appoint two members, one
representing community mental health interests, and one member with
interest or expertise related to the treatment of mentally ill
offenders.
(2) The council shall select a cochairperson from among its
members. Seven members of the council shall constitute a quorum.
(3) The director of the health recovery services administration or
designee and the director of the juvenile rehabilitation administration
or designee shall serve as the liaisons with the department of social
and health services and any other departments within that agency
necessary to further the purposes of this section.
(4) Members of the council shall receive no compensation, but shall
be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel expenses and training
expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. For purposes of
compensation, attendance at meetings of the board and training shall be
deemed performance by a member of the duties of his or her state or
local government employment. The county or local municipality of the
judge or judges that participate in meetings shall be reimbursed in an
amount equal to the amount paid to a pro tem judge that substitutes in
court for the duly elected or appointed judge. The payment for the pro
tem judge shall be in addition to the other actual expenses incurred by
the judge in order to attend the meetings of the council including
travel and lodging expenses.
(5) The goal of the council is to investigate and promote cost-effective approaches to meeting the long-term needs of adults and
juveniles with mental disorders who are likely to become offenders or
who have a history of offending. The council shall:
(a) Identify strategies for preventing adults and juveniles with
mental health needs from becoming offenders;
(b) Identify strategies for improving the cost-effectiveness of
services for adults and juveniles with mental health needs who have a
history of offending; and
(c) Identify incentives to encourage state and local criminal
justice, juvenile justice, and mental health programs to adopt cost-effective approaches for serving adults and juveniles with mental
health needs who are likely to offend or who have a history of
offending.
(6) The council shall consider strategies that:
(a) Improve service coordination among state and local mental
health, criminal justice, and juvenile justice programs;
(b) Improve the ability of adult and juvenile offenders with mental
health needs to transition successfully between corrections-based,
juvenile justice-based, and community-based treatment programs;
(c) Improve access to prescription medications, medicare and
medicaid benefits, and community-based treatment programs; and
(d) Assist and guide the development of an electronic medical
records program that will permit all levels of corrections to share
information concerning the health care, treatment, and medications used
by any offender incarcerated in the state of Washington.
(7) The secretary of the department of corrections and the director
of mental health shall furnish for the use of the council facilities,
supplies, and personnel. The council may secure the assistance of any
state agency, department, or instrumentality in the course of its work,
including the advice and assistance of the attorney general and the
joint legislative audit and review committee.
(8)(a) The council on mentally ill offenders shall file with the
legislature, not later than December 31st of each year, except in 2006,
a report that provides details of the council's activities during the
preceding year. The report shall include recommendations for improving
the cost-effectiveness of mental health and criminal justice programs.
(b) After the first year of operation, the council may recommend to
the legislature and governor modifications to its jurisdiction,
composition, and membership that will further the purposes of this
section.
(9) The council on mentally ill offenders is authorized to apply
for any funds that may be available from the federal government or
other sources to further the purposes of this section.
(10)(a) For purposes of this section, the council shall address the
needs of adults and juveniles who meet the following criteria: Persons
who have been arrested, detained, incarcerated, or are at a significant
risk of being arrested, detained, or incarcerated, and who have a
mental disorder.
(b) The council may expand its purview to allow it to identify
strategies that are preventive in nature and could be directed to
identifiable categories of adults and juveniles that fall outside of
the criteria listed in (a) of this subsection.
(11) This section expires January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of corrections shall submit a biennium budget
request in an amount of not less than two hundred thousand dollars in
2007 and each biennium budget request thereafter that the council on
mentally ill offenders is operating and reporting as required to
support the activities and work of the council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the department of
corrections for the purposes of funding the council on mentally ill
offenders for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---