BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any city with a population less
than four hundred thousand and which is located in a county with a
population greater than six hundred thousand that annexes an area
consistent with its comprehensive plan required by chapter 36.70A RCW,
may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this
chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and
shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the city. The tax may only be imposed by a city if:
(a) The city has commenced annexation of an area under chapter
35.13 or 35A.14 RCW having a population of at least ten thousand people
prior to January 1, 2010; and
(b) The city legislative authority determines by resolution or
ordinance that the projected cost to provide municipal services to the
annexation area exceeds the projected general revenue that the city
would otherwise receive from the annexation area on an annual basis.
(2) The tax authorized under this section is a credit against the
state tax under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue
shall perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the city at no
cost to the city and shall remit the tax to the city as provided in RCW
82.14.060.
(3) The maximum rate of tax any city may impose under this section
shall be 0.2 percent for the total number of annexed areas the city may
annex. The rate of the tax imposed under this section is 0.1 percent
for each annexed area population that is greater than ten thousand and
less than twenty thousand. The rate of the tax imposed under this
section shall be 0.2 percent for an annexed area which the population
is greater than twenty thousand.
(4) The tax imposed by this section shall only be imposed at the
beginning of a fiscal year and shall continue for no more than ten
years from the date the tax is first imposed. Tax rate increases due
to additional annexed areas shall be effective on July 1st of the
fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the annexation occurred,
provided that notice is given to the department as set forth in
subsection (8) of this section.
(5) All revenue collected under this section shall be used solely
to provide, maintain, and operate municipal services for the annexation
area.
(6) The revenues from the tax authorized in this section may not
exceed that which the city deems necessary to generate revenue equal to
the difference between the city's cost to provide, maintain, and
operate municipal services for the annexation area and the general
revenues that the cities would otherwise expect to receive from the
annexation during a year. If the revenues from the tax authorized in
this section and the revenues from the annexation area exceed the costs
to the city to provide, maintain, and operate municipal services for
the annexation area during a given year, the city shall notify the
department and the tax distributions authorized in this section shall
be suspended for the remainder of the year.
(7) No tax may be imposed under this section before July 1, 2007.
Before imposing a tax under this section, the legislative authority of
a city shall adopt an ordinance that includes the following:
(a) The rate of tax under this section that shall be imposed within
the city; and
(b) The threshold amount for the first fiscal year following the
annexation and passage of the ordinance.
(8) The tax shall cease to be distributed to the city for the
remainder of the fiscal year once the threshold amount has been
reached. No later than March 1st of each year, the city shall provide
the department with a new threshold amount for the next fiscal year,
and notice of any applicable tax rate changes. Distributions of tax
under this section shall begin again on July 1st of the next fiscal
year and continue until the new threshold amount has been reached or
June 30th, whichever is sooner. Any revenue generated by the tax in
excess of the threshold amount shall belong to the state of Washington.
Any amount resulting from the threshold amount less the total fiscal
year distributions, as of June 30th, shall not be carried forward to
the next fiscal year.
(9) The following definitions apply throughout this section unless
the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Annexation area" means an area that has been annexed to a city
under chapter 35.13 or 35A.14 RCW. "Annexation area" includes all
territory described in the city resolution.
(b) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(c) "Municipal services" means those services customarily provided
to the public by city government.
(d) "Fiscal year" means the year beginning July 1st and ending the
following June 30th.
(e) "Threshold amount" means the maximum amount of tax
distributions as determined by the city in accordance with subsection
(6) of this section that the department shall distribute to the city
generated from the tax imposed under this section in a fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---