BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, as the
population of Washington and the popularity of recreational off-road
vehicle use have increased, a growing number of informal off-road
vehicle tracks and riding areas have emerged in residential areas.
When excessive noise is generated by off-road vehicle use in such
areas, the residents of nearby properties may experience a negative
impact on property values, health, and the ability of the residents to
enjoy peace and quiet in their homes and yards.
The legislature finds that, despite their efforts, many of those
who live in close proximity to informal off-road vehicle riding areas
have been unable to prompt their local governments to address noise
issues.
Therefore, the legislature intends to strengthen provisions
governing off-road vehicle noise and to provide tools and resources to
state agencies, local government, and citizens, in order to better
protect individuals from the effects of excessive off-road vehicle
noise in residential areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of ecology shall, by June
30, 2007:
(a) Evaluate the adverse effects of off-road vehicle noise in
residential areas, including the evaluation of successful neighborhood
strategies as well as problems and challenges; and
(b) Revise the environmental noise rules and sound level
measurement procedures adopted under chapter 70.107 RCW in order to:
(i) Strengthen the decibel standards applied to off-road vehicle
noise in order to address the adverse effects where they are found by
the department pursuant to the evaluation under (a) of this subsection;
and
(ii) Create alternative methods for the measurement of off-road
vehicle sound levels or alternative environmental noise standards that
would allow for education about, and the enforcement of, noise
standards without requiring the use of expensive equipment or a
sophisticated measurement process.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "off-road vehicle" shall have
the same definition as provided in RCW 46.09.020.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.107.050 and 1987 c 103 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who violates any rule adopted by the department
under this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed
((one)) two hundred fifty dollars imposed by local government pursuant
to this section. An action under this section shall not preclude
enforcement of any provisions of the local government noise ordinance.
Penalties shall become due and payable thirty days from the date of
receipt of a notice of penalty unless within such time said notice is
appealed in accordance with the administrative procedures of the local
government, or if it has no such administrative appeal, to the
pollution control hearings board pursuant to the provisions of chapter
43.21B RCW and procedural rules adopted thereunder. In cases in which
appeals are timely filed, penalties sustained by the local
administrative agency or the pollution control hearings board shall
become due and payable on the issuance of said agency or board's final
order in the appeal.
(2) Whenever penalties incurred pursuant to this section have
become due and payable but remain unpaid, the attorney for the local
government may bring an action in the superior court of the county in
which the violation occurred for recovery of penalties incurred. In
all such actions the procedures and rules of evidence shall be the same
as in any other civil action.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.107.060 and 1987 c 103 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to deny, abridge or
alter alternative rights of action or remedies in equity or under
common law or statutory law, criminal or civil.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall deny, abridge or alter any
powers, duties and functions relating to noise abatement and control
now or hereafter vested in any state agency, nor shall this chapter be
construed as granting jurisdiction over the industrial safety and
health of employees in work places of the state, as now or hereafter
vested in the department of labor and industries.
(3) Standards and other control measures adopted by the department
under this chapter shall be exclusive except as hereinafter provided.
A local government may impose limits or control ((sources differing
from)) measures more stringent than those adopted or controlled by the
department upon a finding that such requirements are necessitated by
special conditions. Noise limiting requirements of local government
which differ from those adopted or controlled by the department shall
be invalid unless first approved by the department. If the department
of ecology fails to approve or disapprove standards submitted by local
governmental jurisdictions within ninety days of submittal, such
standards shall be deemed approved. If disapproved, the local
government may appeal the decision to the pollution control hearings
board which shall decide the appeal on the basis of the provisions of
this chapter, and the applicable regulations, together with such
briefs, testimony, and oral argument as the hearings board in its
discretion may require. The department determination of whether to
grant approval shall depend on the reasonableness and practicability of
compliance. Particular attention shall be given to stationary sources
located near jurisdictional boundaries, and temporary noise producing
operations which may operate across one or more jurisdictional
boundaries.
(4) In carrying out the rule-making authority provided in this
chapter, the department shall follow the procedures of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and shall take care
that no rules adopted purport to exercise any powers preempted by the
United States under federal law.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.09.120 and 2005 c 213 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a traffic infraction for any person to operate any
nonhighway vehicle:
(a) In such a manner as to endanger the property of another;
(b) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without a lighted headlight and taillight between the hours of
dusk and dawn, or when otherwise required for the safety of others
regardless of ownership;
(c) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without an adequate braking device or when otherwise required
for the safety of others regardless of ownership;
(d) Without a spark arrester approved by the department of natural
resources;
(e) Without an adequate, and operating, muffling device which
effectively limits vehicle noise to no more than eighty-six decibels on
the "A" scale at fifty feet as measured by the Society of Automotive
Engineers (SAE) test procedure J 331a, except that a maximum noise
level of one hundred and five decibels for vehicles manufactured before
January 1, 2007, or for vehicles manufactured after that date, ninety-six decibels on the "A" scale at a distance of twenty inches from the
exhaust outlet shall be an acceptable substitute in lieu of the Society
of Automotive Engineers test procedure J 331a when measured:
(i) At a forty-five degree angle at a distance of twenty inches
from the exhaust outlet;
(ii) With the vehicle stationary and the engine running at a steady
speed equal to one-half of the manufacturer's maximum allowable ("red
line") engine speed or where the manufacturer's maximum allowable
engine speed is not known the test speed in revolutions per minute
calculated as sixty percent of the speed at which maximum horsepower is
developed; and
(iii) With the microphone placed ten inches from the side of the
vehicle, one-half way between the lowest part of the vehicle body and
the ground plane, and in the same lateral plane as the rearmost exhaust
outlet where the outlet of the exhaust pipe is under the vehicle;
(f) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle upon the shoulder or inside bank or slope of any nonhighway
road or highway, or upon the median of any divided highway;
(g) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle in any area or in such a manner so as to unreasonably expose
the underlying soil, or to create an erosion condition, or to injure,
damage, or destroy trees, growing crops, or other vegetation;
(h) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle or on any nonhighway road or trail, when these are restricted
to pedestrian or animal travel;
(i) On any public lands in violation of rules and regulations of
the agency administering such lands; and
(j) On a private nonhighway road in violation of RCW 46.09.115(3).
(2) It is a misdemeanor for any person to operate any nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance.
(3)(a) Except for an off-road vehicle equipped with seat belts and
roll bars or an enclosed passenger compartment, it is a traffic
infraction for any person to operate or ride an off-road vehicle on a
nonhighway road without wearing upon his or her head a motorcycle
helmet fastened securely while in motion. For purposes of this
section, "motorcycle helmet" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
46.37.530.
(b) Subsection (3)(a) of this section does not apply to an off-road
vehicle operator operating on his or her own land.
(c) Subsection (3)(a) of this section does not apply to an off-road
vehicle operator operating on agricultural lands owned or leased by the
off-road vehicle operator or the operator's employer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The interagency committee for outdoor
recreation shall convene a working group to develop and propose policy
strategies and legislation to address issues relating to access to
public and private lands for recreational off-road vehicle use,
including:
(a) Proposals to improve and increase recreational off-road vehicle
use opportunities on public lands where such use is compatible with
other types of recreation and the environmental, habitat, and trust
responsibilities of the department of natural resources and other
public land managers, and to decrease use where it is not compatible;
(b) Proposals for addressing the conflicts and safety issues posed
by the growing pressure on public and private lands available for
recreational off-road vehicle use, including noise issues and any
recommended changes to the recreational use immunity statute, RCW
4.24.210; and
(c) Proposals to ensure the existence of the financial resources
necessary to provide access to appropriate public lands for
recreational off-road vehicle use, including funding for agency
planning and management activities, land stewardship and trail
maintenance, noise control, and education and enforcement programs.
(2) The working group consists of the following:
(a) One member from the department of natural resources, appointed
by the commissioner of public lands;
(b) One member from the department of fish and wildlife, appointed
by the director of the department of fish and wildlife;
(c) One member from the state parks and recreation commission,
appointed by the director of the state parks and recreation commission;
(d) One member from the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation, appointed by the director of the interagency committee for
outdoor recreation;
(e) Two members representing county governments, one county
commissioner each from an urban and a rural county, invited by the
governor;
(f) One member representing the United States forest service,
invited by the governor;
(g) Two members representing off-road vehicle recreational user
groups, invited by the governor;
(h) One member representing private land managers, invited by the
governor;
(i) One member representing the off-road vehicle industry, invited
by the governor;
(j) A representative of local law enforcement, selected by the
sheriffs and police chiefs association;
(k) Two members representing nonmotorized outdoor recreation,
invited by the governor;
(l) One representative of environmental organization, appointed by
the governor; and
(m) One representative of the department of ecology, appointed by
the director of ecology.
(3) The two members of the house of representatives, one from each
major caucus, may be appointed to the working group by the speaker of
the house of representatives, and two members of the senate, one from
each major caucus, may be appointed to the working group by the
president of the senate. Legislative members are nonvoting liaisons
representing the legislature.
(4) In carrying out its duties, the working group shall provide a
forum for interested citizens and organizations to provide information
and suggestions to the working group.
(5) The working group shall deliberate together in developing its
recommendations. A report shall be issued by the working group and may
contain majority reports and minority reports. The reports shall be
provided to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2007.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If specific funding for the purposes of
sections 2 and 6 of this act, referencing the section by section number
and by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2006, each
section not referenced is null and void.

--- END ---