BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, as the
population of Washington and the popularity of recreational off-road
vehicle use have increased, a growing number of informal off-road
vehicle tracks and riding areas have emerged in residential areas.
Excessive noise generated by off-road vehicle use in such areas has
affected the residents of nearby properties, impacting property values,
health, and the ability of residents to enjoy peace and quiet in their
homes and yards.
The legislature finds that, despite their efforts, many of those
who live in close proximity to informal off-road vehicle riding areas
have been unable to prompt their local governments to address noise
issues.
Therefore, the legislature intends to strengthen provisions
governing off-road vehicle noise and to provide tools and resources to
state agencies, local government, and citizens, in order to better
protect individuals from the effects of excessive off-road vehicle
noise in residential areas.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.09.120 and 2005 c 213 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a traffic infraction for any person to operate any
nonhighway vehicle:
(a) In such a manner as to endanger the property of another;
(b) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without a lighted headlight and taillight between the hours of
dusk and dawn, or when otherwise required for the safety of others
regardless of ownership;
(c) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without an adequate braking device or when otherwise required
for the safety of others regardless of ownership;
(d) Without a spark arrester approved by the department of natural
resources;
(e) Without an adequate, and operating, muffling device which
effectively limits vehicle noise to no more than eighty-six decibels on
the "A" scale at fifty feet as measured by the Society of Automotive
Engineers (SAE) test procedure J 331a, except that a maximum noise
level of ((one hundred and five)) ninety-six decibels on the "A" scale
at a distance of twenty inches from the exhaust outlet shall be an
acceptable substitute in lieu of the Society of Automotive Engineers
test procedure J 331a when measured:
(i) At a forty-five degree angle at a distance of twenty inches
from the exhaust outlet;
(ii) With the vehicle stationary and the engine running at a steady
speed equal to one-half of the manufacturer's maximum allowable ("red
line") engine speed or where the manufacturer's maximum allowable
engine speed is not known the test speed in revolutions per minute
calculated as sixty percent of the speed at which maximum horsepower is
developed; and
(iii) With the microphone placed ten inches from the side of the
vehicle, one-half way between the lowest part of the vehicle body and
the ground plane, and in the same lateral plane as the rearmost exhaust
outlet where the outlet of the exhaust pipe is under the vehicle;
(f) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle upon the shoulder or inside bank or slope of any nonhighway
road or highway, or upon the median of any divided highway;
(g) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle in any area or in such a manner so as to unreasonably expose
the underlying soil, or to create an erosion condition, or to injure,
damage, or destroy trees, growing crops, or other vegetation;
(h) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle or on any nonhighway road or trail, when these are restricted
to pedestrian or animal travel;
(i) On any public lands in violation of rules and regulations of
the agency administering such lands; and
(j) On a private nonhighway road in violation of RCW 46.09.115(3).
(2) It is a misdemeanor for any person to operate any nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance.
(3)(a) Except for an off-road vehicle equipped with seat belts and
roll bars or an enclosed passenger compartment, it is a traffic
infraction for any person to operate or ride an off-road vehicle on a
nonhighway road without wearing upon his or her head a motorcycle
helmet fastened securely while in motion. For purposes of this
section, "motorcycle helmet" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
46.37.530.
(b) Subsection (3)(a) of this section does not apply to an off-road
vehicle operator operating on his or her own land.
(c) Subsection (3)(a) of this section does not apply to an off-road
vehicle operator operating on agricultural lands owned or leased by the
off-road vehicle operator or the operator's employer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of ecology shall, by June 30,
2007:
(1) Evaluate the adverse effects of off-road vehicle noise in
residential areas; and
(2) Revise the environmental noise rules and sound level
measurement procedures adopted under chapter 70.107 RCW in order to:
(a) Strengthen the decibel standards applied to off-road vehicle
noise in order to address the adverse effects found by the department
under subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Create alternative methods for the measurement of off-road
vehicle sound levels or alternative environmental noise standards that
would allow for the enforcement of noise standards without requiring
the use of expensive equipment or a sophisticated measurement process.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.09.170 and 2004 c 105 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the
motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on a tax rate of: (a) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor vehicle
fuel from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (b) twenty cents per
gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;
(c) twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2009; (d) twenty-two cents per gallon of motor
vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; and (e) twenty-three cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1, 2011,
and thereafter, less proper deductions for refunds and costs of
collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090.
(2) The treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as
follows:
(a) Thirty-six percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway
vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources
solely for acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and
management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation
facilities, and information programs and maintenance of nonhighway
roads;
(b) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish
and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and the maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(c) Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely
for the acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management
of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities; and
(d) Fifty-eight and one-half percent shall be credited to the
nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account to be
administered by the committee for planning, acquisition, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and for education, information, and law
enforcement programs. The funds under this subsection shall be
expended in accordance with the following limitations:
(i) Not more than thirty percent may be expended for education,
information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter, including
programs involving the enforcement of complaints concerning noise from
off-road vehicles in private residential areas. The committee shall
inform appropriate state and local agencies of the availability of
funding for programs relating to off-road vehicle noise in residential
areas and provide the agencies with instructions on how to apply for
funds;
(ii) Not less than seventy percent may be expended for ORV,
nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities. Except as
provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, of this amount:
(A) Not less than thirty percent, together with the funds the
committee receives under RCW 46.09.110, may be expended for ORV
recreation facilities;
(B) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonmotorized
recreation facilities. Funds expended under this subsection
(2)(d)(ii)(B) shall be known as Ira Spring outdoor recreation
facilities funds; and
(C) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(iii) The committee may waive the minimum percentage cited in
(d)(ii) of this subsection due to insufficient requests for funds or
projects that score low in the committee's project evaluation. Funds
remaining after such a waiver must be allocated in accordance with
committee policy.
(3) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.
(4) During the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the NOVA
account to the interagency committee for outdoor recreation, the
department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife,
and the state parks and recreation commission. This appropriation is
not required to follow the specific distribution specified in
subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The municipal research council shall, by
June 30, 2007, develop model ordinance options for local governments,
including options for public disturbance noise ordinances that do not
require the use of a decibel meter for enforcement and options for
decibel-based noise ordinances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department of natural resources
shall convene a working group to develop and propose policy strategies
and legislation to address issues relating to access to public and
private lands for recreational off-road vehicle use, including:
(a) Proposals to improve and increase recreational off-road vehicle
use opportunities on public lands where such use is compatible with
other types of recreation and the environmental, habitat, and trust
responsibilities of the department of natural resources and other
public land managers;
(b) Proposals for reducing the conflicts and safety issues posed by
the growing pressure on public and private lands open to recreational
off-road vehicle use, including recommendations for reducing noise and
land use conflicts in residential neighborhoods and for reducing
landowner liability through changes to the recreation use immunity
statute, RCW 4.24.210; and
(c) Proposals to ensure the existence of the financial resources
necessary to provide access to public lands for recreational off-road
vehicle use, including funding for agency planning and management
activities, land stewardship and trail maintenance, and education and
enforcement programs.
(2) The working group consists of the following:
(a) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the
senate, appointed by the president of the senate;
(b) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(c) One member from the department of natural resources, appointed
by the commissioner of public lands;
(d) One member from the department of fish and wildlife, appointed
by the director of the department of fish and wildlife;
(e) One member from the state parks and recreation commission,
appointed by the director of the state parks and recreation commission;
(f) One member from the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation, appointed by the director of the interagency committee for
outdoor recreation;
(g) One member representing county governments, appointed by the
Washington state association of counties;
(h) One member representing the United States forest service,
invited by the commissioner of public lands;
(i) Two members representing off-road vehicle recreational user
groups, invited by the commissioner of public lands;
(j) Two members representing nonmotorized recreational user groups,
invited by the governor;
(k) One member representing private land managers, invited by the
governor;
(l) One member representing the off-road vehicle industry, invited
by the governor;
(m) One member representing an environmental protection
organization, appointed by the governor;
(n) One member representing local law enforcement, invited by the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs; and
(o) One member representing those residents of residential areas
who are impacted by unwanted off-road vehicle noise, appointed by the
governor.
(3) In carrying out its duties, the working group shall hold no
fewer than six meetings, shall provide notice of its meetings on the
department of natural resources' web site, and shall take testimony and
accept information and suggestions from interested citizens and
organizations.
(4) The working group shall provide its policy strategies and
legislative proposals to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the senate and house of representatives by December 31, 2006.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2007.

--- END ---