BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that state-supported
economic development efforts, including work force training, technology
transfer, tourism development, and industrial modernization, can make
a significant difference in the health and diversification of the
state's economy. There are numerous federal and private economic
development grant programs and research projects designed to increase
the competitiveness of American firms and local work forces, for which
state agencies and local consortiums are eligible to apply. There are
also numerous opportunities to attract major regional, national, and
international business, tourism, and sporting events to the state.
State and local agencies in Washington have not maximized the
opportunities available to receive federal and private funds to augment
economic development efforts.
The legislature declares that it is the state's policy to maximize
the use of federal and private funds for economic development purposes
and to devote state resources to leverage federal and private dollars
to supplement state economic development efforts. In furtherance of
this policy, it is the purpose of section 2 of this act to authorize
and fund a technical assistance and grant writing program within the
department of community, trade, and economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
The economic development grants program is created in the
department to be staffed by at least one grant writer either on
contract or on staff. Program staff shall:
(1) Regularly review the federal register for opportunities to
apply for grants, research projects, and demonstration projects;
(2) Stay abreast of grant opportunities with private foundations
and businesses;
(3) Assist local entities in attracting regional, national, and
international business, tourism, and sporting events;
(4) Correspond and meet with federal officials, including those in
the small business administration, the department of labor, the
department of commerce, and the department of health and human
services, as well as foundation and business officials, on the
prospects for obtaining federal and private funds for economic
development purposes in Washington state;
(5) Apprise the agency directors and division heads of the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the
employment security department, the department of agriculture, the
Washington technology center, the Washington manufacturing service, and
other state agencies as appropriate, of the opportunities for federal
and private grant dollars for economic development projects;
(6) Assist state agencies in their grant-seeking efforts for
economic development projects. Grant writing for and assistance in
grant writing for projects sponsored or cosponsored by state agencies
shall be the highest priority of the program's work;
(7) Write grant requests to further the state's economic
development efforts;
(8) Facilitate joint efforts between agencies and between local
consortiums and state agencies that will increase the likelihood of
success in grant seeking and the attraction of major events; and
(9) Garner the political support necessary from federal, state, and
local elected and appointed officials for success in grant seeking and
the attraction of major events.
The department shall submit to the appropriate committees of the
legislature an annual list of grant applications submitted, grant
awards received, and the total amount of grant funds received during
the year. The list shall be due by December 1st of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---