BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.135 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not prohibit or restrict the performance of
blood-drawing procedures by health care assistants in the residences of
research study participants when such procedures have been authorized
by the institutional review board of a comprehensive cancer center or
nonprofit degree-granting institution of higher education and are
conducted under the general supervision of a physician.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.135.040 and 1984 c 281 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A certification issued to a health care assistant pursuant to this
chapter shall be authority to perform only the functions authorized in
RCW 18.135.010 subject to proper delegation and supervision in the
health care facility making the certification or under the supervision
of the certifying health care practitioner in other health care
facilities or in his or her office or in the residences of research
study participants in accordance with section 1 of this act. No
certification made by one health care facility or health care
practitioner is transferrable to another health care facility or health
care practitioner.

--- END ---