BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.125.065 and 1981 c 145 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Records maintained by rape crisis centers shall not be made
available to any defense attorney as part of discovery in a sexual
assault case unless:
(1) A written pretrial motion is made by the defendant to the court
stating that the defendant is requesting discovery of the rape crisis
center's records;
(2) The written motion is accompanied by an affidavit or affidavits
setting forth specifically the reasons why the defendant is requesting
discovery of the rape crisis center's records. The written motion and
accompanying affidavits shall be served on the prosecuting attorney at
the time the motion is filed;
(3) The court reviews the rape crisis center's records in camera to
determine whether the rape crisis center's records are relevant and
whether the probative value of the records is outweighed by the
victim's privacy interest in the confidentiality of such records taking
into account the further trauma that may be inflicted upon the victim
by the disclosure of the records to the defendant; and
(4) The court enters an order stating whether the records or any
part of the records are discoverable and setting forth the basis for
the court's findings.

Sec. 2 RCW 7.69.030 and 2004 c 120 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a reasonable effort made to ensure that victims,
survivors of victims, and witnesses of crimes have the following
rights, which apply to any criminal court and/or juvenile court
proceeding:
(1) With respect to victims of violent or sex crimes, to receive,
at the time of reporting the crime to law enforcement officials, a
written statement of the rights of crime victims as provided in this
chapter. The written statement shall include the name, address, and
telephone number of a county or local crime victim/witness program, if
such a crime victim/witness program exists in the county;
(2) To be informed by local law enforcement agencies or the
prosecuting attorney of the final disposition of the case in which the
victim, survivor, or witness is involved;
(3) To be notified by the party who issued the subpoena that a
court proceeding to which they have been subpoenaed will not occur as
scheduled, in order to save the person an unnecessary trip to court;
(4) To receive protection from harm and threats of harm arising out
of cooperation with law enforcement and prosecution efforts, and to be
provided with information as to the level of protection available;
(5) To be informed of the procedure to be followed to apply for and
receive any witness fees to which they are entitled;
(6) To be provided, whenever practical, a secure waiting area
during court proceedings that does not require them to be in close
proximity to defendants and families or friends of defendants;
(7) To have any stolen or other personal property expeditiously
returned by law enforcement agencies or the superior court when no
longer needed as evidence. When feasible, all such property, except
weapons, currency, contraband, property subject to evidentiary
analysis, and property of which ownership is disputed, shall be
photographed and returned to the owner within ten days of being taken;
(8) To be provided with appropriate employer intercession services
to ensure that employers of victims, survivors of victims, and
witnesses of crime will cooperate with the criminal justice process in
order to minimize an employee's loss of pay and other benefits
resulting from court appearance;
(9) To access to immediate medical assistance and not to be
detained for an unreasonable length of time by a law enforcement agency
before having such assistance administered. However, an employee of
the law enforcement agency may, if necessary, accompany the person to
a medical facility to question the person about the criminal incident
if the questioning does not hinder the administration of medical
assistance;
(10) With respect to victims of violent and sex crimes, to have a
crime victim advocate from a crime victim/witness program, or any other
support person of the victim's choosing, present at any prosecutorial
or defense interviews with the victim, and at any judicial proceedings
related to criminal acts committed against the victim. This subsection
applies if practical and if the presence of the crime victim advocate
or support person does not cause any unnecessary delay in the
investigation or prosecution of the case. The role of the crime victim
advocate is to provide emotional support to the crime victim;
(11) With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to be
physically present in court during trial, or if subpoenaed to testify,
to be scheduled as early as practical in the proceedings in order to be
physically present during trial after testifying and not to be excluded
solely because they have testified;
(12) With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to be
informed by the prosecuting attorney of the date, time, and place of
the trial and of the sentencing hearing for felony convictions upon
request by a victim or survivor;
(13) To submit a victim impact statement or report to the court,
with the assistance of the prosecuting attorney if requested, which
shall be included in all presentence reports and permanently included
in the files and records accompanying the offender committed to the
custody of a state agency or institution;
(14) With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to present
a statement personally or by representation, at the sentencing hearing
for felony convictions;
(15) With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to entry of
an order of restitution by the court in all felony cases, even when the
offender is sentenced to confinement, unless extraordinary
circumstances exist which make restitution inappropriate in the court's
judgment; ((and))
(16) With respect to victims and survivors of victims, to present
a statement in person, via audio or videotape, in writing or by
representation at any hearing conducted regarding an application for
pardon or commutation of sentence ; and
(17) With respect to victims to have notice of motions, subpoenas,
or other compulsory process for confidential victims' records served on
the prosecuting attorney when the motion is filed or the subpoena is
issued. Confidential victims' records include, but are not limited to,
medical records, counseling records, school records, or other records
protected by state or federal law.

Sec. 3 RCW 7.69A.030 and 2004 c 120 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the rights of victims and witnesses provided for in
RCW 7.69.030, there shall be every reasonable effort made by law
enforcement agencies, prosecutors, and judges to assure that child
victims and witnesses are afforded the rights enumerated in this
section. Except as provided in RCW 7.69A.050 regarding child victims
or child witnesses of violent crimes, sex crimes, or child abuse, the
enumeration of rights shall not be construed to create substantive
rights and duties, and the application of an enumerated right in an
individual case is subject to the discretion of the law enforcement
agency, prosecutor, or judge. Child victims and witnesses have the
following rights, which apply to any criminal court and/or juvenile
court proceeding:
(1) To have explained in language easily understood by the child,
all legal proceedings and/or police investigations in which the child
may be involved.
(2) With respect to child victims of sex or violent crimes or child
abuse, to have a crime victim advocate from a crime victim/witness
program, or any other support person of the victim's choosing, present
at any prosecutorial or defense interviews with the child victim. This
subsection applies if practical and if the presence of the crime victim
advocate or support person does not cause any unnecessary delay in the
investigation or prosecution of the case. The role of the crime victim
advocate is to provide emotional support to the child victim and to
promote the child's feelings of security and safety.
(3) To be provided, whenever possible, a secure waiting area during
court proceedings and to have an advocate or support person remain with
the child prior to and during any court proceedings.
(4) To not have the names, addresses, nor photographs of the living
child victim or witness disclosed by any law enforcement agency,
prosecutor's office, or state agency without the permission of the
child victim, child witness, parents, or legal guardians to anyone
except another law enforcement agency, prosecutor, defense counsel, or
private or governmental agency that provides services to the child
victim or witness.
(5) To allow an advocate to make recommendations to the prosecuting
attorney about the ability of the child to cooperate with prosecution
and the potential effect of the proceedings on the child.
(6) To allow an advocate to provide information to the court
concerning the child's ability to understand the nature of the
proceedings.
(7) To be provided information or appropriate referrals to social
service agencies to assist the child and/or the child's family with the
emotional impact of the crime, the subsequent investigation, and
judicial proceedings in which the child is involved.
(8) To allow an advocate to be present in court while the child
testifies in order to provide emotional support to the child.
(9) To provide information to the court as to the need for the
presence of other supportive persons at the court proceedings while the
child testifies in order to promote the child's feelings of security
and safety.
(10) To allow law enforcement agencies the opportunity to enlist
the assistance of other professional personnel such as child protection
services, victim advocates or prosecutorial staff trained in the
interviewing of the child victim.
(11) With respect to child victims of violent or sex crimes or
child abuse, to receive either directly or through the child's parent
or guardian if appropriate, at the time of reporting the crime to law
enforcement officials, a written statement of the rights of child
victims as provided in this chapter. The written statement shall
include the name, address, and telephone number of a county or local
crime victim/witness program, if such a crime victim/witness program
exists in the county.
(12) With respect to child victims to have notice of motions,
subpoenas, or other compulsory process for confidential victims'
records served on the prosecuting attorney when the motion is filed or
the subpoena is issued. Confidential victims' records include, but are
not limited to, medical records, counseling records, school records, or
other records protected by state or federal law.

--- END ---