BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.96 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person injured by an unjust conviction and incarceration may
sue in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county in which such
violation occurred, and shall recover from the county damages
sustained, including reasonable attorneys' fees and costs of bringing
the suit.
(2)(a) Any person suing under this section must allege and prove
that:
(i) His or her conviction has been reversed or set aside on the
ground that he or she is not guilty of the offense of which he or she
was convicted, or on new trial or rehearing he or she was found not
guilty of such offense, as appears from the record or certificate of
the court setting aside or reversing such conviction, or that he or she
has been pardoned upon the stated ground of innocence and unjust
conviction; and
(ii) He or she did not commit any of the acts charged or his or her
acts, deeds, or omissions in connection with such charge constituted no
offense against the state of Washington, and he or she did not by
misconduct or neglect cause or bring about his or her own prosecution.
(b) Proof of the requisite facts shall be by a certificate of the
court or pardon wherein such facts are alleged to appear, and other
evidence thereof shall not be received.
(c) No pardon or certified copy of a pardon may be considered
unless it contains recitals that the pardon was granted after the
applicant had exhausted all recourse to the courts and that the time
for any court to exercise its jurisdiction had expired.
(d) The amount of damages awarded shall not exceed one hundred
thousand dollars for each twelve-month period of incarceration for any
plaintiff who was unjustly sentenced to death and fifty thousand
dollars for each twelve-month period of incarceration for any other
plaintiff.
(3) Any action to enforce any cause of action under this section
shall be forever barred unless commenced not later than two years after
the cause of action accrues.
(4) The cause of action under this section is available only with
regard to convictions that are entered on or after the effective date
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislative authority of a county may purchase liability
insurance in an amount it deems reasonable to protect the county, its
officers, and employees against liability for a claim of unjust
conviction and incarceration under section 1 of this act.

--- END ---