BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.020 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every vehicle upon a highway within this state at any time from a
half hour after sunset to a half hour before sunrise ((and)), at any
other time when, due to insufficient light or unfavorable atmospheric
conditions, persons and vehicles on the highway are not clearly
discernible at a distance of one thousand feet ahead, and at all times
from two o'clock a.m. Pacific Standard Time on the last Sunday in
October until two o'clock a.m. Pacific Standard Time on the first
Sunday in April, shall display lighted headlights, other lights, and
illuminating devices as hereinafter respectively required for different
classes of vehicles, subject to exceptions with respect to parked
vehicles, and such stop lights, turn signals, and other signaling
devices shall be lighted as prescribed for the use of such devices.

--- END ---