BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.621 and 2005 c 249 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that active military and naval veterans,
reserve military and naval veterans, and national guard members called
to active duty have served their country and have risked their lives to
defend the lives of all Americans and the freedoms that define and
distinguish our nation. The legislature intends to honor active
military and naval veterans, reserve military and naval veterans, and
national guard members who have served on active military or naval duty
for the public service they have provided to this country.
(2) Subject to the limitations in RCW 28B.15.910, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges, may waive all or
a portion of tuition and fees for the following persons:
(a) An eligible veteran or national guard member;
(b) A child and the spouse of an eligible veteran or national guard
member who became totally disabled as defined in RCW 28B.15.385 while
engaged in active federal military or naval service, or who is
determined by the federal government to be a prisoner of war or missing
in action;
(c) A child and the surviving spouse of an eligible veteran or
national guard member who lost his or her life while engaged in active
federal military or naval service. However, upon remarriage, the
surviving spouse of an eligible veteran or national guard member is
ineligible for a waiver under this section.
(3) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community colleges,
may waive all or a portion of tuition and fees for a military or naval
veteran who is a Washington domiciliary, but who did not serve on
foreign soil or in international waters or in another location in
support of those serving on foreign soil or in international waters and
who does not qualify as an eligible veteran or national guard member
under subsection (5) of this section. However, there shall be no state
general fund support for waivers granted under this subsection.
(4) Private vocational schools and private higher education
institutions are encouraged to provide waivers consistent with the
terms in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(5) As used in this section "eligible veteran or national guard
member" means a Washington domiciliary who was an active or reserve
member of the United States military or naval forces, or a past or
current national guard member ((called to active duty,)) who served or
serves, as applicable, in active federal service, under either Title 10
or Title 32 of the United States Code, in a war or conflict fought on
foreign soil or in international waters or in another location in
support of those serving on foreign soil or in international waters,
and if discharged from service, has received an honorable discharge.

--- END ---