BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.24.045 and 2005 c 503 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The regional support network shall:
(1) Contract as needed with licensed service providers. The
regional support network may, in the absence of a licensed service
provider entity, become a licensed service provider entity pursuant to
minimum standards required for licensing by the department for the
purpose of providing services not available from licensed service
providers;
(2) Operate as a licensed service provider if it deems that doing
so is more efficient and cost effective than contracting for services.
When doing so, the regional support network shall comply with rules
promulgated by the secretary that shall provide measurements to
determine when a regional support network provided service is more
efficient and cost effective;
(3) Monitor and perform biennial fiscal audits of licensed service
providers who have contracted with the regional support network to
provide services required by this chapter. The monitoring and audits
shall be performed by means of a formal process which insures that the
licensed service providers and professionals designated in this
subsection meet the terms of their contracts;
(4) Assure that the special needs of minorities, the elderly,
disabled, children, and low-income persons are met within the
priorities established in this chapter;
(5) Maintain patient tracking information in a central location as
required for resource management services and the department's
information system;
(6) Use not more than two percent of state-appropriated community
mental health funds, which shall not include federal funds, to
administer community mental health programs under RCW 71.24.155:
PROVIDED, That county authorities serving a county or combination of
counties whose population is one hundred twenty-five thousand or more
may be entitled to sufficient state-appropriated community mental
health funds to employ up to one full-time employee or the equivalent
thereof in addition to the two percent limit established in this
subsection when such employee is providing staff services to a county
mental health advisory board;
(7) Collaborate to ensure that policies do not result in an adverse
shift of mentally ill persons into state and local correctional
facilities;
(8) Work with the department to expedite the enrollment or re-enrollment of eligible persons leaving state or local correctional
facilities and institutions for mental diseases;
(9) If a regional support network is not operated by the county,
work closely with the county designated mental health professional or
county designated crisis responder to maximize appropriate placement of
persons into community services; ((and))
(10) Coordinate services for individuals who have received services
through the community mental health system and who become patients at
a state mental hospital to ensure they are transitioned into the
community upon determination that they no longer need involuntary
inpatient care; and
(11) Evaluate all petitions for ninety and one hundred eighty-day
involuntary commitments under chapter 71.05 RCW to determine whether
the needs of the individual can be met through community support
services in a less restrictive alternative to detention. Regional
support networks must provide a less restrictive alternative to
detention whenever it is determined that the needs of the individual
can be met through community support services.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.24.300 and 2005 c 503 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the request of a tribal authority or authorities within a
regional support network the joint operating agreement or the county
authority shall allow for the inclusion of the tribal authority to be
represented as a party to the regional support network. The roles and
responsibilities of the county and tribal authorities shall be
determined by the terms of that agreement including a determination of
membership on the governing board and advisory committees, the number
of tribal representatives to be party to the agreement, and the
provisions of law and shall assure the provision of culturally
competent services to the tribes served. The state mental health
authority may not determine the roles and responsibilities of county
authorities as to each other under regional support networks by rule,
except to assure that all duties required of regional support networks
are assigned and that counties and the regional support network do not
duplicate functions and that a single authority has final
responsibility for all available resources and performance under the
regional support network's contract with the secretary. If a regional
support network is a private entity, the department shall allow for the
inclusion of the tribal authority to be represented as a party to the
regional support network. The roles and responsibilities of the
private entity and the tribal authorities shall be determined by the
department, through negotiation with the tribal authority.
(1) Regional support networks shall submit an overall six-year
operating and capital plan, timeline, and budget and submit progress
reports and an updated two-year plan biennially thereafter, to assume
within available resources all of the following duties:
(a) Administer and provide for the availability of all resource
management services, residential services, and community support
services.
(b) Administer and provide for the availability of all
investigation, transportation, court-related, and other services
provided by the state or counties pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW.
(c) Provide within the boundaries of each regional support network
evaluation and treatment services for ((at least eighty-five percent
of)) all persons detained or committed for involuntary intensive
treatment for periods up to seventeen days according to chapter 71.05
RCW. Regional support networks with populations of less than one
hundred fifty thousand may contract to purchase evaluation and
treatment services from other networks. Insofar as the original intent
of serving persons in the community is maintained, the secretary is
authorized to approve exceptions on a case-by-case basis to the
requirement to provide evaluation and treatment services within the
boundaries of each regional support network. Such exceptions are
limited to:
(i) Contracts with neighboring or contiguous regions; or
(ii) Individuals detained or committed for periods up to seventeen
days at the state hospitals at the discretion of the secretary.
(d) Administer a portion of funds appropriated by the legislature
to house mentally ill persons in state institutions from counties
within the boundaries of any regional support network, with the
exception of persons currently confined at, or under the supervision
of, a state mental hospital pursuant to chapter 10.77 RCW, and provide
for the care of all persons needing evaluation and treatment services
for periods up to seventeen days according to chapter 71.05 RCW in
appropriate residential services, which may include state institutions
consistent with (c) of this subsection. To the extent that use of the
state hospitals by the regional support networks is authorized by the
secretary in (c) of this subsection, the regional support networks
shall reimburse the state for use of state institutions at a rate equal
to that assumed by the legislature when appropriating funds for such
care at state institutions during the biennium when reimbursement
occurs. The secretary shall submit a report to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives on the efforts to
implement this section by October 1, 2002. The duty of a state
hospital to accept persons for evaluation and treatment under chapter
71.05 RCW is limited by the responsibilities assigned to regional
support networks under this section.
(e) Administer and provide for the availability of all other mental
health services, which shall include patient counseling, day treatment,
consultation, education services, employment services as defined in RCW
71.24.035, and mental health services to children.
(f) Establish standards and procedures for reviewing individual
service plans and determining when that person may be discharged from
resource management services.
(2) A regional support network may request that any state-owned
land, building, facility, or other capital asset which was ever
purchased, deeded, given, or placed in trust for the care of the
mentally ill and which is within the boundaries of a regional support
network be made available to support the operations of the regional
support network. State agencies managing such capital assets shall
give first priority to requests for their use pursuant to this chapter.
(3) Each regional support network shall appoint a mental health
advisory board which shall review and provide comments on plans and
policies developed under this chapter, provide local oversight
regarding the activities of the regional support network, and work with
the regional support network to resolve significant concerns regarding
service delivery and outcomes. The department shall establish
statewide procedures for the operation of regional advisory committees
including mechanisms for advisory board feedback to the department
regarding regional support network performance. The composition of the
board shall be broadly representative of the demographic character of
the region and shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of
consumers and families, law enforcement, and where the county is not
the regional support network, county elected officials. Composition
and length of terms of board members may differ between regional
support networks but shall be included in each regional support
network's contract and approved by the secretary.
(4) Regional support networks shall assume all duties specified in
their plans and joint operating agreements through biennial contractual
agreements with the secretary.
(5) Regional support networks may receive technical assistance from
the housing trust fund and may identify and submit projects for housing
and housing support services to the housing trust fund established
under chapter 43.185 RCW. Projects identified or submitted under this
subsection must be fully integrated with the regional support network
six-year operating and capital plan, timeline, and budget required by
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.24.330 and 2005 c 503 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Contracts between a regional support network and the department
shall include mechanisms for monitoring performance under the contract
and remedies for failure to substantially comply with the requirements
of the contract including, but not limited to, financial penalties,
termination of the contract, and reprocurement of the contract.
(2) The procurement process shall encourage the preservation of
infrastructure previously purchased by the community mental health
service delivery system, the maintenance of linkages between other
services and delivery systems, and maximization of the use of available
funds for services versus profits. The procurement process shall
provide that public funds appropriated by the legislature shall not be
used to promote or deter, encourage, or discourage employees from
exercising their rights under Title 29, chapter 7, subchapter II,
United States Code or chapter 41.56 RCW.
(3) In addition to the requirements of RCW 71.24.035, contracts
shall:
(a) Define administrative costs and ensure that the regional
support network does not exceed an administrative cost of ten percent
of available funds;
(b) Require effective collaboration with law enforcement, criminal
justice agencies, and the chemical dependency treatment system;
(c) Require substantial implementation of department adopted
integrated screening and assessment process and matrix of best
practices; ((and))
(d) Maintain the decision-making independence of designated mental
health professionals which does not limit the regional support
network's responsibility to provide less restrictive alternatives to
detention when appropriate under RCW 71.24.045; and
(e) Except at the discretion of the secretary, require regional
support networks to pay the state for the costs associated with
individuals who are voluntarily or civilly committed under chapter
71.05 RCW, being served on the grounds of the state hospitals, and not
receiving long-term inpatient care as defined in RCW 72.23.010.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.05.300 and 1998 c 297 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
The petition for ninety day treatment shall be filed with the clerk
of the superior court at least three days before expiration of the
fourteen-day period of intensive treatment. At the time of filing such
petition, the clerk shall set a time for the person to come before the
court on the next judicial day after the day of filing unless such
appearance is waived by the person's attorney, and the clerk shall
notify the ((county)) designated mental health professional. The
((county)) designated mental health professional shall immediately
notify the person detained, his or her attorney, if any, and his or her
guardian or conservator, if any, and the prosecuting attorney, and
provide a copy of the petition to such persons as soon as possible.
The designated mental health professional shall also immediately
provide a copy of the petition to the regional support network and the
state hospital.
At the time set for appearance the detained person shall be brought
before the court, unless such appearance has been waived and the court
shall advise him or her of his or her right to be represented by an
attorney and of his or her right to a jury trial. If the detained
person is not represented by an attorney, or is indigent or is
unwilling to retain an attorney, the court shall immediately appoint an
attorney to represent him or her. The court shall, if requested,
appoint a reasonably available licensed physician, psychologist, or
psychiatrist, designated by the detained person to examine and testify
on behalf of the detained person.
The court may, if requested, also appoint a professional person as
defined in RCW 71.05.020 to seek less restrictive alternative courses
of treatment and to testify on behalf of the detained person. In the
case of a developmentally disabled person who has been determined to be
incompetent pursuant to RCW 10.77.090(4), then the appointed
professional person under this section shall be a developmental
disabilities professional.
The court shall also set a date for a full hearing on the petition
as provided in RCW 71.05.310.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.24.035 and 2005 c 504 s 715 and 2005 c 503 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department is designated as the state mental health
authority.
(2) The secretary shall provide for public, client, and licensed
service provider participation in developing the state mental health
program, developing contracts with regional support networks, and any
waiver request to the federal government under medicaid.
(3) The secretary shall provide for participation in developing the
state mental health program for children and other underserved
populations, by including representatives on any committee established
to provide oversight to the state mental health program.
(4) The secretary shall be designated as the regional support
network if the regional support network fails to meet state minimum
standards or refuses to exercise responsibilities under RCW 71.24.045.
(5) The secretary shall:
(a) Develop a biennial state mental health program that
incorporates regional biennial needs assessments and regional mental
health service plans and state services for mentally ill adults and
children. The secretary shall also develop a six-year state mental
health plan;
(b) Assure that any regional or county community mental health
program provides access to treatment for the region's residents in the
following order of priority: (i) The acutely mentally ill; (ii)
chronically mentally ill adults and severely emotionally disturbed
children; and (iii) the seriously disturbed. Such programs shall
provide:
(A) Outpatient services;
(B) Emergency care services for twenty-four hours per day;
(C) Day treatment for mentally ill persons which includes training
in basic living and social skills, supported work, vocational
rehabilitation, and day activities. Such services may include
therapeutic treatment. In the case of a child, day treatment includes
age-appropriate basic living and social skills, educational and
prevocational services, day activities, and therapeutic treatment;
(D) Screening for patients being considered for admission to state
mental health facilities to determine the appropriateness of admission;
(E) Employment services, which may include supported employment,
transitional work, placement in competitive employment, and other work-related services, that result in mentally ill persons becoming engaged
in meaningful and gainful full or part-time work. Other sources of
funding such as the division of vocational rehabilitation may be
utilized by the secretary to maximize federal funding and provide for
integration of services;
(F) Consultation and education services; and
(G) Community support services;
(c) Develop and adopt rules establishing state minimum standards
for the delivery of mental health services pursuant to RCW 71.24.037
including, but not limited to:
(i) Licensed service providers. These rules shall permit a county-operated mental health program to be licensed as a service provider
subject to compliance with applicable statutes and rules. The
secretary shall provide for deeming of compliance with state minimum
standards for those entities accredited by recognized behavioral health
accrediting bodies recognized and having a current agreement with the
department;
(ii) Regional support networks; and
(iii) Inpatient services, evaluation and treatment services and
facilities under chapter 71.05 RCW, resource management services, and
community support services;
(d) Assure that the special needs of minorities, the elderly,
disabled, children, and low-income persons are met within the
priorities established in this section;
(e) Establish a standard contract or contracts, consistent with
state minimum standards and RCW 71.24.320 and 71.24.330, which shall be
used in contracting with regional support networks. The standard
contract shall include a maximum fund balance, which shall be
consistent with that required by federal regulations or waiver
stipulations;
(f) Establish, to the extent possible, a standardized auditing
procedure which minimizes paperwork requirements of regional support
networks and licensed service providers. The audit procedure shall
focus on the outcomes of service and not the processes for
accomplishing them;
(g) Develop and maintain an information system to be used by the
state and regional support networks that includes a tracking method
which allows the department and regional support networks to identify
mental health clients' participation in any mental health service or
public program on an immediate basis. The information system shall not
include individual patient's case history files. Confidentiality of
client information and records shall be maintained as provided in this
chapter and in RCW 71.05.390, 71.05.420, and 71.05.440;
(h) License service providers who meet state minimum standards;
(i) Certify regional support networks that meet state minimum
standards;
(j) Periodically monitor the compliance of certified regional
support networks and their network of licensed service providers for
compliance with the contract between the department, the regional
support network, and federal and state rules at reasonable times and in
a reasonable manner;
(k) Fix fees to be paid by evaluation and treatment centers to the
secretary for the required inspections;
(l) Monitor and audit regional support networks and licensed
service providers as needed to assure compliance with contractual
agreements authorized by this chapter;
(m) Adopt such rules as are necessary to implement the department's
responsibilities under this chapter; and
(n) Assure the availability of an appropriate amount, as determined
by the legislature in the operating budget by amounts appropriated for
this specific purpose, of community-based, geographically distributed
residential services.
(6) The secretary shall use available resources only for regional
support networks, except to the extent authorized, and in accordance
with any priorities or conditions specified, in the biennial
appropriations act.
(7) Each certified regional support network and licensed service
provider shall file with the secretary, on request, such data,
statistics, schedules, and information as the secretary reasonably
requires. A certified regional support network or licensed service
provider which, without good cause, fails to furnish any data,
statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent
reports thereof, may have its certification or license revoked or
suspended.
(8) The secretary may suspend, revoke, limit, or restrict a
certification or license, or refuse to grant a certification or license
for failure to conform to: (a) The law; (b) applicable rules and
regulations; (c) applicable standards; or (d) state minimum standards.
(9) The superior court may restrain any regional support network or
service provider from operating without certification or a license or
any other violation of this section. The court may also review,
pursuant to procedures contained in chapter 34.05 RCW, any denial,
suspension, limitation, restriction, or revocation of certification or
license, and grant other relief required to enforce the provisions of
this chapter.
(10) Upon petition by the secretary, and after hearing held upon
reasonable notice to the facility, the superior court may issue a
warrant to an officer or employee of the secretary authorizing him or
her to enter at reasonable times, and examine the records, books, and
accounts of any regional support network or service provider refusing
to consent to inspection or examination by the authority.
(11) Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy,
the secretary may file an action for an injunction or other process
against any person or governmental unit to restrain or prevent the
establishment, conduct, or operation of a regional support network or
service provider without certification or a license under this chapter.
(12) The standards for certification of evaluation and treatment
facilities shall include standards relating to maintenance of good
physical and mental health and other services to be afforded persons
pursuant to this chapter and chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW, and shall
otherwise assure the effectuation of the purposes of these chapters.
(13)(a) The department, in consultation with affected parties,
shall establish a distribution formula that reflects regional needs
assessments based on the number of persons who are acutely mentally
ill, chronically mentally ill, severely emotionally disturbed children,
and seriously disturbed. The formula shall take into consideration the
impact on regions of demographic factors which result in concentrations
of priority populations as set forth in subsection (5)(b) of this
section. These factors shall include the population concentrations
resulting from commitments under chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW to state
psychiatric hospitals, as well as concentration in urban areas, at
border crossings at state boundaries, and other significant demographic
and workload factors.
(b) The formula shall also include a projection of the funding
allocations that will result for each region, which specifies
allocations according to priority populations, including the allocation
for services to children and other underserved populations.
(c) After July 1, 2003, the department may allocate up to ((two))
five percent of ((total funds)) available resources to be distributed
to the regional support networks for incentive payments to reward the
achievement of superior outcomes, or significantly improved outcomes,
as measured by a statewide performance measurement system consistent
with the framework recommended in the joint legislative audit and
review committee's performance audit of the mental health system. The
department shall annually report to the legislature on its criteria and
allocation of the incentives provided under this subsection.
(14) The secretary shall assume all duties assigned to the
nonparticipating regional support networks under chapters 71.05, 71.34,
and 71.24 RCW. Such responsibilities shall include those which would
have been assigned to the nonparticipating counties in regions where
there are not participating regional support networks.
The regional support networks, or the secretary's assumption of all
responsibilities under chapters 71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW, shall be
included in all state and federal plans affecting the state mental
health program including at least those required by this chapter, the
medicaid program, and P.L. 99-660. Nothing in these plans shall be
inconsistent with the intent and requirements of this chapter.
(15) The secretary shall:
(a) Disburse funds for the regional support networks within sixty
days of approval of the biennial contract. The department must either
approve or reject the biennial contract within sixty days of receipt.
(b) Enter into biennial contracts with regional support networks.
The contracts shall be consistent with available resources. No
contract shall be approved that does not include progress toward
meeting the goals of this chapter by taking responsibility for: (i)
Short-term commitments; (ii) residential care; and (iii) emergency
response systems.
(c) Notify regional support networks of their allocation of
available resources at least sixty days prior to the start of a new
biennial contract period.
(d) Deny funding allocations to regional support networks based
solely upon formal findings of noncompliance with the terms of the
regional support network's contract with the department. ((Written
notice and at least thirty days for corrective action must precede any
such action. In such cases, regional support networks shall have full
rights to appeal under chapter 34.05 RCW.))
(16) The department, in cooperation with the state congressional
delegation, shall actively seek waivers of federal requirements and
such modifications of federal regulations as are necessary to allow
federal medicaid reimbursement for services provided by free-standing
evaluation and treatment facilities certified under chapter 71.05 RCW.
The department shall periodically report its efforts to the appropriate
committees of the senate and the house of representatives.

Sec. 6 RCW 72.23.010 and 2000 c 22 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington.
(2) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(3) "Employee" means an employee as defined in RCW 49.17.020.
(4) "Licensed physician" means an individual permitted to practice
as a physician under the laws of the state, or a medical officer,
similarly qualified, of the government of the United States while in
this state in performance of his or her official duties.
(5) "Long-term inpatient care" means inpatient services for persons
committed for intensive treatment for periods of ninety days or greater
under chapter 71.05 RCW. "Long-term inpatient care" as used in this
chapter does not include services for individuals committed under
chapter 71.05 RCW who are receiving services pursuant to a conditional
release or a court-ordered less restrictive alternative to detention.
(6) "Mentally ill person" means any person who, pursuant to the
definitions contained in RCW 71.05.020, as a result of a mental
disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm to others or himself or
herself or is gravely disabled.
(((6))) (7) "Patient" means a person under observation, care, or
treatment in a state hospital, or a person found mentally ill by the
court, and not discharged from a state hospital, or other facility, to
which such person had been ordered hospitalized.
(((7))) (8) "Resident" means a resident of the state of Washington.
(((8))) (9) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health
services.
(((9))) (10) "State hospital" means any hospital, including a child
study and treatment center, operated and maintained by the state of
Washington for the care of the mentally ill.
(((10))) (11) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of a state
hospital.
(((11))) (12) "Violence" or "violent act" means any physical
assault or attempted physical assault against an employee or patient of
a state hospital.
Wherever used in this chapter, the masculine shall include the
feminine and the singular shall include the plural.

Sec. 7 RCW 72.23.025 and 1998 c 245 s 141 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to improve the quality of
service at state hospitals, eliminate overcrowding, and more
specifically define the role of the state hospitals. The legislature
intends that eastern and western state hospitals shall become clinical
centers for handling the most complicated long-term care needs of
patients with a primary diagnosis of mental disorder. ((Over the next
six years, their involvement in providing short-term, acute care, and
less complicated long-term care shall be diminished in accordance with
the revised responsibilities for mental health care under chapter 71.24
RCW.)) To this end, the legislature intends that funds appropriated
for mental health programs, including funds for regional support
networks and the state hospitals be used for persons with primary
diagnosis of mental disorder. The legislature finds that establishment
of the eastern state hospital board, the western state hospital board,
and institutes for the study and treatment of mental disorders at both
eastern state hospital and western state hospital will be instrumental
in implementing the legislative intent.
(2)(a) The eastern state hospital board and the western state
hospital board are each established. Members of the boards shall be
appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate. Each board
shall include:
(i) The director of the institute for the study and treatment of
mental disorders established at the hospital;
(ii) One family member of a current or recent hospital resident;
(iii) One consumer of services;
(iv) One community mental health service provider;
(v) Two citizens with no financial or professional interest in
mental health services;
(vi) One representative of the regional support network in which
the hospital is located;
(vii) One representative from the staff who is a physician;
(viii) One representative from the nursing staff;
(ix) One representative from the other professional staff;
(x) One representative from the nonprofessional staff; and
(xi) One representative of a minority community.
(b) At least one representative listed in (a)(viii), (ix), or (x)
of this subsection shall be a union member.
(c) Members shall serve four-year terms. Members of the board
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060 and shall receive compensation as provided in RCW
43.03.240.
(3) The boards established under this section shall:
(a) Monitor the operation and activities of the hospital;
(b) Review and advise on the hospital budget;
(c) Make recommendations to the governor and the legislature for
improving the quality of service provided by the hospital;
(d) Monitor and review the activities of the hospital in
implementing the intent of the legislature set forth in this section;
and
(e) Consult with the secretary regarding persons the secretary may
select as the superintendent of the hospital whenever a vacancy occurs.
(4)(a) There is established at eastern state hospital and western
state hospital, institutes for the study and treatment of mental
disorders. The institutes shall be operated by joint operating
agreements between state colleges and universities and the department
of social and health services. The institutes are intended to conduct
training, research, and clinical program development activities that
will directly benefit mentally ill persons receiving treatment in
Washington state by performing the following activities:
(i) Promote recruitment and retention of highly qualified
professionals at the state hospitals and community mental health
programs;
(ii) Improve clinical care by exploring new, innovative, and
scientifically based treatment models for persons presenting
particularly difficult and complicated clinical syndromes;
(iii) Provide expanded training opportunities for existing staff at
the state hospitals and community mental health programs;
(iv) Promote bilateral understanding of treatment orientation,
possibilities, and challenges between state hospital professionals and
community mental health professionals.
(b) To accomplish these purposes the institutes may, within funds
appropriated for this purpose:
(i) Enter joint operating agreements with state universities or
other institutions of higher education to accomplish the placement and
training of students and faculty in psychiatry, psychology, social
work, occupational therapy, nursing, and other relevant professions at
the state hospitals and community mental health programs;
(ii) Design and implement clinical research projects to improve the
quality and effectiveness of state hospital services and operations;
(iii) Enter into agreements with community mental health service
providers to accomplish the exchange of professional staff between the
state hospitals and community mental health service providers;
(iv) Establish a student loan forgiveness and conditional
scholarship program to retain qualified professionals at the state
hospitals and community mental health providers when the secretary has
determined a shortage of such professionals exists.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary,
the institutes may enter into agreements with the department or the
state hospitals which may involve changes in staffing necessary to
implement improved patient care programs contemplated by this section.
(d) The institutes are authorized to seek and accept public or
private gifts, grants, contracts, or donations to accomplish their
purposes under this section.

--- END ---