BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes the vital importance to the state's
economic prosperity and the economic benefit of placing a priority on
enrolling and conferring degrees upon students in the fields of
engineering, technology, biotechnology, science, computer science, and
mathematics.
(2) The legislature has significant concerns that other countries
are outpacing the United States in graduating qualified engineers, and
that major corporations within Washington state are searching out-of-state and even outside the United States to find the qualified and
trained employees they need.
(3) Data compiled by the technology alliance shows that Washington
state ranks thirty-fourth among the fifty states in the percentage of
residents who have earned a science or engineering degree, per capita.
(4) Data collected by the office of financial management indicates
that between the academic years of 1993-94 and 2003-04 at public four-year institutions of higher education in Washington state:
(a) There was a twelve percent decline in the number of full-time
equivalents enrolled in the fields of engineering and related
technologies; and
(b) There was nearly a nine percent decline in the number of
bachelor's degrees conferred in the fields of engineering and related
technologies.
(5) Data collected by the office of financial management also shows
that for the 2003-04 academic year, only four percent of all full-time
equivalents were enrolled in engineering and related technologies and
just two percent of all full-time equivalents were enrolled in computer
science studies at public four-year institutions of higher education in
the state.
(6) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to promote
increased access, delivery models, enrollment slots, and degree
opportunities in the fields of engineering, technology, biotechnology,
sciences, computer sciences, and mathematics. It is recognized that
these areas of study and training are integrally linked to ensuring
that Washington state's economy can compete nationally and globally in
the twenty-first century marketplace. It is also recognized that
community colleges play a unique role in supporting degree attainment
in the fields of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics
through the development of transferable curricula and the maintenance
of viable articulation agreements with both public and private
universities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A state priority is established for institutions of higher
education, including community colleges, to encourage growing numbers
of enrollments and degrees in the fields of engineering, technology,
biotechnology, sciences, computer sciences, and mathematics.
(2) In meeting this state priority, the legislature understands and
recognizes that the demands of the economic marketplace and the desires
of students are not always on parallel tracks. Therefore, institutions
of higher education shall determine local student demand for programs
in the fields of engineering, technology, biotechnology, sciences,
computer sciences, and mathematics and submit findings and proposed
alternatives to meet demand to the higher education coordinating board
and the legislature by November 1, 2008.
(3) While it is understood that these areas of emphasis should not
be the sole focus of institutions of higher education. It is the
intent of the legislature that steady progress in these areas occur.
The higher education coordinating board shall track and report progress
in the fields of engineering, technology, biotechnology, sciences,
computer sciences, and mathematics including, but not limited to, the
following information:
(a) The number of students enrolled in these fields on a biennial
basis;
(b) The number of associate, bachelor's, and master's degrees
conferred in these fields on a biennial basis;
(c) The amount of expenditures in enrollment and degree programs in
these fields; and
(d) The number and type of public-private partnerships established
relating to these fields among institutions of higher education,
including community colleges, and leading corporations in Washington
state.
(4) Institutions of higher education, including community colleges,
shall be provided discretion and flexibility in achieving the
objectives under this section. Examples of the types of institutional
programs that may help achieve these objectives include, but are not
limited to, establishment of institutes of technology, new polytechnic-based institutions, new divisions of existing institutions, and a
flexible array of delivery models, including face-to-face learning,
interactive courses, internet-based offerings, and instruction on main
campuses, branch campuses, and other educational centers.
(5) The legislature recognizes the global needs of the economic
marketplace for technologically prepared graduates, and the
relationship between technology industries and higher education.
Institutions of higher education, including community colleges, are
strongly urged to consider science, engineering, and technology program
growth in areas of the state that exhibit a high concentration of
aerospace, biotechnology, and technology industrial presence. Expanded
science and technology programs can gain from the proximity of
experienced and knowledgeable industry leaders, while industry can
benefit from access to new sources of highly trained and educated
graduates.

--- END ---