BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.925 and 2003 c 168 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of dietary
supplements for human use (1) dispensed or to be dispensed to patients,
pursuant to a prescription, or (2) sold by a chiropractor licensed
under chapter 18.25 RCW to the chiropractor's patients. "Dietary
supplement" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.925 and 2003 c 168 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the use of
dietary supplements (1) dispensed or to be dispensed to patients,
pursuant to a prescription, if the dietary supplements are for human
use, or (2) sold by a chiropractor licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW to
the chiropractor's patients, if the dietary supplements are for human
use. "Dietary supplement" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.

--- END ---