BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
COMMUNITY REVITALIZATION FINANCING--GENERAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that it is in the
best interests of the state of Washington to promote private investment
in many areas for the purpose of stimulating economic vitality and
promoting economic stability. The legislature recognizes that the
state as a whole benefits from investment in public infrastructure
because it promotes community and economic development. Public
investment stimulates business activity and helps create jobs. The
legislature further finds that these activities generate revenue for
the state and local governments and that it is in the public interest
to invest in these projects through a credit against the state sales
and use tax to those local governments that can demonstrate the
expected returns.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Base year" means the first calendar year following the
creation of an increment area.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Excess state excise taxes" means the amount of excise taxes
received by the state during the measurement year from taxable activity
within the increment area over and above the amount of excise taxes
received by the state during the base year from taxable activity within
the increment area. However, if a local government creates an
increment area and reasonably determines that no activity subject to
tax under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred in the twelve months
immediately preceding the creation of the increment area within the
boundaries of the area that became the increment area, "excess state
excise taxes" means the entire amount of excise taxes received by the
state during a calendar year period beginning with the calendar year
immediately following the creation of the increment area and continuing
with each measurement year thereafter.
(4) "Excise taxes" means the state retail sales and use taxes
imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
(5) "Fiscal year" has the same meaning as in section 104(3) of this
act.
(6) "Increment area" means the geographic area from which taxes are
to be used to finance public improvements authorized under this
chapter.
(7) "Local government" means any city, town, county, port district,
or any combination thereof.
(8) "Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure the amount of excess
excise taxes required to be used to finance public improvement costs
associated with public improvements financed in whole or in part by
community revitalization financing.
(9) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government.
(10) "Participating taxing authority" means a taxing authority that
has entered into a written agreement with a local government for the
use of community revitalization financing to the extent of allocating
excess excise taxes to the local government for the purpose of
financing all or a portion of the costs of designated public
improvements.
(11) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the increment area that
include:
(i) Street and road construction and maintenance;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;
(iii) Sidewalks and streetlights;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas; and
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems; and
(b) Expenditures for any of the following purposes:
(i) Providing environmental analysis, professional management,
planning, and promotion within the increment area, including the
management and promotion of retail trade activities in the increment
area;
(ii) Providing maintenance and security for common or public areas
in the increment area; or
(iii) Historic preservation activities authorized under RCW
35.21.395.
(12) "Public improvement costs" means the costs of: (a) Design,
planning, acquisition, including land acquisition, site preparation
including land clearing, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation,
improvement, and installation of public improvements; (b) demolishing,
relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending construction of
public improvements; (c) relocating utilities as a result of public
improvements; (d) financing public improvements, including interest
during construction, legal and other professional services, taxes,
insurance, principal and interest costs on general indebtedness issued
to finance public improvements, and any necessary reserves for general
indebtedness; and (e) administrative expenses and feasibility studies
reasonably necessary and related to these costs, including related
costs that may have been incurred before adoption of the ordinance
authorizing the public improvements and the use of community
revitalization financing to fund the costs of the public improvements.
(13) "Tax allocation revenues" means those tax revenues derived
from the receipt of excess excise taxes under section 204 of this act.
(14) "Taxing authority" means a governmental entity that imposes a
sales or use tax under chapter 82.14 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within a proposed or approved increment area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 A local government may finance public
improvements using community revitalization financing subject to the
following conditions:
(1) The local government adopts an ordinance designating an
increment area within its boundaries and the ordinance specifies the
public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part with
the use of community revitalization financing. An increment area shall
be geographically restricted to the location of the public improvement
and adjacent locations that the local government finds to have a high
likelihood of receiving direct positive business and economic impacts
due to the public improvement, such as a neighborhood or a block. An
increment area shall not encompass any one political jurisdiction in
its entirety;
(2) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in
part using community revitalization financing are expected to encourage
private development within the increment area;
(3) The local government has entered or expects to enter into a
contract with a private developer relating to the development of
private improvements within the increment area or has received a letter
of intent from a private developer relating to the developer's plans
for the development of private improvements within the increment area;
(4) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the
increment area, as a result of the public improvements, will be
consistent with the countywide planning policy adopted by the county
under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's comprehensive plan and
development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(5) The local government may not use community revitalization
financing to finance the costs associated with the financing, design,
acquisition, construction, equipping, operating, maintaining,
remodeling, repairing, and reequipping of public facilities funded with
taxes collected under RCW 82.14.048;
(6) The governing body of the local government must make a finding
that community revitalization financing: (a) Will not be used for the
purpose of relocating a business from outside the increment area, but
within this state, into the increment area; (b) will improve the
viability of existing business entities within the increment area; and
(c) will be used exclusively in areas within the jurisdiction of the
local government deemed in need of economic development and/or
redevelopment, and absent the financing available under this act the
proposed economic development and/or redevelopment would more than
likely not occur;
(7) The governing body of the local government finds that the
public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using
community revitalization financing are reasonably likely to:
(a) Increase private investment within the increment area;
(b) Increase employment within the increment area; and
(c) Generate, over the period of time that the local sales and use
tax will be imposed under section 201 of this act, state and local
sales and use tax revenues that are equal to or greater than the
respective state and local contributions made under this chapter;
(8) The local government obtains written agreement for the use of
community revitalization financing to finance all or a portion of the
costs of the designated public improvements from taxing authorities
that in the aggregate levy at least sixty percent of the sales and use
taxes within the increment area. The agreement must be authorized by
the governing body of taxing authorities that in the aggregate levy at
least sixty percent of the sales and use taxes on property within the
increment area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 (1) Before adopting an ordinance creating
the increment area, a local government must:
(a) Obtain written agreement for the use of community
revitalization financing to finance all or a portion of the costs of
the designated public improvements from taxing authorities as provided
in section 103(8) of this act; and
(b) Hold a public hearing on the proposed financing of the public
improvement in whole or in part with community revitalization
financing.
(i) Notice of the public hearing must be published in a legal
newspaper of general circulation within the proposed increment area at
least ten days before the public hearing and posted in at least six
conspicuous public places located in the proposed increment area.
(ii) Notice must also be sent by United States mail to the property
owners and the business enterprises located within the proposed
increment area at least thirty days prior to the hearing. In
implementing provisions under this act, the local governing body may
also consult with business organizations, including the local chamber
of commerce, and the office of minority and women's business
enterprises to assist with providing appropriate notice to business
enterprises and property owners for whom English is a second language.
(iii) Notices must describe the contemplated public improvements,
estimate the costs of the public improvements, describe the portion of
the costs of the public improvements to be borne by community
revitalization financing, describe any other sources of revenue to
finance the public improvements, describe the boundaries of the
proposed increment area, and estimate the period during which community
revitalization financing is contemplated to be used. The public
hearing may be held by either the governing body of the local
government, or a committee of the governing body that includes at least
a majority of the whole governing body.
(2) In order to create an increment area, a local government must
adopt an ordinance establishing the increment area that:
(a) Describes the public improvements;
(b) Describes the boundaries of the increment area;
(c) Estimates the cost of the public improvements and the portion
of these costs to be financed by community revitalization financing;
(d) Estimates the time during which tax allocation revenue is to be
used to finance public improvement costs associated with the public
improvements financed in whole or in part by community revitalization
financing;
(e) Estimates the average amount of tax allocation revenue to be
received in all fiscal years through the imposition of a sales and use
tax under section 201 of this act;
(f) Provides the date when the apportionment of tax allocation will
commence; and
(g) Finds that the conditions of RCW 39.89.030 are met.
(3) For purposes of this section, "fiscal year" means the year
beginning July 1st and ending the following June 30th.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 The local government shall:
(1) Publish notice in a legal newspaper of general circulation
within the increment area that describes the public improvement,
describes the boundaries of the increment area, and identifies the
location and times where the ordinance and other public information
concerning the public improvement may be inspected; and
(2) Deliver a certified copy of the ordinance to the county
treasurer and the governing body of each participating taxing authority
within which the increment area is located.

PART II
COMMUNITY REVITALIZATION FINANCING--SALES AND USE TAX REVENUE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A city, town, or county that creates an increment area and
finances public improvements pursuant to chapter 82.-- RCW (the new
chapter created in section 404 of this act) may impose a sales and use
tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter and subject to the
criteria set forth in this section. Except as provided in this
section, the tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and
shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the taxing jurisdiction of the city, town, or county. The
rate of tax shall not exceed the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1) in
the case of a sales tax or the rate provided in RCW 82.12.020(5) in the
case of a use tax, less the aggregate rates of any other taxes imposed
on the same events that are credited against the state taxes imposed
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
credited against the amount of tax otherwise required to be deposited
in the general fund under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department
shall perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the city, town,
or county at no cost to the city, town, or county.
(3) No tax may be imposed under this section before July 1, 2008.
The tax imposed under this section shall expire when the bonds issued
under the authority of chapter 82.-- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 404 of this act) are retired, but not more than twenty-five
years after the tax is first imposed.
(4) An ordinance adopted by the legislative authority of a city,
town, or county imposing a tax under this section shall provide that:
(a) The tax shall first be imposed on the first day of a fiscal
year.
(b) The amount of tax received by the local government in any
fiscal year shall not exceed the amount of the state contribution;
(c) The tax shall cease to be imposed for the remainder of any
fiscal year in which either:
(i) The amount of tax receipts totals the amount of the state
contribution; or
(ii) The amount of revenue from taxes imposed under this section by
all cities, towns, and counties totals the annual state credit limit as
provided in section 203(3) of this act;
(d) The tax shall be reimposed, should it cease to be imposed for
any of the reasons provided in (c) of this subsection, at the beginning
of the next fiscal year, subject to the restrictions in this section;
and
(e) Any revenue generated by the tax in excess of the amounts
specified in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection shall belong to the
state of Washington.
(5) If both a county and a city or town impose a tax under this
section, the tax imposed by the city, town, or county shall be credited
as follows:
(a) If the county has created an increment area before the city or
town, the tax imposed by the county shall be credited against the tax
imposed by the city or town, the purpose of such credit is to give
priority to the county tax; and
(b) If the city or town has created an increment area before the
county, the tax imposed by the city or town shall be credited against
the tax imposed by the county, the purpose of such credit is to give
priority to the city or town tax.
(6) The department shall determine the amount of tax receipts
attributable to each city, town, and county imposing a sales and use
tax under this section and shall advise a city, town, or county when it
must cease imposing the tax for the remainder of the fiscal year as
provided in subsection (4)(c) of this section. Determinations by the
department of the amount of taxes attributable to a city, town, or
county are final and shall not be used to challenge the validity of any
tax imposed under this section. The department shall remit any tax
receipts in excess of the amounts specified in subsection (4)(a), (b),
and (c) of this section to the state treasurer who shall deposit the
moneys in the general fund.
(7) The definitions in section 102 of this act and in this
subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(a) "State contribution" means the lesser of one million dollars or
excess state excise taxes received by the state during the preceding
calendar year.
(b) "Tax allocation revenues" has the same meaning as in section
102 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Moneys collected from the taxes imposed under section 201 of
this act shall be used only for the purpose of principal and interest
payments on bonds issued under the authority of section 301 of this act
and must be matched with an amount from local public sources dedicated
through December 31st of the previous calendar year to finance public
improvements authorized under chapter 82.-- RCW (the new chapter
created in section 404 of this act). Such local public sources
include, but are not limited to, private monetary contributions and tax
revenues other than the taxes imposed under section 201 of this act.
Local public sources are dedicated to finance public improvements if
they are actually expended to pay public improvement costs or are
required by law or an agreement to be used exclusively to pay public
improvement costs.
(2) A local government shall inform the department by the first day
of March of the amount of local public sources dedicated in the
preceding calendar year to finance public improvements authorized under
chapter 82.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 404 of this act).
(3) If a local government fails to comply with subsection (2) of
this section, no tax may be imposed under section 201 of this act in
the subsequent fiscal year.
(4) A local government shall provide a report to the department by
March 1st of each year. The report shall contain the following
information:
(a) The amount of tax allocation revenues, taxes under section 201
of this act, and local public sources received by the local government
during the preceding calendar year, and a summary of how these revenues
were expended;
(b) The names of any businesses locating within the increment area
as a result of the public improvements undertaken by the local
government and financed in whole or in part with community
revitalization financing;
(c) The total number of permanent jobs created as a result of the
public improvements undertaken by the local government and financed in
whole or in part with community revitalization financing;
(d) The average wages and benefits received by all employees of
businesses locating within the increment area as a result of the public
improvements undertaken by the local government and financed in whole
or in part with community revitalization financing; and
(e) That the local government is in compliance with section
103(6)(c) of this act.
(5) The department shall make a report available to the public and
the legislature by June 1st of each year. The report shall include a
list of public improvements undertaken by local governments and
financed in whole or in part with community revitalization financing,
and it shall also include a summary of the information provided to the
department by local governments under subsection (4) of this section.
(6) The definitions in section 102 of this act apply to this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) As a condition to imposing a sales and use tax under section
201 of this act, a city, town, or county must apply to the department
at least seventy-five days before the effective date of any such tax.
The application shall be in a form and manner prescribed by the
department and shall include but is not limited to information
establishing that the applicant is eligible to impose such a tax, the
anticipated effective date for imposing the tax, the estimated number
of years that the tax will be imposed, and the estimated amount of tax
revenue to be received in each fiscal year that the tax will be
imposed. For purposes of this section, "fiscal year" means the year
beginning July 1st and ending the following June 30th. The department
shall make available forms to be used for this purpose. As part of the
application, a city, town, or county must provide to the department a
copy of the ordinance creating the increment area as required in
section 103 of this act. The department shall rule on completed
applications within sixty days of receipt. The department may begin
accepting and approving applications August 1, 2006. No new
applications shall be considered by the department after the thirtieth
day of September of the third year following the year in which the
first application was received by the department.
(2) The authority to impose the local option sales and use taxes
under section 201 of this act is on a first-come basis. Priority for
collecting the taxes authorized under section 201 of this act among
approved applicants shall be based on the date that the approved
application was received by the department. As a part of the approval
of applications under this section, the department shall approve the
amount of tax under section 201 of this act that an applicant may
impose. The amount of tax approved by the department shall not exceed
the lesser of one million dollars or the average amount of tax revenue
that the applicant estimates that it will receive in all fiscal years
through the imposition of a sales and use tax under section 201 of this
act. A city, town, or county shall not receive, in any fiscal year,
more revenues from taxes imposed under section 201 of this act than the
amount approved by the department. The department shall not approve
the receipt of more credit against the state sales and use tax than is
authorized under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The amount of credit against the state sales and use tax is
limited to no more than five million dollars of credit against the
state sales and use tax received by all cities, towns, and counties
imposing a tax under section 201 of this act. This amount shall be
adjusted annually, beginning in the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2008,
by an amount representing the fiscal growth factor as defined in RCW
43.135.025.
(4) The credit against the state sales and use tax shall be
available to any city, town, or county imposing a tax under section 201
of this act only as long as the city, town, or county has outstanding
indebtedness under RCW 39.89.080.
(5) The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW
necessary for the administration of sections 201 through 204 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 (1) A local government that creates an
increment area and has received approval from the department under
section 203 of this act to impose the local option sales and use tax
authorized in section 201 of this act may use annually any excess
excise taxes received by it from taxable activity within the increment
area to finance public improvement costs associated with the public
improvements financed in whole or in part by community revitalization
financing. The use of excess excise taxes must cease when tax
allocation revenues are no longer necessary or obligated to pay the
costs of the public improvements. Any participating taxing authority
is authorized to allocate excess excise taxes to the local government
as long as the local government has received approval from the
department under section 203 of this act to impose the local option
sales and use tax authorized in section 201 of this act. The
legislature declares that it is a proper purpose of a local government
or participating taxing authority to allocate excess excise taxes for
purposes of financing public improvements under this chapter.
(2) A local government consisting solely of a port district may use
excess excise taxes as provided in this section only to the extent that
any participating taxing authority allocates excess excise taxes to the
local government.
(3) A local government consisting of a port district and any city,
town, or county may use excess excise taxes as provided in this section
only if:
(a) The city, town, or county realizes excess excise taxes from
taxable activity within the increment area; or
(b) Any participating taxing authority allocates excess excise
taxes to the local government.
(4) A local government shall provide the department accurate
information describing the geographical boundaries of the increment
area at least seventy-five days before the effective date of the
ordinance creating the increment area. The local government shall
ensure that the boundary information provided to the department is kept
current.
(5) The department shall provide each local government that has
provided boundary information to the department as provided in this
section and that has received approval from the department under
section 203 of this act to impose the local option sales and use tax
authorized in section 201 of this act with the necessary information to
calculate excess excise taxes.

PART III
BOND AUTHORIZATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 (1) A local government designating an
increment area and authorizing the use of community revitalization
financing may incur general indebtedness, and issue general obligation
bonds, to finance the public improvements and retire the indebtedness
in whole or in part from tax allocation revenues and from the sales and
use tax authorized in section 201 of this act it receives, subject to
the following requirements:
(a) The ordinance adopted by the local government creating the
increment area and authorizing the use of community revitalization
financing indicates an intent to incur this indebtedness and the
maximum amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated; and
(b) The local government includes this statement of the intent in
all notices required by section 104 of this act.
(2) The general indebtedness incurred under subsection (1) of this
section may be payable from other tax revenues, the full faith and
credit of the local government, and nontax income, revenues, fees, and
rents from the public improvements, as well as contributions, grants,
and nontax money available to the local government for payment of costs
of the public improvements or associated debt service on the general
indebtedness.
(3) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, a local government designating an increment area and
authorizing the use of community revitalization financing may require
the nonpublic participant to provide adequate security to protect the
public investment in the public improvement within the increment area.
(4) Bonds issued under this section shall be authorized by
ordinance of the local governing body and may be issued in one or more
series and shall bear such date or dates, be payable upon demand or
mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be
in such denomination or denominations, be in such form either coupon or
registered as provided in RCW 39.46.030, carry such conversion or
registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in
such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or
places, and be subject to such terms of redemption with or without
premium, be secured in such manner, and have such other
characteristics, as may be provided by such ordinance or trust
indenture or mortgage issued pursuant thereto.
(5) The local government may annually pay into a fund to be
established for the benefit of bonds issued under this section a fixed
proportion or a fixed amount of any tax allocation revenues derived
from property or business activity within the increment area containing
the public improvements funded by the bonds, such payment to continue
until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full. The local
government may also annually pay into the fund established in this
section a fixed proportion or a fixed amount of any revenues derived
from taxes imposed under section 201 of this act, such payment to
continue until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full.
Revenues derived from taxes imposed under section 201 of this act are
subject to the use restriction in section 202 of this act.
(6) In case any of the public officials of the local government
whose signatures appear on any bonds or any coupons issued under this
chapter shall cease to be such officials before the delivery of such
bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for
all purposes, the same as if such officials had remained in office
until such delivery. Any provision of any law to the contrary
notwithstanding, any bonds issued under this chapter are fully
negotiable.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (4) through (6) of this section,
bonds issued under this section may be issued and sold in accordance
with chapter 39.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A local government that issues bonds under
section 301 of this act to finance public improvements may pledge for
the payment of such bonds all or part of any tax allocation revenues
derived from the public improvements. All of such tax revenues are
subject to the use restriction in section 202 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 The bonds issued by a local government
under section 301 of this act to finance public improvements shall not
constitute an obligation of the state of Washington, either general or
special.

PART IV
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 Part headings used in this act do not
constitute any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 Nothing in this act shall be construed to
give port districts the authority to impose a sales or use tax under
chapter 82.14 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 Sections 101 through 105, 204, 301 through
303, and 403 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

--- END ---