BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Nothing in this title applies to or prevents a spa or art
gallery from offering or supplying without charge wine by the
individual glass to a customer for consumption on the premises.
However, the customer must be at least twenty-one years of age and may
only be offered one glass of wine, and the wine must have been legally
purchased under this title. If the wine is offered by a spa that
provides massages, the wine may not be offered to the customer until
the massage is completed.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "spa" means a business that
offers beauty services including, but not limited to, shampooing,
cutting, styling, or dyeing hair, manicures, pedicures, facials,
massages, and the use of body toning equipment.
(3) For purposes of this section, "art gallery" means a room or
building devoted to the exhibition and/or sale of the works of art.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The board may adopt rules to implement section 1 of this act.

--- END ---