BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter shall not apply to the:
(a) Manufacturing of dairy products; or
(b) Selling of manufactured dairy products to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state. A person taking an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must
keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070
establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the
ordinary course of business out of this state.
(2) "Dairy products" means dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including byproducts from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.4266 and 2005 c 513 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter shall not apply to ((amounts received from)) the:
(((1))) (a) Canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits and vegetables; or
(((2))) (b) Selling at wholesale fresh fruits and vegetables
canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated by the seller and
sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the
goods out of this state. ((As proof of sale to a person who transports
in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the seller
shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by the
department and retain the statement as a business record.)) A person
taking an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and preserve
records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the
goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of
business out of this state.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.260 and 2005 c 513 s 2 and 2005 c 443 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Seafood products which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw
salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by that person; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the value of the products manufactured, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) Beginning July 1, 2012, dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including byproducts from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein; or selling the same to purchasers who transport in
the ordinary course of business the goods out of state; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. ((As proof of sale to a person who
transports in the ordinary course of business goods out of this state,
the seller shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed by
the department and retain the statement as a business record)) Sellers
must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070
establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the
ordinary course of business out of this state;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2012, fresh fruits and/or vegetables by
canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating, or selling
at wholesale fresh fruits and vegetables canned, preserved, frozen,
processed, or dehydrated by the seller and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured or
the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;
(((d))) (e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or
biodiesel feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the business shall be
equal to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(((e))) (f) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are
defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol fuel or
wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the
gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied
by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter
82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to
the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or
foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be
equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed
under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
agent, insurance broker, or insurance solicitor licensed under chapter
48.17 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to
such licensed activities shall be equal to the gross income of such
business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5
percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales, at retail or wholesale, of
commercial airplanes, or components of such airplanes, manufactured by
that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the airplanes
or components multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007, or the day preceding the date final assembly of a
superefficient airplane begins in Washington state, as determined under
RCW 82.32.550; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning on the later of July 1, 2007, or the
date final assembly of a superefficient airplane begins in Washington
state, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial
airplane," "component," and "final assembly of a superefficient
airplane" have the meanings given in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (11) must report
as required under RCW 82.32.545.
(e) This subsection (11) does not apply after the earlier of: July
1, 2024; or December 31, 2007, if assembly of a superefficient airplane
does not begin by December 31, 2007, as determined under RCW 82.32.550.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.32.610 and 2005 c 513 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2) Each person claiming a tax exemption under RCW 82.04.4266 or
section 1 of this act shall report information to the department by
filing a complete annual survey. The survey is due by March 31st of
the year following any calendar year in which a tax exemption under RCW
82.04.4266 or section 1 of this act is taken. The department may
extend the due date for timely filing of annual surveys under this
section as provided in RCW 82.32.590. The survey shall include the
amount of tax exemption taken. The survey shall also include the
following information for employment positions in Washington:
(a) The number of total employment positions;
(b) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(c) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(d) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
The first survey filed under this subsection shall also include
information for the twelve-month period immediately before first use of
a tax incentive.
(3) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the exemption program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(4) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of the tax exemption taken, is deemed taxpayer information under RCW
82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax exemption taken is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330.
(5) If a person fails to submit an annual survey under subsection
(2) of this section by the due date of the report or any extension
under RCW 82.32.590, the department shall declare the amount of taxes
exempted for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and
payable. The department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on
the amounts due under this section. The amount due shall be calculated
using a rate of 0.138 percent. The interest shall be assessed at the
rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter, retroactively to
the date the exemption was claimed, and shall accrue until the taxes
for which the exemption was claimed are repaid. This information is
not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330.
(6) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(7) The department shall study the tax exemption authorized in RCW
82.04.4266 and section 1 of this act. The department shall submit a
report to the finance committee of the house of representatives and the
ways and means committee of the senate by December 1, 2011. The report
shall measure the effect of the exemption on job creation, job
retention, company growth, the movement of firms or the consolidation
of firms' operations into the state, and such other factors as the
department selects.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.74.010 and 2005 c 513 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse ((used))
owned or operated by a wholesaler or third-party warehouser as those
terms are defined in RCW 82.08.820 to store fresh and/or frozen
perishable fruits or vegetables, dairy products, eggs or egg products,
or any combination thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the
quality of the product for orderly marketing.
(3) "Dairy product" means dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including byproducts from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein.
(4) "Dairy product manufacturing" means manufacturing, as defined
in RCW 82.04.120, of dairy products.
(5) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(((4))) (6) "Egg" means eggs that as of March 1, 2000, are
identified in 7 C.F.R., chapter 1, part 94.
(7) "Egg handling" means inspecting, candling, breaking, or
packaging eggs, or filtering, mixing, blending, pasteurizing,
stabilizing, cooling, freezing, drying, or packaging egg products.
(8) "Egg product" means egg products that as of March 1, 2000, are
identified in 7 C.F.R., chapter 1, part 94.
(9) "Eligible investment project" means an investment in qualified
buildings or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and
services rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of
the project. The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not
eligible for a deferral unless (a) the underlying ownership of the
buildings, machinery, and equipment vests exclusively in the same
person; or (b)(i) the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the
economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee in the form of reduced
rent payments, and (ii) the lessee that receives the economic benefit
of the deferral agrees in writing with the department to complete the
annual survey under RCW 82.74.040. The economic benefit of the
deferral to the lessee may be evidenced by any type of payment, credit,
or any other financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the
qualified building and the lessee.
(((5))) (10) "Fresh fruit and vegetable processing" means
manufacturing as defined in RCW 82.04.120 which consists of the
canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits
and/or vegetables.
(((6))) (11)(a) "Initiation of construction" means the date that a
building permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW
19.27.031 for:
(i) Construction of the qualified building, if the underlying
ownership of the building vests exclusively with the person receiving
the economic benefit of the deferral;
(ii) Construction of the qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (((4))) (9) of this section; or
(iii) Tenant improvements for a qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (((4))) (9) of this section.
(b) "Initiation of construction" does not include soil testing,
site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related
activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit
for the construction of the foundation of the building.
(c) If the investment project is a phased project, "initiation of
construction" applies separately to each phase.
(((7))) (12) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(((8))) (13) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new
structures, and expansion or renovation of existing structures for the
purpose of increasing floor space or production capacity used for fresh
fruit and vegetable processing, dairy product manufacturing, egg
handling, cold storage ((warehouse)) warehousing, and research and
development activities, including plant offices and warehouses or other
facilities for the storage of raw material or finished goods if such
facilities are an essential or an integral part of a factory, plant, or
laboratory used for fresh fruit and vegetable processing, dairy product
manufacturing, egg handling, cold storage warehousing, or research and
development. If a building is used partly for fresh fruit and
vegetable processing, dairy product manufacturing, egg handling, cold
storage warehousing, or research and development and partly for other
purposes, the applicable tax deferral shall be determined by
apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the
department.
(((9))) (14) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all
industrial and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities
that are an integral and necessary part of a fresh fruit and vegetable
processing, dairy product manufacturing, egg handling, cold storage
warehouse, or research and development operation. "Qualified machinery
and equipment" includes: Computers; software; data processing
equipment; laboratory equipment; manufacturing components such as
belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies;
operating structures; and all equipment used to control or operate the
machinery.
(((10))) (15) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral
under this chapter.
(((11))) (16) "Research and development" means the development,
refinement, testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product,
service, or process related to fresh fruit and vegetable processing,
dairy product manufacturing, egg handling, or cold storage warehousing
before commercial sales have begun. As used in this subsection,
"commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market
testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the product,
service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.74.030 and 2005 c 513 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a sales and use tax deferral
certificate for state and local sales and use taxes ((due)) imposed or
authorized under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on each eligible
investment project if the investment project is undertaken for the
purpose of fresh fruit and vegetable processing, dairy product
manufacturing, egg handling, cold storage warehousing, or research and
development.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.74.040 and 2005 c 513 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness
are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) Each recipient of a deferral granted under this chapter shall
complete an annual survey. If the economic benefits of the deferral
are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.74.010(((4))) (9), the
lessee shall complete the annual survey and the applicant is not
required to complete the annual survey. The survey is due by March
31st of the year following the calendar year in which the investment
project is certified by the department as having been operationally
complete and each of the seven succeeding calendar years. The
department may extend the due date for timely filing of annual surveys
under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590. The survey shall
include the amount of tax deferred. The survey shall also include the
following information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the deferral program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax deferral taken, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax deferral taken is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request.
(e) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(f) The department shall also use the information to study the tax
deferral program authorized under this chapter. The department shall
report to the legislature by December 1, 2011. The report shall
measure the effect of the program on job creation, ((the number of jobs
created for residents of eligible areas,)) company growth, the
introduction of new products, the diversification of the state's
economy, growth in research and development investment, the movement of
firms or the consolidation of firms' operations into the state, and
such other factors as the department selects.
(2)(a) If a recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual
survey required under subsection (1) of this section by the date due or
any extension under RCW 82.32.590, twelve and one-half percent of the
deferred tax shall be immediately due. If the economic benefits of the
deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.74.010(((4)))
(9), the lessee shall be responsible for payment to the extent the
lessee has received the economic benefit. The department shall assess
interest, but not penalties, on the amounts due under this section.
The interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent
taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, and shall accrue until the amounts due
are repaid.
(b) A recipient who must repay deferred taxes under RCW
82.74.050(2) because the department has found that an investment
project is used for purposes other than fresh fruit and vegetable
processing, dairy product manufacturing, egg handling, cold storage
warehousing, or research and development is no longer required to file
annual surveys under this section beginning on the date an investment
project is used for nonqualifying purposes.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.74.050 and 2005 c 513 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, taxes
deferred under this chapter need not be repaid.
(2) If, on the basis of survey under RCW 82.74.040 or other
information, the department finds that an investment project is used
for purposes other than fresh fruit and vegetable processing, dairy
product manufacturing, egg handling, cold storage warehousing, or
research and development at any time during the calendar year in which
the investment project is certified by the department as having been
operationally completed, or at any time during any of the seven
succeeding calendar years, a portion of deferred taxes shall be
immediately due according to the following schedule:

Year in which nonqualifying use occurs % of deferred taxes due

1 100%

2 87.5%

3 75%

4 62.5%

5 50%

6 37.5%

7 25%

8 12.5%

(3) The department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the
deferred taxes under subsection (2) of this section. The interest
shall be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent taxes under
chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date of deferral, and shall
accrue until the deferred taxes are repaid. The debt for deferred
taxes will not be extinguished by insolvency or other failure of the
recipient. Transfer of ownership does not terminate the deferral. The
deferral is transferred, subject to the successor meeting the
eligibility requirements of this chapter, for the remaining periods of
the deferral.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, deferred taxes
on the following need not be repaid:
(a) Machinery and equipment, and sales of or charges made for labor
and services, which at the time of purchase would have qualified for
exemption under RCW 82.08.02565; and
(b) Machinery and equipment which at the time of first use would
have qualified for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.08.820 and 1997 c 450 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
on:
(a) Material-handling and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment; or
(b) Construction of a warehouse or grain elevator, including
materials, and including service and labor costs,
are eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance. The amount
of the remittance is computed under subsection (3) of this section and
is based on the state share of sales tax.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.820:
(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.213;
(b) "Construction" means the actual construction of a warehouse or
grain elevator that did not exist before the construction began.
"Construction" includes expansion if the expansion adds at least two
hundred thousand square feet of additional space to an existing
warehouse or additional storage capacity of at least one million
bushels to an existing grain elevator. "Construction" does not include
renovation, remodeling, or repair;
(c) "Department" means the department of revenue;
(d) "Distribution center" means a warehouse that is used
exclusively by a retailer solely for the storage and distribution of
finished goods to retail outlets of the retailer. "Distribution
center" does not include a warehouse at which retail sales occur;
(e) "Finished goods" means tangible personal property intended for
sale by a retailer or wholesaler. "Finished goods" does not include
agricultural products stored by wholesalers, third-party warehouses, or
retailers if the storage takes place on the land of the person who
produced the agricultural product. "Finished goods" does not include
logs, minerals, petroleum, gas, or other extracted products stored as
raw materials or in bulk;
(f) "Grain elevator" means a structure used for storage and
handling of grain in bulk;
(g) "Material-handling equipment and racking equipment" means
equipment in a warehouse or grain elevator that is primarily used to
handle, store, organize, convey, package, or repackage finished goods.
The term includes tangible personal property with a useful life of one
year or more that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment,
including repair and replacement parts. The term does not include
equipment in offices, lunchrooms, restrooms, and other like space,
within a warehouse or grain elevator, or equipment used for
nonwarehousing purposes. "Material-handling equipment" includes but is
not limited to: Conveyers, carousels, lifts, positioners, pick-up-and-place units, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots; mechanized
systems, including containers that are an integral part of the system,
whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal property; and
automated handling, storage, and retrieval systems, including computers
that control them, whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal
property; and forklifts and other off-the-road vehicles that are used
to lift or move tangible personal property and that cannot be operated
legally on roads and streets. "Racking equipment" includes, but is not
limited to, conveying systems, chutes, shelves, racks, bins, drawers,
pallets, and other containers and storage devices that form a necessary
part of the storage system;
(h) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030;
(i) "Retailer" means a person who makes "sales at retail" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property;
(j) "Square footage" means the product of the two horizontal
dimensions of each floor of a specific warehouse. The entire footprint
of the warehouse shall be measured in calculating the square footage,
including space that juts out from the building profile such as loading
docks. "Square footage" does not mean the aggregate of the square
footage of more than one warehouse at a location or the aggregate of
the square footage of warehouses at more than one location;
(k) "Third-party warehouser" means a person taxable under RCW
82.04.280(4);
(l) "Warehouse" means an enclosed building or structure in which
finished goods are stored. A warehouse building or structure may have
more than one storage room and more than one floor. Office space,
lunchrooms, restrooms, and other space within the warehouse and
necessary for the operation of the warehouse are considered part of the
warehouse as are loading docks and other such space attached to the
building and used for handling of finished goods. Landscaping and
parking lots are not considered part of the warehouse. A storage yard
is not a warehouse, nor is a building in which manufacturing takes
place; and
(m) "Wholesaler" means a person who makes "sales at wholesale" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property, but
"wholesaler" does not include a person who makes sales exempt under RCW
82.04.330.
(3)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020. The buyer may then apply to the department for remittance
of all or part of the tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. For grain
elevators with bushel capacity of one million but less than two
million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred thousand or
more and for grain elevators with bushel capacity of two million or
more, the remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of
tax paid for qualifying construction, materials, service, and labor,
and fifty percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying material-
handling equipment and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment;
location and size of warehouses and grain elevators; and construction
invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications during the
previous quarter.
(4) Warehouses, grain elevators, and material-handling equipment
and racking equipment for which an exemption, credit, or deferral has
been or is being received under chapter 82.60, ((82.61,)) 82.62, or
82.63 RCW or RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not eligible for any
remittance under this section. Warehouses and grain elevators upon
which construction was initiated before May 20, 1997, are not eligible
for a remittance under this section.
(5) The lessor or owner of a warehouse or grain elevator is not
eligible for a remittance under this section unless the underlying
ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and the material-handling
equipment and racking equipment vests exclusively in the same person,
or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the remittance to the lessee in the form of reduced rent
payments.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.08.820 and 2005 c 513 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
on:
(a) Material-handling and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment; or
(b) Construction of a warehouse or grain elevator, including
materials, and including service and labor costs,
are eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance. The amount
of the remittance is computed under subsection (3) of this section and
is based on the state share of sales tax.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.820:
(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.213;
(b) "Cold storage warehouse" ((means a storage warehouse used to
store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables, or any
combination thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality
of the product for orderly marketing)) has the meaning provided in RCW
82.74.010;
(c) "Construction" means the actual construction of a warehouse or
grain elevator that did not exist before the construction began.
"Construction" includes expansion if the expansion adds at least
twenty-five thousand square feet of additional space to an existing
cold storage warehouse, at least two hundred thousand square feet of
additional space to an existing warehouse other than a cold storage
warehouse, or additional storage capacity of at least one million
bushels to an existing grain elevator. "Construction" does not include
renovation, remodeling, or repair;
(d) "Department" means the department of revenue;
(e) "Distribution center" means a warehouse that is used
exclusively by a retailer solely for the storage and distribution of
finished goods to retail outlets of the retailer. "Distribution
center" does not include a warehouse at which retail sales occur;
(f) "Finished goods" means tangible personal property intended for
sale by a retailer or wholesaler. "Finished goods" does not include
agricultural products stored by wholesalers, third-party warehouses, or
retailers if the storage takes place on the land of the person who
produced the agricultural product. "Finished goods" does not include
logs, minerals, petroleum, gas, or other extracted products stored as
raw materials or in bulk;
(g) "Grain elevator" means a structure used for storage and
handling of grain in bulk;
(h) "Material-handling equipment and racking equipment" means
equipment in a warehouse or grain elevator that is primarily used to
handle, store, organize, convey, package, or repackage finished goods.
The term includes tangible personal property with a useful life of one
year or more that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment,
including repair and replacement parts. The term does not include
equipment in offices, lunchrooms, restrooms, and other like space,
within a warehouse or grain elevator, or equipment used for
nonwarehousing purposes. "Material-handling equipment" includes but is
not limited to: Conveyers, carousels, lifts, positioners, pick-up-and-place units, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots; mechanized
systems, including containers that are an integral part of the system,
whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal property; and
automated handling, storage, and retrieval systems, including computers
that control them, whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal
property; and forklifts and other off-the-road vehicles that are used
to lift or move tangible personal property and that cannot be operated
legally on roads and streets. "Racking equipment" includes, but is not
limited to, conveying systems, chutes, shelves, racks, bins, drawers,
pallets, and other containers and storage devices that form a necessary
part of the storage system;
(i) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030;
(j) "Retailer" means a person who makes "sales at retail" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property;
(k) "Square footage" means the product of the two horizontal
dimensions of each floor of a specific warehouse. The entire footprint
of the warehouse shall be measured in calculating the square footage,
including space that juts out from the building profile such as loading
docks. "Square footage" does not mean the aggregate of the square
footage of more than one warehouse at a location or the aggregate of
the square footage of warehouses at more than one location;
(l) "Third-party warehouser" means a person taxable under RCW
82.04.280(4);
(m) "Warehouse" means an enclosed building or structure in which
finished goods are stored. A warehouse building or structure may have
more than one storage room and more than one floor. Office space,
lunchrooms, restrooms, and other space within the warehouse and
necessary for the operation of the warehouse are considered part of the
warehouse as are loading docks and other such space attached to the
building and used for handling of finished goods. Landscaping and
parking lots are not considered part of the warehouse. A storage yard
is not a warehouse, nor is a building in which manufacturing takes
place; and
(n) "Wholesaler" means a person who makes "sales at wholesale" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property, but
"wholesaler" does not include a person who makes sales exempt under RCW
82.04.330.
(3)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020. The buyer may then apply to the department for remittance
of all or part of the tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. For grain
elevators with bushel capacity of one million but less than two
million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred thousand or
more, other than cold storage warehouses, and for grain elevators with
bushel capacity of two million or more, the remittance is equal to one
hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying construction,
materials, service, and labor, and fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment,
and labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the equipment. For cold storage
warehouses with square footage of twenty-five thousand or more, the
remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid
for qualifying construction, materials, service, and labor, and one
hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment;
location and size of warehouses and grain elevators; and construction
invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications during the
previous quarter.
(4) Warehouses, grain elevators, and material-handling equipment
and racking equipment for which an exemption, credit, or deferral has
been or is being received under chapter 82.60, ((82.61,)) 82.62, or
82.63 RCW or RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not eligible for any
remittance under this section. Warehouses and grain elevators upon
which construction was initiated before May 20, 1997, are not eligible
for a remittance under this section.
(5) The lessor or owner of a warehouse or grain elevator is not
eligible for a remittance under this section unless the underlying
ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and the material-handling
equipment and racking equipment vests exclusively in the same person,
or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the remittance to the lessee in the form of reduced rent
payments.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.08.820 and 2005 c 513 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
on:
(a) Material-handling and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment; or
(b) Construction of a warehouse or grain elevator, including
materials, and including service and labor costs,
are eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance. The amount
of the remittance is computed under subsection (3) of this section and
is based on the state share of sales tax.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.820:
(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.213;
(b) (("Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse used to
store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables, or any
combination thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality
of the product for orderly marketing;
(c))) "Construction" means the actual construction of a warehouse
or grain elevator that did not exist before the construction began.
"Construction" includes expansion if the expansion adds ((at least
twenty-five thousand square feet of additional space to an existing
cold storage warehouse,)) at least two hundred thousand square feet of
additional space to an existing warehouse ((other than a cold storage
warehouse,)) or additional storage capacity of at least one million
bushels to an existing grain elevator. "Construction" does not include
renovation, remodeling, or repair;
(((d))) (c) "Department" means the department of revenue;
(((e))) (d) "Distribution center" means a warehouse that is used
exclusively by a retailer solely for the storage and distribution of
finished goods to retail outlets of the retailer. "Distribution
center" does not include a warehouse at which retail sales occur;
(((f))) (e) "Finished goods" means tangible personal property
intended for sale by a retailer or wholesaler. "Finished goods" does
not include agricultural products stored by wholesalers, third-party
warehouses, or retailers if the storage takes place on the land of the
person who produced the agricultural product. "Finished goods" does
not include logs, minerals, petroleum, gas, or other extracted products
stored as raw materials or in bulk;
(((g))) (f) "Grain elevator" means a structure used for storage and
handling of grain in bulk;
(((h))) (g) "Material-handling equipment and racking equipment"
means equipment in a warehouse or grain elevator that is primarily used
to handle, store, organize, convey, package, or repackage finished
goods. The term includes tangible personal property with a useful life
of one year or more that becomes an ingredient or component of the
equipment, including repair and replacement parts. The term does not
include equipment in offices, lunchrooms, restrooms, and other like
space, within a warehouse or grain elevator, or equipment used for
nonwarehousing purposes. "Material-handling equipment" includes but is
not limited to: Conveyers, carousels, lifts, positioners, pick-up-and-place units, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots; mechanized
systems, including containers that are an integral part of the system,
whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal property; and
automated handling, storage, and retrieval systems, including computers
that control them, whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal
property; and forklifts and other off-the-road vehicles that are used
to lift or move tangible personal property and that cannot be operated
legally on roads and streets. "Racking equipment" includes, but is not
limited to, conveying systems, chutes, shelves, racks, bins, drawers,
pallets, and other containers and storage devices that form a necessary
part of the storage system;
(((i))) (h) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030;
(((j))) (i) "Retailer" means a person who makes "sales at retail"
as defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property;
(((k))) (j) "Square footage" means the product of the two
horizontal dimensions of each floor of a specific warehouse. The
entire footprint of the warehouse shall be measured in calculating the
square footage, including space that juts out from the building profile
such as loading docks. "Square footage" does not mean the aggregate of
the square footage of more than one warehouse at a location or the
aggregate of the square footage of warehouses at more than one
location;
(((l))) (k) "Third-party warehouser" means a person taxable under
RCW 82.04.280(4);
(((m))) (l) "Warehouse" means an enclosed building or structure in
which finished goods are stored. A warehouse building or structure may
have more than one storage room and more than one floor. Office space,
lunchrooms, restrooms, and other space within the warehouse and
necessary for the operation of the warehouse are considered part of the
warehouse as are loading docks and other such space attached to the
building and used for handling of finished goods. Landscaping and
parking lots are not considered part of the warehouse. A storage yard
is not a warehouse, nor is a building in which manufacturing takes
place; and
(((n))) (m) "Wholesaler" means a person who makes "sales at
wholesale" as defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal
property, but "wholesaler" does not include a person who makes sales
exempt under RCW 82.04.330.
(3)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020. The buyer may then apply to the department for remittance
of all or part of the tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. For grain
elevators with bushel capacity of one million but less than two
million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred thousand or
more((, other than cold storage warehouses,)) and for grain elevators
with bushel capacity of two million or more, the remittance is equal to
one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying
construction, materials, service, and labor, and fifty percent of the
amount of tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and
racking equipment, and labor and services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the equipment.
((For cold storage warehouses with square footage of twenty-five
thousand or more, the remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the
amount of tax paid for qualifying construction, materials, service, and
labor, and one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying
material-handling equipment and racking equipment, and labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving the equipment.))
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment;
location and size of warehouses and grain elevators; and construction
invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications during the
previous quarter.
(4) Warehouses, grain elevators, and material-handling equipment
and racking equipment for which an exemption, credit, or deferral has
been or is being received under chapter 82.60, ((82.61,)) 82.62, or
82.63 RCW or RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not eligible for any
remittance under this section. Warehouses and grain elevators upon
which construction was initiated before May 20, 1997, are not eligible
for a remittance under this section.
(5) The lessor or owner of a warehouse or grain elevator is not
eligible for a remittance under this section unless the underlying
ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and the material-handling
equipment and racking equipment vests exclusively in the same person,
or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the remittance to the lessee in the form of reduced rent
payments.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.12.820 and 2005 c 513 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators, and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied under RCW
82.12.020 on:
(a) Material-handling equipment and racking equipment and labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving the equipment; or
(b) Materials incorporated in the construction of a warehouse or
grain elevator, are eligible for an exemption on tax paid in the form
of a remittance or credit against tax owed. The amount of the
remittance or credit is computed under subsection (2) of this section
and is based on the state share of use tax.
(2)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.12.020 to the department. The person may then apply to the
department for remittance of all or part of the tax paid under RCW
82.12.020. For grain elevators with bushel capacity of one million but
less than two million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the
amount of tax paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred
thousand or more((, other than cold storage warehouses,)) and for grain
elevators with bushel capacity of two million or more, the remittance
is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for
qualifying construction materials, and fifty percent of the amount of
tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking
equipment. ((For cold storage warehouses with square footage of
twenty-five thousand or more, the remittance is equal to one hundred
percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying construction,
materials, service, and labor, and one hundred percent of the amount of
tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking
equipment, and labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the equipment.))
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment;
location and size of warehouses, if applicable; and construction
invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit or credit
exempted amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications
during the previous quarter.
(3) Warehouse, grain elevators, and material-handling equipment and
racking equipment for which an exemption, credit, or deferral has been
or is being received under chapter 82.60, ((82.61,)) 82.62, or 82.63
RCW or RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not eligible for any
remittance under this section. Materials incorporated in warehouses
and grain elevators upon which construction was initiated prior to May
20, 1997, are not eligible for a remittance under this section.
(4) The lessor or owner of the warehouse or grain elevator is not
eligible for a remittance or credit under this section unless the
underlying ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and material-handling equipment and racking equipment vests exclusively in the same
person, or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the
economic benefit of the exemption to the lessee in the form of reduced
rent payments.
(5) The definitions in RCW 82.08.820 apply to this section.

Sec. 13 RCW 82.32.600 and 2005 c 514 s 1002 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Persons required to file surveys under RCW 82.04.4452,
82.32.610, or 82.74.040 must electronically file with the department
all surveys, returns, and any other forms or information the department
requires in an electronic format as provided or approved by the
department((, unless the department grants relief under subsection (2)
of this section)). As used in this section, "returns" has the same
meaning as "return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(2) ((Upon request, the department may relieve a person of the
obligations in subsection (1) of this section if the person's taxes
have been reduced a cumulative total of less than one thousand dollars
from all of the credits, exemptions, or preferential business and
occupation tax rates, for which a person is required to file an annual
survey under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.535, 82.32.545, 82.32.570,
82.32.560, 82.60.070, or 82.63.020.
(3) Persons who no longer qualify for relief under subsection (2)
of this section will be notified in writing by the department and must
comply with subsection (1) of this section by the date provided in the
notice.
(4))) Any survey, return, or any other form or information required
to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format.
(3) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
subsection (1) of this section for good cause shown.

Sec. 14 RCW 82.32.590 and 2005 c 514 s 1001 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.610, or 82.74.040 by the
due date was the result of circumstances beyond the control of the
taxpayer, the department shall extend the time for filing the survey.
Such extension shall be for a period of thirty days from the date the
department issues its written notification to the taxpayer that it
qualifies for an extension under this section. The department may
grant additional extensions as it deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey by the due date was the result of circumstances
beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department shall be guided by
rules adopted by the department for the waiver or cancellation of
penalties when the underpayment or untimely payment of any tax was due
to circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this
section, this act takes effect July 1, 2006.
(2) Sections 5 through 8 and 10 of this act take effect July 1,
2007.
(3) Sections 11 and 12 of this act take effect July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Section 9 of this act expires July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Section 10 of this act expires July 1,
2012.

--- END ---