BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.65.410 and 1993 c 340 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every diver engaged in the commercial harvest of geoduck clams
shall obtain a nontransferable geoduck diver license.
(2) After July 1, 2006, the director may not issue new geoduck
diver licenses. A person may renew an existing license only if the
person held a geoduck diver license in 2004 and held a geoduck diver
license for a minimum of five of the ten years from 1994 through 2003.
(3) The director must revoke a geoduck diver license issued after
January 1, 2006, that does not meet the criteria of subsections (1) and
(2) of this section.
(4) Geoduck diver licenses are not transferable. The license
holder must perform the actual harvesting.
(5) The director must revoke geoduck diver licenses that are not
renewed by December 31st of each year.
(6) A license may be reissued by the director if another license is
surrendered for any reason at any time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---