BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there are
factors unique to the relationship between a manufactured/mobile
homeowner and a manufactured/mobile home park owner. Once occupancy
has commenced, the difficulty and expense in moving and relocating a
manufactured/mobile home can affect the operation of market forces, and
lead to an inequality of the bargaining position of the parties. Once
occupancy has commenced, a homeowner may be subject to violations of
the manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act or unfair practices
without an adequate remedy at law. This chapter is created for the
purpose of protecting the public, fostering fair and honest
competition, and regulating the factors unique to the relationship
between the manufactured/mobile homeowner and park owner.
(2) The legislature finds that taking legal action against a park
owner for violations of the manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant
act can be a costly and lengthy process, and that many people cannot
afford to pursue a court process to vindicate statutory rights. Park
owners similarly are benefited by having access to a process that
resolves disputes quickly and efficiently.
(3) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to provide a
less costly and more efficient way for manufactured/mobile homeowners
and park owners to resolve disputes, and to provide a mechanism for
state authorities to quickly locate owners of manufactured housing
communities. The legislature further intends to authorize the
department of community, trade, and economic development to:
(a) Register mobile home parks or manufactured housing communities,
take complaints, conduct investigations, and administratively resolve
disputes, when there are violations of the manufactured/mobile home
landlord-tenant act;
(b) Maintain, update, and expand its current complaint program by
retaining the necessary staffing level of hired or contracted persons
used to operate and implement the program under chapter 429, Laws of
2005; and
(c) Collect data related to conflicts and violations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department.
(3) "Mobile home park" or "manufactured housing community" means
any real property that is rented or held out for rent to others for the
placement of two or more mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park
models for the primary purpose of production of income, except when the
real property is rented or held out for rent for seasonal recreational
purposes only and is not used for year-round occupancy.
(4) "Landlord" or "park owner" means the owner of a mobile home
park or a manufactured housing community, and includes the agents of
the landlord.
(5) "Tenant" or "homeowner" means any person, except a transient,
who rents or occupies a mobile home lot.
(6) "Mobile home lot" means a portion of a mobile home park or
manufactured housing community designated as the location of one mobile
home, manufactured home, or park model and its accessory buildings, and
intended for the exclusive use as a primary residence by the occupants
of that mobile home, manufactured home, or park model.
(7) "Recreational vehicle" means a travel trailer, motor home,
truck camper, or camping trailer that is primarily used as a primary
residence located in a mobile home park or manufactured housing
community.
(8) "Owner" means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in
whom is vested:
(a) All or part of the legal title to the real property; or
(b) All or part of the beneficial ownership, and a right to present
use and enjoyment of the real property.
(9) "Unfair practice" means any act that would constitute an unfair
or deceptive act or practice under chapter 19.86 RCW.
(10) "Complainant" means a landlord, park owner, tenant, or
homeowner, who has a complaint alleging an unfair practice or violation
of chapter 59.20 RCW.
(11) "Respondent" means a landlord, park owner, tenant, or
homeowner, alleged to have committed an unfair practice or violation of
chapter 59.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A complainant shall have the right to
file a complaint with the department alleging an unfair practice or a
violation of chapter 59.20 RCW.
(2) Upon receiving a complaint under this act, the department
must:
(a) If a statutory time period is applicable, inform the
complainant of the time frame to remedy the complaint under RCW
59.20.080 for tenant violations or RCW 59.20.200 for landlord
violations; and
(b) Encourage the complainant to notify the respondent of the
complaint.
(3) The department shall ensure that notice of the complaint
resolution program is given to each mobile/manufactured home landlord
or park owner and each mobile home unit owner or tenant. The landlord
shall post an easily visible notice in all common areas of
mobile/manufactured home communities, including in each clubhouse,
summarizing mobile home park tenant rights and responsibilities, in a
style and format to be determined by the department, and including
information on how to file a complaint with the office of manufactured
housing and a toll-free telephone number that mobile home park owners
and tenants can use to seek additional information and communicate
complaints.
(4) After receiving a complaint under this act, the department may
utilize alternative dispute resolution by the following:
(a) Investigate the alleged violations at its discretion upon
receipt of a complaint alleging unfair practices or violations of
chapter 59.20 RCW;
(b) Utilize investigative ombudsman staff or contractors to
investigate and evaluate complaints alleging unfair practices or
violations of chapter 59.20 RCW;
(c) Discuss the issues surrounding or relating to the complaint
with the complainant, respondent, or any witnesses, either individually
or jointly;
(d) Explain options available to the complainant or respondent,
including the involvement of other agencies; and
(e) Negotiate an agreement that is agreed upon by both the
complainant and the respondent.
(5) If after the investigation and alternative dispute resolution,
no agreement has been reached by the parties, the department may make
written findings, conclusions, decisions, or rulings on whether an
unfair practice or violation of chapter 59.20 RCW has occurred. In
that event, the department shall deliver a citation to the respondent
who committed the violation by certified mail or in person. The
citation must specify the violation, the corrective action to be taken,
the time within which the corrective action must be taken, the
penalties that will result if corrective action is not taken within the
specified time period, and the process for contesting the citation
through a hearing. The complainant shall also be mailed a copy of the
citation.
(6) If after an investigation the department does not find an
unfair practice or violation of chapter 59.20 RCW, the department shall
deliver a written notice of that decision, including any appeal rights,
to both the complainant and the respondent.
(7)(a) Complainants and respondents shall cooperate with the
department in the course of an investigation by:
(i) Furnishing any papers or documents requested;
(ii) Furnishing in writing an explanation covering the matter
contained in the complaint when requested by the department;
(iii) Allowing authorized access to department representatives for
inspection of mobile home parks/manufactured housing community
facilities relevant to the alleged violation being investigated; or
(iv) Responding to subpoenas issued by the department.
(b) Failure to cooperate with the department in the course of an
investigation is a violation of this chapter.
(8) Department decisions regarding citations for violations and
penalties or the failure to find an unfair practice or violation of
chapter 59.20 RCW may be contested through an administrative hearing
under chapter 34.05 RCW. The administrative law judge appointed under
chapter 34.12 RCW shall hear and receive pertinent evidence and
testimony. The administrative law judge shall decide whether the
evidence supports the violation by a preponderance of evidence. The
administrative law judge shall enter an appropriate order within thirty
days after the close of the hearing and immediately mail copies of the
order to the affected parties. The order of the administrative law
judge constitutes the final agency order of the department, and is
appealable to the superior court under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(9) In order to obtain a hearing, the complainant or respondent
must, within thirty days of receiving a citation or written notice from
the department denying the complaint, request a hearing. If a hearing
is not requested within this time period, the citation or written
notice constitutes a final order of the department and is not subject
to review by any court or agency.
(10) For violations that substantially endanger or impair the
health or safety of a complainant resulting in a citation, corrective
action by the respondent must take place within twenty-four hours of
the receipt of the department's citation. For violations involving the
failure of the landlord to provide heat, water, or electricity,
corrective action must take place within forty-eight hours of the
receipt of the department's citation. For all other violations,
corrective action must take place within fifteen days of the receipt of
the department's citation.
(11) If a respondent fails to take corrective action within the
required time period and the department has not received a timely
request for an administrative hearing, the department may impose a
fine, up to a maximum of one thousand dollars per violation, for every
day that the violation remains uncorrected. The department shall
establish written guidelines, adopted by rule, for issuing fines. The
department may consider aggravating or mitigating circumstances in
assessing any fine. The party to whom a fine has been assessed may
appeal the amount of the fine by requesting a hearing within thirty
days of receipt of the department's action. If a hearing is not
requested within this time period, the fine assessment constitutes a
final order of the department and is not subject to review by any court
or agency.
(12) The department may issue an order requiring the respondent, or
its assignee or agent, to cease and desist from an unfair or unlawful
practice and take such affirmative actions that in the judgment of the
department will carry out the purposes of this chapter. The
affirmative actions may include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) Refunds of rent increases, improper fees, charges, and
assessments collected in violation of the terms of this chapter;
(b) Filing and utilization of documents which correct a statutory
or rule violation; and
(c) Reasonable action necessary to correct a statutory or rule
violation.
(13) Upon application to the department by the respondent showing
that a good faith effort to comply with the corrective action
requirements of the citation has been made and that the corrective
action has not been completed because of factors beyond the
respondent's control, the department may extend the time period in
which corrective action must be taken before fines are imposed.
(14) When the department imposes a fine, refund, or other penalty
against the respondent, the respondent is not entitled to any recovery
or reimbursement of the fine, refund, or other penalty from the tenants
or homeowners.
(15) This section is not exclusive and does not limit the right of
landlords or tenants to take legal action against another party as
provided in chapter 59.20 RCW or otherwise. Exhaustion of this
administrative remedy is not required before bringing legal action.
This section does not apply to unlawful detainer actions initiated
under RCW 59.20.080; however, a tenant is not precluded from seeking
relief under this chapter if the complaint claims the notice of
termination violates RCW 59.20.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department must continually maintain and
update a data base, in which the following information is contained at
a minimum:
(1) The number and names of all mobile home parks and manufactured
communities, and their owners, in the state;
(2) The number of complaints received;
(3) The nature and extent of the complaints received;
(4) The violation of law or unfair practice complained of; and
(5) The complaint investigation outcomes for both alternative
dispute resolution and administrative action complaints.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The director or individuals acting on the
director's behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or
criminal, based upon any disciplinary actions or other official acts
performed in the course of their duties under this chapter, except
their intentional or willful misconduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) All mobile home parks and manufactured
housing communities must be registered with the department.
(2) To apply for registration, the owner of a mobile home park or
manufactured housing community must file with the department an
application for registration on a form prescribed by the department.
The application must include, but is not limited to:
(a) The name and address of the owner of the mobile home park or
manufactured housing community;
(b) The name and address of the mobile home park or manufactured
housing community;
(c) The name and address of the manager of the mobile home park or
manufactured housing community; and
(d) The number of lots within the mobile home park or manufactured
housing community that are subject to chapter 59.20 RCW.
(3) Certificates of registration are effective on the date issued
by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department must:
(1) Compile, update, and maintain the most accurate list possible
of all the mobile home parks or manufactured housing communities in the
state, the number of lots subject to chapter 59.20 RCW located in each
mobile home park or manufactured housing community, and the names and
addresses of the owners of these parks. The department is encouraged
to work with groups including, but not limited to: The office of
community development, mobile homeowners' associations, tenant advocacy
groups, park owners' associations, and county assessors to generate the
list;
(2) Send out notifications to all known mobile home park owners or
manufactured housing community owners that the registration assessments
under section 6 of this act which are due. These notifications must
include information about late fees, liens, and passing costs on to
tenants; and
(3) Collect the registration assessments due from all mobile home
park owners or manufactured housing community owners, and allow ninety
days to pass before sending notices of late fees to noncomplying owners
as provided in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The owner of each mobile home park or
manufactured housing community shall pay to the department a
registration assessment of five dollars for each mobile home or
manufactured home that is subject to chapter 59.20 RCW within a park or
community to fund the costs associated with administering this act.
Manufactured housing community owners or mobile home park owners may
pass on no more than two dollars and fifty cents of this assessment to
tenants.
(2) If an owner fails to pay the assessment before the registration
expiration date, a late fee shall be assessed, for each mobile home or
manufactured home that is subject to chapter 59.20 RCW. The owner is
not entitled to any reimbursement of this fee from the tenants.
(a) A late fee shall be assessed at fifty percent of the total
amount due for registration, if the fee is received by the department
more than thirty days, but less than sixty days after the registration
fee due date.
(b) A late fee shall be assessed at one hundred percent of the
total amount due for registration, if the fee is received by the
department more than sixty days late.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 All receipts from the imposition of fines,
assessments, and late fees collected under this act must be deposited
into the office of manufactured housing account under RCW 59.22.070.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the costs associated
with administering this chapter. Only the director or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) In order to provide general assistance
to mobile home resident organizations, park owners, and landlords and
tenants, the department shall establish an office of mobile home
affairs which will serve as the coordinating office within state
government for matters relating to mobile homes or manufactured
housing.
This office will provide a complaint resolution process to mobile
home park owners and mobile home tenants with respect to problems and
disputes between park owners and park residents and to provide
technical assistance to resident organizations or persons in the
process of forming a resident organization under chapter 59.22 RCW.
The office will keep records of its activities in this area.
(2) The office shall perform all the consumer complaint and related
functions of the state administrative agency that are required for
purposes of complying with this chapter and the regulations established
by the federal department of housing and urban development for
manufactured housing, including the preparation and submission of the
state administrative plan.
(3) The office shall administer the mobile home relocation
assistance program established in chapter 59.21 RCW, including
verifying the eligibility of tenants for relocation assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 34.12 RCW
to read as follows:
When requested by the department of licensing, the chief
administrative law judge shall assign an administrative law judge to
conduct proceedings under Title 59 RCW.

Sec. 12 RCW 59.22.070 and 1995 c 399 s 156 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created in the custody of the state treasurer a
special account known as the ((mobile home affairs)) office of
manufactured housing account.
Disbursements from this special account shall be as follows:
(((1))) (a) For the two-year period beginning July 1, 1988, forty
thousand dollars, or so much thereof as may be necessary for costs
incurred in registering landlords and collecting fees, and thereafter
five thousand dollars per year for that purpose.
(((2))) (b) All remaining amounts shall be remitted to the
department for the purpose of implementing RCW 59.22.050 ((and
59.22.060)).
(2) All funds collected by the department under sections 7 and 8 of
this act shall be transferred to the state treasurer for deposit into
the office of manufactured housing account.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used only for the costs
associated with administering this act. Only the director or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 59 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---