BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 50.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon termination, dissolution, or abandonment of a corporate or
limited liability company business, any officer, member, manager, or
other person having control or supervision over the payment of
unemployment tax contributions under RCW 50.24.010 or 50.24.014, or who
is charged with the responsibility for the filing of reports or the
payment of unemployment tax contributions or payments in lieu of
contributions is personally liable for any unpaid taxes and interest
and penalties on those taxes, if such officer or other person willfully
fails to pay or to cause to be paid any taxes due the department from
the corporation under this chapter.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, "willfully
fails to pay or to cause to be paid" means that the failure was the
result of an intentional, conscious, and voluntary course of action.
(3) The officer, member or manager, or other person, is liable only
for taxes due during the period he or she had the control, supervision,
responsibility, or duty to act for the corporation described in
subsection (1) of this section, plus interest and penalties on those
taxes.
(4) Persons liable under subsection (1) of this section are exempt
from liability in situations in which the nonpayment of unemployment
compensation taxes that were due was beyond their control as determined
by the employment security department by rule.
(5) Any person having been issued a notice of assessment under this
section is entitled to the appeal procedures under this title.
(6) This section applies only in situations where the employment
security department has determined that there is no reasonable means of
collecting the tax owed directly from the corporation.
(7) This section does not relieve the corporation or limited
liability company of other tax liabilities or otherwise impair other
tax collection remedies afforded by law.
(8) Collection authority and procedures described in this chapter
apply to collections under this section.
(9) In determining the amount of taxes due, and whether penalties
and interest should be imposed, the commissioner may take into
consideration any hardship factors, either personal or business-related, pertaining to the failure of the officer, member, manager, or
other person to pay the taxes owed.

--- END ---