BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that a state-certified entrepreneurial
and small business development online curriculum would increase access
to business proficiency skills and would promote small business
longevity for individuals interested in self-employment.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall:
(a) Contract for the development, distribution, and promotion of an
entrepreneurial and small business development online curriculum;
(b) Establish the curriculum course content in coordination with:
The state microenterprise association; the small business development
center; universities and community and technical colleges with small
business assistance programs; the work force training and education
coordinating board; and other public and private entrepreneurial and
small business assistance centers in the state;
(c) Complete the curriculum content as soon as possible, but no
later than December 31, 2006, and complete the online curriculum by no
later than June 30, 2007;
(d) Make the curriculum free of charge and available for use by
individuals and all public and private entrepreneurial development and
small business assistance centers throughout the state;
(e) Promote curriculum use by providing electronic and printed
informational materials on the curriculum to public and private
entrepreneurial development and small business assistance centers
throughout the state;
(f) Ensure curriculum accessibility by including in the curriculum
contract the use of web links to the curriculum on state public and
private web sites that small business owners and entrepreneurs use in
establishing and incorporating their businesses; and
(g) Complete online links to the curriculum on state public and
private web sites by December 31, 2007.
(3) The entrepreneurial and small business development curriculum
courses shall contain written assignments and progress standards that
allow participants to submit their work product and prove curriculum
completion to state agencies or private organizations for credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the department of
community, trade, and economic development to carry out the purposes of
section 1 of this act.

--- END ---