BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to a small business during any
twenty-four consecutive month period during the first sixty months of
operation of the business, subject to the requirements of this section.
(2) The person or persons owning a majority interest in the small
business must have participated in at least twenty-five hours of
entrepreneurial or small business training or counseling, and must have
applied this training or counseling to the small business.
(3)(a) For every small business engaged in activities which are
primarily within the purview of RCW 82.04.290(2), the gross income of
the business must not exceed sixty thousand dollars for any twelve
consecutive months during its first sixty months of operation.
(b) For every small business engaged in activities which are not
primarily within the purview of RCW 82.04.290(2), the gross income of
the business must not exceed one hundred twenty thousand dollars for
any twelve consecutive months during its first sixty months of
operation.
(4) For purposes of the exemption under this section, the small
business owner must seek approval of his or her entrepreneurial or
small business training from the Washington State University small
business development center, the employment security department, or the
work force training and education coordinating board. The small
business owner must provide proof of his or her completed training in
a form and manner determined by the department of revenue.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Entrepreneurial or small business training" means management
and technical assistance focused on entrepreneurial and small business
development, including but not limited to training, counseling,
research services, and on-line curriculums offered by agencies or
public or private community development and economic assistance
organizations.
(b) "Small business" means a business that: (i) Obtains or is
required to obtain a registration certificate under RCW 82.32.030 for
the first time; and (ii) has five or fewer employees. "Small business"
also includes a branch location or other facility established after the
effective date of this section by an entity doing business in this
state.
(c) "Small business" does not include:
(i) A business that has been restructured, reorganized, or
transferred, if the activities to be conducted after restructuring,
reorganization, or transferral are substantially similar to the
activities previously conducted; or
(ii) A business that is substantially similar to a business
currently operated, or operated within the past five years, by the same
principals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---