BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 50.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the establishment of a
self-employment assistance program would assist unemployed individuals
and create new businesses and job opportunities in Washington state.
The department shall inform individuals identified as likely to exhaust
regular unemployment benefits of the opportunity to enroll in
commissioner-approved self-employment assistance programs.
(2) An unemployed individual is eligible to participate in a
self-employment assistance program if it has been determined that he or
she:
(a) Is otherwise eligible for regular benefits as defined in RCW
50.22.010;
(b) Has been identified as likely to exhaust regular unemployment
benefits under a profiling system established by the commissioner as
defined in P.L. 103-152; and
(c) Is enrolled in a self-employment assistance program that is
approved by the commissioner, and includes entrepreneurial training,
business counseling, technical assistance, and requirements to engage
in activities relating to the establishment of a business and becoming
self-employed.
(3) Individuals participating in a self-employment assistance
program approved by the commissioner are eligible to receive their
regular unemployment benefits.
(a) The requirements of RCW 50.20.010 and 50.20.080 relating to
availability for work, active search for work, and refusal to accept
suitable work are not applicable to an individual in the
self-employment assistance program for the first fifty-two weeks of the
individual's participation in the program. However, enrollment in a
self-employment assistance program does not entitle the enrollee to any
benefit payments he or she would not be entitled to had he or she not
enrolled in the program.
(b) An individual who meets the requirements of this section is
considered to be "unemployed" under RCW 50.04.310 and 50.20.010.
(4) An individual who fails to participate in his or her approved
self-employment assistance program as prescribed by the commissioner is
disqualified from continuation in the program.
(5) The commissioner shall take all steps necessary in carrying out
this section to assure collaborative involvement of interested parties
in program development, and to ensure that the self-employment
assistance programs meet all federal criteria for withdrawal from the
unemployment fund. The commissioner may approve, as self-employment
assistance programs, existing self-employment training programs
available through community colleges, work force investment boards, or
other organizations and is not obligated by this section to expend any
departmental funds for the operation of self-employment assistance
programs, unless specific funding is provided to the department for
that purpose through federal or state appropriations.
(6) The commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
section.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.20.095 and 1980 c 74 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any individual registered at an established school in a course of
study providing scholastic instruction of twelve or more hours per
week, or the equivalent thereof, shall be disqualified from receiving
benefits or waiting period credit for any week during the school term
commencing with the first week of such scholastic instruction or the
week of leaving employment to return to school, whichever is the
earlier, and ending with the week immediately before the first full
week in which the individual is no longer registered for twelve or more
hours of scholastic instruction per week: PROVIDED, That registration
for less than twelve hours will be for a period of sixty days or
longer. The term "school" includes primary schools, secondary schools,
and "institutions of higher education" as that phrase is defined in RCW
50.44.037.
This disqualification shall not apply to any individual who:
(1) Is in approved training within the meaning of RCW 50.20.043;
((or))
(2) Is in an approved self-employment assistance program under
section 1 of this act; or
(3) Demonstrates to the commissioner by a preponderance of the
evidence his or her actual availability for work, and in arriving at
this determination the commissioner shall consider the following
factors:
(a) Prior work history;
(b) Scholastic history;
(c) Past and current labor market attachment; and
(d) Past and present efforts to seek work.

--- END ---