BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.303 and 2001 c 296 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
School districts, educational service districts, the state school
for the deaf, the state school for the blind, and their contractors
hiring employees ((who will have regularly scheduled unsupervised
access to children)), shall require a record check through the
Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW
43.43.830 through 43.43.834, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050 and through the
federal bureau of investigation before hiring an employee. The record
check shall include a fingerprint check ((using a complete Washington
state criminal identification fingerprint card)) through the Washington
state patrol. The requesting entity shall provide a copy of the record
report to the applicant. When necessary, applicants may be employed on
a conditional basis pending completion of the investigation. If the
applicant has had a record check within the previous two years, the
district, the state school for the deaf, the state school for the
blind, or contractor may waive the requirement. The district, pursuant
to chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW, the state school for the deaf, the state
school for the blind, or contractor hiring the employee shall determine
who shall pay costs associated with the record check.

--- END ---