BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.700 and 1998 c 141 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby established within the Washington state patrol a
section on identification((, child abuse, vulnerable adult abuse,)) and
criminal history hereafter referred to as the section.
In order to aid the administration of justice the section shall
install systems for the identification of individuals, including the
fingerprint system and such other systems as the chief deems necessary.
The section shall keep a complete record and index of all information
received in convenient form for consultation and comparison.
The section shall obtain from whatever source available and file
for record the fingerprints, palmprints, photographs, or such other
identification data as it deems necessary, of persons who have been or
shall hereafter be lawfully arrested and charged with, or convicted of
any criminal offense. The section may obtain like information
concerning persons arrested for or convicted of crimes under the laws
of another state or government.
((The section shall also contain like information concerning
persons, over the age of eighteen years, who have been found to have
physically abused or sexually abused or exploited a child pursuant to
a dependency proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW, or to have abused or
financially exploited a vulnerable adult pursuant to a protection
proceeding under chapter 74.34 RCW.))

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.705 and 1999 c 151 s 1101 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the receipt of identification data from criminal justice
agencies within this state, the section shall immediately cause the
files to be examined and upon request shall promptly return to the
contributor of such data a transcript of the record of previous arrests
and dispositions of the persons described in the data submitted.
Upon application, the section shall furnish to criminal justice
agencies((, or to the department of social and health services,
hereinafter referred to as the "department",)) a transcript of the
criminal ((offender)) history record information((, dependency record
information, or protection proceeding record information)) available
pertaining to any person of whom the section has a record.
For the purposes of RCW 43.43.700 through 43.43.785 the following
words and phrases shall have the following meanings:
"Criminal ((offender)) history record information" includes, and
shall be restricted to identifying data and ((public record))
information recorded as the result of an arrest or other initiation of
criminal proceedings and the consequent proceedings related thereto.
"Criminal ((offender)) history record information" shall not include
intelligence, analytical, or investigative reports and files.
"Criminal justice agencies" are those public agencies within or
outside the state which perform, as a principal function, activities
directly relating to the apprehension, prosecution, adjudication or
rehabilitation of criminal offenders.
(("Dependency record information" includes and shall be restricted
to identifying data regarding a person, over the age of eighteen, who
was a party to a dependency proceeding brought under chapter 13.34 RCW
and who has been found, pursuant to such dependency proceeding, to have
sexually abused or exploited or physically abused a child.
"Protection proceeding record information" includes and shall be
restricted to identifying data regarding a person, over eighteen, who
was a respondent to a protection proceeding brought under chapter 74.34
RCW and who has been found pursuant to such a proceeding to have abused
or financially exploited a vulnerable adult.))
The section may refuse to furnish any information pertaining to the
identification or history of any person or persons of whom it has a
record, or other information in its files and records, to any applicant
if the chief determines that the applicant has previously misused
information furnished to such applicant by the section or the chief
believes that the applicant will not use the information requested
solely for the purpose of due administration of the criminal laws or
for the purposes enumerated in RCW 43.43.760(((3))) (4). The applicant
may appeal such determination by notifying the chief in writing within
thirty days. The hearing shall be before an administrative law judge
appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW and in accordance with procedures for
adjudicative proceedings under chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.43.715 and 1989 c 334 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The section shall, consistent with the procedures set forth in
chapter 152, Laws of 1972 ex. sess., cooperate with all other criminal
justice agencies((, and the department,)) within or without the state,
in an exchange of information regarding convicted criminals and those
suspected of or wanted for the commission of crimes((, and persons who
are the subject of dependency record information or protection
proceeding record information,)) to the end that proper identification
may rapidly be made and the ends of justice served.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.43.725 and 1985 c 201 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any copy of a criminal ((offender)) history record, photograph,
fingerprint, or other paper or document in the files of the section,
((including dependency record information,)) certified by the chief or
his or her designee to be a true and complete copy of the original or
of information on file with the section, shall be admissible in
evidence in any court of this state pursuant to the provisions of RCW
5.44.040.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.43.730 and 1985 c 201 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any individual shall have the right to inspect criminal
((offender)) history record information((, or dependency record
information,)) on file with the section which refers to ((him)) the
individual. If ((an)) the individual believes such information to be
inaccurate or incomplete, he or she may request the section to purge,
modify or supplement it and to advise such persons or agencies who have
received his or her record and whom the individual designates to modify
it accordingly. Should the section decline to so act, or should the
individual believe the section's decision to be otherwise
unsatisfactory, the individual may appeal such decision to the superior
court in the county in which he or she is resident, or the county from
which the disputed record emanated or Thurston county. The court shall
in such case conduct a de novo hearing, and may order such relief as it
finds to be just and equitable.
(2) The section may prescribe reasonable hours and a place for
inspection, and may impose such additional restrictions, including
fingerprinting, as are reasonably necessary both to assure the record's
security and to verify the identities of those who seek to inspect
them: PROVIDED, That the section may charge a reasonable fee for
fingerprinting.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.43.735 and 1991 c 3 s 297 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the sheriff or director of public
safety of every county, and the chief of police of every city or town,
and of every chief officer of other law enforcement agencies duly
operating within this state, to cause the photographing and
fingerprinting of all adults and juveniles lawfully arrested for the
commission of any criminal offense constituting a felony or gross
misdemeanor. (a) When such juveniles are brought directly to a
juvenile detention facility, the juvenile court administrator is also
authorized, but not required, to cause the photographing,
fingerprinting, and record transmittal to the appropriate law
enforcement agency; and (b) a further exception may be made when the
arrest is for a violation punishable as a gross misdemeanor and the
arrested person is not taken into custody.
(2) It shall be the right, but not the duty, of the sheriff or
director of public safety of every county, and the chief of police of
every city or town, and every chief officer of other law enforcement
agencies operating within this state to photograph and record the
fingerprints of all adults lawfully arrested((, all persons who are the
subject of dependency record information, or all persons who are the
subject of protection proceeding record information)).
(3) Such sheriffs, directors of public safety, chiefs of police,
and other chief law enforcement officers, may record, in addition to
photographs and fingerprints, the palmprints, soleprints, toeprints, or
any other identification data of all persons whose photograph and
fingerprints are required or allowed to be taken under this section((,
all persons who are the subject of dependency record information, or
all persons who are the subject of protection proceeding record
information,)) when in the discretion of such law enforcement officers
it is necessary for proper identification of the arrested person or the
investigation of the crime with which he is charged.
(((4) It shall be the duty of the department of health or the court
having jurisdiction over the dependency action and protection
proceedings under chapter 74.34 RCW to cause the fingerprinting of all
persons who are the subject of a disciplinary board final decision,
dependency record information, protection proceeding record
information, or to obtain other necessary identifying information, as
specified by the section in rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW to
carry out the provisions of this subsection.
(5) The court having jurisdiction over the dependency or protection
proceeding action may obtain and record, in addition to fingerprints,
the photographs, palmprints, soleprints, toeprints, or any other
identification data of all persons who are the subject of dependency
record information or protection proceeding record information, when in
the discretion of the court it is necessary for proper identification
of the person.))

Sec. 7 RCW 43.43.740 and 1989 c 334 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the sheriff or director of public
safety of every county, and the chief of police of every city or town,
and of every chief officer of other law enforcement agencies duly
operating within this state to furnish within seventy-two hours from
the time of arrest to the section the required sets of fingerprints
together with other identifying data as may be prescribed by the chief,
of any person lawfully arrested, fingerprinted, and photographed
pursuant to RCW 43.43.735.
(2) Law enforcement agencies may retain and file copies of the
fingerprints, photographs, and other identifying data and information
obtained pursuant to RCW 43.43.735. Said records shall remain in the
possession of the law enforcement agency as part of the identification
record and are not returnable to the subjects thereof.
(((3) It shall be the duty of the court having jurisdiction over
the dependency action to furnish dependency record information,
obtained pursuant to RCW 43.43.735, to the section within seven days,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, from the date that the
court enters a finding, pursuant to a dependency action brought under
chapter 13.34 RCW, that a person over the age of eighteen, who is a
party to the dependency action, has sexually abused or exploited or
physically abused a child.
(4) The court having jurisdiction over the dependency or protection
proceeding action may retain and file copies of the fingerprints,
photographs, and other identifying data and information obtained
pursuant to RCW 43.43.735. These records shall remain in the
possession of the court as part of the identification record and are
not returnable to the subjects thereof.
(5) It shall be the duty of a court having jurisdiction over the
protection proceeding to furnish protection proceeding record
information, obtained under RCW 43.43.735 to the section within seven
days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, from the date that
the court enters a final order pursuant to a protection proceeding
brought under chapter 74.34 RCW, that a person over the age of
eighteen, who is the respondent to the protection proceeding, has
abused or financially exploited a vulnerable adult as that term is
defined in RCW 43.43.830.
(6) The section shall administer periodic compliance audits for the
department of licensing and each court having jurisdiction over
dependency and protection proceeding actions as defined in chapters
13.34 and 74.34 RCW, respectively. Such audits shall ensure that all
dependency record information regarding persons over the age of
eighteen years has been furnished to the section as required in
subsection (3) of this section.))

Sec. 8 RCW 43.43.810 and 1977 ex.s. c 314 s 17 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any person who willfully requests, obtains or seeks to obtain
criminal ((offender)) history record information under false pretenses,
or who willfully communicates or seeks to communicate criminal
((offender)) history record information to any agency or person except
in accordance with chapter 152, Laws of 1972 ex. sess., or any member,
officer, employee or agent of the section, the council or any
participating agency, who willfully falsifies criminal ((offender))
history record information, or any records relating thereto, shall for
each such offense be guilty of a misdemeanor.

--- END ---