BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.26.048 and 1996 c 226 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid
to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust or
organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation
duly executed and filed with the department. If there be no such
designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's
death, such member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's
surviving spouse as if in fact such spouse had been nominated by
written designation, or if there be no such surviving spouse, then to
such member's legal representatives.
(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only ((where))
when death occurs: (a) As a result of injuries sustained in the course
of employment; or (b) to a member of plan 2 as a result of an
occupational disease or infection as arises naturally and proximately
out of employment covered in this chapter. The determination of
eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW
by the department of labor and industries. The department of labor and
industries shall notify the department of retirement systems by order
under RCW 51.52.050.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2006, and every year thereafter, the
department shall adjust the amount of the benefit for plan 2 members
annually for inflation as provided in RCW 41.26.440.

--- END ---