BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.165 and 1999 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state department of transportation and the local authorities
are authorized to reserve all or any portion of any highway under their
respective jurisdictions, including any designated lane or ramp, for
the exclusive or preferential use of public transportation vehicles or
private motor vehicles carrying no fewer than a specified number of
passengers when such limitation will increase the efficient utilization
of the highway or will aid in the conservation of energy resources.
Motor vehicles towing trailers are prohibited from using high-occupancy
vehicle lanes on public highways designated under this section,
regardless of the number of occupants in the vehicle. Regulations
authorizing such exclusive or preferential use of a highway facility
may be declared to be effective at all times or at specified times of
day or on specified days. Violation of a restriction of highway usage
prescribed by the appropriate authority under this section is a traffic
infraction.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.100 and 1997 c 253 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon all roadways of sufficient width a vehicle shall be driven
upon the right half of the roadway, except as follows:
(a) When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the
same direction under the rules governing such movement;
(b) When an obstruction exists making it necessary to drive to the
left of the center of the highway; provided, any person so doing shall
yield the right of way to all vehicles traveling in the proper
direction upon the unobstructed portion of the highway within such
distance as to constitute an immediate hazard;
(c) Upon a roadway divided into three marked lanes and providing
for two-way movement traffic under the rules applicable thereon; or
(d) Upon a street or highway restricted to one-way traffic.
(2) Upon all roadways having two or more lanes for traffic moving
in the same direction, all vehicles shall be driven in the right-hand
lane then available for traffic, except (a) when overtaking and passing
another vehicle proceeding in the same direction, (b) when traveling at
a speed greater than the traffic flow, (c) when moving left to allow
traffic to merge, or (d) when preparing for a left turn at an
intersection, exit, or into a private road or driveway when such left
turn is legally permitted. On any such roadway, a vehicle or
combination over ten thousand pounds shall be driven only in the right-hand lane except under the conditions enumerated in (a) through (d) of
this subsection.
(3) No vehicle towing a trailer ((or)) and no vehicle or
combination over ten thousand pounds may be driven in the left-hand
lane of a limited access roadway having three or more lanes for traffic
moving in one direction except when preparing for a left turn at an
intersection, exit, or into a private road or driveway when a left turn
is legally permitted. This subsection does not apply to a vehicle or
combination over ten thousand pounds using a high-occupancy vehicle
lane. A high-occupancy vehicle lane is not considered the left-hand
lane of a roadway for vehicles or combinations over ten thousand
pounds. The department of transportation, in consultation with the
Washington state patrol, shall adopt rules specifying (a) those
circumstances where it is permissible for other vehicles to use the
left lane in case of emergency or to facilitate the orderly flow of
traffic, and (b) those segments of limited access roadway to be exempt
from this subsection due to the operational characteristics of the
roadway.
(4) It is a traffic infraction to drive continuously in the left
lane of a multilane roadway when it impedes the flow of other traffic.
(5) Upon any roadway having four or more lanes for moving traffic
and providing for two-way movement of traffic, a vehicle shall not be
driven to the left of the center line of the roadway except when
authorized by official traffic control devices designating certain
lanes to the left side of the center of the roadway for use by traffic
not otherwise permitted to use such lanes, or except as permitted under
subsection (1)(b) of this section. However, this subsection shall not
be construed as prohibiting the crossing of the center line in making
a left turn into or from an alley, private road or driveway.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.52.025 and 1974 ex.s. c 133 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Highway authorities of the state, counties, and incorporated cities
and towns, in addition to the specific powers granted in this chapter,
shall also have, and may exercise, relative to limited access
facilities, any and all additional authority, now or hereafter vested
in them relative to highways or streets within their respective
jurisdictions, and may regulate, restrict, or prohibit the use of such
limited access facilities by various classes of vehicles or traffic.
Such highway authorities may reserve any limited access facility or
portions thereof, including designated lanes or ramps for the exclusive
or preferential use of public transportation vehicles, privately owned
buses, or private motor vehicles carrying not less than a specified
number of passengers when such limitation will increase the efficient
utilization of the highway facility or will aid in the conservation of
energy resources. Motor vehicles towing trailers are prohibited from
using high-occupancy vehicle lanes on public highways designated under
this section, regardless of the number of occupants in the vehicle.
Regulations authorizing such exclusive or preferential use of a highway
facility may be declared to be effective at all time or at specified
times of day or on specified days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"High-occupancy vehicle" means a public transportation vehicle or
a private motor vehicle carrying no fewer than a specified number of
passengers as designated under RCW 46.61.165 and 47.52.025. A motor
vehicle towing a trailer, regardless of the number of occupants in the
vehicle, is not considered a high-occupancy vehicle.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.04.010 and 2003 c 244 s 2 and 2003 c 141 s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following words and phrases, wherever used in this title, shall
have the meaning as in this section ascribed to them, unless where used
the context thereof shall clearly indicate to the contrary or unless
otherwise defined in the chapter of which they are a part:
(1) "Alley." A highway within the ordinary meaning of alley not
designated for general travel and primarily used as a means of access
to the rear of residences and business establishments;
(2) "Arterial highway." Every highway, as herein defined, or
portion thereof designated as such by proper authority;
(3) "Business district." The territory contiguous to and including
a highway, as herein defined, when within any six hundred feet along
such highway there are buildings in use for business or industrial
purposes, including but not limited to hotels, banks, or office
buildings, railroad stations, and public buildings which occupy at
least three hundred feet of frontage on one side or three hundred feet
collectively on both sides of the highway;
(4) "Center line." The line, marked or unmarked parallel to and
equidistant from the sides of a two-way traffic roadway of a highway
except where otherwise indicated by painted lines or markers;
(5) "Center of intersection." The point of intersection of the
center lines of the roadways of intersecting highways;
(6) "City street." Every highway as herein defined, or part
thereof located within the limits of incorporated cities and towns,
except alleys;
(7) "Combination of vehicles." Every combination of motor vehicle
and motor vehicle, motor vehicle and trailer, or motor vehicle and
semitrailer;
(8) "Commercial vehicle." Any vehicle the principal use of which
is the transportation of commodities, merchandise, produce, freight,
animals, or passengers for hire;
(9) "County road." Every highway as herein defined, or part
thereof, outside the limits of incorporated cities and towns and which
has not been designated as a state highway, or branch thereof;
(10) "Crosswalk." The portion of the roadway between the
intersection area and a prolongation or connection of the farthest
sidewalk line or in the event there are no sidewalks then between the
intersection area and a line ten feet therefrom, except as modified by
a marked crosswalk;
(11) "High-occupancy vehicle." A public transportation vehicle or
a private motor vehicle carrying no fewer than a specified number of
passengers as designated under RCW 46.61.165 and 47.52.025. A motor
vehicle towing a trailer, regardless of the number of occupants in the
vehicle, is not considered a high-occupancy vehicle;
(12) "Highway." Every way, lane, road, street, boulevard, and
every way or place in the state of Washington open as a matter of right
to public vehicular travel both inside and outside the limits of
incorporated cities and towns;
(((12))) (13) "Intersection area." (a) The area embraced within
the prolongation or connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none,
then the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two or more highways
which join one another at, or approximately at, right angles, or the
area within which vehicles traveling upon different highways joining at
any other angle may come in conflict;
(b) Where a highway includes two roadways thirty feet or more
apart, then every crossing of each roadway of such divided highway by
an intersecting highway shall be regarded as a separate intersection.
In the event such intersecting highway also includes two roadways
thirty feet or more apart, then every crossing of two roadways of such
highways shall be regarded as a separate intersection;
(c) The junction of an alley with a street or highway shall not
constitute an intersection;
(((13))) (14) "Intersection control area." The intersection area
as herein defined, together with such modification of the adjacent
roadway area as results from the arc or curb corners and together with
any marked or unmarked crosswalks adjacent to the intersection;
(((14))) (15) "Laned highway." A highway the roadway of which is
divided into clearly marked lanes for vehicular traffic;
(((15))) (16) "Local authorities." Every county, municipal, or
other local public board or body having authority to adopt local police
regulations under the Constitution and laws of this state;
(((16))) (17) "Marked crosswalk." Any portion of a roadway
distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings
on the surface thereof;
(((17))) (18) "Metal tire." Every tire, the bearing surface of
which in contact with the highway is wholly or partly of metal or other
hard, nonresilient material;
(((18))) (19) "Motor truck." Any motor vehicle, as herein defined,
designed or used for the transportation of commodities, merchandise,
produce, freight, or animals;
(((19))) (20) "Motor vehicle." Every vehicle, as herein defined,
which is in itself a self-propelled unit;
(((20))) (21) "Multiple lane highway." Any highway the roadway of
which is of sufficient width to reasonably accommodate two or more
separate lanes of vehicular traffic in the same direction, each lane of
which shall be not less than the maximum legal vehicle width, and
whether or not such lanes are marked;
(((21))) (22) "Operator." Every person who drives or is in actual
physical control of a vehicle as herein defined;
(((22))) (23) "Peace officer." Any officer authorized by law to
execute criminal process or to make arrests for the violation of the
statutes generally or of any particular statute or statutes relative to
the highways of this state;
(((23))) (24) "Pedestrian." Any person afoot or who is using a
wheelchair, power wheelchair as defined in RCW 46.04.415, or a means of
conveyance propelled by human power other than a bicycle;
(((24))) (25) "Person." Every natural person, firm, copartnership,
corporation, association, or organization;
(((25))) (26) "Personal wireless service." Any federally licensed
personal wireless service;
(((26))) (27) "Personal wireless service facilities." Unstaffed
facilities that are used for the transmission or reception, or both, of
personal wireless services including, but not necessarily limited to,
antenna arrays, transmission cables, equipment shelters, and support
structures;
(((27))) (28) "Pneumatic tires." Every tire of rubber or other
resilient material designed to be inflated with compressed air to
support the load thereon;
(((28))) (29) "Private road or driveway." Every way or place in
private ownership and used for travel of vehicles by the owner or those
having express or implied permission from the owner, but not by other
persons;
(((29))) (30) "Railroad." A carrier of persons or property upon
vehicles, other than street cars, operated upon stationary rails, the
route of which is principally outside incorporated cities and towns;
(((30))) (31) "Railroad sign or signal." Any sign, signal, or
device erected by authority of a public body or official or by a
railroad and intended to give notice of the presence of railroad tracks
or the approach of a railroad train;
(((31))) (32) "Residence district." The territory contiguous to
and including the highway, as herein defined, not comprising a business
district, as herein defined, when the property on such highway for a
continuous distance of three hundred feet or more on either side
thereof is in the main improved with residences or residences and
buildings in use for business;
(((32))) (33) "Roadway." The paved, improved, or proper driving
portion of a highway designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel;
(((33))) (34) "Safety zone." The area or space officially set
apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and which
is protected or is marked or indicated by painted marks, signs,
buttons, standards, or otherwise so as to be plainly discernible;
(((34))) (35) "Sidewalk." That property between the curb lines or
the lateral lines of a roadway, as herein defined, and the adjacent
property, set aside and intended for the use of pedestrians or such
portion of private property parallel and in proximity to a highway and
dedicated to use by pedestrians;
(((35))) (36) "Solid tire." Every tire of rubber or other
resilient material which does not depend upon inflation with compressed
air for the support of the load thereon;
(((36))) (37) "State highway." Every highway as herein defined, or
part thereof, which has been designated as a state highway, or branch
thereof, by legislative enactment;
(((37))) (38) "Street car." A vehicle other than a train, as
herein defined, for the transporting of persons or property and
operated upon stationary rails principally within incorporated cities
and towns;
(((38))) (39) "Traffic." Pedestrians, ridden or herded animals,
vehicles, street cars, and other conveyances either singly or together
while using any highways for purposes of travel;
(((39))) (40) "Traffic control signal." Any traffic device, as
herein defined, whether manually, electrically, or mechanically
operated, by which traffic alternately is directed to stop or proceed
or otherwise controlled;
(((40))) (41) "Traffic devices." All signs, signals, markings, and
devices not inconsistent with this title placed or erected by authority
of a public body or official having jurisdiction, for the purpose of
regulating, warning, or guiding traffic;
(((41))) (42) "Train." A vehicle propelled by steam, electricity,
or other motive power with or without cars coupled thereto, operated
upon stationary rails, except street cars;
(((42))) (43) "Vehicle." Every device capable of being moved upon
a highway and in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may be
transported or drawn upon a highway, excepting power wheelchairs, as
defined in RCW 46.04.415, or devices moved by human or animal power or
used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.
Words and phrases used herein in the past, present, or future tense
shall include the past, present, and future tenses; words and phrases
used herein in the masculine, feminine, or neuter gender shall include
the masculine, feminine, and neuter genders; and words and phrases used
herein in the singular or plural shall include the singular and plural;
unless the context thereof shall indicate to the contrary.

--- END ---