BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each insurer engaged in writing automobile policies shall, on
or before April 15th of each year, pay to the state treasurer through
the commissioner's office a transportation enforcement fee. The fee
shall be one dollar per vehicle and must be included in the premiums
for all motor vehicle insurance policies. Two-thirds of the money
shall be deposited into the state patrol highway account created in RCW
46.68.030 to be used for additional emphasis patrols in
high-accident-corridor locations on state routes; and the remainder
shall be deposited into the highway safety fund created in RCW
46.68.060 to be used to create a county road high-accident-corridor
emphasis patrol program. The program shall be administered by the
Washington state traffic safety commission. County law enforcement may
apply to the commission for emphasis patrols on specific
high-accident-corridors within their county. The commission shall
determine what criteria to use in awarding these emphasis patrols. The
emphasis patrols shall be performed by the Washington state patrol at
no cost to the county. For purposes of this section,
high-accident-corridor means a highway corridor of one mile or more
where a five-year analysis of collision history indicates that the
section has higher than average collision and severity factors.
(2) The commissioner shall annually, on or before April 1st,
calculate and bill each organization for the amount of the fee. Fees
shall be due and payable no later than April 15th of each year. The
penalties for failure to pay fees when due shall be the same as the
penalties for failure to pay taxes pursuant to RCW 48.14.060. The fees
required by this section are in addition to all other taxes and fees
now imposed or that may be subsequently imposed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2006.

--- END ---