BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of ecology, in coordination with the department
of health, shall adopt rules as necessary to carry out the provisions
of this chapter in accordance with the public policy for reclaimed
water use as declared in RCW 90.46.005.
(2) The department of health shall, in coordination with the
department of ecology, adopt rules for reclaimed water use specific to
greywater applications consistent with this chapter.
(3) Rules required by this section must be adopted by December 31,
2009.
(4) The department of ecology must consult with the advisory
committee created in RCW 90.46.050 in all aspects of rule development
and adoption under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.46.005 and 2001 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that by encouraging the use of reclaimed
water while assuring the health and safety of all Washington citizens
and the protection of its environment, the state of Washington will
continue to use water in the best interests of present and future
generations.
To facilitate the use of reclaimed water as soon as is practicable,
the legislature encourages the cooperative efforts of the public and
private sectors ((and the use of pilot projects)) to effectuate the
goals of this chapter. The legislature further directs the department
of health and the department of ecology to coordinate efforts towards
developing an efficient and streamlined process for creating and
implementing processes for the use of reclaimed water.
It is hereby declared that the people of the state of Washington
have a primary interest in the development of facilities to provide
reclaimed water to replace potable water in nonpotable applications, to
supplement existing surface and ground water supplies, and to assist in
meeting the future water requirements of the state.
The legislature further finds and declares that the utilization of
reclaimed water by local communities for domestic, agricultural,
industrial, recreational, and fish and wildlife habitat creation and
enhancement purposes, including wetland enhancement, will contribute to
the peace, health, safety, and welfare of the people of the state of
Washington. To the extent reclaimed water is appropriate for
beneficial uses, it should be so used to preserve potable water for
drinking purposes. Use of reclaimed water constitutes the development
of new basic water supplies needed for future generations.
The legislature further finds and declares that the use of
reclaimed water is not inconsistent with the policy of antidegradation
of state waters announced in other state statutes, including the water
pollution control act, chapter 90.48 RCW and the water resources act,
chapter 90.54 RCW.
The legislature finds that other states, including California,
Florida, and Arizona, have successfully used reclaimed water to
supplement existing water supplies without threatening existing
resources or public health.
It is the intent of the legislature that the department of ecology
and the department of health undertake the necessary steps to encourage
the development of water reclamation facilities so that reclaimed water
may be made available to help meet the growing water requirements of
the state.
The legislature further finds and declares that reclaimed water
facilities are water pollution control facilities as defined in chapter
70.146 RCW and are eligible for financial assistance as provided in
chapter 70.146 RCW. ((The legislature finds that funding demonstration
projects will ensure the future use of reclaimed water. The
demonstration projects in RCW 90.46.110 are varied in nature and will
provide the experience necessary to test different facets of the
standards and refine a variety of technologies so that water purveyors
can begin to use reclaimed water technology in a more cost-effective
manner. This is especially critical in smaller cities and communities
where the feasibility for such projects is great, but there are scarce
resources to develop the necessary facilities.))
The legislature further finds that the agricultural processing
industry can play a critical and beneficial role in promoting the
efficient use of water by having the opportunity to develop and reuse
agricultural industrial process water from food processing.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.46.010 and 2002 c 329 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Greywater" means wastewater having the consistency and
strength of residential domestic type wastewater. Greywater includes
wastewater from sinks, showers, and laundry fixtures, but does not
include toilet or urinal waters.
(2) "Land application" means ((application of treated effluent for
purposes of)) use of reclaimed water as permitted under this chapter
for irrigation or landscape enhancement ((for residential, business,
and governmental purposes)).
(3) "Person" means any state, individual, public or private
corporation, political subdivision, governmental subdivision,
governmental agency, municipality, copartnership, association, firm,
trust estate, or any other legal entity whatever.
(4) "Reclaimed water" means effluent derived in any part from
sewage from a wastewater treatment system that has been adequately and
reliably treated, so that as a result of that treatment, it is suitable
for a beneficial use or a controlled use that would not otherwise occur
and is no longer considered wastewater.
(5) "Sewage" means water-carried human wastes from residences,
buildings, industrial and commercial establishments, or other places,
together with such ground water infiltration, surface waters, or
industrial wastewater as may be present.
(6) "User" means any person who uses reclaimed water.
(7) "Wastewater" means water and wastes discharged from homes,
businesses, and industry to the sewer system.
(8) "Beneficial use" means the use of reclaimed water, that has
been transported from the point of production to the point of use
without an intervening discharge to the waters of the state, for a
beneficial purpose.
(9) "Direct recharge" means the controlled subsurface addition of
water directly to the ground water basin that results in the
replenishment of ground water.
(10) "Ground water recharge criteria" means the contaminant
criteria found in the drinking water quality standards adopted by the
state board of health pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW and the department
of health pursuant to chapter 70.119A RCW.
(11) "Planned ground water recharge project" means any reclaimed
water project designed for the purpose of recharging ground water, via
direct recharge or surface percolation.
(12) "Reclamation criteria" means the criteria set forth in the
water reclamation and reuse interim standards and subsequent revisions
adopted by the department of ecology and the department of health.
(13) "Streamflow augmentation" means the discharge of reclaimed
water to rivers and streams of the state or other surface water bodies,
but not wetlands.
(14) "Surface percolation" means the controlled application of
water to the ground surface for the purpose of replenishing ground
water.
(15) "Wetland or wetlands" means areas that are inundated or
saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and duration
sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support,
a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted to life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and
similar areas. Wetlands regulated under this chapter shall be
delineated in accordance with the manual adopted by the department of
ecology pursuant to RCW 90.58.380.
(16) "Constructed beneficial use wetlands" means those wetlands
intentionally constructed on nonwetland sites to produce or replace
natural wetland functions and values. Constructed beneficial use
wetlands are considered "waters of the state."
(17) "Constructed treatment wetlands" means those wetlands
intentionally constructed on nonwetland sites and managed for the
primary purpose of wastewater or storm water treatment. Constructed
treatment wetlands are considered part of the collection and treatment
system and are not considered "waters of the state."
(18) "Agricultural industrial process water" means water that has
been used for the purpose of agricultural processing and has been
adequately and reliably treated, so that as a result of that treatment,
it is suitable for other agricultural water use.
(19) "Agricultural processing" means the processing of crops or
milk to produce a product primarily for wholesale or retail sale for
human or animal consumption, including but not limited to potato,
fruit, vegetable, and grain processing.
(20) "Agricultural water use" means the use of water for irrigation
and other uses related to the production of agricultural products.
These uses include, but are not limited to, construction, operation,
and maintenance of agricultural facilities and livestock operations at
farms, ranches, dairies, and nurseries. Examples of these uses
include, but are not limited to, dust control, temperature control, and
fire control.
(21) "Industrial reuse water" means water that has been used for
the purpose of industrial processing and has been adequately and
reliably treated so that, as a result of that treatment, it is suitable
for other uses.
(22) "Constructed wetlands" means those wetlands intentionally
constructed on nonwetland sites and managed for the primary purpose of
polishing reclaimed water or aesthetics. Constructed wetlands are not
considered "waters of the state."
(23) "Created wetlands" means those wetlands intentionally
constructed on nonwetland sites to produce or replace natural wetland
functions and values. Created wetlands are considered "waters of the
state."

Sec. 4 RCW 90.46.030 and 2005 c 59 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of health shall, in coordination with the
department of ecology, adopt a single set of standards, procedures, and
guidelines on or before August 1, 1993, for the industrial and
commercial use of reclaimed water. These standards apply only until
the department of ecology adopts rules, in accordance with section 1 of
this act, regarding the industrial and commercial use of reclaimed
water.
(2) The department of health may issue a reclaimed water permit for
industrial and commercial uses of reclaimed water to the generator of
reclaimed water who may then distribute the water, subject to
provisions in the permit governing the location, rate, water quality,
and purposes of use.
(3) The department of health in consultation with the advisory
committee established in RCW 90.46.050, shall develop recommendations
for a fee structure for permits issued under subsection (2) of this
section. Fees shall be established in amounts to fully recover, and
not exceed, expenses incurred by the department of health in processing
permit applications and modifications, monitoring and evaluating
compliance with permits, and conducting inspections and supporting the
reasonable overhead expenses that are directly related to these
activities. Permit fees may not be used for research or enforcement
activities. The department of health shall not issue permits under
this section until a fee structure has been established.
(4) A permit under this section for use of reclaimed water may be
issued only to:
(a) A municipal, quasi-municipal, or other governmental entity;
(b) A private utility as defined in RCW 36.94.010; or
(c) The holder of a waste discharge permit issued under chapter
90.48 RCW.
(5) The authority and duties created in this section are in
addition to any authority and duties already provided in law with
regard to sewage and wastewater collection, treatment, and disposal for
the protection of health and safety of the state's waters. Nothing in
this section limits the powers of the state or any political
subdivision to exercise such authority.
(6) The department of health may implement the requirements of this
section through the department of ecology by execution of a formal
agreement between the departments. Upon execution of such an
agreement, the department of ecology may issue reclaimed water permits
for industrial and commercial uses of reclaimed water by issuance of
permits under chapter 90.48 RCW, and may establish and collect fees as
required for permits issued under chapter 90.48 RCW.
(7) Before deciding whether to issue a permit under this section to
a private utility, the department of health may require information
that is reasonable and necessary to determine whether the private
utility has the financial and other resources to assure the
reliability, continuity, and supervision of the reclaimed water
facility. Permits issued after the adoption of rules under section 1
of this act must be consistent with the adopted rules.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.46.040 and 2005 c 59 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of ecology shall, in coordination with the
department of health, adopt a single set of standards, procedures, and
guidelines, on or before August 1, 1993, for land applications of
reclaimed water. These standards apply only until the department of
ecology adopts rules, in accordance with section 1 of this act,
regarding the land application of reclaimed water.
(2) A permit is required for any land application of reclaimed
water. The department of ecology may issue a reclaimed water permit
under chapter 90.48 RCW to the generator of reclaimed water who may
then distribute the water, subject to provisions in the permit
governing the location, rate, water quality, and purpose of use. The
department of ecology shall not issue more than one permit for any
individual land application of reclaimed water to a single generator.
(3) In cases where the department of ecology determines, in land
applications of reclaimed water, that a significant risk to the public
health exists, the department shall refer the application to the
department of health for review and consultation and the department of
health may require fees appropriate for review and consultation from
the applicant pursuant to RCW 43.70.250.
(4) A permit under this section for use of reclaimed water may be
issued only to:
(a) A municipal, quasi-municipal, or other governmental entity;
(b) A private utility as defined under RCW 36.94.010; or
(c) The holder of a waste discharge permit issued under chapter
90.48 RCW.
(5) The authority and duties created in this section are in
addition to any authority and duties already provided in law. Nothing
in this section limits the powers of the state or any political
subdivision to exercise such authority.
(6) Before deciding whether to issue a permit under this section to
a private utility, the department of ecology may require information
that is reasonable and necessary to determine whether the private
utility has the financial and other resources to assure the
reliability, continuity, and supervision of the reclaimed water
facility.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.46.042 and 1995 c 342 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of ecology shall, in consultation with the
department of health, adopt a single set of standards, procedures, and
guidelines, on or before December 31, 1996, for direct recharge using
reclaimed water. The standards shall address both water quality
considerations and avoidance of property damage from excessive
recharge. These standards apply only until the department of ecology
adopts rules, in accordance with section 1 of this act, regarding
direct recharge using reclaimed water.

Sec. 7 RCW 90.46.044 and 1995 c 342 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of ecology shall, in consultation with the
department of health, adopt a single set of standards, procedures, and
guidelines, on or before June 30, 1996, for discharge of reclaimed
water to wetlands. These standards apply only until the department of
ecology adopts rules, in accordance with section 1 of this act,
regarding the discharge of reclaimed water to wetlands.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.46.050 and 1995 c 342 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of ((health)) ecology shall, before July 1,
((1995)) 2006, form an advisory committee, in coordination with the
department of ((ecology)) health and the department of agriculture,
which will provide technical assistance in the development of
standards, procedures, and guidelines required by this chapter.
((Such)) The advisory committee shall be composed of ((individuals from
the public water and wastewater utilities, landscaping enhancement
industry, commercial and industrial application community, and any
other persons deemed technically helpful by the department of health))
a broad range of interested individuals representing the various
stakeholders that use or are potentially impacted by the use of
reclaimed water. The advisory committee must also contain individuals
with technical expertise and knowledge of new advancements in
technology.
(2) The advisory committee shall review and recommend to the
legislature by December 1, 2007, any proposed changes in state law, in
light of (a) existing conflicts with provisions contained in this
chapter; (b) the need to facilitate implementation of locally developed
watershed plans under chapter 90.82 RCW; (c) the development and
implementation of a comprehensive partnership to restore the health of
Puget Sound, and the potential role of reclaimed water; and (d)
increasingly stringent federal water quality standards.

Sec. 9 RCW 90.46.080 and 1997 c 444 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, reclaimed water
may be beneficially used for surface percolation provided the reclaimed
water meets the ground water recharge criteria as measured in ground
water beneath or down gradient of the recharge project site, and has
been incorporated into a sewer or water comprehensive plan, as
applicable, adopted by the applicable local government and approved by
the department of health or department of ecology as applicable.
(2) If the state ground water recharge criteria as defined by RCW
90.46.010 do not contain a standard for a constituent or contaminant,
the department of ecology shall establish a discharge limit consistent
with the goals of this chapter, except as otherwise provided in this
section.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, reclaimed water
that does not meet the ground water recharge criteria may be
beneficially used for surface percolation where the department of
ecology, in consultation with the department of health, has
specifically authorized such use at such lower standard.
(4) Any rules adopted by the department of ecology in accordance
with section 1 of this act regarding surface percolation supersede the
provisions of this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 90.46.090 and 1997 c 444 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Reclaimed water may be beneficially used for discharge into
constructed beneficial use wetlands and constructed treatment wetlands
provided the reclaimed water meets the class A or B reclaimed water
standards as defined in the reclamation criteria, and the discharge is
incorporated into a sewer or water comprehensive plan, as applicable,
adopted by the applicable local government and approved by the
department of health or department of ecology as applicable.
(2) Reclaimed water that does not meet the class A or B reclaimed
water standards may be beneficially used for discharge into constructed
treatment wetlands where the department of ecology, in consultation
with the department of health, has specifically authorized such use at
such lower standards.
(3)(a) The department of ecology and the department of health must
develop appropriate standards for discharging reclaimed water into
constructed beneficial use wetlands and constructed treatment wetlands.
These standards must be considered as part of the approval process
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(b) Standards adopted under this section apply only until the
department of ecology adopts rules, in accordance with section 1 of
this act, regarding use in constructed wetlands and created wetlands.

Sec. 11 RCW 90.46.100 and 1995 c 342 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Reclaimed water intended for beneficial reuse may be discharged
for streamflow augmentation provided the reclaimed water meets the
requirements of the federal water pollution control act, chapter 90.48
RCW, and is incorporated into a sewer or water comprehensive plan, as
applicable, adopted by the applicable local government and approved by
the department of health or department of ecology as applicable.
(2) Standards adopted under this section apply only until the
department of ecology adopts rules, in accordance with section 1 of
this act, regarding use of reclaimed water for streamflow augmentation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 90.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Reclaimed water may be used for mitigation projects for
diversions or withdrawals of waters of the state.
(2) The use of reclaimed water, consistent with the standards and
criteria developed under the authority of this chapter, shall be
considered a water resource management technique to be considered by
the department under RCW 90.03.255 when evaluating an application for
a water right, change, or transfer, or when proposed as a mitigated
use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 90.46 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of ecology and the department of health financial
assistance programs shall evaluate the use of existing state funding
sources to pay for some of the costs of reclaimed water projects and
shall work with the advisory committee created in RCW 90.46.050 to
develop recommendations on how to make additional funding available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The code reviser shall alphabetize and
renumber the definitions in section 3 of this act.

--- END ---