BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Washington state institute for public
policy, in consultation with the employment security department, shall
conduct a study to address the impacts of Washington state's minimum
wage law, and must report its findings to the legislature by December
1, 2006. The study shall address:
(1) The extent to which the minimum wage is paid in various
industries and occupations in Washington;
(2) A demographic analysis of persons earning the minimum wage,
including race, ethnicity, gender, marital status, age, household
composition, the number of dependents a minimum wage earner supports,
and whether or not the person is the sole wage earner in the household;
(3) The average amount of time an employee who remains with the
same employer is paid the minimum wage;
(4) A comparison of minimum wage laws in other states;
(5) The impact of the minimum wage on job creation and job loss
from 1990 to the present;
(6) Whether there is any correlation between changes in the state
minimum wage and the state unemployment rate, or the unemployment rate
in a particular industry;
(7) Wage compression or expansion for workers earning up to one
hundred thirty percent of the minimum wage;
(8) Economic activity and wage progression in industries with large
numbers of low-wage workers compared to economic activity and wage
progression in moderate to high-wage industries in Washington;
(9) The minimum wage's effect on the federal poverty level rates of
low-income workers in this state;
(10) The rate at which minimum wage workers and their families use
public benefits;
(11) Differences in economic activity attributable to the minimum
wage in comparison with similar activity in Oregon, Idaho, and other
states similar in economic size and industrial base to Washington; and
(12) The potential impact on employers and employees of a minimum
tipped wage.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.46.020 and 1999 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) ((Until January 1, 1999, every employer shall pay to each of
his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at
a rate of not less than four dollars and ninety cents per hour.
(2) Beginning January 1, 1999, and until January 1, 2000, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than five dollars and
seventy cents per hour.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2000, and until January 1, 2001, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than six dollars and
fifty cents per hour.
(4)(a))) Beginning on January 1, 2001, and each following January
1st as set forth under (((b) of this)) subsection (2) of this section,
every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has
reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than the
amount established under (((b) of this)) subsection (2) of this
section.
(((b) On)) (2) Beginning September 30, 2000, ((and on each
following)) on every September 30th((,)) until September 30, 2005, the
department of labor and industries shall calculate an adjusted minimum
wage rate to maintain employee purchasing power by increasing the
current year's minimum wage rate by the rate of inflation. The
adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated to the nearest cent
using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical
workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve months prior to
each September 1st as calculated by the United States department of
labor. Each adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under this
subsection (((4)(b))) takes effect on the following January 1st.
(((5))) (3) The director shall by regulation establish the minimum
wage for employees under the age of eighteen years.

--- END ---