BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.45.073 and 2003 c 86 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No licensee may engage in the business of making small loans
without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to its license from
the director in accordance with this chapter. An endorsement will be
required for each location where a licensee engages in the business of
making small loans, but a small loan endorsement may authorize a
licensee to make small loans at a location different than the licensed
locations where it cashes or sells checks. A licensee may have more
than one endorsement.
(2) ((The termination date of a small loan may not exceed the
origination date of that same small loan by more than forty-five days,
including weekends and holidays, unless the term of the loan is
extended by agreement of both the borrower and the licensee and no
additional fee or interest is charged.)) A licensee that has obtained
the required small loan endorsement may not make a small loan under
this chapter unless (a) the licensee has assessed the borrower's
ability to repay the loan, including the borrower's current and
expected income, current obligations, and employment, and (b) at
consummation of the loan, the borrower's total monthly debts, including
the small loan, do not exceed forty-five percent of the borrower's
monthly gross income. Each small loan must have a minimum term of not
less than two weeks, including weekends and holidays, for each fifty-dollar amount owed on the small loan. The maximum principal amount of
any small loan, or the outstanding principal balances of all small
loans made by a licensee to a single borrower at any one time, may not
exceed ((seven)) five hundred dollars.
(3) A licensee that has obtained the required small loan
endorsement may charge interest or fees for small loans not to exceed
((in the aggregate fifteen percent of the first five hundred dollars of
principal. If the principal exceeds five hundred dollars, a licensee
may charge interest or fees not to exceed in the aggregate ten percent
of that portion of the principal in excess of five hundred dollars))
thirty-six percent per annum. The rate charged on the outstanding
balance after maturity shall not be greater than the rate charged
during the loan term. If a licensee makes more than one loan to a
single borrower, ((and)) the aggregated principal of all loans made to
that borrower ((exceeds)) may not exceed five hundred dollars at any
one time((, the licensee may charge interest or fees not to exceed in
the aggregate ten percent on that portion of the aggregated principal
of all loans at any one time that is in excess of five hundred
dollars)). The director may determine by rule which fees, if any, are
not subject to the interest or fee limitations described in this
section. It is a violation of this chapter for any licensee to
knowingly loan to a single borrower at any one time, in a single loan
or in the aggregate, more than the maximum principal amount described
in this section.
(4) In connection with making a small loan, a licensee may advance
moneys on the security of a postdated check. The licensee may not
accept any other property, title to property, or other evidence of
ownership of property as collateral for a small loan. The licensee may
accept only one postdated check per loan as security for the loan. A
licensee may permit a borrower to redeem a postdated check with a
payment of cash or the equivalent of cash. The licensee may disburse
the proceeds of a small loan in cash, in the form of a check, or in the
form of the electronic equivalent of cash or a check.
(5) No person may at any time cash or advance any moneys on a
postdated check or draft in excess of the amount of goods or services
purchased without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to a check
casher or check seller license.

--- END ---