BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.45.210 and 2005 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A licensee shall:
(a) When collecting any delinquent small loan, not garnish any
wages or salary paid for service in the armed forces;
(b) Defer for the duration of the posting all collection activity
against a military borrower who has been deployed to a combat or combat
support posting for the duration of the posting;
(c) Not contact, or threaten to contact either orally or in
writing, the military chain of command of a military borrower in an
effort to collect a delinquent small loan;
(d) Honor the terms of any repayment agreement between the licensee
and any military borrower, including any repayment agreement negotiated
through military counselors or third party credit counselors; and
(e) Not make a loan from a specific location to a person that the
licensee knows is a military borrower when the military borrower's
commander has notified the licensee in writing that the specific
location is designated off-limits to military personnel under their
command.
(2) For purposes of this section, "military borrower" means any
active duty member or spouse of the armed forces of the United States,
or any member or spouse of the national guard or the reserves of the
armed forces of the United States who has been called to active duty.

--- END ---