BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.45.084 and 2003 c 86 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((A licensee and borrower may agree to a payment plan for a
small loan at any time. After four successive loans and prior to
default upon the last loan, each borrower may convert their small loan
to a payment plan.)) If the borrower is unable to repay a small loan
in full on the due date, the licensee shall provide the borrower with
a loan repayment plan. The repayment plan shall be in the form of a
new loan with a principal balance in the amount of the outstanding
small loan minus any payments made on that loan. Each agreement for a
loan payment plan must be in writing and acknowledged by both the
borrower and the licensee. The licensee may charge the borrower, at
the time both parties enter into the payment plan, a one-time fee for
the payment plan in an amount up to the fee or interest on the
outstanding principal of the loan as allowed under RCW 31.45.073(3).
The licensee may not assess any other fee, interest charge, or other
charge on the borrower as a result of converting the small loan into a
payment plan. This payment plan must provide for the payment of the
total of payments due on the small loan over a period not less than
((sixty)) ninety days in three or more payments, unless the borrower
and licensee agree to a shorter payment period. The borrower may pay
the total of payments at any time. The licensee may not charge any
penalty, fee, or charge to the borrower for prepayment of the loan
payment plan by the borrower. Each licensee shall conspicuously
disclose to each borrower in the small loan agreement or small loan
note that the borrower has access to such a payment plan ((after four
successive loans)). A licensee's violation of such a payment plan
constitutes a violation of this chapter.
(2) ((The licensee may take postdated checks at the initiation of
the payment plan for the payments agreed to under the plan. If any
check accepted by the licensee as payment under the payment plan is
dishonored, the licensee may not charge the borrower any fee for the
dishonored check.)) Any outstanding check securing a small loan must
be returned to the borrower at the time the repayment plan is signed by
both the borrower and the licensee.
(3) If the borrower defaults on the payment plan, the licensee may
initiate action to collect the total of payments under RCW 31.45.082.
The licensee may charge the borrower a one-time payment plan default
fee of twenty-five dollars.
(4) If the licensee enters into a payment plan with the borrower
through an accredited third party, with certified credit counselors,
that is representing the borrower, the licensee's failure to comply
with the terms of that payment plan constitutes a violation of this
chapter.

--- END ---