BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the vast majority
of contractors engaged in the business of constructing or remodeling
owner-occupied single-family homes are both technically proficient in
their trade and able to manage their business dealings in accordance
with the highest standards. The legislature also finds, however, that
in those relatively few, but all-too-frequent, instances where prime
contractors on such construction or remodeling projects intentionally,
negligently, or unintentionally mismanage payments received from
homeowners that are intended for subcontractors, suppliers, and others,
existing provisions are inadequate to protect homeowners.
Additionally, the toll on an individual homeowner's personal economic
and emotional condition that such financial mismanagement by this small
fraction of prime contractors is not adequately balanced against the
responsibilities, obligations, and possible penalties that contractors
bear for such mismanagement. Consequently, the legislature finds that
it is necessary to (1) clearly establish when prime contractors are
personally responsible for mismanagement of funds received from or on
behalf of homeowners that are intended for suppliers, subcontractors,
and others; (2) increase awareness by homeowners to the potential for
liens against their residence if contractors fail to pay suppliers and
subcontractors as promised; and (3) increase opportunities for
homeowners to become better educated about ways to protect themselves
from financial mismanagement by those few contractors who are unable or
unwilling to meet the financial management standards set by the vast
majority of residential contractors in this state.
The legislature recognizes the independence of the federal
bankruptcy courts, but nonetheless encourages such courts, when
addressing whether or not to discharge liabilities of contractors
arising under this act due to the mismanagement of funds received from
or for the benefit of homeowners, to adopt a policy disfavoring the
discharge of such liabilities in bankruptcy. If the mismanagement
rises to the level of criminal conduct, nothing in this act is intended
to interfere with criminal prosecution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of determining whether the bond required of a
prime residential contractor should be increased under RCW
18.27.040(10), the department shall consider whether:
(a) The prime residential contractor and, if applicable, any
persons financially responsible for the prime residential contractor
engaged or participated in any of the activities described in
subsection (2) of this section while retained by a residential
homeowner; and
(b) A lien claimant or potential lien claimant that had supplied
goods or services to the residential construction or remodel project
performed by the prime residential contractor for the homeowner entered
into any agreement or was party to a judgment requiring the homeowner
to pay to the claimant some or all of a debt that the homeowner had
previously paid to the contractor.
(2) A prime residential contractor and, if applicable, any persons
financially responsible for the prime residential contractor may be
subjected to the increased bond requirement under RCW 18.27.040(10) if
the prime residential contractor:
(a) Is not properly registered, insured, and bonded pursuant to
this chapter or chapter 19.28 RCW at the time the prime residential
contractor: (i) Incurs any expense or obligation for or on behalf of
the homeowner from any other potential lien claimant; or (ii) requests
or receives any funds from the homeowner;
(b) Requests or accepts funds from the residential homeowner in an
amount exceeding one-half of the amount of the contractor's bond on
file with the department of labor and industries under RCW 18.27.040 or
19.28.041(3) and the amount requested or accepted exceeds the amount
owed or due to all other potential lien claimants at the time the funds
are requested or accepted;
(c) Requests or accepts any funds from the residential homeowner
after the prime residential contractor incurs expenses or obligations
for or on behalf of the homeowner from any other potential lien
claimant, but before providing the homeowner a billing statement,
invoice, or other written notice described in subsection (3) of this
section; or
(d)(i) Requests or accepts any funds from the homeowner after the
contractor incurs expenses or obligations for or on behalf of the
homeowner from any other potential lien claimant;
(ii) Makes the request for and accepts funds from the homeowner at
the same time or after the prime residential contractor provides the
homeowner with a billing statement, invoice, or other written notice as
described in subsection (3) of this section; and
(iii) Purposefully fails to (A) identify a potential lien claimant
on such written notice pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section;
or (B) identify the potential lien claimants to which the payment due
and amount owed has not been fully satisfied as of the date of the
notice pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section; or (C) apply the
requested homeowner's payment to the potential lien claimant or
claimants as indicated on such written notice under subsection (3)(c)
or (d) of this section.
(3) The written notice provided by this section shall identify:
(a) The other potential lien claimants, if any, from which goods or
services have been ordered or obtained by the prime residential
contractor for or on behalf of the homeowner, and for which the payment
due and amount owed has been fully satisfied as the date of the notice;
(b) The other potential lien claimants, if any, from which goods or
services have been ordered or obtained by the prime residential
contractor for or on behalf of the homeowner, and for which the payment
due and amount owed has not been fully satisfied as of the date of the
notice;
(c) The other potential lien claimants, if any, identified pursuant
to (b) of this subsection to which the prime residential contractor
intends to pay all amounts owed from the homeowner's payment; and
(d) The potential lien claimants, if any, identified pursuant to
(b) of this subsection to which the prime residential contractor does
not intend to pay all amounts owed from the homeowner's payment, and
the reason for less than full payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall not increase the bond required to be
provided by a registered contractor under RCW 18.27.040(10) if the
person who engaged in the activities described in section 2 of this act
shows, by clear and convincing evidence in defending against a claimed
lien or other collection action, that:
(a) He or she is a person financially responsible for the prime
residential contractor who actually did not know and, in the exercise
of due diligence incumbent to the person's position as a financially
responsible party, had no reasonable opportunity to know of the
registration status, activities, or transactions of the contractor that
gave rise to the liability;
(b) The prime residential contractor or an entity other than the
prime residential contractor paid the lien claimant the full contract
price for the labor, professional services, materials, or equipment
incurred on behalf of the homeowner by the prime residential contractor
and supplied by a lien claimant;
(c) The failure to either identify a potential lien claimant or
apply a homeowner's payment as provided in section 2(2)(d)(iii) of this
act was due to an inadvertent error or a reasonable mistake, and was
not a substantial cause of the filing of the lien claim; or
(d) The prime residential contractor: (i) Did not engage in any
activity described in section 2(2) (a) through (c) of this act; (ii)
substantially complied with the notice provisions of section 2(2)(d) of
this act; and (iii) did not pay the amount claimed by the lien claimant
solely because of a dispute between the prime residential contractor or
the homeowner and the lien claimant over the quality or quantity of
work performed or goods supplied, the legitimacy or accuracy of the
amount billed, or similar issues.
(2)(a) A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the person (i)
engages or participates in an activity described in section 2 of this
act; (ii) enters into an agreement or is party to a judgment where a
residential homeowner is required to pay some or all of such claimed
debt; and (iii) fails to file a certified copy of such judgment or
agreement with the department of labor and industries, and pay the
filing fee established by rule by the department, within thirty days of
the entry of such judgment or agreement.
(b) The clerk of the court entering a judgment in a lien action
commenced pursuant to RCW 60.04.021 shall mail a copy of the judgment
to the department of labor and industries, by certified mail, if (i) a
residential homeowner, a prime residential contractor, or any person
financially responsible for the prime residential contractor are
parties, and (ii) the residential homeowner is required under the
judgment to pay any part of the claimed lien.

Sec. 4 RCW 60.04.091 and 1992 c 126 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person claiming a lien under RCW 60.04.021 shall file for
recording, in the county where the subject property is located, a
notice of claim of lien not later than ninety days after the person has
ceased to furnish labor, professional services, materials, or equipment
or the last date on which employee benefit contributions were due.
(1) The notice of claim of lien((:
(1))) shall state in substance and effect:
(a) The name, ((phone)) telephone number, and address of the
claimant;
(b) The first ((and)) date on which the claimant began to perform
labor, provide professional services, or supply material or equipment
or the first date on which employee benefits became due;
(c) The last date on which the labor, professional services,
materials, or equipment was furnished or employee benefit contributions
were due;
(((c))) (d) The name of the person indebted to the claimant;
(((d))) (e) The street address, legal description, or other
description reasonably calculated to identify, for a person familiar
with the area, the location of the real property to be charged with the
lien;
(((e))) (f) The name of the owner or reputed owner of the property,
if known, and, if not known, that fact shall be stated; ((and
(f))) (g) The principal amount for which the lien is claimed,
excluding any interest, late fees, costs, attorneys' fees, or similar
charges; and
(h) Whether the claimant is the assignee of the claim.
(2) The notice of claim of lien shall be signed by the claimant or
some person authorized to act on his or her behalf who shall
affirmatively state they have read or heard and understand the notice
of claim of lien ((and)), believe the ((notice of claim of lien))
contents to be true and correct, and the lien is not frivolous and is
not clearly excessive, under penalty of perjury, and shall be
acknowledged as set forth in the form below, or pursuant to chapter
64.08 RCW. If the lien has been assigned, the name of the assignee
shall be stated. Where an action to foreclose the lien has been
commenced such notice of claim of lien may be amended as pleadings may
be by order of the court insofar as the interests of third parties are
not adversely affected by such amendment. A claim of lien
substantially in the following form shall be sufficient:

CLAIM OF LIEN

. . . . . ., claimant, vs . . . . . ., name of person indebted
to claimant:

Notice is hereby given that the person named below claims a
lien pursuant to chapter ((64.04)) 60.04 RCW. In support of
this lien the following information is submitted:

1. NAME OF LIEN CLAIMANT: . . . . . . . . . . . .

TELEPHONE NUMBER: . . . . . . . . . . . .

ADDRESS: . . . . . . . . . . . .

2. DATE ON WHICH THE CLAIMANT BEGAN TO PERFORM LABOR,
PROVIDE PROFESSIONAL SERVICES, SUPPLY MATERIAL OR EQUIPMENT OR
THE DATE ON WHICH EMPLOYEE BENEFIT CONTRIBUTIONS BECAME DUE: . . . . . . . . . . . .

3. NAME OF PERSON INDEBTED TO THE CLAIMANT:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

4. DESCRIPTION OF THE PROPERTY AGAINST WHICH A LIEN IS
CLAIMED (Street address, legal description or other information
that will reasonably describe the property): . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

5. NAME OF THE OWNER OR REPUTED OWNER (If not known
state "unknown"): . . . . . . . . . . . .

6. THE LAST DATE ON WHICH LABOR WAS PERFORMED;
PROFESSIONAL SERVICES WERE FURNISHED; CONTRIBUTIONS TO AN
EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLAN WERE DUE; OR MATERIAL, OR EQUIPMENT WAS
FURNISHED: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

7. PRINCIPAL AMOUNT FOR WHICH THE LIEN IS CLAIMED IS: . . . . . . . . . . . .

8. IF THE CLAIMANT IS THE ASSIGNEE OF THIS CLAIM SO
STATE HERE: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

STATE OF WASHINGTON, COUNTY OF
. . . . . . . ., ss.
. . . . . . . ., being sworn, says: I am the claimant (or attorney of
the claimant, or administrator, representative, or agent of the
trustees of an employee benefit plan) above named; I have read or heard
and understand the foregoing claim, read and know the contents thereof,
and believe the same to be true and correct and that the claim of lien
is not frivolous and is made with reasonable cause, and is not clearly
excessive under penalty of perjury.

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

Subscribed and sworn to before me this . . . . day of . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

(3) The period provided for recording the claim of lien is a period
of limitation and no action to foreclose a lien shall be maintained
unless the claim of lien is filed for recording within the ninety-day
period stated. The lien claimant shall give a copy of the claim of
lien to the owner or reputed owner by mailing it by certified or
registered mail or by personal service within fourteen days of the time
the claim of lien is filed for recording. Failure to do so results in
a forfeiture of any right the claimant may have to attorneys' fees and
costs against the owner under RCW 60.04.181.
(4) A lien claimant that, for any reason, includes any interest,
late fee, cost, attorneys' fees, or similar charges as part of the
principal amount for which the lien is claimed shall be deemed to have
waived any right under contract or otherwise to such charges, and shall
also forfeit any right the claimant may have to attorneys' fees and
costs against the owner under RCW 60.04.181.

Sec. 5 RCW 60.04.250 and 1990 c 81 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of labor and industries shall prepare master
documents that provide informational material about:
(1) Construction lien laws and available safeguards against real
property lien claims. The material shall include methods of protection
against lien claims, including obtaining lien release documents,
performance bonds, joint payee checks, the opportunity to require
contractor disclosure of all potential lien claimants as a condition of
payment, and lender supervision under ((RCW 60.04.200 and 60.04.210))
this chapter. The material shall also include sources of further
information, including the department of labor and industries and the
office of the attorney general.
(2) The basics of lien law relating to owner-occupied residential
improvements and new construction projects, including a list of
available safeguards against real property lien claims. Before any
building permit may be issued for (a) the construction of a new owner-occupied single-family residence; or (b) the improvement to an owner-occupied single-family residence for an amount in excess of one
thousand dollars, if the construction will involve the services of a
prime residential contractor, the permit-issuing agency shall not issue
any permit until the homeowner has acknowledged receipt of the document
personally, or through an agent who is not the prime residential
contractor or any employee, owner, or agent of the prime residential
contractor. The permit-issuing agency shall maintain a copy of the
acknowledgment of receipt of the document in the file of the permit-issuing agency relating to the homeowner's permit application. The
document shall be in substantially the following form and shall also
include information describing the scope and limits of state contractor
bonding requirements, the provisions of this act, and the availability
of further information, including the department of labor and
industries and the office of the attorney general.

Dear Homeowner:
Before any permit can be issued, you must file with this agency the
attached document acknowledging that you have received and read this
form. You should also review the items below and carefully consider
what protection, if any, you want against potential lien claims on your
property as a result of the construction work for which you are
contracting. If your contractor fails to pay subcontractors,
suppliers, or laborers or neglects to make other legally required
payments, those who are owed money can file a lien against your
property for payment, even if you have paid your contractor in full.
Anyone filing a valid lien claim may force the sale of your property to
recover the unpaid amount. This is true if you have hired a contractor
to build a new home or are buying a newly built home. It is also true
when you remodel or improve your property.
People who supply materials or labor ordered by your contractor are
permitted by law to file a lien only if they do so within ninety days
of cessation of performance or delivery of materials. The time frame
is spelled out in RCW 60.04.091.
If you enter into a contract to buy a newly built home, you may not
receive a notice of a lien based on a claim by a contractor or material
handler. Be aware that a lien may be claimed even though you have not
received a notice. Before making final payment on the project, obtain
a completed lien release form from each contractor and material
supplier. A sample of this release of lien form is available from the
department of labor and industries, contractor registration section.
You have final responsibility for seeing that all bills are paid
even if you have paid your contractor in full.
If you are dealing with a lending institution, ask your loan
officer what precautions the lending institution takes to verify that
subcontractors and material suppliers are being paid when mortgage
money is paid to your contractor. You may want to request lender
supervision if your lending institution is providing interim or
construction financing.
If you receive a notice to enforce a lien, take the notice
seriously. Let your contractor know you have received the notice.
Find out what arrangements are being made to pay the sender of the
notice.
When in doubt, or if you need more details, consult your attorney.
When and how to pay your contractor is a decision that requires serious
consideration. Washington law, RCW 18.27.114, requires contractors to
give you this disclosure statement if your contract exceeds one
thousand dollars.
Below is a list of some alternatives about how you may want to
protect yourself from possible lien claims on your property, and inform
your contractor of your selections or discuss your selections with your
contractor (select one):
. . . . . . . . . issue checks made payable jointly, naming the
contractor and the subcontractor or supplier as payees.
. . . . . . . . . issue checks to the contractor and subcontractors
in the amounts equal to the amounts for which lien releases that
release all lien rights to those amounts, as provided by RCW 60.04.071,
have been provided to me by each lien claimant requesting payment.
. . . . . . . . . require the contractor to post a bond to assure
both performance of this construction work and payment to all
subcontractors and suppliers in the amount of either . . . the total
contract amount . . . in the amount of $ . . . . . . . . (Note: Your
contractor may add the cost of this bond to your contract price.)
. . . . . . . . . use an escrow agent to disburse construction
funds and to protect my interests. (NOTE: Before making this
selection, find out whether the escrow agent you plan to use will
protect you against liens when disbursing payments. If you are
interested in using this alternative, consult your attorney.)
. . . . . . . . . insist that the contractor set up a trust account
for all funds paid to this contractor, and the trust funds must be
disbursed in accordance with our construction agreement to
subcontractors and suppliers.
. . . . . . . . . None of the above protections from potential lien
claims against my property as a result of this construction work.
In addition to the above selection, consider whether to insist that
the prime residential contractor is to disclose all potential lien
claimants as a condition of payment. (NOTE: A lien claimant must,
under RCW 60.04.091(2), mail by certified or registered mail or by
personal service a copy of the claim of lien to the owner within
fourteen days of the time the lien is recorded. While an action is
ongoing, the law, RCW 60.04.151, allows an owner to withhold from this
prime residential contractor the amount of money for which a claim is
recorded by a subcontractor, supplier, or laborer.)
More information about contractors is available by visiting the
department of labor and industries on the internet at
www.LNI.wa.gov/SCS/contractors/ or by calling the contractor
registration hotline at 1-800-647-0982. You may also call your local
department of labor and industries office. See listings under
"Washington, state of" in the government section or the white pages of
the telephone book.

Sec. 6 RCW 60.04.031 and 1992 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, every person
furnishing professional services, materials, or equipment for the
improvement of real property shall give the owner or reputed owner
notice in writing of the right to claim a lien. If the prime
contractor is in compliance with the requirements of RCW 19.27.095,
60.04.230, and 60.04.261, this notice shall also be given to the prime
contractor as described in this subsection unless the potential lien
claimant has contracted directly with the prime contractor. The notice
may be given at any time but only protects the right to claim a lien
for professional services, materials, or equipment supplied after the
date which is sixty days before:
(a) Mailing the notice by certified or registered mail to the owner
or reputed owner; or
(b) Delivering or serving the notice personally upon the owner or
reputed owner and obtaining evidence of delivery in the form of a
receipt or other ((acknowledgement)) acknowledgment signed by the owner
or reputed owner or an affidavit of service.
In the case of new construction, repair, alteration, or remodel of
a single-family residence or garage appurtenant to a single-family
residence, the notice of a right to claim a lien may be given at any
time but only protects the right to claim a lien for professional
services, materials, or equipment supplied after a date which is ten
days before the notice is given as described in this subsection.
(2) Notices of a right to claim a lien shall not be required of:
(a) Persons who contract directly with the owner or the owner's
common law agent;
(b) Laborers whose claim of lien is based solely on performing
labor; or
(c) Subcontractors who contract for the improvement of real
property directly with the prime contractor, except as provided in
subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(3)(a) Persons who furnish professional services, materials, or
equipment in connection with the new construction, repair, alteration,
or remodel of ((an existing owner-occupied)) a single-family residence
or appurtenant garage:
(((a))) (i) Who contract directly with the ((owner-occupier or
their)) residential homeowner or the homeowner's common law agent shall
not be required to send a written notice of the right to claim a lien
and shall have a lien for the full amount due under their contract, as
provided in RCW 60.04.021; or
(((b))) (ii) Who do not contract directly with the ((owner-occupier
or their)) residential homeowner or the homeowner's common law agent
shall give notice of the right to claim a lien to the ((owner-occupier)) homeowner.
(b) Claims of liens of persons furnishing professional services,
materials, or equipment who do not contract directly with the ((owner-occupier)) homeowner or their common law agent ((may only be satisfied
from)) for the repair, alteration, or remodel of the homeowner's
residence shall be dismissed if:
(i) The amounts ((not yet)) paid to the prime residential
contractor by the owner at the time the notice described in this
section is received equals or otherwise satisfies all amounts owed by
the homeowner to all potential lien claimants, including the prime
residential contractor, regardless of whether amounts ((not yet)) paid
to the prime residential contractor are due; and
(ii) The homeowner notifies the potential lien claimant in writing
that the lien is subject to dismissal pursuant to this subsection, and
such notice is received by the potential lien claimant within thirty
days of receipt of the notice provided by (a)(ii) of this subsection.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection "received" means actual
receipt of notice by personal service, or registered or certified mail,
or three days after mailing by registered or certified mail, excluding
Saturdays, Sundays, or legal holidays.
(4) The notice of right to claim a lien described in subsection (1)
of this section, shall include but not be limited to the following
information and shall substantially be in the following form, using
lower-case and upper-case ten-point type where appropriate.

NOTICE TO OWNER

IMPORTANT: READ BOTH SIDES OF THIS NOTICE CAREFULLY.

PROTECT YOURSELF FROM PAYING TWICE

Re: (description of property: Street address or general location.)

From: . . . . . . . . . . . .

AT THE REQUEST OF: (Name of person ordering the professional
services, materials, or equipment)

THIS IS NOT A LIEN--THIS NOTICE IS MEANT TO PROVIDE YOU WITH
INFORMATION NECESSARY TO PROPERLY MANAGE YOUR CONSTRUCTION PROJECT:
This notice is sent to you to tell you who is providing professional
services, materials, or equipment for the improvement of your property
and to advise you of the rights of these persons and your
responsibilities. Also take note that laborers on your project may
claim a lien without sending you a notice.

OWNER/OCCUPIER OF EXISTING RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY AND/OR
NEW RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY

Under Washington law, those who furnish labor, professional services,
materials, or equipment for the repair, remodel, or alteration of your
owner-occupied principal residence and who are not paid, have a right
to enforce their claim for payment against your property. This claim
is known as a construction lien.

The law limits the amount that a lien claimant can claim against your
property. ((Claims may only be made against that portion of the
contract price you have not yet paid to your prime contractor as of the
time this notice was given to you or three days after this notice was
mailed to you.)) If the improvement to your property is new
construction, repair, alteration, or remodel of a single-family
residence or its appurtenant garage, a lien may be claimed for some or
all professional services, materials, or equipment furnished after a
date that is ten days before this notice was given to you or mailed to
you. Review the back of this notice for more information and ways to
avoid lien claims.

COMMERCIAL ((AND/OR NEW RESIDENTIAL)) PROPERTY

We have or will be providing professional services, materials, or
equipment for the improvement of your commercial ((or new residential))
project. In the event you or your contractor fail to pay us, we may
file a lien against your property. A lien may be claimed for all
professional services, materials, or equipment furnished after a date
that is sixty days before this notice was given to you or mailed to
you((, unless the improvement to your property is the construction of
a new single-family residence, then ten days before this notice was
given to you or mailed to you)).

Sender: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Address: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Brief description of professional services, materials, or equipment
provided or to be provided: . . . . . . . . . . . .

IMPORTANT INFORMATION ON REVERSE SIDE

IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR YOUR PROTECTION

This notice is sent to inform you that we have or will provide
professional services, materials, or equipment for the improvement of
your property. We expect to be paid by the person who ordered our
services, but if we are not paid, we have the right to enforce our
claim by filing a construction lien against your property.

LEARN more about the lien laws and the meaning of this notice by
discussing them with your contractor, suppliers, Department of Labor
and Industries, the firm sending you this notice, your lender, or your
attorney.

COMMON METHODS TO AVOID CONSTRUCTION LIENS: There are several methods
available to protect your property from construction liens. The
following are two of the more commonly used methods.

DUAL PAYCHECKS (Joint Checks): When paying your contractor for
services or materials, you may make checks payable jointly to
the contractor and the firms furnishing you this notice.

LIEN RELEASES: You may require your contractor to provide lien
releases signed by all the suppliers and subcontractors from
whom you have received this notice. If they cannot obtain lien
releases because you have not paid them, you may use the dual
payee check method to protect yourself.

YOU SHOULD TAKE APPROPRIATE STEPS TO PROTECT YOUR PROPERTY FROM LIENS.

YOUR PRIME CONTRACTOR AND YOUR CONSTRUCTION LENDER ARE REQUIRED BY LAW
TO GIVE YOU WRITTEN INFORMATION ABOUT LIEN CLAIMS. IF YOU HAVE NOT
RECEIVED IT, ASK THEM FOR IT.

* * * * * * * * * * * * *

(5) Every potential lien claimant providing professional services
where no improvement as defined in RCW 60.04.011(5) (a) or (b) has been
commenced, and the professional services provided are not visible from
an inspection of the real property may record in the real property
records of the county where the property is located a notice which
shall contain the professional service provider's name, address,
telephone number, legal description of the property, the owner or
reputed owner's name, and the general nature of the professional
services provided. If such notice is not recorded, the lien claimed
shall be subordinate to the interest of any subsequent mortgagee and
invalid as to the interest of any subsequent purchaser if the mortgagee
or purchaser acts in good faith and for a valuable consideration
acquires an interest in the property prior to the commencement of an
improvement as defined in RCW 60.04.011(5) (a) or (b) without notice of
the professional services being provided. The notice described in this
subsection shall be substantially in the following form:

NOTICE OF FURNISHING PROFESSIONAL SERVICES

That on the (day) day of (month and year) , (name of
provider) began providing professional services upon or for the
improvement of real property legally described as follows:

[Legal Description is mandatory]

The general nature of the professional services provided is . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

The owner or reputed owner of the real property is . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .

(6) A lien authorized by this chapter shall not be enforced unless
the lien claimant has complied with the applicable provisions of this
section.

Sec. 7 RCW 60.04.011 and 1992 c 126 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Construction agent" means any registered or licensed
contractor, registered or licensed subcontractor, architect, engineer,
or other person having charge of any improvement to real property, who
shall be deemed the agent of the owner for the limited purpose of
establishing the lien created by this chapter.
(2) "Contract price" means the amount, including overhead and
profit, agreed upon by the contracting parties, or if no amount is
agreed upon, then the customary and reasonable charge therefor, but in
no case shall contract price include any amount payable under the
contract, or otherwise, in the event of nonpayment or late payment.
(3) "Draws" means periodic disbursements of interim or construction
financing by a lender.
(4) "Furnishing labor, professional services, materials, or
equipment" means the performance of any labor or professional services,
the contribution owed to any employee benefit plan on account of any
labor, the provision of any supplies or materials, and the renting,
leasing, or otherwise supplying of equipment for the improvement of
real property.
(5) "Improvement" means: (a) Constructing, altering, repairing,
remodeling, demolishing, clearing, grading, or filling in, of, to, or
upon any real property or street or road in front of or adjoining the
same; (b) planting of trees, vines, shrubs, plants, hedges, or lawns,
or providing other landscaping materials on any real property; and (c)
providing professional services upon real property or in preparation
for or in conjunction with the intended activities in (a) or (b) of
this subsection.
(6) "Interim or construction financing" means that portion of money
secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other encumbrance to finance
improvement of, or to real property, but does not include:
(a) Funds to acquire real property;
(b) Funds to pay interest, insurance premiums, lease deposits,
taxes, assessments, or prior encumbrances;
(c) Funds to pay loan, commitment, title, legal, closing,
recording, or appraisal fees;
(d) Funds to pay other customary fees, which pursuant to agreement
with the owner or borrower are to be paid by the lender from time to
time;
(e) Funds to acquire personal property for which the potential lien
claimant may not claim a lien pursuant to this chapter.
(7) "Labor" means exertion of the powers of body or mind performed
at the site for compensation. "Labor" includes amounts due and owed to
any employee benefit plan on account of such labor performed.
(8) "Mortgagee" means a person who has a valid mortgage of record
or deed of trust of record securing a loan.
(9) "Owner-occupied" means a single-family residence occupied by
the owner as his or her principal residence.
(10) "Payment bond" means a surety bond issued by a surety licensed
to issue surety bonds in the state of Washington that confers upon
potential claimants the rights of third party beneficiaries.
(11) "Potential lien claimant" means any person or entity entitled
to assert lien rights under this chapter who has otherwise complied
with the provisions of this chapter and is registered or licensed if
required to be licensed or registered by the provisions of the laws of
the state of Washington.
(12) "Prime contractor" includes all contractors, general
contractors, and specialty contractors, as defined by chapter 18.27 or
19.28 RCW, or who are otherwise required to be registered or licensed
by law, who contract directly with a property owner or their common law
agent to assume primary responsibility for the creation of an
improvement to real property, and includes property owners or their
common law agents who are contractors, general contractors, or
specialty contractors as defined in chapter 18.27 or 19.28 RCW, or who
are otherwise required to be registered or licensed by law, who offer
to sell their property without occupying or using the structures,
projects, developments, or improvements for more than one year.
(13) "Professional services" means surveying, establishing or
marking the boundaries of, preparing maps, plans, or specifications
for, or inspecting, testing, or otherwise performing any other
architectural or engineering services for the improvement of real
property.
(14) "Real property lender" means a bank, savings bank, savings and
loan association, credit union, mortgage company, or other corporation,
association, partnership, trust, or individual that makes loans secured
by real property located in the state of Washington.
(15) "Residential homeowner" or "homeowner" means the same as the
term is defined by RCW 18.27.010.
(16) "Site" means the real property which is or is to be improved.
(((16))) (17) "Subcontractor" means a general contractor or
specialty contractor as defined by chapter 18.27 or 19.28 RCW, or who
is otherwise required to be registered or licensed by law, who
contracts for the improvement of real property with someone other than
the owner of the property or their common law agent.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.27.010 and 2001 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1)(a) "Contractor" means any person, firm, or corporation who or
which, in the pursuit of an independent business undertakes to, or
offers to undertake, or submits a bid to, construct, alter, repair, add
to, subtract from, provide construction consultation or management
services for, develop, improve, move, wreck or demolish, for another,
any building, highway, road, railroad, excavation or other structure,
project, development, or improvement attached to real estate or to do
any part thereof including the installation of doors, windows,
carpeting or other floor covering, kitchen and bathroom cabinetry,
fixtures, and built-in appliances, the erection of scaffolding or other
structures or works in connection therewith or who installs or repairs
roofing or siding, or who provides tree removal or trimming services;
or, who, to do similar work upon his or her own property, employs
members of more than one trade upon a single job or project or under a
single building permit except as otherwise provided herein.
(b) "Contractor" includes any person, firm, corporation, or other
entity covered by this subsection, whether or not registered as
required under this chapter.
(c) A "contractor" is presumed to be a developer and prime
residential contractor in business for another, and is not eligible for
the exemption provided in RCW 18.27.090 (11) or (12), when the
contractor owns and constructs, alters, repairs, or remodels one or
more residential structures, and offers for sale or lease (i) more than
two such structures in any twenty-four month period, or (ii) any such
structure without occupying or using it for more than one year.
(d) Solely for the purposes of RCW 18.27.200 (2) and (3) and
18.27.340(3)(b), "contractor" includes any party that, in the pursuit
of an independent business retains, for or on behalf of a residential
homeowner, the services of a general contractor or specialty contractor
to alter, repair, or improve an existing residential structure owned
and occupied by the homeowner that has been damaged by an accident,
fire, or weather-related or other natural event.
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries or designated representative employed by the department.
(4) "General contractor" means a contractor whose business
operations ((require)) involve the use or supervision of more than
((two unrelated)) one building ((trades or crafts)) trade, craft, or
contractor whose work the general contractor ((shall)) superintends or
((do)) does in whole or in part. "General contractor" ((shall)) does
not include an individual who does all work personally without
employees or other "specialty contractors" as defined in this section.
The terms "general contractor," "developer," and "builder" are
synonymous.
(5) "Other potential lien claimant" means a potential lien
claimant, as defined in RCW 60.04.011, other than a prime residential
contractor.
(6) "Partnership" means a business formed under Title 25 RCW.
(((6))) (7) "Prime residential contractor" means a prime
contractor, as defined in RCW 60.04.011, that is engaged in the
business of constructing, altering, repairing, or remodeling single-family homes for residential homeowners.
(8) "Prime residential contractor's financially responsible
parties" or "persons financially responsible for a prime residential
contractor" means (a) all persons having an ownership interest of more
than five percent of the prime residential contractor business; (b) all
partners, officers, directors, principals, or vice-principals of the
prime residential contractor; and (c) the person, if different from
those persons identified in (a) or (b) of this subsection, who received
or is entitled to receive the most compensation from the prime
residential contractor, regardless of whether the compensation is
provided as salary, wages, profits, or otherwise, during the term of
the contractor's registration.
(9) "Registration cancellation" means a written notice from the
department that a contractor's action is in violation of this chapter
and that the contractor's registration has been revoked.
(((7))) (10) "Registration suspension" means a written notice from
the department that a contractor's action is a violation of this
chapter and that the contractor's registration has been suspended for
a specified time, or until the contractor shows evidence of compliance
with this chapter.
(((8))) (11) "Residential homeowner" for the purposes of this
chapter and chapter 64.04 RCW means an individual person or persons
owning or leasing real property:
(a) Upon which one single-family residence is to be built and in
which the owner or lessee intends to reside upon completion of any
construction; or
(b) Upon which there is a single-family residence to which
improvements are to be made and in which the owner or lessee intends to
reside upon completion of any construction.
(((9))) (12) "Specialty contractor" means a contractor whose
operations do not (a) require or involve the use of any unrelated
building trade, craft, or contractor; nor (b) fall within the
definition of "general contractor".
(((10))) (13) "Unregistered contractor" means a person, firm,
corporation, or other entity doing work as a contractor without being
registered in compliance with this chapter. "Unregistered contractor"
includes contractors whose registration is expired, revoked, or
suspended. "Unregistered contractor" does not include a contractor who
has maintained a valid bond and the insurance or assigned account
required by RCW 18.27.050, and whose registration has lapsed for thirty
or fewer days.
(((11))) (14) "Unsatisfied final judgment" means a judgment that
has not been satisfied either through payment, court approved
settlement, discharge in bankruptcy, or assignment under RCW 19.72.070.
(((12))) (15) "Verification" means the receipt and duplication by
the city, town, or county of a contractor registration card that is
current on its face, checking the department's contractor registration
data base, or calling the department to confirm that the contractor is
registered.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.27.020 and 1997 c 314 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every contractor shall register with the department.
(2) It is a gross misdemeanor for any contractor to:
(a) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor without being registered as required by this chapter;
(b) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor when the contractor's registration is suspended or
revoked;
(c) Use a false or expired registration number in purchasing or
offering to purchase an advertisement for which a contractor
registration number is required; ((or))
(d) Transfer a valid registration to an unregistered contractor or
allow an unregistered contractor to work under a registration issued to
another contractor; or
(e) Subcontract work to or employ an unregistered contractor.
(3) It is not unlawful for a general contractor to employ an
unregistered contractor who was registered at the time he or she
entered into a contract with the general contractor, unless the general
contractor or his or her representative has been notified in writing by
the department of labor and industries that the contractor has become
unregistered.
(4) All ((misdemeanor)) actions under this chapter shall be
prosecuted in the county where the infraction occurs.
(5) A person is guilty of a separate gross misdemeanor for each day
worked if, after the person receives a citation from the department,
the person works while unregistered, or while his or her registration
is suspended or revoked, or works under a registration issued to
another contractor. A person is guilty of a separate gross misdemeanor
for each worksite on which he or she violates subsection (2) of this
section. Nothing in this subsection applies to a registered
contractor.
(6) The director by rule shall establish a two-year audit and
monitoring program for a contractor not registered under this chapter
who becomes registered after receiving an infraction or conviction
under this chapter as an unregistered contractor. The director shall
notify the departments of revenue and employment security of the
infractions or convictions and shall cooperate with these departments
to determine whether any taxes or registration, license, or other fees
or penalties are owed the state.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.27.030 and 2001 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant for registration as a contractor shall submit an
application under oath upon a form to be prescribed by the director and
which shall include the following information pertaining to the
applicant:
(a) Employer social security number.
(b) Unified business identifier number, if required by the
department of revenue.
(c) Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's
employees working in Washington, as follows:
(i) The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by
the department;
(ii) The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department;
or
(iii) For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada
subject to an agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as
permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of coverage issued by
the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the
applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant
has secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or
province's workers' compensation law.
(d) Employment security department number.
(e) State excise tax registration number.
(f) Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be
substituted for the information required by (c) of this subsection if
the applicant will not employ employees in Washington, and by (d) and
(e) of this subsection.
(g) Type of contracting activity, whether a general or a specialty
contractor and if the latter, the type of specialty, and whether the
contractor engages or intends to engage in the new construction,
repair, alteration, or remodel of the single-family residence or
appurtenant garage of any residential homeowner.
(h) The name and address of each partner if the applicant is a firm
or partnership, or the name and address of the owner if the applicant
is an individual proprietorship, or the name and address of the
corporate officers and statutory agent, if any, if the applicant is a
corporation or the name and address of all members of other business
entities.
(i) If the applicant is a prime residential contractor, (i) the
name and address of the person who received or is entitled to receive
the most compensation from the contractor, regardless of whether the
compensation is provided as salary, wages, profits, or otherwise,
during the term of the contractor's registration; and, if different,
each person financially responsible for the prime residential
contractor, as defined by RCW 18.27.010; and (ii) whether (A) any
person so identified has in the previous twenty-four months engaged or
participated in any of the activities described in section 2(2) of this
act while retained by a residential homeowner; and (B) a lien claimant
or potential lien claimant that had supplied goods or services to the
residential construction or remodel project performed by the prime
residential contractor for the homeowner entered into any agreement or
was party to a judgment requiring the homeowner to pay to the claimant
some or all of a debt that the homeowner had previously paid to the
contractor. An applicant shall update information required under this
subsection (1)(i) no later than thirty days after there is a change in
the persons required to be identified under this subsection (1)(i).
(j) The information contained in such application is a matter of
public record and open to public inspection.
(2) The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage
information provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(c) of this
section, including but not limited to information regarding the
coverage of an individual employee of the applicant. If coverage is
provided under the laws of another state, the department may notify the
other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.
(3)(a) The department shall deny an application for registration
if: (i) The applicant has been previously performing work subject to
this chapter as a sole proprietor, partnership, corporation, or other
entity and the department has notice that the applicant has an
unsatisfied final judgment against him or her in an action based on
this chapter or the applicant owes the department money for penalties
assessed or fees due under this chapter as a result of a final
judgment; (ii) the applicant was a principal or officer of a
partnership, corporation, or other entity that either has an
unsatisfied final judgment against it in an action that was incurred
for work performed subject to this chapter or owes the department money
for penalties assessed or fees due under this chapter as a result of a
final judgment; or (iii) the applicant does not have a valid unified
business identifier number, if required by the department of revenue.
(b) The department shall suspend an active registration if (i) the
department has notice that the registrant is a contractor or sole
proprietor or a principal or officer of a registered contractor that
has an unsatisfied final judgment against it for work within the scope
of this chapter; or (ii) the applicant does not maintain a valid
unified business identifier number, if required by the department of
revenue.
(4) The department shall not deny an application or suspend a
registration because of an unsatisfied final judgment if the
applicant's or registrant's unsatisfied final judgment was determined
by the director to be the result of the fraud or negligence of another
party.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.27.040 and 2001 c 159 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each applicant shall file with the department a surety bond
issued by a surety insurer who meets the requirements of chapter 48.28
RCW in the sum of twelve thousand dollars if the applicant is a general
contractor and six thousand dollars if the applicant is a specialty
contractor. If no valid bond is already on file with the department at
the time the application is filed, a bond must accompany the
registration application. The bond shall have the state of Washington
named as obligee with good and sufficient surety in a form to be
approved by the department. The bond shall be continuous and may be
canceled by the surety upon the surety giving written notice to the
director. A cancellation or revocation of the bond or withdrawal of
the surety from the bond automatically suspends the registration issued
to the registrant until a new bond or reinstatement notice has been
filed and approved as provided in this section. The bond shall be
conditioned that the applicant will pay all persons performing labor,
including employee benefits, for the contractor, will pay all taxes and
contributions due to the state of Washington, and will pay all persons
furnishing labor or material or renting or supplying equipment to the
contractor and will pay all amounts that may be adjudged against the
contractor by reason of breach of contract including negligent or
improper work in the conduct of the contracting business. A change in
the name of a business or a change in the type of business entity shall
not impair a bond for the purposes of this section so long as one of
the original applicants for such bond maintains partial ownership in
the business covered by the bond.
(2) At the time of initial registration or renewal, the contractor
shall provide a bond or other security deposit as required by this
chapter and comply with all of the other provisions of this chapter
before the department shall issue or renew the contractor's certificate
of registration. Any contractor registered as of July 1, 2001, who
maintains that registration in accordance with this chapter is in
compliance with this chapter until the next renewal of the contractor's
certificate of registration.
(3) Any person, firm, or corporation having a claim against the
contractor for any of the items referred to in this section may bring
suit upon the bond or deposit in the superior court of the county in
which the work was done or of any county in which jurisdiction of the
contractor may be had. The surety issuing the bond shall be named as
a party to any suit upon the bond. Action upon the bond or deposit
brought by a residential homeowner for breach of contract by a party to
the construction contract shall be commenced by filing the summons and
complaint with the clerk of the appropriate superior court within two
years from the date the claimed contract work was substantially
completed or abandoned. Action upon the bond or deposit brought by any
other authorized party shall be commenced by filing the summons and
complaint with the clerk of the appropriate superior court within one
year from the date the claimed labor was performed and benefits
accrued, taxes and contributions owing the state of Washington became
due, materials and equipment were furnished, or the claimed contract
work was substantially completed or abandoned. Service of process in
an action against the contractor, the contractor's bond, or the deposit
shall be exclusively by service upon the department. Three copies of
the summons and complaint and a fee adopted by rule of not less than
twenty dollars to cover the costs shall be served by registered or
certified mail, or other delivery service requiring notice of receipt,
upon the department at the time suit is started and the department
shall maintain a record, available for public inspection, of all suits
so commenced. Service is not complete until the department receives
the fee and three copies of the summons and complaint. The service
shall constitute service on the registrant and the surety for suit upon
the bond or deposit and the department shall transmit the summons and
complaint or a copy thereof to the registrant at the address listed in
the registrant's application and to the surety within two days after it
shall have been received.
(4) The surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate
amount in excess of the amount named in the bond nor for any monetary
penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter for an infraction. The
liability of the surety shall not cumulate where the bond has been
renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued or otherwise extended. The
surety upon the bond may, upon notice to the department and the
parties, tender to the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of the
action an amount equal to the claims thereunder or the amount of the
bond less the amount of judgments, if any, previously satisfied
therefrom and to the extent of such tender the surety upon the bond
shall be exonerated but if the actions commenced and pending at any one
time exceed the amount of the bond then unimpaired, claims shall be
satisfied from the bond in the following order:
(a) Employee labor and claims of laborers, including employee
benefits;
(b) Claims for breach of contract by a party to the construction
contract;
(c) Registered or licensed subcontractors, material, and equipment;
(d) Taxes and contributions due the state of Washington;
(e) Any court costs, interest, and ((attorney's [attorneys']))
attorneys' fees plaintiff may be entitled to recover. The surety is
not liable for any amount in excess of the penal limit of its bond.
A payment made by the surety in good faith exonerates the bond to
the extent of any payment made by the surety.
(5) The total amount paid from a bond or deposit required of a
general contractor by this section to claimants other than residential
homeowners must not exceed one-half of the bond amount. The total
amount paid from a bond or deposit required of a specialty contractor
by this section to claimants other than residential homeowners must not
exceed one-half of the bond amount or four thousand dollars, whichever
is greater.
(6) The prevailing party in an action filed under this section
against the contractor and contractor's bond or deposit, for breach of
contract by a party to ((a)) the construction contract involving a
residential homeowner, is entitled to costs, interest, and reasonable
attorneys' fees. The surety upon the bond is not liable in an
aggregate amount in excess of the amount named in the bond nor for any
monetary penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter for an infraction.
(7) If a final judgment impairs the liability of the surety upon
the bond so furnished that there is not in effect a bond in the full
amount prescribed in this section, the registration of the contractor
is automatically suspended until the bond liability in the required
amount unimpaired by unsatisfied judgment claims is furnished.
(8) In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the
contractor may file with the department a deposit consisting of cash or
other security acceptable to the department.
(9) Any person having filed and served a summons and complaint as
required by this section having an unsatisfied final judgment against
the registrant for any items referred to in this section may execute
upon the security held by the department by serving a certified copy of
the unsatisfied final judgment by registered or certified mail upon the
department within one year of the date of entry of such judgment. Upon
the receipt of service of such certified copy the department shall pay
or order paid from the deposit, through the registry of the superior
court which rendered judgment, towards the amount of the unsatisfied
judgment. The priority of payment by the department shall be the order
of receipt by the department, but the department shall have no
liability for payment in excess of the amount of the deposit.
(10) The director ((may)) shall require an applicant applying to
renew or reinstate a registration or applying for a new registration to
file a bond of ((up to three)) at least two times, but not more than
five times, the normally required amount, if the director determines
that:
(a) An applicant, or a previous registration of a corporate
officer, owner, or partner of a current applicant, has had in the past
five years a total of six final judgments in actions under this chapter
involving a residential single-family dwelling on two or more different
structures; or
(b) The applicant is a prime residential contractor, and in the
twenty-four months preceding the application or renewal: (i) The
contractor or any of the prime residential contractor's financially
responsible parties has or have been engaged or participated in any of
the activities described in section 2(2) of this act while retained by
a residential homeowner; and
(ii) A lien claimant or potential lien claimant that had supplied
goods or services to the residential construction or remodel project
performed by the prime residential contractor for the homeowner entered
into any agreement or was party to a judgment requiring the homeowner
to pay to the claimant some or all of a debt that the homeowner had
previously paid to the contractor; or
(c) The applicant is a prime residential contractor, and the
department is notified by a residential homeowner that the contractor
retained by the homeowner or any of the prime residential contractor's
financially responsible parties is currently engaging or participated
in any of the activities described in section 2(2) of this act, and the
prime residential contractor fails to rebut the homeowner's assertion
by clear and convincing evidence.
(11) The director may adopt rules necessary for the proper
administration of the security, including such rules relating to
procedures and fees reasonably necessary to administer the filing and
notification requirements of section 3(2)(a)(iii) of this act.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.27.080 and 1988 c 285 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of
a contractor may: (a) Bring or maintain any action in any court of
this state for the collection of compensation for the performance of
any work or for breach of any contract for which registration is
required under this chapter; or (b) commence any action to compel
another to comply with an arbitration or similar provision in the
contractor's contract, or to enforce any such arbitration ruling;
without alleging and proving that he was a duly registered contractor
and held a current and valid certificate of registration at the time he
contracted for the performance of such work or entered into such
contract.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the court shall not find a
contractor in substantial compliance with the registration requirements
of this chapter unless: (((1))) (a) The department has on file the
information required by RCW 18.27.030; (((2))) (b) the contractor has
a current bond or other security as required by RCW 18.27.040; and
(((3))) (c) the contractor has current insurance as required by RCW
18.27.050. In determining under this section whether a contractor is
in substantial compliance with the registration requirements of this
chapter, the court shall take into consideration the length of time
during which the contractor did not hold a valid certificate of
registration.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.27.200 and 2002 c 82 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a violation of this chapter and an infraction for any
contractor to:
(a) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor without being registered as required by this chapter;
(b) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor when the contractor's registration is suspended or
revoked;
(c) Transfer a valid registration to an unregistered contractor or
allow an unregistered contractor to work under a registration issued to
another contractor; or
(d) If the contractor is a contractor as defined in RCW 18.106.010,
violate RCW 18.106.320.
(2) It is a violation of this chapter and an infraction for any
contractor to employ an unregistered contractor. It is not a violation
for a contractor to employ an unregistered contractor who was
registered at the time he or she entered into a contract with the
general contractor, unless the contractor or his or her representative
has been notified in writing by the department that the contractor has
become unregistered.
(3) Each day that a contractor works without being registered as
required by this chapter, works while the contractor's registration is
suspended or revoked, employs an unregistered contractor, or works
under a registration issued to another contractor is a separate
infraction. Each worksite at which a contractor works without being
registered as required by this chapter, works while the contractor's
registration is suspended or revoked, or works under a registration
issued to another contractor is a separate infraction.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.27.340 and 1997 c 314 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
a contractor found to have committed an infraction under RCW 18.27.200
shall be assessed a monetary penalty of not less than two hundred
dollars and not more than five thousand dollars.
(2) The director may waive collection in favor of payment of
restitution to a consumer complainant.
(3) A contractor found to have committed an infraction under RCW
18.27.200 for:
(a) Failure to register; or
(b) Employing an unregistered contractor,
shall be assessed a fine of not less than one thousand dollars, nor
more than five thousand dollars. The director may reduce the penalty
for failure to register, but in no case below five hundred dollars, if
the person becomes registered within ten days of receiving a notice of
infraction and the notice of infraction is for a first offense. The
director may reduce the penalty for employing an unregistered
contractor, but in no case may reduce the penalty below seven hundred
fifty dollars, if the notice of infraction is for a first offense for
employing an unregistered contractor.
(4) Monetary penalties collected under this chapter shall be
deposited in the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act takes effect July 1, 2007.

--- END ---