BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2005 c 474 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) A joint task force is created to determine the most appropriate
and effective administrative structure for delivery of social and
health services to the children and families of the state. The joint
task force shall study how best to ensure that an administrative
structure has defined lines of responsibility for delivering services
to children and families in need and the best means for the public to
hold government accountable for delivery of those services. The joint
task force shall compare the effectiveness of: Including social and
health services to children and families within an umbrella agency,
such as the current department of social and health services;
establishing a separate agency for social and health services to
children and families whose administrator reports directly to the
governor; or creating a children and family services cabinet reporting
directly to the governor. The joint task force shall, as part of the
comparison, examine the administrative structures used in other states
to deliver social and health services to children and families.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2007.

Sec. 2 2005 c 474 s 2 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) Membership of the joint task force shall consist of the
following:
(a) The dean of the school of social work at the University of
Washington or an academic professor from a list recommended by the
dean, jointly appointed by the chairs of the house of representatives
children and family services committee and the senate human services
and corrections committee;
(b) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives, one of whom shall be a member
of the majority caucus and one of whom shall be a member of the
minority caucus, and two members of the senate appointed by the
president of the senate, one of whom shall be a member of the majority
caucus and one of whom shall be a member of the minority caucus;
(c) The secretary of the department of social and health services
or the secretary's designee;
(d) An individual with previous experience as an administrator of
a public agency providing services to children and families, jointly
appointed by the chairs of the house of representatives children and
family services committee and the senate human services and corrections
committee;
(e) A juvenile court administrator, jointly appointed by the chairs
of the house of representatives children and family services committee
and the senate human services and corrections committee;
(f) A family superior court judge, jointly appointed by the chairs
of the house of representatives children and family services committee
and the senate human services and corrections committee;
(g) The director of the office of the family and children's
ombudsman;
(h) A social worker with experience in the public sector serving
children and families, jointly appointed by the chairs of the house of
representatives children and family services committee and the senate
human services and corrections committee; ((and))
(i) Two representatives of community-based providers serving
children and families, jointly appointed by the chairs of the house of
representatives children and family services committee and the senate
human services and corrections committee;
(j) A representative from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction;
(k) A representative from the office of public defender.
(2) The dean of the school of social work at the University of
Washington or the academic professor appointed from a list recommended
by the dean shall be the chair of the joint task force.
(3) Staff support for the joint task force shall be provided by the
house of representatives office of program research and senate
committee services and may include consultant services. At least a
one-half full-time equivalent position shall be devoted to the task
force.
(4) Legislative members of the joint task force shall be reimbursed
for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2007.

Sec. 3 2005 c 474 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The joint task force shall make recommendations concerning
which administrative structure or structures would best realize
efficiencies in administration and best achieve positive outcomes for
children and families, including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) Reducing the number of children at risk for abuse or neglect
and increasing the safety and well-being of children;
(b) Increasing the ability of families to care for their own
children and reducing the number of children in foster care;
(c) Increasing placement stability and permanency for children in
out-of-home care and reducing unsafe and inappropriate placements;
(d) Delivering appropriate and timely mental health services;
(e) Providing adequate and appropriate staff training and
education;
(f) Promoting foster parent recruitment, training, and retention;
(g) Reducing the frequency and duration of sibling separation;
(h) Delivering adequate and timely services to adolescents; and
(i) Increasing responsibility and accountability for achieving
goals.
(2) The joint task force shall also make recommendations concerning
the costs, benefits, savings, or reductions in services associated with
the various administrative structures considered by the joint task
force.
(3) The joint task force shall report its recommendations to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1,
2006.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2007.

--- END ---