BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.26 RCW
to read as follows:
A child born to a woman as the result of the implantation of an
embryo, which was donated by the genetic parents, or any person or
entity with the legal authority to transfer such embryo, is presumed to
be the adopted child of the woman and, if married, of her husband. All
legal authority to transfer the embryo, and the parental rights of the
embryo donor, shall be irrevocably terminated in accordance with the
terms of a written instrument executed prior to the implantation or the
thawing and implantation of the embryo. A child born as the result of
such an embryo implantation shall be afforded all of the legal rights
and protection of any child adopted under the laws of this state.
Upon application to a court of competent jurisdiction, the parent
or parents of such a child shall be entitled to, but not required to
obtain, a decree confirming the parent-child relationship. This
section shall not apply to a child born to a surrogate mother who is
not genetically related to the child and who executes an appropriate
agreement not inconsistent with the laws of this state.

--- END ---