BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to inspire and
encourage all Washington students to dream big by creating a guaranteed
one-year tuition scholarship program for academically successful high
school students from low and middle-income families. The legislature
finds that too often, financial barriers prevent many of the brightest
students from even considering college as a future possibility. Often
the cost of tuition coupled with the complexity of finding and applying
for financial aid is enough to prevent a student from even applying to
college. Many students become disconnected from the education system
early on and may give up or even drop out before graduation. It is the
intent of the legislature to reward high-achieving students early in
their high school career so that they know they have options and
opportunities available beyond high school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The higher education coordinating board
shall design the guaranteed opportunities scholarship in accordance
with this section.
(1) Scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating from
public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW,
students participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter
28A.200 RCW, and persons twenty-one years of age or younger receiving
a GED certificate, who meet both an academic and a financial
eligibility criteria.
(a) To meet the academic eligibility criteria:
(i) Students graduating from public high schools, approved private
high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, students participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW, and persons
twenty-one years of age or younger receiving a GED certificate, must
attain or exceed the standards in all content areas on the Washington
assessment of student learning or on the Washington alternative
assessment system on their first attempt; and
(ii) Students graduating from public high schools or approved
private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW must have a grade point
average equal to or greater than 3.5 for the ninth and tenth grades.
(b) To meet the financial eligibility criteria, a student's family
income shall not exceed one hundred percent of the state median family
income adjusted for family size, as determined by the higher education
coordinating board for each graduating class. Students not meeting the
eligibility requirements for the first year of scholarship benefits may
reapply for the second year of benefits, but must still meet the income
standard set by the board for the student's graduating class.
(2) Scholarships shall be one hundred tuition units.
(3) Scholarships shall be awarded in the fall after results of the
high school Washington assessment of student learning are available.
The first scholarships shall be awarded to students who take the high
school assessment for the first time in the spring of 2007.
(4) The state of Washington retains legal ownership of tuition
units awarded as scholarships under this chapter until the tuition
units are redeemed. These tuition units shall remain separately held
from any tuition units owned under chapter 28B.95 RCW by a guaranteed
opportunities scholarship recipient.
(5) Scholarships must be used within five years of receipt. Any
unused scholarship tuition units revert to the guaranteed opportunities
scholarship account.
(6) Guaranteed opportunities scholarships are not intended to
supplant any grant, scholarship, or tax program related to
postsecondary education. If the board finds that the scholarship
supplants or reduces any grant, scholarship, or tax program for
categories of students, then the board shall adjust the financial
eligibility criteria or the amount of scholarship to the level
necessary to avoid supplanting.
(7) The higher education coordinating board, with the assistance of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall implement
and administer the guaranteed opportunities scholarship program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The guaranteed opportunities scholarship
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The account
shall be a discrete nontreasury account retaining its interest earnings
in accordance with RCW 43.79A.040.
(2) The higher education coordinating board shall deposit in the
account all money received for the program. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds representing tuition units purchased by
the state of Washington and funds received from other sources, public
or private. With the exception of investment and operating costs
associated with the investment of money by the investment board paid
under RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160, the account shall be credited with
all investment income earned by the account. Disbursements from the
account are exempt from appropriations and the allotment provisions of
chapter 43.88 RCW. Money used for program administration is subject to
the allotment of all expenditures. However, an appropriation is not
required for such expenditures.
(3) The limitations and authorities applicable to the Washington
advanced college tuition payment program under RCW 28B.95.060 apply to
the guaranteed opportunities scholarship account.
(4) The assets of the account may be spent without appropriation
for the purpose of making payments to institutions of higher education
on behalf of recipients of guaranteed opportunities scholarships.
Disbursements from the account shall be made only on the authorization
of the higher education coordinating board.
(5) Administrative expenses of the tuition unit payment portion of
the guaranteed opportunities program shall be paid from the guaranteed
opportunities scholarship account in an amount not to exceed three
percent of total available assets in the account.
(6) With regard to the assets of the account, the state acts in a
fiduciary, not ownership, capacity. Therefore the assets of the
program are not considered state money, common cash, or revenue to the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This chapter shall not be construed to
change current state requirements for students who received home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The higher education coordinating board may
adopt rules to implement this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.195.010 and 2004 c 19 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature hereby recognizes that private schools should be
subject only to those minimum state controls necessary to insure the
health and safety of all the students in the state and to insure a
sufficient basic education to meet usual graduation requirements. The
state, any agency or official thereof, shall not restrict or dictate
any specific educational or other programs for private schools except
as hereinafter in this section provided.
Principals of private schools or superintendents of private school
districts shall file each year with the state superintendent of public
instruction a statement certifying that the minimum requirements
hereinafter set forth are being met, noting any deviations. After
review of the statement, the state superintendent will notify schools
or school districts of those deviations which must be corrected. In
case of major deviations, the school or school district may request and
the state board of education may grant provisional status for one year
in order that the school or school district may take action to meet the
requirements. The state board of education shall not require private
school students to meet the student learning goals, obtain a
certificate of academic achievement, or a certificate of individual
achievement to graduate from high school, to master the essential
academic learning requirements, or to be assessed pursuant to RCW
28A.655.061. However, private schools may choose, on a voluntary
basis, to have their students master these essential academic learning
requirements, take the assessments, and obtain a certificate of
academic achievement or a certificate of individual achievement.
Minimum requirements shall be as follows:
(1) The minimum school year for instructional purposes shall
consist of no less than one hundred eighty school days or the
equivalent in annual minimum program hour offerings as prescribed in
RCW 28A.150.220.
(2) The school day shall be the same as that required in RCW
28A.150.030 and 28A.150.220, except that the percentages of total
program hour offerings as prescribed in RCW 28A.150.220 for basic
skills, work skills, and optional subjects and activities shall not
apply to private schools or private sectarian schools.
(3) All classroom teachers shall hold appropriate Washington state
certification except as follows:
(a) Teachers for religious courses or courses for which no
counterpart exists in public schools shall not be required to obtain a
state certificate to teach those courses.
(b) In exceptional cases, people of unusual competence but without
certification may teach students so long as a certified person
exercises general supervision. Annual written statements shall be
submitted to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
reporting and explaining such circumstances.
(4) An approved private school may operate an extension program for
parents, guardians, or persons having legal custody of a child to teach
children in their custody. The extension program shall require at a
minimum that:
(a) The parent, guardian, or custodian be under the supervision of
an employee of the approved private school who is certified under
chapter 28A.410 RCW;
(b) The planning by the certified person and the parent, guardian,
or person having legal custody include objectives consistent with this
subsection and subsections (1), (2), (5), (6), and (7) of this section;
(c) The certified person spend a minimum average each month of one
contact hour per week with each student under his or her supervision
who is enrolled in the approved private school extension program;
(d) Each student's progress be evaluated by the certified person;
and
(e) The certified employee shall not supervise more than thirty
students enrolled in the approved private school's extension program.
(5) Appropriate measures shall be taken to safeguard all permanent
records against loss or damage.
(6) The physical facilities of the school or district shall be
adequate to meet the program offered by the school or district:
PROVIDED, That each school building shall meet reasonable health and
fire safety requirements. A residential dwelling of the parent,
guardian, or custodian shall be deemed to be an adequate physical
facility when a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody is
instructing his or her child under subsection (4) of this section.
(7) Private school curriculum shall include instruction of the
basic skills of occupational education, science, mathematics, language,
social studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the
development of appreciation of art and music, all in sufficient units
for meeting state board of education graduation requirements.
(8) Each school or school district shall be required to maintain
up-to-date policy statements related to the administration and
operation of the school or school district.
A student enrolled at a private school shall be permitted to take
the high school assessments under RCW 28A.655.061 at an educational
service district for the purpose of qualifying for a guaranteed
opportunities scholarship or any other purpose.
(9) All decisions of policy, philosophy, selection of books,
teaching material, curriculum, except as in subsection (7) of this
section provided, school rules and administration, or other matters not
specifically referred to in this section, shall be the responsibility
of the administration and administrators of the particular private
school involved.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.200.010 and 2004 c 19 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each parent whose child is receiving home-based instruction
under RCW 28A.225.010(4) shall have the duty to:
(a) File annually a signed declaration of intent that he or she is
planning to cause his or her child to receive home-based instruction.
The statement shall include the name and age of the child, shall
specify whether a certificated person will be supervising the
instruction, and shall be written in a format prescribed by the
superintendent of public instruction. Each parent shall file the
statement by September 15th of the school year or within two weeks of
the beginning of any public school quarter, trimester, or semester with
the superintendent of the public school district within which the
parent resides or the district that accepts the transfer, and the
student shall be deemed a transfer student of the nonresident district.
Parents may apply for transfer under RCW 28A.225.220;
(b) Ensure that test scores or annual academic progress assessments
and immunization records, together with any other records that are kept
relating to the instructional and educational activities provided, are
forwarded to any other public or private school to which the child
transfers. At the time of a transfer to a public school, the
superintendent of the local school district in which the child enrolls
may require a standardized achievement test to be administered and
shall have the authority to determine the appropriate grade and course
level placement of the child after consultation with parents and review
of the child's records; ((and))
(c) Ensure that a standardized achievement test approved by the
state board of education is administered annually to the child by a
qualified individual or that an annual assessment of the student's
academic progress is written by a certificated person who is currently
working in the field of education. ((The state board of education
shall not require these children to meet the student learning goals,
master the essential academic learning requirements, to take the
assessments, or to obtain a certificate of academic achievement or a
certificate of individual achievement pursuant to RCW 28A.655.061 and
28A.155.045.)) The standardized test administered or the annual
academic progress assessment written shall be made a part of the
child's permanent records. If, as a result of the annual test or
assessment, it is determined that the child is not making reasonable
progress consistent with his or her age or stage of development, the
parent shall make a good faith effort to remedy any deficiency; and
(d) The state board of education shall not require these children
to meet the student learning goals, master the essential academic
learning requirements, to take the assessments, or to obtain a
certificate of mastery pursuant to RCW 28A.655.061. However, a student
receiving home-based instruction shall be permitted to take the
Washington assessment of student learning at an educational service
district for the purpose of qualifying for a guaranteed opportunities
scholarship or any other purpose.
(2) Failure of a parent to comply with the duties in this section
shall be deemed a failure of such parent's child to attend school
without valid justification under RCW 28A.225.020. Parents who do
comply with the duties set forth in this section shall be presumed to
be providing home-based instruction as set forth in RCW 28A.225.010(4).

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.95.020 and 2005 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Academic year" means the regular nine-month, three-quarter, or
two-semester period annually occurring between August 1st and July
31st.
(2) "Account" means the Washington advanced college tuition payment
program account established for the deposit of all money received by
the board from eligible purchasers and interest earnings on investments
of funds in the account, as well as for all expenditures on behalf of
eligible beneficiaries for the redemption of tuition units and for the
development of any authorized college savings program pursuant to RCW
28B.95.150.
(3) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board as
defined in chapter 28B.76 RCW.
(4) "Committee on advanced tuition payment" or "committee" means a
committee of the following members: The state treasurer, the director
of the office of financial management, the executive director of the
higher education coordinating board, or their designees, and two
members to be appointed by the governor, one representing program
participants and one private business representative with marketing,
public relations, or financial expertise.
(5) "Governing body" means the committee empowered by the
legislature to administer the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program.
(6) "Contractual obligation" means a legally binding contract of
the state with the purchaser and the beneficiary establishing that
purchases of tuition units will be worth the same number of tuition
units at the time of redemption as they were worth at the time of the
purchase.
(7) "Eligible beneficiary" means the person for whom the tuition
unit will be redeemed for attendance at an institution of higher
education. The beneficiary is that person named by the purchaser at
the time that a tuition unit contract is accepted by the governing
body. Qualified organizations, as allowed under section 529 of the
federal internal revenue code, purchasing tuition unit contracts as
future scholarships need not designate a beneficiary at the time of
purchase.
(8) "Eligible purchaser" means an individual or organization that
has entered into a tuition unit contract with the governing body for
the purchase of tuition units for an eligible beneficiary. The state
of Washington may be an eligible purchaser for purposes of purchasing
tuition units to be held for granting guaranteed opportunities
scholarships.
(9) "Full-time tuition charges" means resident tuition charges at
a state institution of higher education for enrollments between ten
credits and eighteen credit hours per academic term.
(10) "Institution of higher education" means an institution that
offers education beyond the secondary level and is recognized by the
internal revenue service under chapter 529 of the internal revenue
code.
(11) "Investment board" means the state investment board as defined
in chapter 43.33A RCW.
(12) "State institution of higher education" means institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(13) "Tuition and fees" means undergraduate tuition and services
and activities fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041 rounded
to the nearest whole dollar. For purposes of this chapter, services
and activities fees do not include fees charged for the payment of
bonds heretofore or hereafter issued for, or other indebtedness
incurred to pay, all or part of the cost of acquiring, constructing, or
installing any lands, buildings, or facilities.
(14) "Tuition unit contract" means a contract between an eligible
purchaser and the governing body, or a successor agency appointed for
administration of this chapter, for the purchase of tuition units for
a specified beneficiary that may be redeemed at a later date for an
equal number of tuition units.
(15) "Unit purchase price" means the minimum cost to purchase one
tuition unit for an eligible beneficiary. Generally, the minimum
purchase price is one percent of the undergraduate tuition and fees for
the current year, rounded to the nearest whole dollar, adjusted for the
costs of administration and adjusted to ensure the actuarial soundness
of the account. The analysis for price setting shall also include, but
not be limited to consideration of past and projected patterns of
tuition increases, program liability, past and projected investment
returns, and the need for a prudent stabilization reserve.

Sec. 9 RCW 28B.95.030 and 2005 c 272 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington advanced college tuition payment program shall
be administered by the committee on advanced tuition payment which
shall be chaired by the executive director of the board. The committee
shall be supported by staff of the board.
(2)(a) The Washington advanced college tuition payment program
shall consist of the sale of tuition units, which may be redeemed by
the beneficiary at a future date for an equal number of tuition units
regardless of any increase in the price of tuition, that may have
occurred in the interval.
(b) Each purchase shall be worth a specific number of or fraction
of tuition units at each state institution of higher education as
determined by the governing body.
(c) The number of tuition units necessary to pay for a full year's,
full-time undergraduate tuition and fee charges at a state institution
of higher education shall be set by the governing body at the time a
purchaser enters into a tuition unit contract.
(d) The governing body may limit the number of tuition units
purchased by any one purchaser or on behalf of any one beneficiary,
however, no limit may be imposed that is less than that necessary to
achieve four years of full-time, undergraduate tuition charges at a
state institution of higher education. The governing body also may, at
its discretion, limit the number of participants, if needed, to ensure
the actuarial soundness and integrity of the program.
(e) While the Washington advanced college tuition payment program
is designed to help all citizens of the state of Washington, the
governing body may determine residency requirements for eligible
purchasers and eligible beneficiaries to ensure the actuarial soundness
and integrity of the program.
(3)(a) Except for tuition units purchased by the state of
Washington for the guaranteed opportunities scholarship program under
chapter 28B.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act), no tuition unit
may be redeemed until two years after the purchase of the unit. Units
may be redeemed for enrollment at any institution of higher education
that is recognized by the internal revenue service under chapter 529 of
the internal revenue code.
(b) Units redeemed at a nonstate institution of higher education or
for graduate enrollment shall be redeemed at the rate for state public
institutions in effect at the time of redemption.
(4) The governing body shall determine the conditions under which
the tuition benefit may be transferred to another family member. In
permitting such transfers, the governing body may not allow the tuition
benefit to be bought, sold, bartered, or otherwise exchanged for goods
and services by either the beneficiary or the purchaser.
(5) The governing body shall administer the Washington advanced
college tuition payment program in a manner reasonably designed to be
actuarially sound, such that the assets of the trust will be sufficient
to defray the obligations of the trust including the costs of
administration. The governing body may, at its discretion, discount
the minimum purchase price for certain kinds of purchases such as those
from families with young children, as long as the actuarial soundness
of the account is not jeopardized.
(6) The governing body shall annually determine current value of a
tuition unit.
(7) The governing body shall promote, advertise, and publicize the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program.
(8) In addition to any other powers conferred by this chapter, the
governing body may:
(a) Impose reasonable limits on the number of tuition units or
units that may be used in any one year;
(b) Determine and set any time limits, if necessary, for the use of
benefits under this chapter;
(c) Impose and collect administrative fees and charges in
connection with any transaction under this chapter;
(d) Appoint and use advisory committees as needed to provide
program direction and guidance;
(e) Formulate and adopt all other policies and rules necessary for
the efficient administration of the program;
(f) Consider the addition of an advanced payment program for room
and board contracts and also consider a college savings program;
(g) Purchase insurance from insurers licensed to do business in the
state, to provide for coverage against any loss in connection with the
account's property, assets, or activities or to further insure the
value of the tuition units;
(h) Make, execute, and deliver contracts, conveyances, and other
instruments necessary to the exercise and discharge of its powers and
duties under this chapter;
(i) Contract for the provision for all or part of the services
necessary for the management and operation of the program with other
state or nonstate entities authorized to do business in the state;
(j) Contract for other services or for goods needed by the
governing body in the conduct of its business under this chapter;
(k) Contract with financial consultants, actuaries, auditors, and
other consultants as necessary to carry out its responsibilities under
this chapter;
(l) Solicit and accept cash donations and grants from any person,
governmental agency, private business, or organization; and
(m) Perform all acts necessary and proper to carry out the duties
and responsibilities of this program under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28B.95
RCW to read as follows:
Ownership of tuition units purchased by the state of Washington for
the guaranteed opportunities scholarship program under chapter 28B.--RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act) shall be in the name of the
state of Washington and may be redeemed by the state of Washington on
behalf of recipients of guaranteed opportunity scholarships for tuition
and fees only and not for college-related expenses.

Sec. 11 RCW 28B.95.060 and 2000 c 14 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington advanced college tuition payment program account
is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The account shall be
a discrete nontreasury account retaining its interest earnings in
accordance with RCW 43.79A.040.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the governing
body shall deposit in the account all money received for the program.
The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of payments received
from purchasers of tuition units and funds received from other sources,
public or private. With the exception of investment and operating
costs associated with the investment of money by the investment board
paid under RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160, the account shall be credited
with all investment income earned by the account. Disbursements from
the account are exempt from appropriations and the allotment provisions
of chapter 43.88 RCW. Money used for program administration is subject
to the allotment of all expenditures. However, an appropriation is not
required for such expenditures. Program administration shall include,
but not be limited to: The salaries and expenses of the program
personnel including lease payments, travel, and goods and services
necessary for program operation; contracts for program promotion and
advertisement, audits, and account management; and other general costs
of conducting the business of the program.
(b) All money received by the program from the state of Washington
for the guaranteed opportunities scholarship program shall be deposited
in the guaranteed opportunities scholarship account created in section
3 of this act.
(3) The assets of the account may be spent without appropriation
for the purpose of making payments to institutions of higher education
on behalf of the qualified beneficiaries, making refunds, transfers, or
direct payments upon the termination of the Washington advanced college
tuition payment program. Disbursements from the account shall be made
only on the authorization of the governing body.
(4) With regard to the assets of the account, the state acts in a
fiduciary, not ownership, capacity. Therefore the assets of the
program are not considered state money, common cash, or revenue to the
state.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2005 c 424 s 18, 2005 c 402 s 8, 2005
c 215 s 10, and 2005 c 16 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
guaranteed opportunities scholarship account, the agricultural local
fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
scholarship endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the
commemorative works account, the Washington international exchange
scholarship endowment fund, the developmental disabilities endowment
trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable
inspection account, the future teachers conditional scholarship
account, the game farm alternative account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local
tourism promotion account, the produce railcar pool account, the rural
rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the
youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the
sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's trust fund, the
Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund
account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund
account, the individual development account program account, the
Washington horse racing commission operating account (earnings from the
Washington horse racing commission operating account must be credited
to the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account),
and the life sciences discovery fund. However, the earnings to be
distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---