BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.320.125 and 2002 c 205 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By ((June 1, 2002)) the beginning of the 2007-08 school year,
within existing resources, the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with ((representatives from the emergency management
division of the state military department, educators, classified staff,
principals, superintendents, administrators, the American society for
industrial security, the state criminal justice training commission,
the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and others as
determined by the superintendent)) the Washington state school safety
center advisory committee, shall provide guidance to school districts
in developing comprehensive safe school plans for each school. This
guidance shall include, but shall not be limited to, a comprehensive
school safety checklist to use as a tool when developing their own
individual comprehensive safe school plans, and successful models of
comprehensive safe school plans that include prevention, intervention,
all-hazards/crisis response, and postcrisis recovery.
(2) Schools and school districts shall consider the guidance,
including the comprehensive school safety checklist and the model
comprehensive safe school plans, when developing their own individual
comprehensive safe school plans.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
school district superintendents, shall establish timelines for and set
standards for school districts to develop individual comprehensive safe
school plans. If funding is provided specifically for this purpose,
all schools must have comprehensive safe school plans in place by the
beginning of the 2008-09 school year. The school mapping component is
required by the 2008-09 school year only for schools for which funding
has been provided. If specific funding is not provided to enable this
deadline to be met, the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt rules regarding timelines for the development and review of
comprehensive safe school plans consistent with the availability of
resources including but not limited to technical assistance. The
superintendent of public instruction shall require school districts to
((periodically report progress on their comprehensive safe school
plans)) annually update and review as well as report on their
comprehensive safe school plan, which includes the school mapping
component where applicable.
(4) If funding is provided specifically for this purpose, beginning
with the 2007-08 school year and annually thereafter, staff in each
school shall receive information and training regarding the school's
comprehensive safe school plan. School districts shall coordinate
comprehensive safe school plans and staff information and training with
local emergency response officials.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction ((may)) shall adopt
rules to implement provisions of this section. These rules ((may))
shall include, but are not limited to, provisions for periodic table-top exercises and drills and testing, evacuations, lockdowns, shelter
in-place, or other components of a comprehensive safe school plan.
These rules shall be in place for the 2007-08 school year.

--- END ---