BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(2) "Oil" means crude oil, condensate, distillate, or other oil, or
other liquid hydrocarbon extracted from any lands or waters of this
state, regardless of gravity.
(3) "Gas" means natural gas and casinghead gas, or other gaseous
hydrocarbon from any lands or waters of this state, regardless of
whether produced from a gas well or from a well producing oil or other
liquid hydrocarbons.
(4) "Value" means the fair market value of the oil or gas at the
time of severance and at the point of production.
(5) "Operating producer" means a producer who shares in the
production expenses of the severed product, and who conducts,
personally or by lease or contract, the daily operations of the
business of producing the product, including, but not limited to, the
sale of the product, receipt of proceeds of sale, and the payment of
expenses.
(6) "Severance" means the taking from the lands or waters of this
state of any oil and gas in any manner.
(7) "Person" means "person" as defined in RCW 82.04.030.
(8) "Producer" means any person having an economic interest in the
severed product, whether engaged in the business of producing or
extracting oil or gas or not, who has, as a result of the ownership of
such interests, a right to receive a part or all of the oil and gas
produced or has a right to receive all or a part of the proceeds of the
oil or gas severed. Such persons include, but are not limited to,
persons owning a royalty interest, an overriding royalty interest, a
working or operating interest, a net profit interest, or any
combination thereof, but does not include laborers or employees working
on or at the production site.
(9) "Point of production" means:
(a) For oil, the point where it is severed and is first metered or
measured in a manner approved by the department;
(b) For gas recovered from or in association with oil, where it is
severed and is first metered or measured in a manner approved by the
department after separation from the oil;
(c) For gas not recovered from or in association with oil, where it
is severed and is first metered or measured in a manner approved by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 IMPOSITION AND RATE OF SEVERANCE TAX. (1)
In addition to any other tax, an excise tax is imposed upon the
severance of oil and gas from any lands or waters of this state, less
the value of any part of the oil or gas, the ownership or right to
which is exempt from taxation under section 4 of this act.
(2) The rate of the tax imposed is six percent.
(3) The measure of the tax is the value of the oil and gas at the
time and point of production.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 PAYMENT AND COLLECTION OF TAX. (1) The
taxes imposed by this chapter on the severance of oil and gas is the
liability of the producer or producers. The operating producer shall
file the return with the department, shall pay the tax due, and shall
deduct and withhold the rateable share of the tax from payments made to
other producers in proportion to their interest.
(2) If oil or gas on which the severance and conservation taxes are
due is not sold at the time of production but is retained by the
producer, the operating producer shall pay to the department the taxes
due with respect to the oil and gas severed but not sold and shall
deduct or withhold the rateable share of the tax from payments made to
other producers in proportion to their interest.
(3) The department may require taxes to be paid upon the basis of
the prevailing price being paid at the time and point of production of
other oil or gas of like kind, character, quality, or comparable source
when the value reported to the department does not represent the market
value of oil or gas sold or retained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 EXEMPTIONS. The following are exempt from
the taxes imposed under this chapter:
(1) The value of any oil or gas reinjected for storage, provided
that any subsequent removal of oil or gas produced in this state from
storage for sale, use, or other retention shall constitute a severance
within the meaning of this chapter.
(2) The value of any oil or gas owned by a producer or producers
exempt from tax by reason of federal law or a compact negotiated by the
state with a tribal government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 APPLICABILITY OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATIVE
PROVISIONS--DEPARTMENTAL RULES. All of chapter 82.32 RCW applies to
the tax imposed by this chapter. The department shall provide for the
effective administration of this chapter by rules which shall include,
but are not limited to, the determination of value at the time and
point of production and a determination of metering methods and
measuring the severance of oil and gas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 COLLECTION AND DEPOSIT OF REVENUE FROM THE
SEVERANCE TAX--SHARING OF REVENUE FROM THE SEVERANCE TAX WITH LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS. (1) The department shall deposit eighty percent of the
amount collected by it under section 2 of this act in the general fund.
(2) The local government severance taxation account is established
in the state treasury into which twenty percent of the taxes collected
under section 2 of this act shall be deposited. Money in the account
may be spent after appropriation. Money in this account shall be used
solely for making distributions to those local governments in which
impacts from oil and gas production activities occur, after
appropriation by statute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be known and
cited as the oil and gas severance and conservation act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
EXEMPTION OF OIL AND GAS RESERVES AND LEASES. (1) The following
property is exempt from ad valorem taxation: Oil or gas reserves and
leases on the rights to develop and operate upon or within any lands
and waters of this state for oil or gas and the property rights
attached to or inherent therein.
(2) This section does not in any way exempt the land, improvements,
or other personal property from ad valorem taxation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Captions used in this act are not part of
the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 8 of this act take
effect January 1, 2007.

--- END ---