BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A foster parent critical support and
retention program is established to retain foster parents who care for
sexually aggressive youth, physically assaultive children, or children
with other high-risk behaviors. The foster parent critical support and
retention program is to be implemented under the division of children
and family services' contract and supervision. A contractor must
demonstrate experience providing in-home case management to foster
homes that are licensed through the division of children and family
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Under the foster parent critical support and
retention program, foster parents who care for sexually aggressive
youth, physically assaultive children, or children with other high-risk
behaviors shall receive:
(1) Twenty-four/seven emergency assistance;
(2) Assessment of risk and development of a safety and supervision
plan;
(3) Home-based foster parent training utilizing evidence-based
models;
(4) Ongoing support groups; and
(5) Referral to community services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of two hundred seventy-five thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the
division of children and family services for direct services for the
purposes of this act.

--- END ---