BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
By January 31, 2007, and by January 31st of each year thereafter,
the department shall certify to the state treasurer the total number of
vehicles that have boarded Washington state ferries for each state
ferry route for the prior calendar year. The state treasurer shall
distribute an amount equal to twenty-five cents multiplied by the total
number of vehicles loading and unloading from a state ferry for each
ferry route to the city in which each ferry terminal facility is
located, or to the county if the facility is located in an
unincorporated area. A city or county receiving a distribution under
this section must use the money to defray capital or operating costs
associated with state ferry traffic impacts on the community where the
ferry terminal facility is located. The maximum amount a city or
county can receive under this section is five hundred thousand dollars
per Washington state ferry route.

--- END ---