BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.38 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that it has become increasingly difficult for
many homeowners to pay the increased taxes resulting from rapid
increases in valuation. The legislature intends to allow low and
middle-income homeowners to defer payment of property taxes on their
principal residences to the extent that tax increases exceed fifteen
percent. The deferral program created in section 2 of this act is
intended to assist persons in maintaining their homes by easing the
increases in tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A claimant may defer that portion of the increase in real
property taxes on the claimant's principal residence that exceeds
fifteen percent of the taxes due the previous year. In determining the
amount of taxes that are eligible for deferral under this chapter, any
increase in tax due to physical improvements made to the property since
the previous assessment shall not be considered in the year in which
improvements are made.
(2) Deferral of taxes under this chapter is subject to the
following conditions:
(a) The claimant must have owned, at the time of filing, the
residence on which the real property taxes have been imposed. For
purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by a marital community
or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to be owned by each spouse or
cotenant. A claimant who has only a share ownership in cooperative
housing, a life estate, a lease for life, or a revocable trust does not
satisfy the ownership requirement.
(b) The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence that
was occupied by the claimant as a principal place of residence.
(c) The claimant must have a combined disposable income, as defined
in RCW 84.36.383, less than one hundred twenty-five percent of the
state median household income as estimated for the previous year by the
office of financial management.
(d) A deferral is not allowed for taxes levied in the first full
calendar year in which the person owns the residence.
(e) The claimant must have and keep in force fire and casualty
insurance in sufficient amount to protect the interest of the state in
the claimant's equity value. If the claimant fails to keep fire and
casualty insurance in force to the extent of the state's interest in
the claimant's equity value, the amount deferred shall not exceed one
hundred percent of the claimant's equity value in the land or lot only.
(f) The total amount of taxes deferred, including interest thereon,
must not exceed eighty percent of the claimant's equity value in the
residence.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.38.010 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 291 s 26 are each
amended to read as follows:
The legislature finds that savings once deemed adequate for
retirement living have been rendered inadequate by increased tax rates,
increased property values, and the failure of pension systems to
adequately reflect such factors. It is therefore deemed necessary that
the legislature, in addition to that tax exemption as provided for in
RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 as now or hereafter amended, allow
retired persons to defer payment of special assessments on their
residences, and to defer their real property tax obligations on their
residences, an amount of up to eighty percent of their equity in said
property. ((This deferral program)) The deferral provided under RCW
84.38.030 is intended to assist retired persons in maintaining their
dignity and a reasonable standard of living by residing in their own
homes, providing for their own needs, and managing their own affairs
without requiring assistance from public welfare programs.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.38.050 and 1979 ex.s. c 214 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Declarations to defer property taxes for all years following
the first year under RCW 84.38.030 may be made by filing with the
county assessor no later than thirty days before the tax is due a
renewal form in duplicate, prescribed by the department of revenue and
supplied by the county assessor, which affirms the continued
eligibility of the claimant.
(b) In January of each year, the county assessor shall send to each
claimant who has been granted deferral of ad valorem taxes for the
previous year under RCW 84.38.030 renewal forms and notice to renew.
(2) Declarations to defer special assessments shall be made by
filing with the assessor no later than thirty days before the special
assessment is due on a form to be prescribed by the department of
revenue and supplied by the county assessor. Upon approval, the full
amount of special assessments upon such claimant's residence shall be
deferred but not to exceed an amount equal to eighty percent of the
claimant's equity value in said property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is effective for taxes levied for
collection in 2007 and thereafter.

--- END ---