BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.350 and 2001 c 38 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the cost to The Evergreen State College, or any regional
university, or state university, of any building, construction,
renovation, remodeling, or demolition other than maintenance or repairs
will equal or exceed the sum of ((thirty-five)) fifty thousand dollars,
complete plans and specifications for such work shall be prepared and
such work shall be put out for public bids and the contract shall be
awarded to the lowest responsible bidder if in accordance with the bid
specifications: PROVIDED, That when the estimated cost of such
building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition equals or
exceeds the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars, such project shall be
deemed a public works and "the prevailing rate of wage," under chapter
39.12 RCW shall be applicable thereto: PROVIDED FURTHER, That when
such building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition
involves one trade or craft area and the estimated cost exceeds
((fifteen)) twenty thousand dollars, complete plans and specifications
for such work shall be prepared and such work shall be put out for
public bids, and the contract shall be awarded to the lowest
responsible bidder if in accordance with the bid specifications. This
subsection shall not apply when a contract is awarded by the small
works roster procedure authorized in RCW 39.04.155 or under any other
procedure authorized for an institution of higher education.
(2) The Evergreen State College, any regional university, or state
university may require a project to be put to public bid even when it
is not required to do so under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Where the estimated cost to The Evergreen State College, or any
regional university, or state university of any building, construction,
renovation, remodeling, or demolition is less than twenty-five thousand
dollars or the contract is awarded by the small works roster procedure
authorized in RCW 39.04.155, the publication requirements of RCW
39.04.020 shall be inapplicable.
(4) In the event of any emergency when the public interest or
property of The Evergreen State College, regional university, or state
university would suffer material injury or damage by delay, the
president of such college or university may declare the existence of
such an emergency and reciting the facts constituting the same may
waive the requirements of this section with reference to any contract
in order to correct the condition causing the emergency: PROVIDED,
That an "emergency," for the purposes of this section, means a
condition likely to result in immediate physical injury to persons or
to property of such college or university in the absence of prompt
remedial action or a condition which immediately impairs the
institution's ability to perform its educational obligations.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.50.330 and 1993 c 379 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
The boards of trustees of college districts are empowered in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter to provide for the
construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, demolition, and
major alterations of buildings and other capital assets, and the
acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements, or
appurtenances for the use of the aforementioned colleges as authorized
by the college board in accordance with RCW 28B.50.140; to be financed
by bonds payable out of special funds from revenues hereafter derived
from income received from such facilities, gifts, bequests, or grants,
and such additional funds as the legislature may provide, and payable
out of a bond retirement fund to be established by the respective
district boards in accordance with rules and regulations of the state
board. With respect to building, improvements, or repairs, or other
work, where the estimated cost exceeds ((twenty-five)) fifty thousand
dollars, complete plans and specifications for such work shall be
prepared and such work shall be put out for public bids and the
contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder if in
accordance with the bid specifications: PROVIDED, That when such
building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition involves
one trade or craft area and the estimated cost exceeds ((ten)) twenty
thousand dollars, complete plans and specifications for such work shall
be prepared and such work shall be put out for public bids, and the
contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder if in
accordance with the bid specifications. This subsection shall not
apply when a contract is awarded by the small works procedure as
authorized ((in RCW 39.04.150)) by state law: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
any project regardless of dollar amount may be put to public bid.
Where the estimated cost to any college of any building,
improvements, or repairs, or other work, is less than twenty-five
thousand dollars, the publication requirements of RCW 39.04.020 shall
be inapplicable.

--- END ---