BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.80.050 and 2002 c 354 s 306 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as may be specifically limited by this chapter, employees
shall have the right to self-organization, to form, join, or assist
employee organizations, and to bargain collectively through
representatives of their own choosing for the purpose of collective
bargaining free from interference, restraint, or coercion. Employees
shall also have the right to refrain from any or all such activities
((except to the extent that they may be required to pay a fee to an
exclusive bargaining representative under a union security provision
authorized by this chapter)).

Sec. 2 RCW 41.80.100 and 2002 c 354 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A collective bargaining agreement may contain a union security
provision requiring as a condition of employment the payment, no later
than the thirtieth day following the beginning of employment or July 1,
2004, whichever is later, of an agency shop fee to the employee
organization that is the exclusive bargaining representative for the
bargaining unit in which the employee is employed. The amount of the
fee shall be equal to the amount required to become a member in good
standing of the employee organization. Each employee organization
shall establish a procedure by which any employee so requesting may pay
a representation fee no greater than the part of the membership fee
that represents a pro rata share of expenditures for purposes germane
to the collective bargaining process, to contract administration, or to
pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of
employment. However, the union security provision shall not be renewed
or extended beyond July 1, 2007.
(2) An employee who is covered by a union security provision and
who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide religious
tenets, or teachings of a church or religious body of which the
employee is a member, shall, as a condition of employment, make
payments to the employee organization, for purposes within the program
of the employee organization as designated by the employee that would
be in harmony with his or her individual conscience. The amount of the
payments shall be equal to the periodic dues and fees uniformly
required as a condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the
employee organization minus any included monthly premiums for insurance
programs sponsored by the employee organization. The employee shall
not be a member of the employee organization but is entitled to all the
representation rights of a member of the employee organization.
(3) Upon filing with the employer the written authorization of a
bargaining unit employee under this chapter, the employee organization
that is the exclusive bargaining representative of the bargaining unit
shall have the exclusive right to have deducted from the salary of the
employee an amount equal to the fees and dues uniformly required as a
condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the employee
organization. The fees and dues shall be deducted each pay period from
the pay of all employees who have given authorization for the deduction
and shall be transmitted by the employer as provided for by agreement
between the employer and the employee organization.
(4) Employee organizations that before July 1, 2004, were entitled
to the benefits of this section shall continue to be entitled to these
benefits. However, the benefits shall not be renewed or extended
beyond July 1, 2007.
(5) A collective bargaining agreement effective July 1, 2007, and
beyond may not contain a union security provision requiring as a
condition of employment the payment of an agency shop fee to the
employee organization that is the exclusive bargaining representative
for the bargaining unit in which the employee is employed. A
collective bargaining agreement may not require any other fees or
payments as a condition of employment.

--- END ---