BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.52.045 and 1987 c 314 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon filing with the employer the voluntary written
authorization of a bargaining unit employee under this chapter, the
employee organization which is the exclusive bargaining representative
of the bargaining unit shall have the right to have deducted from the
salary of the bargaining unit employee the periodic dues and initiation
fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring or retaining
membership in the exclusive bargaining representative. Such employee
authorization shall not be irrevocable for a period of more than one
year. Such dues and fees shall be deducted from the pay of all
employees who have given authorization for such deduction, and shall be
transmitted by the employer to the employee organization or to the
depository designated by the employee organization.
(2) A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions, but not a closed shop. If an agency shop or other union
security provision is agreed to((,)): (a) The employer shall enforce
any such provision by deductions from the salary of bargaining unit
employees affected thereby and shall transmit such funds to the
employee organization or to the depository designated by the employee
organization; and (b) the exclusive bargaining representative must act
in accordance with section 2 of this act.
(3) An employee who is covered by a union security provision and
who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide religious
tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which such
employee is a member shall pay to a nonreligious charity or other
charitable organization an amount of money equivalent to the periodic
dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring
or retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining representative.
The charity shall be agreed upon by the employee and the employee
organization to which such employee would otherwise pay the dues and
fees. The employee shall furnish written proof that such payments have
been made. If the employee and the employee organization do not reach
agreement on such matter, the commission shall designate the charitable
organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an agency shop or other union security provision is agreed
to, the exclusive bargaining representative must annually, not more
than ninety days after the end of its fiscal year, provide financial
disclosure information to all members of the bargaining unit and to the
general public by filing with the commission a report containing the
following information, detailed by functional spending categories, that
accurately discloses its financial condition and operations for the
preceding fiscal year:
(a) Assets and liabilities at the beginning and end of the fiscal
year;
(b) Salary, the cost of fringe benefits, allowances, and other
direct or indirect disbursements to each officer of the local, the
exclusive bargaining representative, and the support staff, as well as
all contributions to state or national affiliates and any official or
employee thereof;
(c) All income received or the value of services furnished to an
exclusive bargaining representative by either a parent affiliated labor
organization or by any other labor organization on behalf of the
exclusive bargaining representative;
(d) An itemization of the total amount spent by the exclusive
bargaining representative for:
(i) Contract negotiation and administration;
(ii) Organizing activities;
(iii) Strike activities;
(iv) Litigation, specifying the matters and cases involved;
(v) Public relations activities;
(vi) Political activities;
(vii) Activities attempting to influence the passage or defeat of
federal, state, or local legislation or the content or enforcement of
federal, state, or local regulations or policies;
(viii) Voter education and issue advocacy activities;
(ix) Training activities for each officer of the exclusive
bargaining representative or employee organization support staff; and
(x) Conference, convention, and travel activities engaged in by the
exclusive bargaining representative;
(e) The percentage of the exclusive bargaining representative's
total expenditures that were spent for each of the activities described
in (d)(i) through (x) of this subsection;
(f) The names, addresses, and activities of any of the law firms,
public relations firms, or lobbyists whose services are used by the
exclusive bargaining representative for any activity described in
(d)(iv) through (x) of this subsection;
(g) A list of political candidates, political organizations,
charitable organizations, nonprofit organizations, and community
organizations to which the exclusive bargaining representative
contributed financial or in-kind assistance and the dollar amount of
such assistance; and
(h) The name and address of any political action committees with
which the exclusive bargaining representative is affiliated or to whom
it provides contributions, the total amount of contributions to such
committees, the candidates or causes to which such committees provided
any financial assistance, and the amount provided to each such
candidate or cause.
(2) The report required in subsection (1) of this section must be
prepared by an auditing organization, independent of the exclusive
bargaining representative, using generally accepted auditing standards
and generally accepted accounting principles, that ensures the accuracy
and veracity of the information provided by the exclusive bargaining
representative. All expenditures must be reported as either germane to
collective bargaining, contract administration, or grievance
processing, or not so related.
(3) The exclusive bargaining representative must disclose
information to all members of the bargaining unit and to the general
public by filing with the commission a report signed by its president
and secretary or corresponding principal officers, and containing the
following information:
(a) The name of the labor organization, its mailing address, and
any other address at which it maintains its principal office or at
which it keeps records;
(b) The name and title of each of its officers;
(c) The initiation fee or fees required from a new or transferred
member;
(d) The regular dues or fees or other periodic payments required to
remain a member of the reporting labor organization; and
(e) Detailed statements regarding the provisions made and
procedures followed with respect to each of the following:
(i) Qualifications for, or restrictions on, membership;
(ii) Levying of assessments;
(iii) Participating in insurance or other benefit plans;
(iv) Authorization for disbursement of funds of the labor
organization;
(v) Audit of financial transaction of the labor organization;
(vi) The calling of regular and special meetings;
(vii) The selection of officers and stewards;
(viii) Discipline or removal of officers or agents;
(ix) Imposition of fines, suspensions, and expulsions of members,
including the grounds for such action and any provision made for
notice, hearing, judgment, and appeal;
(x) Authorization for bargaining demands; and
(xi) Ratification of contract terms.
(4) Any change in the information required by subsection (3) of
this section must be reported to the commission at the time the
exclusive bargaining representative files with the commission the
annual financial report required in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) If, on a petition filed by the employer or any member of the
bargaining unit before expiration of the applicable union security
provision, the commission finds that an exclusive bargaining
representative has violated this subsection by failing or refusing to
prepare the reports as required in subsection (1) or (2) of this
section or by preparing an incomplete or inaccurate report, the
commission shall order the refund of all membership dues or agency shop
fees to members of the bargaining unit for the period covered by the
report. On finding a second violation by the exclusive bargaining
representative, the commission shall also order an employee election in
the affected bargaining unit to determine whether the employee
organization will continue to be the exclusive bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit. The election shall be conducted
upon the expiration of the existing collective bargaining agreement
covering the affected bargaining unit.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.80.100 and 2002 c 354 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A collective bargaining agreement may contain a union security
provision requiring as a condition of employment the payment, no later
than the thirtieth day following the beginning of employment or July 1,
2004, whichever is later, of an agency shop fee to the employee
organization that is the exclusive bargaining representative for the
bargaining unit in which the employee is employed. The amount of the
fee shall be equal to the amount required to become a member in good
standing of the employee organization. Each employee organization
shall establish a procedure by which any employee so requesting may pay
a representation fee no greater than the part of the membership fee
that represents a pro rata share of expenditures for purposes germane
to the collective bargaining process, to contract administration, or to
pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of
employment.
(2) An employee who is covered by a union security provision and
who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide religious
tenets, or teachings of a church or religious body of which the
employee is a member, shall, as a condition of employment, make
payments to the employee organization, for purposes within the program
of the employee organization as designated by the employee that would
be in harmony with his or her individual conscience. The amount of the
payments shall be equal to the periodic dues and fees uniformly
required as a condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the
employee organization minus any included monthly premiums for insurance
programs sponsored by the employee organization. The employee shall
not be a member of the employee organization but is entitled to all the
representation rights of a member of the employee organization.
(3) Upon filing with the employer the written authorization of a
bargaining unit employee under this chapter, the employee organization
that is the exclusive bargaining representative of the bargaining unit
shall have the exclusive right to have deducted from the salary of the
employee an amount equal to the fees and dues uniformly required as a
condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the employee
organization. The fees and dues shall be deducted each pay period from
the pay of all employees who have given authorization for the deduction
and shall be transmitted by the employer as provided for by agreement
between the employer and the employee organization.
(4) Employee organizations that before July 1, 2004, were entitled
to the benefits of this section shall continue to be entitled to these
benefits.
(5) If a union security provision is agreed to, the exclusive
bargaining representative must act in accordance with section 4 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a union security provision is agreed to, the exclusive
bargaining representative must annually, not more than ninety days
after the end of its fiscal year, provide financial disclosure
information to all members of the bargaining unit and to the general
public by filing with the commission a report containing the following
information, detailed by functional spending categories, that
accurately discloses its financial condition and operations for the
preceding fiscal year:
(a) Assets and liabilities at the beginning and end of the fiscal
year;
(b) Salary, the cost of fringe benefits, allowances, and other
direct or indirect disbursements to each officer of the local, the
exclusive bargaining representative, and the support staff, as well as
all contributions to state or national affiliates and any official or
employee thereof;
(c) All income received or the value of services furnished to an
exclusive bargaining representative by either a parent affiliated labor
organization or by any other labor organization on behalf of the
exclusive bargaining representative;
(d) An itemization of the total amount spent by the exclusive
bargaining representative for:
(i) Contract negotiation and administration;
(ii) Organizing activities;
(iii) Strike activities;
(iv) Litigation, specifying the matters and cases involved;
(v) Public relations activities;
(vi) Political activities;
(vii) Activities attempting to influence the passage or defeat of
federal, state, or local legislation or the content or enforcement of
federal, state, or local regulations or policies;
(viii) Voter education and issue advocacy activities;
(ix) Training activities for each officer of the exclusive
bargaining representative or employee organization support staff; and
(x) Conference, convention, and travel activities engaged in by the
exclusive bargaining representative;
(e) The percentage of the exclusive bargaining representative's
total expenditures that were spent for each of the activities described
in (d)(i) through (x) of this subsection;
(f) The names, addresses, and activities of any of the law firms,
public relations firms, or lobbyists whose services are used by the
exclusive bargaining representative for any activity described in
(d)(iv) through (x) of this subsection;
(g) A list of political candidates, political organizations,
charitable organizations, nonprofit organizations, and community
organizations to which the exclusive bargaining representative
contributed financial or in-kind assistance and the dollar amount of
such assistance; and
(h) The name and address of any political action committees with
which the exclusive bargaining representative is affiliated or to whom
it provides contributions, the total amount of contributions to such
committees, the candidates or causes to which such committees provided
any financial assistance, and the amount provided to each such
candidate or cause.
(2) The report required in subsection (1) of this section must be
prepared by an auditing organization, independent of the exclusive
bargaining representative, using generally accepted auditing standards
and generally accepted accounting principles, that ensures the accuracy
and veracity of the information provided by the exclusive bargaining
representative. All expenditures must be reported as either germane to
collective bargaining, contract administration, or grievance
processing, or not so related.
(3) The exclusive bargaining representative must disclose
information to all members of the bargaining unit and to the general
public by filing with the commission a report signed by its president
and secretary or corresponding principal officers, and containing the
following information:
(a) The name of the labor organization, its mailing address, and
any other address at which it maintains its principal office or at
which it keeps records;
(b) The name and title of each of its officers;
(c) The initiation fee or fees required from a new or transferred
member;
(d) The regular dues or fees or other periodic payments required to
remain a member of the reporting labor organization; and
(e) Detailed statements regarding the provisions made and
procedures followed with respect to each of the following:
(i) Qualifications for, or restrictions on, membership;
(ii) Levying of assessments;
(iii) Participating in insurance or other benefit plans;
(iv) Authorization for disbursement of funds of the labor
organization;
(v) Audit of financial transaction of the labor organization;
(vi) The calling of regular and special meetings;
(vii) The selection of officers and stewards;
(viii) Discipline or removal of officers or agents;
(ix) Imposition of fines, suspensions, and expulsions of members,
including the grounds for such action and any provision made for
notice, hearing, judgment, and appeal;
(x) Authorization for bargaining demands; and
(xi) Ratification of contract terms.
(4) Any change in the information required by subsection (3) of
this section must be reported to the commission at the time the
exclusive bargaining representative files with the commission the
annual financial report required in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) If, on a petition filed by the employer or any member of the
bargaining unit before expiration of the applicable union security
provision, the commission finds that an exclusive bargaining
representative has violated this subsection by failing or refusing to
prepare the reports as required in subsection (1) or (2) of this
section or by preparing an incomplete or inaccurate report, the
commission shall order the refund of all membership dues or agency shop
fees to members of the bargaining unit for the period covered by the
report. On finding a second violation by the exclusive bargaining
representative, the commission shall also order an employee election in
the affected bargaining unit to determine whether the employee
organization will continue to be the exclusive bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit. The election shall be conducted
upon the expiration of the existing collective bargaining agreement
covering the affected bargaining unit.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.56.122 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 22 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A collective bargaining agreement may:
(((1))) (a) Contain union security provisions((: PROVIDED, That
nothing in this section shall authorize)). However, the union security
provision may not contain a closed shop provision((: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That)). Agreements involving union security provisions must safeguard
the right of nonassociation of public employees based on bona fide
religious tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which
such public employee is a member. Such public employee shall pay an
amount of money equivalent to regular union dues and initiation fee to
a nonreligious charity or to another charitable organization mutually
agreed upon by the public employee affected and the bargaining
representative to which such public employee would otherwise pay the
dues and initiation fee. The public employee shall furnish written
proof that such payment has been made. If the public employee and the
bargaining representative do not reach agreement on such matter, the
commission shall designate the charitable organization. When there is
a conflict between any collective bargaining agreement reached by a
public employer and a bargaining representative on a union security
provision and any charter, ordinance, rule, or regulation adopted by
the public employer or its agents, including but not limited to, a
civil service commission, the terms of the collective bargaining
agreement shall prevail.
(((2))) (b) Provide for binding arbitration of a labor dispute
arising from the application or the interpretation of the matters
contained in a collective bargaining agreement.
(2) If a union security agreement is agreed to, the bargaining
representative must act in accordance with section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a union security provision is agreed to, the bargaining
representative must annually, not more than ninety days after the end
of its fiscal year, provide financial disclosure information to all
members of the bargaining unit and to the general public by filing with
the commission a report containing the following information, detailed
by functional spending categories, that accurately discloses its
financial condition and operations for the preceding fiscal year:
(a) Assets and liabilities at the beginning and end of the fiscal
year;
(b) Salary, the cost of fringe benefits, allowances, and other
direct or indirect disbursements to each officer of the local, the
bargaining representative, and the support staff, as well as all
contributions to state or national affiliates and any official or
employee thereof;
(c) All income received or the value of services furnished to a
bargaining representative by either a parent affiliated labor
organization or by any other labor organization on behalf of the
bargaining representative;
(d) An itemization of the total amount spent by the bargaining
representative for:
(i) Contract negotiation and administration;
(ii) Organizing activities;
(iii) Strike activities;
(iv) Litigation, specifying the matters and cases involved;
(v) Public relations activities;
(vi) Political activities;
(vii) Activities attempting to influence the passage or defeat of
federal, state, or local legislation or the content or enforcement of
federal, state, or local regulations or policies;
(viii) Voter education and issue advocacy activities;
(ix) Training activities for each officer of the bargaining
representative or employee organization support staff; and
(x) Conference, convention, and travel activities engaged in by the
bargaining representative;
(e) The percentage of the bargaining representative's total
expenditures that were spent for each of the activities described in
(d)(i) through (x) of this subsection;
(f) The names, addresses, and activities of any of the law firms,
public relations firms, or lobbyists whose services are used by the
bargaining representative for any activity described in (d)(iv) through
(x) of this subsection;
(g) A list of political candidates, political organizations,
charitable organizations, nonprofit organizations, and community
organizations to which the bargaining representative contributed
financial or in-kind assistance and the dollar amount of such
assistance; and
(h) The name and address of any political action committees with
which the bargaining representative is affiliated or to whom it
provides contributions, the total amount of contributions to such
committees, the candidates or causes to which such committees provided
any financial assistance, and the amount provided to each such
candidate or cause.
(2) The report required in subsection (1) of this section must be
prepared by an auditing organization, independent of the bargaining
representative, using generally accepted auditing standards and
generally accepted accounting principles, that ensures the accuracy and
veracity of the information provided by the bargaining representative.
All expenditures must be reported as either germane to collective
bargaining, contract administration, or grievance processing, or not so
related.
(3) The bargaining representative must disclose information to all
members of the bargaining unit and to the general public by filing with
the commission a report signed by its president and secretary or
corresponding principal officers, and containing the following
information:
(a) The name of the labor organization, its mailing address, and
any other address at which it maintains its principal office or at
which it keeps records;
(b) The name and title of each of its officers;
(c) The initiation fee or fees required from a new or transferred
member;
(d) The regular dues or fees or other periodic payments required to
remain a member of the reporting labor organization; and
(e) Detailed statements regarding the provisions made and
procedures followed with respect to each of the following:
(i) Qualifications for, or restrictions on, membership;
(ii) Levying of assessments;
(iii) Participating in insurance or other benefit plans;
(iv) Authorization for disbursement of funds of the labor
organization;
(v) Audit of financial transaction of the labor organization;
(vi) The calling of regular and special meetings;
(vii) The selection of officers and stewards;
(viii) Discipline or removal of officers or agents;
(ix) Imposition of fines, suspensions, and expulsions of members,
including the grounds for such action and any provision made for
notice, hearing, judgment, and appeal;
(x) Authorization for bargaining demands; and
(xi) Ratification of contract terms.
(4) Any change in the information required by subsection (3) of
this section must be reported to the commission at the time the
bargaining representative files with the commission the annual
financial report required in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) If, on a petition filed by the employer or any member of the
bargaining unit before expiration of the applicable union security
provision, the commission finds that a bargaining representative has
violated this subsection by failing or refusing to prepare the reports
as required in subsection (1) or (2) of this section or by preparing an
incomplete or inaccurate report, the commission shall order the refund
of all membership dues or agency shop fees to members of the bargaining
unit for the period covered by the report. On finding a second
violation by the bargaining representative, the commission shall also
order an employee election in the affected bargaining unit to determine
whether the employee organization will continue to be the bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit. The election shall be conducted
upon the expiration of the existing collective bargaining agreement
covering the affected bargaining unit.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.59.100 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions including an agency shop, but not a union or closed shop.
If an agency shop provision is agreed to((,)): (1) The employer shall
enforce it by deducting from the salary payments to members of the
bargaining unit the dues required of membership in the bargaining
representative, or, for nonmembers thereof, a fee equivalent to such
dues; and (2) the exclusive bargaining representative must act in
accordance with section 8 of this act. All union security provisions
must safeguard the right of nonassociation of employees based on bona
fide religious tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of
which such employee is a member. Such employee shall pay an amount of
money equivalent to regular dues and fees to a nonreligious charity or
to another charitable organization mutually agreed upon by the employee
affected and the bargaining representative to which such employee would
otherwise pay the dues and fees. The employee shall furnish written
proof that such payment has been made. If the employee and the
bargaining representative do not reach agreement on such matter, the
commission shall designate the charitable organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an agency shop provision is agreed to, the exclusive
bargaining representative must annually, not more than ninety days
after the end of its fiscal year, provide financial disclosure
information to all members of the bargaining unit and to the general
public by filing with the commission a report containing the following
information, detailed by functional spending categories, that
accurately discloses its financial condition and operations for the
preceding fiscal year:
(a) Assets and liabilities at the beginning and end of the fiscal
year;
(b) Salary, the cost of fringe benefits, allowances, and other
direct or indirect disbursements to each officer of the local, the
exclusive bargaining representative, and the support staff, as well as
all contributions to state or national affiliates and any official or
employee thereof;
(c) All income received or the value of services furnished to an
exclusive bargaining representative by either a parent affiliated labor
organization or by any other labor organization on behalf of the
exclusive bargaining representative;
(d) An itemization of the total amount spent by the exclusive
bargaining representative for:
(i) Contract negotiation and administration;
(ii) Organizing activities;
(iii) Strike activities;
(iv) Litigation, specifying the matters and cases involved;
(v) Public relations activities;
(vi) Political activities;
(vii) Activities attempting to influence the passage or defeat of
federal, state, or local legislation or the content or enforcement of
federal, state, or local regulations or policies;
(viii) Voter education and issue advocacy activities;
(ix) Training activities for each officer of the exclusive
bargaining representative or employee organization support staff; and
(x) Conference, convention, and travel activities engaged in by the
exclusive bargaining representative;
(e) The percentage of the exclusive bargaining representative's
total expenditures that were spent for each of the activities described
in (d)(i) through (x) of this subsection;
(f) The names, addresses, and activities of any of the law firms,
public relations firms, or lobbyists whose services are used by the
exclusive bargaining representative for any activity described in
(d)(iv) through (x) of this subsection;
(g) A list of political candidates, political organizations,
charitable organizations, nonprofit organizations, and community
organizations to which the exclusive bargaining representative
contributed financial or in-kind assistance and the dollar amount of
such assistance; and
(h) The name and address of any political action committees with
which the exclusive bargaining representative is affiliated or to whom
it provides contributions, the total amount of contributions to such
committees, the candidates or causes to which such committees provided
any financial assistance, and the amount provided to each such
candidate or cause.
(2) The report required in subsection (1) of this section must be
prepared by an auditing organization, independent of the exclusive
bargaining representative, using generally accepted auditing standards
and generally accepted accounting principles, that ensures the accuracy
and veracity of the information provided by the exclusive bargaining
representative. All expenditures must be reported as either germane to
collective bargaining, contract administration, or grievance
processing, or not so related.
(3) The exclusive bargaining representative must disclose
information to all members of the bargaining unit and to the general
public by filing with the commission a report signed by its president
and secretary or corresponding principal officers, and containing the
following information:
(a) The name of the labor organization, its mailing address, and
any other address at which it maintains its principal office or at
which it keeps records;
(b) The name and title of each of its officers;
(c) The initiation fee or fees required from a new or transferred
member;
(d) The regular dues or fees or other periodic payments required to
remain a member of the reporting labor organization; and
(e) Detailed statements regarding the provisions made and
procedures followed with respect to each of the following:
(i) Qualifications for, or restrictions on, membership;
(ii) Levying of assessments;
(iii) Participating in insurance or other benefit plans;
(iv) Authorization for disbursement of funds of the labor
organization;
(v) Audit of financial transaction of the labor organization;
(vi) The calling of regular and special meetings;
(vii) The selection of officers and stewards;
(viii) Discipline or removal of officers or agents;
(ix) Imposition of fines, suspensions, and expulsions of members,
including the grounds for such action and any provision made for
notice, hearing, judgment, and appeal;
(x) Authorization for bargaining demands; and
(xi) Ratification of contract terms.
(4) Any change in the information required by subsection (3) of
this section must be reported to the commission at the time the
exclusive bargaining representative files with the commission the
annual financial report required in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) If, on a petition filed by the employer or any member of the
bargaining unit before expiration of the applicable union security
provision, the commission finds that an exclusive bargaining
representative has violated this subsection by failing or refusing to
prepare the reports as required in subsection (1) or (2) of this
section or by preparing an incomplete or inaccurate report, the
commission shall order the refund of all membership dues or agency shop
fees to members of the bargaining unit for the period covered by the
report. On finding a second violation by the exclusive bargaining
representative, the commission shall also order an employee election in
the affected bargaining unit to determine whether the employee
organization will continue to be the exclusive bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit. The election shall be conducted
upon the expiration of the existing collective bargaining agreement
covering the affected bargaining unit.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.76.045 and 2002 c 356 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon filing with the employer the voluntary written
authorization of a bargaining unit faculty member under this chapter,
the employee organization which is the exclusive bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit shall have the right to have
deducted from the salary of the bargaining unit faculty member the
periodic dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of
acquiring or retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining
representative. Such employee authorization shall not be irrevocable
for a period of more than one year. Such dues and fees shall be
deducted from the pay of all faculty members who have given
authorization for such deduction, and shall be transmitted by the
employer to the employee organization or to the depository designated
by the employee organization.
(2) A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions, but not a closed shop. If an agency shop or other union
security provision is agreed to((,)): (a) The employer shall enforce
any such provision by deductions from the salary of bargaining unit
faculty members affected thereby and shall transmit such funds to the
employee organization or to the depository designated by the employee
organization; and (b) the exclusive bargaining representative must act
in accordance with section 10 of this act.
(3) A faculty member who is covered by a union security provision
and who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide religious
tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which such faculty
member is a member shall pay to a nonreligious charity or other
charitable organization an amount of money equivalent to the periodic
dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring
or retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining representative.
The charity shall be agreed upon by the faculty member and the employee
organization to which such faculty member would otherwise pay the dues
and fees. The faculty member shall furnish written proof that such
payments have been made. If the faculty member and the employee
organization do not reach agreement on such matter, the dispute shall
be submitted to the commission for determination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 41.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an agency shop or other union security provision is agreed
to, the exclusive bargaining representative must annually, not more
than ninety days after the end of its fiscal year, provide financial
disclosure information to all members of the bargaining unit and to the
general public by filing with the commission a report containing the
following information, detailed by functional spending categories, that
accurately discloses its financial condition and operations for the
preceding fiscal year:
(a) Assets and liabilities at the beginning and end of the fiscal
year;
(b) Salary, the cost of fringe benefits, allowances, and other
direct or indirect disbursements to each officer of the local, the
exclusive bargaining representative, and the support staff, as well as
all contributions to state or national affiliates and any official or
employee thereof;
(c) All income received or the value of services furnished to an
exclusive bargaining representative by either a parent affiliated labor
organization or by any other labor organization on behalf of the
exclusive bargaining representative;
(d) An itemization of the total amount spent by the exclusive
bargaining representative for:
(i) Contract negotiation and administration;
(ii) Organizing activities;
(iii) Strike activities;
(iv) Litigation, specifying the matters and cases involved;
(v) Public relations activities;
(vi) Political activities;
(vii) Activities attempting to influence the passage or defeat of
federal, state, or local legislation or the content or enforcement of
federal, state, or local regulations or policies;
(viii) Voter education and issue advocacy activities;
(ix) Training activities for each officer of the exclusive
bargaining representative or employee organization support staff; and
(x) Conference, convention, and travel activities engaged in by the
exclusive bargaining representative;
(e) The percentage of the exclusive bargaining representative's
total expenditures that were spent for each of the activities described
in (d)(i) through (x) of this subsection;
(f) The names, addresses, and activities of any of the law firms,
public relations firms, or lobbyists whose services are used by the
exclusive bargaining representative for any activity described in
(d)(iv) through (x) of this subsection;
(g) A list of political candidates, political organizations,
charitable organizations, nonprofit organizations, and community
organizations to which the exclusive bargaining representative
contributed financial or in-kind assistance and the dollar amount of
such assistance; and
(h) The name and address of any political action committees with
which the exclusive bargaining representative is affiliated or to whom
it provides contributions, the total amount of contributions to such
committees, the candidates or causes to which such committees provided
any financial assistance, and the amount provided to each such
candidate or cause.
(2) The report required in subsection (1) of this section must be
prepared by an auditing organization, independent of the exclusive
bargaining representative, using generally accepted auditing standards
and generally accepted accounting principles, that ensures the accuracy
and veracity of the information provided by the exclusive bargaining
representative. All expenditures must be reported as either germane to
collective bargaining, contract administration, or grievance
processing, or not so related.
(3) The exclusive bargaining representative must disclose
information to all members of the bargaining unit and to the general
public by filing with the commission a report signed by its president
and secretary or corresponding principal officers, and containing the
following information:
(a) The name of the labor organization, its mailing address, and
any other address at which it maintains its principal office or at
which it keeps records;
(b) The name and title of each of its officers;
(c) The initiation fee or fees required from a new or transferred
member;
(d) The regular dues or fees or other periodic payments required to
remain a member of the reporting labor organization; and
(e) Detailed statements regarding the provisions made and
procedures followed with respect to each of the following:
(i) Qualifications for, or restrictions on, membership;
(ii) Levying of assessments;
(iii) Participating in insurance or other benefit plans;
(iv) Authorization for disbursement of funds of the labor
organization;
(v) Audit of financial transaction of the labor organization;
(vi) The calling of regular and special meetings;
(vii) The selection of officers and stewards;
(viii) Discipline or removal of officers or agents;
(ix) Imposition of fines, suspensions, and expulsions of members,
including the grounds for such action and any provision made for
notice, hearing, judgment, and appeal;
(x) Authorization for bargaining demands; and
(xi) Ratification of contract terms.
(4) Any change in the information required by subsection (3) of
this section must be reported to the commission at the time the
exclusive bargaining representative files with the commission the
annual financial report required in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) If, on a petition filed by the employer or any member of the
bargaining unit before expiration of the applicable union security
provision, the commission finds that an exclusive bargaining
representative has violated this subsection by failing or refusing to
prepare the reports as required in subsection (1) or (2) of this
section or by preparing an incomplete or inaccurate report, the
commission shall order the refund of all membership dues or agency shop
fees to members of the bargaining unit for the period covered by the
report. On finding a second violation by the exclusive bargaining
representative, the commission shall also order an employee election in
the affected bargaining unit to determine whether the employee
organization will continue to be the exclusive bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit. The election shall be conducted
upon the expiration of the existing collective bargaining agreement
covering the affected bargaining unit.

Sec. 11 RCW 47.64.160 and 1983 c 15 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions including an agency shop, but not a union or closed shop.
If an agency shop provision is agreed to((,)): (1) The employer shall
enforce it by deducting from the salary payments to members of the
bargaining unit the dues required of membership in the bargaining
representative, or, for nonmembers thereof, a fee equivalent to such
dues; and (2) the bargaining representative must act in accordance with
section 12 of this act. All union security provisions shall safeguard
the right of nonassociation of employees based on bona fide religious
tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which such
employee is a member. Such employee shall pay an amount of money
equivalent to regular dues and fees to a nonreligious charity or to
another charitable organization mutually agreed upon by the employee
affected and the bargaining representative to which such employee would
otherwise pay the dues and fees. The employee shall furnish written
proof that such payment has been made. If the employee and the
bargaining representative do not reach agreement on such matter, the
commission shall designate the charitable organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an agency shop provision is agreed to, the bargaining
representative must annually, not more than ninety days after the end
of its fiscal year, provide financial disclosure information to all
members of the bargaining unit and to the general public by filing with
the public employment relations commission a report containing the
following information, detailed by functional spending categories, that
accurately discloses its financial condition and operations for the
preceding fiscal year:
(a) Assets and liabilities at the beginning and end of the fiscal
year;
(b) Salary, the cost of fringe benefits, allowances, and other
direct or indirect disbursements to each officer of the local, the
bargaining representative, and the support staff, as well as all
contributions to state or national affiliates and any official or
employee thereof;
(c) All income received or the value of services furnished to a
bargaining representative by either a parent affiliated labor
organization or by any other labor organization on behalf of the
bargaining representative;
(d) An itemization of the total amount spent by the bargaining
representative for:
(i) Contract negotiation and administration;
(ii) Organizing activities;
(iii) Strike activities;
(iv) Litigation, specifying the matters and cases involved;
(v) Public relations activities;
(vi) Political activities;
(vii) Activities attempting to influence the passage or defeat of
federal, state, or local legislation or the content or enforcement of
federal, state, or local regulations or policies;
(viii) Voter education and issue advocacy activities;
(ix) Training activities for each officer of the bargaining
representative or employee organization support staff; and
(x) Conference, convention, and travel activities engaged in by the
bargaining representative;
(e) The percentage of the bargaining representative's total
expenditures that were spent for each of the activities described in
(d)(i) through (x) of this subsection;
(f) The names, addresses, and activities of any of the law firms,
public relations firms, or lobbyists whose services are used by the
bargaining representative for any activity described in (d)(iv) through
(x) of this subsection;
(g) A list of political candidates, political organizations,
charitable organizations, nonprofit organizations, and community
organizations to which the bargaining representative contributed
financial or in-kind assistance and the dollar amount of such
assistance; and
(h) The name and address of any political action committees with
which the bargaining representative is affiliated or to whom it
provides contributions, the total amount of contributions to such
committees, the candidates or causes to which such committees provided
any financial assistance, and the amount provided to each such
candidate or cause.
(2) The report required in subsection (1) of this section must be
prepared by an auditing organization, independent of the bargaining
representative, using generally accepted auditing standards and
generally accepted accounting principles, that ensures the accuracy and
veracity of the information provided by the bargaining representative.
All expenditures must be reported as either germane to collective
bargaining, contract administration, or grievance processing, or not so
related.
(3) The bargaining representative must disclose information to all
members of the bargaining unit and to the general public by filing with
the commission a report signed by its president and secretary or
corresponding principal officers, and containing the following
information:
(a) The name of the labor organization, its mailing address, and
any other address at which it maintains its principal office or at
which it keeps records;
(b) The name and title of each of its officers;
(c) The initiation fee or fees required from a new or transferred
member;
(d) The regular dues or fees or other periodic payments required to
remain a member of the reporting labor organization; and
(e) Detailed statements regarding the provisions made and
procedures followed with respect to each of the following:
(i) Qualifications for, or restrictions on, membership;
(ii) Levying of assessments;
(iii) Participating in insurance or other benefit plans;
(iv) Authorization for disbursement of funds of the labor
organization;
(v) Audit of financial transaction of the labor organization;
(vi) The calling of regular and special meetings;
(vii) The selection of officers and stewards;
(viii) Discipline or removal of officers or agents;
(ix) Imposition of fines, suspensions, and expulsions of members,
including the grounds for such action and any provision made for
notice, hearing, judgment, and appeal;
(x) Authorization for bargaining demands; and
(xi) Ratification of contract terms.
(4) Any change in the information required by subsection (3) of
this section must be reported to the commission at the time the
bargaining representative files with the commission the annual
financial report required in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) If, on a petition filed by the employer or any member of the
bargaining unit before expiration of the applicable union security
provision, the commission finds that a bargaining representative has
violated this subsection by failing or refusing to prepare the reports
as required in subsection (1) or (2) of this section or by preparing an
incomplete or inaccurate report, the commission shall order the refund
of all membership dues or agency shop fees to members of the bargaining
unit for the period covered by the report. On finding a second
violation by the bargaining representative, the commission shall also
order an employee election in the affected bargaining unit to determine
whether the employee organization will continue to be the bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit. The election shall be conducted
upon the expiration of the existing collective bargaining agreement
covering the affected bargaining unit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---