BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW
to read as follows:
The health care authority, in coordination with the department of
social and health services, shall by December 1st of each year report
to the legislature for each month of the preceding fiscal year the
number of basic health plan enrollees who were employed, or who were
the spouse or dependent child of someone who was employed, and the
total cost to the state for these enrollees. The information shall be
reported in total, and by employer and industry type for any employer
or industry type having more than thirty employees enrolled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of social and health services, in coordination with
the health care authority, shall by December 1st of each year report to
the legislature for each month of the preceding fiscal year the number
of medical assistance recipients who were employed, or who were the
spouse or dependent child of someone who was employed, and the total
cost to the state for these recipients. The information shall be
reported in total, and by employer and industry type for any employer
or industry type having more than thirty employees as recipients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2007.

--- END ---