BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 17.28.255 and 2005 c 181 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of trustees shall annually determine the amount of
money necessary to carry on the operations of the district and shall
classify the property therein in proportion to the benefits to be
derived from the operations of the district and in accordance with such
classification shall apportion and assess the several lots, blocks,
tracts, and parcels of land or other property within the district,
which assessment shall be collected with the general taxes of the
county or counties.
(2) A mosquito control district must use the assessed value
applicable to forest land, farm and agricultural land, or open space
land, under chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW, when the land has been
designated as such and the assessed value is used as a component in
determining the district assessment. If a district uses a fractional
amount of assessed value as a component in determining the district
assessment, then a fractional amount of the value applicable to forest
land, farm and agricultural land, or open space land, under chapter
84.33 or 84.34 RCW, shall be used.
(3) Land that is exempt from tax under Title 84 RCW is exempt from
any assessment under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.44.010 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 21 s 178 are each
amended to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided by law, all lands, including school
lands, granted lands, escheated lands, or other lands, held or owned by
the state of Washington in fee simple (in trust or otherwise), situated
within the limits of any assessing district in this state, may be
assessed and charged for the cost of local or other improvements
specially benefiting such lands which may be ordered by the proper
authorities of any such assessing district and may be assessed by any
irrigation district to the same extent as private lands within the
district are assessed: PROVIDED, That the leasehold, contractual, or
possessory interest of any person, firm, association, or private or
municipal corporation in any such lands shall be charged and assessed
in the proportional amount such leasehold, contractual, or possessory
interest is benefited: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That no lands of the state
shall be included within an irrigation district except as provided in
RCW 87.03.025 and 89.12.090.

--- END ---