BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.36.200 and 2003 c 355 s 1 and 2003 c 53 s 258 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When construction, repair, or maintenance work is conducted on
or adjacent to a public highway, county road, street, bridge, or other
thoroughfare commonly traveled and when the work interferes with the
normal and established mode of travel on the highway, county road,
street, bridge, or thoroughfare, the location shall be properly posted
by prominently displayed signs or flagmen or both. Signs used for
posting in such an area shall be consistent with the provisions found
in the state of Washington "Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices
for Streets and Highways" obtainable from the department of
transportation.
(2) If the construction, repair, or maintenance work includes or
uses grooved pavement, abrupt lane edges, steel plates, or gravel or
earth surfaces, the construction, repair, or maintenance zone must be
posted with signs stating the condition, as required by current law,
and in addition, must warn motorcyclists of the potential hazard only
if the hazard or condition exists on a paved public highway, county
road, street, bridge, or other thoroughfare commonly traveled. For the
purposes of this subsection, the department shall adopt by rule a
uniform sign or signs for this purpose, including at least the
following language, "MOTORCYCLES USE EXTREME CAUTION."
(3) Any contractor, firm, corporation, political subdivision, or
other agency performing such work shall comply with this section.
(4) Each driver of a motor vehicle used in connection with such
construction, repair, or maintenance work shall obey traffic signs
posted for, and flaggers stationed at such location in the same manner
and under the same restrictions as is required for the driver of any
other vehicle.
(5) A violation of or a failure to comply with this section is a
misdemeanor. Each day upon which there is a violation, or there is a
failure to comply, constitutes a separate violation.

--- END ---