BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
TAX DEFERRALS FOR INVESTMENT PROJECTS IN QUALIFIED ACTIVITIES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The legislature finds that the state's
retail sales tax on construction discourages capital investment by new
and existing Washington businesses. Without relief from the state's
retail sales tax on construction, Washington businesses in certain
sectors and areas will be adversely impacted. The legislature
recognizes the importance of such businesses for employment and
economic development in Washington state.
(2) In 1985 and 2004, the legislature found that there were several
areas in the state that are characterized by very high levels of
unemployment and poverty. The legislature further found that economic
stagnation was the primary cause of this high unemployment rate and
poverty. The legislature reaffirms that policies providing tax
incentives for manufacturing and research and development businesses in
these distressed areas are essential to promote economic stimulation,
economic growth, and new employment opportunities in these distressed
areas.
(3) In 1994 and 2004, the legislature found that high-wage,
high-skilled jobs were vital to the economic health of the state's
citizens. The legislature reaffirms that high-technology businesses
are a vital and growing source of high-wage, high-skilled jobs in this
state, and that the high-technology sector is a key component of the
state's effort to encourage economic diversification. The legislature
found that many high-technology businesses incur significant costs
associated with research and development and pilot scale manufacturing
many years before a marketable product can be produced, and that
current state tax policy discourages the growth of these companies by
taxing them long before they become profitable. The legislature
reaffirms that stimulating growth of high-technology businesses early
in their development cycle, when they are turning ideas into marketable
products, will build upon the state's established high-technology base,
creating additional research and development jobs and subsequent
manufacturing facilities.
(4) In 2005, the legislature found that the fruit and vegetable
processing industry was important to the Washington state economy. The
legislature further found that businesses engaged in fruit and
vegetable processing are often located in areas in need of economic
stimulation and new employment opportunities. The legislature
reaffirms that state policies providing tax incentives for economic
growth in the fruit and vegetable processing industry are essential.
(5) For these reasons, the legislature established tax incentive
programs to defer retail sales and use tax on investments in buildings
and machinery and equipment used by the businesses in this section. To
further encourage investments, the legislature subsequently modified
the deferral programs to authorize the waiver of the deferred sales and
use tax if the business fulfilled certain requirements, to recapture
the deferred sales and use tax if the business failed to meet those
requirements, and to clarify definitions. These subsequent
modifications to the deferral programs have led to inconsistencies
between programs that confuse taxpayers and complicate administration.
Therefore, the legislature declares that these programs must be
consolidated and simplified to ensure that taxpayers receive consistent
treatment and benefits under these tax deferral programs.
(6) The legislature further declares that tax incentives should be
subject to the same rigorous requirements for efficiency and
accountability as are other expenditure programs, and that tax
incentives should therefore be focused to provide the greatest possible
return on the state's investment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project
used in qualified activities.
(i) The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for
a deferral unless the underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery,
and equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(ii)(A) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the
deferral agrees in writing with the department to file the complete
annual survey under section 106 of this act; and
(B) The economic benefit of the deferral is passed to the lessee,
is no less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor, and is
evidenced by any type of payment, credit, or any other financial
arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified building and
the lessee.
(b) "Eligible investment project" does not include: (i) Any
portion of an investment project undertaken by a light and power
business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(5), other than that portion of a
cogeneration project that is used to generate power for consumption
within the manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an
integral part; or (ii) investment projects to replace qualified
machinery and equipment that have already received deferrals under this
chapter or chapters 82.60, 82.63, or 82.74 RCW.
(4)(a) "Initiation of construction" means the date that a building
permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031
for:
(i) Construction of the qualified building, if the underlying
ownership of the building vests exclusively with the person receiving
the economic benefit of the deferral;
(ii) Construction of the qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (3)(a)(ii)(B) of this section; or
(iii) Tenant improvements for a qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (3)(a)(ii)(B) of this section.
(b) "Initiation of construction" does not include soil testing,
site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related
activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit
for the construction of the foundation of the building.
(c) If the investment project includes more than one qualified
building, initiation of construction applies separately to each
qualified building.
(5) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the
project.
(6) "Operationally complete" means that the investment project is
capable of being used for its intended purpose as described in the
application.
(7) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030. For the
purpose of the qualified activities of high-technology research and
development as defined in subsection (8)(b) of this section, "person"
also includes state universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(8) "Qualified activities" means the activities described in (a),
(b), and (c) of this subsection only.
(a)(i) "Qualified activities" includes manufacturing or research
and development in an eligible area.
(ii) For purposes of (a) of this subsection, the following
definitions apply:
(A) "Eligible area" means a rural county as defined in RCW
82.14.370. "Eligible area" also means a designated community
empowerment zone approved under RCW 43.31C.020 or a county containing
a community empowerment zone, if, in addition to all other provisions
and requirements of this chapter, the applicant establishes that at the
time the project is operationally complete:
(I) The applicant will hire at least one qualified employment
position for each seven hundred fifty thousand dollars of investment
for which a deferral is requested;
(II) The positions will be filled by persons who at the time of
hire are residents of the community empowerment zone. As used in this
subsection (8)(a)(ii)(A), "resident" means the person makes his or her
home in the community empowerment zone. A mailing address alone is
insufficient to establish that a person is a resident for the purposes
of this subsection (8)(a)(ii)(A). The persons must be hired after the
date the application is filed with the department; and
(III) The qualified employment position must be filled by the end
of the calendar year following the year in which the project is
certified as operationally complete. If a person does not meet the
requirements for qualified employment positions by the end of the
second calendar year following the year in which the project is
certified as operationally complete, all deferred taxes are immediately
due. The department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on
amounts due under this subsection (8)(a)(ii)(A). The interest shall be
assessed at the rate provided for delinquent taxes under chapter 82.32
RCW, retroactively to the date of deferral, and shall accrue until the
deferred taxes due are repaid.
(B) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, and the
activities performed by research and development laboratories and
commercial testing laboratories.
(C) "Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process before commercial sales have begun. As used in this subsection
(8)(a)(ii)(C), "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales
for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the
product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.
(D) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee employed in the eligible investment project during the entire
tax year. The term "entire tax year" means a full-time position that
is filled for a period of twelve consecutive months. The term
"full-time" means at least thirty-five hours a week, four hundred
fifty-five hours a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours
a year.
(b)(i) "Qualified activities" includes high-technology research and
development and pilot scale manufacturing.
(ii) For purposes of (b) of this subsection, the following
definitions apply:
(A) "Research and development" means activities performed to
discover technological information, and technical and nonroutine
activities concerned with translating technological information into
new or improved products, processes, techniques, formulas, inventions,
or software. The term includes exploration of a new use for an
existing drug, device, or biological product if the new use requires
separate licensing by the federal food and drug administration under
chapter 21, C.F.R., as amended. The term does not include adaptation
or duplication of existing products where the products are not
substantially improved by application of the technology, nor does the
term include surveys and studies, social science and humanities
research, market research or testing, quality control, sale promotion
and service, computer software developed for internal use, and research
in areas such as improved style, taste, and seasonal design.
(B) "High technology" means technology in the fields of advanced
computing, advanced materials, biotechnology, electronic device
technology, and environmental technology.
(C) "Advanced computing" means technologies used in the designing
and developing of computing hardware and software, including
innovations in designing the full spectrum of hardware from hand-held
calculators to super computers, and peripheral equipment.
(D) "Advanced materials" means materials with engineered properties
created through the development of specialized processing and synthesis
technology, including ceramics, high value-added metals, electronic
materials, composites, polymers, and biomaterials.
(E) "Biotechnology" means the application of technologies, such as
recombinant DNA techniques, biochemistry, molecular and cellular
biology, genetics and genetic engineering, cell fusion techniques, and
new bioprocesses, using living organisms, or parts of organisms, to
produce or modify products, to improve plants or animals, to develop
microorganisms for specific uses, to identify targets for small
molecule pharmaceutical development, or to transform biological systems
into useful processes and products or to develop microorganisms for
specific uses.
(F) "Electronic device technology" means technologies involving
microelectronics; semiconductors; electronic equipment and
instrumentation; radio frequency, microwave, and millimeter
electronics; optical and optic-electrical devices; and data and digital
communications and imaging devices.
(G) "Environmental technology" means assessment and prevention of
threats or damage to human health or the environment, environmental
cleanup, and the development of alternative energy sources.
(H) "Pilot scale manufacturing" means design, construction, and
testing of preproduction prototypes and models in the fields of
biotechnology, advanced computing, electronic device technology,
advanced materials, and environmental technology other than for
commercial sale. As used in this subsection (8)(b)(ii)(H), "commercial
sale" excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the
total gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or
process do not exceed one million dollars.
(c)(i) "Qualified activities" includes fresh fruit and vegetable
processing, cold storage warehousing as related to fresh fruit and
vegetable processing, and research and development activities as
related to fresh fruit and vegetable processing or cold storage
warehousing.
(ii) For purposes of (c) of this subsection, the following
definitions apply:
(A) "Fresh fruit and vegetable processing" means manufacturing as
defined in RCW 82.04.120 which consists of the canning, preserving,
freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits and/or vegetables.
(B) "Cold storage warehouse" means a storage warehouse owned or
operated by a wholesaler or third-party warehouser as those terms are
defined in RCW 82.08.820 to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits
or vegetables, or any combination thereof, at a desired temperature to
maintain the quality of the product for orderly marketing.
(C) "Research and development" has the same meaning as in
(a)(ii)(C) of this subsection (8).
(9)(a) "Qualified buildings" means:
(i) Construction of new buildings used for qualified activities.
(ii) Expansion or renovation of existing buildings for the purpose
of increasing floor space or production capacity used for qualified
activities.
(iii) Construction of new warehouses, or the expansion or
renovation of existing warehouses, used to support qualified activities
located at a manufacturing operation or research and development
operation.
(iv) Construction of new offices exclusively occupied by employees
of a recipient, or a lessee as provided in subsection (3)(a)(ii) of
this section, whose job responsibilities exclusively support qualified
activities or employees performing qualified activities. Offices must
be located within or adjacent to a qualified building under (a)(i) or
(ii) of this subsection. Employees engaged in sales, marketing, and
similar activities do not support qualified activities or employees
performing qualified activities.
(v) Construction of new parking facilities located within or
adjacent to a qualified building under (a)(i) or (ii) of this
subsection. New parking facilities must be constructed under the same
tax deferral certificate used to construct, expand, or renovate the
building in which the parking facility supports.
(b) If a qualified building is used partly for qualified activities
and partly for other purposes, the applicable tax deferral shall be
determined by apportionment of the costs of construction under rules
adopted by the department.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Warehouse" means a building, structure, or storage yard in
which raw materials or finished goods are stored. A warehouse may have
more than one storage room and more than one floor.
(ii) "Manufacturing operation" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.02565(2)(d).
(iii) "Research and development operation" has the same meaning as
in RCW 82.08.02565(2)(f).
(10) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means:
(a) All industrial and research fixtures, equipment, and support
facilities, not otherwise eligible for exemption under RCW 82.08.02565
or 82.12.02565, that are used primarily in qualified activities; and
(b) Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory
equipment; manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and
moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all
equipment used to control or operate the machinery, that are used
primarily in qualified activities.
(11) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 (1) Application for deferral of taxes
under this chapter must be made before the initiation of construction
of the qualified buildings or acquisition of qualified machinery or
equipment. The application shall be made to the department in a form
and manner prescribed by the department. The application shall contain
information regarding the location of the investment project, the
applicant's average employment in the state for the prior year,
estimated or actual new employment related to the project, estimated or
actual wages of employees related to the project, estimated or actual
costs, time schedules for completion and operation, and other
information required by the department.
(2) The department shall rule on the application within sixty days.
The department shall track, by type of qualified activities, the amount
of all deferrals granted under this chapter during each fiscal
biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 (1) The department shall issue a sales and
use tax deferral certificate for state and local sales and use taxes
imposed or authorized under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW for
the following eligible investment projects.
(a) Until July 1, 2010, investment projects in the qualified
activities described in section 102(8)(a) of this act;
(b) Until July 1, 2015, investment projects in the qualified
activities described in section 102(8)(b) of this act;
(c) From July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2012, investment projects
in the qualified activities described in section 102(8)(c) of this act;
(2) Use of a sales and use tax deferral certificate by the
recipient is deemed a waiver under RCW 82.32.050(3)(c) of the period of
limitations under RCW 82.32.050(3) for sales and use taxes deferred
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2)
of this section, section 102(8)(a)(ii)(A)(III) of this act, and section
106 of this act, taxes deferred under this chapter need not be repaid.
(2) If, on the basis of a survey under section 106 of this act or
other information, the department finds that an investment project is
not eligible for tax deferral under this chapter, a portion of deferred
taxes shall be immediately due and payable according to the following
schedule:

Year in Which
Ineligibility
Occurs % of Deferred
Taxes Due

1 100%

2 87.5%

3 75%

4 62.5%

5 50%

6 37.5%

7 25%

8 12.5%

(3) The department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on
amounts due under subsection (2) of this section. The interest shall
be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent taxes under chapter
82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date of deferral, and shall accrue
until the deferred taxes due are repaid. The debt for deferred taxes
is not extinguished by insolvency or other failure of the recipient.
Transfer of ownership does not terminate the deferral. The deferral is
transferred, subject to the new owner meeting the eligibility
requirements of this chapter and agreeing in writing to assume
liability for payment of any deferred taxes under subsection (2) of
this section, for the remaining periods of the deferral. The original
recipient of a deferral that is transferred is not responsible for
payment of any deferred tax under subsection (2) of this section for
periods subsequent to the transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 (1) The legislature finds that
accountability and effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax
policy. In order to make policy choices regarding the best use of
limited state resources the legislature needs information on how a tax
incentive is used.
(2) Recipients for deferral of taxes under this chapter and persons
subject to this chapter by reason of section 110 of this act shall file
a complete annual survey with the department. If the economic benefits
of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in section
102(3)(a)(ii)(B) of this act, the lessee shall agree to file the annual
survey and the applicant is not required to file the annual survey.
The annual survey is due by April 30th of the year following the
calendar year in which the investment project is certified by the
department as having been operationally complete and the seven
succeeding calendar years. The department may extend the due date for
timely filing annual surveys under this section as provided in RCW
82.32.590. The annual survey shall include the amount of tax deferred,
the number of new products or research projects by general
classification, and the number of trademarks, patents, and copyrights
associated with activities at the investment project. The survey shall
also include the following information for employment positions in
Washington:
(a) The number of total employment positions;
(b) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(c) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(d) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(3) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the deferral program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(4)(a) If a recipient of the deferral fails to file a complete
annual survey required under this subsection by the date due or any
extension under RCW 82.32.590, the portion of deferred taxes that need
not be repaid for the previous calendar year according to the schedule
in section 105 of this act shall be immediately due and payable. If
the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as
provided in section 102(3)(a)(ii)(B) of this act, the lessee is
responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has received the
economic benefit. The department shall assess interest, but not
penalties, on the deferred taxes payable under this subsection. The
interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise
taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date of deferral,
and shall accrue until the deferred taxes are repaid.
(b) A recipient who must repay deferred taxes under section 105 of
this act because the department has found that an investment project is
used for purposes other than qualified activities is no longer required
to file annual surveys under this section beginning on the date an
investment project is used for nonqualified activities.
(5) For purposes of this section, "complete annual survey" means a
survey that is filed on a form or in a format required by the
department by the due date and substantially responds to all survey
questions to enable the department to provide summary statistics and to
study the effectiveness of the tax deferral program.
(6) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of the total tax deferred, is deemed taxpayer information under RCW
82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax deferred is not subject to
the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to
the public upon request. If the amount of the total tax deferred as
reported on the survey is different than the amount actually deferred
or otherwise allowed by the department, the amount actually deferred or
allowed may be disclosed.
(7) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(8) The department shall use the information to study the tax
deferral program authorized under this chapter. The department shall
report to the legislature by December 1, 2009, December 1, 2011, and
December 1, 2013. The reports shall measure the effect of the program
on job creation, job retention, net jobs for Washington residents,
company growth, diversification of the state's economy, cluster
dynamics, and such other factors as the department selects.
(9) A person who is subject to the requirements in RCW 82.32.535,
82.32.545, 82.32.560, or 82.32.570 is not required to file a complete
annual survey under this section if the person timely files the annual
report required by RCW 82.32.535, 82.32.545, 82.32.560, or 82.32.570.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the
administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 Applications received by the department
under this chapter are not subject to the confidentiality provisions of
RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 The employment security department shall
make, and certify to the department of revenue, all determinations of
employment and wages as requested by the department under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 Persons who have received a sales and use
tax deferral certificate from the department under chapter 82.60,
82.63, or 82.74 RCW are subject to the provisions of chapter 82.-- RCW
(sections 101 through 110 of this act). This act does not apply to, or
authorize refunds for, investment projects that are not eligible as of
December 31, 2006, for tax deferrals granted under chapter 82.60 or
82.63 RCW before January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 Sections 101 through 110 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.60.010 (Legislative findings and declaration) and 1985
c 232 s 1;
(2) RCW 82.60.020 (Definitions) and 2004 c 25 s 3, 1999 sp.s. c 9
s 2, 1999 c 164 s 301, 1996 c 290 s 4, & 1995 1st sp.s. c 3 s 5;
(3) RCW 82.60.030 (Application for deferral -- Contents) and 1994
sp.s. c 1 s 2 & 1985 c 232 s 3;
(4) RCW 82.60.040 (Issuance of tax deferral certificate) and 2004
c 25 s 4, 1999 c 164 s 302, 1997 c 156 s 5, 1995 1st sp.s. c 3 s 6,
1994 sp.s. c 1 s 3, 1986 c 116 s 13, & 1985 c 232 s 4;
(5) RCW 82.60.049 (Additional eligible projects) and 2004 c 25 s 5,
2000 c 106 s 8, & 1999 c 164 s 304;
(6) RCW 82.60.050 (Expiration of RCW 82.60.030 and 82.60.040) and
2004 c 25 s 6, 1994 sp.s. c 1 s 7, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 404, 1988 c 41 s
5, & 1985 c 232 s 10;
(7) RCW 82.60.060 (Repayment schedule) and 2000 c 106 s 5 & 1985 c
232 s 5;
(8) RCW 82.60.065 (Tax deferral on construction labor and
investment projects -- Repayment forgiven) and 1995 1st sp.s. c 3 s 8,
1994 sp.s. c 1 s 6, & 1986 c 116 s 14;
(9) RCW 82.60.070 (Annual survey by recipients -- Assessment of
taxes, interest) and 2004 c 25 s 7, 1999 c 164 s 303, 1995 1st sp.s. c
3 s 9, 1994 sp.s. c 1 s 5, & 1985 c 232 s 6;
(10) RCW 82.60.080 (Employment and wage determinations) and 2000 c
106 s 6 & 1985 c 232 s 7;
(11) RCW 82.60.090 (Applicability of general administrative
provisions) and 1985 c 232 s 8;
(12) RCW 82.60.100 (Applications, reports, and information subject
to disclosure) and 1987 c 49 s 1;
(13) RCW 82.60.110 (Competing projects -- Impact study) and 1998 c
245 s 169 & 1994 sp.s. c 1 s 8;
(14) RCW 82.60.900 (Effective date, applicability -- 1985 c 232) and
1985 c 232 s 11;
(15) RCW 82.60.901 (Effective date -- 1994 sp.s. c 1) and 1994 sp.s.
c 1 s 10;
(16) RCW 82.63.005 (Findings -- Intent to create a contract) and 2004
c 2 s 1 & 1994 sp.s. c 5 s 1;
(17) RCW 82.63.010 (Definitions) and 2004 c 2 s 3, 1995 1st sp.s.
c 3 s 12, & 1994 sp.s. c 5 s 3;
(18) RCW 82.63.020 (Application -- Annual survey--Reports) and 2004
c 2 s 4 & 1994 sp.s. c 5 s 4;
(19) RCW 82.63.030 (Sales and use tax deferral certificate--Eligible investment projects and pilot scale manufacturing) and 2004 c
2 s 5 & 1994 sp.s. c 5 s 5;
(20) RCW 82.63.045 (Repayment not required -- Repayment schedule for
unqualified investment project -- Exceptions) and 2004 c 2 s 6, 2000 c
106 s 10, & 1995 1st sp.s. c 3 s 13;
(21) RCW 82.63.060 (Administration) and 1994 sp.s. c 5 s 8;
(22) RCW 82.63.070 (Public disclosure) and 2004 c 2 s 7 & 1994
sp.s. c 5 s 9;
(23) RCW 82.63.900 (Effective date -- 1994 sp.s. c 5) and 1994 sp.s.
c 5 s 12;
(24) RCW 82.74.010 (Definitions) and 2005 c 513 s 4;
(25) RCW 82.74.020 (Application for tax deferral) and 2005 c 513 s
5;
(26) RCW 82.74.030 (Issuance of certificate) and 2005 c 513 s 6;
(27) RCW 82.74.040 (Annual survey) and 2005 c 513 s 7;
(28) RCW 82.74.050 (Repayment of deferred taxes) and 2005 c 513 s
8;
(29) RCW 82.74.060 (Application of chapter 82.32 RCW) and 2005 c
513 s 9; and
(30) RCW 82.74.070 (Confidentiality of applications) and 2005 c 513
s 10.

PART II
TAX CREDITS FOR NEW JOBS IN RURAL AREAS
Sec. 201 RCW 82.62.020 and 1986 c 116 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
Application for tax credits under this chapter must be made
((before)) within ninety consecutive days after the actual hiring of
qualified employment positions. The application shall be made to the
department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
application shall contain information regarding the location of the
business project, the applicant's average employment, if any, at the
facility for the prior year, estimated or actual new employment related
to the project, estimated or actual wages of employees related to the
project, estimated or actual costs, time schedules for completion and
operation, and other information required by the department. The
department shall rule on the application within sixty days.

PART III
TAX INCENTIVES ACCOUNTABILITY
Sec. 301 RCW 82.32.545 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person who reports taxes under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (11)
or who claims an exemption or credit under RCW 82.04.4461, 82.08.980,
82.12.980, 82.29A.137, 84.36.655, and 82.04.4463 shall make an annual
report to the department detailing employment, wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits per job at the manufacturing
site. The report shall not include names of employees. The report
shall also detail employment by the total number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions. The first report filed under this
subsection shall include employment, wage, and benefit information for
the twelve-month period immediately before first use of a preferential
tax rate under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (11), or tax exemption or credit
under RCW 82.04.4461, 82.08.980, 82.12.980, 82.29A.137, 84.36.655, and
82.04.4463. The report is due by ((March 31st)) April 30th following
any year in which a preferential tax rate under RCW 82.04.260(((13)))
(11) is used, or tax exemption or credit under RCW 82.04.4461,
82.08.980, 82.12.980, 82.29A.137, 84.36.655, and 82.04.4463 is taken.
The department may extend the due date for timely filing annual reports
under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590. This information is
not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may
be disclosed to the public upon request.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection by the due date of the report or any extension under RCW
82.32.590, the department shall declare the amount of taxes exempted or
credited, or reduced in the case of the preferential business and
occupation tax rate, for that year to be immediately due and payable.
Excise taxes payable under this subsection are subject to interest but
not penalties, as provided under this chapter. This information is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request.
(3) By November 1, 2010, and by November 1, 2023, the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate, in
consultation with the department, shall report to the legislature on
the effectiveness of chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. in regard to
keeping Washington competitive. The report shall measure the effect of
chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. on job retention, net jobs
created for Washington residents, company growth, diversification of
the state's economy, cluster dynamics, and other factors as the
committees select. The reports shall include a discussion of
principles to apply in evaluating whether the legislature should
reenact any or all of the tax preferences in chapter 1, Laws of 2003
2nd sp. sess.

Sec. 302 RCW 82.32.590 and 2005 c 514 s 1001 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey or annual report under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.545,
82.32.560, 82.32.570, 82.32.610, 82.32.620, or section 106 of this act,
by the due date was the result of circumstances beyond the control of
the taxpayer, the department shall extend the time for filing the
survey or report. Such extension shall be for a period of thirty days
from the date the department issues its written notification to the
taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under this section. The
department may grant additional extensions as it deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey or annual report by the due date was the result
of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department
shall be guided by rules adopted by the department for the waiver or
cancellation of penalties when the underpayment or untimely payment of
any tax was due to circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.

Sec. 303 RCW 82.32.600 and 2005 c 514 s 1002 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Persons required to file annual surveys or annual reports under
RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.545, 82.32.560, 82.32.570, 82.32.610, 82.32.620,
or section 106 of this act, must electronically file with the
department all surveys, reports, returns, and any other forms or
information the department requires in an electronic format as provided
or approved by the department((, unless the department grants relief
under subsection (2) of this section)). As used in this section,
"returns" has the same meaning as "return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(2) ((Upon request, the department may relieve a person of the
obligations in subsection (1) of this section if the person's taxes
have been reduced a cumulative total of less than one thousand dollars
from all of the credits, exemptions, or preferential business and
occupation tax rates, for which a person is required to file an annual
survey under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.535, 82.32.545, 82.32.570,
82.32.560, 82.60.070, or 82.63.020.
(3) Persons who no longer qualify for relief under subsection (2)
of this section will be notified in writing by the department and must
comply with subsection (1) of this section by the date provided in the
notice.
(4))) Any survey, report, return, or any other form or information
required to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of
this section is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format.
(3) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
subsection (1) of this section for good cause shown.

Sec. 304 RCW 82.04.4452 and 2005 c 514 s 1003 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person whose research and development spending during
the year in which the credit is claimed exceeds 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year.
(2) The credit shall be calculated as follows:
(a) Determine the greater of the amount of qualified research and
development expenditures of a person or eighty percent of amounts
received by a person other than a public educational or research
institution in compensation for the conduct of qualified research and
development;
(b) Subtract 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount from the
amount determined under (a) of this subsection;
(c) Multiply the amount determined under (b) of this subsection by
the following:
(i) For the period June 10, 2004, through December 31, 2006, the
person's average tax rate for the calendar year for which the credit is
claimed;
(ii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2007, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 0.75 percent;
(iii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2008, the greater
of the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.0 percent;
(iv) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2009, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.25 percent;
(v) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2010, and thereafter,
1.50 percent.
For purposes of calculating the credit, if a person's reporting
period is less than annual, the person may use an estimated average tax
rate for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed by using the
person's average tax rate for each reporting period. A person who uses
an estimated average tax rate must make an adjustment to the total
credit claimed for the calendar year using the person's actual average
tax rate for the calendar year when the person files its last return
for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(3) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified research and development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified research
and development.
(4) The credit, including any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section, shall be claimed against taxes due for
the same calendar year in which the qualified research and development
expenditures are incurred. The credit, including any credit assigned
to a person under subsection (3) of this section, for each calendar
year shall not exceed the lesser of two million dollars or the amount
of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year.
(5) For any person claiming the credit, including any credit
assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section, whose
research and development spending during the calendar year in which the
credit is claimed fails to exceed 0.92 percent of the person's taxable
amount during the same calendar year or who is otherwise ineligible,
the department shall declare the taxes against which the credit was
claimed to be immediately due and payable. The department shall assess
interest, but not penalties, on the taxes against which the credit was
claimed. Interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the
date the credit was claimed, and shall accrue until the taxes against
which the credit was claimed are repaid. Any credit assigned to a
person under subsection (3) of this section that is disallowed as a
result of this section may be claimed by the person who performed the
qualified research and development subject to the limitations set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.
(6)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness
are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) A person claiming the credit shall file a complete annual
survey with the department. The survey is due by ((March 31st)) April
30th following any year in which a credit is claimed. The department
may extend the due date for timely filing of annual surveys under this
section as provided in RCW 82.32.590. The survey shall include the
amount of the tax credit claimed, the qualified research and
development expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, the taxable amount during the calendar year for which the
credit is claimed, the number of new products or research projects by
general classification, the number of trademarks, patents, and
copyrights associated with the research and development activities for
which a credit was claimed, and whether the credit has been assigned
under subsection (3) of this section and who assigned the credit. The
survey shall also include the following information for employment
positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the tax credit program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d)(i) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax credit claimed, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax credit claimed is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request, except as provided in this
subsection (6)(d). If the amount of the tax credit as reported on the
survey is different than the amount actually claimed on the taxpayer's
tax returns or otherwise allowed by the department, the amount actually
claimed or allowed may be disclosed.
(ii) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax credit claimed
on the taxpayer's returns or otherwise allowed by the department is
less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the survey
may request the department to treat the tax credit amount as
confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(e) If a person fails to file a complete annual survey required
under this subsection with the department by the due date or any
extension under RCW 82.32.590, the person entitled to the credit
provided in subsection (2) of this section is not eligible to claim or
assign the credit provided in subsection (2) of this section in the
year the person failed to timely file a complete survey.
(7) The department shall use the information from subsection (6) of
this section to prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No
fewer than three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The
department shall report these statistics to the legislature each year
by September 1st.
(8) The department shall use the information from subsection (6) of
this section to study the tax credit program authorized under this
section. The department shall report to the legislature by December 1,
2009, and December 1, 2013. The reports shall measure the effect of
the program on job creation, ((the number of)) job retention, net jobs
((created)) for Washington residents, company growth, ((the
introduction of new products,)) the diversification of the state's
economy, ((growth in research and development investment, the movement
of firms or the consolidation of firms' operations into the state))
cluster dynamics, and such other factors as the department selects.
(9) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Average tax rate" means a person's total tax liability under
this chapter for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed
divided by the taxpayer's total taxable amount under this chapter for
the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(b) "Complete annual survey" means a survey that is filed on a form
or in a format required by the department by the due date, or any
extension under RCW 82.32.590, and substantially responds to all survey
questions to enable the department to provide summary statistics and to
study the effectiveness of the tax credit.
(c) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined under rules adopted by the
department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly
incurred in qualified research and development by a person claiming the
credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development. Nor does
the term include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land,
structures, or depreciable property.
(((c))) (d) "Qualified research and development" shall have the
same meaning as high technology research and development in ((RCW
82.63.010)) section 102(8)(b) of this act.
(((d))) (e) "Research and development spending" means qualified
research and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development.
(((e))) (f) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to
the tax imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
combined excise tax returns for the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under
RCW 82.04.440.
(10) This section expires January 1, 2015.

Sec. 305 RCW 82.32.560 and 2004 c 240 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "electrolytic processing
business tax exemption" means the exemption ((and preferential tax rate
under)) in RCW 82.16.0421.
(2) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources, the
legislature needs information to evaluate whether the stated goals of
legislation were achieved.
(3) The goals of the electrolytic processing business tax exemption
are:
(a) To retain family wage jobs by enabling electrolytic processing
businesses to maintain production of chlor-alkali and sodium chlorate
at a level that will preserve at least seventy-five percent of the jobs
that were on the payroll effective January 1, 2004; and
(b) To allow the electrolytic processing industries to continue
production in this state through 2011 so that the industries will be
positioned to preserve and create new jobs when the anticipated
reduction of energy costs occur.
(4)(a) A person who receives the benefit of an electrolytic
processing business tax exemption shall make an annual report to the
department detailing employment, wages, and employer-provided health
and retirement benefits per job at the manufacturing site. The report
is due by ((March 31st)) April 30th following any year in which a tax
exemption is claimed or used. The department may extend the due date
for timely filing annual reports under this section as provided in RCW
82.32.590. The report shall not include names of employees. The
report shall detail employment by the total number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions. The report shall indicate the quantity
of product produced at the plant during the time period covered by the
report. The first report filed under this subsection shall include
employment, wage, and benefit information for the twelve-month period
immediately before first use of a tax exemption. Employment reports
shall include data for actual levels of employment and identification
of the number of jobs affected by any employment reductions that have
been publicly announced at the time of the report. Information in a
report under this section is not subject to the confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon
request.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection by the due date of the report or any extension under RCW
82.32.590, the department shall declare the amount of taxes exempted
for that year to be immediately due and payable. Public utility taxes
payable under this subsection are subject to interest but not
penalties, as provided under this chapter. This information is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request.
(5) By December 1, 2007, and by December 1, 2010, the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate, in
consultation with the department, shall report to the legislature on
the effectiveness of the tax incentive under RCW 82.16.0421. The
report shall measure the effect of the incentive on job retention for
Washington residents, and other factors as the committees select. The
report shall also discuss expected trends or changes to electricity
prices as they affect the industries that benefit from the incentives.

Sec. 306 RCW 82.32.570 and 2004 c 24 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "smelter tax incentive" means
the preferential tax rate under RCW 82.04.2909, or an exemption or
credit under RCW 82.04.4481, 82.08.805, 82.12.805, or 82.12.022(5).
(2) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information to evaluate whether the stated goals of
legislation were achieved.
(3) The goals of the smelter tax incentives are to retain family-wage jobs in rural areas by:
(a) Enabling the aluminum industry to maintain production of
aluminum at a level that will preserve at least 75 percent of the jobs
that were on the payroll effective January 1, 2004, as adjusted for
employment reductions publicly announced before November 30, 2003; and
(b) Allowing the aluminum industry to continue producing aluminum
in this state through 2006 so that the industry will be positioned to
preserve and create new jobs when the anticipated reduction of energy
costs occurs.
(4)(a) An aluminum smelter receiving the benefit of a smelter tax
incentive shall make an annual report to the department detailing
employment, wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits
per job at the manufacturing site. The report is due by ((March 31st))
April 30th following any year in which a tax incentive is claimed or
used. The department may extend the due date for timely filing annual
reports under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590. The report
shall not include names of employees. The report shall detail
employment by the total number of full-time, part-time, and temporary
positions. The report shall indicate the quantity of aluminum smelted
at the plant during the time period covered by the report. The first
report filed under this subsection shall include employment, wage, and
benefit information for the twelve-month period immediately before
first use of a tax incentive. Employment reports shall include data
for actual levels of employment and identification of the number of
jobs affected by any employment reductions that have been publicly
announced at the time of the report. Information in a report under
this section is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection by the due date of the report or any extension under RCW
82.32.590, the department shall declare the amount of taxes exempted or
credited, or reduced in the case of the preferential business and
occupation tax rate, for that year to be immediately due and payable.
Excise taxes payable under this subsection are subject to interest but
not penalties, as provided under this chapter. This information is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request.
(5) By December 1, 2005, and by December 1, 2006, the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate, in
consultation with the department, shall report to the legislature on
the effectiveness of the smelter tax incentives and, by December 1,
2010, on the effectiveness of the incentives under RCW 82.04.4482 and
82.16.0498. The reports shall measure the effect of the tax incentives
on job retention for Washington residents and any other factors the
committees may select.

Sec. 307 RCW 82.32.610 and 2005 c 513 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2) Each person claiming a tax exemption under RCW 82.04.4266 shall
report information to the department by filing a complete annual
survey. The survey is due by ((March 31st)) April 30th of the year
following any calendar year in which a tax exemption under RCW
82.04.4266 is taken. The department may extend the due date for timely
filing annual reports under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.
The survey shall include the amount of tax exemption taken. The survey
shall also include the following information for employment positions
in Washington:
(a) The number of total employment positions;
(b) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(c) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(d) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
The first survey filed under this subsection shall also include
information for the twelve-month period immediately before first use of
a tax incentive.
(3) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the exemption program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(4) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of the tax exemption taken, is deemed taxpayer information under RCW
82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax exemption taken is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330.
(5) If a person fails to submit an annual survey under subsection
(2) of this section by the due date of the report or any extension
under RCW 82.32.590, the department shall declare the amount of taxes
exempted for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and
payable. The department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on
the amounts due under this section. The amount due shall be calculated
using a rate of 0.138 percent. The interest shall be assessed at the
rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter, retroactively to
the date the exemption was claimed, and shall accrue until the taxes
for which the exemption was claimed are repaid. This information is
not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330.
(6) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(7) The department shall study the tax exemption authorized in RCW
82.04.4266. The department shall submit a report to the finance
committee of the house of representatives and the ways and means
committee of the senate by December 1, 2011. The report shall measure
the effect of the exemption on job creation, job retention, net jobs
for Washington residents, company growth, ((the movement of firms or
the consolidation of firms' operations into the state)) diversification
of the state's economy, cluster dynamics, and such other factors as the
department selects.

Sec. 308 RCW 82.32.620 and 2005 c 301 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person who reports taxes under RCW 82.04.294 shall make an
annual report to the department detailing employment, wages, and
employer-provided health and retirement benefits per job at the
manufacturing site. The report shall not include names of employees.
The report shall also detail employment by the total number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions. The first report filed under
this subsection shall include employment, wage, and benefit information
for the twelve-month period immediately before first use of a
preferential tax rate under RCW 82.04.294. The report is due by
((March 31st)) April 30th following any year in which a preferential
tax rate under RCW 82.04.294 is used. The department may extend the
due date for timely filing annual reports under this section as
provided in RCW 82.32.590. This information is not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection, the department shall declare the amount of taxes reduced
for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and payable.
Excise taxes payable under this subsection are subject to interest, but
not penalties, at the rate provided for delinquent taxes, as provided
under this chapter. The department shall assess interest,
retroactively to the date the preferential tax rate under RCW
82.04.294, was used. The interest shall be assessed at the rate
provided for delinquent excise taxes under this chapter, and shall
accrue until the taxes for which the preferential tax rate was used are
repaid. This information is not subject to the confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330.

Sec. 309 RCW 82.32.330 and 2005 c 326 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Disclose" means to make known to any person in any manner
whatever a return or tax information;
(b) "Return" means a tax or information return or claim for refund
required by, or provided for or permitted under, the laws of this state
which is filed with the department of revenue by, on behalf of, or with
respect to a person, and any amendment or supplement thereto, including
supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are supplemental to,
or part of, the return so filed;
(c) "Tax information" means (i) a taxpayer's identity, (ii) the
nature, source, or amount of the taxpayer's income, payments, receipts,
deductions, exemptions, credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax
liability deficiencies, overassessments, or tax payments, whether taken
from the taxpayer's books and records or any other source, (iii)
whether the taxpayer's return was, is being, or will be examined or
subject to other investigation or processing, (iv) a part of a written
determination that is not designated as a precedent and disclosed
pursuant to RCW 82.32.410, or a background file document relating to a
written determination, and (v) other data received by, recorded by,
prepared by, furnished to, or collected by the department of revenue
with respect to the determination of the existence, or possible
existence, of liability, or the amount thereof, of a person under the
laws of this state for a tax, penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or
other imposition, or offense: PROVIDED, That data, material, or
documents that do not disclose information related to a specific or
identifiable taxpayer do not constitute tax information under this
section. Except as provided by RCW 82.32.410, nothing in this chapter
shall require any person possessing data, material, or documents made
confidential and privileged by this section to delete information from
such data, material, or documents so as to permit its disclosure;
(d) "State agency" means every Washington state office, department,
division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency;
(e) "Taxpayer identity" means the taxpayer's name, address,
telephone number, registration number, or any combination thereof, or
any other information disclosing the identity of the taxpayer; and
(f) "Department" means the department of revenue or its officer,
agent, employee, or representative.
(2) Returns and tax information shall be confidential and
privileged, and except as authorized by this section, neither the
department of revenue nor any other person may disclose any return or
tax information.
(3) This section does not prohibit the department of revenue from:
(a) Disclosing such return or tax information in a civil or
criminal judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:
(i) In respect of any tax imposed under the laws of this state if
the taxpayer or its officer or other person liable under Title 82 RCW
is a party in the proceeding; or
(ii) In which the taxpayer about whom such return or tax
information is sought and another state agency are adverse parties in
the proceeding;
(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the
director shall prescribe by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW, such return or tax information regarding a taxpayer to such
taxpayer or to such person or persons as that taxpayer may designate in
a request for, or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person,
at the taxpayer's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a
request for information or assistance made by the taxpayer to such
other person: PROVIDED, That tax information not received from the
taxpayer shall not be so disclosed if the director determines that such
disclosure would compromise any investigation or litigation by any
federal, state, or local government agency in connection with the civil
or criminal liability of the taxpayer or another person, or that such
disclosure would identify a confidential informant, or that such
disclosure is contrary to any agreement entered into by the department
that provides for the reciprocal exchange of information with other
government agencies which agreement requires confidentiality with
respect to such information unless such information is required to be
disclosed to the taxpayer by the order of any court;
(c) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been either issued or filed and remains outstanding for
a period of at least ten working days. The department shall not be
required to disclose any information under this subsection if a
taxpayer: (i) Has been issued a tax assessment; (ii) has been issued
a warrant that has not been filed; and (iii) has entered a deferred
payment arrangement with the department of revenue and is making
payments upon such deficiency that will fully satisfy the indebtedness
within twelve months;
(d) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been filed with a court of record and remains
outstanding;
(e) Publishing statistics so classified as to prevent the
identification of particular returns or reports or items thereof;
(f) Disclosing such return or tax information, for official
purposes only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state
agency, or to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing
with matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of
industry or the professions;
(g) Permitting the department of revenue's records to be audited
and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and
employees;
(h) Disclosing any such return or tax information to a peace
officer as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for
official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a
search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure
is for the purpose of criminal tax enforcement. A peace officer or
county prosecuting attorney who receives the return or tax information
may disclose that return or tax information only for use in the
investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the court
proceeding for which the return or tax information originally was
sought;
(i) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the proper
officer of the internal revenue service of the United States, the
Canadian government or provincial governments of Canada, or to the
proper officer of the tax department of any state or city or town or
county, for official purposes, but only if the statutes of the United
States, Canada or its provincial governments, or of such other state or
city or town or county, as the case may be, grants substantially
similar privileges to the proper officers of this state;
(j) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the Department
of Justice, including the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco ((and)), Firearms
((of the Department of the Treasury)) and Explosives within the
Department of Justice, the Department of Defense, the Immigration and
Customs Enforcement and the Customs and Border Protection agencies of
the United States ((Customs Service)) Department of Homeland Security,
the Coast Guard of the United States, and the United States Department
of Transportation, or any authorized representative thereof, for
official purposes;
(k) Publishing or otherwise disclosing the text of a written
determination designated by the director as a precedent pursuant to RCW
82.32.410;
(l) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other tax
information, the taxpayer name, entity type, business address, mailing
address, revenue tax registration numbers, North American industry
classification system or standard industrial classification code of a
taxpayer, and the dates of opening and closing of business. This
subsection shall not be construed as giving authority to the department
to give, sell, or provide access to any list of taxpayers for any
commercial purpose;
(m) Disclosing such return or tax information that is also
maintained by another Washington state or local governmental agency as
a public record available for inspection and copying under the
provisions of chapter 42.17 RCW or is a document maintained by a court
of record not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;
(n) Disclosing such return or tax information to the United States
department of agriculture for the limited purpose of investigating food
stamp fraud by retailers;
(o) Disclosing to a financial institution, escrow company, or title
company, in connection with specific real property that is the subject
of a real estate transaction, current amounts due the department for a
filed tax warrant, judgment, or lien against the real property;
(p) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted
liability as a successor under RCW 82.32.140 return or tax information
pertaining to the specific business of the taxpayer to which the person
has succeeded; ((or))
(q) Disclosing such return or tax information in the possession of
the department relating to the administration or enforcement of the
real estate excise tax imposed under chapter 82.45 RCW, including
information regarding transactions exempt or otherwise not subject to
tax; or
(r) Disclosing the least amount of return or tax information
necessary for the reports of the effectiveness of tax incentive
programs when the number of taxpayers included in the reports or any
part of the reports cannot be classified to prevent the identification
of taxpayers or particular returns, reports, tax information, or items
in the possession of the department.
(4)(a) The department may disclose return or taxpayer information
to a person under investigation or during any court or administrative
proceeding against a person under investigation as provided in this
subsection (4). The disclosure must be in connection with the
department's official duties relating to an audit, collection activity,
or a civil or criminal investigation. The disclosure may occur only
when the person under investigation and the person in possession of
data, materials, or documents are parties to the return or tax
information to be disclosed. The department may disclose return or tax
information such as invoices, contracts, bills, statements, resale or
exemption certificates, or checks. However, the department may not
disclose general ledgers, sales or cash receipt journals, check
registers, accounts receivable/payable ledgers, general journals,
financial statements, expert's workpapers, income tax returns, state
tax returns, tax return workpapers, or other similar data, materials,
or documents.
(b) Before disclosure of any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4), the department shall, through written
correspondence, inform the person in possession of the data, materials,
or documents to be disclosed. The correspondence shall clearly
identify the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The
department may not disclose any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4) until the time period allowed in (c) of this
subsection has expired or until the court has ruled on any challenge
brought under (c) of this subsection.
(c) The person in possession of the data, materials, or documents
to be disclosed by the department has twenty days from the receipt of
the written request required under (b) of this subsection to petition
the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides for
injunctive relief. The court shall limit or deny the request of the
department if the court determines that:
(i) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure are
cumulative or duplicative, or are obtainable from some other source
that is more convenient, less burdensome, or less expensive;
(ii) The production of the data, materials, or documents sought
would be unduly burdensome or expensive, taking into account the needs
of the department, the amount in controversy, limitations on the
petitioner's resources, and the importance of the issues at stake; or
(iii) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure
contain trade secret information that, if disclosed, could harm the
petitioner.
(d) The department shall reimburse reasonable expenses for the
production of data, materials, or documents incurred by the person in
possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed.
(e) Requesting information under (b) of this subsection that may
indicate that a taxpayer is under investigation does not constitute a
disclosure of tax return or tax information under this section.
(5) Any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information
in the course of his or her employment with the department of revenue
and any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information as
provided under subsection (3)(f), (g), (h), (i), (j), or (n) of this
section, who discloses any such return or tax information to another
person not entitled to knowledge of such return or tax information
under the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If
the person guilty of such violation is an officer or employee of the
state, such person shall forfeit such office or employment and shall be
incapable of holding any public office or employment in this state for
a period of two years thereafter.

Sec. 310 RCW 82.32.330 and 2005 c 326 s 1 and 2005 c 274 s 361
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Disclose" means to make known to any person in any manner
whatever a return or tax information;
(b) "Return" means a tax or information return or claim for refund
required by, or provided for or permitted under, the laws of this state
which is filed with the department of revenue by, on behalf of, or with
respect to a person, and any amendment or supplement thereto, including
supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are supplemental to,
or part of, the return so filed;
(c) "Tax information" means (i) a taxpayer's identity, (ii) the
nature, source, or amount of the taxpayer's income, payments, receipts,
deductions, exemptions, credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax
liability deficiencies, overassessments, or tax payments, whether taken
from the taxpayer's books and records or any other source, (iii)
whether the taxpayer's return was, is being, or will be examined or
subject to other investigation or processing, (iv) a part of a written
determination that is not designated as a precedent and disclosed
pursuant to RCW 82.32.410, or a background file document relating to a
written determination, and (v) other data received by, recorded by,
prepared by, furnished to, or collected by the department of revenue
with respect to the determination of the existence, or possible
existence, of liability, or the amount thereof, of a person under the
laws of this state for a tax, penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or
other imposition, or offense: PROVIDED, That data, material, or
documents that do not disclose information related to a specific or
identifiable taxpayer do not constitute tax information under this
section. Except as provided by RCW 82.32.410, nothing in this chapter
shall require any person possessing data, material, or documents made
confidential and privileged by this section to delete information from
such data, material, or documents so as to permit its disclosure;
(d) "State agency" means every Washington state office, department,
division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency;
(e) "Taxpayer identity" means the taxpayer's name, address,
telephone number, registration number, or any combination thereof, or
any other information disclosing the identity of the taxpayer; and
(f) "Department" means the department of revenue or its officer,
agent, employee, or representative.
(2) Returns and tax information shall be confidential and
privileged, and except as authorized by this section, neither the
department of revenue nor any other person may disclose any return or
tax information.
(3) This section does not prohibit the department of revenue from:
(a) Disclosing such return or tax information in a civil or
criminal judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:
(i) In respect of any tax imposed under the laws of this state if
the taxpayer or its officer or other person liable under Title 82 RCW
is a party in the proceeding; or
(ii) In which the taxpayer about whom such return or tax
information is sought and another state agency are adverse parties in
the proceeding;
(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the
director shall prescribe by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW, such return or tax information regarding a taxpayer to such
taxpayer or to such person or persons as that taxpayer may designate in
a request for, or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person,
at the taxpayer's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a
request for information or assistance made by the taxpayer to such
other person: PROVIDED, That tax information not received from the
taxpayer shall not be so disclosed if the director determines that such
disclosure would compromise any investigation or litigation by any
federal, state, or local government agency in connection with the civil
or criminal liability of the taxpayer or another person, or that such
disclosure would identify a confidential informant, or that such
disclosure is contrary to any agreement entered into by the department
that provides for the reciprocal exchange of information with other
government agencies which agreement requires confidentiality with
respect to such information unless such information is required to be
disclosed to the taxpayer by the order of any court;
(c) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been either issued or filed and remains outstanding for
a period of at least ten working days. The department shall not be
required to disclose any information under this subsection if a
taxpayer: (i) Has been issued a tax assessment; (ii) has been issued
a warrant that has not been filed; and (iii) has entered a deferred
payment arrangement with the department of revenue and is making
payments upon such deficiency that will fully satisfy the indebtedness
within twelve months;
(d) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been filed with a court of record and remains
outstanding;
(e) Publishing statistics so classified as to prevent the
identification of particular returns or reports or items thereof;
(f) Disclosing such return or tax information, for official
purposes only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state
agency, or to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing
with matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of
industry or the professions;
(g) Permitting the department of revenue's records to be audited
and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and
employees;
(h) Disclosing any such return or tax information to a peace
officer as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for
official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a
search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure
is for the purpose of criminal tax enforcement. A peace officer or
county prosecuting attorney who receives the return or tax information
may disclose that return or tax information only for use in the
investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the court
proceeding for which the return or tax information originally was
sought;
(i) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the proper
officer of the internal revenue service of the United States, the
Canadian government or provincial governments of Canada, or to the
proper officer of the tax department of any state or city or town or
county, for official purposes, but only if the statutes of the United
States, Canada or its provincial governments, or of such other state or
city or town or county, as the case may be, grants substantially
similar privileges to the proper officers of this state;
(j) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the Department
of Justice, including the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco ((and)), Firearms
((of the Department of the Treasury)) and Explosives within the
Department of Justice, the Department of Defense, the Immigration and
Customs Enforcement and the Customs and Border Protection agencies of
the United States ((Customs Service)) Department of Homeland Security,
the Coast Guard of the United States, and the United States Department
of Transportation, or any authorized representative thereof, for
official purposes;
(k) Publishing or otherwise disclosing the text of a written
determination designated by the director as a precedent pursuant to RCW
82.32.410;
(l) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other tax
information, the taxpayer name, entity type, business address, mailing
address, revenue tax registration numbers, North American industry
classification system or standard industrial classification code of a
taxpayer, and the dates of opening and closing of business. This
subsection shall not be construed as giving authority to the department
to give, sell, or provide access to any list of taxpayers for any
commercial purpose;
(m) Disclosing such return or tax information that is also
maintained by another Washington state or local governmental agency as
a public record available for inspection and copying under the
provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW or is a document maintained by a court
of record not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;
(n) Disclosing such return or tax information to the United States
department of agriculture for the limited purpose of investigating food
stamp fraud by retailers;
(o) Disclosing to a financial institution, escrow company, or title
company, in connection with specific real property that is the subject
of a real estate transaction, current amounts due the department for a
filed tax warrant, judgment, or lien against the real property;
(p) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted
liability as a successor under RCW 82.32.140 return or tax information
pertaining to the specific business of the taxpayer to which the person
has succeeded; ((or))
(q) Disclosing such return or tax information in the possession of
the department relating to the administration or enforcement of the
real estate excise tax imposed under chapter 82.45 RCW, including
information regarding transactions exempt or otherwise not subject to
tax; or
(r) Disclosing the least amount of return or tax information
necessary for the reports of the effectiveness of tax incentive
programs when the number of taxpayers included in the reports or any
part of the reports cannot be classified to prevent the identification
of taxpayers or particular returns, reports, tax information, or items
in the possession of the department.
(4)(a) The department may disclose return or taxpayer information
to a person under investigation or during any court or administrative
proceeding against a person under investigation as provided in this
subsection (4). The disclosure must be in connection with the
department's official duties relating to an audit, collection activity,
or a civil or criminal investigation. The disclosure may occur only
when the person under investigation and the person in possession of
data, materials, or documents are parties to the return or tax
information to be disclosed. The department may disclose return or tax
information such as invoices, contracts, bills, statements, resale or
exemption certificates, or checks. However, the department may not
disclose general ledgers, sales or cash receipt journals, check
registers, accounts receivable/payable ledgers, general journals,
financial statements, expert's workpapers, income tax returns, state
tax returns, tax return workpapers, or other similar data, materials,
or documents.
(b) Before disclosure of any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4), the department shall, through written
correspondence, inform the person in possession of the data, materials,
or documents to be disclosed. The correspondence shall clearly
identify the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The
department may not disclose any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4) until the time period allowed in (c) of this
subsection has expired or until the court has ruled on any challenge
brought under (c) of this subsection.
(c) The person in possession of the data, materials, or documents
to be disclosed by the department has twenty days from the receipt of
the written request required under (b) of this subsection to petition
the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides for
injunctive relief. The court shall limit or deny the request of the
department if the court determines that:
(i) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure are
cumulative or duplicative, or are obtainable from some other source
that is more convenient, less burdensome, or less expensive;
(ii) The production of the data, materials, or documents sought
would be unduly burdensome or expensive, taking into account the needs
of the department, the amount in controversy, limitations on the
petitioner's resources, and the importance of the issues at stake; or
(iii) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure
contain trade secret information that, if disclosed, could harm the
petitioner.
(d) The department shall reimburse reasonable expenses for the
production of data, materials, or documents incurred by the person in
possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed.
(e) Requesting information under (b) of this subsection that may
indicate that a taxpayer is under investigation does not constitute a
disclosure of tax return or tax information under this section.
(5) Any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information
in the course of his or her employment with the department of revenue
and any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information as
provided under subsection (3)(f), (g), (h), (i), (j), or (n) of this
section, who discloses any such return or tax information to another
person not entitled to knowledge of such return or tax information
under the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If
the person guilty of such violation is an officer or employee of the
state, such person shall forfeit such office or employment and shall be
incapable of holding any public office or employment in this state for
a period of two years thereafter.

PART IV
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 Except as provided in section 110 of this
act, the repealed sections in section 112 of this act do not affect any
rights, liabilities, obligations, or proceedings, incurred or
instituted under those repealed sections or rules or orders adopted by
the department of revenue pursuant to those repealed sections prior to
the effective date of section 112 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 (1) Sections 101 through 112 and 201 of
this act take effect January 1, 2007.
(2) Sections 301 through 309 of this act are necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and take effect immediately.
(3) Section 310 of this act takes effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 Section 309 of this act expires July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 Part headings used in this act are not
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---