BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.103.010 and 2000 c 159 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this section and RCW 28B.103.020 and
28B.103.030.
(1) "Eligible student" means an enlisted member or an officer of
the rank of captain or below in the Washington national guard who
attends an institution of higher education that is located in this
state and accredited by the Northwest Association of Schools and
Colleges, or beginning September 1, 2006, an institution that is
located in this state that provides approved training under the
Montgomery GI Bill, and who meets any additional selection criteria
adopted by the office.
(2) "Conditional scholarship" means a loan that is forgiven in
whole or in part if the recipient renders service as a member of the
Washington national guard under rules adopted by the office.
(3) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means either to
render service in the Washington national guard in lieu of monetary
repayment, or to be relieved of the service obligation under rules
adopted by the office.
(4) "Office" means the office of the adjutant general of the state
military department.
(5) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received a
conditional scholarship under this chapter.
(6) "Service obligation" means serving in the Washington national
guard for one additional year for each year of conditional scholarship
received under this program.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.103.020 and 1994 c 234 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington state national guard conditional scholarship program
is established. The program shall be administered by the office. In
administering the program, the powers and duties of the office shall
include, but need not be limited to:
(1) The selection of eligible students to receive conditional
scholarships;
(2) The award of conditional scholarships funded by federal and
state funds, private donations, or repayments from any participant who
does not complete the participant's service obligation. Use of state
funds is subject to available funds. The annual amount of each
conditional scholarship may vary, but shall not exceed the annual cost
of undergraduate tuition fees and services and activities fees at the
University of Washington, plus an allowance for books and supplies;
(3) The adoption of necessary rules and guidelines, including
establishing a priority for eligible students attending an institution
of higher education located in this state that is accredited by the
Northwest Association of Schools and Colleges;
(4) The adoption of participant selection criteria. The criteria
may include but need not be limited to requirements for: Satisfactory
progress, minimum grade point averages, enrollment in courses or
programs that lead to a baccalaureate degree or an associate degree or
a certificate, and satisfactory participation as a member of the
Washington national guard;
(5) The notification of participants of their additional service
obligation or required repayment of the conditional scholarship; and
(6) The collection of repayments from participants who do not meet
the eligibility criteria or service obligations.

--- END ---