BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.44.270 and 1998 c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to sell, give, or otherwise
supply liquor to any person under the age of twenty-one years or permit
any person under that age to consume liquor on his or her premises or
on any premises under his or her control. For the purposes of this
subsection, "premises" includes real property, houses, buildings, and
other structures, and motor vehicles and watercraft. A violation of
this subsection is a gross misdemeanor punishable as provided for in
chapter 9A.20 RCW. In addition, the court may suspend a driver's
license issued to or the driving privilege of a person for not more
than: (a) Thirty days for a first conviction; and (b) six months for
a second or subsequent conviction.
(2)(a) It is unlawful for any person under the age of twenty-one
years to possess, consume, or otherwise acquire any liquor. A
violation of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor punishable as
provided for in chapter 9A.20 RCW. In addition, the court shall
suspend a driver's license issued to or the driving privilege of a
person for not more than: (a) Thirty days for a first conviction; and
(b) six months for a second or subsequent conviction.
(b) It is unlawful for a person under the age of twenty-one years
to be in a public place, or to be in a motor vehicle in a public place,
while exhibiting the effects of having consumed liquor. For purposes
of this subsection, exhibiting the effects of having consumed liquor
means that a person has the odor of liquor on his or her breath and
either: (i) Is in possession of or close proximity to a container that
has or recently had liquor in it; or (ii) by speech, manner,
appearance, behavior, lack of coordination, or otherwise, exhibits that
he or she is under the influence of liquor. This subsection (2)(b)
does not apply if the person is in the presence of a parent or guardian
or has consumed or is consuming liquor under circumstances described in
subsection (4) or (5) of this section.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2)(a) of this section do not apply to
liquor given or permitted to be given to a person under the age of
twenty-one years by a parent or guardian and consumed in the presence
of the parent or guardian. This subsection shall not authorize
consumption or possession of liquor by a person under the age of
twenty-one years on any premises licensed under chapter 66.24 RCW.
(4) This section does not apply to liquor given for medicinal
purposes to a person under the age of twenty-one years by a parent,
guardian, physician, or dentist.
(5) This section does not apply to liquor given to a person under
the age of twenty-one years when such liquor is being used in
connection with religious services and the amount consumed is the
minimal amount necessary for the religious service.
(6) Conviction or forfeiture of bail for a violation of this
section by a person under the age of twenty-one years at the time of
such conviction or forfeiture shall not be a disqualification of that
person to acquire a license to sell or dispense any liquor after that
person has attained the age of twenty-one years.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.44.290 and 2003 c 53 s 301 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person under the age of twenty-one years who purchases or
attempts to purchase liquor shall be guilty of a violation of this
title. In addition, the court shall suspend a driver's license issued
to or the driving privilege of a person for not more than: (a) Thirty
days for a first conviction; and (b) six months for a second or
subsequent conviction. This section does not apply to persons between
the ages of eighteen and twenty-one years who are participating in a
controlled purchase program authorized by the liquor control board
under rules adopted by the board. Violations occurring under a
private, controlled purchase program authorized by the liquor control
board may not be used for criminal or administrative prosecution.
(2) An employer who conducts an in-house controlled purchase
program authorized under this section shall provide his or her
employees a written description of the employer's in-house controlled
purchase program. The written description must include notice of
actions an employer may take as a consequence of an employee's failure
to comply with company policies regarding the sale of alcohol during an
in-house controlled purchase.
(3) An in-house controlled purchase program authorized under this
section shall be for the purposes of employee training and employer
self-compliance checks. An employer may not terminate an employee
solely for a first-time failure to comply with company policies
regarding the sale of alcohol during an in-house controlled purchase
program authorized under this section.
(4) Every person between the ages of eighteen and twenty,
inclusive, who is convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of
a misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a
minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars shall be imposed and any
sentence requiring community restitution shall require not fewer than
twenty-five hours of community restitution. In addition, the court
shall suspend a driver's license issued to or the driving privilege of
a person for not more than: (a) Thirty days for a first conviction;
and (b) six months for a second or subsequent conviction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of licensing shall promptly suspend a driver's
license issued to or the driving privilege of a person, upon the
court's imposition of a suspension of a driver's license or driving
privilege under RCW 66.44.270(1).
(2) The department shall promptly suspend a driver's license issued
to or the driving privilege of a person who is under the age of twenty-one years upon a violation of RCW 66.44.270(2)(a) or 66.44.290 (1) or
(4).

--- END ---