BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.106.010 and 2003 c 399 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the
following words and phrases as ((hereinafter)) used in this chapter
shall have the following meaning:
(1) "Advisory board" means the state plumbing and mechanical
advisory board ((of plumbers));
(2) "Contractor" means any person, corporate or otherwise, who
engages in, or offers or advertises to engage in, any work covered by
the provisions of this chapter by way of trade or business, or any
person, corporate or otherwise, who employs anyone, or offers or
advertises to employ anyone, to engage in any work covered by the
provisions of this chapter;
(3) "Department" means the department of labor and industries;
(4) "Director" means the director of department of labor and
industries;
(5) "Heating, ventilating, air conditioning, and refrigeration" or
"HVAC/R" (a) means that craft involved in installing, altering,
repairing and renovating heating, ventilation, air conditioning, and
refrigeration systems and equipment; and (b) does not include
residential wood stoves, or work performed by an electric utility or
employees of an electrical utility while engaging in the installation,
repair, replacement, or maintenance of HVAC/R equipment associated with
work performed on the utility's lines or systems;
(6) "HVAC/R equipment" means all materials, devices, components,
appliances, fuel delivery piping, controls, including thermostatic
controls for air, liquid, or gas, cabling, and wiring necessary to
operate any system that heats, cools, conditions, ventilates, filters,
refrigerates, humidifies, or dehumidifies environmental air for
industrial, commercial, or residential use, including decorative gas
fireplaces, which does not include: (a) Electrical wiring on the
energized side of a switch or other means of disconnecting the
electrical circuit providing power to the HVAC/R equipment from a
source of power; (b) mechanical piping other than that necessary to
deliver fuel; or (c) sheet metal work or ducting;
(7) "HVAC/R fuel delivery piping mechanic" means a person who
installs, alters, repairs, and renovates piping that delivers liquid or
gas fuel to HVAC/R equipment, other than a registered journeyman or
specialty plumber who works on piping necessary to deliver gas fuel to
HVAC/R equipment;
(8) "Journeyman HVAC/R mechanic" means a person who installs,
alters, repairs, and renovates HVAC/R equipment who has been issued a
certificate of competency by the department of labor and industries
under RCW 18.106.070;
(9) "Journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic" means a person who
installs, alters, repairs, and renovates HVAC/R equipment in a
residential structure who has been issued a certificate of competency
by the department of labor and industries under RCW 18.106.070;
(10) "Journeyman plumber" means any person who has been issued a
certificate of competency by the department of labor and industries as
provided in this chapter;
(((6))) (11) "Like-in-kind" means having similar characteristics
such as plumbing size, type, and function, and being in the same
location;
(((7))) (12) "Medical gas piping" means oxygen, nitrous oxide, high
pressure nitrogen, medical compressed air, and medical vacuum systems;
(((8))) (13) "Medical gas piping installer" means a journeyman
plumber who has been issued a medical gas piping installer endorsement;
(((9))) (14) "Plumbing" means that craft involved in installing,
altering, repairing and renovating potable water systems, liquid waste
systems, and medical gas piping systems within a building.
Installation in a water system of water softening or water treatment
equipment is not within the meaning of plumbing as used in this
chapter;
(((10))) (15) "Specialty plumber" means anyone who has been issued
a specialty certificate of competency limited to:
(a) Installation, maintenance, and repair of the plumbing of
single-family dwellings, duplexes, and apartment buildings that do not
exceed three stories; or
(b) Maintenance and repair of backflow prevention assemblies.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.106.020 and 2002 c 82 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may engage in or offer to engage in the trade of
plumbing without having a journeyman certificate, specialty
certificate, temporary permit, or trainee certificate. A trainee must
be supervised by a person who has a journeyman certificate, specialty
certificate, or temporary permit, as specified in RCW 18.106.070. No
contractor may employ a person to engage in or offer to engage in the
trade of plumbing unless the person employed has a journeyman
certificate, specialty certificate, temporary permit, or trainee
certificate. This section does not apply to a contractor who is
contracting for work on his or her own residence.
(2) No person may engage in or offer to engage in medical gas
piping installation without having a certificate of competency as a
journeyman plumber and a medical gas piping installer endorsement. A
trainee may engage in medical gas piping installation if he or she has
a training certificate and is supervised by a person with a medical gas
piping installer endorsement. No contractor may employ a person to
engage in or offer to engage in medical gas piping installation unless
the person employed has a certificate of competency as a journeyman
plumber and a medical gas piping installer endorsement.
(3) Except for electricians properly licensed or supervised
pursuant to chapter 19.28 RCW and performing work within the scope of
their licenses, no person may engage in or offer to engage in the trade
of installing, repairing, or maintaining HVAC/R equipment without
having a journeyman HVAC/R mechanic certificate, journeyman residential
HVAC/R mechanic certificate, HVAC/R fuel delivery piping mechanic
certificate, temporary permit, or HVAC/R trainee certificate. A
trainee must be supervised by a person who has a journeyman HVAC/R
mechanic certificate, journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic
certificate, or temporary permit, as specified in RCW 18.106.070. No
contractor may employ a person to engage in or offer to engage in the
trade of repairing, maintaining, or installing HVAC/R equipment unless
the person employed has a journeyman HVAC/R mechanic certificate,
journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic certificate, HVAC/R fuel
delivery piping mechanic certificate, temporary permit, or HVAC/R
trainee certificate. This section does not apply to a contractor who
is contracting for work on his or her own residence. This section
shall also not apply to workers retained by an HVAC/R contractor to
engage in only activities that do not require knowledge or skills
associated with the energizing or fueling of HVAC/R equipment, such as
the lifting or movement of decommissioned, de-energized, or un-energized HVAC/R equipment and related tools and supplies to, from, or
within the worksite.
(4) No contractor may advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or
perform any work under this chapter without being registered as a
contractor under chapter 18.27 RCW.
(((4))) (5) Violation of this section is an infraction. Each day
in which a person engages in the trade of plumbing or HVAC/R in
violation of this section or employs a person in violation of this
section is a separate infraction. Each worksite at which a person
engages in the trade of plumbing or HVAC/R in violation of this section
or at which a person is employed in violation of this section is a
separate infraction.
(((5))) (6) Notices of infractions for violations of this section
may be issued to:
(a) The person engaging in or offering to engage in the trade of
plumbing or HVAC/R in violation of this section;
(b) The contractor in violation of this section; and
(c) The contractor's employee who authorized the work assignment of
the person employed in violation of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.106.030 and 1997 c 326 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person desiring to be issued a certificate of competency as
provided in this chapter shall deliver evidence in a form prescribed by
the department affirming that said person has had sufficient experience
in as well as demonstrated general competency in the trade of plumbing
or specialty plumbing so as to qualify him to make an application for
a certificate of competency as a journeyman plumber or specialty
plumber. Completion of a course of study in the plumbing trade in the
armed services of the United States or at a school accredited by the
work force training and education coordinating board shall constitute
sufficient evidence of experience and competency to enable such person
to make application for a certificate of competency.
(2) Any person desiring to be issued a medical gas piping installer
endorsement shall deliver evidence in a form prescribed by the
department affirming that the person has met the requirements
established by the department for a medical gas piping installer
endorsement.
(3) Any person desiring to be issued a journeyman HVAC/R mechanic
certificate, journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic certificate, HVAC/R
fuel delivery piping certificate, temporary permit, or HVAC/R trainee
certificate shall deliver evidence in a form prescribed by the
department affirming that the person has met the requirements
established under this chapter for a journeyman HVAC/R mechanic
certificate, journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic certificate, HVAC/R
fuel delivery piping mechanic certificate, temporary permit, or HVAC/R
trainee certificate.
(4) In addition to supplying the evidence as prescribed in this
section, each applicant for a certificate of competency shall submit an
application for such certificate on such form and in such manner as
shall be prescribed by the director of the department.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.106.040 and 2001 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of the application and evidence set forth in RCW
18.106.030, the director shall review the same and make a determination
as to whether the applicant is eligible to take an examination for the
certificate of competency. To be eligible to take the examination:
(a) Each applicant for a journeyman plumber's certificate of
competency shall furnish written evidence that he or she has completed
a course of study in the plumbing trade in the armed services of the
United States or at a school licensed by the work force training and
education coordinating board, or has had four or more years of
experience under the direct supervision of a licensed journeyman
plumber.
(b) Each applicant for a specialty plumber's certificate of
competency under RCW 18.106.010(((8)(a))) (15)(a) shall furnish written
evidence that he or she has completed a course of study in the plumbing
trade in the armed services of the United States or at a school
licensed by the work force training and education coordinating board
under chapter 28C.10 RCW, or that he or she has had at least three
years practical experience in the specialty.
(c) Each applicant for a specialty plumber's certificate of
competency under RCW 18.106.010(((8)(b))) (15)(b) shall furnish written
evidence that he or she is eligible to take the examination. These
eligibility requirements shall be adopted by rule by the director
pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(d) Each applicant for a journeyman HVAC/R mechanic certificate of
competency under RCW 18.106.010(8) shall furnish: (i) Written evidence
that he or she has completed a course of study in the HVAC/R trade in
the armed services of the United States, civil service shipyard, or
repair facility, at a school licensed by the work force training and
education coordinating board, or at an apprenticeship program approved
by the apprentice council created under RCW 49.04.010; or (ii) evidence
of at least eight thousand hours of verifiable work experience, of
which at least four thousand hours must be other than (A) the
installation, repair, or maintenance of residential HVAC/R equipment,
(B) fuel delivery piping work, and (C) work in accordance with an
HVAC/R equipment's manufacturer's preventative or routine maintenance
procedures, other than the repair or replacement of electrical or
mechanical components, preventative maintenance work, and fuel delivery
piping. Of the eight thousand hours of work experience, up to four
thousand hours of training may be applied from the completion of a work
force accredited training school or apprenticeship program specializing
in heating, ventilation, air conditioning, and refrigeration.
(e) Each applicant for a journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic
certificate of competency under RCW 18.106.010(9) shall furnish: (i)
Written evidence that he or she has completed a course of study in the
HVAC/R trade in the armed services of the United States, civil service
shipyard, or repair facility, at a school licensed by the work force
training and education coordinating board, or at an apprenticeship
program approved by the apprentice council created under RCW 49.04.010;
or (ii) evidence of at least four thousand hours of verifiable work
experience of which two thousand hours must be other than: (A) Fuel
delivery piping work; and (B) work in accordance with an HVAC/R
equipment's manufacturer's preventative or routine maintenance
procedures, other than the repair or replacement of electrical or
mechanical components, preventative maintenance work and fuel delivery
piping. Of the four thousand hours or less of work experience, no more
than two thousand hours of training may be applied from the completion
of a work force accredited training school or apprenticeship program
specializing in heating, ventilation, air conditioning, and
refrigeration.
(f) Each applicant for an HVAC/R fuel delivery piping mechanic
certificate of competency under RCW 18.106.010(7) shall furnish: (i)
Written evidence that he or she has completed a course of study in the
HVAC/R trade in the armed services of the United States, civil service
shipyard, or repair facility, at a school licensed by the work force
training and education coordinating board, or at an apprenticeship
program approved by the apprentice council created under RCW 49.04.010;
or (ii) evidence of at least two thousand hours of verifiable work
experience, of which one thousand hours must be from other than
preventative maintenance work. In addition, a gas codes course
approved by the department, of no less than sixty hours, must be
completed. Of the two thousand hours of work experience, no more than
one thousand hours of training may be applied from the completion of a
work force accredited training school or apprenticeship program
specializing in heating, ventilation, air conditioning, and
refrigeration.
(2)(a) The director shall establish reasonable rules for the
examinations to be given applicants for certificates of competency. In
establishing the rules, the director shall consult with the state
plumbing and mechanical advisory board ((of plumbers as)) established
in RCW 18.106.110.
(b) The director shall establish reasonable criteria by rule for
determining an applicant's eligibility to take an examination for the
certificate of competency for specialty plumbers under subsection
(1)(c) of this section. In establishing the criteria, the director
shall consult with the state plumbing and mechanical advisory board
((of plumbers as)) established in RCW 18.106.110. ((These rules must
take effect by July 1, 2002.))
(3) Upon determination that the applicant is eligible to take the
examination, the director shall so notify the applicant, indicating the
time and place for taking the same.
(4) No other requirement for eligibility may be imposed.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.106.050 and 1997 c 326 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, with the advice of the advisory board, shall
prepare a written examination to be administered to applicants for
certificates of competency for journeyman plumber and specialty
plumber. The examination shall be constructed to determine:
(a) Whether the applicant possesses varied general knowledge of the
technical information and practical procedures that are identified with
the trade of journeyman plumber or specialty plumber; and
(b) Whether the applicant is familiar with the applicable plumbing
codes and the administrative rules of the department pertaining to
plumbing and plumbers.
((The department shall administer the examination to eligible
persons. All applicants shall, before taking the examination, pay to
the department a fee.))
(2) ((For purposes of the medical gas piping installer
endorsement,)) The department, with the advice of the advisory board,
shall prepare a written examination to be administered to applicants
for certificates of competency for journeyman HVAC/R mechanic,
journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic, and HVAC/R fuel delivery piping
mechanic. The examination shall be constructed to determine:
(a) Whether the applicant possesses varied general knowledge of the
technical information and practical procedures that are identified with
the HVAC/R trade; and
(b) Whether the applicant is familiar with the applicable plumbing,
electrical, and mechanical codes and administrative rules of the
department pertaining to HVAC/R.
(3) The department, with the consent of the advisory board, may
enter into a contract with a nationally recognized testing agency to
develop, administer, and score ((medical gas piping installer)) any
examinations required by this chapter. All applicants shall, before
taking an examination ((for a medical gas piping installer
endorsement)), pay the required examination fee. The department shall
set the examination fee by contract with a nationally recognized
testing agency. The fee shall cover but not exceed the costs of
preparing and administering the examination and the materials necessary
to conduct the practical elements of the examination. The department
shall approve training courses and set the fees for training courses
for ((the medical gas piping installer endorsement)) examinations under
this chapter.
The department shall certify the results of the examinations under
this chapter, and shall notify the applicant in writing whether he or
she has passed or failed. Any applicant who has failed the examination
may retake the examination, upon the terms and after a period of time
that the director shall set by rule. The director may not limit the
number of times that a person may take the examination.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.106.070 and 2003 c 399 s 801 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a certificate of competency to all
applicants who have passed the examination and have paid the fee for
the certificate. The certificate shall bear the date of issuance, and
shall expire on the birthdate of the holder immediately following the
date of issuance. The certificate shall be renewable every other year,
upon application, on or before the birthdate of the holder. The
department shall renew a certificate of competency if the applicant:
(a) Pays the renewal fee assessed by the department; and (b) during the
past two years has completed sixteen hours of continuing education
approved by the department with the advice of the advisory board,
including four hours related to electrical safety. If a person fails
to renew the certificate by the renewal date, he or she must pay a
doubled fee. If the person does not renew the certificate within
ninety days of the renewal date, he or she must retake the examination
and pay the examination fee.
The journeyman plumber and specialty plumber certificates of
competency, the medical gas piping installer endorsement, the
journeyman HVAC/R mechanic, journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic,
HVAC/R fuel delivery piping mechanic certificates, and the temporary
permits provided for in this chapter grant the holder the right to
engage in the work of plumbing as a journeyman plumber, specialty
plumber, journeyman HVAC/R mechanic, journeyman residential HVAC/R
mechanic, HVAC/R fuel delivery piping mechanic, or medical gas piping
installer, in accordance with their provisions throughout the state and
within any of its political subdivisions on any job or any employment
without additional proof of competency or any other license or permit
or fee to engage in the work. This section does not preclude employees
from adhering to a union security clause in any employment where such
a requirement exists.
(2)(a) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the plumbing construction trade or
who is learning the plumbing construction trade may work in the
plumbing construction trade if supervised by a certified journeyman
plumber or a certified specialty plumber in that plumber's specialty.
All apprentices and individuals learning the plumbing construction
trade shall obtain a plumbing training certificate from the department.
The certificate shall authorize the holder to learn the plumbing
construction trade ((while)) under the direct supervision of a
journeyman plumber or a specialty plumber working in his or her
specialty. The holder of the plumbing training certificate shall renew
the certificate annually. At the time of renewal, the holder shall
provide the department with an accurate list of the holder's employers
in the plumbing construction industry for the previous year and the
number of hours worked for each employer. An annual fee shall be
charged for the issuance or renewal of the certificate. The department
shall set the fee by rule. The fee shall cover, but not exceed, the
cost of administering and enforcing the trainee certification and
supervision requirements of this chapter. Apprentices and individuals
learning the plumbing construction trade shall ((have)) possess their
plumbing training certificates ((in their possession)) at all times
((that they are)) when performing plumbing work. They shall show their
certificates to an authorized representative of the department at the
representative's request.
(b) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the HVAC/R trade or who is
learning the HVAC/R trade may work in the HVAC/R trade if supervised by
a journeyman HVAC/R mechanic, journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic,
or HVAC/R fuel delivery piping mechanic who works in that mechanic's
scope of work. All apprentices and individuals learning the HVAC/R
trade shall obtain an HVAC/R training certificate from the department.
The certificate shall authorize the holder to learn the HVAC/R trade
under the direct supervision of a journeyman HVAC/R mechanic, a
journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic, or an HVAC/R fuel delivery
piping mechanic who works in that mechanic's scope of work. The holder
of the HVAC/R training certificate shall renew the certificate
annually. At the time of renewal, the holder shall provide the
department with an accurate list of the holder's employers in the
HVAC/R industry for the previous year and the number of hours worked
for each employer. An annual fee shall be charged for the issuance or
renewal of the certificate. The department shall set the fee by rule.
The fee shall cover, but not exceed, the cost of administering and
enforcing the trainee certification and supervision requirements of
this chapter. Apprentices and individuals learning the HVAC/R trade
shall possess their HVAC/R training certificates at all times when
performing HVAC/R work. They shall show their certificates to an
authorized representative of the department at the representative's
request.
(3) Any person who has been issued a plumbing or HVAC/R training
certificate under this chapter may work if that person is under
supervision. Supervision shall consist of a person being on the same
job site and under the control of either a journeyman plumber or an
appropriate specialty plumber, or a journeyman HVAC/R mechanic,
journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic, or HVAC/R fuel delivery piping
mechanic who has an applicable certificate of competency issued under
this chapter. Either a journeyman plumber or an appropriate specialty
plumber, or a journeyman HVAC/R mechanic, journeyman residential HVAC/R
mechanic, or HVAC/R fuel delivery piping mechanic shall be on the same
job site as the noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five
percent of each working day unless otherwise provided in this chapter.
The ratio of noncertified individuals to certified journeymen or
specialty plumbers, or journeyman HVAC/R mechanics, journeyman
residential HVAC/R mechanics, or HVAC/R fuel delivery piping mechanics
working on a job site shall be:
(a) Not more than two noncertified plumbers working on any one job
site for every certified specialty plumber or journeyman plumber
working as a specialty plumber; ((and))
(b) Not more than one noncertified plumber working on any one job
site for every certified journeyman plumber working as a journeyman
plumber;
(c) Not more than one HVAC/R trainee working on any job site for
every journeyman HVAC/R mechanic working as a journeyman HVAC/R
mechanic;
(d) Not more than two HVAC/R trainees working on any residential
job site for either every (i) journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic
working as a journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic or (ii) journeyman
HVAC/R mechanic; and
(e) At least one (i) certified HVAC/R fuel delivery piping mechanic
working as an HVAC/R fuel delivery piping mechanic, (ii) journeyman
residential HVAC/R mechanic working as a journeyman residential HVAC/R
mechanic, or (iii) journeyman HVAC/R mechanic at a site where an HVAC/R
trainee is performing HVAC/R fuel delivery piping work.
An individual who has a current training certificate and who has
successfully completed or is currently enrolled in an approved
apprenticeship program or in a technical school program in the plumbing
construction or HVAC/R trade in a school approved by the work force
training and education coordinating board, may work without direct on-site supervision during the last six months of meeting the practical
experience requirements of this chapter.
(4) An individual who has a current training certificate and who
has successfully completed or is currently enrolled in a medical gas
piping installer training course approved by the department may work on
medical gas piping systems if the individual is under the direct
supervision of a certified medical gas piping installer who holds a
medical gas piping installer endorsement one hundred percent of a
working day on a one-to-one ratio.
(5) The training to become a certified plumber, journeyman HVAC/R
mechanic, journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic, or HVAC/R fuel
delivery piping mechanic must include not less than sixteen hours of
classroom training established by the director with the advice of the
advisory board. The classroom training must include, but not be
limited to, electrical wiring safety, grounding, bonding, and other
related items plumbers and HVAC/R mechanics need to know to work under
RCW 19.28.091.
(6) All persons who are certified plumbers before January 1, 2003,
are deemed to have received the classroom training required in
subsection (5) of this section.
(7)(a) An HVAC/R trainee may perform work in accordance with an
HVAC/R equipment's manufacturer's preventative or routine maintenance
procedures, other than the repair or replacement of any electrical or
mechanical components, as long as on-site supervision is provided by
either a journeyman HVAC/R mechanic working as a journeyman HVAC/R
mechanic or a journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic working as a
journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic no less than twenty-five percent
of the time during any day the HVAC/R trainee is engaged in such work.
(b) Each hour that an HVAC/R trainee performs work that is properly
supervised pursuant to this section is creditable towards the minimum
hours of experience necessary to qualify to take an examination for the
certification of competency under RCW 18.106.040.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.106.080 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 175 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
No examination shall be required of any applicant for:
(1) A certificate of competency who, on July 16, 1973, was engaged
in a bona fide business or trade of plumbing, or on said date held a
valid journeyman plumber's license issued by a political subdivision of
the state of Washington and whose license is valid at the time of
making his application for said certificate. Applicants qualifying
under this section shall be issued a certificate by the department upon
making an application as provided in RCW 18.106.030 and paying the fee
required under RCW 18.106.050((: PROVIDED, That)). However, no
applicant under this section shall be required to furnish such evidence
as required by RCW 18.106.030.
(2) A certificate of competency as a journeyman HVAC/R mechanic,
who before June 30, 2007, provides the department with evidence of at
least eight thousand hours of verifiable work experience of which four
thousand hours or more must be:
(a) Nonresidential HVAC/R work performed after January 1, 1998,
with a general or specialty HVAC/R contractor registered under chapter
18.27 RCW, and must also possess, at the time of application, a valid
electrical license that allows work in the repair, replacement,
maintenance, or installation of heating, ventilation, air conditioning,
and refrigeration equipment in Washington state;
(b) Nonresidential HVAC/R work performed after January 1, 1998,
with a registered general or specialty HVAC/R contractor, or the
equivalent, which was accrued in another state, country, or province;
(c) Nonresidential HVAC/R work experience in the United States
armed forces; or
(d) Any combination of at least eight thousand hours of verifiable
work experience as described in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(3) A certificate of competency as a journeyman residential HVAC/R
mechanic, who before June 30, 2007, provides the department with
evidence of at least four thousand hours of verifiable work experience
after January 1, 1998:
(a) With a general or specialty HVAC/R contractor registered under
chapter 18.27 RCW, and who possesses at the time of application, a
valid electrical license that allows work in the repair, replacement,
maintenance, or installation of heating, ventilation, air conditioning,
and refrigeration equipment in Washington state;
(b) With a registered general or specialty HVAC/R contractor, or
the equivalent, which was accrued in another state, country, or
province;
(c) In the United States armed forces; or
(d) Any combination of at least four thousand hours of verifiable
work experience as described in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(4) A certificate of competency as an HVAC/R fuel delivery piping
mechanic, who before June 30, 2007, provides the department with
evidence of at least two thousand hours of verifiable work experience
after January 1, 1998:
(a) With a general or specialty HVAC/R contractor registered under
chapter 18.27 RCW, and who either provides proof of completion of a gas
codes course approved by the department of at least sixty hours or
holds a valid jurisdictional gas code license within the state of
Washington;
(b) With a registered general or specialty HVAC/R contractor, or
the equivalent, which was accrued in another state, country, or
province;
(c) In the United States armed forces; or
(d) Any combination of at least two thousand hours of verifiable
work experience as listed in (a) through (c) of this subsection.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.106.090 and 1985 c 7 s 78 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to grant and issue temporary permits
in lieu of certificates of competency whenever a plumber or HVAC/R
mechanic coming into the state of Washington from another state
requests the department for a temporary permit to engage in the trade
of plumbing as a journeyman plumber or as a specialty plumber, or as a
journeyman HVAC/R mechanic, journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic, or
HVAC/R fuel delivery piping mechanic during the period of time between
filing of an application for a certificate as provided in RCW
18.106.030 as now or hereafter amended and taking the examination
provided for in RCW 18.106.050((: PROVIDED, That)). However, no
temporary permit shall be issued to:
(1) Any person who has failed to pass the examination for a
certificate of competency;
(2) Any applicant under this section who has not furnished the
department with such evidence required under RCW 18.106.030;
(3) ((To)) Any apprentice plumber or apprentice HVAC/R mechanic.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.106.110 and 1997 c 307 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created a state plumbing and mechanical advisory board
((of plumbers)), to be composed of ((five)) fourteen members appointed
by the governor. ((Two)) Three members shall be journeyman plumbers,
((two)) three members shall be persons conducting a plumbing business,
((and)) one member shall be from the general public who is familiar
with the business and trade of plumbing, three members shall be either
journeyman HVAC/R mechanics or journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanics,
at least one of which must reside east of the crest of the Cascade
mountains, three members shall be persons conducting an HVAC/R
business, at least one of which must reside east of the crest of the
Cascade mountains, and one member from the general public who is
familiar with the HVAC/R trade and business.
(2) The term of one journeyman plumber expires July 1, 1995; the
term of the second journeyman plumber expires July 1, 2000; the term of
the third journeyman plumber expires July 1, 2008; the term of one
person conducting a plumbing business expires July 1, 1996; the term of
the second person conducting a plumbing business expires July 1, 2000;
((and)) the term of the third person conducting a plumbing business
expires July 1, 2007; the term of the public member with plumbing
experience expires July 1, 1997; the term of one journeyman HVAC/R
mechanic expires July 1, 2007; the term of the second journeyman HVAC/R
mechanic expires July 1, 2008; the term of the third journeyman HVAC/R
mechanic expires July 1, 2009; the term of one person conducting an
HVAC/R business expires July 1, 2007; the term of the second person
conducting an HVAC/R business expires July 1, 2008; the term of the
third person conducting an HVAC/R business expires July 1, 2009; and
the term of the public member with HVAC/R experience expires July 1,
2008. ((Thereafter,)) Upon the expiration of said terms, the governor
shall appoint a new member to serve for a period of three years.
However, to ensure that the board can continue to act, a member whose
term expires shall continue to serve until his or her replacement is
appointed. In the case of any vacancy on the board for any reason, the
governor shall appoint a new member to serve out the term of the person
whose position has become vacant.
(3)(a) The advisory board shall carry out all the functions and
duties enumerated in this chapter, as well as generally advise the
department on all matters relative to this chapter. However, no rules
shall be amended or repealed until the advisory board has had an
opportunity to consider any proposed amendments or repeals and make
recommendations to the director relative thereto.
(b) The advisory board may, upon a two-thirds majority vote of the
entire board, organize itself into two subboards for the purpose of
addressing issues of relevance to either the plumbing trade and
business or the HVAC/R trade and business, but not to both trades and
businesses. All decisions of either subboard constituted pursuant to
this subsection (3)(b) shall be deemed a decision of the advisory board
if approved by a two-thirds majority vote of the members of the
subboard.
(4) Each member of the advisory board shall receive travel expenses
in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now
existing or hereafter amended for each day in which such member is
actually engaged in attendance upon the meetings of the advisory board.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.106.130 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 175 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
All moneys received from certificates, permits, or other sources,
shall be paid to the state treasurer as ex officio custodian thereof
and by him placed in a special fund designated as the "plumbing and
HVAC/R certificate fund". He shall pay out upon vouchers duly and
regularly issued therefor and approved by the director. The treasurer
shall keep an accurate record of payments into said fund, and of all
disbursement therefrom. Said fund shall be charged with its pro rata
share of the cost of administering said fund.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.106.150 and 2003 c 399 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require that a
person obtain a license, a certified HVAC/R mechanic, or a certified
plumber in order to do HVAC/R or plumbing work at his or her residence
or farm or place of business or on other property owned by him or her.
(2) A current certificate of competency or apprentice permit is not
required for:
(a) Persons performing HVAC/R or plumbing work on a farm; or
(b) Certified journeyman electricians, certified residential
specialty electricians, or electrical trainees working for an
electrical contractor and performing exempt work under RCW
18.27.090(18).
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be intended to derogate from or
dispense with the requirements of any valid or mechanical plumbing code
enacted by a political subdivision of the state, except that no code
shall require the holder of a certificate of competency to demonstrate
any additional proof of competency or obtain any other license or pay
any fee in order to engage in the trade of plumbing or HVAC/R.
(4) This chapter shall not apply to common carriers subject to Part
I of the Interstate Commerce Act, nor to their officers and employees.
(5) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to any
farm, business, industrial plant, or corporation doing plumbing or
HVAC/R work on premises it owns or operates.
(6) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict the
right of any householder to assist or receive assistance from a friend,
neighbor, relative or other person when none of the individuals doing
such plumbing or HVAC/R work hold themselves out as engaged in the
trade or business of plumbing or HVAC/R, respectively.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.106.155 and 1977 ex.s. c 149 s 11 are each amended
to read as follows:
The director may, upon payment of the appropriate fees, grant a
certificate of competency without examination to any applicant who is
a registered journeyman HVAC/R mechanic, journeyman residential HVAC/R
mechanic, journeyman plumber, or specialty plumber in any other state
whose requirements for registration are at least substantially
equivalent to the requirements of this state, and which extends the
same privileges of reciprocity to journeyman HVAC/R mechanics,
journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanics, journeymen plumbers, or
specialty plumbers registered in this state.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.106.170 and 1983 c 124 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
An authorized representative of the department may investigate
alleged or apparent violations of this chapter. An authorized
representative of the department upon presentation of credentials may
inspect sites at which a person is doing plumbing or HVAC/R work for
the purpose of determining whether that person has a certificate or
permit issued by the department in accordance with this chapter or is
supervised by a person who has such a certificate or permit. Upon
request of the authorized representative of the department, a person
doing plumbing or HVAC/R work shall produce evidence that the person
has a certificate or permit issued by the department in accordance with
this chapter or is supervised by a person who has such a certificate or
permit.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.106.180 and 2002 c 82 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An authorized representative of the department may issue a
notice of infraction as specified in RCW 18.106.020 if:
(a) A person who is doing plumbing or HVAC/R work or who is
offering to do plumbing or HVAC/R work fails to produce evidence of:
(i) Having a certificate or permit issued by the department in
accordance with this chapter, or being supervised by a person who has
such a certificate or permit; and
(ii) Being registered as a contractor as required under chapter
18.27 RCW or this chapter, or being employed by a person who is
registered as a contractor;
(b) A person who employs anyone, or offers or advertises to employ
anyone, to do plumbing or HVAC/R work fails to produce evidence of
being registered as a contractor as required under chapter 18.27 RCW or
this chapter; or
(c) A contractor violates RCW 18.106.320.
(2) A notice of infraction issued under this section shall be
personally served on the person named in the notice by an authorized
representative of the department or sent by certified mail to the last
known address provided to the department of the person named in the
notice.

Sec. 15 RCW 18.106.250 and 2002 c 82 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The administrative law judge shall conduct notice of infraction
cases under this chapter pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The burden of proof is on the department to establish the
commission of the infraction by a preponderance of the evidence. The
notice of infraction shall be dismissed if the defendant establishes
that, at the time the notice was issued:
(a) The defendant who was issued a notice of infraction authorized
by RCW 18.106.020(((5)(a))) (6)(a) had a certificate or permit issued
by the department in accordance with this chapter, was supervised by a
person who has such a certificate or permit, or was exempt from this
chapter under RCW 18.106.150; or
(b) For the defendant who was issued a notice of infraction
authorized by RCW 18.106.020(((5) (b) or (c))) (6) (b) or (c), the
person employed or supervised by the defendant has a certificate or
permit issued by the department in accordance with this chapter, was
supervised by a person who had such a certificate or permit, was exempt
from this chapter under RCW 18.106.150, or was registered as a
contractor under chapter 18.27 RCW.
(3) After consideration of the evidence and argument, the
administrative law judge shall determine whether the infraction was
committed. If it has not been established that the infraction was
committed, an order dismissing the notice shall be entered in the
record of the proceedings. If it has been established that the
infraction was committed, the administrative law judge shall issue
findings of fact and conclusions of law in its decision and order
determining whether the infraction was committed.
(4) An appeal from the administrative law judge's determination or
order shall be to the superior court. The decision of the superior
court is subject only to discretionary review pursuant to Rule 2.3 of
the Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Sec. 16 RCW 18.106.270 and 1994 c 174 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed an infraction under RCW
18.106.020 shall be assessed a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty
dollars for the first infraction, and not more than one thousand
dollars for a second or subsequent infraction. The department shall
set by rule a schedule of penalties for infractions imposed under this
chapter.
(2) The administrative law judge may waive, reduce, or suspend the
monetary penalty imposed for the infraction for good cause shown.
(3) Monetary penalties collected under this chapter shall be
deposited in the plumbing and HVAC/R certificate fund.

Sec. 17 RCW 18.106.320 and 2005 c 274 s 229 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Contractors shall accurately verify and attest to the trainee
hours worked by plumbing and HVAC/R trainees on behalf of the
contractor and that all training hours were under the supervision of a
certified plumber and within the proper ratio, and shall provide names
and certificate numbers of the supervising plumbers((' names and
certificate numbers)) or HVAC/R mechanics. However, contractors are
not required to identify which hours a trainee works with a specific
certified plumber or HVAC/R mechanic.
(2) The department may audit the records of a contractor that has
verified the hours of experience submitted by a plumbing or HVAC/R
trainee to the department under RCW 18.106.030 in the following
circumstances: Excessive hours were reported; hours were reported
outside the normal course of the contractor's business; or for other
similar circumstances in which the department demonstrates a likelihood
of excessive or improper hours being reported. The department shall
limit the audit to records necessary to verify hours. The department
shall adopt rules implementing audit procedures. Information obtained
from a contractor under the provisions of this section is confidential
and is not open to public inspection under chapter 42.56 RCW.
(3) Violation of this section by a contractor is an infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 18.106
RCW to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation,
or other entity to advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, engage
in, conduct, or carry on the business of installing or maintaining
wires or equipment to convey electric current, or installing or
maintaining equipment to be operated by electric current as it pertains
to any HVAC/R equipment defined in RCW 18.106.010(6), without having an
unrevoked, unsuspended, and unexpired: (a) Electrical contractor
license as required by RCW 19.28.041; (b) certificate of competency as
a master journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master
specialty residential electrician, specialty residential electrician,
or a properly supervised electrical trainee, as required by RCW
19.28.161; or (c) certificate of competency as a journeyman HVAC/R
mechanic or journeyman residential HVAC/R mechanic issued by the
department in accordance with this chapter.
(2) It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation,
or other entity to advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, engage
in, conduct, or carry on the business of installing, maintaining, or
repairing fuel piping relating to HVAC/R equipment as defined in RCW
18.106.010(6), without having an unrevoked, unsuspended, and unexpired:
(a) Certificate of competency as a journeyman plumber, specialty
plumber, properly supervised plumbing trainee, or temporary permit, as
required by RCW 18.106.020 and provided in RCW 18.106.070; or (b)
certificate of competency as a journeyman HVAC/R mechanic, journeyman
residential HVAC/R mechanic, HVAC/R fuel delivery mechanic, properly
supervised HVAC/R trainee, or temporary permit issued by the department
in accordance with this chapter.

Sec. 19 RCW 19.28.041 and 2002 c 249 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided by section 18 of this act, it is unlawful
for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity to
engage in, conduct, or carry on the business of installing or
maintaining wires or equipment to convey electric current, or
installing or maintaining equipment to be operated by electric current
as it pertains to the electrical industry, without having an unrevoked,
unsuspended, and unexpired electrical contractor license, issued by the
department in accordance with this chapter. All electrical contractor
licenses expire twenty-four calendar months following the day of their
issue. The department may issue an electrical contractors license for
a period of less than twenty-four months only for the purpose of
equalizing the number of electrical contractor licenses that expire
each month. Application for an electrical contractor license shall be
made in writing to the department, accompanied by the required fee.
The application shall state:
(a) The name and address of the applicant; in case of firms or
partnerships, the names of the individuals composing the firm or
partnership; in case of corporations, the names of the managing
officials thereof;
(b) The location of the place of business of the applicant and the
name under which the business is conducted;
(c) Employer social security number;
(d) Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's
employees working in Washington, as follows:
(i) The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by
the department;
(ii) The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department;
or
(iii) For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada
subject to an agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as
permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of coverage issued by
the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the
applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant
has secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or
province's workers' compensation law;
(e) Employment security department number;
(f) State excise tax registration number;
(g) Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be
substituted for the information required by (d) of this subsection if
the applicant will not employ employees in Washington, and by (e) and
(f) of this subsection; and
(h) Whether a general or specialty electrical contractor license is
sought and, if the latter, the type of specialty. Electrical
contractor specialties include, but are not limited to: Residential,
pump and irrigation, limited energy system, signs, nonresidential
maintenance, restricted nonresidential maintenance, appliance repair,
and a combination specialty. A general electrical contractor license
shall grant to the holder the right to engage in, conduct, or carry on
the business of installing or maintaining wires or equipment to carry
electric current, and installing or maintaining equipment, or
installing or maintaining material to fasten or insulate such wires or
equipment to be operated by electric current, in the state of
Washington. A specialty electrical contractor license shall grant to
the holder a limited right to engage in, conduct, or carry on the
business of installing or maintaining wires or equipment to carry
electrical current, and installing or maintaining equipment; or
installing or maintaining material to fasten or insulate such wires or
equipment to be operated by electric current in the state of Washington
as expressly allowed by the license.
(2) The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage
information provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(d) of this
section, including but not limited to information regarding the
coverage of an individual employee of the applicant. If coverage is
provided under the laws of another state, the department may notify the
other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.
(3) The application for an electrical contractor license shall be
accompanied by a bond in the sum of four thousand dollars with the
state of Washington named as obligee in the bond, with good and
sufficient surety, to be approved by the department. The bond shall at
all times be kept in full force and effect, and any cancellation or
revocation thereof, or withdrawal of the surety therefrom, suspends the
license issued to the principal until a new bond has been filed and
approved as provided in this section. Upon approval of a bond, the
department shall on the next business day deposit the fee accompanying
the application in the electrical license fund and shall file the bond
in the office. The department shall upon request furnish to any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity a certified
copy of the bond upon the payment of a fee that the department shall
set by rule. The fee shall cover but not exceed the cost of furnishing
the certified copy. The bond shall be conditioned that in any
installation or maintenance of wires or equipment to convey electrical
current, and equipment to be operated by electrical current, the
principal will comply with the provisions of this chapter and with any
electrical ordinance, building code, or regulation of a city or town
adopted pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3) that is in effect at the time of
entering into a contract. The bond shall be conditioned further that
the principal will pay for all labor, including employee benefits, and
material furnished or used upon the work, taxes and contributions to
the state of Washington, and all damages that may be sustained by any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity due to a
failure of the principal to make the installation or maintenance in
accordance with this chapter or any applicable ordinance, building
code, or regulation of a city or town adopted pursuant to RCW
19.28.010(3). In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the
license applicant may file with the department a cash deposit or other
negotiable security acceptable to the department. If the license
applicant has filed a cash deposit, the department shall deposit the
funds in a special trust savings account in a commercial bank, mutual
savings bank, or savings and loan association and shall pay annually to
the depositor the interest derived from the account.
(4) The department shall issue general or specialty electrical
contractor licenses to applicants meeting all of the requirements of
this chapter. The provisions of this chapter relating to the licensing
of any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
including the requirement of a bond with the state of Washington named
as obligee therein and the collection of a fee therefor, are exclusive,
and no political subdivision of the state of Washington may require or
issue any licenses or bonds or charge any fee for the same or a similar
purpose. No person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
holding more than one specialty contractor license under this chapter
may be required to pay an annual fee for more than one such license or
to post more than one four thousand dollar bond, equivalent cash
deposit, or other negotiable security.
(5) To obtain a general or specialty electrical contractor license
the applicant must designate an individual who currently possesses a
valid master journeyman electrician's certificate of competency, master
specialty electrician's certificate of competency in the specialty for
which application has been made, or administrator's certificate as a
general electrical contractor administrator or as a specialty
electrical contractor administrator in the specialty for which
application has been made.
(6) Administrator certificate specialties include but are not
limited to: Residential, pump and irrigation, limited energy system,
signs, nonresidential maintenance, restricted nonresidential
maintenance, appliance repair, and combination specialty. To obtain an
administrator's certificate an individual must pass an examination as
set forth in RCW 19.28.051 unless the applicant was a licensed
electrical contractor at any time during 1974. Applicants who were
electrical contractors licensed by the state of Washington at any time
during 1974 are entitled to receive a general electrical contractor
administrator's certificate without examination if the applicants apply
prior to January 1, 1984. The board of electrical examiners shall
certify to the department the names of all persons who are entitled to
either a general or specialty electrical contractor administrator's
certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 This act takes effect January 1, 2007.

--- END ---