BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to give
public and private entities that provide services to children the tools
necessary to prevent convicted child sex offenders from contacting
children when those children are within the legal boundaries of the
covered public and private entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
As used in this section and sections 3 and 4 of this act:
(1) "Covered entity" means any public facility or private facility
whose primary purpose, at any time, is to provide for the education,
care, or recreation of a child or children, including but not limited
to community and recreational centers, playgrounds, schools, swimming
pools, and state or municipal parks.
(2) "Child" means a person under the age of eighteen, unless the
context clearly indicates that the term is otherwise defined in
statute.
(3) "Public facility" means a facility operated by a unit of local
or state government, or by a nonprofit organization.
(4) "Schools" means public and private schools, but does not
include home-based instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010.
(5) "Covered offender" means a person who is eighteen years of age
or older, who is not under the jurisdiction of the juvenile
rehabilitation authority or currently serving a special sex offender
disposition alternative, whose risk level classification has been
assessed at a risk level II or a risk level III pursuant to RCW
72.09.345, and who, at any time, has been convicted of one or more of
the following offenses:
(a) Rape of a child in the first, second, and third degree; child
molestation in the first, second, and third degree; indecent liberties
against a child under age fourteen; sexual misconduct with a minor in
the first and second degree; incest in the first and second degree;
luring with sexual motivation; possession of depictions of minors
engaged in sexually explicit conduct; dealing in depictions of minors
engaged in sexually explicit conduct; bringing into the state
depictions of minors engaged in sexually explicit conduct; sexual
exploitation of a minor; communicating with a minor for immoral
purposes; patronizing a juvenile prostitute;
(b) Indecent liberties against a child under age fifteen; statutory
rape in the first and second degree; carnal knowledge;
(c) Any felony offense for which:
(i) There was a finding that the offense was committed with sexual
motivation; and
(ii) The victim of the offense was less than sixteen years of age
at the time of the offense;
(d) An attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit any of the
offenses listed in (a) through (c) of this subsection;
(e) Any conviction from any other jurisdiction which is comparable
to any of the offenses listed in (a) through (d) of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An owner, employee, or agent of a covered entity may order a
covered offender from the legal premises of a covered entity as
provided under this section. To do this, the owner, employee, or agent
of a covered entity must first personally serve on the covered offender
a written notice that informs the covered offender that:
(a) The covered offender must leave the legal premises of the
covered entity and may not return without the written permission of the
covered entity; and
(b) If the covered offender refuses to leave the legal boundaries
of the covered entity, or thereafter returns and enters within the
legal boundaries of the covered entity, the offender may be charged and
prosecuted for a felony offense as provided in section 4 of this act.
(2) An owner, employee, or agent of a covered entity shall be
immune from civil liability for damages arising from ejecting covered
offenders from a covered entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of the crime of criminal trespass against
children if he or she:
(a) Is a covered offender as defined in section 2 of this act;
(b) Receives written notice that complies with the requirements of
section 3 of this act that he or she is not permitted to remain upon or
reenter the legal boundaries of the covered entity; and
(c) Remains upon or reenters the legal boundaries of the covered
entity without the written permission of the covered entity.
(2) Criminal trespass against children is a class C felony.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2005 c 458 s 2 and 2005 c 183 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit
conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of
a Signal Preemption Device
(RCW 46.37.675)

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW
9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of dependent person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a
Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW
9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW
9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Criminal Trespass Against Children
(second or subsequent offense)
(section 4 of this act)

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting
Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW 48.17.063(3))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Abandonment of dependent person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace
Officer With a Projectile Stun
Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except
subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily
Harm By Use of a Signal
Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.674)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---