BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of fish and wildlife shall
develop a draft grey wolf management plan and present the plan to the
legislature by December 31, 2007. At a minimum the department of fish
and wildlife shall hold a public hearing on the draft plan in each of
the department's regions prior to transmitting the report to the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the department of
fish and wildlife for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---