BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in this section, an eligible light
and power business may claim a credit against the tax imposed under
this chapter.
(2) The amount of credit is equal to the amount of contributions
made in any fiscal year by an eligible light and power business to a
public utility district special needs transportation fund.
(3) The credit under this section shall not exceed twenty-five
thousand dollars per fiscal year per eligible light and power business.
(4) The credit under this section shall be claimed against taxes
due for the same fiscal year in which contributions to a public utility
district special needs transportation fund are made by the eligible
light and power business. The credit claimed for each reporting period
shall not exceed the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter for
the reporting period. Credit earned in any fiscal year shall not be
carried forward or backward and claimed against taxes due for prior or
subsequent fiscal years. Refunds shall not be granted in the place of
a credit. Any unused credit expires.
(5) Any amounts paid to an eligible light and power business by
qualified recipients for ADA-compliant transportation provided or
acquired by the light and power business for the qualified recipient
making the payment shall be deposited into the public utility district
special needs transportation fund.
(6) If contributions for which a credit under this section was
claimed are remaining in a public utility district special needs
transportation fund at the time that the fund is dissolved or are
otherwise not used for ADA-compliant transportation, the light and
power business shall immediately repay to the department the amount of
taxes against which the credit was claimed. Interest, but not
penalties, shall apply to amounts due under this subsection,
retroactively to the date the credit was claimed, and shall accrue
until the taxes against which the credit was claimed are repaid.
(7) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "ADA-compliant transportation" means general purpose
transportation services that meet the requirements of the Americans
with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq., applicable
to public entities operating a demand responsive transportation system.
For purposes of this subsection (7)(a), "demand responsive
transportation system" means any transportation system other than a
transportation system that operates along a prescribed route according
to a fixed schedule. Demand responsive transportation systems
typically include services provided by taxis, limousines, vans, or
shuttle buses.
(b) "Eligible light and power business" means a light and power
business that:
(i) Is a public utility district authorized under Title 54 RCW; and
(ii) Primarily or exclusively serves residents of a rural area.
(c) "Fiscal year" means a year that begins July 1st and ends June
30th of the following year.
(d) "Public utility district special needs transportation fund"
means a fund established by an eligible light and power business that
is devoted and used exclusively by the eligible light and power
business in:
(i) Providing or acquiring ADA-compliant transportation for
qualified recipients; and
(ii) Acquiring motor vehicles or other transportation equipment
necessary for the eligible light and power business to provide
ADA-compliant transportation for qualified recipients.
(e) "Qualified recipient" means any person, including his or her
personal attendants, with a disability or who is at least sixty years
of age, resides in a rural area, and who because of physical or mental
disability, income status, or age is unable to transport himself or
herself or to purchase appropriate transportation. For purposes of
this subsection (7)(e), "person with a disability" means an individual
with a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or
more of the major life activities such as caring for one's self,
performing manual tasks, walking, seeing, hearing, speaking, breathing,
learning, or working.
(f) "Rural area" means a county that has a population density of
less than nine persons per square mile as determined by the office of
financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A rural public utility district may operate or provide a demand
responsive transportation system, within the district's limits, for
qualified recipients.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Demand responsive transportation system" means any
transportation system other than a transportation system that operates
along a prescribed route according to a fixed schedule. A demand
responsive transportation system includes services provided by taxis,
limousines, vans, or shuttle buses. A demand responsive transportation
system does not include ambulance service.
(b) "Disability" means an individual with a physical or mental
impairment that substantially limits one or more of the major life
activities such as caring for one's self, performing manual tasks,
walking, seeing, hearing, speaking, breathing, learning, or working.
(c) "Qualified recipient" means any person, including his or her
personal attendants, with a disability or who is at least sixty years
of age, and who because of physical or mental disability, income
status, or age is unable to transport himself or herself or to purchase
appropriate transportation.
(d) "Rural public utility district" means a district located in a
county with a population density of less than nine persons per square
mile as determined by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to contributions made to a
public utility district special needs transportation fund, as defined
in section 1 of this act, after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---