BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 One of the pillars of American economic
prosperity--our scientific and technological superiority--is beginning
to atrophy even as other nations are developing their own capacity in
these areas. Many respected organizations representing business,
research, and education, as well as government science and statistics
agencies and commissions, have extensively documented the critical
situation in the United States regarding science, technology,
engineering, and mathematics. The indicators range from measurable
declines in United States innovation, such as patents and scientific
articles, to soaring numbers of students in Asia majoring in these
fields, to United States students' lagging interest and performance in
mathematics and science. In Washington state, measures of K-12 student
achievement in mathematics and science yield generally disappointing
results, despite some small positive signs. America's competitive edge
in the global economy, the strength and versatility of its labor force,
and its capacity to nourish research and innovation all depend on an
education system capable of producing a steady supply of young people
well-prepared in mathematics and science. The legislature finds that
it is imperative to encourage and inspire our Washington students to
pursue higher education in the fields of mathematics, science, and
engineering. Our economic viability depends on this, both as a state
and as a nation.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2005 c 205 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except as
provided in section 3 of this act.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of
education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A mathematics/science scholar designation on the high school
diploma is created. This designation shall be awarded to public school
students, and approved private school students at the discretion of the
approved private school, who complete the following requirements:
(a) Successfully earn the following high school credits:
(i) Four mathematics credits, including calculus;
(ii) At least three science credits, including chemistry and
physics; and
(iii) At least three credits of world language other than English;
(b) Receive advanced placement scores of three or higher on at
least two advance placement tests;
(c) Earn a high school grade point average of 3.5 or above; and
(d) Meet the state standards in all content areas of the high
school level Washington assessment of student achievement.
(2) As used in this section, "high school credits" means a full
school year of study or one hundred fifty hours of planned
instructional activities, whichever is greater, or an equivalent as
defined by the state board of education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The higher education coordinating board
shall award full tuition scholarships to students graduating from
public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW who
obtain a mathematics/science scholar designation on their high school
diplomas, if the student pursues an undergraduate degree in a
mathematics or science-related field and who qualify for a scholarship
under the ranking system developed by the board.
(2) The scholarships may only be used for undergraduate coursework
beginning in the student's second year at accredited institutions of
higher education in the state of Washington, except that the
scholarships may be used for undergraduate coursework at Oregon
institutions of higher education that are located in counties bordering
Washington state.
(3) The higher education coordinating board shall develop a ranking
system to determine priority of the award of the mathematics/science
scholarship. The ranking system shall consider the following factors:
(a) The first year of course selection at institutions of higher
education by the applicant. Applications shall be ranked higher based
on the number of mathematics and science classes that the applicant
enrolled and completed;
(b) The grade point average of the applicant in the first year at
an institution of higher education; and
(c) Other criteria that the higher education coordinating board
deems appropriate.
(4) The higher education coordinating board shall award
scholarships to as many eligible students as possible using the ranking
system.
(5) The scholarships may not be awarded to any student who is
pursuing a degree in theology.
(6) The higher education coordinating board may establish
satisfactory progress standards for the continued receipt of the
scholarship.
(7) The higher education coordinating board shall establish the
time frame within which the student must use the scholarship.
(8) The higher education coordinating board may adopt rules to
implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The mathematics/science high school
scholar scholarship account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. The account shall be a nontreasury account retaining its
interest earnings in accordance with RCW 43.79A.040.
(2) The higher education coordinating board shall deposit in the
account all money received for the program. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for the
mathematics/science high school scholar scholarship program, private
contributions to the program, and refunds of scholarships under this
chapter.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall be used for scholarships to
eligible students.
(4) With the exception of the operating costs associated with the
management of the account by the treasurer's office as authorized in
chapter 43.79A RCW, the account shall be credited with all investment
income earned by the account.
(5) Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations
and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.
(6) Disbursements from the account shall be made only on the
authorization of the higher education coordinating board.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2005 c 424 s 18, 2005 c 402 s 8, 2005
c 215 s 10, and 2005 c 16 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers
conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the
grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the
mathematics/science high school scholar scholarship account, the
produce railcar pool account, the rural rehabilitation account, the
stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility
account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse
racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the
Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the
individual development account program account, the Washington horse
racing commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse
racing commission operating account must be credited to the Washington
horse racing commission class C purse fund account), and the life
sciences discovery fund. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 4 and 5 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---