BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
By August 1st, November 1st, February 1st, and May 1st of every
year, the department of transportation shall notify the state treasurer
in writing of the amount of state sales and use tax paid under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW by the Washington state ferries on the purchase of
fuel for the preceding calendar quarter. By September 1st, December
1st, March 1st, and June 1st of every year, the state treasurer shall
transfer an amount equal to the amount indicated by the department in
their notification to the treasurer into the passenger ferry account
created in RCW 47.60.645. This section expires September 30, 2011.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.60.645 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 558 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is hereby established in the transportation fund the
passenger ferry account. Money in the account shall be used for
((capital improvements for passenger ferry projects including, but not
limited to, pedestrian and transit facilities at ferry terminals and
passenger-only ferry vessels)): (1) Operating or capital grants for
ferry systems operated or contracted by local governments as provided
in chapters 36.54 and 36.57A RCW; or (2) grants for the department to
operate the passenger-only ferry route in service as of January 1,
2006. Moneys in the account shall be expended with legislative
appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The indication of the amount of fuel taxes
paid by the Washington state ferries in section 1 of this act applies
to all calendar quarters beginning on or after April 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 By April 1, 2007, the department of
transportation shall sell or otherwise dispose of the Washington state
ferries Snohomish and Chinook for market value and deposit the proceeds
of the sales into the passenger ferry account created in RCW 47.60.645.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall maintain the level of service existing on
January 1, 2006, for the Vashon to Seattle passenger-only ferry route
until such time as either:
(1) A local government assumes the Vashon to Seattle passenger-only
ferry route, and provides a level of service for the route that meets
or exceeds the state level. The successor entity assuming the route
shall assume any existing labor contract governing service on the
Vashon to Seattle passenger-only ferry route; or
(2) A legislative authority of a county with a population over one
million persons and having a boundary on Puget Sound creates a ferry
district under chapter 36.54 RCW, assumes service among Vashon,
Southworth, and Seattle on or before June 30, 2007, and provides a
level of service that meets or exceeds the state level of service on
the Vashon to Seattle passenger-only ferry route. The successor entity
assuming the route shall assume any existing labor contract governing
service on the Vashon to Seattle passenger-only ferry route. A
successor entity under this subsection shall enter into an interlocal
agreement with the public transportation benefit area serving the
Southworth ferry terminal within thirty days of beginning Southworth
ferry service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 36.78 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The county road administration board shall establish a ferry
grant program subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose. The purpose of the grant program is to provide: (a)
Operating or capital grants for ferry systems operated or contracted by
local governments as provided in chapters 36.54 and 36.57A RCW; and (b)
grants for the department of transportation to operate the passenger-only ferry route in service as of January 1, 2006.
(2) In providing grants under this section, the board may enter
into multiple year contracts with the stipulation that future year
allocations are subject to the availability of funding as provided by
legislative appropriation.
(3) Priority shall be given to grant applications that provide
continuity of existing passenger-only service and the provision of
local or federal matching funds.

Sec. 7 RCW 36.54.110 and 2003 c 83 s 301 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county ((with a population over
one million persons and having a boundary on Puget Sound)) may adopt an
ordinance creating a ferry district in all or a portion of the area of
the county, including the area within the corporate limits of any city
or town within the county. The ordinance may be adopted only after a
public hearing has been held on the creation of a ferry district, and
the county legislative authority makes a finding that it is in the
public interest to create the district. ((A ferry district is limited
to providing passenger-only ferry service.))
(2) A ferry district is a municipal corporation, an independent
taxing "authority" within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the
state Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the meaning of
Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.
(3) A ferry district is a body corporate and possesses all the
usual powers of a corporation for public purposes as well as all other
powers that may now or hereafter be specifically conferred by statute,
including, but not limited to, the authority to hire employees, staff,
and services, to enter into contracts, and to sue and be sued.
(4) The members of the county legislative authority, acting ex
officio and independently, shall compose the governing body of any
ferry district that is created within the county. The voters of a
ferry district must be registered voters residing within the boundaries
of the district.
(((5) For the purposes of this section, Puget Sound is considered
as extending north as far as the Canadian border and west as far as
Port Angeles.))

Sec. 8 RCW 36.54.130 and 2003 c 83 s 303 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To carry out the purposes for which ferry districts are
created, the governing body of a ferry district may levy each year an
ad valorem tax on all taxable property located in the district not to
exceed seventy-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value. The
levy must be sufficient for the provision of ferry services as shown to
be required by the budget prepared by the governing body of the ferry
district.
(2) A tax imposed under this section may be used only for providing
((passenger-only)) ferry services, including the purchase, lease, or
rental of ((passenger-only)) ferry vessels and dock facilities, the
operation and maintenance of ((passenger-only)) ferry vessels and dock
facilities, and related personnel costs.

--- END ---