BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.450 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 24 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may submit an authorizing
proposition to the county voters at a primary or general election and,
if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which
the proposed sales and use tax will be used. Funds raised under this
tax shall not supplant existing funds used for these purposes. The
rate of tax under this section shall not exceed three-tenths of one
percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of
the article used, in the case of a use tax. For the purposes of this
subsection, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Existing funds" means the amount of tax revenues spent for
criminal justice purposes during the calendar year before the calendar
year in which voter approval of the tax authorized in this section
occurred.
(b) "Tax revenues" means: (i) The amount of revenue collected from
sales and use taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.030 and regular property
taxes described in RCW 84.52.043(1)(b) for counties; and (ii) the
amount of revenue collected from sales and use taxes imposed under RCW
82.14.030, regular property taxes described in RCW 84.52.043(1)(d),
city business and occupation taxes, and city utility taxes for cities.
The amount of tax revenues for counties for purposes of supplanting
shall be reduced to compensate for any city that became newly
incorporated or enlarged through annexation during or after the
calendar year in which voter approval of the tax authorized in this
section occurred.
(2) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county.
(3) The retail sale or use of motor vehicles, and the lease of
motor vehicles for up to the first thirty-six months of the lease, are
exempt from tax imposed under this section.
(4) One-third of all money received under this section shall be
used solely for criminal justice purposes. For the purposes of this
subsection, "criminal justice purposes" means ((additional)) police
protection, mitigation of congested court systems, health care services
for suspects in custody or incarcerated offenders, pensions predating
the establishment of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 1, and law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 1 medical and long-term care
liabilities, or relief of overcrowded jails or other local correctional
facilities.
(5) Money received under this section shall be shared between the
county and the cities as follows: Sixty percent shall be retained by
the county and forty percent shall be distributed on a per capita basis
to cities in the county.

--- END ---