BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state board of education shall review
the need for having a class in first aid as a requirement for high
school graduation and report its findings to appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2007.

--- END ---