BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.320 and 2005 c 152 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a beer and/or wine restaurant license to sell beer,
including strong beer, or wine, or both, at retail, for consumption on
the premises. A patron of the licensee may remove from the premises,
recorked or recapped in its original container, any portion of wine
that was purchased for consumption with a meal.
(1) The annual fee shall be two hundred dollars for the beer
license, two hundred dollars for the wine license, or four hundred
dollars for a combination beer and wine license.
(2)(a) The board may issue a caterer's endorsement to this license
to allow the licensee to remove from the liquor stocks at the licensed
premises, only those types of liquor that are authorized under the on-premises license privileges for sale and service at event locations at
a specified date and, except as provided in subsection (3) of this
section, place not currently licensed by the board. If the event is
open to the public, it must be sponsored by a society or organization
as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If attendance at the event is limited to
members or invited guests of the sponsoring individual, society, or
organization, the requirement that the sponsor must be a society or
organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375 is waived. Cost of the
endorsement is three hundred fifty dollars.
(b) The holder of this license with catering endorsement shall, if
requested by the board, notify the board or its designee of the date,
time, place, and location of any catered event. Upon request, the
licensee shall provide to the board all necessary or requested
information concerning the society or organization that will be holding
the function at which the endorsed license will be utilized.
(3) Licensees under this section that hold a caterer's endorsement
are allowed to use this endorsement on a domestic winery premises under
the following conditions:
(a) Agreements between the domestic winery and the retail licensee
shall be in writing, contain no exclusivity clauses regarding the
alcohol beverages to be served, and be filed with the board; and
(b) The domestic winery and the retail licensee shall be separately
contracted and compensated by the persons sponsoring the event for
their respective services.
(4) The holder of this license or its manager may furnish beer or
wine to the licensee's employees free of charge as may be required for
use in connection with instruction on beer and wine. The instruction
may include the history, nature, values, and characteristics of beer or
wine, the use of wine lists, and the methods of presenting, serving,
storing, and handling beer or wine. The beer and/or wine licensee must
use the beer or wine it obtains under its license for the sampling as
part of the instruction. The instruction must be given on the premises
of the beer and/or wine licensee.
(5) If the license is issued to a person who contracts with the
Washington state ferry system to provide food and alcohol service on a
designated ferry route, the license shall cover any vessel assigned to
the designated route. A separate license is required for each
designated ferry route.

--- END ---