BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.50.050 and 1995 c 239 s 317 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall:
(1) Have the authority to organize the department ((into not more
than four divisions, each headed by an assistant director));
(2) Have free access to all files and records of various funds
assigned to the department and inspect and audit the files and records
as deemed necessary;
(3) Employ personnel to carry out the general administration of the
department;
(4) Submit an annual written report of the activities of the
department to the governor and the chairs of the appropriate
legislative committees with one copy to the staff of each of the
committees, including recommendations for statutory changes the
director believes to be desirable;
(5) Adopt such rules ((and regulations)) as are necessary to carry
out the powers, duties, and functions of the department pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

--- END ---