BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.010 and 2005 c 131 s 8 and 2005 c 23 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly
required by the context:
(1)(a) "Accumulated contributions" for plan 1 members, means the
sum of all regular annuity contributions and, except for the purpose of
withdrawal at the time of retirement, any amount paid under RCW
41.50.165(2) with regular interest thereon.
(b) "Accumulated contributions" for plan 2 members, means the sum
of all contributions standing to the credit of a member in the member's
individual account, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2),
together with the regular interest thereon.
(2) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when
computed upon the basis of such mortality tables and regulations as
shall be adopted by the director and regular interest.
(3) "Annuity" means the moneys payable per year during life by
reason of accumulated contributions of a member.
(4) "Member reserve" means the fund in which all of the accumulated
contributions of members are held.
(5)(a) "Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this
chapter.
(b) "Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means any person
in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this
chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by another
person.
(6) "Contract" means any agreement for service and compensation
between a member and an employer.
(7) "Creditable service" means membership service plus prior
service for which credit is allowable. This subsection shall apply
only to plan 1 members.
(8) "Dependent" means receiving one-half or more of support from a
member.
(9) "Disability allowance" means monthly payments during
disability. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.
(10)(a) "Earnable compensation" for plan 1 members, means:
(i) All salaries and wages paid by an employer to an employee
member of the retirement system for personal services rendered during
a fiscal year. In all cases where compensation includes maintenance
the employer shall fix the value of that part of the compensation not
paid in money.
(ii) For an employee member of the retirement system teaching in an
extended school year program, two consecutive extended school years, as
defined by the employer school district, may be used as the annual
period for determining earnable compensation in lieu of the two fiscal
years.
(iii) "Earnable compensation" for plan 1 members also includes the
following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal
services:
(A) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on
reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer
to an individual in lieu of reinstatement in a position which are
awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wages which the
individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered earnable compensation and the individual shall receive the
equivalent service credit.
(B) If a leave of absence, without pay, is taken by a member for
the purpose of serving as a member of the state legislature, and such
member has served in the legislature five or more years, the salary
which would have been received for the position from which the leave of
absence was taken shall be considered as compensation earnable if the
employee's contribution thereon is paid by the employee. In addition,
where a member has been a member of the state legislature for five or
more years, earnable compensation for the member's two highest
compensated consecutive years of service shall include a sum not to
exceed thirty-six hundred dollars for each of such two consecutive
years, regardless of whether or not legislative service was rendered
during those two years.
(iv) For members employed less than full time under written
contract with a school district, or community college district, in an
instructional position, for which the member receives service credit of
less than one year in all of the years used to determine the earnable
compensation used for computing benefits due under RCW 41.32.497,
41.32.498, and 41.32.520, the member may elect to have earnable
compensation defined as provided in RCW 41.32.345. For the purposes of
this subsection, the term "instructional position" means a position in
which more than seventy-five percent of the member's time is spent as
a classroom instructor (including office hours), a librarian, a
psychologist, a social worker, a nurse, a physical therapist, an
occupational therapist, a speech language pathologist or audiologist,
or a counselor. Earnable compensation shall be so defined only for the
purpose of the calculation of retirement benefits and only as necessary
to insure that members who receive fractional service credit under RCW
41.32.270 receive benefits proportional to those received by members
who have received full-time service credit.
(v) "Earnable compensation" does not include:
(A) Remuneration for unused sick leave authorized under RCW
41.04.340, 28A.400.210, or 28A.310.490;
(B) Remuneration for unused annual leave in excess of thirty days
as authorized by RCW 43.01.044 and 43.01.041.
(b) "Earnable compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means
salaries or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for
personal services, including overtime payments, and shall include wages
and salaries deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections
403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, but
shall exclude lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused
accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of
severance pay.
"Earnable compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes
the following actual or imputed payments which, except in the case of
(b)(ii)(B) of this subsection, are not paid for personal services:
(i) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on
reinstatement of the employee in a position or payments by an employer
to an individual in lieu of reinstatement in a position which are
awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wages which the
individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered earnable compensation, to the extent provided above, and the
individual shall receive the equivalent service credit.
(ii) In any year in which a member serves in the legislature the
member shall have the option of having such member's earnable
compensation be the greater of:
(A) The earnable compensation the member would have received had
such member not served in the legislature; or
(B) Such member's actual earnable compensation received for
teaching and legislative service combined. Any additional
contributions to the retirement system required because compensation
earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater than
compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be paid
by the member for both member and employer contributions.
(11) "Employer" means the state of Washington, the school district,
or any agency of the state of Washington by which the member is paid.
(12) "Fiscal year" means a year which begins July 1st and ends June
30th of the following year.
(13) "Former state fund" means the state retirement fund in
operation for teachers under chapter 187, Laws of 1923, as amended.
(14) "Local fund" means any of the local retirement funds for
teachers operated in any school district in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 163, Laws of 1917 as amended.
(15) "Member" means any teacher included in the membership of the
retirement system who has not been removed from membership under RCW
41.32.878 or 41.32.768. Also, any other employee of the public schools
who, on July 1, 1947, had not elected to be exempt from membership and
who, prior to that date, had by an authorized payroll deduction,
contributed to the member reserve.
(16) "Membership service" means service rendered subsequent to the
first day of eligibility of a person to membership in the retirement
system: PROVIDED, That where a member is employed by two or more
employers the individual shall receive no more than one service credit
month during any calendar month in which multiple service is rendered.
The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.
(17) "Pension" means the moneys payable per year during life from
the pension reserve.
(18) "Pension reserve" is a fund in which shall be accumulated an
actuarial reserve adequate to meet present and future pension
liabilities of the system and from which all pension obligations are to
be paid.
(19) "Prior service" means service rendered prior to the first date
of eligibility to membership in the retirement system for which credit
is allowable. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to
plan 1 members.
(20) "Prior service contributions" means contributions made by a
member to secure credit for prior service. The provisions of this
subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.
(21) "Public school" means any institution or activity operated by
the state of Washington or any instrumentality or political subdivision
thereof employing teachers, except the University of Washington and
Washington State University.
(22) "Regular contributions" means the amounts required to be
deducted from the compensation of a member and credited to the member's
individual account in the member reserve. This subsection shall apply
only to plan 1 members.
(23) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may
determine.
(24)(a) "Retirement allowance" for plan 1 members, means monthly
payments based on the sum of annuity and pension, or any optional
benefits payable in lieu thereof.
(b) "Retirement allowance" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means
monthly payments to a retiree or beneficiary as provided in this
chapter.
(25) "Retirement system" means the Washington state teachers'
retirement system.
(26)(a) "Service" for plan 1 members means the time during which a
member has been employed by an employer for compensation.
(i) If a member is employed by two or more employers the individual
shall receive no more than one service credit month during any calendar
month in which multiple service is rendered.
(ii) As authorized by RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of
sick leave may be creditable as service solely for the purpose of
determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.
(iii) As authorized in RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers teachers in public schools may be
applied solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire
under RCW 41.32.470.
(b) "Service" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means periods of
employment by a member for one or more employers for which earnable
compensation is earned subject to the following conditions:
(i) A member employed in an eligible position or as a substitute
shall receive one service credit month for each month of September
through August of the following year if he or she earns earnable
compensation for eight hundred ten or more hours during that period and
is employed during nine of those months, except that a member may not
receive credit for any period prior to the member's employment in an
eligible position except as provided in RCW 41.32.812 and 41.50.132;
(ii) If a member is employed either in an eligible position or as
a substitute teacher for nine months of the twelve month period between
September through August of the following year but earns earnable
compensation for less than eight hundred ten hours but for at least six
hundred thirty hours, he or she will receive one-half of a service
credit month for each month of the twelve month period;
(iii) All other members in an eligible position or as a substitute
teacher shall receive service credit as follows:
(A) A service credit month is earned in those calendar months where
earnable compensation is earned for ninety or more hours;
(B) A half-service credit month is earned in those calendar months
where earnable compensation is earned for at least seventy hours but
less than ninety hours; and
(C) A quarter-service credit month is earned in those calendar
months where earnable compensation is earned for less than seventy
hours.
(iv) Any person who is a member of the teachers' retirement system
and who is elected or appointed to a state elective position may
continue to be a member of the retirement system and continue to
receive a service credit month for each of the months in a state
elective position by making the required member contributions.
(v) When an individual is employed by two or more employers the
individual shall only receive one month's service credit during any
calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours is
rendered.
(vi) As authorized by RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of
sick leave may be creditable as service solely for the purpose of
determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470. For purposes of
plan 2 and plan 3 "forty-five days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal
to two service credit months. Use of less than forty-five days of sick
leave is creditable as allowed under this subsection as follows:
(A) Less than eleven days equals one-quarter service credit month;
(B) Eleven or more days but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service credit month;
(C) Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;
(D) More than twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days
equals one and one-quarter service credit month;
(E) Thirty-three or more days but less than forty-five days equals
one and one-half service credit month.
(vii) As authorized in RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers teachers in public schools may be
applied solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire
under RCW 41.32.470.
(viii) The department shall adopt rules implementing this
subsection.
(27) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.
(28) "Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an
accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.
(29) "Teacher" means any person qualified to teach who is engaged
by a public school in an instructional, administrative, or supervisory
capacity. The term includes state, educational service district, and
school district superintendents and their assistants and all employees
certificated by the superintendent of public instruction; and in
addition thereto any full time school doctor who is employed by a
public school and renders service of an instructional or educational
nature.
(30) "Average final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members,
means the member's average earnable compensation of the highest
consecutive sixty service credit months prior to such member's
retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting authorized
leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of average final
compensation except under RCW 41.32.810(2).
(31) "Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer while a member.
(32) "Department" means the department of retirement systems
created in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(33) "Director" means the director of the department.
(34) "State elective position" means any position held by any
person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed
as a member of the legislature.
(35) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(36) "Substitute teacher" means:
(a) A teacher who is hired by an employer to work as a temporary
teacher, except for teachers who are annual contract employees of an
employer and are guaranteed a minimum number of hours; or
(b) Teachers who either (i) work in ineligible positions for more
than one employer or (ii) work in an ineligible position or positions
together with an eligible position.
(37)(a) "Eligible position" for plan 2 members from June 7, 1990,
through September 1, 1991, means a position which normally requires two
or more uninterrupted months of creditable service during September
through August of the following year.
(b) "Eligible position" for plan 2 and plan 3 on and after
September 1, 1991, means a position that, as defined by the employer,
normally requires five or more months of at least seventy hours of
earnable compensation during September through August of the following
year.
(c) For purposes of this chapter an employer shall not define
"position" in such a manner that an employee's monthly work for that
employer is divided into more than one position.
(d) The elected position of the superintendent of public
instruction is an eligible position.
(38) "Plan 1" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 1
providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who
first became members of the system prior to October 1, 1977.
(39) "Plan 2" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 2
providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who
first became members of the system on and after October 1, 1977, and
prior to July 1, 1996.
(40) "Plan 3" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 3
providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who
first become members of the system on and after July 1, 1996, or who
transfer under RCW 41.32.817.
(41) "Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual
average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage
earners and clerical workers, all items compiled by the bureau of labor
statistics, United States department of labor.
(42) "Index A" means the index for the year prior to the
determination of a postretirement adjustment.
(43) "Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.
(44) "Index year" means the earliest calendar year in which the
index is more than sixty percent of index A.
(45) "Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index
B.
(46) "Annual increase" means((, initially, fifty-nine)) one dollar
and fifty-seven cents per month per year of service which amount shall
be increased each July 1st by three percent, rounded to the nearest
cent.
(47) "Member account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3
means the sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member
in the defined contribution portion of plan 3.
(48) "Separation from service or employment" occurs when a person
has terminated all employment with an employer.
(49) "Employed" or "employee" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free
from the employer's direction and control over the performance of work.
The department shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection
consistent with common law.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.32.835 and 1995 c 239 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All teachers who first become employed by an employer in an
eligible position on or after ((July 1, 1996, shall be members of plan
3)) July 1, 2007, shall have a period of ninety days to make an
irrevocable choice to become a member of plan 2 or plan 3. At the end
of ninety days, if the member has not made a choice to become a member
of plan 2, he or she becomes a member of plan 3.
(2) For administrative efficiency, until a member elects to become
a member of plan 3, or becomes a member of plan 3 by default under
subsection (1) of this section, the member shall be reported to the
department in plan 2, with member and employer contributions. Upon
becoming a member of plan 3 by election or by default, all service
credit shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined benefit, and
all employee accumulated contributions shall be transferred to the
member's plan 3 defined contribution account.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.32.840 and 1996 c 39 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member of the retirement system shall receive a retirement
allowance equal to one percent of such member's average final
compensation for each service credit year.
(2) In lieu of the retirement allowance under subsection (1) of
this section, a member of the retirement system who elects to
participate under section 4 of this act shall receive:
(a) A monthly retirement allowance equal to one percent of such
member's average final compensation for each service credit year; and
(b) An additional retirement allowance equal to the excess, if any,
of:
(i) One percent of such member's average final compensation for
each service credit year from the date of election; over
(ii) The monthly annuity offset.
(A) The monthly annuity offset from the date of election shall be
the actuarial equivalent value of the member's account under chapter
41.34 RCW, at separation, from the minimum contributions required under
RCW 41.34.040 as if it were paid at normal retirement as a single-life
annuity with a three percent annual cost-of-living adjustment
commencing one year from the date of normal retirement.
(B) For the purposes of this subsection, "actuarial equivalent"
means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of such
mortality tables and regulations as shall be adopted by the director
and regular interest.
(3) A member who elects to participate under section 4 of this act
must, after election, earn at least ten service credit years, or five
service credit years including twelve service credit months after age
fifty-four, to be eligible for the benefit provided in subsection
(2)(b) of this section.
(4) The retirement allowance payable under RCW 41.32.875 to a
member who separates after having completed at least twenty service
credit years shall be increased by twenty-five one-hundredths of one
percent, compounded for each month from the date of separation to the
date that the retirement allowance commences.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2007, and through June 30, 2008, members who
exercised an irrevocable option to transfer to plan 3 prior to January
1, 2007, may make an irrevocable election, filed in writing with the
department, to participate in the prospective contribution and benefit
provisions under RCW 41.32.840(2) and 41.34.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2007, and through June 30, 2008, a member who
established membership under RCW 41.32.835 may make a one-time
irrevocable election, filed in writing with the department, to leave
any service credit earned as a member of plan 3 in plan 3 and join plan
2. A member who makes such an election shall become a dual plan member
and may combine service in each plan for the purpose of determining
benefit eligibility. The benefits of such members shall be
administered in the same manner as benefits administered under the
provisions of chapter 41.54 RCW, with such members being treated as if
they were members of different systems for portability purposes. The
department shall adopt rules to ensure the portability of such members'
plan 2 and plan 3 benefits.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.34.040 and 2003 c 156 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member shall contribute from his or her compensation
according to one of the following rate structures in addition to the
mandatory minimum five percent:

Option A Contribution Rate

All Ages 0.0% fixed

Option B

Up to Age 35 0.0%

Age 35 to 44 1.0%

Age 45 and above 2.5%

Option C

Up to Age 35 1.0%

Age 35 to 44 2.5%

Age 45 and above 3.5%

Option D

All Ages 2.0%

Option E

All Ages 5.0%

Option F

All Ages 10.0%

(2) The board shall have the right to offer contribution rate
options in addition to those listed in subsection (1) of this section,
provided that no significant additional administrative costs are
created. All options offered by the board shall conform to the
requirements stated in subsections (3) and (5) of this section.
(3)(a) For members of the teachers' retirement system entering plan
3 under RCW 41.32.835 or members of the school employees' retirement
system entering plan 3 under RCW 41.35.610, within ninety days of
becoming a member he or she has an option to choose one of the above
contribution rate structures. If the member does not select an option
within the ninety-day period, he or she shall be assigned option A.
(b) For members of the public employees' retirement system entering
plan 3 under RCW 41.40.785, within the ninety days described in RCW
41.40.785 an employee who irrevocably chooses plan 3 shall select one
of the above contribution rate structures. If the member does not
select an option within the ninety-day period, he or she shall be
assigned option A.
(c) For members of the teachers' retirement system transferring to
plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817, members of the school employees' retirement
system transferring to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510, or members of the
public employees' retirement system transferring to plan 3 under RCW
41.40.795, upon election to plan 3 he or she must choose one of the
above contribution rate structures.
(d) Within ninety days of the date that an employee changes
employers, he or she has an option to choose one of the above
contribution rate structures. If the member does not select an option
within this ninety-day period, he or she shall be assigned option A.
(4) Each year, members may change their contribution rate option by
notifying their employer in writing during the month of January.
(5) Contributions shall begin the first day of the pay cycle in
which the rate option is made, or the first day of the pay cycle in
which the end of the ninety-day period occurs.
(6) A member of the teachers' retirement system who elects to
participate under section 4 of this act shall contribute a minimum of
six percent of compensation which shall be directed to the Washington
state investment board investment program.
(7) A member of the school employees' retirement system who elects
to participate under section 12 of this act shall contribute a minimum
of five percent of compensation which shall be directed to the
Washington state investment board investment program.
(8) A member of the public employees' retirement system who elects
to participate under section 16 of this act shall contribute a minimum
of five percent of compensation which shall be directed to the
Washington state investment board investment program.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.34.040 and 2006 c ... s 6 (section 6 of this act)
are each amended to read as follows:
(1) A member shall contribute from his or her compensation
according to one of the following rate structures in addition to the
mandatory minimum five percent:

Option A Contribution Rate

All Ages 0.0% fixed

Option B

Up to Age 35 0.0%

Age 35 to 44 1.0%

Age 45 and above 2.5%

Option C

Up to Age 35 1.0%

Age 35 to 44 2.5%

Age 45 and above 3.5%

Option D

All Ages 2.0%

Option E

All Ages 5.0%

Option F

All Ages 10.0%

(2) The board shall have the right to offer contribution rate
options in addition to those listed in subsection (1) of this section,
provided that no significant additional administrative costs are
created. All options offered by the board shall conform to the
requirements stated in subsections (3) and (((5))) (4) of this section.
(3)(a) For members of the teachers' retirement system entering plan
3 under RCW 41.32.835 or members of the school employees' retirement
system entering plan 3 under RCW 41.35.610, within ninety days of
becoming a member he or she has an option to choose one of the above
contribution rate structures. If the member does not select an option
within the ninety-day period, he or she shall be assigned option A.
(b) For members of the public employees' retirement system entering
plan 3 under RCW 41.40.785, within the ninety days described in RCW
41.40.785 an employee who irrevocably chooses plan 3 shall select one
of the above contribution rate structures. If the member does not
select an option within the ninety-day period, he or she shall be
assigned option A.
(c) For members of the teachers' retirement system transferring to
plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817, members of the school employees' retirement
system transferring to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510, or members of the
public employees' retirement system transferring to plan 3 under RCW
41.40.795, upon election to plan 3 he or she must choose one of the
above contribution rate structures.
(d) Within ninety days of the date that an employee changes
employers, he or she has an option to choose one of the above
contribution rate structures. If the member does not select an option
within this ninety-day period, he or she shall be assigned option A.
(4) ((Each year, members may change their contribution rate option
by notifying their employer in writing during the month of January.
(5))) Contributions shall begin the first day of the pay cycle in
which the rate option is made, or the first day of the pay cycle in
which the end of the ninety-day period occurs.
(((6))) (5) A member of the teachers' retirement system who elects
to participate under RCW 41.32.--- (section 4 of this act) shall
contribute a minimum of six percent of compensation which shall be
directed to the Washington state investment board investment program.
(((7))) (6) A member of the school employees' retirement system who
elects to participate under RCW 41.35.--- (section 12 of this act)
shall contribute a minimum of five percent of compensation which shall
be directed to the Washington state investment board investment
program.
(((8))) (7) A member of the public employees' retirement system who
elects to participate under RCW 41.40.--- (section 16 of this act)
shall contribute a minimum of five percent of compensation which shall
be directed to the Washington state investment board investment
program.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.34.060 and 2001 c 180 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the
member's account shall be invested by the state investment board. In
order to reduce transaction costs and address liquidity issues, based
upon recommendations of the state investment board, the department may
require members to provide up to ninety days' notice prior to moving
funds from the state investment board portfolio to self-directed
investment options provided under subsection (3) of this section.
(a) For members of the retirement system as provided for in chapter
41.32 RCW of plan 3, investment shall be in the same portfolio as that
of the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund under RCW
41.50.075(2).
(b) For members of the retirement system as provided for in chapter
41.35 RCW of plan 3, investment shall be in the same portfolio as that
of the school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund
under RCW 41.50.075(4).
(c) For members of the retirement system as provided for in chapter
41.40 RCW of plan 3, investment shall be in the same portfolio as that
of the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund
under RCW 41.50.075(3).
(2) The state investment board shall declare monthly unit values
for the portfolios or funds, or portions thereof, utilized under
subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section. The declared values
shall be an approximation of portfolio or fund values, based on
internal procedures of the state investment board. Such declared unit
values and internal procedures shall be in the sole discretion of the
state investment board. The state investment board may delegate any of
the powers and duties under this subsection, including discretion,
pursuant to RCW 43.33A.030. Member accounts shall be credited by the
department with a rate of return based on changes to such unit values.
(3)(a) Members may elect to self-direct their investments as set
forth in RCW 41.34.130 and 43.33A.190.
(b) Members who elect to participate under sections 4, 12, and 16
of this act may elect to self-direct their investments for only that
portion of their investments related to contributions above the minimum
rates established under RCW 41.34.040.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.34.110 and 1996 c 39 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member who separates from service and then reestablishes
membership may restore contributions to the member account.
(2) A member electing to participate under section 4, 12, or 16 of
this act, who separates from service and then reestablishes membership,
may continue to be eligible for benefits under RCW 41.32.840(2)(b),
41.35.620(2)(b), or 41.40.790(2)(b) by restoring all contributions to
the member account made after the election, plus interest as determined
by the director.

Sec. 10 RCW 41.35.610 and 1998 c 341 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All classified employees who first become employed by an
employer in an eligible position on or after ((September 1, 2000, shall
be members of plan 3)) July 1, 2007, shall have a period of ninety days
to make an irrevocable choice to become a member of plan 2 or plan 3.
At the end of ninety days, if the member has not made a choice to
become a member of plan 2, he or she becomes a member of plan 3.
(2) For administrative efficiency, until a member elects to become
a member of plan 3, or becomes a member of plan 3 by default under
subsection (1) of this section, the member shall be reported to the
department in plan 2, with member and employer contributions. Upon
becoming a member of plan 3 by election or by default, all service
credit shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined benefit, and
all employee accumulated contributions shall be transferred to the
member's plan 3 defined contribution account.

Sec. 11 RCW 41.35.620 and 1998 c 341 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A member of the retirement system shall receive a retirement
allowance equal to one percent of such member's average final
compensation for each service credit year.
(2) In lieu of the retirement allowance under subsection (1) of
this section, a member of the retirement system who elects to
participate under section 12 of this act shall receive:
(a) A monthly retirement allowance equal to one percent of such
member's average final compensation for each service credit year; and
(b) An additional retirement allowance equal to the excess, if any,
of:
(i) One percent of such member's average final compensation for
each service credit year from the date of election; over
(ii) The monthly annuity offset.
(A) The monthly annuity offset from the date of election shall be
the actuarial equivalent value of the member's account under chapter
41.34 RCW, at separation, from the minimum contributions required under
RCW 41.34.040 as if it were paid at normal retirement as a single-life
annuity with a three percent annual cost-of-living adjustment
commencing one year from the date of normal retirement.
(B) For the purposes of this subsection, "actuarial equivalent"
means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of such
mortality tables and regulations as shall be adopted by the director
and regular interest.
(3) A member who elects to participate under section 12 of this act
must, after election, earn at least ten service credit years, or five
service credit years including twelve service credit months after age
fifty-four, to be eligible for the benefit provided in subsection
(2)(b) of this section.
(4) The retirement allowance payable under RCW 41.35.680 to a
member who separates after having completed at least twenty service
credit years shall be increased by twenty-five one-hundredths of one
percent, compounded for each month from the date of separation to the
date that the retirement allowance commences.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2007, and through June 30, 2008, members who
exercised the irrevocable option to transfer to plan 3 prior to January
1, 2007, may make an irrevocable election, filed in writing with the
department, to participate in the prospective contribution and benefit
provisions under RCW 41.34.040 and 41.35.620(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2007, and through June 30, 2008, a member who
established membership under RCW 41.35.610 may make a one-time
irrevocable election, filed in writing with the department, to leave
any service credit earned as a member of plan 3 in plan 3 and join plan
2. A member who makes such an election shall become a dual plan member
and may combine service in each plan for the purpose of determining
benefit eligibility. The benefits of such members shall be
administered in the same manner as benefits administered under the
provisions of chapter 41.54 RCW, with such members being treated as if
they were members of different systems for portability purposes. The
department shall promulgate rules to ensure the portability of such
members' plan 2 and plan 3 benefits.

Sec. 14 RCW 41.40.010 and 2004 c 242 s 53 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly
required by the context:
(1) "Retirement system" means the public employees' retirement
system provided for in this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of retirement systems created
in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(3) "State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of
Washington.
(4)(a) "Employer" for plan 1 members, means every branch,
department, agency, commission, board, and office of the state, any
political subdivision or association of political subdivisions of the
state admitted into the retirement system, and legal entities
authorized by RCW 35.63.070 and 36.70.060 or chapter 39.34 RCW; and the
term shall also include any labor guild, association, or organization
the membership of a local lodge or division of which is comprised of at
least forty percent employees of an employer (other than such labor
guild, association, or organization) within this chapter. The term may
also include any city of the first class that has its own retirement
system.
(b) "Employer" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means every branch,
department, agency, commission, board, and office of the state, and any
political subdivision and municipal corporation of the state admitted
into the retirement system, including public agencies created pursuant
to RCW 35.63.070, 36.70.060, and 39.34.030; except that after August
31, 2000, school districts and educational service districts will no
longer be employers for the public employees' retirement system plan 2.
(5) "Member" means any employee included in the membership of the
retirement system, as provided for in RCW 41.40.023. RCW 41.26.045
does not prohibit a person otherwise eligible for membership in the
retirement system from establishing such membership effective when he
or she first entered an eligible position.
(6) "Original member" of this retirement system means:
(a) Any person who became a member of the system prior to April 1,
1949;
(b) Any person who becomes a member through the admission of an
employer into the retirement system on and after April 1, 1949, and
prior to April 1, 1951;
(c) Any person who first becomes a member by securing employment
with an employer prior to April 1, 1951, provided the member has
rendered at least one or more years of service to any employer prior to
October 1, 1947;
(d) Any person who first becomes a member through the admission of
an employer into the retirement system on or after April 1, 1951,
provided, such person has been in the regular employ of the employer
for at least six months of the twelve-month period preceding the said
admission date;
(e) Any member who has restored all contributions that may have
been withdrawn as provided by RCW 41.40.150 and who on the effective
date of the individual's retirement becomes entitled to be credited
with ten years or more of membership service except that the provisions
relating to the minimum amount of retirement allowance for the member
upon retirement at age seventy as found in RCW 41.40.190(4) shall not
apply to the member;
(f) Any member who has been a contributor under the system for two
or more years and who has restored all contributions that may have been
withdrawn as provided by RCW 41.40.150 and who on the effective date of
the individual's retirement has rendered five or more years of service
for the state or any political subdivision prior to the time of the
admission of the employer into the system; except that the provisions
relating to the minimum amount of retirement allowance for the member
upon retirement at age seventy as found in RCW 41.40.190(4) shall not
apply to the member.
(7) "New member" means a person who becomes a member on or after
April 1, 1949, except as otherwise provided in this section.
(8)(a) "Compensation earnable" for plan 1 members, means salaries
or wages earned during a payroll period for personal services and where
the compensation is not all paid in money, maintenance compensation
shall be included upon the basis of the schedules established by the
member's employer.
(i) "Compensation earnable" for plan 1 members also includes the
following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal
services:
(A) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on
reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer
to an individual in lieu of reinstatement in a position which are
awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wage which the
individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered compensation earnable and the individual shall receive the
equivalent service credit;
(B) If a leave of absence is taken by an individual for the purpose
of serving in the state legislature, the salary which would have been
received for the position from which the leave of absence was taken,
shall be considered as compensation earnable if the employee's
contribution is paid by the employee and the employer's contribution is
paid by the employer or employee;
(C) Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and
72.09.240;
(D) Compensation that a member would have received but for a
disability occurring in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW
41.40.038;
(E) Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the
leave sharing program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through
41.04.670; and
(F) Compensation that a member receives for being in standby
status. For the purposes of this section, a member is in standby
status when not being paid for time actually worked and the employer
requires the member to be prepared to report immediately for work, if
the need arises, although the need may not arise.
(ii) "Compensation earnable" does not include:
(A) Remuneration for unused sick leave authorized under RCW
41.04.340, 28A.400.210, or 28A.310.490;
(B) Remuneration for unused annual leave in excess of thirty days
as authorized by RCW 43.01.044 and 43.01.041.
(b) "Compensation earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means
salaries or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for
personal services, including overtime payments, and shall include wages
and salaries deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections
403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, but
shall exclude nonmoney maintenance compensation and lump sum or other
payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation,
unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of severance pay.
"Compensation earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes
the following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for
personal services:
(i) Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on
reinstatement of the employee in a position, or payments by an employer
to an individual in lieu of reinstatement in a position which are
awarded or granted as the equivalent of the salary or wage which the
individual would have earned during a payroll period shall be
considered compensation earnable to the extent provided above, and the
individual shall receive the equivalent service credit;
(ii) In any year in which a member serves in the legislature, the
member shall have the option of having such member's compensation
earnable be the greater of:
(A) The compensation earnable the member would have received had
such member not served in the legislature; or
(B) Such member's actual compensation earnable received for
nonlegislative public employment and legislative service combined. Any
additional contributions to the retirement system required because
compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection is greater
than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection shall be
paid by the member for both member and employer contributions;
(iii) Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045,
and 72.09.240;
(iv) Compensation that a member would have received but for a
disability occurring in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW
41.40.038;
(v) Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the
leave sharing program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through
41.04.670; and
(vi) Compensation that a member receives for being in standby
status. For the purposes of this section, a member is in standby
status when not being paid for time actually worked and the employer
requires the member to be prepared to report immediately for work, if
the need arises, although the need may not arise.
(9)(a) "Service" for plan 1 members, except as provided in RCW
41.40.088, means periods of employment in an eligible position or
positions for one or more employers rendered to any employer for which
compensation is paid, and includes time spent in office as an elected
or appointed official of an employer. Compensation earnable earned in
full time work for seventy hours or more in any given calendar month
shall constitute one service credit month except as provided in RCW
41.40.088. Compensation earnable earned for less than seventy hours in
any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service credit month of
service except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Only service credit
months and one-quarter service credit months shall be counted in the
computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for
in this chapter. Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into
account in the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits.
Time spent in standby status, whether compensated or not, is not
service.
(i) Service by a state employee officially assigned by the state on
a temporary basis to assist another public agency, shall be considered
as service as a state employee: PROVIDED, That service to any other
public agency shall not be considered service as a state employee if
such service has been used to establish benefits in any other public
retirement system.
(ii) An individual shall receive no more than a total of twelve
service credit months of service during any calendar year. If an
individual is employed in an eligible position by one or more employers
the individual shall receive no more than one service credit month
during any calendar month in which multiple service for seventy or more
hours is rendered.
(iii) A school district employee may count up to forty-five days of
sick leave as creditable service solely for the purpose of determining
eligibility to retire under RCW 41.40.180 as authorized by RCW
28A.400.300. For purposes of plan 1 "forty-five days" as used in RCW
28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months. Use of less than
forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under this
subsection as follows:
(A) Less than twenty-two days equals one-quarter service credit
month;
(B) Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;
(C) More than twenty-two days but less than forty-five days equals
one and one-quarter service credit month.
(b) "Service" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means periods of
employment by a member in an eligible position or positions for one or
more employers for which compensation earnable is paid. Compensation
earnable earned for ninety or more hours in any calendar month shall
constitute one service credit month except as provided in RCW
41.40.088. Compensation earnable earned for at least seventy hours but
less than ninety hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-half
service credit month of service. Compensation earnable earned for less
than seventy hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter
service credit month of service. Time spent in standby status, whether
compensated or not, is not service.
Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in
the computation of such retirement allowance or benefits.
(i) Service in any state elective position shall be deemed to be
full time service, except that persons serving in state elective
positions who are members of the Washington school employees'
retirement system, teachers' retirement system, public safety
employees' retirement system, or law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system at the time of election or appointment to
such position may elect to continue membership in the Washington school
employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement system, public
safety employees' retirement system, or law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system.
(ii) A member shall receive a total of not more than twelve service
credit months of service for such calendar year. If an individual is
employed in an eligible position by one or more employers the
individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during
any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours
is rendered.
(iii) Up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as
service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire
under RCW 41.40.180 as authorized by RCW 28A.400.300. For purposes of
plan 2 and plan 3 "forty-five days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal
to two service credit months. Use of less than forty-five days of sick
leave is creditable as allowed under this subsection as follows:
(A) Less than eleven days equals one-quarter service credit month;
(B) Eleven or more days but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service credit month;
(C) Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;
(D) More than twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days
equals one and one-quarter service credit month;
(E) Thirty-three or more days but less than forty-five days equals
one and one-half service credit month.
(10) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.
(11) "Service credit month" means a month or an accumulation of
months of service credit which is equal to one.
(12) "Prior service" means all service of an original member
rendered to any employer prior to October 1, 1947.
(13) "Membership service" means:
(a) All service rendered, as a member, after October 1, 1947;
(b) All service after October 1, 1947, to any employer prior to the
time of its admission into the retirement system for which member and
employer contributions, plus interest as required by RCW 41.50.125,
have been paid under RCW 41.40.056 or 41.40.057;
(c) Service not to exceed six consecutive months of probationary
service rendered after April 1, 1949, and prior to becoming a member,
in the case of any member, upon payment in full by such member of the
total amount of the employer's contribution to the retirement fund
which would have been required under the law in effect when such
probationary service was rendered if the member had been a member
during such period, except that the amount of the employer's
contribution shall be calculated by the director based on the first
month's compensation earnable as a member;
(d) Service not to exceed six consecutive months of probationary
service, rendered after October 1, 1947, and before April 1, 1949, and
prior to becoming a member, in the case of any member, upon payment in
full by such member of five percent of such member's salary during said
period of probationary service, except that the amount of the
employer's contribution shall be calculated by the director based on
the first month's compensation earnable as a member.
(14)(a) "Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance, pension or other benefit provided by
this chapter.
(b) "Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means any person
in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this
chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer by another
person.
(15) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may
determine.
(16) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all contributions
standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the
regular interest thereon.
(17)(a) "Average final compensation" for plan 1 members, means the
annual average of the greatest compensation earnable by a member during
any consecutive two year period of service credit months for which
service credit is allowed; or if the member has less than two years of
service credit months then the annual average compensation earnable
during the total years of service for which service credit is allowed.
(b) "Average final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members,
means the member's average compensation earnable of the highest
consecutive sixty months of service credit months prior to such
member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods constituting
authorized leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of
average final compensation except under RCW 41.40.710(2).
(18) "Final compensation" means the annual rate of compensation
earnable by a member at the time of termination of employment.
(19) "Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated
contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(20) "Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions
made by the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly
installments.
(21) "Retirement allowance" means the sum of the annuity and the
pension.
(22) "Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free
from the employer's direction and control over the performance of work.
The department shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection
consistent with common law.
(23) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when
computed upon the basis of such mortality and other tables as may be
adopted by the director.
(24) "Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a
retirement allowance as provided by this chapter.
(25) "Eligible position" means:
(a) Any position that, as defined by the employer, normally
requires five or more months of service a year for which regular
compensation for at least seventy hours is earned by the occupant
thereof. For purposes of this chapter an employer shall not define
"position" in such a manner that an employee's monthly work for that
employer is divided into more than one position;
(b) Any position occupied by an elected official or person
appointed directly by the governor, or appointed by the chief justice
of the supreme court under RCW 2.04.240(2) or 2.06.150(2), for which
compensation is paid.
(26) "Ineligible position" means any position which does not
conform with the requirements set forth in subsection (25) of this
section.
(27) "Leave of absence" means the period of time a member is
authorized by the employer to be absent from service without being
separated from membership.
(28) "Totally incapacitated for duty" means total inability to
perform the duties of a member's employment or office or any other work
for which the member is qualified by training or experience.
(29) "Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer while a member.
(30) "Director" means the director of the department.
(31) "State elective position" means any position held by any
person elected or appointed to statewide office or elected or appointed
as a member of the legislature.
(32) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(33) "Plan 1" means the public employees' retirement system, plan
1 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who
first became members of the system prior to October 1, 1977.
(34) "Plan 2" means the public employees' retirement system, plan
2 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who
first became members of the system on and after October 1, 1977, and
are not included in plan 3.
(35) "Plan 3" means the public employees' retirement system, plan
3 providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who:
(a) First become a member on or after:
(i) March 1, 2002, and are employed by a state agency or institute
of higher education and who did not choose to enter plan 2; or
(ii) September 1, 2002, and are employed by other than a state
agency or institute of higher education and who did not choose to enter
plan 2; or
(b) Transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.40.795.
(36) "Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual
average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage
earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor statistics, United States department of labor.
(37) "Index A" means the index for the year prior to the
determination of a postretirement adjustment.
(38) "Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.
(39) "Index year" means the earliest calendar year in which the
index is more than sixty percent of index A.
(40) "Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index
B.
(41) "Annual increase" means((, initially, fifty-nine)) one dollar
and fifty-seven cents per month per year of service which amount shall
be increased each July 1st by three percent, rounded to the nearest
cent.
(42) "Separation from service" occurs when a person has terminated
all employment with an employer. Separation from service or employment
does not occur, and if claimed by an employer or employee may be a
violation of RCW 41.40.055, when an employee and employer have a
written or oral agreement to resume employment with the same employer
following termination.
(43) "Member account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan 3
means the sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member
in the defined contribution portion of plan 3.

Sec. 15 RCW 41.40.790 and 2000 c 247 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A member of the retirement system shall receive a retirement
allowance equal to one percent of such member's average final
compensation for each service credit year.
(2) In lieu of the retirement allowance under subsection (1) of
this section, a member of the retirement system who elects to
participate under section 16 of this act shall receive:
(a) A monthly retirement allowance equal to one percent of such
member's average final compensation for each service credit year; and
(b) An additional retirement allowance equal to the excess, if any,
of:
(i) One percent of such member's average final compensation for
each service credit year from the date of election; over
(ii) The monthly annuity offset.
(A) The monthly annuity offset from the date of election shall be
the actuarial equivalent value of the member's account under chapter
41.34 RCW, at separation, from the minimum contributions required under
RCW 41.34.040 as if it were paid at normal retirement as a single-life
annuity with a three percent annual cost-of-living adjustment
commencing one year from the date of normal retirement.
(B) For the purposes of this subsection, "actuarial equivalent"
means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the basis of such
mortality tables and regulations as shall be adopted by the director
and regular interest.
(3) A member who elects to participate under section 16 of this act
must, after election, earn at least ten service credit years, or five
service credit years including twelve service credit months after age
fifty-four, to be eligible for the benefit provided in subsection
(2)(b) of this section.
(4) The retirement allowance payable under RCW 41.40.820 to a
member who separates after having completed at least twenty service
credit years shall be increased by twenty-five one-hundredths of one
percent, compounded for each month from the date of separation to the
date that the retirement allowance commences.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2007, and through June 30, 2008, members who
exercised an irrevocable option to transfer to plan 3 prior to January
1, 2007, may make an irrevocable election, filed in writing with the
department, to participate in the prospective contribution and benefit
provisions under RCW 41.34.040 and 41.40.790(2).

Sec. 17 RCW 41.45.061 and 2004 c 242 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The required contribution rate for members of the ((plan 2))
teachers' retirement system plan 2 shall be ((fixed at the rates in
effect on July 1, 1996, subject to the following:
(a) Beginning September 1, 1997, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, the employee contribution rate shall not exceed the
employer plan 2 and 3 rates adopted under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.054, and
41.45.070 for the teachers' retirement system;
(b) In addition, the employee contribution rate for plan 2 shall be
increased by fifty percent of the contribution rate increase caused by
any plan 2 benefit increase passed after July 1, 1996;
(c) In addition, the employee contribution rate for plan 2 shall
not be increased as a result of any distributions pursuant to section
309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998 and RCW 41.31A.020)) set at the same
rate as the employer combined plan 2 and plan 3 rate.
(2) The required contribution rate for members of the school
employees' retirement system plan 2 shall ((equal the school employees'
retirement system employer plan 2 and 3 contribution rate adopted under
RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.054, and 41.45.070, except as provided in
subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The member contribution rate for the school employees'
retirement system plan 2 shall be increased by fifty percent of the
contribution rate increase caused by any plan 2 benefit increase passed
after September 1, 2000)) be set at the same rate as the employer
combined plan 2 and plan 3 rate.
(((4))) (3) The required contribution rate for members of the
public employees' retirement system plan 2 shall be set at the same
rate as the employer combined plan 2 and plan 3 rate.
(((5))) (4) The required contribution rate for members of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 shall
be set at fifty percent of the cost of the retirement system.
(5) The required contribution rates for members of the teachers'
retirement system plan 2 shall not include any increase as a result of
this act.
(6) The ((employee)) required contribution rates for members of the
school employees' retirement system plan 2 ((under subsections (3) and
(4) of this section)) shall not include any increase as a result of
((any distributions pursuant to RCW 41.31A.020 and 41.31A.030)) this
act.
(7) The required contribution rates for members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 shall not include any increase as
a result of this act.
(8) The required plan 2 and 3 contribution rates for employers
shall be adopted in the manner described in RCW 41.45.060((,
41.45.054,)) and 41.45.070.
(((8))) (9) The required contribution rate for members of the
public safety employees' retirement system plan 2 shall be set at fifty
percent of the cost of the retirement system.

Sec. 18 RCW 41.45.070 and 2004 c 242 s 41 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the basic employer contribution rate established
in RCW 41.45.060 ((or 41.45.054)), the department shall also charge
employers of public employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement
system, school employees' retirement system, public safety employees'
retirement system, or Washington state patrol retirement system members
an additional supplemental rate to pay for the cost of additional
benefits, if any, granted to members of those systems. ((Except as
provided in subsections (6) and (7) of this section,)) The supplemental
contribution rates required by this section shall be calculated by the
state actuary and shall be charged regardless of language to the
contrary contained in the statute which authorizes additional benefits.
(2) In addition to the basic member, employer, and state
contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.0604 for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2, the department
shall also establish supplemental rates to pay for the cost of
additional benefits, if any, granted to members of the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2. ((Except as
provided in subsection (6) of this section,)) These supplemental rates
shall be calculated by the actuary retained by the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' board and the state actuary through the
process provided in RCW 41.26.720(1)(a) and the state treasurer shall
transfer the additional required contributions regardless of language
to the contrary contained in the statute which authorizes the
additional benefits.
(3) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
benefit increases provided to active members of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and
Washington state patrol retirement system, shall be calculated as the
level percentage of all members' pay needed to fund the cost of the
benefit not later than June 30, 2024.
(4) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
benefit increases provided to active and retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the teachers'
retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the public safety employees'
retirement system plan 2, or the school employees' retirement system
plan 2 and plan 3 shall be calculated as the level percentage of all
members' pay needed to fund the cost of the benefit, as calculated
under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, or 41.45.067.
(5) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
postretirement adjustments which are provided on a nonautomatic basis
to current retirees shall be calculated as the percentage of pay needed
to fund the adjustments as they are paid to the retirees. The
supplemental rate charged under this section to fund automatic
postretirement adjustments for active or retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 shall be calculated as the level percentage of pay needed to
fund the cost of the automatic adjustments not later than June 30,
2024.
(6) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
((additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 340, Laws
of 1998.
(7) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW;
section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998; or section 701, chapter 341,
Laws of 1998)) this act prior to July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 41.31.010 (Annual pension increases -- Increased by gain-sharing increase amount) and 1998 c 340 s 1;
(2) RCW 41.31.020 (Gain-sharing increase amount calculated) and
1998 c 340 s 2;
(3) RCW 41.31.030 (Contractual right to increase not granted) and
1998 c 340 s 3;
(4) RCW 41.31A.010 (Definitions) and 2000 c 247 s 407 & 1998 c 341
s 311;
(5) RCW 41.31A.020 (Extraordinary investment gain -- Credited to
member accounts -- Persons eligible -- Calculation of amount -- Contractual
right not granted) and 2003 c 294 s 4, 2000 c 247 s 408, & 1998 c 341
s 312;
(6) RCW 41.31A.030 (Retroactive extraordinary investment gain--Credited to member accounts -- Persons eligible -- Calculation of amount--Contractual right not granted) and 1998 c 341 s 313; and
(7) RCW 41.31A.040 (Retroactive extraordinary investment gain--Credited to member accounts -- Persons eligible -- Calculation of amount--Contractual right not granted) and 2000 c 247 s 409.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 The benefits provided under this act are
not provided to employees as a matter of contractual right prior to
July 1, 2007. The legislature retains the right to alter or abolish
these benefits at any time prior to July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with a final determination by the federal internal revenue
service that is a prescribed condition to favorable tax treatment of
one or more of the retirement plans, the conflicting part of this act
is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to
the individual members directly affected. This finding does not affect
the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the
members concerned. The legislature reserves the right to amend or
repeal this act in the future as may be required to comply with a final
federal determination that amendment or repeal is necessary to maintain
the favorable tax treatment of a plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Except for section 7 of this act which
takes effect July 1, 2008, this act takes effect July 1, 2007.

--- END ---