BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In October 2004, the court of appeals held
in the Mayflower Park Hotel decision that hotels are not entitled to a
resale exemption for tangible personal property which they purchase for
the exclusive use and consumption of guests. A regulation of the
department of revenue (WAC 458-20-166) reaches the same conclusion.
The legislature finds that the court's decision and the department's
regulation are inconsistent with the sales tax resale exemption and
inconsistent with the way other similarly situated taxpayers are
taxable under the same subsection of the law. Therefore, the
legislature intends to overturn the Mayflower Park Hotel decision and
departmental regulation and grant the lodging industry the resale
exemption.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to a
lodging business of amenities.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section:
(a) "Amenities" means tangible personal property purchased
primarily for the use and enjoyment of lodging guests and includes, but
is not limited to: Body lotion; combs; conditioner; cotton balls;
cotton swabs; envelopes and pencils; gift baskets and their contents;
hairnets; magazines; matches; mouthwash; notepads; pens; postcards;
razors; sewing kits; shampoo; shaving foam and shaving cream; shoe
mitts; shower caps; slippers; soap; shower gels; stationery; tissue
paper; toilet paper; toothbrushes; and toothpaste.
(b) "Lodging business" means a person that furnishes lodging
taxable by the state under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of amenities by a lodging business.
(2) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---