BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington state
employees impacted by disasters caused by all hazards, whether natural,
technological, or human caused, can be greatly helped by effective
support from their employer. There are many opportunities in which an
employer can provide support, including employer to employee, employer-coordinated employee to employee, and employer in conjunction with or
on behalf of their impacted employees to local governments and
charitable organizations. Washington state may be able to
significantly enhance disaster recovery plans by reviewing plans put
together by businesses in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington state employee disaster
recovery task force is established.
(2) The task force is composed of the following members:
(a) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development or the director's designee;
(b) The director of the Washington state military department or the
director's designee;
(c) The governor or the governor's designee;
(d) A representative of the Washington state federation of state
employees; and
(e) The director of the department of personnel or the director's
designee.
(3) The task force shall convene by July 1, 2006. Upon convening,
the task force shall select a chair to preside over task force meetings
and a vice-chair to preside in the chair's absence.
(4) Staff to the task force must be provided by the department of
community, trade, and economic development. Upon request by the task
force, any state agency must provide information within the scope of
the task force's work.
(5) Members of the task force shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The Washington state employee disaster
recovery task force shall, upon convening, examine the findings and
recommendations of the Weyerhaeuser handbook "Hurricane Katrina
Rebuilding a Community: An Employer's Guide to Assisting Employees"
and all other information that may be pertinent to disaster recovery
for Washington state employees. The task force shall report its
findings to the relevant committees of the legislature that deal with
state and local government issues by December 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The Washington state employee disaster
recovery task force and its powers and duties terminate June 30, 2007.

--- END ---