BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.710 and 2003 c 164 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the
date a regular legislative session convenes and continuing thirty days
past the date of final adjournment, and during the period beginning on
the date a special legislative session convenes and continuing through
the date that session adjourns, no state official or a person employed
by or acting on behalf of a state official or state legislator may
solicit or accept contributions to a public office fund, to a candidate
or authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt. Contributions
received through the mail after the thirtieth day before a regular
legislative session may be accepted if the contribution is postmarked
prior to the thirtieth day before the session.
(2) This section does not apply to activities authorized in RCW
43.07.370.

--- END ---