BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.01.051 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created a transportation commission, which shall
consist of seven voting members appointed by the governor, with the
consent of the senate. The present five members of the highway
commission shall serve as five initial members of the transportation
commission until their terms of office as highway commission members
would have expired. The additional two members provided herein for the
transportation commission shall be appointed for initial terms to
expire on June 30, 1982, and June 30, 1983. Thereafter all terms shall
be for six years. No elective state official ((or)), state officer, or
state employee shall be a member of the commission((, and not more than
four members of the commission shall at the time of appointment or
thereafter during their respective terms of office be members of the
same major political party. At the time of appointment or thereafter
during their respective terms of office, four members of the commission
shall reside in the western part of the state and three members shall
reside in the eastern part of the state as divided north and south by
the summit of the Cascade mountains. No more than two members of the
commission shall reside in the same county)); however, the governor, or
his or her designee, shall serve as a nonvoting member of the
commission. Commission appointments should reflect both a wide range
of transportation interests and a balanced statewide geographic
representation. Commissioners ((shall not be removed from office by
the governor before the expiration of their terms unless for a
disqualifying change of residence or for cause based upon a
determination of incapacity, incompetence, neglect of duty, or
malfeasance in office by the superior court of the state of Washington
in and for Thurston county upon petition and show cause proceedings
duly brought therefor in said court and directed to the commissioner in
question. No member shall be appointed for more than two consecutive
terms)) may be removed from office by the governor before the
expiration of their terms for cause.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.01.061 and 2005 c 319 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall meet at such times as it deems advisable
but at least ((once every month)) on a quarterly basis with meetings to
be held in different parts of the state. It may adopt its own rules
and regulations and may establish its own procedure. It shall act
collectively in harmony with recorded resolutions or motions adopted by
majority vote of at least four members. The commission may appoint an
((administrative secretary)) executive director, and shall elect one of
its members ((chairman)) chair for a term of one year. The ((chairman
shall be able to)) chair may vote on all matters before the commission.
The commission may from time to time retain planners, consultants, and
other technical personnel to advise it in the performance of its
duties.
(2) The commission shall submit to each regular session of the
legislature held in an odd-numbered year its own budget proposal
necessary for the commission's operations separate from that proposed
for the department.
(3) Each member of the commission shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall be reimbursed for actual
necessary traveling and other expenses in going to, attending, and
returning from meetings of the commission, and actual and necessary
traveling and other expenses incurred in the discharge of such duties
as may be requested by a majority vote of the commission or by the
secretary of transportation, but in no event shall ((a commissioner be
compensated in any year for more than one hundred twenty days, except
the chairman of the commission who may be paid compensation for not
more than one hundred fifty days)) the entire commission membership be
compensated for more than one thousand two hundred thirty days
combined. Service on the commission shall not be considered as service
credit for the purposes of any public retirement system.
(4) Each member of the commission shall disclose any actual or
potential conflict of interest, if applicable under the circumstance,
regarding any commission business.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.01.071 and 2005 c 319 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The transportation commission shall have the following functions,
powers, and duties:
(1) To propose policies to be adopted by the governor and the
legislature designed to assure the development and maintenance of a
comprehensive and balanced statewide transportation system which will
meet the needs of the people of this state for safe and efficient
transportation services. Wherever appropriate the policies shall
provide for the use of integrated, intermodal transportation systems to
implement the social, economic, and environmental policies, goals, and
objectives of the people of the state, and especially to conserve
nonrenewable natural resources including land and energy. To this end
the commission shall:
(a) Develop transportation policies which are based on the
policies, goals, and objectives expressed and inherent in existing
state laws;
(b) Inventory the adopted policies, goals, and objectives of the
local and area-wide governmental bodies of the state and define the
role of the state, regional, and local governments in determining
transportation policies, in transportation planning, and in
implementing the state transportation plan;
(c) Propose a transportation policy for the state;
(d) Establish a procedure for review and revision of the state
transportation policy and for submission of proposed changes to the
governor and the legislature;
(e) To integrate the statewide transportation plan with the needs
of the elderly and handicapped, and to coordinate federal and state
programs directed at assisting local governments to answer such needs;
(2) To provide for the effective coordination of state
transportation planning with national transportation policy, state and
local land use policies, and local and regional transportation plans
and programs;
(3) In conjunction with the provisions under RCW 47.01.075, to
provide for public involvement in transportation designed to elicit the
public's views both with respect to adequate transportation services
and appropriate means of minimizing adverse social, economic,
environmental, and energy impact of transportation programs;
(4) To prepare a comprehensive and balanced statewide
transportation plan which shall be based on the transportation policy
adopted by the governor and the legislature, and applicable state and
federal laws. The plan shall be reviewed and revised, and submitted to
the governor and the house of representatives and senate standing
committees on transportation, prior to each regular session of the
legislature during an even-numbered year thereafter.
The plan shall take into account federal law and regulations
relating to the planning, construction, and operation of transportation
facilities;
(5) To propose to the governor and the legislature prior to the
convening of each regular session held in an odd-numbered year a
recommended budget for the operations of the commission as required by
RCW 47.01.061;
(6) ((To approve the issuance and sale of all bonds authorized by
the legislature for capital construction of state highways, toll
facilities, Columbia Basin county roads (for which reimbursement to the
motor vehicle fund has been provided), urban arterial projects, and
aviation facilities;
(7))) To adopt such rules((, regulations, and policy directives))
as may be necessary to carry out reasonably and properly those
functions expressly vested in the commission by statute;
(((8))) (7) To contract with the office of financial management or
other appropriate state agencies for administrative support, accounting
services, computer services, and other support services necessary to
carry out its other statutory duties;
(8) To conduct transportation-related studies and policy analysis
to the extent directed by the legislature in the omnibus transportation
appropriations act, or as otherwise provided in law, and subject to the
availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose; and
(9) To exercise such other specific powers and duties as may be
vested in the transportation commission by this or any other provision
of law.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.01.075 and 2005 c 319 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The transportation commission shall provide a public forum for
the development of transportation policy in Washington state to include
coordination with regional transportation planning organizations,
transportation stakeholders, counties, cities, and citizens. It may
recommend to the secretary of transportation, the governor, and the
legislature means for obtaining appropriate citizen and professional
involvement in all transportation policy formulation and other matters
related to the powers and duties of the department. It may further
hold hearings and explore ways to improve the mobility of the
citizenry. At least every five years, the commission shall convene
regional forums to gather citizen input on transportation issues.
(2) Every two years, in coordination with the development of the
state biennial budget, the commission shall prepare the statewide
multimodal transportation progress report that outlines the
transportation priorities of the ensuing biennium. The report must:
(a) Consider the citizen input gathered at the forums;
(b) Be developed with the assistance of state transportation-related agencies and organizations;
(c) Be developed with the input from state, local, and regional
jurisdictions, transportation service providers, and key transportation
stakeholders;
(d) Be considered by the secretary of transportation and other
state transportation-related agencies in preparing proposed agency
budgets and executive request legislation;
(e) Be submitted by the commission to the governor and the
legislature by October 1st of each even-numbered year for consideration
by the governor.
(3) In fulfilling its responsibilities under this section, the
commission may create ad hoc committees or other such committees of
limited duration as necessary.
(4) In order to promote a better transportation system, the
commission shall offer policy guidance and make recommendations to the
governor and the legislature in key issue areas, including but not
limited to:
(a) Transportation finance;
(b) Preserving, maintaining, and operating the statewide
transportation system;
(c) Transportation infrastructure needs;
(d) Promoting best practices for adoption and use by
transportation-related agencies and programs;
(e) Transportation efficiencies that will improve service delivery
and/or coordination;
(f) Improved planning and coordination among transportation
agencies and providers; and
(g) Use of intelligent transportation systems and other technology-based solutions.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.01.091 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary shall establish such advisory councils as are
necessary to carry out the purposes of this ((1977 amendatory act))
title, and to insure adequate public participation in the planning and
development of transportation facilities. Members of such councils
shall serve at the pleasure of the secretary and may receive per diem
and necessary expenses, in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060,
as now or hereafter amended.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.01.101 and 2005 c 319 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary shall have the authority and it shall be his or her
duty:
(1) To serve as chief executive officer of the department with full
administrative authority to direct all its activities;
(2) To organize the department as he or she may deem necessary to
carry out the work and responsibilities of the department effectively;
(3) To designate and establish such transportation district,
region, or branch offices as may be necessary or convenient, and to
appoint assistants and delegate any powers, duties, and functions to
them or any officer or employee of the department as deemed necessary
to administer the department efficiently;
(4) To direct and coordinate the programs of the various divisions
of the department to assure that they achieve the greatest possible
mutual benefit, produce a balanced overall effort, and eliminate
unnecessary duplication of activity;
(5) To adopt all department rules that are subject to the adoption
procedures contained in the state administrative procedure act, except
rules subject to adoption by the commission pursuant to statute;
(6) To maintain and safeguard the official records of the
department, including the commission's recorded resolutions and orders;
(7) To provide, under contract or interagency agreement, ((full))
staff support to the commission, including long-term technical and
administrative support as needed, to assist it in carrying out its
functions, powers, and duties;
(8) To execute and implement the biennial operating budget for the
operation of the department in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW and
with legislative appropriation;
(9) To advise the governor and the legislature with respect to
matters under the jurisdiction of the department; and
(10) To exercise all other powers and perform all other duties as
are now or hereafter provided by law.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.01.280 and 2005 c 319 s 121 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon receiving an application for improvements to an existing
state highway or highways pursuant to RCW 43.160.074 from the community
economic revitalization board, the ((transportation commission))
department shall, in a timely manner, determine whether or not the
proposed state highway improvements:
(a) Meet the safety and design criteria of the department of
transportation;
(b) Will impair the operational integrity of the existing highway
system; and
(c) Will affect any other improvements planned by the department((;
and
(d) Will be consistent with its policies developed pursuant to RCW
47.01.071)).
(2) Upon completion of its determination of the factors contained
in subsection (1) of this section and any other factors it deems
pertinent, the ((transportation commission)) department shall forward
its approval, as submitted or amended or disapproval of the proposed
improvements to the board, along with any recommendation it may wish to
make concerning the desirability and feasibility of the proposed
development. If the ((transportation commission)) department
disapproves any proposed improvements, it shall specify its reasons for
disapproval.
(3) Upon notification from the board of an application's approval
pursuant to RCW 43.160.074, the ((transportation commission))
department shall ((direct the department of transportation to)) carry
out the improvements in coordination with the applicant.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.05.021 and 2005 c 319 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall conduct periodic analyses of the entire
state highway system((,)) and report to the ((commission)) office of
financial management and the chairs of the transportation committees of
the senate and house of representatives, any subsequent recommendations
to subdivide, classify, and subclassify all designated state highways
into the following three functional classes:
(a) The "principal arterial system" shall consist of a connected
network of rural arterial routes with appropriate extensions into and
through urban areas, including all routes designated as part of the
interstate system, which serve corridor movements having travel
characteristics indicative of substantial statewide and interstate
travel;
(b) The "minor arterial system" shall, in conjunction with the
principal arterial system, form a rural network of arterial routes
linking cities and other activity centers which generate long distance
travel, and, with appropriate extensions into and through urban areas,
form an integrated network providing interstate and interregional
service; and
(c) The "collector system" shall consist of routes which primarily
serve the more important intercounty, intracounty, and intraurban
travel corridors, collect traffic from the system of local access roads
and convey it to the arterial system, and on which, regardless of
traffic volume, the predominant travel distances are shorter than on
arterial routes.
(2) The ((transportation commission)) department shall adopt a
functional classification of highways. The ((commission)) department
shall consider ((the recommendations of the department and testimony))
comments from the public and local municipalities. The ((commission))
department shall give consideration to criteria consistent with this
section and federal regulations relating to the functional
classification of highways, including but not limited to the following:
(a) Urban population centers within and without the state
stratified and ranked according to size;
(b) Important traffic generating economic activities, including but
not limited to recreation, agriculture, government, business, and
industry;
(c) Feasibility of the route, including availability of alternate
routes within and without the state;
(d) Directness of travel and distance between points of economic
importance;
(e) Length of trips;
(f) Character and volume of traffic;
(g) Preferential consideration for multiple service which shall
include public transportation;
(h) Reasonable spacing depending upon population density; and
(i) System continuity.
(3) The ((transportation commission)) department or the legislature
shall designate state highways of statewide significance under RCW
47.06.140. If the ((commission)) department designates a state highway
of statewide significance, it shall submit a list of such facilities
for adoption by the legislature. This statewide system shall include
at a minimum interstate highways and other statewide principal
arterials that are needed to connect major communities across the state
and support the state's economy.
(4) The ((transportation commission)) department shall designate a
freight and goods transportation system. This statewide system shall
include state highways, county roads, and city streets. The
((commission)) department, in cooperation with cities and counties,
shall review and make recommendations to the legislature regarding
policies governing weight restrictions and road closures which affect
the transportation of freight and goods.

Sec. 9 RCW 36.57A.191 and 2003 c 363 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
As a condition of receiving state funding, a public transportation
benefit area authority shall submit a maintenance and preservation
management plan for certification by the department of transportation
((commission or its successor entity)). The plan must inventory all
transportation system assets within the direction and control of the
authority, and provide a preservation plan based on lowest life-cycle
cost methodologies.

Sec. 10 RCW 36.78.121 and 2003 c 363 s 307 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county road administration board, or its successor entity,
shall establish a standard of good practice for maintenance of
transportation system assets. This standard must be implemented by all
counties no later than December 31, 2007. The board shall develop a
model maintenance management system for use by counties. The board
shall develop rules to assist the counties in the implementation of
this system. Counties shall annually submit their maintenance plans to
the board. The board shall compile the county data regarding
maintenance management and annually submit it to the ((transportation
commission or its successor entity)) office of financial management.

Sec. 11 RCW 36.79.120 and 1988 c 26 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Counties receiving funds from the rural arterial trust account for
construction of arterials and the construction of replacement bridges
funded by the federal bridge replacement program on access roads in
rural areas shall provide such matching funds as established by rules
recommended by the board, subject to review, revision, and final
approval by the ((state transportation commission)) office of financial
management. Matching requirements shall be established after
appropriate studies by the board, taking into account financial
resources available to counties to meet arterial needs.

Sec. 12 RCW 36.79.130 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 49 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
Not later than November 1st of each even-numbered year the board
shall prepare and present to the ((state transportation commission))
office of financial management a recommended budget for expenditures
from the rural arterial trust account during the ensuing biennium. The
budget shall contain an estimate of the revenues to be credited to the
rural arterial trust account.
The ((state transportation commission)) office of financial
management shall review the budget as recommended, revise the budget as
it deems proper, and include the budget as revised as a separate
section of the transportation budget which it shall submit to the
governor pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 13 RCW 36.120.020 and 2002 c 56 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the governing body of a regional transportation
investment district.
(2) "Department" means the Washington state department of
transportation.
(3) "Highway of statewide significance" means an existing or
proposed state route or federal interstate designated as a highway of
statewide significance by the transportation commission, ((its
successor entity)) the department, or the legislature.
(4) "Lead agency" means a public agency that by law can plan,
design, and build a transportation project and has been so designated
by the district.
(5) "Regional transportation investment district" or "district"
means a municipal corporation whose boundaries are coextensive with two
or more contiguous counties and that has been created by county
legislative authorities and a vote of the people under this chapter to
implement a regional transportation investment plan.
(6) "Regional transportation investment district planning
committee" or "planning committee" means the advisory committee created
under RCW 36.120.030 to create and propose to county legislative
authorities a regional transportation investment plan to develop,
finance, and construct transportation projects.
(7) "Regional transportation investment plan" or "plan" means a
plan to develop, construct, and finance a transportation project or
projects.
(8) "Transportation project" means:
(a) A capital improvement or improvements to a highway that has
been designated, in whole or in part, as a highway of statewide
significance, including an extension, that:
(i) Adds a lane or new lanes to an existing state or federal
highway; or
(ii) Repairs or replaces a lane or lanes damaged by an event
declared an emergency by the governor before January 1, 2002.
(b) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
highway of statewide significance, including an extension, and may
include the following associated multimodal capital improvements:
(i) Approaches to highways of statewide significance;
(ii) High-occupancy vehicle lanes;
(iii) Flyover ramps;
(iv) Park and ride lots;
(v) Bus pullouts;
(vi) Vans for vanpools;
(vii) Buses; and
(viii) Signalization, ramp metering, and other transportation
system management improvements.
(c) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
city street, county road, or existing highway or the creation of a new
highway that intersects with a highway of statewide significance, if
all of the following conditions are met:
(i) The project is included in a plan that makes highway
improvement projects that add capacity to a highway or highways of
statewide significance;
(ii) The secretary of transportation determines that the project
would better relieve traffic congestion than investing that same money
in adding capacity to a highway of statewide significance;
(iii) Matching money equal to one-third of the total cost of the
project is provided by local entities, including but not limited to a
metropolitan planning organization, county, city, port, or private
entity in which a county participating in a plan is located. Local
entities may use federal grants to meet this matching requirement;
(iv) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed ten percent of the revenues generated by the
district;
(v) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed one billion dollars; and
(vi) The specific projects are included within the plan and
submitted as part of the plan to a vote of the people.
(d) Operations, preservation, and maintenance are excluded from
this definition and may not be included in a regional transportation
investment plan.
(9) "Weighted vote" means a vote that reflects the population each
board or planning committee member represents relative to the
population represented by the total membership of the board or planning
committee. Population will be determined using the federal 2000 census
or subsequent federal census data.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.10.101 and 2005 c 319 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
The attorney general shall prepare annually a report to the
transportation committees of the legislature, the governor, the
department of transportation, and the transportation commission((, and
the transportation performance audit board)) comprising a comprehensive
summary of all cases involving tort claims against the department of
transportation involving highways which were concluded and closed in
the previous calendar year. The report shall include for each case
closed:
(1) A summary of the factual background of the case;
(2) Identification of the attorneys representing the state and the
opposing parties;
(3) A synopsis of the legal theories asserted and the defenses
presented;
(4) Whether the case was tried, settled, or dismissed, and in whose
favor;
(5) The approximate number of attorney hours expended by the state
on the case, together with the corresponding dollar amount billed
therefore; and
(6) Such other matters relating to the case as the attorney general
deems relevant or appropriate, especially including any comments or
recommendations for changes in statute law or agency practice that
might effectively reduce the exposure of the state to such tort claims.

Sec. 15 RCW 46.44.042 and 1996 c 116 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Subject to the maximum gross weights specified in RCW 46.44.041, it
is unlawful to operate any vehicle upon the public highways with a
gross weight, including load, upon any tire concentrated upon the
surface of the highway in excess of six hundred pounds per inch width
of such tire. An axle manufactured after July 31, 1993, carrying more
than ten thousand pounds gross weight must be equipped with four or
more tires. ((Effective January 1, 1997,)) An axle carrying more than
ten thousand pounds gross weight must have four or more tires,
regardless of date of manufacture. Instead of the four or more tires
per axle requirements of this section, an axle may be equipped with two
tires limited to five hundred pounds per inch width of tire. This
section does not apply to vehicles operating under oversize or
overweight permits, or both, issued under RCW 46.44.090, while carrying
a nonreducible load.
The following equipment may operate at six hundred pounds per inch
width of tire: (1) A nonliftable steering axle or axles on the power
unit; (2) a tiller axle on fire fighting apparatus; (3) a rear booster
trailing axle equipped with two tires on a ready-mix concrete transit
truck; and (4) a straddle trailer manufactured before January 1, 1996,
equipped with single-tire axles or a single axle using a walking beam
supported by two in-line single tires and used exclusively for the
transport of fruit bins between field, storage, and processing. A
straddle trailer manufactured after January 1, 1996, meeting this use
criteria may carry five hundred fifteen pounds per inch width of tire
on sixteen and one-half inch wide tires.
For the purpose of this section, the width of tire in case of solid
rubber or hollow center cushion tires, so long as the use thereof may
be permitted by the law, shall be measured between the flanges of the
rim. For the purpose of this section, the width of tires in case of
pneumatic tires shall be the maximum overall normal inflated width as
stipulated by the manufacturer when inflated to the pressure specified
and without load thereon.
The department of transportation, ((under rules adopted by the
transportation commission)) by rule with respect to state highways, and
a local authority, with respect to a public highway under its
jurisdiction, may extend the weight table in RCW 46.44.041 to one
hundred fifteen thousand pounds. However, the extension must be in
compliance with federal law, and vehicles operating under the extension
must be in full compliance with the 1997 axle and tire requirements
under this section.

Sec. 16 RCW 46.44.080 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 29 are each amended
to read as follows:
Local authorities with respect to public highways under their
jurisdiction may prohibit the operation thereon of motor trucks or
other vehicles or may impose limits as to the weight thereof, or any
other restrictions as may be deemed necessary, whenever any such public
highway by reason of rain, snow, climatic or other conditions, will be
seriously damaged or destroyed unless the operation of vehicles thereon
be prohibited or restricted or the permissible weights thereof reduced:
PROVIDED, That whenever a highway has been closed generally to vehicles
or specified classes of vehicles, local authorities shall by general
rule or by special permit authorize the operation thereon of school
buses, emergency vehicles, and motor trucks transporting perishable
commodities or commodities necessary for the health and welfare of
local residents under such weight and speed restrictions as the local
authorities deem necessary to protect the highway from undue damage:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the governing authorities of incorporated cities
and towns shall not prohibit the use of any city street designated ((by
the transportation commission as forming)) a part of the route of any
primary state highway through any such incorporated city or town by
vehicles or any class of vehicles or impose any restrictions or
reductions in permissible weights unless such restriction, limitation,
or prohibition, or reduction in permissible weights be first approved
in writing by the department of transportation.
The local authorities imposing any such restrictions or
limitations, or prohibiting any use or reducing the permissible weights
shall do so by proper ordinance or resolution and shall erect or cause
to be erected and maintained signs designating the provisions of the
ordinance or resolution in each end of the portion of any public
highway affected thereby, and no such ordinance or resolution shall be
effective unless and until such signs are erected and maintained.
The department shall have the same authority as hereinabove granted
to local authorities to prohibit or restrict the operation of vehicles
upon state highways. The department shall give public notice of
closure or restriction. The department may issue special permits for
the operation of school buses and motor trucks transporting perishable
commodities or commodities necessary for the health and welfare of
local residents under specified weight and speed restrictions as may be
necessary to protect any state highway from undue damage.

Sec. 17 RCW 46.44.090 and 2001 c 262 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of transportation, pursuant to its rules ((adopted
by the transportation commission)) with respect to state highways, and
local authorities, with respect to public highways under their
jurisdiction, may, upon application in writing and good cause being
shown therefor, issue a special permit in writing, or electronically,
authorizing the applicant to operate or move a vehicle or combination
of vehicles of a size, weight of vehicle, or load exceeding the maximum
set forth in RCW 46.44.010, 46.44.020, 46.44.030, 46.44.034, and
46.44.041 upon any public highway under the jurisdiction of the
authority granting such permit and for the maintenance of which such
authority is responsible.

Sec. 18 RCW 46.44.092 and 1989 c 398 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Special permits may not be issued for movements on any state
highway outside the limits of any city or town in excess of the
following widths:
On two-lane highways, fourteen feet;
On multiple-lane highways where a physical barrier serving as a
median divider separates opposing traffic lanes, twenty feet;
On multiple-lane highways without a physical barrier serving as a
median divider, thirty-two feet.
These limits apply except under the following conditions:
(1) In the case of buildings, the limitations referred to in this
section for movement on any two lane state highway other than the
national system of interstate and defense highways may be exceeded
under the following conditions: (a) Controlled vehicular traffic shall
be maintained in one direction at all times; (b) the maximum distance
of movement shall not exceed five miles; additional contiguous permits
shall not be issued to exceed the five-mile limit: PROVIDED, That when
the department of transportation((, pursuant to general rules adopted
by the transportation commission,)) determines a hardship would result,
this limitation may be exceeded upon approval of the department of
transportation; (c) prior to issuing a permit a qualified
transportation department employee shall make a visual inspection of
the building and route involved determining that the conditions listed
herein shall be complied with and that structures or overhead
obstructions may be cleared or moved in order to maintain a constant
and uninterrupted movement of the building; (d) special escort or other
precautions may be imposed to assure movement is made under the safest
possible conditions, and the Washington state patrol shall be advised
when and where the movement is to be made;
(2) Permits may be issued for widths of vehicles in excess of the
preceding limitations on highways or sections of highways which have
been designed and constructed for width in excess of such limitations;
(3) Permits may be issued for vehicles with a total outside width,
including the load, of nine feet or less when the vehicle is equipped
with a mechanism designed to cover the load pursuant to RCW 46.61.655;
(4) These limitations may be rescinded when certification is made
by military officials, or by officials of public or private power
facilities, or when in the opinion of the department of transportation
the movement or action is a necessary movement or action: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That in the judgment of the department of transportation the
structures and highway surfaces on the routes involved are capable of
sustaining widths in excess of such limitation;
(5) These limitations shall not apply to movement during daylight
hours on any two lane state highway where the gross weight, including
load, does not exceed eighty thousand pounds and the overall width of
load does not exceed sixteen feet: PROVIDED, That the minimum and
maximum speed of such movements, prescribed routes of such movements,
the times of such movements, limitation upon frequency of trips (which
limitation shall be not less than one per week), and conditions to
assure safety of traffic may be prescribed by the department of
transportation or local authority issuing such special permit.
The applicant for any special permit shall specifically describe
the vehicle or vehicles and load to be operated or moved and the
particular state highways for which permit to operate is requested and
whether such permit is requested for a single trip or for continuous
operation.

Sec. 19 RCW 46.44.096 and 1996 c 92 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In determining fees according to RCW 46.44.0941, mileage on state
primary and secondary highways shall be determined from the planning
survey records of the department of transportation, and the gross
weight of the vehicle or vehicles, including load, shall be declared by
the applicant. Overweight on which fees shall be paid will be gross
loadings in excess of loadings authorized by law or axle loadings in
excess of loadings authorized by law, whichever is the greater. Loads
which are overweight and oversize shall be charged the fee for the
overweight permit without additional fees being assessed for the
oversize features.
Special permits issued under RCW 46.44.047, 46.44.0941, or
46.44.095, may be obtained from offices of the department of
transportation, ports of entry, or other agents appointed by the
department.
The department may appoint agents for the purposes of selling
special motor vehicle permits, temporary additional tonnage permits,
and log tolerance permits. Agents so appointed may retain three
dollars and fifty cents for each permit sold to defray expenses
incurred in handling and selling the permits. If the fee is collected
by the department of transportation, the department shall certify the
fee so collected to the state treasurer for deposit to the credit of
the motor vehicle fund.
The department may select a third party contractor, by means of
competitive bid, to perform the department's permit issuance function,
as provided under RCW 46.44.090. Factors the department shall
consider, but is not limited to, in the selection of a third party
contractor are economic benefit to both the department and the motor
carrier industry, and enhancement of the overall level of permit
service. For purposes of this section, "third party contractor" means
a business entity that is authorized by the department to issue special
permits. The department of transportation ((commission)) may adopt
rules specifying the criteria that a business entity must meet in order
to qualify as a third party contractor under this section.
Fees established in RCW 46.44.0941 shall be paid to the political
body issuing the permit if the entire movement is to be confined to
roads, streets, or highways for which that political body is
responsible. When a movement involves a combination of state highways,
county roads, and/or city streets the fee shall be paid to the
((state)) department of transportation. When a movement is confined
within the city limits of a city or town upon city streets, including
routes of state highways on city streets, all fees shall be paid to the
city or town involved. A permit will not be required from city or town
authorities for a move involving a combination of city or town streets
and state highways when the move through a city or town is being
confined to the route of the state highway. When a move involves a
combination of county roads and city streets the fee shall be paid to
the county authorities, but the fee shall not be collected nor the
county permit issued until valid permits are presented showing that the
city or town authorities approve of the move in question. When the
movement involves only county roads the fees collected shall be paid to
the county involved. Fees established shall be paid to the political
body issuing the permit if the entire use of the vehicle during the
period covered by the permit shall be confined to the roads, streets,
or highways for which that political body is responsible.

Sec. 20 RCW 46.61.450 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 39 are each amended
to read as follows:
It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a vehicle or any
combination of vehicles over any bridge or other elevated structure or
through any tunnel or underpass constituting a part of any public
highway at a rate of speed or with a gross weight or of a size which is
greater at any time than the maximum speed or maximum weight or size
which can be maintained or carried with safety over any such bridge or
structure or through any such tunnel or underpass when such bridge,
structure, tunnel, or underpass is sign posted as hereinafter provided.
The secretary of transportation, if it be a bridge, structure, tunnel,
or underpass upon a state highway, or the governing body or authorities
of any county, city, or town, if it be upon roads or streets under
their jurisdiction, may restrict the speed which may be maintained or
the gross weight or size which may be operated upon or over any such
bridge or elevated structure or through any such tunnel or underpass
with safety thereto. The secretary or the governing body or
authorities of any county, city, or town having jurisdiction shall
determine and declare the maximum speed or maximum gross weight or size
which such bridge, elevated structure, tunnel, or underpass can
withstand or accommodate and shall cause suitable signs stating such
maximum speed or maximum gross weight, or size, or either, to be
erected and maintained on the right hand side of such highway, road, or
street and at a distance of not less than one hundred feet from each
end of such bridge, structure, tunnel, or underpass and on the approach
thereto: PROVIDED, That in the event that any such bridge, elevated
structure, tunnel, or underpass is upon a city street designated by the
department of transportation ((commission)) as forming a part of the
route of any state highway through any such incorporated city or town
the determination of any maximum speed or maximum gross weight or size
which such bridge, elevated structure, tunnel, or underpass can
withstand or accommodate shall not be enforceable at any speed, weight,
or size less than the maximum allowed by law, unless with the approval
in writing of the secretary. Upon the trial of any person charged with
a violation of this section, proof of either violation of maximum speed
or maximum weight, or size, or either, and the distance and location of
such signs as are required, shall constitute conclusive evidence of the
maximum speed or maximum weight, or size, or either, which can be
maintained or carried with safety over such bridge or elevated
structure or through such tunnel or underpass.

Sec. 21 RCW 46.68.113 and 2003 c 363 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
During the 2003-2005 biennium, cities and towns shall provide to
the transportation commission, or its successor entity, preservation
rating information on at least seventy percent of the total city and
town arterial network. Thereafter, the preservation rating information
requirement shall increase in five percent increments in subsequent
biennia. The rating system used by cities and towns must be based upon
the Washington state pavement rating method or an equivalent standard
approved by the department of transportation ((commission or its
successor entity)). Beginning January 1, 2007, the preservation rating
information shall be submitted to the department.

Sec. 22 RCW 47.28.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 59 are each amended
to read as follows:
Whenever the general route of any state highway shall be designated
and laid out as running to or by way of certain designated points,
without specifying the particular route to be followed to or by way of
such points, the ((transportation commission)) department shall
determine the particular route to be followed by said state highway to
or by way of said designated points, and shall be at liberty to select
and adopt as a part of such state highway, the whole or any part of any
existing public highway previously designated as a county road, primary
road, or secondary road or now or hereafter classified as a county
road. The ((commission)) department need not select and adopt the
entire routes for such state highways at one time, but may select and
adopt parts of such routes from time to time as it deems advisable.
Where a state highway is designated as passing by way of a certain
point, this shall not require the ((commission)) department to cause
such state highway to pass through or touch such point but such
designation is directional only and may be complied with by location in
the general vicinity. The department ((of transportation)) is
empowered to construct as a part of any state highway as designated and
in addition to any portion meeting the limits of any incorporated city
or town a bypass section either through or around any such incorporated
city or town.

Sec. 23 RCW 47.28.170 and 1990 c 265 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the department finds that as a consequence of
accident, natural disaster, or other emergency, an existing state
highway is in jeopardy or is rendered impassible in one or both
directions and the department further finds that prompt reconstruction,
repair, or other work is needed to preserve or restore the highway for
public travel, the department may obtain at least three written bids
for the work without publishing a call for bids, and the secretary of
transportation may award a contract forthwith to the lowest responsible
bidder.
The department shall notify any association or organization of
contractors filing a request to regularly receive notification.
Notification to an association or organization of contractors shall
include: (a) The location of the work to be done; (b) the general
anticipated nature of the work to be done; and (c) the date determined
by the department as reasonable in view of the nature of the work and
emergent nature of the problem after which the department will not
receive bids.
(2) Whenever the department finds it necessary to protect a highway
facility from imminent damage or to perform emergency work to reopen a
highway facility, the department may contract for such work on a
negotiated basis not to exceed force account rates for a period not to
exceed thirty working days.
(3) The secretary shall review any contract exceeding ((two)) seven
hundred thousand dollars awarded under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section with the ((transportation commission at its next regularly
scheduled meeting)) office of financial management within thirty days
of the contract award.
(4) Any person, firm, or corporation awarded a contract for work
must be prequalified pursuant to RCW 47.28.070 and may be required to
furnish a bid deposit or performance bond.

Sec. 24 RCW 47.38.060 and 1996 c 172 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((transportation commission)) department may designate
interstate safety rest areas, as appropriate, as locations for memorial
signs to prisoners of war and those missing in action. The
((commission)) department shall adopt policies for the placement of
memorial signs on interstate safety rest areas and may disapprove any
memorial sign that it determines to be inappropriate or inconsistent
with the policies. The policies shall include, but are not limited to,
guidelines for the size and location of and inscriptions on memorial
signs. The secretary shall adopt rules for administering this program.
Nonprofit associations may have their name identified on a memorial
sign if the association bears the cost of supplying and maintaining the
memorial sign.

Sec. 25 RCW 47.52.133 and 1987 c 200 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 47.52.134, the ((transportation
commission)) department and the highway authorities of the counties and
incorporated cities and towns, with regard to facilities under their
respective jurisdictions, prior to the establishment of any limited
access facility, shall hold a public hearing within the county, city,
or town wherein the limited access facility is to be established to
determine the desirability of the plan proposed by such authority.
Notice of such hearing shall be given to the owners of property
abutting the section of any existing highway, road, or street being
established as a limited access facility, as indicated in the tax rolls
of the county, and in the case of a state limited access facility, to
the county and/or city or town. Such notice shall be by United States
mail in writing, setting forth a time for the hearing, which time shall
be not less than fifteen days after mailing of such notice. Notice of
such hearing also shall be given by publication not less than fifteen
days prior to such hearing in one or more newspapers of general
circulation within the county, city, or town. Such notice by
publication shall be deemed sufficient as to any owner or reputed owner
or any unknown owner or owner who cannot be located. Such notice shall
indicate a suitable location where plans for such proposal may be
inspected.

Sec. 26 RCW 47.52.145 and 1981 c 95 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever after the final adoption of a plan for a limited access
highway by the ((transportation commission)) department, an additional
design public hearing with respect to the facility or any portion
thereof is conducted pursuant to federal law resulting in a revision of
the design of the limited access plan, the ((commission)) department
may modify the previously adopted limited access plan to conform to the
revised design without further public hearings providing the following
conditions are met:
(1) As compared with the previously adopted limited access plan,
the revised plan will not require additional or different right of way
with respect to that section of highway for which the design has been
revised, in excess of five percent by area; and
(2) If the previously adopted limited access plan was modified by
a board of review convened at the request of a county, city, or town,
the legislative authority of the county, city, or town shall approve
any revisions of the plan which conflict with modifications ordered by
the board of review.

Sec. 27 RCW 47.52.210 and 1981 c 95 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the ((transportation commission)) department adopts a
plan for a limited access highway to be constructed within the
corporate limits of a city or town which incorporates existing city or
town streets, title to such streets shall remain in the city or town,
and the provisions of RCW 47.24.020 as now or hereafter amended shall
continue to apply to such streets until such time that the highway is
operated as either a partially or fully controlled access highway.
Title to and full control over that portion of the city or town street
incorporated into the limited access highway shall be vested in the
state upon a declaration by the secretary of transportation that such
highway is operational as a limited access facility, but in no event
prior to the acquisition of right of way for such highway including
access rights, and not later than the final completion of construction
of such highway.
(2) Upon the completion of construction of a state limited access
highway within a city or town, the department of transportation may
relinquish to the city or town streets constructed or improved as a
functional part of the limited access highway, slope easements,
landscaping areas, and other related improvements to be maintained and
operated by the city or town in accordance with the limited access
plan. Title to such property relinquished to a city or town shall be
conveyed by a deed executed by the secretary of transportation and duly
acknowledged. Relinquishment of such property to the city or town may
be expressly conditioned upon the maintenance of access control
acquired by the state and the continued operation of such property as
a functional part of the limited access highway.

Sec. 28 RCW 81.112.086 and 2003 c 363 s 306 are each amended to
read as follows:
As a condition of receiving state funding, a regional transit
authority shall submit a maintenance and preservation management plan
for certification by the department of transportation ((commission or
its successor entity)). The plan must inventory all transportation
system assets within the direction and control of the transit
authority, and provide a plan for preservation of assets based on
lowest life-cycle cost methodologies.

Sec. 29 RCW 36.56.121 and 2003 c 363 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
As a condition of receiving state funding, a county that has
assumed the transportation functions of a metropolitan municipal
corporation shall submit a maintenance and preservation management plan
for certification by the ((transportation commission or its successor
entity)) department of transportation. The plan must inventory all
transportation system assets within the direction and control of the
county, and provide a preservation plan based on lowest life-cycle cost
methodologies.

Sec. 30 RCW 36.57A.070 and 1985 c 6 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The comprehensive transit plan adopted by the authority shall be
reviewed by the state department of transportation ((commission)) to
determine:
(1) The completeness of service to be offered and the economic
viability of the transit system proposed in such comprehensive transit
plan;
(2) Whether such plan integrates the proposed transportation system
with existing transportation modes and systems that serve the benefit
area;
(3) Whether such plan coordinates that area's system and service
with nearby public transportation systems;
(4) Whether such plan is eligible for matching state or federal
funds((;
After reviewing the comprehensive transit plan, the state
transportation commission shall have sixty days in which to approve
such plan and to certify to the state treasurer that such public
transportation benefit area shall be eligible to receive the motor
vehicle excise tax proceeds authorized pursuant to RCW 35.58.273, as
now or hereafter amended in the manner prescribed by chapter 82.44 RCW,
as now or hereafter amended. To be approved a plan shall provide for
coordinated transportation planning, the integration of such proposed
transportation program with other transportation systems operating in
areas adjacent to, or in the vicinity of the proposed public
transportation benefit area, and be consistent with the public
transportation coordination criteria adopted pursuant to the urban mass
transportation act of 1964 as amended as of July 1, 1975. In the event
such comprehensive plan is disapproved and ruled ineligible to receive
motor vehicle tax proceeds, the state transportation commission shall
provide written notice to the authority within thirty days as to the
reasons for such plan's disapproval and such ineligibility. The
authority may resubmit such plan upon reconsideration and correction of
such deficiencies in the plan cited in such notice of disapproval)).

Sec. 31 RCW 47.10.861 and 2003 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to provide funds necessary for the location, design, right
of way, and construction of selected projects or improvements that are
identified as transportation 2003 projects or improvements in the
omnibus transportation budget, there shall be issued and sold upon the
request of the secretary of the department of transportation
((commission)) a total of two billion six hundred million dollars of
general obligation bonds of the state of Washington.

Sec. 32 RCW 47.10.862 and 2003 c 147 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the request of the secretary of the department of
transportation ((commission)), as appropriate, the state finance
committee shall supervise and provide for the issuance, sale, and
retirement of the bonds in RCW 47.10.861 through 47.10.866 in
accordance with chapter 39.42 RCW. Bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.861
through 47.10.866 shall be sold in the manner, at time or times, in
amounts, and at the price as the state finance committee shall
determine. No bonds may be offered for sale without prior legislative
appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.
The state finance committee shall consider the issuance of short-term obligations in lieu of long-term obligations for the purposes of
more favorable interest rates, lower total interest costs, and
increased marketability and for the purpose of retiring the bonds
during the life of the project for which they were issued.

Sec. 33 RCW 47.10.843 and 1998 c 321 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
In order to provide funds necessary for the location, design, right
of way, and construction of state and local highway improvements, there
shall be issued and sold upon the request of the ((Washington state))
secretary of the department of transportation ((commission)) a maximum
of one billion nine hundred million dollars of general obligation bonds
of the state of Washington.

Sec. 34 RCW 47.10.844 and 1998 c 321 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the request of the secretary of the department of
transportation ((commission)), the state finance committee shall
supervise and provide for the issuance, sale, and retirement of the
bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 through 47.10.848 in accordance with
chapter 39.42 RCW. Bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 through 47.10.848
shall be sold in such manner, at such time or times, in such amounts,
and at such price as the state finance committee shall determine. No
such bonds may be offered for sale without prior legislative
appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.
The state finance committee shall consider the issuance of short-term obligations in lieu of long-term obligations for the purposes of
more favorable interest rates, lower total interest costs, and
increased marketability and for the purpose of retiring the bonds
during the life of the project for which they were issued.

Sec. 35 RCW 47.10.834 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 15 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
In order to provide funds necessary to implement the public-private
transportation initiatives authorized by chapter 47.46 RCW, there shall
be issued and sold upon the request of the ((Washington state))
secretary of the department of transportation ((commission)) a total of
twenty-five million six hundred twenty-five thousand dollars of general
obligation bonds of the state of Washington.

Sec. 36 RCW 47.10.835 and 1994 c 183 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the request of the secretary of the department of
transportation ((commission)), the state finance committee shall
supervise and provide for the issuance, sale, and retirement of the
bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.834 through 47.10.841 in accordance with
chapter 39.42 RCW. Bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.834 through 47.10.841
shall be sold in such manner, at such time or times, in such amounts,
and at such price as the state finance committee shall determine. No
such bonds may be offered for sale without prior legislative
appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds. In making
such appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds, the
legislature shall specify what portion of the appropriation is provided
for possible loans and what portion of the appropriation is provided
for other forms of cash contributions to projects.
The state finance committee shall consider the issuance of short-term obligations in lieu of long-term obligations for the purposes of
more favorable interest rates, lower total interest costs, and
increased marketability and for the purpose of retiring the bonds
during the life of the project for which they were issued.

Sec. 37 RCW 47.10.819 and 1993 c 432 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to provide funds necessary for the location, design, right
of way, and construction of selected interstate and other highway
improvements, there shall be issued and sold upon the request of the
((Washington state)) secretary of the department of transportation
((commission)) a total of one hundred million dollars of general
obligation bonds of the state of Washington for the following purposes
and specified sums:
(1) Not to exceed twenty-five million dollars to pay the state's
and local governments' share of matching funds for the ten
demonstration projects identified in the Intermodal Surface
Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991.
(2) Not to exceed fifty million dollars to temporarily pay the
regular federal share of construction in advance of federal-aid
apportionments as authorized by this section.
(3) Not to exceed twenty-five million dollars for loans to local
governments to provide the required matching funds to take advantage of
available federal funds. These loans shall be on such terms and
conditions as determined by the ((Washington state)) secretary of the
department of transportation ((commission)), but in no event may the
loans be for a period of more than ten years. The interest rate on the
loans authorized under this subsection shall be equal to the interest
rate on the bonds sold for such purposes.

Sec. 38 RCW 47.10.820 and 1993 c 432 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the request of the secretary of the department of
transportation ((commission)), the state finance committee shall
supervise and provide for the issuance, sale, and retirement of the
bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.819 through 47.10.824 in accordance with
chapter 39.42 RCW. Bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.819 through 47.10.824
shall be sold in such manner, at such time or times, in such amounts,
and at such price as the state finance committee shall determine. No
such bonds may be offered for sale without prior legislative
appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.
The state finance committee shall consider the issuance of short-term obligations in lieu of long-term obligations for the purposes of
more favorable interest rates, lower total interest costs, and
increased marketability and for the purpose of retiring the bonds
during the life of the project for which they were issued.

Sec. 39 RCW 47.02.120 and 1990 c 293 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of providing funds for the acquisition of
headquarters facilities for district 1 of the department of
transportation and costs incidental thereto, together with all
improvements and equipment required to make the facilities suitable for
the department's use, there shall be issued and sold upon the request
of the ((Washington transportation commission)) secretary of the
department of transportation a total of fifteen million dollars of
general obligation bonds of the state of Washington.

Sec. 40 RCW 47.02.140 and 1990 c 293 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the request of the secretary of the department of
transportation ((commission)), the state finance committee shall
supervise and provide for the issuance, sale, and retirement of the
bonds authorized by RCW 47.02.120 through 47.02.190 in accordance with
chapter 39.42 RCW. Bonds authorized by RCW 47.02.120 through 47.02.190
shall be sold in such manner, at such time or times, in such amounts,
and at such price as the state finance committee shall determine.
Except for the purpose of repaying the loan from the motor vehicle
fund, no such bonds may be offered for sale without prior legislative
appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.
The state finance committee shall consider the issuance of short-term obligations in lieu of long-term obligations for the purposes of
more favorable interest rates, lower total interest costs, and
increased marketability and for the purpose of retiring the bonds
during the life of the project for which they were issued.

Sec. 41 RCW 47.17.132 and 1997 c 308 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 35 is established
as follows:
Beginning at the Washington-Oregon boundary line thence northerly
to a junction with state route number 14 in the vicinity of White
Salmon((; however, until such time as a bridge across the Columbia
River is constructed at a location adopted by the transportation
commission no existing route may be maintained or improved by the
transportation commission as a temporary route for state route number
35)).

Sec. 42 RCW 47.24.010 and 1998 c 245 s 97 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of transportation ((commission)) shall determine
what streets, together with bridges thereon and wharves necessary for
use for ferriage of motor vehicle traffic in connection with such
streets, if any, in any incorporated cities and towns shall form a part
of the route of state highways and between the first and fifteenth days
of July of any year the department ((of transportation)) shall identify
by brief description, the streets, together with the bridges thereon
and wharves, if any, in such city or town which are designated as
forming a part of the route of any state highway; and all such streets,
including curbs and gutters and street intersections and such bridges
and wharves, shall thereafter be a part of the state highway system and
as such shall be constructed and maintained by the department ((of
transportation)) from any state funds available therefor: PROVIDED,
That the responsibility for the construction and maintenance of any
such street together with its appurtenances may be returned to a city
or a town upon certification by the department ((of transportation)) to
the clerk of any city or town that such street, or portion thereof, is
no longer required as a part of the state highway system: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That any such certification that a street, or portion thereof,
is no longer required as a part of the state highway system shall be
made between the first and fifteenth of July following the
determination by the department that such street or portion thereof is
no longer required as a part of the state highway system, but this
shall not prevent the department and any city or town from entering
into an agreement that a city or town will accept responsibility for
such a street or portion thereof at some time other than between the
first and fifteenth of July of any year.

Sec. 43 RCW 43.88.030 and 2005 c 386 s 3 and 2005 c 319 s 108 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The director of financial management shall provide all agencies
with a complete set of instructions for submitting biennial budget
requests to the director at least three months before agency budget
documents are due into the office of financial management. The budget
document or documents shall consist of the governor's budget message
which shall be explanatory of the budget and shall contain an outline
of the proposed financial policies of the state for the ensuing fiscal
period, as well as an outline of the proposed six-year financial
policies where applicable, and shall describe in connection therewith
the important features of the budget. The biennial budget document or
documents shall also describe performance indicators that demonstrate
measurable progress towards priority results. The message shall set
forth the reasons for salient changes from the previous fiscal period
in expenditure and revenue items and shall explain any major changes in
financial policy. Attached to the budget message shall be such
supporting schedules, exhibits and other explanatory material in
respect to both current operations and capital improvements as the
governor shall deem to be useful to the legislature. The budget
document or documents shall set forth a proposal for expenditures in
the ensuing fiscal period, or six-year period where applicable, based
upon the estimated revenues and caseloads as approved by the economic
and revenue forecast council and caseload forecast council or upon the
estimated revenues and caseloads of the office of financial management
for those funds, accounts, sources, and programs for which the forecast
councils do not prepare an official forecast. Revenues shall be
estimated for such fiscal period from the source and at the rates
existing by law at the time of submission of the budget document,
including the supplemental budgets submitted in the even-numbered years
of a biennium. However, the estimated revenues and caseloads for use
in the governor's budget document may be adjusted to reflect budgetary
revenue transfers and revenue and caseload estimates dependent upon
budgetary assumptions of enrollments, workloads, and caseloads. All
adjustments to the approved estimated revenues and caseloads must be
set forth in the budget document. The governor may additionally
submit, as an appendix to each supplemental, biennial, or six-year
agency budget or to the budget document or documents, a proposal for
expenditures in the ensuing fiscal period from revenue sources derived
from proposed changes in existing statutes.
((Supplemental and biennial documents shall reflect a six-year
expenditure plan consistent with estimated revenues from existing
sources. Any additional revenue resulting from proposed changes to
existing statutes shall be separately identified within the document as
well as related expenditures for the six-year period.))
The budget document or documents shall also contain:
(a) Revenues classified by fund and source for the immediately past
fiscal period, those received or anticipated for the current fiscal
period, and those anticipated for the ensuing biennium;
(b) The undesignated fund balance or deficit, by fund;
(c) Such additional information dealing with expenditures,
revenues, workload, performance, and personnel as the legislature may
direct by law or concurrent resolution;
(d) Such additional information dealing with revenues and
expenditures as the governor shall deem pertinent and useful to the
legislature;
(e) Tabulations showing expenditures classified by fund, function,
and agency;
(f) The expenditures that include nonbudgeted, nonappropriated
accounts outside the state treasury;
(g) Identification of all proposed direct expenditures to implement
the Puget Sound water quality plan under chapter 90.71 RCW, shown by
agency and in total; and
(h) Tabulations showing each postretirement adjustment by
retirement system established after fiscal year 1991, to include, but
not be limited to, estimated total payments made to the end of the
previous biennial period, estimated payments for the present biennium,
and estimated payments for the ensuing biennium.
(2) The budget document or documents shall include detailed
estimates of all anticipated revenues applicable to proposed operating
or capital expenditures and shall also include all proposed operating
or capital expenditures. The total of beginning undesignated fund
balance and estimated revenues less working capital and other reserves
shall equal or exceed the total of proposed applicable expenditures.
The budget document or documents shall further include:
(a) Interest, amortization and redemption charges on the state
debt;
(b) Payments of all reliefs, judgments, and claims;
(c) Other statutory expenditures;
(d) Expenditures incident to the operation for each agency;
(e) Revenues derived from agency operations;
(f) Expenditures and revenues shall be given in comparative form
showing those incurred or received for the immediately past fiscal
period and those anticipated for the current biennium and next ensuing
biennium;
(g) A showing and explanation of amounts of general fund and other
funds obligations for debt service and any transfers of moneys that
otherwise would have been available for appropriation;
(h) Common school expenditures on a fiscal-year basis;
(i) A showing, by agency, of the value and purpose of financing
contracts for the lease/purchase or acquisition of personal or real
property for the current and ensuing fiscal periods; and
(j) A showing and explanation of anticipated amounts of general
fund and other funds required to amortize the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability of the retirement system specified under chapter
41.45 RCW, and the contributions to meet such amortization, stated in
total dollars and as a level percentage of total compensation.
(3) The governor's operating budget document or documents shall
reflect the statewide priorities as required by RCW 43.88.090.
(4) The governor's operating budget document or documents shall
identify activities that are not addressing the statewide priorities.
(5) A separate capital budget document or schedule shall be
submitted that will contain the following:
(a) A statement setting forth a long-range facilities plan for the
state that identifies and includes the highest priority needs within
affordable spending levels;
(b) A capital program consisting of proposed capital projects for
the next biennium and the two biennia succeeding the next biennium
consistent with the long-range facilities plan. Insomuch as is
practical, and recognizing emergent needs, the capital program shall
reflect the priorities, projects, and spending levels proposed in
previously submitted capital budget documents in order to provide a
reliable long-range planning tool for the legislature and state
agencies;
(c) A capital plan consisting of proposed capital spending for at
least four biennia succeeding the next biennium;
(d) A strategic plan for reducing backlogs of maintenance and
repair projects. The plan shall include a prioritized list of specific
facility deficiencies and capital projects to address the deficiencies
for each agency, cost estimates for each project, a schedule for
completing projects over a reasonable period of time, and
identification of normal maintenance activities to reduce future
backlogs;
(e) A statement of the reason or purpose for a project;
(f) Verification that a project is consistent with the provisions
set forth in chapter 36.70A RCW;
(g) A statement about the proposed site, size, and estimated life
of the project, if applicable;
(h) Estimated total project cost;
(i) For major projects valued over five million dollars, estimated
costs for the following project components: Acquisition, consultant
services, construction, equipment, project management, and other costs
included as part of the project. Project component costs shall be
displayed in a standard format defined by the office of financial
management to allow comparisons between projects;
(j) Estimated total project cost for each phase of the project as
defined by the office of financial management;
(k) Estimated ensuing biennium costs;
(l) Estimated costs beyond the ensuing biennium;
(m) Estimated construction start and completion dates;
(n) Source and type of funds proposed;
(o) Estimated ongoing operating budget costs or savings resulting
from the project, including staffing and maintenance costs;
(p) For any capital appropriation requested for a state agency for
the acquisition of land or the capital improvement of land in which the
primary purpose of the acquisition or improvement is recreation or
wildlife habitat conservation, the capital budget document, or an
omnibus list of recreation and habitat acquisitions provided with the
governor's budget document, shall identify the projected costs of
operation and maintenance for at least the two biennia succeeding the
next biennium. Omnibus lists of habitat and recreation land
acquisitions shall include individual project cost estimates for
operation and maintenance as well as a total for all state projects
included in the list. The document shall identify the source of funds
from which the operation and maintenance costs are proposed to be
funded;
(q) Such other information bearing upon capital projects as the
governor deems to be useful;
(r) Standard terms, including a standard and uniform definition of
normal maintenance, for all capital projects;
(s) Such other information as the legislature may direct by law or
concurrent resolution.
For purposes of this subsection (5), the term "capital project"
shall be defined subsequent to the analysis, findings, and
recommendations of a joint committee comprised of representatives from
the house capital appropriations committee, senate ways and means
committee, legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
and office of financial management.
(6) No change affecting the comparability of agency or program
information relating to expenditures, revenues, workload, performance
and personnel shall be made in the format of any budget document or
report presented to the legislature under this section or RCW
43.88.160(1) relative to the format of the budget document or report
which was presented to the previous regular session of the legislature
during an odd-numbered year without prior legislative concurrence.
Prior legislative concurrence shall consist of (a) a favorable majority
vote on the proposal by the standing committees on ways and means of
both houses if the legislature is in session or (b) a favorable
majority vote on the proposal by members of the legislative evaluation
and accountability program committee if the legislature is not in
session.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 44 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The transportation commission may review the performance and
outcome measures of transportation-related agencies. The purpose of
these reviews is to ensure that the legislature has the means to
adequately and accurately assess the performance and outcomes of those
agencies and departments. Where two or more agencies have shared
responsibility for functions or priorities of government, these reviews
can also determine whether effective interagency cooperation and
collaboration occurs in areas such as program coordination,
administrative structures, information systems, and administration of
grants and loans.
(2) The performance and outcome measures and benchmarks of each
transportation-related agency or department may be reviewed at the
discretion of the transportation commission. In setting the schedule
and the extent of performance reviews, the commission shall consider
the timing and results of other recent state, federal, and independent
reviews and audits, the seriousness of past findings, any inadequate
remedial action taken by an agency or department, whether an agency or
department lacks performance and outcome measures, and the desirability
to include a diverse range of agencies or programs each year.
(3) The reviews may include, but are not limited to:
(a) A determination of whether the performance and outcome measures
are consistent with legislative mandates, strategic plans, mission
statements, and goals and objectives, and whether the legislature has
established clear mandates, strategic plans, mission statements, and
goals and objectives that lend themselves to performance and outcome
measurement;
(b) An examination of how agency management uses the measures to
manage resources in an efficient and effective manner;
(c) An assessment of how performance benchmarks are established for
the purpose of assessing overall performance compared to external
standards and benchmarks;
(d) An examination of how an analysis of the measurement data is
used to make planning and operational improvements;
(e) A determination of how performance and outcome measures are
used in the budget planning, development, and allotment processes and
the extent to which the agency is in compliance with its
responsibilities under RCW 43.88.090;
(f) A review of how performance data are reported to and used by
the legislature both in policy development and resource allocation;
(g) An assessment of whether the performance measure data are
reliable and collected in a uniform and timely manner;
(h) A determination whether targeted funding investments and
established priorities of government actually produce the intended and
expected services and benefits; and
(i) Recommendations as necessary or appropriate.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "transportation-related
agencies" means any state or local agency, board, special purpose
district, or commission that receives or generates funding primarily
for transportation-related purposes. At a minimum, the department of
transportation, the Washington state patrol, the department of
licensing, the transportation improvement board or its successor
entity, the county road administration board or its successor entity,
and the traffic safety commission are considered transportation-related
agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 45 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 44.75.010 (Intent) and 2003 c 362 s 1;
(2) RCW 44.75.020 (Definitions) and 2005 c 319 s 16 & 2003 c 362 s
2;
(3) RCW 44.75.030 (Board created -- Membership) and 2005 c 319 s 17
& 2003 c 362 s 3;
(4) RCW 44.75.040 (Procedures, compensation, support) and 2005 c
319 s 18 & 2003 c 362 s 4;
(5) RCW 44.75.050 (Reviews of transportation-related agencies) and
2005 c 319 s 19 & 2003 c 362 s 5;
(6) RCW 44.75.060 (Review methodology) and 2003 c 362 s 6;
(7) RCW 44.75.070 (Scope of reviews) and 2003 c 362 s 7;
(8) RCW 44.75.080 (Direction of audit) and 2005 c 319 s 20 & 2003
c 362 s 8;
(9) RCW 44.75.090 (Professional experts) and 2005 c 319 s 21 & 2003
c 362 s 9;
(10) RCW 44.75.100 (Audit reports) and 2005 c 319 s 22 & 2003 c 362
s 10;
(11) RCW 44.75.110 (Scope of audit) and 2005 c 319 s 23 & 2003 c
362 s 11;
(12) RCW 44.75.120 (Contents of report) and 2005 c 319 s 24 & 2003
c 362 s 12;
(13) RCW 44.75.800 (Department of transportation audit) and 2003 c
362 s 15;
(14) RCW 44.75.900 (Captions -- 2003 c 362) and 2003 c 362 s 18; and
(15) RCW 44.75.901 (Effective date -- 2003 c 362) and 2003 c 362 s
19.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 46 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---