BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.100 and 1991 c 199 s 704 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governing body of each authority shall be known as the
board of directors.
(2)(a) In the case of an authority comprised of one county, with a
population of less than four hundred thousand people, the board shall
be comprised of two appointees of the city selection committee, at
least one of whom shall represent the city having the most population
in the county, and two representatives to be designated by the board of
county commissioners.
(b) In the case of an authority comprised of one county, with a
population of equal to or greater than four hundred thousand people,
the board shall be comprised of three appointees of cities, one each
from the two cities with the most population in the county and one
appointee of the city selection committee representing the other
cities, and one representative to be designated by the board of county
commissioners.
(c) In the case of an authority comprised of two, three, four, or
five counties, the board shall be comprised of one appointee from each
county, who shall represent the city having the most population in such
county, to be designated by the mayor and city council of such city,
and one representative from each county to be designated by the board
of county commissioners of each county making up the authority.
(d) In the case of an authority comprised of six or more counties,
the board shall be comprised of one representative from each county to
be designated by the board of county commissioners of each county
making up the authority, and three appointees, one each from the three
largest cities within the local authority's jurisdiction to be
appointed by the mayor and city council of such city.
(3) If the board of an authority otherwise would consist of an even
number, the members selected as above provided shall agree upon and
elect an additional member who shall be:
(a) In the case of an authority comprised of one county with a
population of equal to or greater than four hundred thousand people, a
citizen residing in the county who demonstrates significant
professional experience in the field of public health, air quality
protection, or meteorology; or
(b) In the case of an authority comprised of one county, with a
population less than four hundred thousand people, or of more than one
county, either a member of the governing body of one of the towns,
cities or counties comprising the authority, or a private citizen
residing in the authority.
(4) The terms of office of board members shall be four years.
(5) Wherever a member of a board has a potential conflict of
interest in an action before the board, the member shall declare to the
board the nature of the potential conflict prior to participating in
the action review. The board shall, if the potential conflict of
interest, in the judgment of a majority of the board, may prevent the
member from a fair and objective review of the case, remove the member
from participation in the action.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.94.110 and 1967 c 238 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a separate and distinct city selection committee for
each county making up an authority. The membership of such committee
shall consist of the mayor of each incorporated city and town within
such county, except that the mayors of the cities, with the most
population in a county, having already designated appointees to the
board of an air pollution control authority comprised of a single
county shall not be members of the committee. A majority of the
members of each city selection committee shall constitute a quorum.

--- END ---