BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.155 and 1998 c 191 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When purchasing any hunting license, persons under the age of
eighteen shall present certification of completion of a course of
instruction of at least ten hours in the safe handling of firearms,
safety, conservation, and sportsmanship. Beginning January 1, 1995,
all persons purchasing any hunting license for the first time, if born
after January 1, 1972, shall present such certification.
(2)(a) The director may establish a program for training persons in
the safe handling of firearms, conservation, and sportsmanship and may
cooperate with the National Rifle Association, organized sportsmen's
groups, or other public or private organizations.
(b) The director shall prescribe the type of instruction and the
qualifications of the instructors.
(c) Upon successful completion of the course, a trainee shall
receive a hunter education certificate signed by an authorized
instructor. The certificate is evidence of compliance with this
section.
(d) The director may accept certificates from other states that
persons have successfully completed firearm safety, hunter education,
or similar courses as evidence of compliance with this section.
(3)(a) In addition to any program in existence on the effective
date of this section, the director shall, by December 1, 2006,
establish a program for the training of persons in the safe handling of
firearms, conservation, and sportsmanship. Upon successful completion
of a course of instruction under this program, a trainee must receive
a hunter education certificate signed by an authorized instructor. The
certificate is evidence of compliance with this section.
(b) In establishing the program under (a) of this subsection, the
director must prescribe procedures for the certification of
instructors, approval of instruction methods, and approval of course
materials.
(c) Instructors certified under the program established under (a)
of this subsection may profit from the teaching of hunter education
courses. Fees charged under the program may not exceed fifty dollars
per person, per course.
(d) The department must operate the program established under (a)
of this subsection without the use of federal funds.
(e) By December 1, 2006, the director shall provide a report to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives detailing the substance and status of the program
established under (a) of this subsection.

--- END ---