BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.155 and 1998 c 191 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When purchasing any hunting license, persons under the age of
eighteen shall present certification of completion of a course of
instruction of at least ten hours in the safe handling of firearms,
safety, conservation, and sportsmanship. ((Beginning January 1,
1995,)) All persons purchasing any hunting license for the first time,
if born after January 1, 1972, shall present such certification.
(2)(a) The director may establish a program for training persons in
the safe handling of firearms, conservation, and sportsmanship and
shall prescribe the type of instruction and the qualifications of the
instructors. The director may cooperate with the National Rifle
Association, organized sportsmen's groups, or other public or private
organizations when establishing the training program.
((The director shall prescribe the type of instruction and the
qualifications of the instructors.)) (b) To encourage the participation
of an adequate number of instructors for the training program, all
volunteer instructors who taught at least two full classes in the
previous year, with at least one class being held between August 15th
and November 30th, shall be given the opportunity to purchase one
multiple season big game permit under RCW 77.32.450, with the following
conditions:
(i) Up to fifty percent of the multiple season big game permits to
be offered each year must be reserved for sale to volunteer hunter
education instructors who met the requirements of (b) of this
subsection in the previous year;
(ii) If the number of instructor applicants meeting the
requirements of (b) of this subsection exceeds fifty percent of the
multiple season big game permits to be offered in a given year, then
the permits reserved for instructor applicants must be allocated for
purchase to the qualified instructors on a lottery basis.
(3) Upon the successful completion of ((the)) a course established
under this section, ((a)) the trainee shall receive a hunter education
certificate signed by an authorized instructor. The certificate is
evidence of compliance with this section.
(4) The director may accept certificates from other states that
persons have successfully completed firearm safety, hunter education,
or similar courses as evidence of compliance with this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.32.450 and 2005 c 140 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A big game hunting license is required to hunt for big game.
A big game license allows the holder to hunt for forest grouse,
unclassified wildlife, and the individual species identified within a
specific big game combination license package. Each big game license
includes one transport tag for each species purchased in that package.
A hunter may not purchase more than one license for each big game
species except as authorized by rule of the commission. The fees for
annual big game combination packages are as follows:
(a) Big game number 1: Deer, elk, bear, and cougar. The fee for
this license is sixty-six dollars for residents, six hundred sixty
dollars for nonresidents, and thirty-three dollars for youth.
(b) Big game number 2: Deer and elk. The fee for this license is
fifty-six dollars for residents, five hundred sixty dollars for
nonresidents, and twenty-eight dollars for youth.
(c) Big game number 3: Deer or elk, bear, and cougar. At the time
of purchase, the holder must identify either deer or elk. The fee for
this license is forty-six dollars for residents, four hundred sixty
dollars for nonresidents, and twenty-three dollars for youth.
(d) Big game number 4: Deer or elk. At the time of purchase, the
holder must identify either deer or elk. The fee for this license is
thirty-six dollars for residents, three hundred sixty dollars for
nonresidents, and eighteen dollars for youth.
(e) Big game number 5: Bear and cougar. The fee for this license
is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred dollars for nonresidents,
and ten dollars for youth.
(2) In the event that the commission authorizes a two animal big
game limit, the fees for the second animal are as follows:
(a) Elk: The fee is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.
(b) Deer: The fee is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.
(c) Bear: The fee is ten dollars for residents, one hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.
(d) Cougar: The fee is ten dollars for residents, one hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.
(3) In the event that the commission authorizes a special permit
hunt for goat, sheep, or moose, the permit fees are as follows:
(a) Mountain goat: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents,
one thousand dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.
(b) Sheep: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents, one
thousand dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.
(c) Moose: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents, one
thousand dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.
(4) Multiple season big game permit: The commission may, by rule,
offer permits for hunters to hunt deer or elk during more than one
general season. However, the opportunity to purchase one multiple
season big game permit per year must be made available to qualified
volunteer hunter education instructors in accordance with RCW
77.32.155(2)(b). Only one deer or elk may be harvested annually under
a multiple season big game permit. The fee is one hundred fifty
dollars for residents and one thousand five hundred dollars for
nonresidents.
(5) Authorization to hunt the species set out under subsection
(3)(a) through (c) of this section or in multiple seasons as set out in
subsection (4) of this section is by special permit issued under RCW
77.32.370.
(6) The commission may adopt rules to reduce the price of a license
or eliminate the transportation tag requirements concerning bear or
cougar when necessary to meet harvest objectives.

--- END ---