BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.645.010 and 1990 c 33 s 544 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person, or persons, either severally or collectively, aggrieved
by any decision or order of any school official or board, within
((thirty days)) one year after the rendition of such decision or order,
or of the failure to act upon the same when properly presented, may
appeal the same to the superior court of the county in which the school
district or part thereof is situated, by filing with the secretary of
the school board if the appeal is from board action or failure to act,
otherwise with the proper school official, and filing with the clerk of
the superior court, a notice of appeal which shall set forth in a clear
and concise manner the errors complained of. The school district shall
provide the aggrieved person with a description of the appeal process
immediately following the decision.
Appeals by teachers, principals, supervisors, superintendents, or
other certificated employees from the actions of school boards with
respect to discharge or other action adversely affecting their contract
status, or failure to renew their contracts for the next ensuing term
shall be governed by the appeal provisions of chapters 28A.400 and
28A.405 RCW therefor and in all other cases shall be governed by
chapter 28A.645 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.405.320 and 1990 c 33 s 397 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any teacher, principal, supervisor, superintendent, or other
certificated employee, desiring to appeal from any action or failure to
act upon the part of a school board relating to the discharge or other
action adversely affecting his or her contract status, or failure to
renew that employee's contract for the next ensuing term, within
((thirty days)) one year after his or her receipt of such decision or
order, may serve upon the chair of the school board and file with the
clerk of the superior court in the county in which the school district
is located a notice of appeal which shall set forth also in a clear and
concise manner the errors complained of.

--- END ---