BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to study
the advisability of providing to all recipients of protection orders,
who are victims of domestic violence, wallet-size cards that would
provide to law enforcement all information necessary to enforce the
protection order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The domestic violence hope card study
committee is established to review the advisability of providing
wallet-size cards bearing information regarding protection orders to
victims of domestic violence within Washington state. The committee
shall collaborate with the Washington state gender and justice
commission and shall be composed of:
(a) Two senators, one from each caucus in the senate;
(b) Two representatives, one from each caucus in the house of
representatives;
(c) One representative of the Washington state attorney general's
office;
(d) One police chief appointed by the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs;
(e) One elected sheriff appointed by the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs;
(f) One representative of the Washington state patrol;
(g) One representative of the administrative office of the courts;
(h) One representative of a tribal government appointed by the
governor;
(i) One representative of the Washington association of criminal
defense lawyers;
(j) One representative of a statewide domestic violence advocacy
group appointed by the governor;
(k) One representative who is an advocate for domestic violence
victims on tribal lands appointed by the governor;
(l) One representative of the office of crime victims advocacy;
(m) One representative of the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys; and
(n) One representative of the Washington state association of
county clerks.
(2) The committee shall review and analyze hope card programs
operating in Washington state and other states. Specifically, the
committee shall review:
(a) The practicality of requiring the statewide distribution of
wallet-size cards to victims of domestic violence that document the
existence of a protection order and provide identifying information
regarding the respondent, including a photograph, and contents of a
protection order in addition to contact information for the victim to
utilize the court system, gain access to domestic violence services,
and contact law enforcement;
(b) The information required to be provided to victims of domestic
violence under current law;
(c) Whether victims of domestic violence are receiving this
information;
(d) Whether any additional information should be included on the
cards provided to domestic violence victims;
(e) Costs, administrative, and capital equipment issues involved
with the implementation of such a program;
(f) How such a program could be implemented statewide;
(g) Confidentiality, privacy, and safety concerns that may arise in
the implementation of such a program; and
(h) Any other issues the committee finds relevant to the
distribution of hope cards to victims of domestic violence.
(3) Staff support shall be provided by the office of crime victims
advocacy, senate committee services, and the office of program
research.
(4) Legislative members of the study committee shall be reimbursed
for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) A committee report, containing findings and proposed
legislation, if any, shall be delivered to the full legislature not
later than December 31, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires June 30, 2007.

--- END ---