BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the United States
supreme court ruled in Kelo v. City of New London that a city could use
its power of eminent domain to condemn and transfer the unblighted
property of one private owner to another private owner for the purpose
of increasing tax revenues.
The legislature also finds that while Washington's constitution
specifically forbids such transfers and states that "Private property
shall not be taken for private use," unblighted private properties in
Washington are subject to condemnation and transfer to other private
uses under community renewal statutes that allow "public use"
condemnation of unblighted properties located within blighted areas, as
determined by local government designations which can be based on a
combination of vague statutory factors including a lack of open spaces,
excessive land coverage, inappropriate uses of land or buildings,
diversity of ownership, high levels of unemployment or poverty, or
inadequate street or lot layout.
The legislature therefore declares its intent that the following
statement of former Washington State Supreme Court Justice Hugh
Rosellini be adopted as formal state policy: "One man's land should
not be seized by the government and sold to another man so that the
purchaser may build a better house, or enhance the beauty or aesthetic
value according to the ideas of an artist or planner whose tastes have
the sanction of the government."
The legislature further declares its intent to adequately respect
and safeguard the lives, liberties, and property rights of Washington
citizens by clearly prohibiting Washington governments from condemning
and transferring unblighted private property to another private use.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.81.005 and 2002 c 218 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is hereby found and declared that blighted areas which
constitute a serious and growing menace, injurious to the public
health, safety, morals and welfare of the residents of the state exist
in municipalities of the state; that the existence of such areas
contributes substantially and increasingly to the spread of disease and
crime and depreciation of property values, constitutes an economic and
social liability, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of
municipalities, retards the provision of housing accommodations,
hinders job creation and economic growth, aggravates traffic problems
and substantially impairs or arrests the elimination of traffic hazards
and the improvement of traffic facilities; and that the prevention and
elimination of such areas is a matter of state policy and state concern
in order that the state and its municipalities shall not continue to be
endangered by areas which are focal centers of disease, promote
juvenile delinquency, are conducive to fires, are difficult to police
and to provide police protection for, and, while contributing little to
the tax income of the state and its municipalities, consume an
excessive proportion of its revenues because of the extra services
required for police, fire, accident, hospitalization and other forms of
public protection, services, and facilities.
It is further found and declared that certain of such areas, or
portions thereof, may require acquisition, clearance, and disposition
subject to use restrictions, as provided in this chapter, since the
prevailing condition of decay may make impracticable the reclamation of
the area by rehabilitation; that other areas or portions thereof may,
through the means provided in this chapter, be susceptible of
rehabilitation in such a manner that the conditions and evils
hereinbefore enumerated may be eliminated, remedied or prevented; and
that to the extent feasible salvable blighted areas should be
rehabilitated through voluntary action and the regulatory process.
It is further found and declared that there is an urgent need to
enhance the ability of municipalities to act effectively and
expeditiously to revive blighted areas and to prevent further blight
due to shocks to the economy of the state and their actual and
threatened effects on unemployment, poverty, and the availability of
private capital for businesses and projects in the area.
It is further found and declared that the powers conferred by this
chapter are for public uses and purposes for which public money may be
expended and the power of eminent domain exercised; and that the
necessity in the public interest for the provisions herein enacted is
hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination.
It is further found and declared, however, that the condemnation of
an unblighted private property located within an area designated by the
local governing body as a blighted area shall not be declared a public
use for purposes of blight removal, and that private property shall not
be condemned and transferred to another private use unless the present
condition and use of that private property displays unremedied blight
conditions that endanger public health and safety, endanger life or
property by fire or other causes, or otherwise contribute substantially
to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile
delinquency, or crime.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.81.080 and 2002 c 218 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
A municipality shall have the right to acquire by condemnation, in
accordance with the procedure provided for condemnation by such
municipality for other purposes, any interest in real property, which
it may deem necessary for a community renewal project under this
chapter after the adoption by the local governing body of a resolution
declaring that the acquisition of the real property described therein
is necessary for such purpose. Condemnation for community renewal of
blighted areas is declared to be a public use((, and)). However, the
condemnation of an unblighted private property located within an area
designated by the local governing body as a blighted area shall not be
declared a public use for purposes of blight removal, and private
property shall not be condemned and transferred to another private use
unless the present condition and use of that private property displays
unremedied blight conditions that endanger public health and safety,
endanger life or property by fire or other causes, or otherwise
contribute substantially to ill health, transmission of disease, infant
mortality, juvenile delinquency, or crime. Property already devoted to
any other public use or acquired by the owner or a predecessor in
interest by eminent domain may be condemned for the purposes of this
chapter.
The award of compensation for blighted real property taken for such
a project shall not be increased by reason of any increase in the value
of the real property caused by the assembly, clearance, or
reconstruction, or proposed assembly, clearance, or reconstruction in
the project area. No allowance shall be made for the improvements
begun on real property after notice to the owner of such property of
the institution of proceedings to condemn such property. Evidence
shall be admissible bearing upon the insanitary, unsafe, or substandard
condition of the premises, or the unlawful use thereof.

Sec. 4 RCW 35.81.090 and 2002 c 218 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A municipality, with approval of its legislative authority, may
acquire real property, or any interest therein, for the purposes of a
community renewal project (a) prior to the selection of one or more
persons interested in undertaking to redevelop or rehabilitate the real
property, or (b) after the selection of one or more persons interested
in undertaking to redevelop or rehabilitate such real property. In
either case the municipality may select a redeveloper through a
competitive bidding process consistent with this section or through a
process consistent with RCW 35.81.095.
(2) However, the condemnation of an unblighted private property
located within an area designated by the local governing body as a
blighted area shall not be declared a public use for purposes of blight
removal, and private property shall not be condemned and transferred to
another private use unless the present condition and use of that
private property displays unremedied blight conditions that endanger
public health and safety, endanger life or property by fire or other
causes, or otherwise contribute substantially to ill health,
transmission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency, or
crime.
(3) Subject to the limitations contained in subsection (2) of this
section, a municipality, with approval of its legislative authority,
may sell, lease, or otherwise transfer real property or any interest
therein acquired by it for a community renewal project, in a community
renewal area for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial, or
other uses or for public use, and may enter into contracts with respect
thereto, or may retain such a property or interest only for parks and
recreation, education, public utilities, public transportation, public
safety, health, highways, streets, and alleys, administrative
buildings, or civic centers, in accordance with the community renewal
project plan, subject to such covenants, conditions, and restrictions,
including covenants running with the land, as it may deem to be
necessary or desirable to assist in preventing the development or
spread of blighted areas or otherwise to carry out the purposes of this
chapter. However, such a sale, lease, other transfer, or retention,
and any agreement relating thereto, may be made only after the approval
of the community renewal plan by the local governing body. The
purchasers or lessees and their successors and assigns shall be
obligated to devote the real property only to the uses specified in the
community renewal plan, and may be obligated to comply with any other
requirements as the municipality may determine to be in the public
interest, including the obligation to begin and complete, within a
reasonable time, any improvements on the real property required by the
community renewal plan or promised by the transferee. The real
property or interest shall be sold, leased, or otherwise transferred
for the consideration the municipality determines adequate. In
determining the adequacy of consideration, a municipality may take into
account the uses permitted under the community renewal plan; the
restrictions upon, and the covenants, conditions, and obligations
assumed by, the transferee; and the public benefits to be realized,
including furthering of the objectives of the plan for the prevention
of the recurrence of blighted areas.
(((3))) (4) The municipality in any instrument of conveyance to a
private purchaser or lessee may provide that the purchaser or lessee
shall be without power to sell, lease, or otherwise transfer the real
property, or to permit changes in ownership or control of a purchaser
or lessee that is not a natural person, in each case without the prior
written consent of the municipality until the purchaser or lessee has
completed the construction of all improvements that it has obligated
itself to construct thereon. The municipality may also retain the
right, upon any earlier transfer or change in ownership or control
without consent; or any failure or change in ownership or control
without consent; or any failure to complete the improvements within the
time agreed to terminate the transferee's interest in the property; or
to retain or collect on any deposit or instrument provided as security,
or both. The enforcement of these restrictions and remedies is
declared to be consistent with the public policy of this state. Real
property acquired by a municipality that, in accordance with the
provisions of the community renewal plan, is to be transferred, shall
be transferred as rapidly as feasible, in the public interest,
consistent with the carrying out of the provisions of the community
renewal plan. The inclusion in any contract or conveyance to a
purchaser or lessee of any covenants, restrictions, or conditions
(including the incorporation by reference therein of the provisions of
a community renewal plan or any part thereof) shall not prevent the
recording of such a contract or conveyance in the land records of the
auditor or the county in which the city or town is located, in a manner
that affords actual or constructive notice thereof.
(((4))) (5)(a)(i) A municipality may dispose of real property in a
community renewal area, acquired by the municipality under this
chapter, to any private persons only under those reasonable competitive
bidding procedures as it shall prescribe, or by competitive bidding as
provided in this subsection, through direct negotiation where
authorized under (c) of this subsection, or by a process authorized in
RCW 35.81.095.
(ii) A competitive bidding process may occur (A) prior to the
purchase of the real property by the municipality, or (B) after the
purchase of the real property by the municipality.
(b)(i) A municipality may, by public notice by publication once
each week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper having a general
circulation in the community, prior to the execution of any contract or
deed to sell, lease, or otherwise transfer real property and prior to
the delivery of any instrument of conveyance with respect thereto under
the provisions of this section, invite bids from, and make available
all pertinent information to, private redevelopers or any persons
interested in undertaking to redevelop or rehabilitate a community
renewal area, or any part thereof. This notice shall identify the
area, or portion thereof, and shall state that further information as
is available may be obtained at the office as shall be designated in
the notice.
(ii) The municipality shall consider all responsive redevelopment
or rehabilitation bids and the financial and legal ability of the
persons making the bids to carry them out. The municipality may accept
the bids as it deems to be in the public interest and in furtherance of
the purposes of this chapter. Thereafter, the municipality may
execute, in accordance with the provisions of subsection (((2))) (3) of
this section, and deliver contracts, deeds, leases, and other
instruments of transfer.
(c) If the legislative authority of the municipality determines
that the sale of real property to a specific person is necessary to the
success of a neighborhood revitalization or community renewal project
for which the municipality is providing assistance to a nonprofit
organization from federal community development block grant funds under
42 U.S.C. Sec. 5305(a)(15), or successor provision, under a plan or
grant application approved by the United States department of housing
and urban development, or successor agency, then the municipality may
sell or lease that property to that person through direct negotiation,
for consideration determined by the municipality to be adequate
consistent with subsection (((2))) (3) of this section. This direct
negotiation may occur, and the municipality may enter into an agreement
for sale or lease, either before or after the acquisition of the
property by the municipality. Unless the municipality has provided
notice to the public of the intent to sell or lease the property by
direct negotiation, as part of a citizen participation process adopted
under federal regulations for the plan or grant application under which
the federal community development block grant funds have been awarded,
the municipality shall publish notice of the sale at least fifteen days
prior to the conveyance of the property.
(((5))) (6) A municipality may operate and maintain real property
acquired in a community renewal area for a period of three years
pending the disposition of the property for redevelopment, without
regard to the provisions of subsection (((2))) (3) of this section, for
such uses and purposes as may be deemed desirable even though not in
conformity with the community renewal plan. However, the municipality
may, after a public hearing, extend the time for a period not to exceed
three years.
(((6))) (7) Any covenants, restrictions, promises, undertakings,
releases, or waivers in favor of a municipality contained in any deed
or other instrument accepted by any transferee of property from the
municipality or community renewal agency under this chapter, or
contained in any document executed by any owner of property in a
community renewal area, shall run with the land to the extent provided
in the deed, instrument, or other document, so as to bind, and be
enforceable by the municipality against, the person accepting or making
the deed, instrument, or other document and that person's heirs,
successors in interest, or assigns having actual or constructive notice
thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---