BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When the department has summarily suspended a license, the
licensee may, subject to the department's approval, elect to
participate in a temporary management program. All provisions of this
section apply. The purposes of a temporary management program are:
(a) To mitigate dislocation and transfer trauma of residents while
the department and licensee pursue dispute resolution or appeal of a
summary suspension of license;
(b) To facilitate the continuity of safe and appropriate resident
care and services;
(c) To preserve a residential option that either meets a
specialized service need or is in a geographical area that has a lack
of available providers, or both; and
(d) To provide residents with the opportunity for orderly
discharge.
(2) Licensee participation in the temporary management program is
voluntary. The department has the discretion to approve any temporary
manager and the temporary management arrangements. The temporary
management shall assume the total responsibility for the daily
operations of the home.
(3) The temporary management shall contract with the licensee as an
independent contractor and is responsible for ensuring that all minimum
licensing requirements are met. The temporary management shall protect
the health, safety, and well-being of the residents for the duration of
the temporary management and shall perform all acts reasonably
necessary to ensure that residents' needs are met. The licensee is
responsible for all costs related to administering the temporary
management program and contracting with the temporary management. The
temporary management agreement must, at a minimum, address the
following:
(a) Provision of liability insurance to protect residents and their
property;
(b) Preservation of resident trust funds;
(c) The timely payment of past due or current accounts, operating
expenses, including but not limited to staff compensation, and all debt
that comes due during the period of the temporary management;
(d) The responsibilities for addressing all other financial
obligations that would interfere with the ability of the temporary
manager to provide adequate care and services to residents; and
(e) The authority of the temporary manager to manage the home,
including the hiring, managing, and firing of employees for good cause,
and to provide adequate care and services to residents.
(4) The licensee and department shall provide written notification
immediately to all residents, legal representatives, interested family
members, and the state long-term care ombudsman program of the
temporary management and the reasons for it. This notification must
include notice that residents may move from the home without notifying
the licensee in advance, and without incurring any charges, fees, or
costs otherwise available for insufficient advance notice, during the
temporary management period.
(5) The temporary management period under this section concludes
twenty-eight days after issuance of the formal notification of
enforcement action or conclusion of administrative proceedings,
whichever date is later. Nothing in this section precludes the
department from either revoking its approval of the temporary
management or exercising its licensing enforcement authority under this
chapter, or both. The department's decision whether to approve or to
revoke a temporary management arrangement is not subject to the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) The department is authorized to adopt rules to implement this
section.

--- END ---