BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 By creating the Washington promise
scholarship program, the legislature intended to strengthen the link
between postsecondary education and K-12 education for academically
successful high school graduates from low and middle-income families.
Providing adequate funding for this program signifies the legislature's
support for students who work hard and perform well in school but who
may not have the financial ability to attend college because they
cannot obtain financial aid or because financial aid is insufficient.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of six million fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the
higher education coordinating board for the purposes of the Washington
promise scholarship.

--- END ---