BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the welfare of
the people of the state of Washington is positively impacted through
the encouragement and expansion of family wage employment in the
state's manufacturing industries. The legislature further finds that
targeting tax incentives to focus on key industry clusters is an
important business climate strategy. Washington state has recognized
the semiconductor industry, which includes the design and manufacture
of semiconductor materials, as one of the state's existing key industry
clusters. Businesses in this cluster in the state of Washington are
facing increasing pressure to expand elsewhere. The sales and use tax
exemptions for manufacturing machinery and equipment enacted by the
1995 legislature improved Washington's ability to compete with other
states for manufacturing investment. In 2003 the legislature enacted
comprehensive tax incentives for the semiconductor cluster that address
activities of the lead product industry and its suppliers and
customers. These tax incentives are contingent on the investment of at
least one billion dollars in a new semiconductor microchip fabrication
facility in this state, which has not occurred. This investment
criteria failed to recognize the significance of potential investment
in the advanced semiconductor materials sector. Therefore, the
legislature intends to complement existing comprehensive tax incentives
for the semiconductor cluster to address activities of the advanced
semiconductor materials product industry and its suppliers and
customers. Tax incentives for the semiconductor cluster are important
in both retention and expansion of existing businesses and attraction
of new businesses, all of which will strengthen this cluster. The
legislature also recognizes that the semiconductor industry involves
major investment that results in significant construction projects,
which will create jobs and bring many indirect benefits to the state
during the construction phase.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing or processing for hire advanced semiconductor materials,
as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business
shall, in the case of manufacturers, be equal to the value of the
product manufactured, or, in the case of processors for hire, be equal
to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section "advanced semiconductor
materials" means silicon crystals, silicon ingots that are at least
three hundred millimeters in diameter, raw polished semiconductor
wafers that are at least three hundred millimeters in diameter, and
compound semiconductor wafers that are at least three hundred
millimeters in diameter.
(3) This section expires twelve years after the effective date of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire in the
production of advanced semiconductor materials. This exemption is
limited to gases and chemicals used in the production process to grow
the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the
product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the
product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such
uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the
product during the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals
to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such processing
takes place. For the purposes of this section, "advanced semiconductor
materials" has the meaning provided in section 2 of this act.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must report
under section 5 of this act. No application is necessary for the tax
exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of chapter
82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires twelve years after the effective date of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire
in the production of advanced semiconductor materials. This exemption
is limited to gases and chemicals used in the production process to
grow the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on
the product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the
product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such
uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the
product during the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals
to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such processing
takes place. For purposes of this section, "advanced semiconductor
materials" has the meaning provided in section 2 of this act.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must report
under section 5 of this act. No application is necessary for the tax
exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of chapter
82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires twelve years after the effective date of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person who reports taxes under section 2 of this act or
who claims an exemption or credit under sections 3 and 4 of this act
shall make a complete annual report to the department detailing
employment, wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits
per job at the manufacturing site. The report shall not include names
of employees. The report shall also detail employment by the total
number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions. The first
report filed under this subsection shall include employment, wage, and
benefit information for the twelve-month period immediately before
first use of a preferential tax rate under section 2 of this act, or
tax exemption or credit under sections 3 and 4 of this act. The report
is due by April 30th following any year in which a preferential tax
rate under section 2 of this act is used, or tax exemption or credit
under sections 3 and 4 of this act is taken. The department may extend
the due date for timely filing annual reports under this section as
provided in RCW 82.32.590. This information is not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(b) If a person fails to submit a complete annual report under (a)
of this subsection by the due date of the report or any extension under
RCW 82.32.590, the department shall declare the amount of taxes
exempted or credited, or reduced in the case of the preferential
business and occupation tax rate, for that year to be immediately due
and payable. Excise taxes payable under this subsection are subject to
interest but not penalties, as provided under this chapter. This
information is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(3) By November 1st of the year occurring five years after the
effective date of this section, and November 1st of the year occurring
eleven years after the effective date of this section, the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate, in
consultation with the department, shall report to the legislature on
the effectiveness of this act in regard to keeping Washington
competitive. The report shall measure the effect of this act on job
retention, net jobs created for Washington residents, company growth,
diversification of the state's economy, cluster dynamics, and other
factors as the committees select. The reports shall include a
discussion of principles to apply in evaluating whether the legislature
should reenact any or all of the tax preferences in this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.04.440 and 2005 c 301 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in activities ((which are within the
purview of the provisions of two or more of sections)) that are subject
to tax under two or more provisions of RCW 82.04.230 ((to)) through
82.04.298, inclusive, shall be taxable under each ((paragraph))
provision applicable to ((the)) those activities ((engaged in)).
(2) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.2909(2), 82.04.250, 82.04.270,
82.04.294(2), or 82.04.260 (1)(c), (4), or (((13))) (11) with respect
to selling products in this state shall be allowed a credit against
those taxes for any (a) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the
manufacturing of products so sold in this state, and/or (b) extracting
taxes paid with respect to the extracting of products so sold in this
state or ingredients of products so sold in this state. Extracting
taxes taken as credit under subsection (3) of this section may also be
taken under this subsection, if otherwise allowable under this
subsection. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the sale of those
products.
(3) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.240 or 82.04.260(1)(b) shall be
allowed a credit against those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with
respect to extracting the ingredients of the products so manufactured
in this state. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the manufacturing
of those products.
(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1),
82.04.294(1), section 2 of this act, or 82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), (((6),
or (13))) or (11) with respect to extracting or manufacturing products
in this state shall be allowed a credit against those taxes for any (i)
gross receipts taxes paid to another state with respect to the sales of
the products so extracted or manufactured in this state, (ii)
manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the manufacturing of products
using ingredients so extracted in this state, or (iii) manufacturing
taxes paid with respect to manufacturing activities completed in
another state for products so manufactured in this state. The amount
of the credit shall not exceed the tax liability arising under this
chapter with respect to the extraction or manufacturing of those
products.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of
business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the
tax an income tax or value added tax; and
(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately
stated from the sales price.
(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the
United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of
such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign
country or political subdivision thereof.
(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and
includes (i) the taxes imposed in RCW 82.04.240, section 2 of this act,
82.04.2909(1), 82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), and (((13))) (11), and
82.04.294(1); and (ii) similar gross receipts taxes paid to other
states.
(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act
or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes the
tax imposed in RCW 82.04.230 and similar gross receipts taxes paid to
other states.
(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used
in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through
82.04.212, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of
describing taxes imposed by other states.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.32.590 and 2005 c 514 s 1001 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey or annual report under RCW 82.04.4452 or section 5 of
this act by the due date was the result of circumstances beyond the
control of the taxpayer, the department shall extend the time for
filing the survey or report. Such extension shall be for a period of
thirty days from the date the department issues its written
notification to the taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under
this section. The department may grant additional extensions as it
deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey or annual report by the due date was the result
of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department
shall be guided by rules adopted by the department for the waiver or
cancellation of penalties when the underpayment or untimely payment of
any tax was due to circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.32.600 and 2005 c 514 s 1002 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Persons required to file annual surveys or annual reports under
RCW 82.04.4452 or section 5 of this act must electronically file with
the department all surveys, reports, returns, and any other forms or
information the department requires in an electronic format as provided
or approved by the department((, unless the department grants relief
under subsection (2) of this section)). As used in this section,
"returns" has the same meaning as "return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(2) ((Upon request, the department may relieve a person of the
obligations in subsection (1) of this section if the person's taxes
have been reduced a cumulative total of less than one thousand dollars
from all of the credits, exemptions, or preferential business and
occupation tax rates, for which a person is required to file an annual
survey under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.535, 82.32.545, 82.32.570,
82.32.560, 82.60.070, or 82.63.020.
(3) Persons who no longer qualify for relief under subsection (2)
of this section will be notified in writing by the department and must
comply with subsection (1) of this section by the date provided in the
notice.
(4))) Any survey, report, return, or any other form or information
required to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of
this section is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format.
(3) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
subsection (1) of this section for good cause shown.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1)(a) This act is contingent upon the
siting, expansion, or renovation, and commercial operation of a
significant advanced semiconductor materials fabrication facility or
facilities in the state of Washington.
(b) For the purposes of this section:
(i) "Commercial operation" means the equipment and process
qualifications in the new or expanded building are completed and
production for sale has begun.
(ii) "Advanced semiconductor materials fabrication" means the
manufacturing of "advanced semiconductor materials" as that term is
defined in section 2 of this act.
(iii) "Significant" means that the combined investment or
investments by a single person, occurring at any time before the
effective date of this act, of new buildings, expansion or renovation
of existing buildings, tenant improvements to buildings, and machinery
and equipment in the buildings, at the commencement of commercial
production, is at least three hundred fifty million dollars based on
actual expenditures by the person.
(2) This act takes effect the first day of the month immediately
following the department's determination that the contingency in
subsection (1) of this section has occurred. The department shall make
its determination regarding the contingency in subsection (1) of this
section based on information provided to the department by affected
taxpayers or representatives of affected taxpayers.
(3) The department of revenue shall provide notice of the effective
date of this act to affected taxpayers, the legislature, the office of
the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the department.

--- END ---