BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.030 and 2004 c 3 s 6 are each amended to read as
follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Public employer" means any officer, board, commission,
council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any public body
governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public body. For
the purposes of this section, the public employer of district court or
superior court employees for wage-related matters is the respective
county legislative authority, or person or body acting on behalf of the
legislative authority, and the public employer for nonwage-related
matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective district
court or superior court.
(2) "Public employee" means any employee of a public employer
except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to
office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy, administrative
assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential relationship to
(i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining unit, or
(ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed
to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner or a court
magistrate of superior court, district court, or a department of a
district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who is a
personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or
court commissioner, or (f) excluded from a bargaining unit under RCW
41.56.201(2)(a). For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more
than one assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from
a bargaining unit.
(3) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which
has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in
their employment relations with employers.
(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in
good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters,
including wages, hours and working conditions, which may be peculiar to
an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that by
such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal
or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.
(7) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as
defined in RCW 41.26.030 employed by the governing body of any city or
town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more and law
enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any county with
a population of ten thousand or more; (b) correctional employees who
are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and noncommissioned
security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020(5),
by a county with a population of seventy thousand or more, and who are
trained for and charged with the responsibility of controlling and
maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and safeguarding inmates
from other inmates; (c) juvenile corrections employees responsible for
supervising juvenile detainees in jurisdictions where the county jail
administers juvenile detention; (d) general authority Washington peace
officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a port district in a
county with a population of one million or more; (((d))) (e) security
forces established under RCW 43.52.520; (((e))) (f) fire fighters as
that term is defined in RCW 41.26.030; (((f))) (g) employees of a port
district in a county with a population of one million or more whose
duties include crash fire rescue or other fire fighting duties; (((g)))
(h) employees of fire departments of public employers who dispatch
exclusively either fire or emergency medical services, or both; or
(((h))) (i) employees in the several classes of advanced life support
technicians, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, who are employed by a public
employer.
(8) "Institution of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.
(9) "Home care quality authority" means the authority under chapter
74.39A RCW.
(10) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240(4) who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, is a public employee as provided in RCW 74.39A.270.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.56.465 and 1995 c 273 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In making its determination, the panel shall be mindful of the
legislative purpose enumerated in RCW 41.56.430 and, as additional
standards or guidelines to aid it in reaching a decision, it shall take
into consideration the following factors:
(a) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(b) Stipulations of the parties;
(c)(i) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(7) (a) through (((d)))
(e), comparison of the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
personnel involved in the proceedings with the wages, hours, and
conditions of employment of like personnel of like employers of similar
size on the west coast of the United States;
(ii) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(7) (((e))) (f) through
(((h))) (i), comparison of the wages, hours, and conditions of
employment of personnel involved in the proceedings with the wages,
hours, and conditions of employment of like personnel of public fire
departments of similar size on the west coast of the United States.
However, when an adequate number of comparable employers exists within
the state of Washington, other west coast employers may not be
considered;
(d) The average consumer prices for goods and services, commonly
known as the cost of living;
(e) Changes in any of the circumstances under (a) through (d) of
this subsection during the pendency of the proceedings; and
(f) Such other factors, not confined to the factors under (a)
through (e) of this subsection, that are normally or traditionally
taken into consideration in the determination of wages, hours, and
conditions of employment. For those employees listed in RCW
41.56.030(7)(a) who are employed by the governing body of a city or
town with a population of less than fifteen thousand, or a county with
a population of less than seventy thousand, consideration must also be
given to regional differences in the cost of living.
(2) Subsection (1)(c) of this section may not be construed to
authorize the panel to require the employer to pay, directly or
indirectly, the increased employee contributions resulting from chapter
502, Laws of 1993 or chapter 517, Laws of 1993 as required under
chapter 41.26 RCW.

--- END ---