BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Protecting the well-being, tranquility, and
privacy of the home is of the highest order in a free and civilized
society, and the efficient conduct of private businesses and government
operations are of significant government interest. The legislature
finds that automatic calling and announcing devices uniquely intrude
into these interests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) An "automatic dialing and announcing device" is a device which
automatically dials telephone numbers and plays a recorded message once
a connection is made.
(b) "Message" means any communication, regardless of its content,
that is not a commercial solicitation as defined in RCW 80.36.400.
(2) No person may use an automatic dialing and announcing device
before 9:00 a.m. or after 9:00 p.m. without written or electronic
consent from the recipient.
(3) This section does not apply to emergency messages from
government agencies.
(4) This section applies to all calls intended to be received by
telephone customers within the state.
(5) Any recipient may bring an action against a person who has
violated this section for the amount of one thousand dollars per
violation. This action is in addition to any other remedy relating to
a violation of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.36.400 and 1986 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) An "automatic dialing and announcing device" is a device which
automatically dials telephone numbers and plays a recorded message once
a connection is made.
(b) "Commercial solicitation" means the unsolicited initiation of
a telephone conversation for the purpose of encouraging a person to
purchase property, goods, or services.
(2) No person may use an automatic dialing and announcing device
for purposes of commercial solicitation. This section applies to all
commercial solicitation intended to be received by telephone customers
within the state.
(3) A violation of this section is a violation of chapter 19.86
RCW. It shall be presumed that damages to the recipient of commercial
solicitations made using an automatic dialing and announcing device are
((five hundred)) one thousand dollars per violation.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the
Washington utilities and transportation commission from adopting
additional rules regulating automatic dialing and announcing devices.

--- END ---