BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A majority of students in Washington do not
have the chance to study any language other than English until they are
in middle school, or more often, high school. Education systems of
other nations, some of them much less economically developed than the
United States, begin second language study in the early elementary
grades or even in preschool. Washington's economy is tied to world
trade. To enable Washington citizens to more effectively compete in
the world marketplace and develop a greater sense of the world's
culture and geography, our students, at all levels, must be provided
the opportunity to develop fluency in a second language.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The state board of education shall study
whether school districts should require all students in grades nine
through twelve to take a world language program that provides
instruction in Spanish and a Chinese language.
(2) The state board of education shall provide a report of the
study under this section and its recommendations to appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2006.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.410.025 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.67.010 are each
amended to read as follows:
No person shall be accounted as a qualified teacher within the
meaning of the school law who is not the holder of a valid teacher's
certificate or permit issued by lawful authority of this state, except
that a school district may use noncertificated staff to provide the
language instruction in the programs or classes taught as part of a
world language program. However, the noncertificated staff providing
the language instruction must: (1) Be able to speak and write the
language fluently; and (2) speak English.

--- END ---