BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.52.210 and 1994 c 81 s 82 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A cemetery district organized under this chapter shall have
power to acquire, establish, maintain, manage, improve and operate
cemeteries and conduct any and all of the businesses of a cemetery as
defined in this title. A cemetery district shall constitute a cemetery
authority as defined in this title and shall have and exercise all
powers conferred thereby upon a cemetery authority and be subject to
the provisions thereof.
(2) A cemetery district may include within its boundaries the lands
embraced within the corporate limits of any incorporated city or town
((with a population of less than ten thousand)) and in any such cases
the district may acquire any cemetery or cemeteries theretofore
maintained and operated by any such city or town and proceed to
maintain, manage, improve and operate the same under the provisions
hereof. In such event the governing body of the city or town, after
the transfer takes place, shall levy no cemetery tax. The power of
eminent domain heretofore conferred shall not extend to the
condemnation of existing cemeteries within the district: PROVIDED,
That no cemetery district shall operate a cemetery within the corporate
limits of any city or town where there is a private cemetery operated
for profit.

--- END ---