BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.290 and 1965 c 7 s 35.21.290 are each amended to
read as follows:
Cities and towns owning their own waterworks, or electric light or
power plants shall have a lien against the premises to which water,
electric light, or power services were furnished for four months
charges therefor due or to become due, but not for any charges more
than four months past due((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the owner of
the premises or the owner of a delinquent mortgage thereon may give
written notice to the superintendent or other head of such works or
plant to cut off service to such premises accompanied by payment or
tender of payment of the then delinquent and unpaid charges for such
service against the premises together with the cut-off charge((,
whereupon)). Consequently, the city or town shall have no lien against
the premises for charges for such service thereafter furnished, nor
shall the owner of the premises or the owner of a delinquent mortgage
thereon be held for the payment thereof.
All charges made for utility services must be charged to the
customer who contracts for the services. In cases where the service
contract is with the tenant of a property, collection of charges must
be made from the tenant, and liens against the property owner are
prohibited. A city or town may not refuse to provide service to a
residential customer who is a tenant based on the nonpayment for
services by the prior customer. The city or town may refuse to provide
service if the prior nonpaying customer continues to reside in the
premises.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.67.200 and 1991 c 36 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Cities and towns owning their own sewer systems shall have a lien
for delinquent and unpaid rates and charges for sewer service,
penalties levied ((pursuant to)) under RCW 35.67.190, and connection
charges, including interest thereon, against the premises to which such
service has been furnished or is available, which lien shall be
superior to all other liens and encumbrances except general taxes and
local and special assessments. The city or town by ordinance may
provide that delinquent charges shall bear interest at ((not
exceeding)) no more than eight percent per annum computed on a monthly
basis((: PROVIDED, That)). However, a city or town using the property
tax system for utility billing may, by resolution or ordinance, adopt
the alternative lien procedure as set forth in RCW 35.67.215.
All charges made for utility services must be charged to the
customer who contracts for the services. In cases where the service
contract is with the tenant of a property, collection of charges must
be made from the tenant, and liens against the property owner are
prohibited. A city or town may not refuse to provide service to a
residential customer who is a tenant based on the nonpayment for
services by the prior customer. The city or town may refuse to provide
service if the prior nonpaying customer continues to reside in the
premises.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.94.150 and 1997 c 393 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
All counties operating a system of sewerage ((and/))or water, or
both, shall have a lien for delinquent connection charges and charges
for the availability of sewerage ((and/))or water service, together
with interest fixed by resolution at eight percent per annum from the
date due until paid. Penalties ((of not more than)) not exceeding ten
percent of the amount due may be imposed in case of failure to pay the
charges at times fixed by resolution. The lien shall be for all
charges, interest, and penalties and shall attach to the premises to
which the services were available. The lien shall be superior to all
other liens and encumbrances, except general taxes and local and
special assessments of the county.
The county department established in RCW 36.94.120 shall certify
periodically the delinquencies to the auditor of the county at which
time the lien shall attach.
Upon the expiration of sixty days after the attachment of the lien,
the county may bring suit in foreclosure by civil action in the
superior court of the county where the property is located. Costs
associated with the foreclosure of the lien, including, but not limited
to, advertising, title report, and personnel costs, shall be added to
the lien upon filing of the foreclosure action. In addition to the
costs and disbursements provided by statute, the court may allow the
county a reasonable attorney's fee. The lien shall be foreclosed in
the same manner as the foreclosure of real property tax liens.
All charges made for utility services must be charged to the
customer who contracts for the services. In cases where the service
contract is with the tenant of a property, collection of charges must
be made from the tenant, and liens against the property owner are
prohibited. A county may not refuse to provide service to a
residential customer who is a tenant based on the nonpayment for
services by the prior customer. The county may refuse to provide
service if the prior nonpaying customer continues to reside in the
premises.

Sec. 4 RCW 57.08.081 and 2003 c 394 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to RCW 57.08.005(6), the commissioners of any district
shall provide for revenues by fixing rates and charges for furnishing
sewer and drainage service and facilities to those to whom service is
available or for providing water, such rates and charges to be fixed as
deemed necessary by the commissioners, so that uniform charges will be
made for the same class of customer or service and facility. Rates and
charges may be combined ((for the furnishing of)) to furnish more than
one type of sewer or drainage service and facilities.
(2) In classifying customers of such water, sewer, or drainage
system, the board of commissioners may in its discretion consider any
or all of the following factors: The difference in cost to various
customers; the location of the various customers within and without the
district; the difference in cost of maintenance, operation, repair, and
replacement of the various parts of the system; the different character
of the service furnished various customers; the quantity and quality of
the service and facility furnished; the time of its use; the
achievement of water conservation goals and the discouragement of
wasteful practices; capital contributions made to the system including,
but not limited to, assessments; and any other matters which present a
reasonable difference as a ground for distinction. Rates shall be
established as deemed proper by the commissioners and as fixed by
resolution and shall produce revenues sufficient to take care of the
costs of maintenance and operation, revenue bond and warrant interest
and principal amortization requirements, and all other charges
necessary for efficient and proper operation of the system. Prior to
furnishing services, a district may require a deposit to guarantee
payment for services. However, failure to require a deposit does not
affect the validity of any lien authorized by this section.
(3) The commissioners shall enforce collection of connection
charges, and rates and charges for water supplied against property
owners connecting with the system or receiving such water, and for
sewer and drainage services charged against property to which and its
owners to whom the service is available, such charges being deemed
charges against the property served, by addition of penalties of not
more than ten percent thereof in case of failure to pay the charges at
times fixed by resolution. The commissioners may provide by resolution
that where either connection charges or rates and charges for services
supplied are delinquent for any specified period of time, the district
shall certify the delinquencies to the auditor of the county in which
the real property is located, and the charges and any penalties added
thereto and interest thereon at the rate of not more than the prime
lending rate of the district's bank plus four percentage points per
year shall be a lien against the property upon which the service was
received, subject only to the lien for general taxes.
(4) All charges made for utility services must be charged to the
customer who contracts for the services. In cases where the service
contract is with the tenant of a property, collection of charges must
be made from the tenant, and liens against the property owner are
prohibited. A district may not refuse to provide service to a
residential customer who is a tenant based on the nonpayment for
services by the prior customer. The district may refuse to provide
service if the prior nonpaying customer continues to reside in the
premises.
(5) The district may, at any time after the connection charges or
rates and charges for services supplied or available and penalties are
delinquent for a period of sixty days, bring suit in foreclosure by
civil action in the superior court of the county in which the real
property is located. The court may allow, in addition to the costs and
disbursements provided by statute, attorneys' fees, title search and
report costs, and expenses as it adjudges reasonable. The action shall
be in rem, and may be brought in the name of the district against an
individual or against all of those who are delinquent in one action.
The laws and rules of the court shall control as in other civil
actions.
(((5))) (6) In addition to the right to foreclose ((provided in))
under this section, the district may also cut off all or part of the
service after charges for water or sewer service supplied or available
are delinquent for a period of thirty days.
(((6))) (7) A district may determine how to apply partial payments
on past due accounts.
(((7))) (8) A district may provide a real property owner or the
owner's designee with duplicate bills for service to tenants, or may
notify an owner or the owner's designee that a tenant's service account
is delinquent. However, if an owner or the owner's designee notifies
the district in writing that a property served by the district is a
rental property, asks to be notified of a tenant's delinquency, and has
provided, in writing, a complete and accurate mailing address, the
district shall notify the owner or the owner's designee of a tenant's
delinquency at the same time and in the same manner the district
notifies the tenant of the tenant's delinquency or by mail. When a
district provides a real property owner or the owner's designee with
duplicates of tenant utility service bills or notice that a tenant's
utility account is delinquent, the district shall notify the tenant
that it is providing the duplicate bills or delinquency notice to the
owner or the owner's designee. After January 1, 1999, if a district
fails to notify the owner of a tenant's delinquency after receiving a
written request to do so and after receiving the other information
required by this subsection (((7))) (8), the district shall have no
lien against the premises for the tenant's delinquent and unpaid
charges.

Sec. 5 RCW 80.28.010 and 1995 c 399 s 211 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All charges made, demanded, or received by any gas company,
electrical company, or water company for gas, electricity, or water, or
for any service rendered or to be rendered in connection therewith,
shall be just, fair, reasonable, and sufficient. To meet the
requirements of this subsection, all charges made for utility services
must be charged to the customer who contracts for the services. In
cases where the service contract is with the tenant of a property,
collection of charges must be made from the tenant, and liens against
the property owner are prohibited.
(2) Every gas company, electrical company and water company shall
furnish and supply such service, instrumentalities and facilities ((as
shall be safe, adequate and efficient, and)) in all respects just and
reasonable.
(3) All rules and regulations issued by any gas company, electrical
company, or water company, affecting or pertaining to the sale or
distribution of its product, shall be just and reasonable.
(4) Utility service for residential space heating shall not be
terminated between November 15 through March 15 if the customer:
(a) Notifies the utility of the inability to pay the bill,
including a security deposit. This notice should be provided within
five business days of receiving a payment overdue notice unless there
are extenuating circumstances. If the customer fails to notify the
utility within five business days and service is terminated, the
customer can, by paying reconnection charges, if any, and fulfilling
the requirements of this section, receive the protections of this
chapter;
(b) Provides self-certification of household income for the prior
twelve months to a grantee of the department of community, trade, and
economic development which administers federally funded energy
assistance programs. The grantee shall determine that the household
income does not exceed the maximum allowed for eligibility under the
state's plan for low-income energy assistance under 42 U.S.C. 8624 and
shall provide a dollar figure that is seven percent of household
income. The grantee may verify information provided in the self-certification;
(c) Has applied for home heating assistance from applicable
government and private sector organizations and certifies that any
assistance received will be applied to the current bill and future
utility bills;
(d) Has applied for low-income weatherization assistance to the
utility or other appropriate agency if such assistance is available for
the dwelling;
(e) Agrees to a payment plan and agrees to maintain the payment
plan. The plan will be designed both to pay the past due bill by the
following October 15 and to pay for continued utility service. If the
past due bill is not paid by the following October 15, the customer
shall not be eligible for protections under this chapter until the past
due bill is paid. The plan shall not require monthly payments in
excess of seven percent of the customer's monthly income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date application is made and
thereafter during November 15 through March 15. A customer may agree
to pay a higher percentage during this period, but shall not be in
default unless payment during this period is less than seven percent of
monthly income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date
application is made and thereafter. If assistance payments are
received by the customer subsequent to implementation of the plan, the
customer shall contact the utility to reformulate the plan; and
(f) Agrees to pay the moneys owed even if he or she moves.
(5) The utility shall:
(a) Include in any notice that an account is delinquent and that
service may be subject to termination, a description of the customer's
duties in this section;
(b) Assist the customer in fulfilling the requirements under this
section;
(c) Be authorized to transfer an account to a new residence when a
customer who has established a plan under this section moves from one
residence to another within the same utility service area;
(d) Be permitted to disconnect service if the customer fails to
honor the payment program. Utilities may continue to disconnect
service for those practices authorized by law other than for nonpayment
((as provided for in)) under this subsection. Customers who qualify
for payment plans under this section who default on their payment plans
and are disconnected can be reconnected and maintain the protections
afforded under this chapter by paying reconnection charges, if any, and
by paying all amounts that would have been due and owing under the
terms of the applicable payment plan, absent default, on the date on
which service is reconnected; and
(e) Advise the customer in writing at the time it disconnects
service that it will restore service if the customer contacts the
utility and fulfills the other requirements of this section.
(6) A payment plan implemented under this section ((is)) must be
consistent with RCW 80.28.080.
(7) Every gas company and electrical company shall offer
residential customers the option of a budget billing or equal payment
plan. The budget billing or equal payment plan shall be offered to
low-income customers eligible under the state's plan for low-income
energy assistance prepared in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 8624(C)(1)
without limiting availability to certain months of the year, without
regard to the length of time the customer has occupied the premises,
and without regard to whether the customer is the tenant or owner of
the premises occupied.
(8) A gas company, electric company, or water company may not
refuse to provide service to a residential customer who is a tenant
based on the nonpayment for services by the prior customer. Either
company may refuse to provide service if the prior nonpaying customer
continues to reside in the premises.
(9) Every gas company, electrical company, and water company shall
construct and maintain such facilities in connection with the
manufacture and distribution of its product as will be efficient and
safe to its employees and the public.
(((9))) (10) An agreement between the customer and the utility,
whether oral or written, shall not waive the protections afforded under
this chapter.
(((10))) (11) In establishing rates or charges for water service,
water companies as defined in RCW 80.04.010 may consider the
achievement of water conservation goals and the discouragement of
wasteful water use practices.

--- END ---