BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.71.050 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 307 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each applicant who has graduated from a school of medicine
located in any state, territory, or possession of the United States,
the District of Columbia, or the Dominion of Canada, shall file an
application for licensure with the commission on a form prepared by the
secretary with the approval of the commission. Each applicant shall
furnish proof satisfactory to the commission of the following:
(a) That the applicant has attended and graduated from a school of
medicine approved by the commission;
(b) That the applicant has completed two years of postgraduate
medical training in a program acceptable to the commission, provided
that applicants graduating before July 28, 1985, may complete only one
year of postgraduate medical training;
(c) That the applicant is of good moral character; ((and))
(d) That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of safely
carrying on the practice of medicine. The commission may require any
applicant to submit to such examination or examinations as it deems
necessary to determine an applicant's physical and/or mental capability
to safely practice medicine;
(e) That the applicant has a professional record that indicates
that the applicant has not committed any act or engaged in any conduct
that would constitute grounds for disciplinary action against a
licensee under this chapter unless the applicant has fulfilled all
requirements on any disciplinary action taken in another jurisdiction.
The applicant must either be released from that action or approved by
the licensing authority in the jurisdiction the action occurred prior
to being considered for a license in Washington state;
(f) That the applicant has not had a license to practice medicine
revoked by a medical regulatory board in another jurisdiction for an
action that occurred in that jurisdiction that constitutes
unprofessional conduct pursuant to this chapter unless the applicant
has fulfilled all requirements on any disciplinary action taken in
another jurisdiction. The applicant must either be released from that
action or approved by the licensing authority in the jurisdiction the
action occurred prior to being considered for a license in Washington
state;
(g) That the applicant is not currently under investigation,
suspension, or restriction by a medical regulatory board in another
jurisdiction for an act that occurred in that jurisdiction that
constitutes unprofessional conduct pursuant to this chapter. If the
applicant is under investigation by a medical regulatory board in
another jurisdiction, the board shall suspend the application process
and may not issue or deny a license to the applicant until the
investigation is resolved; and
(h) That the applicant has not surrendered, relinquished, or given
up a license to practice medicine in lieu of disciplinary action by a
medical regulatory board in another jurisdiction for an act that
occurred in that jurisdiction that constitutes unprofessional conduct
pursuant to this chapter.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the
commission from requiring such additional information from applicants
as it deems necessary. The issuance and denial of licenses are subject
to chapter 18.130 RCW, the Uniform Disciplinary Act.

--- END ---