BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the state
has committed itself to providing educational opportunities to students
until age twenty-one or until they receive a high school diploma,
whichever occurs first. The legislature further recognizes that the
purpose of education reform has been to assure that all students are
provided a rigorous educational experience that will prepare them for
college or the work force. The legislature understands, however, that
all students have different learning styles and learn at different
rates and that some may require more time to earn a diploma than the
standard four years of high school. For these older students, the
legislature recognizes that additional opportunities outside of the
traditional high school classroom may be necessary. It is the intent
of the legislature to explore what learning environments are best
suited to helping students access the knowledge and skills necessary to
become college or career ready.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) To the extent funds are appropriated,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction in conjunction
with the higher education coordinating board and the state board for
community and technical colleges, shall convene a work group to explore
the creation of college and career readiness centers as a way to
provide additional learning opportunities for students in middle
school, high school, and beyond high school, up to age twenty-one, who
are at a risk of not graduating from high school with their peers. The
work group shall, at a minimum, consider the following issues:
(a) Where college and career readiness centers should be located;
(b) How to best administer the educational program at the centers
in order to provide students with a flexible learning environment that
accommodates the needs of students, including instructional activities
and support;
(c) How students, parents, and the community should be provided
information about college and career readiness centers;
(d) Funding mechanisms for college and career readiness centers;
(e) Eligibility criteria for college and career readiness centers;
and
(f) How a community-school district partnership involving parents,
youth organizations, institutions of higher education, and other
community leaders of community organizations could be brought together
to help implement college and career readiness centers that would
support students with diverse learning styles and strategies who may
have unique problems and barriers to success in public high schools.
In considering the development and implementation of a community-school
district partnership, the work group shall consider and make
recommendations regarding the use of demonstration projects to pilot
this option, including a time frame and cost for implementation.
(2) The work group shall include representatives of the following
groups, agencies, and organizations:
(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(b) The state board of education;
(c) Teachers and faculty from the K-12 and higher education system;
(d) School administrators;
(e) School counselors;
(f) Educational service districts;
(g) Institutions of higher education;
(h) Work force training and education coordinating board;
(i) Representatives of cultural, linguistic, and racial minority
groups;
(j) Representatives of the business community;
(k) Representatives of federally recognized Washington tribes;
(l) Skill centers; and
(m) Other interested organizations and personnel.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
report the findings of the work group under this section to the state
board of education and the legislature no later than January 10, 2007.

--- END ---