BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The right to privacy is a personal and fundamental right
protected by Article 1, section 7 of the state Constitution. All
individuals have a right of privacy in information pertaining to them.
(2) Washington state recognizes the importance of protecting the
confidentiality and privacy of an individual's personal information
contained in identification documents such as driver's licenses.
(3) Machine-readable features found on driver's licenses and other
similar identification documents are intended to facilitate
verification of identity, not to facilitate collection of personal
information about individuals, nor to facilitate the creation of
private data bases of transactional information associated with those
individuals.
(4) Easy access to the information found on driver's licenses and
other similar identification documents facilitates the crime of
identity theft, a crime that is a major concern in Washington.
(5) Use of machine-readable features on identification documents
for purposes other than verification of identity constitutes an
unreasonable infringement of privacy and is an unfair business
practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.192 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Electronically" means relating to technology having
electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or
similar capabilities.
(b) "Identification document" means any document issued by a
governmental entity containing personal information that an individual
uses alone or in conjunction with other information to establish his or
her identity. Identification documents include, but are not limited
to, the following:
(i) Driver's licenses or identicards;
(ii) Identification cards for governmental employees or
contractors;
(iii) Identification cards issued by public educational
institutions;
(iv) Benefit cards issued in conjunction with any
government-supported aid program;
(v) Licenses, certificates, registration, or other similar
documents issued by the department of licensing or necessary to engage
in a regulated business or profession; and
(vi) Library cards issued by any public library.
(c) "Personal information" includes any of the following: An
individual's name, address, telephone number, e-mail address, date of
birth, race, religion, ethnicity, nationality, photograph, fingerprint
or other biometric image of the individual, social security number, or
any other unique personal identifier or number.
(2) A nongovernmental entity may only electronically read an
individual's identification document to verify the authenticity of the
document or verify the individual's age or identity.
(3) When a nongovernmental entity electronically reads an
identification document for one of the purposes permitted in subsection
(2) of this section, the entity may not store, sell, or share personal
information collected from the identification document.
(4) A business may only verify a consumer's age when providing an
age-restricted good or service or for which there is a discount based
on the consumer's age. A business may only verify the consumer's
identity when the consumer pays with a method other than cash or
returns an item. A business may not deny a consumer or prospective
consumer a good or service when the consumer or prospective consumer
exercises the right under this section not to allow his or her
identification document to be read electronically for other purposes or
exercises the right not to allow storage, sale, or sharing of personal
information. Any waiver of a provision of this section is contrary to
public policy and is void and unenforceable.
(5) In addition to any other remedy provided by law, an individual
whose personal information is read, stored, shared, sold, or otherwise
used in violation of this section may bring an action to recover actual
damages or one thousand dollars, whichever is greater, and equitable
relief, if available. A court shall award a prevailing individual
reasonable costs and attorneys' fees. If a court finds that a
violation of this title was willful or knowing, the court may increase
the amount of the award to no more than three times the amount
otherwise available.

--- END ---