BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "community protection program"
means a program, established and implemented by the department of
social and health services' division of developmental disabilities,
designed to provide safe residential facilities to persons with
developmental disabilities who: (a) Have been convicted of, found not
guilty by reason of insanity of, or found to be incompetent to stand
trial for, a sex offense, as defined by RCW 9.94A.030; or (b)
constitute a current risk to others, as determined by a qualified
professional.
(2)(a) A person seeking to work at a facility that is part of the
community protection program shall submit a full set of fingerprints to
the Washington state patrol to be used to conduct a national criminal
history background check.
(b) The Washington state patrol shall submit the fingerprints of
the prospective community protection program worker to the federal
bureau of investigation or to such other entity necessary to conduct a
national criminal history background check.
(3) The secretary of the department of social and health services
shall determine what criminal history shall prohibit a person from
working at a community protection program facility.
(4) This section applies to all prospective employees, volunteers,
and independent contractors who are likely to have unsupervised access
to residents of a community protection program facility.

--- END ---