BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.16.050 and 2004 c 153 s 308 are each amended to
read as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the gross income the
following items:
(1) Amounts derived by municipally owned or operated public service
businesses, directly from taxes levied for the support or maintenance
thereof: PROVIDED, That this section shall not be construed to exempt
service charges which are spread on the property tax rolls and
collected as taxes;
(2) Amounts derived from the sale of commodities to persons in the
same public service business as the seller, for resale as such within
this state. This deduction is allowed only with respect to water
distribution, gas distribution or other public service businesses which
furnish water, gas or any other commodity in the performance of public
service businesses;
(3) Amounts actually paid by a taxpayer to another person taxable
under this chapter as the latter's portion of the consideration due for
services furnished jointly by both, if the total amount has been
credited to and appears in the gross income reported for tax by the
former;
(4) The amount of cash discount actually taken by the purchaser or
customer;
(5) The amount of bad debts, as that term is used in 26 U.S.C. Sec.
166, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003, on which tax was
previously paid under this chapter;
(6) Amounts derived from business which the state is prohibited
from taxing under the Constitution of this state or the Constitution or
laws of the United States;
(7) Amounts derived from the distribution of water through an
irrigation system, for irrigation purposes;
(8) Amounts derived from the transportation of commodities from
points of origin in this state to final destination outside this state,
or from points of origin outside this state to final destination in
this state, with respect to which the carrier grants to the shipper the
privilege of stopping the shipment in transit at some point in this
state for the purpose of storing, manufacturing, milling, or other
processing, and thereafter forwards the same commodity, or its
equivalent, in the same or converted form, under a through freight rate
from point of origin to final destination; and amounts derived from the
transportation of commodities from points of origin in the state to an
export elevator, wharf, dock or ship side on tidewater or navigable
tributaries thereto from which such commodities are forwarded, without
intervening transportation, by vessel, in their original form, to
interstate or foreign destinations: PROVIDED, That no deduction will
be allowed when the point of origin and the point of delivery to such
an export elevator, wharf, dock, or ship side are located within the
corporate limits of the same city or town;
(9) Amounts derived from the production, sale, or transfer of
electrical energy for resale within or outside the state or for
consumption outside the state;
(10) Amounts derived from the distribution of water by a nonprofit
water association and used for capital improvements by that nonprofit
water association;
(11) Amounts paid by a sewerage collection business taxable under
RCW 82.16.020(1)(a) to a person taxable under chapter 82.04 RCW for the
treatment or disposal of sewage;
(12) Amounts derived from fees or charges imposed on persons for
transit services provided by a public transportation agency. For the
purposes of this subsection, "public transportation agency" means a
municipality, as defined in RCW 35.58.272, that performs the function
of metropolitan public transportation.

--- END ---