BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.60.040 and 2003 c 111 s 1504 are each amended to
read as follows:
A ballot is invalid and no votes on that ballot may be counted if
it is found folded together with another ballot ((or it is marked so as
to identify the voter)).
Those parts of a ballot are invalid and no votes may be counted for
those issues or offices where more votes are cast for the office or
issue than are permitted by law; write-in votes do not contain all of
the information required under RCW ((29A.60.020)) 29A.60.021; or that
issue or office is not marked with sufficient definiteness to determine
the voter's choice or intention. No write-in vote may be rejected due
to a variation in the form of the name if the election board or the
canvassing board can determine the issue for or against which or the
person and the office for which the voter intended to vote.

--- END ---