BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county may establish a community protection zone, as defined
under RCW 9.94A.030 for an offender convicted of a sex offense.
(2) A county may enact a rule or ordinance prohibiting an offender
convicted of a sex offense from residing near a public or private
school, playground, public swimming pool, day care center, organized
campground, community center, and any other facility whose primary
purpose is the education or care of persons under eighteen years of
age.
(3) Any county may enact such a rule or ordinance, or may designate
specific areas where an offender convicted of a sex offense may reside.

--- END ---