BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that most child sexual
abuse victims know or are related to their offenders and often express
a wish that the offenders receive treatment. The legislature further
finds that a primary rationale for the enactment of the special sex
offender sentencing alternative was that many victims, child victims in
particular, might not cooperate with the prosecution if the only
possible outcome was incarceration without treatment.
Since enactment of the sentencing alternative, no systematic
evaluation of the sentencing alternative's impact on victims has been
conducted. The legislature intends such an analysis be conducted to
assist the legislature in determining the extent to which the
sentencing alternative continues to serve the purposes for which it was
enacted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall contract with the Harborview medical center
sexual assault center to conduct a study of the impact on victims of
the special sex offender sentencing alternative from money appropriated
by the legislature. The study shall include a geographically diverse
sample of at least two hundred victims whose offenders received the
sentencing alternative at least four years prior to the commencement of
the study.
(2) The study shall include, at a minimum, an analysis of:
(a) Victims' attitudes and perceptions about the sentencing
alternative before sentencing and after their offenders' participation
in the sentencing alternative;
(b) If victims' attitudes and perceptions changed over time, the
variables influencing the changes; and
(c) The relationship, if any, between victims' attitudes and
perceptions about the sentencing alternative and their current
psychological and social functioning.
(3) Not later than December 1, 2007, the center shall report to the
legislature on the results of this study. The report shall include a
description of the methodology used to conduct the study, the findings
and conclusions resulting from the analysis conducted in the study, and
recommendations, if any, on ways to improve the sentencing alternative
to better serve the purposes for which it was created.

--- END ---