BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.381 and 2005 c 248 (HB 1019) s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
A person shall be exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a
portion of the amount of excess and regular real property taxes due and
payable in the year following the year in which a claim is filed, and
thereafter, in accordance with the following:
(1) The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence
which was occupied by the person claiming the exemption as a principal
place of residence as of the time of filing: PROVIDED, That any person
who sells, transfers, or is displaced from his or her residence may
transfer his or her exemption status to a replacement residence, but no
claimant shall receive an exemption on more than one residence in any
year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That confinement of the person to a hospital,
nursing home, boarding home, or adult family home shall not disqualify
the claim of exemption if:
(a) The residence is temporarily unoccupied;
(b) The residence is occupied by a spouse and/or a person
financially dependent on the claimant for support; or
(c) The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home,
hospital, boarding home, or adult family home costs;
(2) The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time
of filing, in fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the
residence on which the property taxes have been imposed or if the
person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership, such person must own a share
therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in which he
or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
a marital community or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to be owned
by each spouse or cotenant, and any lease for life shall be deemed a
life estate;
(3) The person claiming the exemption must be (a) sixty-one years
of age or older on December 31st of the year in which the exemption
claim is filed, or must have been, at the time of filing, retired from
regular gainful employment by reason of disability, or (b) a veteran of
the armed forces of the United States with a one hundred percent
service connected disability as ((provided in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 423
(d)(1)(A) as amended prior)) determined pursuant to 38 U.S.C. Sec. 1110
et seq. as existing on January 1, ((2005)) 2006. However, any
surviving spouse of a person who was receiving an exemption at the time
of the person's death shall qualify if the surviving spouse is fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets the requirements of
this section;
(4) Except for veterans of the armed forces of the United States
with a one hundred percent service connected disability, the amount
that the person shall be exempt from an obligation to pay shall be
calculated on the basis of combined disposable income, as defined in
RCW 84.36.383. If the person claiming the exemption was retired for
two months or more of the assessment year, the combined disposable
income of such person shall be calculated by multiplying the average
monthly combined disposable income of such person during the months
such person was retired by twelve. If the income of the person
claiming exemption is reduced for two or more months of the assessment
year by reason of the death of the person's spouse, or when other
substantial changes occur in disposable income that are likely to
continue for an indefinite period of time, the combined disposable
income of such person shall be calculated by multiplying the average
monthly combined disposable income of such person after such
occurrences by twelve. If it is necessary to estimate income to comply
with this subsection, the assessor may require confirming documentation
of such income prior to May 31 of the year following application;
(5)(a) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of thirty-five thousand dollars or less or
who is a veteran of the armed forces of the United States with a one
hundred percent service connected disability shall be exempt from all
excess property taxes; and
(b)(i) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less but
greater than twenty-five thousand dollars shall be exempt from all
regular property taxes on the greater of fifty thousand dollars or
thirty-five percent of the valuation of his or her residence, but not
to exceed seventy thousand dollars of the valuation of his or her
residence; or
(ii) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a
combined disposable income of twenty-five thousand dollars or less or
who is a veteran of the armed forces of the United States with a one
hundred percent service connected disability shall be exempt from all
regular property taxes on the greater of sixty thousand dollars or
sixty percent of the valuation of his or her residence;
(6) For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of thirty-five thousand dollars or less or
who is a veteran of the armed forces of the United States with a one
hundred percent service connected disability, the valuation of the
residence shall be the assessed value of the residence on the later of
January 1, 1995, or January 1st of the assessment year the person first
qualifies under this section. If the person subsequently fails to
qualify under this section only for one year because of high income,
this same valuation shall be used upon requalification. If the person
fails to qualify for more than one year in succession because of high
income or fails to qualify for any other reason, the valuation upon
requalification shall be the assessed value on January 1st of the
assessment year in which the person requalifies. If the person
transfers the exemption under this section to a different residence,
the valuation of the different residence shall be the assessed value of
the different residence on January 1st of the assessment year in which
the person transfers the exemption.
In no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater than
the true and fair value of the residence on January 1st of the
assessment year.
This subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to the
property in the year in which the improvements are made. Subsequent
improvements to the property shall be added to the value otherwise
determined under this subsection at their true and fair value in the
year in which they are made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2007 and thereafter.

--- END ---