BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.68.035 and 2005 c 314 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
All proceeds from combined vehicle licensing fees received by the
director for vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 and 46.16.085((, the
license fee under RCW 46.16.086, and the farm vehicle trip permit under
RCW 46.16.162)) shall be forwarded to the state treasurer to be
distributed into accounts according to the following method:
(1) The sum of two dollars for each vehicle shall be deposited into
the multimodal transportation account, except that for each vehicle
registered by a county auditor or agent to a county auditor pursuant to
RCW 46.01.140, the sum of two dollars shall be credited to the current
county expense fund.
(2) The remainder and the proceeds from the license fee under RCW
46.16.086 and the farm vehicle trip permit under RCW 46.16.162 shall be
distributed as follows:
(a) ((24.00)) 22.36 percent shall be deposited into the state
patrol highway account of the motor vehicle fund;
(b) ((1.8)) 1.375 percent shall be deposited into the Puget Sound
ferry operations account of the motor vehicle fund;
(c) ((6.38)) 5.237 percent shall be deposited into the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account); ((and))
(d) ((On July 1, 2006, six million dollars shall be deposited into
the freight mobility investment account created in RCW 46.68.300 and
beginning on July 1, 2007, and every July 1st thereafter, three million
dollars shall be deposited into the freight mobility investment account
created in RCW 46.68.300;)) 11.533 percent shall be deposited into the
transportation partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290; and
(e) The remaining proceeds shall be deposited into the motor
vehicle fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.086 and 2005 c 314 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
In lieu of the license tab fees provided in RCW 46.16.0621, private
use single-axle trailers of two thousand pounds scale weight or less
may be licensed upon the payment of a license fee in the sum of fifteen
dollars, but only if the trailer is operated upon public highways. The
license fee must be collected annually for each registration year or
fraction of a registration year. This reduced license fee applies only
to trailers operated for personal use of the owners, and not trailers
held for rental to the public or used in any commercial or business
endeavor. The proceeds from the fees collected under this section
shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 46.68.035(2).

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.162 and 2005 c 314 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The owner of a farm vehicle licensed under RCW 46.16.090
purchasing a monthly license under RCW 46.16.135 may, as an alternative
to the first partial month of the license registration, secure and
operate the vehicle under authority of a farm vehicle trip permit
issued by this state. The licensed gross weight may not exceed eighty
thousand pounds for a combination of vehicles nor forty thousand pounds
for a single unit vehicle with three or more axles.
(2) If a monthly license previously issued has expired, the owner
of a farm vehicle may, as an alternative to purchasing a full monthly
license, secure and operate the vehicle under authority of a farm
vehicle trip permit issued by this state. The licensed gross weight
may not exceed eighty thousand pounds for a combination of vehicles nor
forty thousand pounds for a single unit vehicle with three or more
axles.
(3) Each farm vehicle trip permit shall authorize the operation of
a single vehicle at the maximum legal weight limit for the vehicle for
the period remaining in the first month of monthly license, commencing
with the day of first use. No more than four such permits may be used
for any one vehicle in any twelve-month period. Every permit shall
identify, as the department may require, the vehicle for which it is
issued and shall be completed in its entirety and signed by the
operator before operation of the vehicle on the public highways of this
state. Correction of data on the permit such as dates, license number,
or vehicle identification number invalidates the permit. The farm
vehicle trip permit shall be displayed on the vehicle to which it is
issued as prescribed by the department.
(4) Vehicles operating under authority of farm vehicle trip permits
are subject to all laws, rules, and regulations affecting the operation
of like vehicles in this state.
(5) Farm vehicle trip permits may be obtained from the department
of licensing or agents and subagents appointed by the department. The
fee for each farm vehicle trip permit is six dollars and twenty-five
cents. Farm vehicle trip permits sold by the department's agents or
subagents are subject to fees specified in RCW 46.01.140 (4)(a),
(5)(b), or (6).
(6) The proceeds from farm vehicle trip permits received by the
director shall be forwarded to the state treasurer to be distributed as
provided in RCW 46.68.035(2).
(7) No exchange, credits, or refunds may be given for farm vehicle
trip permits after they have been purchased.
(8) The department of licensing may adopt rules as it deems
necessary to administer this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.68.135 and 2005 c 314 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Beginning)) By July 1, ((2007)) 2006, and each year thereafter,
the state treasurer shall transfer ((five)) two and one-half million
dollars from the multimodal account to the transportation
infrastructure account created under RCW 82.44.190. The funds must be
distributed for rail capital improvements only.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.68.290 and 2005 c 314 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The transportation partnership account is hereby created in the
state treasury. All distributions to the account from RCW 46.68.090
must be deposited into the account. Money in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used
only for projects or improvements identified as 2005 transportation
partnership projects or improvements in the omnibus transportation
appropriations act, including any principal and interest on bonds
authorized for the projects or improvements.
(2) ((If a regional transportation plan has not been adopted by
January 2007, the legislature intends to reprioritize allocation of
funding for the projects identified on the 2005 transportation
partnership project list so that complete and functioning
transportation projects can be constructed in a reasonable time.
(3) By January 1, 2006, the transportation performance audit board
must develop performance measures and benchmarks for the evaluation of
the expenditures of the transportation partnership account. The board
must also develop an audit plan and schedule for audits of the
performance of the department of transportation's delivery of the plan
as defined by project list, schedule, and budget enacted by the
legislature.
(4))) The legislature finds that:
(a) Citizens demand and deserve accountability of transportation-related programs and expenditures. Transportation-related programs
must continuously improve in quality, efficiency, and effectiveness in
order to increase public trust;
(b) Transportation-related agencies that receive tax dollars must
continuously improve the way they operate and deliver services so
citizens receive maximum value for their tax dollars; and
(c) Fair, independent, comprehensive performance audits of
transportation-related agencies overseen by the elected state auditor
are essential to improving the efficiency, economy, and effectiveness
of the state's transportation system.
(((5))) (3) For purposes of chapter 314, Laws of 2005:
(a) "Performance audit" means an objective and systematic
assessment of a state agency or agencies or any of their programs,
functions, or activities by the state auditor or designee in order to
help improve agency efficiency, effectiveness, and accountability.
Performance audits include economy and efficiency audits and program
audits.
(b) "Transportation-related agency" means any state agency, board,
or commission that receives funding primarily for transportation-related purposes. At a minimum, the department of transportation, the
transportation improvement board or its successor entity, the county
road administration board or its successor entity, and the traffic
safety commission are considered transportation-related agencies. The
Washington state patrol and the department of licensing shall not be
considered transportation-related agencies under chapter 314, Laws of
2005.
(((6))) (4) Within the authorities and duties under chapter 43.09
RCW, the state auditor shall establish criteria and protocols for
performance audits. Transportation-related agencies shall be audited
using criteria that include generally accepted government auditing
standards as well as legislative mandates and performance objectives
established by state agencies. Mandates include, but are not limited
to, agency strategies, timelines, program objectives, and mission and
goals as required in RCW 43.88.090.
(((7))) (5) Within the authorities and duties under chapter 43.09
RCW, the state auditor may conduct performance audits for
transportation-related agencies. The state auditor shall contract with
private firms to conduct the performance audits.
(((8))) (6) The audits may include:
(a) Identification of programs and services that can be eliminated,
reduced, consolidated, or enhanced;
(b) Identification of funding sources to the transportation-related
agency, to programs, and to services that can be eliminated, reduced,
consolidated, or enhanced;
(c) Analysis of gaps and overlaps in programs and services and
recommendations for improving, dropping, blending, or separating
functions to correct gaps or overlaps;
(d) Analysis and recommendations for pooling information technology
systems used within the transportation-related agency, and evaluation
of information processing and telecommunications policy, organization,
and management;
(e) Analysis of the roles and functions of the transportation-related agency, its programs, and its services and their compliance
with statutory authority and recommendations for eliminating or
changing those roles and functions and ensuring compliance with
statutory authority;
(f) Recommendations for eliminating or changing statutes, rules,
and policy directives as may be necessary to ensure that the
transportation-related agency carry out reasonably and properly those
functions vested in the agency by statute;
(g) Verification of the reliability and validity of transportation-related agency performance data, self-assessments, and performance
measurement systems as required under RCW 43.88.090;
(h) Identification of potential cost savings in the transportation-related agency, its programs, and its services;
(i) Identification and recognition of best practices;
(j) Evaluation of planning, budgeting, and program evaluation
policies and practices;
(k) Evaluation of personnel systems operation and management;
(l) Evaluation of purchasing operations and management policies and
practices;
(m) Evaluation of organizational structure and staffing levels,
particularly in terms of the ratio of managers and supervisors to
nonmanagement personnel; and
(n) Evaluation of transportation-related project costs, including
but not limited to environmental mitigation, competitive bidding
practices, permitting processes, and capital project management.
(((9))) (7) Within the authorities and duties under chapter 43.09
RCW, the state auditor must provide the preliminary performance audit
reports to the audited state agency for comment. The auditor also may
seek input on the preliminary report from other appropriate officials.
Comments must be received within thirty days after receipt of the
preliminary performance audit report unless a different time period is
approved by the state auditor. The final performance audit report
shall include the objectives, scope, and methodology; the audit
results, including findings and recommendations; the agency's response
and conclusions; and identification of best practices.
(((10))) (8) The state auditor shall provide final performance
audit reports to the citizens of Washington, the governor, the joint
legislative audit and review committee, the transportation performance
audit board, the appropriate legislative committees, and other
appropriate officials. Final performance audit reports shall be posted
on the internet.
(((11))) (9) The audited transportation-related agency is
responsible for follow-up and corrective action on all performance
audit findings and recommendations. The audited agency's plan for
addressing each audit finding and recommendation shall be included in
the final audit report. The plan shall provide the name of the contact
person responsible for each action, the action planned, and the
anticipated completion date. If the audited agency does not agree with
the audit findings and recommendations or believes action is not
required, then the action plan shall include an explanation and
specific reasons.
The office of financial management shall require periodic progress
reports from the audited agency until all resolution has occurred. The
office of financial management is responsible for achieving audit
resolution. The office of financial management shall annually report
by December 31st the status of performance audit resolution to the
appropriate legislative committees and the state auditor. The
legislature shall consider the performance audit results in connection
with the state budget process.
The auditor may request status reports on specific audits or
findings.
(((12))) (10) For the period from July 1, 2005, until June 30,
2007, the amount of $((4,000,000)) 2,000,000 is appropriated from the
transportation partnership account to the state auditors office for the
purposes of subsections (((4))) (2) through (((11))) (9) of this
section.
(((13) When appointing the citizen members with performance
measurement expertise to the transportation performance audit board,
the governor shall appoint the state auditor, or his or her designee.
(14))) (11) If the state auditor's financial audit of a
transportation-related agency implies that a performance audit is
warranted, the transportation performance audit board shall include in
its annual work plan the performance audit recommended by the state
auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On July 1, 2006, and by each July 1st thereafter, the state
treasurer shall transfer from the transportation partnership account
created in RCW 46.68.290:
(a) One million dollars to the small city pavement and sidewalk
account created in RCW 47.26.340;
(b) Two and one-half million dollars to the transportation
improvement account created in RCW 47.26.084; and
(c) One and one-half million dollars to the county arterial
preservation account created in RCW 46.68.090(2)(i).
(2) On July 1, 2006, the state treasurer shall transfer six million
dollars from the transportation partnership account created in RCW
46.68.290 into the freight mobility investment account created in RCW
46.68.300 and by July 1, 2007, and by every July 1st thereafter, three
million dollars shall be deposited into the freight mobility investment
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The freight mobility multimodal account is created in the state
treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for freight mobility
projects identified in the omnibus transportation appropriations act,
including any principal and interest on bonds authorized for the
projects or improvements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The regional mobility grant program account is hereby created
in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
grants provided under RCW 47.66.030.
(2) Beginning with September 2007, by the last day of September,
December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall
transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the regional
mobility grant program account five million dollars.
(3) Beginning with September 2015, by the last day of September,
December, March, and June of each year, the state treasurer shall
transfer from the multimodal transportation account to the regional
mobility grant program account six million two hundred fifty thousand
dollars.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.17.010 and 2005 c 314 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There shall be paid and collected annually for motor vehicles
subject to the fee under RCW 46.16.0621, except motor homes, a vehicle
weight fee. The amount of the fee shall be based upon the vehicle
scale weight, which is correlated with vehicle size and roadway lane
usage. Fees imposed under this section must be used for transportation
purposes, and shall not be used for the general support of state
government. The vehicle weight fee shall be that portion of the fee as
reflected on the scale weight set forth in schedule B provided in RCW
46.16.070 that is in excess of the fee imposed under RCW 46.16.0621.
This fee is due at the time of initial and renewal of vehicle
registration.
(2) If the resultant weight according to this section is not listed
in schedule B provided in RCW 46.16.070, it shall be increased to the
next higher weight pursuant to chapter 46.44 RCW.
(3) For the purpose of administering this section, the department
shall rely on the vehicle empty scale weights as provided by vehicle
manufacturers, or other sources defined by the department, to determine
the weight of each vehicle. The department shall adopt rules for
determining weight for vehicles without manufacturer empty scale
weights.
(4) The vehicle weight fee under this section is imposed to provide
funds to mitigate the impact of vehicle loads on the state roads and
highways and is separate and distinct from other vehicle license fees.
Proceeds from the fee may be used for transportation purposes, or for
facilities and activities that reduce the number of vehicles or load
weights on the state roads and highways.
(5) The vehicle weight fee collected under this section shall be
deposited as follows:
(a) On July 1, 2006, six million dollars shall be deposited into
the freight mobility ((investment)) multimodal account created in ((RCW
46.68.300)) section 7 of this act, and the remainder collected from
((January 1, 2006)) the effective date of this section, through June
30, 2006, shall be deposited into the multimodal transportation
account;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2007, and every July 1st thereafter, three
million dollars shall be deposited into the freight mobility
((investment)) multimodal account created in ((RCW 46.68.300)) section
7 of this act, and the remainder shall be deposited into the multimodal
transportation account.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.84.092 and 2005 c 514 s 1105, 2005 c 353 s 3, 2005
c 339 s 22, 2005 c 314 s 109, 2005 c 312 s 7, and 2005 c 94 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the emergency reserve fund, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight
mobility multimodal account, the health services account, the public
health services account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health services account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll lanes
operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund account,
the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold
excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local
sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home
park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and
use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account,
the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1
account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving
account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account,
the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the regional mobility grant program account, the
regional transportation investment district account, the resource
management cost account, the rural Washington loan fund, the site
closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the
state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll
bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.84.092 and 2005 c 514 s 1106, 2005 c 353 s 4, 2005
c 339 s 23, 2005 c 314 s 110, 2005 c 312 s 8, and 2005 c 94 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the emergency reserve fund, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight
mobility multimodal account, the health services account, the public
health services account, the health system capacity account, the
personal health services account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll lanes
operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund account,
the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold
excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local
sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home
park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and
use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account,
the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1
account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving
account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account,
the public works assistance account, the Puyallup tribal settlement
account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the resource management cost account, the rural
Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the small city pavement
and sidewalk account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the
tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Section 10 of this act expires July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Section 11 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Section 1 of this act applies to license
fees due on or after July 1, 2006.

--- END ---