BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adult" means an individual who is eighteen years of age or
older.
(2) "Attending physician" means the physician who has primary
responsibility for the care of the patient and treatment of the
patient's terminal disease.
(3) "Capable" means that, in the opinion of a court or in the
opinion of the patient's attending physician or consulting physician,
psychiatrist, or psychologist, a patient has the ability to make and
communicate health care decisions to health care providers, including
communication through persons familiar with the patient's manner of
communicating if those persons are available.
(4) "Consulting physician" means a physician who is qualified by
specialty or experience to make a professional diagnosis and prognosis
regarding the patient's disease.
(5) "Counseling" means one or more consultations as necessary
between a state licensed psychiatrist or psychologist and a patient for
the purpose of determining that the patient is capable and not
suffering from a psychiatric or psychological disorder or depression
causing impaired judgment.
(6) "Health care provider" means a person licensed, certified, or
otherwise authorized or permitted by law to administer health care or
dispense medication in the ordinary course of business or practice of
a profession, and includes a health care facility.
(7) "Informed decision" means a decision by a qualified patient, to
request and obtain a prescription to end his or her life in a humane
and dignified manner, that is based on an appreciation of the relevant
facts and after being fully informed by the attending physician of:
(a) His or her medical diagnosis;
(b) His or her prognosis;
(c) The potential risks associated with taking the medication to be
prescribed;
(d) The probable result of taking the medication to be prescribed;
and
(e) The feasible alternatives, including, but not limited to,
comfort care, hospice care, and pain control.
(8) "Medically confirmed" means the medical opinion of the
attending physician has been confirmed by a consulting physician who
has examined the patient and the patient's relevant medical records.
(9) "Patient" means a person who is under the care of a physician.
(10) "Physician" means a doctor of medicine or osteopathy licensed
to practice medicine in the state of Washington.
(11) "Qualified patient" means a capable adult who is a resident of
Washington state and has satisfied the requirements of this chapter in
order to obtain a prescription for medication to end his or her life in
a humane and dignified manner.
(12) "Terminal disease" means an incurable and irreversible disease
that has been medically confirmed and will, within reasonable medical
judgment, produce death within six months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) An adult who is capable, is a resident
of Washington state, and has been determined by the attending physician
and consulting physician to be suffering from a terminal disease, and
who has voluntarily expressed his or her wish to die, may make a
written request for medication to end his or her life in a humane and
dignified manner in accordance with this chapter.
(2) A person does not qualify under this chapter solely because of
age or disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A valid request for medication under
this chapter must be in substantially the form described in section 21
of this act, signed and dated by the patient and witnessed by at least
two individuals who, in the presence of the patient, attest that to the
best of their knowledge and belief the patient is capable, acting
voluntarily, and is not being coerced to sign the request.
(2) One of the witnesses must be a person who is not:
(a) A relative of the patient by blood, marriage, or adoption;
(b) A person who at the time the request is signed would be
entitled to any portion of the estate of the qualified patient upon
death under any will or by operation of law; or
(c) An owner, operator, or employee of a health care facility where
the qualified patient is receiving medical treatment or is a resident.
(3) The patient's attending physician at the time the request is
signed may not be a witness.
(4) If the patient is a patient in a long-term care facility at the
time the written request is made, one of the witnesses must be an
individual designated by the facility and having the qualifications
specified by the department of health by rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The attending physician must:
(a) Make the initial determination of whether a patient has a
terminal disease, is capable, and has made the request voluntarily;
(b) Request that the patient demonstrate Washington residency under
section 13 of this act;
(c) To ensure that the patient is making an informed decision,
inform the patient of:
(i) His or her medical diagnosis;
(ii) His or her prognosis;
(iii) The potential risks associated with taking the medication to
be prescribed;
(iv) The probable result of taking the medication to be prescribed;
and
(v) The feasible alternatives, including, but not limited to,
comfort care, hospice care, and pain control;
(d) Refer the patient to a consulting physician for medical
confirmation of the diagnosis, and for a determination that the patient
is capable and acting voluntarily;
(e) Refer the patient for counseling if appropriate under section
6 of this act;
(f) Recommend that the patient notify next of kin;
(g) Counsel the patient about the importance of having another
person present when the patient takes the medication prescribed under
this chapter and of not taking the medication in a public place;
(h) Inform the patient that he or she has an opportunity to rescind
the request at any time and in any manner, and offer the patient an
opportunity to rescind at the end of the fifteen-day waiting period
under section 9 of this act;
(i) Verify, immediately before writing the prescription for
medication under this chapter, that the patient is making an informed
decision;
(j) Fulfill the medical record documentation requirements of
section 12 of this act;
(k) Ensure that all appropriate steps are carried out in accordance
with this chapter before writing a prescription for medication to
enable a qualified patient to end his or her life in a humane and
dignified manner; and
(l)(i) Dispense medications directly, including ancillary
medications intended to facilitate the desired effect to minimize the
patient's discomfort, if the attending physician is authorized under
statute and rule to dispense and has a current drug enforcement
administration certificate; or
(ii) With the patient's written consent:
(A) Contact a pharmacist and inform the pharmacist of the
prescription; and
(B) Deliver the written prescription personally or by mail to the
pharmacist, who will dispense the medications to either the patient,
the attending physician, or an expressly identified agent of the
patient.
(2) The attending physician may sign the patient's death
certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Before a patient is qualified under this
chapter, a consulting physician must examine the patient and his or her
relevant medical records and confirm, in writing, the attending
physician's diagnosis that the patient is suffering from a terminal
disease, and verify that the patient is capable, is acting voluntarily,
and has made an informed decision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If in the opinion of the attending physician
or the consulting physician a patient may be suffering from a
psychiatric or psychological disorder or depression causing impaired
judgment, either physician must refer the patient for counseling.
Medication to end a patient's life in a humane and dignified manner may
not be prescribed until the person performing the counseling determines
that the patient is not suffering from a psychiatric or psychological
disorder or depression causing impaired judgment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A person may not receive a prescription for
medication to end his or her life in a humane and dignified manner
unless he or she has made an informed decision. Immediately before
writing a prescription for medication under this chapter, the attending
physician must verify that the patient is making an informed decision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The attending physician shall recommend that
the patient notify the next of kin of his or her request for medication
under this chapter. A patient who declines or is unable to notify next
of kin may not have his or her request denied for that reason.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 To receive a prescription for medication to
end his or her life in a humane and dignified manner, a qualified
patient must have made an oral request and a written request, and
reiterate the oral request to his or her attending physician at least
fifteen days after making the initial oral request. At the time the
qualified patient makes his or her second oral request, the attending
physician must offer the patient an opportunity to rescind the request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A patient may rescind his or her request at
any time and in any manner without regard to his or her mental state.
No prescription for medication under this chapter may be written
without the attending physician offering the qualified patient an
opportunity to rescind the request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 At least fifteen days must elapse between
the patient's initial oral request and the writing of a prescription
under this chapter. At least forty-eight hours must elapse between the
patient's written request and the writing of a prescription under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The following must be documented or filed
in the patient's medical record:
(1) All oral requests by a patient for medication to end his or her
life in a humane and dignified manner;
(2) All written requests by a patient for medication to end his or
her life in a humane and dignified manner;
(3) The attending physician's diagnosis and prognosis, and
determination that the patient is capable, is acting voluntarily, and
has made an informed decision;
(4) The consulting physician's diagnosis and prognosis, and
verification that the patient is capable, is acting voluntarily, and
has made an informed decision;
(5) A report of the outcome and determinations made during
counseling, if performed;
(6) The attending physician's offer to the patient to rescind his
or her request at the time of the patient's second oral request under
section 9 of this act; and
(7) A note by the attending physician indicating that all
requirements under this chapter have been met and indicating the steps
taken to carry out the request, including a notation of the medication
prescribed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Only requests made by Washington state
residents under this chapter may be granted. Factors demonstrating
Washington state residency include but are not limited to:
(1) Possession of a Washington state driver's license;
(2) Registration to vote in Washington state; or
(3) Evidence that the person owns or leases property in Washington
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1)(a) The department of health must
annually review a sample of records maintained under this chapter.
(b) The department of health must require any health care provider
upon dispensing medication under this chapter to file a copy of the
dispensing record with the department.
(2) The department of health must adopt rules to facilitate the
collection of information regarding compliance with this chapter.
Except as otherwise required by law, the information collected is not
a public record and may not be made available for inspection by the
public.
(3) The department of health must generate and make available to
the public an annual statistical report of information collected under
subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) Any provision in a contract, will, or
other agreement, whether written or oral, to the extent the provision
would affect whether a person may make or rescind a request for
medication to end his or her life in a humane and dignified manner, is
not valid.
(2) Any obligation owing under any currently existing contract may
not be conditioned or affected by the making or rescinding of a
request, by a person, for medication to end his or her life in a humane
and dignified manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The sale, procurement, or issuance of any
life, health, or accident insurance or annuity policy or the rate
charged for any policy may not be conditioned upon or affected by the
making or rescinding of a request, by a person, for medication to end
his or her life in a humane and dignified manner. A qualified
patient's act of ingesting medication to end his or her life in a
humane and dignified manner may not have an effect upon a life, health,
or accident insurance or annuity policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Nothing in this chapter authorizes a
physician or any other person to end a patient's life by lethal
injection, mercy killing, or active euthanasia. Actions taken in
accordance with this chapter do not, for any purpose, constitute
suicide, assisted suicide, mercy killing, or homicide, under the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) Except as provided in section 19 of
this act and subsection (2) of this section:
(a) A person may not be subject to civil or criminal liability or
professional disciplinary action for participating in good faith
compliance with this chapter. This includes being present when a
qualified patient takes the prescribed medication to end his or her
life in a humane and dignified manner;
(b) A professional organization or association, or health care
provider, may not subject a person to censure, discipline, suspension,
loss of license, loss of privileges, loss of membership, or other
penalty for participating or refusing to participate in good faith
compliance with this chapter;
(c) A patient's request for or provision by an attending physician
of medication in good faith compliance with this chapter does not
constitute neglect for any purpose of law or provide the sole basis for
the appointment of a guardian or conservator; and
(d) A health care provider is not under any duty, whether by
contract, by statute, or by any other legal requirement, to participate
in the provision to a qualified patient of medication to end his or her
life in a humane and dignified manner. If a health care provider is
unable or unwilling to carry out a patient's request under this
chapter, and the patient transfers his or her care to a new health care
provider, the prior health care provider must transfer, upon request,
a copy of the patient's relevant medical records to the new health care
provider.
(2)(a) A health care provider may prohibit another health care
provider from participating in this chapter on the premises of the
prohibiting provider if the prohibiting provider has notified the
health care provider of the prohibiting provider's policy regarding
participating in this chapter. This subsection does not prevent a
health care provider from providing health care services to a patient
that do not constitute participation in this chapter.
(b) A health care provider may subject another health care provider
to the sanctions stated in this subsection if the sanctioning health
care provider has notified the sanctioned provider before participation
in this chapter that it prohibits participation in this chapter:
(i) Loss of privileges, loss of membership, or other sanctions
provided under the medical staff bylaws, policies, and procedures of
the sanctioning health care provider if the sanctioned provider is a
member of the sanctioning provider's medical staff and participates in
this chapter while on the health care facility premises of the
sanctioning health care provider, but not including the private medical
office of a physician or other provider;
(ii) Termination of a lease or other property contract or other
nonmonetary remedies provided by a lease contract, not including loss
or restriction of medical staff privileges or exclusion from a provider
panel, if the sanctioned provider participates in this chapter while on
the premises of the sanctioning health care provider or on property
that is owned by or under the direct control of the sanctioning health
care provider; or
(iii) Termination of a contract or other nonmonetary remedies
provided by contract if the sanctioned provider participates in this
chapter while acting in the course and scope of the sanctioned
provider's capacity as an employee or independent contractor of the
sanctioning health care provider. Nothing in this subsection
(2)(b)(iii) prevents:
(A) A health care provider from participating in this chapter while
acting outside the course and scope of the provider's capacity as an
employee or independent contractor; or
(B) A patient from contracting with his or her attending physician
and consulting physician to act outside the course and scope of the
provider's capacity as an employee or independent contractor of the
sanctioning health care provider.
(c) A health care provider that imposes sanctions under (b) of this
subsection must follow all due process and other procedures the
sanctioning health care provider may have that are related to the
imposition of sanctions on another health care provider.
(d) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Notify" means a separate statement in writing to the health
care provider specifically informing the health care provider before
the provider's participation in this chapter of the sanctioning health
care provider's policy about participation in activities covered by
this chapter.
(ii) "Participate in this chapter" means to perform the duties of
an attending physician under section 4 of this act, the consulting
physician function under section 5 of this act, or the counseling
function under section 6 of this act. "Participate in this chapter"
does not include:
(A) Making an initial determination that a patient has a terminal
disease and informing the patient of the medical prognosis;
(B) Providing information about the Washington death with dignity
act to a patient upon the request of the patient;
(C) Providing a patient, upon the request of the patient, with a
referral to another physician; or
(D) A patient contracting with his or her attending physician and
consulting physician to act outside of the course and scope of the
provider's capacity as an employee or independent contractor of the
sanctioning health care provider.
(3) Suspension or termination of staff membership or privileges
under subsection (2) of this section is not reportable under RCW
18.71.0193. Action taken under section 3, 4, 5, or 6 of this act may
not be the sole basis for a report of unprofessional conduct under RCW
18.130.180.
(4) This chapter does not allow a lower standard of care for
patients in the community where the patient is treated or a similar
community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) A person who without authorization of
the patient willfully alters or forges a request for medication or
conceals or destroys a rescission of that request with the intent or
effect of causing the patient's death is guilty of a class A felony.
(2) A person who coerces or exerts undue influence on a patient to
request medication to end the patient's life, or to destroy a
rescission of a request, is guilty of a class A felony.
(3) This chapter does not limit further liability for civil damages
resulting from other negligent conduct or intentional misconduct by any
person.
(4) The penalties in this chapter do not preclude criminal
penalties applicable under other law for conduct that is inconsistent
with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Any governmental entity that incurs costs
resulting from a person terminating his or her life under this chapter
in a public place has a claim against the estate of the person to
recover such costs and reasonable attorneys' fees related to enforcing
the claim.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A request for a medication as authorized by
this chapter must be in substantially the following form:

REQUEST FOR MEDICATION
TO END MY LIFE IN A HUMANE
AND DIGNIFIED MANNER

I, ________________, am an adult of sound mind.

I am suffering from _________, which my attending physician has
determined is a terminal disease and which has been medically confirmed
by a consulting physician.

I have been fully informed of my diagnosis, prognosis, the nature of
medication to be prescribed and potential associated risks, the
expected result, and the feasible alternatives, including comfort care,
hospice care, and pain control.

I request that my attending physician prescribe medication that will
end my life in a humane and dignified manner.

INITIAL ONE:

______ I have informed my family of my decision and taken their
opinions into consideration.

______ I have decided not to inform my family of my decision.

______ I have no family to inform of my decision.

I understand that I have the right to rescind this request at any time.

I understand the full import of this request and I expect to die when
I take the medication to be prescribed. I further understand that
although most deaths occur within three hours, my death may take longer
and my physician has counseled me about this possibility.

I make this request voluntarily and without reservation, and I accept
full moral responsibility for my actions.

Signed: ___________

Dated: ____________

DECLARATION OF WITNESSES

We declare that the person signing this request:

(1) Is personally known to us or has provided proof of identity;
(2) Signed this request in our presence;
(3) Appears to be of sound mind and not under duress, fraud, or undue
influence; and
(4) Is not a patient for whom either of us is an attending physician.

______________Witness 1/Date

______________Witness 2/Date

NOTE: One witness must not be a relative (by blood, marriage, or
adoption) of the person signing this request, may not be entitled to
any portion of the person's estate upon death, and may not own,
operate, or be employed at a health care facility where the person is
a patient or resident. If the patient is an inpatient at a health care
facility, one of the witnesses must be an individual designated by the
facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington death with dignity act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Sections 1 through 23 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

Sec. 25 RCW 42.56.360 and 2005 c 274 s 416 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following health care information is exempt from disclosure
under this chapter:
(a) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in
RCW 69.45.090;
(b) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department
of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044,
69.41.280, and 18.64.420;
(c) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee under RCW
43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250, regardless of which agency is in possession of the
information and documents;
(d)(i) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the
submitting entity, with review by the department of health,
specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with
an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption
sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310;
(ii) If a request for such information is received, the submitting
entity must be notified of the request. Within ten business days of
receipt of the notice, the submitting entity shall provide a written
statement of the continuing need for confidentiality, which shall be
provided to the requester. Upon receipt of such notice, the department
of health shall continue to treat information designated under this
subsection (1)(d) as exempt from disclosure;
(iii) If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure
under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to
demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality;
(e) Records of the entity obtained in an action under RCW 18.71.300
through 18.71.340;
(f) Except for published statistical compilations and reports
relating to the infant mortality review studies that do not identify
individual cases and sources of information, any records or documents
obtained, prepared, or maintained by the local health department for
the purposes of an infant mortality review conducted by the department
of health under RCW 70.05.170; ((and))
(g) Information collected by the department of health under chapter
70.-- RCW (sections 1 through 23 of this act) except as provided in
section 14 of this act; and
(h) Complaints filed under chapter 18.130 RCW after July 27, 1997,
to the extent provided in RCW 18.130.095(1).
(2) Chapter 70.02 RCW applies to public inspection and copying of
health care information of patients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 RCW 70.122.100 (Mercy killing or physician-assisted suicide not authorized) and 1992 c 98 s 10 & 1979 c 112 s 11
are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 Section 25 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

--- END ---