BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.21.030 and 1995 c 122 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notice required by RCW 59.20.080 before park closure or
conversion of the park, whether twelve months or longer, shall be given
to the director and all tenants in writing, and posted at all park
entrances. The notice required by RCW 59.20.080 must also meet the
following requirements:
(a) A copy of the closure notice must be provided with all month-to-month rental agreements signed after the original park closure
notice date((.));
(b) Notice to the director must include: (i) A good faith estimate
of the timetable for removal of the mobile homes ((and)); (ii) the
reason for closure((.)); and (iii) a list of the names and mailing
addresses of the current registered park tenants. Notice required
under this subsection must be sent to the director within ten business
days; and
(c) Notice must ((also)) be recorded in the office of the county
auditor for the county where the mobile home park is located.
(2) The department must mail every tenant an application and
information on relocation assistance within ten business days of
receipt of the notice required in subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.20.060 and 2002 c 63 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any mobile home space tenancy regardless of the term, shall be
based upon a written rental agreement, signed by the parties, which
shall contain:
(a) The terms for the payment of rent, including time and place,
and any additional charges to be paid by the tenant. Additional
charges that occur less frequently than monthly shall be itemized in a
billing to the tenant;
(b) Reasonable rules for guest parking which shall be clearly
stated;
(c) The rules and regulations of the park;
(d) The name and address of the person who is the landlord, and if
such person does not reside in the state there shall also be designated
by name and address a person who resides in the county where the mobile
home park is located who is authorized to act as agent for the purposes
of service of notices and process. If no designation is made of a
person to act as agent, then the person to whom rental payments are to
be made shall be considered the agent;
(e) The name and address of any party who has a secured interest in
the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model;
(f) A forwarding address of the tenant or the name and address of
a person who would likely know the whereabouts of the tenant in the
event of an emergency or an abandonment of the mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model;
(g)(i) A covenant by the landlord that, except for acts or events
beyond the control of the landlord, the mobile home park will not be
converted to a land use that will prevent the space that is the subject
of the lease from continuing to be used for its intended use for a
period of three years after the beginning of the term of the rental
agreement;
(ii) A rental agreement may, in the alternative, contain a
statement that: "The park may be sold or otherwise transferred at any
time with the result that subsequent owners may close the mobile home
park, or that the landlord may close the park at any time after the
required notice." The covenant or statement required by this
subsection must: (A) Appear in print that is in bold face and is
larger than the other text of the ((lease and must)) rental agreement;
(B) be set off by means of a box, blank space, or comparable visual
device;
((The requirements of this subsection shall apply to tenancies
initiated after April 28, 1989)) and (C) be located directly above the
tenant's signature on the rental agreement.
(h) The terms and conditions under which any deposit or portion
thereof may be withheld by the landlord upon termination of the rental
agreement if any moneys are paid to the landlord by the tenant as a
deposit or as security for performance of the tenant's obligations in
a rental agreement;
(i) A listing of the utilities, services, and facilities which will
be available to the tenant during the tenancy and the nature of the
fees, if any, to be charged;
(j) A description of the boundaries of a mobile home space
sufficient to inform the tenant of the exact location of the tenant's
space in relation to other tenants' spaces;
(k) A statement of the current zoning of the land on which the
mobile home park is located; and
(l) A statement of the expiration date of any conditional use,
temporary use, or other land use permit subject to a fixed expiration
date that is necessary for the continued use of the land as a mobile
home park.
(2) Any rental agreement executed between the landlord and tenant
shall not contain any provision:
(a) Which allows the landlord to charge a fee for guest parking
unless a violation of the rules for guest parking occurs: PROVIDED,
That a fee may be charged for guest parking which covers an extended
period of time as defined in the rental agreement;
(b) Which authorizes the towing or impounding of a vehicle except
upon notice to the owner thereof or the tenant whose guest is the owner
of the vehicle;
(c) Which allows the landlord to alter the due date for rent
payment or increase the rent: (i) During the term of the rental
agreement if the term is less than one year, or (ii) more frequently
than annually if the term is for one year or more: PROVIDED, That a
rental agreement may include an escalation clause for a pro rata share
of any increase in the mobile home park's real property taxes or
utility assessments or charges, over the base taxes or utility
assessments or charges of the year in which the rental agreement took
effect, if the clause also provides for a pro rata reduction in rent or
other charges in the event of a reduction in real property taxes or
utility assessments or charges, below the base year: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That a rental agreement for a term exceeding one year may provide for
annual increases in rent in specified amounts or by a formula specified
in such agreement;
(d) By which the tenant agrees to waive or forego rights or
remedies under this chapter;
(e) Allowing the landlord to charge an "entrance fee" or an "exit
fee." However, an entrance fee may be charged as part of a continuing
care contract as defined in RCW 70.38.025;
(f) Which allows the landlord to charge a fee for guests:
PROVIDED, That a landlord may establish rules charging for guests who
remain on the premises for more than fifteen days in any sixty-day
period;
(g) By which the tenant agrees to waive or forego homestead rights
provided by chapter 6.13 RCW. This subsection shall not prohibit such
waiver after a default in rent so long as such waiver is in writing
signed by the husband and wife or by an unmarried claimant and in
consideration of the landlord's agreement not to terminate the tenancy
for a period of time specified in the waiver if the landlord would be
otherwise entitled to terminate the tenancy under this chapter; or
(h) By which, at the time the rental agreement is entered into, the
landlord and tenant agree to the selection of a particular arbitrator.

--- END ---