BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the
application of barley straw to waters of the state for the purposes of
water clarification does not require a state waste discharge permit as
long as the following provisions are met:
(a) The barley straw is applied at a rate of up to two hundred
twenty-five pounds per acre of surface water;
(b) Whole bales or tightly packed straw are not used. Straw must
be loosely packed in nylon or mesh bags;
(c) Bags of straw are placed where control is desired, such as
around docks and swim areas, and around inlets to aid in aeration or
mixing;
(d) The bags must be staked or anchored in place;
(e) Straw is placed in early spring, prior to the growth of algae;
and
(f) Bags are removed four to six months after placement and must
not be left in the water over winter.
(2) The placement of barley straw into waters of the state in any
other instance is not authorized absent a permit.
(3) This section does not alter any permit requirement that may
exist under chapter 77.55 RCW.

--- END ---