BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.36.330 and 2003 c 53 s 401 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the approval of the director of the claim for refund, the
state treasurer shall draw a warrant upon the state treasury for the
amount of the claim in favor of the person making such claim and the
warrant shall be paid from the excise tax collected on motor vehicle
fuel: PROVIDED, That the state treasurer shall deduct from each marine
use refund claim an amount equivalent to one cent per gallon and shall
deposit the same in the coastal protection fund created by RCW
90.48.390.
(2) Applications for refunds of excise tax shall be filed in the
office of the director not later than the close of the last business
day of a period ((thirteen months)) five years from the date of
purchase of such motor fuel, and if not filed within this period the
right to refund shall be forever barred, except that such limitation
shall not apply to claims for loss or destruction of motor vehicle fuel
as provided by the provisions of RCW 82.36.370.
(3) The department shall pay interest of one percent on any refund
payable under this chapter that is issued more than thirty state
business days after the receipt of a claim properly filed and completed
in accordance with this section. After the end of the thirty business-day period, additional interest shall accrue at the rate of one percent
on the amount payable for each thirty calendar-day period, until the
refund is issued.
(4) Any person or the member of any firm or the officer or agent of
any corporation who makes any false statement in any claim required for
the refund of excise tax, as provided in this chapter, or who collects
or causes to be repaid to him or her or to any other person any such
refund without being entitled to the same under the provisions of this
chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.38.190 and 1998 c 176 s 74 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Claims under RCW 82.38.180 shall be filed with the department
on forms prescribed by the department and shall show the date of filing
and the period covered in the claim, the number of gallons of special
fuel used for purposes subject to tax refund, and such other facts and
information as may be required. Every such claim shall be supported by
an invoice or invoices issued to or by the claimant, as may be
prescribed by the department, and such other information as the
department may require. The requirement to provide invoices may be
waived for small refund amounts, as determined by the department.
Claims for refund of special fuel tax must be for at least twenty
dollars.
(2) Any amount determined to be refundable by the department under
RCW 82.38.180 shall first be credited on any amounts then due and
payable from a person to whom the refund is due, and the department
shall then certify the balance thereof to the state treasurer, who
shall thereupon draw his or her warrant for the certified amount to the
person.
(3) No refund or credit shall be approved by the department unless
a written claim for refund or credit stating the specific grounds upon
which the claim is founded is filed with the department:
(a) Within ((thirteen months)) five years from the date of purchase
or from the last day of the month following the close of the reporting
period for which the refundable amount or credit is due with respect to
refunds or credits allowable under RCW 82.38.180 (1), (2), (4), and
(5), and if not filed within this period the right to refund shall be
forever barred.
(b) Within five years from the last day of the month following the
close of the reporting period for which the overpayment is due with
respect to the refunds or credits allowable under RCW 82.38.180(3).
The department shall refund any amount paid that has been verified by
the department to be more than ten dollars over the amount actually due
for the reporting period. Payment credits shall not be carried forward
and applied to subsequent tax returns for a person licensed under this
chapter.
(4) Within thirty days after disallowing any claim in whole or in
part, the department shall serve written notice of its action on the
claimant.
(5) Interest shall be paid upon any refundable amount or credit due
under RCW 82.38.180(3) at the rate of one percent per month from the
last day of the calendar month following the reporting period for which
the refundable amount or credit is due.
The interest shall be paid:
(a) In the case of a refund, to the last day of the calendar month
following the date upon which the person making the overpayment, if he
or she has not already filed a claim, is notified by the department
that a claim may be filed or the date upon which the claim is approved
by the department, whichever date is earlier.
(b) In the case of a credit, to the same date as that to which
interest is computed on the tax or amount against which the credit is
applied.
If the department determines that any overpayment has been made
intentionally or by reason of carelessness, it shall not allow any
interest thereon.
(6) The department shall pay interest of one percent on any refund
payable under RCW 82.38.180 (1), (2), or (6) that is issued more than
thirty state business days after the receipt of a claim properly filed
and completed in accordance with this section. After the end of the
thirty business-day period, additional interest shall accrue at the
rate of one percent on the amount payable for each thirty calendar-day
period, until the refund is issued.
(7) No injunction or writ of mandate or other legal or equitable
process shall issue in any suit, action or proceeding in any court
against this state or against any officer of the state to prevent or
enjoin the collection under this chapter of any tax or any amount of
tax required to be collected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to motor vehicle fuel and
special fuel purchased on or after the effective date of this act.

--- END ---