BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.27.010 and 2001 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1)(a) "Contractor" means any person, firm, or corporation who or
which, in the pursuit of an independent business undertakes to, or
offers to undertake, or submits a bid to, construct, alter, repair, add
to, subtract from, improve, move, wreck or demolish, for another, any
building, highway, road, railroad, excavation or other structure,
project, development, or improvement attached to real estate or to do
any part thereof including the installation of carpeting or other floor
covering, the erection of scaffolding or other structures or works in
connection therewith or who installs or repairs roofing or siding; or,
who, to do similar work upon his or her own property, employs members
of more than one trade upon a single job or project or under a single
building permit except as otherwise provided herein.
(b) Solely for the purposes of RCW 18.27.200 (2) and (3) and
18.27.340(3)(b), "contractor" includes any party that retains the
services of a general contractor or specialty contractor to alter,
repair, or improve an existing residential homeowner owned and occupied
structure that has been damaged by an accident, fire, or weather-related or other natural event.
(c) "Contractor" includes any person, firm, corporation, or other
entity covered by this subsection, whether or not registered as
required under this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries or designated representative employed by the department.
(4) "General contractor" means a contractor whose business
operations require the use of more than two unrelated building trades
or crafts whose work the contractor shall superintend or do in whole or
in part. "General contractor" shall not include an individual who does
all work personally without employees or other "specialty contractors"
as defined in this section. The terms "general contractor" and
"builder" are synonymous.
(5) "Partnership" means a business formed under Title 25 RCW.
(6) "Registration cancellation" means a written notice from the
department that a contractor's action is in violation of this chapter
and that the contractor's registration has been revoked.
(7) "Registration suspension" means a written notice from the
department that a contractor's action is a violation of this chapter
and that the contractor's registration has been suspended for a
specified time, or until the contractor shows evidence of compliance
with this chapter.
(8) "Residential homeowner" means an individual person or persons
owning or leasing real property:
(a) Upon which one single-family residence is to be built and in
which the owner or lessee intends to reside upon completion of any
construction; or
(b) Upon which there is a single-family residence to which
improvements are to be made and in which the owner or lessee intends to
reside upon completion of any construction.
(9) "Specialty contractor" means a contractor whose operations do
not fall within the definition of "general contractor".
(10) "Unregistered contractor" means a person, firm, corporation,
or other entity doing work as a contractor without being registered in
compliance with this chapter. "Unregistered contractor" includes
contractors whose registration is expired, revoked, or suspended.
"Unregistered contractor" does not include a contractor who has
maintained a valid bond and the insurance or assigned account required
by RCW 18.27.050, and whose registration has lapsed for thirty or fewer
days.
(11) "Unsatisfied final judgment" means a judgment that has not
been satisfied either through payment, court approved settlement,
discharge in bankruptcy, or assignment under RCW 19.72.070.
(12) "Verification" means the receipt and duplication by the city,
town, or county of a contractor registration card that is current on
its face, checking the department's contractor registration data base,
or calling the department to confirm that the contractor is registered.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.27.020 and 1997 c 314 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every contractor shall register with the department.
(2) It is a misdemeanor for any contractor to:
(a) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor without being registered as required by this chapter;
(b) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor when the contractor's registration is suspended or
revoked;
(c) Use a false or expired registration number in purchasing or
offering to purchase an advertisement for which a contractor
registration number is required; or
(d) Transfer a valid registration to an unregistered contractor or
allow an unregistered contractor to work under a registration issued to
another contractor.
(3) It is (a) unlawful for a general contractor to employ an
unregistered contractor; but (b) not unlawful for a general contractor
to employ an unregistered contractor who was registered at the time he
or she entered into a contract with the general contractor, unless the
general contractor or his or her representative has been notified in
writing by the department of labor and industries that the contractor
has become unregistered.
(4) All misdemeanor actions under this chapter shall be prosecuted
in the county where the infraction occurs.
(5) A person is guilty of a separate misdemeanor for each day
worked if, after the person receives a citation from the department,
the person works while unregistered, or while his or her registration
is suspended or revoked, or works under a registration issued to
another contractor. A person is guilty of a separate misdemeanor for
each worksite on which he or she violates subsection (2) of this
section. Nothing in this subsection applies to a registered
contractor.
(6) The director by rule shall establish a two-year audit and
monitoring program for a contractor not registered under this chapter
who becomes registered after receiving an infraction or conviction
under this chapter as an unregistered contractor. The director shall
notify the departments of revenue and employment security of the
infractions or convictions and shall cooperate with these departments
to determine whether any taxes or registration, license, or other fees
or penalties are owed the state.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.27.200 and 2002 c 82 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a violation of this chapter and an infraction for any
contractor to:
(a) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor without being registered as required by this chapter;
(b) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor when the contractor's registration is suspended or
revoked;
(c) Transfer a valid registration to an unregistered contractor or
allow an unregistered contractor to work under a registration issued to
another contractor; or
(d) If the contractor is a contractor as defined in RCW 18.106.010,
violate RCW 18.106.320.
(2) It is a violation of this chapter and an infraction for any
contractor to employ an unregistered contractor. It is not a violation
for a contractor to employ an unregistered contractor who was
registered at the time he or she entered into a contract with the
general contractor, unless the contractor or his or her representative
has been notified in writing by the department of labor and industries
that the contractor has become unregistered.
(3) Each day that a contractor works without being registered as
required by this chapter, works while the contractor's registration is
suspended or revoked, employs an unregistered contractor, or works
under a registration issued to another contractor is a separate
infraction. Each worksite at which a contractor works without being
registered as required by this chapter, works while the contractor's
registration is suspended or revoked, or works under a registration
issued to another contractor is a separate infraction.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.27.340 and 1997 c 314 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
a contractor found to have committed an infraction under RCW 18.27.200
shall be assessed a monetary penalty of not less than two hundred
dollars and not more than five thousand dollars.
(2) The director may waive collection in favor of payment of
restitution to a consumer complainant.
(3) A contractor found to have committed an infraction under RCW
18.27.200 for:
(a) Failure to register; or
(b) Employing an unregistered contractor,
shall be assessed a fine of not less than one thousand dollars, nor
more than five thousand dollars. The director may reduce the penalty
for failure to register, but in no case below five hundred dollars, if
the person becomes registered within ten days of receiving a notice of
infraction and the notice of infraction is for a first offense. The
director may reduce the penalty for employing an unregistered
contractor, but in no case may reduce the penalty below seven hundred
fifty dollars, if the notice of infraction is for a first offense for
employing an unregistered contractor.
(4) Monetary penalties collected under this chapter shall be
deposited in the general fund.

--- END ---