BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.34.090 and 2002 c 164 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, the legislature
shall approve names for new or existing buildings on the state capitol
grounds based upon recommendations from the state capitol committee and
the director of the department of general administration, with the
advice of the capitol campus design advisory committee, subject to the
following limitations:
(a) An existing building may be renamed only after a substantial
renovation or a change in the predominant tenant agency headquartered
in the building.
(b) A new or existing building may be named or renamed after:
(i) An individual who has played a significant role in Washington
history;
(ii) The purpose of the building;
(iii) The single or predominant tenant agency headquartered in the
building;
(iv) A significant place name or natural place in Washington;
(v) A Native American tribe located in Washington;
(vi) A group of people or type of person;
(vii) Any other appropriate person consistent with this section as
recommended by the director of the department of general
administration.
(c) The names on the facades of the state capitol group shall not
be removed.
(d) The John A. Cherberg building is hereby renamed the John A.
Cherberg-Sid Snyder building and the Irving R. Newhouse building is
hereby renamed the Irving R. Newhouse-Jeannette Hayner building.
(2) The legislature shall approve names for new or existing public
rooms or spaces on the west capitol campus based upon recommendations
from the state capitol committee and the director of the department of
general administration, with the advice of the capitol campus design
advisory committee, subject to the following limitations:
(a) An existing room or space may be renamed only after a
substantial renovation;
(b) A new or existing room or space may be named or renamed only
after:
(i) An individual who has played a significant role in Washington
history;
(ii) The purpose of the room or space;
(iii) A significant place name or natural place in Washington;
(iv) A Native American tribe located in Washington;
(v) A group of people or type of person;
(vi) Any other appropriate person consistent with this section as
recommended by the director of the department of general
administration.
(3) When naming or renaming buildings, rooms, and spaces under this
section, consideration must be given to: (a) Any disparity that exists
with respect to the gender of persons after whom buildings, rooms, and
spaces are named on the state capitol grounds; (b) the diversity of
human achievement; and (c) the diversity of the state's citizenry and
history.
(4) For purposes of this section, "state capitol grounds" means
buildings and land owned by the state and otherwise designated as state
capitol grounds, including the west capitol campus, the east capitol
campus, the north capitol campus, the Tumwater campus, the Lacey
campus, Sylvester Park, Centennial Park, the Old Capitol Building, and
Capitol Lake.

Sec. 2 RCW 27.48.040 and 1999 c 343 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this section.
(a) "State capitol group" includes the legislative building, the
insurance building, the John A. Cherberg-Sid Snyder building, the John
L. O'Brien building, the Irving R. Newhouse-Jeannette Hayner building,
and the temple of justice building.
(b) "Historic furnishings" means furniture, fixtures, and artwork
fifty years of age or older.
(2) The capitol furnishings preservation committee is established
to promote and encourage the recovery and preservation of the original
and historic furnishings of the state capitol group, prevent future
loss of historic furnishings, and review and advise future remodeling
and restoration projects as they pertain to historic furnishings. The
committee's authority does not extend to the placement of any historic
furnishings within the state capitol group.
(3) The capitol furnishings preservation committee account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts designated
for the account from appropriations and from other sources must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only to finance the activities of the capitol furnishings preservation
committee. Only the director of the Washington state historical
society or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account when authorized to do so by the committee. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(4) The committee may:
(a) Authorize the director of the Washington state historical
society or the director's designee to expend funds from the capitol
furnishings preservation committee account for limited purposes of
purchasing and preserving historic furnishings of the state capitol
group;
(b) Accept monetary donations, grants, and donations of historic
furnishings from, but not limited to, (i) current and former
legislators, state officials, and lobbyists; (ii) the families of
former legislators, state officials, and lobbyists; and (iii) the
general public. Moneys received under this section must be deposited
in the capitol furnishings preservation committee account; and
(c) Engage in or encourage fund-raising activities including the
solicitation of charitable gifts, grants, or donations specifically for
the limited purpose of the recovery of the original and historic
furnishings.
(5) The membership of the committee shall include: Two members of
the house of representatives, one from each major caucus, appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives; two members of the senate,
one from each major caucus, appointed by the president of the senate;
the chief clerk of the house of representatives; the secretary of the
senate; the governor or the governor's designee; the lieutenant
governor or the lieutenant governor's designee; a representative from
the office of the secretary of state, the office of the state
treasurer, the office of the state auditor, and the office of the
insurance commissioner; a representative from the supreme court; a
representative from the Washington state historical society, the
department of general administration, and the Thurston county planning
council, each appointed by the governor; and three private citizens,
appointed by the governor.
(6) Original or historic furnishings from the state capitol group
are not surplus property under chapter 43.19 RCW or other authority
unless designated as such by the committee.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.24.710 and 2005 c 330 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 79.24.720, 79.24.730, 43.01.090, 43.19.500,
and 79.24.087, "state capitol public and historic facilities" includes:
(1) The east, west and north capitol campus grounds, Sylvester
park, Heritage park, Marathon park, Centennial park, the Deschutes
river basin commonly known as Capitol lake, the interpretive center,
Deschutes parkway, and the landscape, memorials, artwork, fountains,
streets, sidewalks, lighting, and infrastructure in each of these areas
not including state-owned aquatic lands in these areas managed by the
department of natural resources under RCW ((79.90.450)) 79.105.010;
(2) The public spaces and the historic interior and exterior
elements of the following buildings: The visitor center, the
Governor's mansion, the legislative building, the John L. O'Brien
building, the John A. Cherberg-Sid Snyder building, the Irving R.
Newhouse-Jeannette Hayner building, the Pritchard building, the temple
of justice, the insurance building, the Dolliver building, capitol
court, and the old capitol buildings, including the historic state-owned furnishings and works of art commissioned for or original to
these buildings; and
(3) Other facilities or elements of facilities as determined by the
state capitol committee, in consultation with the department of general
administration.

--- END ---