BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that dishonest
construction contractors sometimes hire persons without proper
licensing and certification to do electrical, plumbing, and conveyance
work. This practice gives honest contractors an unfair competitive
disadvantage and leaves workers and customers vulnerable. Requiring
persons with proper licensing and certification to visibly display
their licenses and certificates while doing such work will help address
the problems of the underground economy in the construction industry,
level the playing field for honest contractors, and protect workers and
consumers.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27.050 and 1985 c 360 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The counties and cities shall enforce the state building code
required by this chapter ((shall be enforced by the counties and
cities)), and refer alleged or apparent violations of sections 4 and 6
of this act to the department of labor and industries for investigation
and appropriate enforcement action. Any county or city not having a
building department shall contract with another county, city, or
inspection agency approved by the county or city for enforcement of the
state building code within its jurisdictional boundaries.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.106.170 and 1983 c 124 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An authorized representative of the department may investigate
alleged or apparent violations of this chapter, and shall investigate
referrals of alleged or apparent violations of subsection (2) of this
section from local government officials charged with the duty to
enforce building codes under chapter 19.27 RCW. An authorized
representative of the department upon presentation of credentials may
inspect sites at which a person is doing plumbing work for the purpose
of determining whether that person has a certificate or permit issued
by the department in accordance with this chapter or is supervised by
a person who has such a certificate or permit. ((Upon request of the
authorized representative of the department,))
(2) A person doing plumbing work shall ((produce evidence that the
person has a)) wear and visibly display his or her certificate or
permit ((issued by the department in accordance with this chapter or is
supervised by a person who has such a certificate or permit)) while
doing such work. A person doing plumbing work need not wear and
visibly display his or her certificate or permit if doing so would
create a danger or unsafe condition for the person or for the public,
as long as the person can produce evidence that he or she has a
certificate or permit to an authorized representative of the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 19.28 RCW
to read as follows:
Certificate holders shall wear and visibly display their
certificates while engaging in the electrical construction trade. A
certificate holder need not wear and visibly display his or her
certificate if doing so would create a danger or unsafe condition for
the certificate holder or for the public, as long as the certificate
holder can demonstrate proof of his or her certificate to electrical
inspectors appointed by the director of labor and industries and by the
officials of incorporated cities and towns where electrical inspections
are required by local ordinances.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.28.251 and 2001 c 211 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director may ((promulgate)) adopt rules, make specific
decisions, orders, and rulings, including demands and findings, and
take other necessary action for the implementation and enforcement of
RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271. The director shall investigate
referrals of alleged or apparent violations of section 4 of this act
from local government officials charged with the duty to enforce
building codes under chapter 19.27 RCW. In the administration of RCW
19.28.161 through 19.28.271 the department shall not enter any
controversy arising over work assignments with respect to the trades
involved in the construction industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 70.87 RCW
to read as follows:
Licensees shall wear and visibly display their licenses while
performing conveyance work. A licensee need not wear and visibly
display his or her license if doing so would create a danger or unsafe
condition for the licensee or for the public, as long as the licensee
can demonstrate proof of his or her license to an elevator inspector of
the department or an elevator inspector of a municipality having in
effect an elevator ordinance under RCW 70.87.200.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.87.120 and 1998 c 137 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall appoint and employ inspectors, as may be
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, under the
provisions of the rules adopted by the Washington personnel resources
board in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the department
shall cause all conveyances to be inspected and tested at least once
each year. Inspectors have the right during reasonable hours to enter
into and upon any building or premises in the discharge of their
official duties, for the purpose of making any inspection or testing
any conveyance contained thereon or therein. Inspections and tests
shall conform with the rules adopted by the department. The department
shall inspect all installations before it issues any initial permit for
operation. Permits shall not be issued until the fees required by this
chapter have been paid.
(b)(i) Private residence conveyances operated exclusively for
single-family use shall be inspected and tested only when required
under RCW 70.87.100 or as necessary for the purposes of subsection (4)
of this section and shall be exempt from RCW 70.87.090 unless an annual
inspection and operating permit are requested by the owner.
(ii) The department may perform additional inspections of a private
residence conveyance at the request of the owner of the conveyance.
Fees for these inspections shall be in accordance with the schedule of
fees adopted for operating permits pursuant to RCW 70.87.030. An
inspection requested under this subsection (2)(b)(ii) shall not be
performed until the required fees have been paid.
(3) If inspection shows a conveyance to be in an unsafe condition,
the department shall issue an inspection report in writing requiring
the repairs or alterations to be made to the conveyance that are
necessary to render it safe and may also suspend or revoke a permit
pursuant to RCW 70.87.125 or order the operation of a conveyance
discontinued pursuant to RCW 70.87.145.
(a) A penalty may be assessed under RCW 70.87.185 for failure to
correct a violation within ninety days after the owner is notified in
writing of inspection results.
(b) The owner may be assessed a penalty under RCW 70.87.185 for
failure to submit official notification in writing to the department
that all corrections have been completed.
(4) The department may investigate accidents and alleged or
apparent violations of this chapter, and shall investigate referrals of
alleged or apparent violations of section 6 of this act from local
government officials charged with the duty to enforce building codes
under chapter 19.27 RCW.

--- END ---