BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that approximately
twelve thousand Washington residents who meet eligibility criteria for
the department of social and health services division of developmental
disabilities do not receive any paid services from the division. The
legislature also finds that little is known about the services these
individuals need, or how the needs of these individuals differ from
those who currently receive services from the division.
The legislature also finds that the division of developmental
disabilities has begun to implement changes in assessment processes
according to recommendations of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. These changes will eventually allow the division to assess
the needs of the twelve thousand clients eligible for services.
The legislature finds that the governor and the legislature need
reliable information about service needs to consider any policy changes
for services for individuals with developmental disabilities during the
2005-2007 and 2007-2009 biennia. The legislature intends that
sufficient assessments be performed by the division of developmental
disabilities, that the results of the assessments may be studied by the
Washington state institute for public policy, and that the study will
assist in determining the type and level of service needs for
individuals with developmental disabilities statewide.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The Washington institute for public policy
shall conduct a study and comparison of the characteristics and service
needs of clients of the division of developmental disabilities who are
not receiving paid services by the division and those who are receiving
paid services. The institute shall design a sampling strategy to guide
the department of social and health services in conducting assessments
such that assessment data would be available on a statistically valid
sample of the clients not receiving paid services by the division of
developmental disabilities to compare to a sample of clients receiving
paid services.
Not later than November 1, 2006, the institute shall report to the
governor and the legislature including, but not necessarily limited to:
(1) The nature and severity of the service needs of clients
receiving and not receiving paid services by the division;
(2) Demographic information, including income information, for
those receiving and not receiving paid services by the division;
(3) An analysis of the differences between the two groups.
Not later than June 30, 2007, the institute shall provide a six-year estimate of service needs of the state's population of individuals
with developmental disabilities, done in conjunction with the caseload
forecast council.

--- END ---