BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.170 and 2005 c 418 s 3, 2005 c 225 s 4, 2005 c
224 s 4, and 2005 c 42 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) There is established in the state treasury the state wildlife
account which consists of moneys received from:
(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;
(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department
purposes;
(c) The assessment of administrative penalties, and the sale of
licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by chapter 77.32 RCW ((and
RCW 77.65.490, except annual resident adult saltwater and all annual
razor clam and shellfish licenses, which shall be deposited into the
state general fund));
(d) Fees for informational materials published by the department;
(e) Fees for personalized vehicle, Wild on Washington, and
Endangered Wildlife license plates and Washington's Wildlife license
plate collection as provided in chapter 46.16 RCW;
(f) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this title;
(g) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife
losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320;
(h) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter
82.27 RCW;
(i) The sale of personal property seized by the department for
fish, shellfish, or wildlife violations;
(j) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles
authorized by the commission; ((and))
(k) The sale of watchable wildlife decals under RCW 77.32.560; and
(l) The sale of commercial licenses and permits required under this
title.
(2) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury
to be credited to the state wildlife account.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.177 and 2001 c 253 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this title, state and county officers
receiving ((the following)) moneys for damages to food fish or
shellfish shall deposit them in the state general fund((:
(a) The sale of commercial licenses required under this title,
except for licenses issued under RCW 77.65.490; and
(b) Moneys received for damages to food fish or shellfish)).
(2) The director shall make weekly remittances to the state
treasurer of moneys collected by the department.
(3) All fines and forfeitures collected or assessed by a district
court for a violation of this title or rule of the department shall be
remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW.
(4) Proceeds from the sale of food fish or shellfish taken in test
fishing conducted by the department, to the extent that these proceeds
exceed the estimates in the budget approved by the legislature, may be
allocated as unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.270 to reimburse
the department for unanticipated costs for test fishing operations in
excess of the allowance in the budget approved by the legislature.
(5) Proceeds from the sale of salmon carcasses and salmon eggs from
state general funded hatcheries by the department of general
administration shall be deposited in the regional fisheries enhancement
group account established in RCW 77.95.090.
(6) Moneys received by the commission under RCW 77.12.039, to the
extent these moneys exceed estimates in the budget approved by the
legislature, may be allocated as unanticipated receipts under RCW
43.79.270. Allocations under this subsection shall be made only for
the specific purpose for which the moneys were received, unless the
moneys were received in settlement of a claim for damages to food fish
or shellfish, in which case the moneys may be expended for the
conservation of these resources.
(7) Proceeds from the sale of herring spawn on kelp fishery
licenses by the department, to the extent those proceeds exceed
estimates in the budget approved by the legislature, may be allocated
as unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.270. Allocations under this
subsection shall be made only for herring management, enhancement, and
enforcement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 77.32.510 (Recreational license fees--Disposition of appropriation) and 1998 c 191 s 43 are each repealed.

--- END ---