BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington has
long been one of the nation's premier centers for the medical device
and biotechnology industries, but that the growth in life sciences jobs
in the state has stagnated since 2002. The legislature further finds
that the state lags in investments in medical device and biotechnology
manufacturing and has a relatively low supply of advanced degrees in
the life sciences. It is the intent of the legislature to identify
weaknesses in the state's support for the life sciences and to craft a
comprehensive strategy and implementation plan for growth in the life
sciences sector of the state's economy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) The joint legislative task force on
life sciences is established. The task force shall consist of the
following voting members:
(i) One member from each caucus of the senate, appointed by the
president of the senate;
(ii) One member from each caucus of the house of representatives,
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(iii) Nine members appointed jointly by the president of the senate
and the speaker of the house of representatives as follows:
(A) Three members representing life sciences industries. One of
these members shall represent private research and development firms,
one shall represent venture capital firms, and one shall represent a
manufacturing firm;
(B) Two members representing academic institutions;
(C) One member representing a facility incubating life sciences
businesses;
(D) One member representing a life sciences industry association;
and
(E) One member representing a local government with model permit
issuance processes.
(b) The task force shall choose bipartisan cochairs from among its
legislative members.
(2) The task force shall review the weaknesses in the state's
capacity to support development and growth of the life sciences sector
and develop a comprehensive strategy and implementation plan to:
(a) Enhance the life sciences research and development capacity in
the state;
(b) Foster university-industry collaboration;
(c) Promote networking;
(d) Increase the supply of risk capital;
(e) Increase the number of research parks, incubators, and other
facilities;
(f) Enhance the business environment; and
(g) Encourage permit streamlining.
(3)(a) The task force shall use legislative facilities, and staff
support shall be provided by senate committee services and the house of
representatives office of program research.
(b) The task force may hire additional staff or contract with
additional persons who have specific technical expertise if such
expertise is necessary to carry out the mandates of the study.
(4) The expenses of the task force shall be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(5) The task force shall complete its work by December 15, 2006.
(6) This section expires December 31, 2006.

--- END ---