BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 88.16.035 and 2005 c 26 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of pilotage commissioners shall:
(((1))) (a) Adopt rules, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary
for the enforcement and administration of this chapter;
(((2)(a))) (b)(i) Issue training licenses and pilot licenses to
pilot applicants meeting the qualifications provided for in RCW
88.16.090 and such additional qualifications as may be determined by
the board;
(((b))) (ii) Establish a comprehensive training program to assist
in the training and evaluation of pilot applicants before final
licensing; and
(((c))) (iii) Establish additional training requirements, including
a program of continuing education developed after consultation with
pilot organizations, including those located within the state of
Washington, as required to maintain a competent pilotage service;
(((3))) (c) Maintain a register of pilots, records of pilot
accidents and other history pertinent to pilotage, along with a roster
of vessels, agents, owners, operators, and masters necessary for the
maintenance of a roster of persons interested in and concerned with
pilotage and maritime safety;
(((4))) (d) Determine from time to time the number of pilots
necessary to be licensed in each district of the state to optimize the
operation of a safe, fully regulated, efficient, and competent pilotage
service in each district;
(((5))) (e) Annually fix the pilotage tariffs for pilotage services
performed aboard vessels as required by this chapter: PROVIDED, That
the board may fix extra compensation for extra services to vessels in
distress, for awaiting vessels, or for being carried to sea on vessels
against the will of the pilot, and for such other services as may be
determined by the board;
(((6))) (f) File annually with the governor and the chairs of the
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives a
report which includes, but is not limited to, the following: The
number, names, addresses, ages, pilot license number, training license
number, and years of service as a Washington licensed pilot of any
person licensed by the board as a Washington state pilot or trainee;
the names, employment, and other information of the members of the
board; the total number of pilotage assignments by pilotage district,
including information concerning the various types and sizes of vessels
and the total annual tonnage; the annual earnings or stipends of
individual pilots and trainees before and after deduction for expenses
of pilot organizations, including extra compensation as a separate
category; the annual expenses of private pilot associations, including
personnel employed and capital expenditures; the status of pilotage
tariffs, extra compensation, and travel; the retirement contributions
paid to pilots and the disposition thereof; the number of groundings,
mishaps, or other incidents which are reported to or investigated by
the board, and which are determined to be accidents, as defined by the
board, including the vessel name, location of incident, pilot's or
trainee's name, and disposition of the case together with information
received before the board acted from all persons concerned, including
the United States coast guard; the names, qualifications, time
scheduled for examinations, and the district of persons desiring to
apply for Washington state pilotage licenses; summaries of dispatch
records, quarterly reports from pilots, and the bylaws and operating
rules of pilotage organizations; the names, sizes in deadweight tons,
surcharges, if any, port of call, name of the pilot or trainee, and
names and horsepower of tug boats for any and all oil tankers subject
to the provisions of RCW 88.16.190 together with the names of any and
all vessels for which the United States coast guard requires special
handling pursuant to their authority under the Ports and Waterways
Safety Act of 1972; the expenses of the board; and any and all other
information which the board deems appropriate to include;
(((7))) (g) Publish a manual which includes the pilotage act and
other statutes of Washington state and the federal government which
affect pilotage, including the rules of the board, together with such
additional information as may be informative for pilots, agents,
owners, operators, and masters. Such manual shall be distributed
without cost to all pilots and governmental agencies upon request. All
other copies shall be sold for a five dollar fee with proceeds to be
credited to the pilotage account;
(((8))) (h) Appoint advisory committees and employ marine experts
as necessary to carry out its duties under this chapter;
(((9))) (i) Provide for the maintenance of efficient and competent
pilotage service on all waters covered by this chapter; and do such
other things as are reasonable, necessary, and expedient to insure
proper and safe pilotage upon the waters covered by this chapter and
facilitate the efficient administration of this chapter.
(2) The board may pay stipends to pilot trainees under subsection
(1)(b) of this section.

Sec. 2 2005 c 313 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS
Pilotage Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($417,000))
$1,017,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $500,000 of the appropriation is provided
solely for stipends to trainees in the training program as set forth in
rules adopted by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is intended to clarify the
authority of the board of pilotage commissioners to pay stipends to
pilot trainees that have indicated they wish to receive a stipend
during the board of pilotage commissioners' training program. Section
1 of this act is remedial and curative in nature and applies
retroactively to December 1, 2005. Specifically, the board may pay
stipends, pursuant to the rules established by the board, to any pilot
trainees that qualified for the stipends on, or after, December 1,
2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---