BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.95A.080 and 2002 c 248 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every ((authority)) city with a population of five hundred
sixty thousand or more, regional transit authority created pursuant to
RCW 81.112.030, or county with a population of one million or more has
the power to levy and collect a special excise tax not exceeding two
and one-half percent on the value of every motor vehicle owned by a
resident of ((the authority area)) a city with a population over five
hundred sixty thousand for the privilege of using a motor vehicle.
((Before utilization of any excise tax money collected under this
section for acquisition of right of way or construction of a public
monorail transportation facility on a separate right of way, the
authority must adopt rules affording the public an opportunity for
corridor public hearings and design public hearings, which provide in
detail the procedures necessary for public participation in the
following instances: (a) Prior to adoption of location and design
plans having a substantial social, economic, or environmental effect
upon the locality upon which they are to be constructed; or (b) on the
public transportation facilities operating on a separate right of way
whenever a substantial change is proposed relating to location or
design in the adopted plan. In adopting rules the authority must
adhere to the provisions of the administrative procedure act.
(2) A "corridor public hearing" is a public hearing that: (a) Is
held before the authority is committed to a specific route proposal for
the public transportation facility, and before a route location is
established; (b) is held to afford an opportunity for participation by
those interested in the determination of the need for, and the location
of, the public transportation facility; and (c) provides a public forum
that affords a full opportunity for presenting views on the public
transportation facility route location, and the social, economic, and
environmental effects on that location and alternate locations.
However, the hearing is not deemed to be necessary before adoption of
a transportation plan as provided in section 7 of this act or a vote of
the qualified electors under subsection (5) of this section.
(3) A "design public hearing" is a public hearing that: (a) Is
held after the location is established but before the design is
adopted; (b) is held to afford an opportunity for participation by
those interested in the determination of major design features of the
public monorail transportation facility; and (c) provides a public
forum to afford a full opportunity for presenting views on the public
transportation system design, and the social, economic, and
environmental effects of that design and alternate designs, including
people-mover technology)) The special excise tax levied and collected
by a city, regional transit authority, or county must be used solely
for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of acquiring,
designing, constructing, equipping, maintaining, operating, or
contracting for the service thereof, of public high capacity rapid
transportation facilities west of any major interstate and high
capacity transportation facility in existence on or under construction
as of the effective date of this act, within the city. The special
excise tax may also be used to pay or secure the payment of all or part
of the principal of or interest on any general obligation bonds or
revenue bonds issued for the construction of high capacity rapid
transportation purposes in the city, as described above.
(((4) An authority imposing)) (2) A jurisdiction authorized to
impose a tax under subsection (1) of this section may also impose a
sales and use tax, in addition to any tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030,
upon retail car rentals within the city that are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of tax must not exceed
1.944 percent of the base of the tax. The base of the tax will be the
selling price in the case of a sales tax or the rental value of the
vehicle used in the case of a use tax. The revenue collected under
this subsection will be distributed in the same manner as sales and use
taxes under chapter 82.14 RCW.
(((5))) (3) Before ((any authority)) a city, regional transit
authority, or county may impose any of the taxes authorized under this
section, the authorization for imposition of the taxes must be approved
by the qualified electors of the ((authority area)) city.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.95A.090 and 2002 c 248 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every ((authority)) city with a population of five hundred
sixty thousand or more, regional transit authority created pursuant to
RCW 81.112.030, or county with a population of one million or more has
the power to fix and impose a fee, not to exceed one hundred dollars
per vehicle, for each vehicle that is subject to ((relicensing tab))
licensing fees under RCW 46.16.0621 and for each vehicle that is
subject to RCW 46.16.070 with an unladen weight of six thousand pounds
or less, and that is determined by the department of licensing to be
registered within the boundaries of the ((authority area)) city. ((The
department of licensing must provide an exemption from the fee for any
vehicle the owner of which demonstrates is not operated within the
authority area.))
(2) The department of licensing will administer and collect the
fee. The department will deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected, for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining
proceeds will be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer for
monthly distribution to the ((authority)) jurisdiction imposing the
fee.
(3) The ((authority)) jurisdiction imposing this fee will delay the
effective date at least six months from the date the fee is approved by
the qualified voters of the ((authority area)) city to allow the
department of licensing to implement administration and collection of
the fee.
(4) Before any ((authority)) jurisdiction may impose any of the
fees authorized under this section, the authorization for imposition of
the fees must be approved by a majority of the qualified electors of
the ((authority area)) city voting.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.95A.120 and 2003 c 147 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The city transportation authority may be dissolved by a vote of
the people residing within the boundaries of the authority if the
authority is faced with significant financial problems. However, the
authority may covenant with holders of its bonds that it may not be
dissolved and shall continue to exist solely for the purpose of
continuing to levy and collect any taxes or assessments levied by it
and pledged to the repayment of debt and to take other actions,
including the appointment of a trustee, as necessary to allow it to
repay any remaining debt. No such debt may be incurred by the
authority on a project until thirty days after a final environmental
impact statement on that project has been issued as required by chapter
43.21C RCW. The amount of the authority's initial bond issue is
limited to the amount of the project costs in the subsequent two years
as documented by a certified engineer or by submitted bids, plus any
reimbursable capital expenses already incurred at the time of the bond
issue. The authority may size the first bond issue consistent with the
internal revenue service five-year spend down schedule if an
independent financial advisor recommends such an approach is
financially advisable. Any referendum petition to dissolve the city
transportation authority must be filed with the city council and
contain provisions for dissolution of the authority. Within seven
days, the city prosecutor must review the validity of the petition and
submit its report to the petitioner and city council. If the
petitioner's claims are deemed valid by the city prosecutor, within ten
days of the petitioner's filing, the city council will confer with the
petitioner concerning the form and style of the petition, issue an
identification number for the petition, and write a ballot title for
the measure. The ballot title must be posed as a question and an
affirmative vote on the measure results in authority retention and a
negative vote on the measure results in the authority's dissolution.
The petitioner will be notified of the identification number and ballot
title within this ten-day period.
After this notification, the petitioner has ninety days in which to
secure on petition forms, the signatures of not less than fifteen
percent of the registered voters in the authority area and to file the
signed petitions with the filing officer. Each petition form must
contain the ballot title and the full text of the measure to be
referred. The filing officer will verify the sufficiency of the
signatures on the petitions. If sufficient valid signatures are
properly submitted, the filing officer shall submit the initiative to
the authority area voters at a general or special election held on one
of the dates provided in RCW ((29.13.010)) 29A.04.321 as determined by
the city council, which election will not take place later than one
hundred twenty days after the signed petition has been filed with the
filing officer.
(2) The governing body of a city transportation authority shall
dissolve the authority if a majority of the qualified electors voting
at a regular or special election has determined that no new public
monorail transportation facilities shall be built.
(a) Upon the governing body's approval of the dissolution of the
authority, the authority shall continue to exist solely for the
purposes of continuing to levy and collect any taxes or assessments
levied by it and pledged to the repayment of debt and taking other
actions necessary to allow the authority to satisfy any remaining
obligations and liabilities, liquidate any assets, and wind up the
affairs of the authority. Such actions may include, without
limitation:
(i) Appointing a trustee or other agent to liquidate the assets of
the authority, including by the exchange, sale, or other disposal of
all property, real and personal, of the authority;
(ii) Providing for the retention of the records of the authority
for the term required by law;
(iii) Defending or settling any claims against the authority;
(iv) Discharging or making provision for discharging the
liabilities of the authority; and
(v) Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate the
business and affairs of the authority.
(b) A dissolved authority may dispose of the known claims against
it by following the procedure described in this subsection. The
dissolved authority shall notify its known claimants in writing of the
dissolution at any time after the governing body's approval of the
dissolution. The written notice must:
(i) Describe information that must be included in a claim;
(ii) Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;
(iii) State the deadline, which may not be fewer than one hundred
twenty days from the effective date of the written notice, by which the
dissolved authority must receive the claim; and
(iv) State that the claim will be barred if not received by the
deadline.
A claim against the dissolved authority is barred if a claimant who
was given written notice under this subsection (2)(b) does not deliver
the claim to the dissolved authority by the deadline; or if a claimant
whose claim was rejected by the dissolved authority does not commence
a proceeding to enforce the claim within ninety days from the effective
date of the rejection notice. For purposes of this subsection, "claim"
does not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event
occurring after the governing body's approval of the dissolution.
(c) When the governing body determines that all debts of the
authority have been repaid, that all remaining obligations and
liabilities have been satisfied or adequately provided for, and the
period for claims to be made under (b) of this subsection has passed,
it shall cease levying and shall direct the cessation of collecting any
and all taxes and assessments as soon as practicable. Once the final
payment of any such taxes and assessments has been remitted to the
authority, the governing body shall transfer any net assets to one or
more other political subdivisions or governmental agencies selected by
the board of the authority with instructions as to their use or
disposition and shall terminate the authority.
(d) Upon the termination of the authority, the former officers,
directors, employees, and agents of the authority shall be immune from
personal liability in connection with any claims brought against them
in connection with their service to the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 35.95A.010 (Definitions) and 2002 c 248 s 1;
(2) RCW 35.95A.020 (Creation of authority -- Vote of the people) and
2002 c 248 s 2;
(3) RCW 35.95A.030 (Creation by ordinance -- Proposal by petition)
and 2002 c 248 s 3;
(4) RCW 35.95A.040 (Authority subject to standard requirements of
governmental entity) and 2002 c 248 s 4;
(5) RCW 35.95A.050 (Powers) and 2002 c 248 s 5;
(6) RCW 35.95A.060 (Funds and accounts -- Designation of treasurer)
and 2002 c 248 s 6;
(7) RCW 35.95A.070 (Excess levies -- General obligation bonds--Revenue bonds) and 2002 c 248 s 8;
(8) RCW 35.95A.100 (Property tax levies) and 2002 c 248 s 11;
(9) RCW 35.95A.110 (Taxes and fees -- Limitation on use) and 2002 c
248 s 12;
(10) RCW 35.95A.120 (Dissolution of authority) and 2003 c 147 s 14
& 2002 c 248 s 13; and
(11) RCW 35.95A.140 (Requirements for signage) and 2005 c 19 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1, 2, and 4 of this act take effect
July 1, 2008.

--- END ---