BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a
legitimate and compelling state interest in ensuring that the sincerely
held values and beliefs of most parents regarding sexual orientation
are not denigrated or denied by our public schools and the teaching of
sexual orientation should not be presented or promoted to our youth.
The legislature further finds that the office of superintendent of
public instruction has published materials that encourage the
presentation of sexual orientation to the early grades and that this
teaching is inappropriate and unacceptable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The office of superintendent of public instruction shall not
encourage or promote the teaching of sexual orientation.

--- END ---