BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.48.070 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of malicious mischief in the first degree if
he or she knowingly and maliciously:
(a) Causes physical damage to the property of another in an amount
exceeding ((one)) five thousand five hundred dollars;
(b) Causes an interruption or impairment of service rendered to the
public by physically damaging or tampering with an emergency vehicle or
property of the state, a political subdivision thereof, or a public
utility or mode of public transportation, power, or communication; or
(c) Causes an impairment of the safety, efficiency, or operation of
an aircraft by physically damaging or tampering with the aircraft or
aircraft equipment, fuel, lubricant, or parts.
(2) Malicious mischief in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.48.080 and 1994 c 261 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of malicious mischief in the second degree
if he or she knowingly and maliciously:
(a) Causes physical damage to the property of another in an amount
exceeding ((two)) nine hundred ((fifty)) dollars; or
(b) Creates a substantial risk of interruption or impairment of
service rendered to the public, by physically damaging or tampering
with an emergency vehicle or property of the state, a political
subdivision thereof, or a public utility or mode of public
transportation, power, or communication.
(2) Malicious mischief in the second degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.48.090 and 2003 c 53 s 71 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of malicious mischief in the third degree if
he or she:
(a) Knowingly and maliciously causes physical damage to the
property of another, under circumstances not amounting to malicious
mischief in the first or second degree; or
(b) Writes, paints, or draws any inscription, figure, or mark of
any type on any public or private building or other structure or any
real or personal property owned by any other person unless the person
has obtained the express permission of the owner or operator of the
property, under circumstances not amounting to malicious mischief in
the first or second degree.
(2)(((a))) Malicious mischief in the third degree ((under
subsection (1)(a) of this section is a gross misdemeanor if the damage
to the property is in an amount exceeding fifty dollars.
(b) Malicious mischief in the third degree under subsection (1)(a)
of this section is a misdemeanor if the damage to the property is fifty
dollars or less.
(c) Malicious mischief in the third degree under subsection (1)(b)
of this section)) is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 4 RCW 9A.56.010 and 2002 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following definitions are applicable in this chapter unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) "Access device" means any card, plate, code, account number, or
other means of account access that can be used alone or in conjunction
with another access device to obtain money, goods, services, or
anything else of value, or that can be used to initiate a transfer of
funds, other than a transfer originated solely by paper instrument;
(2) "Appropriate lost or misdelivered property or services" means
obtaining or exerting control over the property or services of another
which the actor knows to have been lost or mislaid, or to have been
delivered under a mistake as to identity of the recipient or as to the
nature or amount of the property;
(3) "Beverage crate" means a plastic or metal box-like container
used by a manufacturer or distributor in the transportation or
distribution of individually packaged beverages to retail outlets, and
affixed with language stating "property of . . . . .," "owned by
. . . . .," or other markings or words identifying ownership;
(4) "By color or aid of deception" means that the deception
operated to bring about the obtaining of the property or services; it
is not necessary that deception be the sole means of obtaining the
property or services;
(5) "Deception" occurs when an actor knowingly:
(a) Creates or confirms another's false impression which the actor
knows to be false; or
(b) Fails to correct another's impression which the actor
previously has created or confirmed; or
(c) Prevents another from acquiring information material to the
disposition of the property involved; or
(d) Transfers or encumbers property without disclosing a lien,
adverse claim, or other legal impediment to the enjoyment of the
property, whether that impediment is or is not valid, or is or is not
a matter of official record; or
(e) Promises performance which the actor does not intend to perform
or knows will not be performed.
(6) "Deprive" in addition to its common meaning means to make
unauthorized use or an unauthorized copy of records, information, data,
trade secrets, or computer programs;
(7) "Merchandise pallet" means a wood or plastic carrier designed
and manufactured as an item on which products can be placed before or
during transport to retail outlets, manufacturers, or contractors, and
affixed with language stating "property of . . .," "owned by . . .," or
other markings or words identifying ownership;
(8) "Obtain control over" in addition to its common meaning, means:
(a) In relation to property, to bring about a transfer or purported
transfer to the obtainer or another of a legally recognized interest in
the property; or
(b) In relation to labor or service, to secure performance thereof
for the benefits of the obtainer or another;
(9) "Owner" means a person, other than the actor, who has
possession of or any other interest in the property or services
involved, and without whose consent the actor has no authority to exert
control over the property or services;
(10) "Parking area" means a parking lot or other property provided
by retailers for use by a customer for parking an automobile or other
vehicle;
(11) "Receive" includes, but is not limited to, acquiring title,
possession, control, or a security interest, or any other interest in
the property;
(12) "Services" includes, but is not limited to, labor,
professional services, transportation services, electronic computer
services, the supplying of hotel accommodations, restaurant services,
entertainment, the supplying of equipment for use, and the supplying of
commodities of a public utility nature such as gas, electricity, steam,
and water;
(13) "Shopping cart" means a basket mounted on wheels or similar
container generally used in a retail establishment by a customer for
the purpose of transporting goods of any kind;
(14) "Stolen" means obtained by theft, robbery, or extortion;
(15) "Subscription television service" means cable or encrypted
video and related audio and data services intended for viewing on a
home television by authorized members of the public only, who have
agreed to pay a fee for the service. Subscription services include but
are not limited to those video services presently delivered by coaxial
cable, fiber optic cable, terrestrial microwave, television broadcast,
and satellite transmission;
(16) "Telecommunication device" means (a) any type of instrument,
device, machine, or equipment that is capable of transmitting or
receiving telephonic or electronic communications; or (b) any part of
such an instrument, device, machine, or equipment, or any computer
circuit, computer chip, electronic mechanism, or other component, that
is capable of facilitating the transmission or reception of telephonic
or electronic communications;
(17) "Telecommunication service" includes any service other than
subscription television service provided for a charge or compensation
to facilitate the transmission, transfer, or reception of a telephonic
communication or an electronic communication;
(18) Value. (a) "Value" means the market value of the property or
services at the time and in the approximate area of the criminal act.
(b) Whether or not they have been issued or delivered, written
instruments, except those having a readily ascertained market value,
shall be evaluated as follows:
(i) The value of an instrument constituting an evidence of debt,
such as a check, draft, or promissory note, shall be deemed the amount
due or collectible thereon or thereby, that figure ordinarily being the
face amount of the indebtedness less any portion thereof which has been
satisfied;
(ii) The value of a ticket or equivalent instrument which evidences
a right to receive transportation, entertainment, or other service
shall be deemed the price stated thereon, if any; and if no price is
stated thereon, the value shall be deemed the price of such ticket or
equivalent instrument which the issuer charged the general public;
(iii) The value of any other instrument that creates, releases,
discharges, or otherwise affects any valuable legal right, privilege,
or obligation shall be deemed the greatest amount of economic loss
which the owner of the instrument might reasonably suffer by virtue of
the loss of the instrument.
(c) Except as provided in (f) of this subsection, whenever any
series of transactions which constitute theft, would, when considered
separately, constitute theft in the third degree because of value, and
said series of transactions are a part of a criminal episode or a
common scheme or plan, then the transactions may be aggregated in one
count and the sum of the value of all said transactions shall be the
value considered in determining the degree of theft involved.
For purposes of this subsection, "criminal episode" means a series
of thefts committed by the same person from one or more mercantile
establishments on three or more occasions within a five-day period.
(d) Whenever any person is charged with possessing stolen property
and such person has unlawfully in his possession at the same time the
stolen property of more than one person, then the stolen property
possessed may be aggregated in one count and the sum of the value of
all said stolen property shall be the value considered in determining
the degree of theft involved.
(e) Property or services having value that cannot be ascertained
pursuant to the standards set forth above shall be deemed to be of a
value not exceeding ((two)) nine hundred ((and fifty)) dollars.
(f) A series of thefts committed by the same person from one or
more mercantile establishments over a period of one hundred eighty days
may be aggregated in one count and the sum of the value of all of the
property shall be the value considered in determining the degree of the
theft;
(19) "Wrongfully obtains" or "exerts unauthorized control" means:
(a) To take the property or services of another;
(b) Having any property or services in one's possession, custody or
control as bailee, factor, lessee, pledgee, renter, servant, attorney,
agent, employee, trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, or officer
of any person, estate, association, or corporation, or as a public
officer, or person authorized by agreement or competent authority to
take or hold such possession, custody, or control, to secrete,
withhold, or appropriate the same to his or her own use or to the use
of any person other than the true owner or person entitled thereto; or
(c) Having any property or services in one's possession, custody,
or control as partner, to secrete, withhold, or appropriate the same to
his or her use or to the use of any person other than the true owner or
person entitled thereto, where the use is unauthorized by the
partnership agreement.

Sec. 5 RCW 9A.56.030 and 2005 c 212 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft in the first degree if he or she
commits theft of:
(a) Property or services which exceed(s) ((one)) five thousand five
hundred dollars in value other than a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010;
(b) Property of any value other than a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 taken from the person of another; or
(c) A search and rescue dog, as defined in RCW 9.91.175, while the
search and rescue dog is on duty.
(2) Theft in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 6 RCW 9A.56.040 and 1995 c 129 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft in the second degree if he or she
commits theft of:
(a) Property or services which exceed(s) ((two)) nine hundred ((and
fifty)) dollars in value other than a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010, but does not exceed ((one)) five thousand five hundred
dollars in value; or
(b) A public record, writing, or instrument kept, filed, or
deposited according to law with or in the keeping of any public office
or public servant; or
(c) An access device; or
(d) A motor vehicle, of a value less than ((one)) five thousand
five hundred dollars.
(2) Theft in the second degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 7 RCW 9A.56.050 and 1998 c 236 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft in the third degree if he or she
commits theft of property or services which (a) does not exceed ((two))
nine hundred ((and fifty)) dollars in value, or (b) includes ten or
more merchandise pallets, or ten or more beverage crates, or a
combination of ten or more merchandise pallets and beverage crates.
(2) Theft in the third degree is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 8 RCW 9A.56.060 and 1982 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who shall with intent to defraud, make, or draw, or
utter, or deliver to another person any check, or draft, on a bank or
other depository for the payment of money, knowing at the time of such
drawing, or delivery, that he or she has not sufficient funds in, or
credit with ((said)) the bank or other depository, to meet ((said)) the
check or draft, in full upon its presentation, ((shall be)) is guilty
of unlawful issuance of a bank check. The word "credit" as used herein
shall be construed to mean an arrangement or understanding with the
bank or other depository for the payment of such check or draft, and
the uttering or delivery of such a check or draft to another person
without such fund or credit to meet the same shall be prima facie
evidence of an intent to defraud.
(2) Any person who shall with intent to defraud, make, or draw, or
utter, or deliver to another person any check, or draft on a bank or
other depository for the payment of money and who issues a stop-payment
order directing the bank or depository on which the check is drawn not
to honor ((said)) the check, and who fails to make payment of money in
the amount of the check or draft or otherwise arrange a settlement
agreed upon by the holder of the check within twenty days of issuing
((said)) the check or draft ((shall be)) is guilty of unlawful issuance
of a bank check.
(3) When any series of transactions which constitute unlawful
issuance of a bank check would, when considered separately, constitute
unlawful issuance of a bank check in an amount of ((two)) nine hundred
((fifty)) dollars or less because of value, and the series of
transactions are a part of a common scheme or plan, the transactions
may be aggregated in one count and the sum of the value of all of the
transactions shall be the value considered in determining whether the
unlawful issuance of a bank check is to be punished as a class C felony
or a gross misdemeanor.
(4) Unlawful issuance of a bank check in an amount greater than
((two)) nine hundred ((fifty)) dollars is a class C felony.
(5) Unlawful issuance of a bank check in an amount of ((two)) nine
hundred ((fifty)) dollars or less is a gross misdemeanor and shall be
punished as follows:
(a) The court shall order the defendant to make full restitution;
(b) The defendant need not be imprisoned, but the court shall
impose a minimum fine of five hundred dollars. Of the fine imposed, at
least fifty dollars shall not be suspended or deferred. Upon
conviction for a second offense within any twelve-month period, the
court may suspend or defer only that portion of the fine which is in
excess of five hundred dollars.

Sec. 9 RCW 9A.56.096 and 2003 c 53 s 77 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who, with intent to deprive the owner or owner's
agent, wrongfully obtains, or exerts unauthorized control over, or by
color or aid of deception gains control of personal property that is
rented or leased to the person, is guilty of theft of rental, leased,
or lease-purchased property.
(2) The finder of fact may presume intent to deprive if the finder
of fact finds either of the following:
(a) That the person who rented or leased the property failed to
return or make arrangements acceptable to the owner of the property or
the owner's agent to return the property to the owner or the owner's
agent within seventy-two hours after receipt of proper notice following
the due date of the rental, lease, or lease-purchase agreement; or
(b) That the renter or lessee presented identification to the owner
or the owner's agent that was materially false, fictitious, or not
current with respect to name, address, place of employment, or other
appropriate items.
(3) As used in subsection (2) of this section, "proper notice"
consists of a written demand by the owner or the owner's agent made
after the due date of the rental, lease, or lease-purchase period,
mailed by certified or registered mail to the renter or lessee at: (a)
The address the renter or lessee gave when the contract was made; or
(b) the renter or lessee's last known address if later furnished in
writing by the renter, lessee, or the agent of the renter or lessee.
(4) The replacement value of the property obtained must be utilized
in determining the amount involved in the theft of rental, leased, or
lease-purchased property.
(5)(a) Theft of rental, leased, or lease-purchased property is a
class B felony if the rental, leased, or lease-purchased property is
valued at ((one)) five thousand five hundred dollars or more.
(b) Theft of rental, leased, or lease-purchased property is a class
C felony if the rental, leased, or lease-purchased property is valued
at ((two)) nine hundred ((fifty)) dollars or more but less than ((one))
five thousand five hundred dollars.
(c) Theft of rental, leased, or lease-purchased property is a gross
misdemeanor if the rental, leased, or lease-purchased property is
valued at less than ((two)) nine hundred ((fifty)) dollars.
(6) This section applies to rental agreements that provide that the
renter may return the property any time within the rental period and
pay only for the time the renter actually retained the property, in
addition to any minimum rental fee, to lease agreements, and to lease-purchase agreements as defined under RCW 63.19.010. This section does
not apply to rental or leasing of real property under the residential
landlord-tenant act, chapter 59.18 RCW.

Sec. 10 RCW 9A.56.150 and 1995 c 129 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of possessing stolen property in the first
degree if he or she possesses stolen property other than a firearm as
defined in RCW 9.41.010 which exceeds ((one)) five thousand five
hundred dollars in value.
(2) Possessing stolen property in the first degree is a class B
felony.

Sec. 11 RCW 9A.56.160 and 1995 c 129 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of possessing stolen property in the second
degree if:
(a) He or she possesses stolen property other than a firearm as
defined in RCW 9.41.010 which exceeds ((two)) nine hundred ((fifty))
dollars in value but does not exceed ((one)) five thousand five hundred
dollars in value; or
(b) He or she possesses a stolen public record, writing or
instrument kept, filed, or deposited according to law; or
(c) He or she possesses a stolen access device; or
(d) He or she possesses a stolen motor vehicle of a value less than
((one)) five thousand five hundred dollars.
(2) Possessing stolen property in the second degree is a class C
felony.

Sec. 12 RCW 9A.56.170 and 1998 c 236 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of possessing stolen property in the third
degree if he or she possesses (a) stolen property which does not exceed
((two)) nine hundred ((fifty)) dollars in value, or (b) ten or more
stolen merchandise pallets, or ten or more stolen beverage crates, or
a combination of ten or more stolen merchandise pallets and beverage
crates.
(2) Possessing stolen property in the third degree is a gross
misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 9A.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When any series of acts which constitute malicious mischief
would, when considered separately, constitute malicious mischief in the
second degree or third degree because of the value of the damages, and
the series of acts are a part of a common scheme or plan, the acts may
be aggregated in one count and the sum of the value of the damages of
all of the acts shall be the value considered in determining the degree
of the malicious mischief involved.
(2) Any series of acts committed by the same person in different
counties that have been aggregated in one county may be prosecuted in
any county in which one of the acts occurred.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 9A.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Any series of thefts committed by the same person in different
counties that have been aggregated in one county may be prosecuted in
any county in which one of the thefts occurred.

Sec. 15 RCW 9A.82.050 and 2003 c 53 s 86 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who:
(a) Knowingly initiates, organizes, plans, finances, directs,
manages, or supervises the theft of property for sale to others((,
or));
(b) Who knowingly traffics in stolen property; or
(c) Commits a series of thefts from one or more mercantile
establishments over a period of one hundred eighty days that have been
aggregated in one count under section 14 of this act,
is guilty of trafficking in stolen property in the first degree.
(2) Trafficking in stolen property in the first degree is a class
B felony.

--- END ---