BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A commission is created to investigate
and make recommendations for alternative regulatory approaches to the
production, distribution, and control of psychoactive substances with
the objective of reducing crime, enhancing public health, protecting
children, and promoting efficient use of scarce public resources.
(2) The governor shall appoint one member with expertise from each
of the following fields after consultation with individuals and
representative groups thereof:
(a) Education;
(b) Mental health and substance abuse;
(c) Law enforcement;
(d) Medicine;
(e) Law;
(f) The judiciary;
(g) Local government;
(h) Public health;
(i) Labor;
(j) Business;
(k) Pharmacology; and
(l) The public at large.
(3) The governor shall appoint one member from subsection (2) of
this section as chairperson.
(4) Four members of the legislature shall be members of the
commission, including two members of the senate, appointed by the
president of the senate, one of the majority and one of the minority
party; and two members of the house of representatives, appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives, one from the majority and
one from the minority party.
(5) The commission shall appoint a staff and the members of the
commission shall be reimbursed for expenses.
(6) The commission shall report its recommendations to the
legislature by December 1, 2007.

--- END ---