BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.16.080 and 1989 c 38 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
The following actions shall be commenced within three years:
(1) An action for waste or trespass upon real property;
(2) An action for taking, detaining, or injuring personal property,
including an action for the specific recovery thereof, or for any other
injury to the person or rights of another not hereinafter enumerated
except for an injury to a person or the rights of another where the
injury is caused by acts that would constitute a sex offense under
chapter 9A.44 RCW, whether or not the person was convicted of the
offense, in which case such an action may be commenced at any time;
(3) Except as provided in RCW 4.16.040(2), an action upon a
contract or liability, express or implied, which is not in writing, and
does not arise out of any written instrument;
(4) An action for relief upon the ground of fraud, the cause of
action in such case not to be deemed to have accrued until the
discovery by the aggrieved party of the facts constituting the fraud;
(5) An action against a sheriff, coroner, or constable upon a
liability incurred by the doing of an act in his official capacity and
by virtue of his office, or by the omission of an official duty,
including the nonpayment of money collected upon an execution; but this
subdivision shall not apply to action for an escape;
(6) An action against an officer charged with misappropriation or
a failure to properly account for public funds intrusted to his
custody; an action upon a statute for penalty or forfeiture, where an
action is given to the party aggrieved, or to such party and the state,
except when the statute imposing it prescribed a different limitation:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, The cause of action for such misappropriation,
penalty or forfeiture, whether for acts heretofore or hereafter done,
and regardless of lapse of time or existing statutes of limitations, or
the bar thereof, even though complete, shall not be deemed to accrue or
to have accrued until discovery by the aggrieved party of the act or
acts from which such liability has arisen or shall arise, and such
liability, whether for acts heretofore or hereafter done, and
regardless of lapse of time or existing statute of limitation, or the
bar thereof, even though complete, shall exist and be enforceable for
three years after discovery by aggrieved party of the act or acts from
which such liability has arisen or shall arise.

--- END ---