BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.20.120 and 2005 c 133 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to the other provisions of this title, benefits
shall be payable to any eligible individual during the individual's
benefit year in a maximum amount equal to the lesser of thirty times
the weekly benefit amount, as determined in subsection (2) of this
section, or one-third of the individual's base year wages under this
title: PROVIDED, That as to any week which falls in an extended
benefit period as defined in RCW 50.22.010(1), an individual's
eligibility for maximum benefits in excess of twenty-six times his or
her weekly benefit amount will be subject to the terms and conditions
set forth in RCW 50.22.020.
(b) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
the first Sunday of the calendar month immediately following the month
in which the commissioner finds that the state unemployment rate is six
and eight-tenths percent or less, benefits shall be payable to any
eligible individual during the individual's benefit year in a maximum
amount equal to the lesser of twenty-six times the weekly benefit
amount, as determined in subsection (2) of this section, or one-third
of the individual's base year wages under this title.
(2)(a) For claims with an effective date before January 4, 2004, an
individual's weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one
twenty-fifth of the average quarterly wages of the individual's total
wages during the two quarters of the individual's base year in which
such total wages were highest.
(b) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after
January 4, 2004, and before January 2, 2005, an individual's weekly
benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one twenty-fifth of the
average quarterly wages of the individual's total wages during the
three quarters of the individual's base year in which such total wages
were highest.
(c)(i) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after
January 2, 2005, except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, an
individual's weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one
percent of the total wages paid in the individual's base year.
(ii) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after the
first Sunday following April 22, 2005, ((and before July 1, 2007,)) an
individual's weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal to three
and eighty-five one-hundredths percent of the average quarterly wages
of the individual's total wages during the two quarters of the
individual's base year in which such total wages were highest.
(3) The maximum and minimum amounts payable weekly shall be
determined as of each June 30th to apply to benefit years beginning in
the twelve-month period immediately following such June 30th.
(a)(i) With respect to claims that have an effective date before
January 4, 2004, the maximum amount payable weekly shall be seventy
percent of the "average weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding
such June 30th.
(ii) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 4, 2004, the maximum amount payable weekly shall be either four
hundred ninety-six dollars or sixty-three percent of the "average
weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding such June 30th, whichever
is greater.
(b) The minimum amount payable weekly shall be fifteen percent of
the "average weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding such June
30th.
(4) If any weekly benefit, maximum benefit, or minimum benefit
amount computed herein is not a multiple of one dollar, it shall be
reduced to the next lower multiple of one dollar.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.24.010 and 2000 c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Contributions shall accrue and become payable by each employer
(except employers as described in RCW 50.44.010 who have properly
elected to make payments in lieu of contributions and those employers
who are required to make payments in lieu of contributions) for each
calendar year in which the employer is subject to this title at the
rate established pursuant to chapter 50.29 RCW.
(2) In each rate year, the amount of wages subject to tax for each
individual shall be one hundred fifteen percent of the amount of wages
subject to tax for the previous year rounded to the next lower one
hundred dollars, except that:
(a) Through rate year 2006, the amount of wages subject to tax in
any rate year shall not exceed eighty percent of the "average annual
wage for contributions purposes" for the second preceding calendar year
rounded to the next lower one hundred dollars. ((However, the amount
subject to tax shall be twenty-four thousand three hundred dollars for
rate year 2000.))
(b) For rate year 2007 and thereafter, the amount of wages subject
to tax in any rate year shall not exceed seventy-five percent of the
"average annual wage for contributions purposes" for the second
preceding calendar year rounded to the next lower one hundred dollars.
(3) In making computations under this section and RCW 50.29.010,
wages paid based on services for employers making payments in lieu of
contributions shall not be considered remuneration. Moneys paid from
the fund, based on services performed for employers who make payments
in lieu of contributions, which have not been reimbursed to the fund as
of any June 30 shall be deemed an asset of the unemployment
compensation fund, to the extent that such moneys exceed the amount of
payments in lieu of contributions which the commissioner has previously
determined to be uncollectible: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the amount
attributable to employment with the state shall also include interest
as provided for in RCW 50.44.020.
(4)(a) Contributions shall become due and be paid by each employer
to the treasurer for the unemployment compensation fund in accordance
with such regulations as the commissioner may prescribe, and shall not
be deducted, in whole or in part, from the remuneration of individuals
in employment of the employer. Any deduction in violation of the
provisions of this section shall be unlawful.
(b) In the payment of any contributions, a fractional part of a
cent shall be disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent or more,
in which case it shall be increased to one cent.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.29.025 and 2005 c 133 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
contribution rate for each employer subject to contributions under RCW
50.24.010 shall be determined under this subsection.
(a) A fund balance ratio shall be determined by dividing the
balance in the unemployment compensation fund as of the September 30th
immediately preceding the rate year by the total remuneration paid by
all employers subject to contributions during the second calendar year
preceding the rate year and reported to the department by the following
March 31st. The division shall be carried to the fourth decimal place
with the remaining fraction, if any, disregarded. The fund balance
ratio shall be expressed as a percentage.
(b) The interval of the fund balance ratio, expressed as a
percentage, shall determine which tax schedule in (e) of this
subsection shall be in effect for assigning tax rates for the rate
year. The intervals for determining the effective tax schedule shall
be:

Interval of the
Fund Balance Ratio
Expressed as a Percentage
Effective
Tax Schedule

2.90 and above AA

2.10 to 2.89 A

1.70 to 2.09 B

1.40 to 1.69 C

1.00 to 1.39 D

0.70 to 0.99 E

Less than 0.70 F

(c) An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in
ascending order of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each
qualified employer: (i) Identification number; (ii) benefit ratio;
(iii) taxable payrolls for the four calendar quarters immediately
preceding the computation date and reported to the department by the
cut-off date; (iv) a cumulative total of taxable payrolls consisting of
the employer's taxable payroll plus the taxable payrolls of all other
employers preceding him or her in the array; and (v) the percentage
equivalent of the cumulative total of taxable payrolls.
(d) Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of twenty
rate classes according to the percentage intervals of cumulative
taxable payrolls set forth in (e) of this subsection: PROVIDED, That
if an employer's taxable payroll falls within two or more rate classes,
the employer and any other employer with the same benefit ratio shall
be assigned to the lowest rate class which includes any portion of the
employer's taxable payroll.
(e) Except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the contribution rate for
each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the following
tables for the rate class to which he or she has been assigned, as
determined under (d) of this subsection, within the tax schedule which
is to be in effect during the rate year:

Percent of
Cumulative
Taxable Payrolls
Schedules of Contributions Rates
for Effective Tax Schedule

From
To
Rate
Class
AA
A
B
C
D
E
F

0.00 5.00 1 0.47 0.47 0.57 0.97 1.47 1.87 2.47

5.01 10.00 2 0.47 0.47 0.77 1.17 1.67 2.07 2.67

10.01 15.00 3 0.57 0.57 0.97 1.37 1.77 2.27 2.87

15.01 20.00 4 0.57 0.73 1.11 1.51 1.90 2.40 2.98

20.01 25.00 5 0.72 0.92 1.30 1.70 2.09 2.59 3.08

25.01 30.00 6 0.91 1.11 1.49 1.89 2.29 2.69 3.18

30.01 35.00 7 1.00 1.29 1.69 2.08 2.48 2.88 3.27

35.01 40.00 8 1.19 1.48 1.88 2.27 2.67 3.07 3.47

40.01 45.00 9 1.37 1.67 2.07 2.47 2.87 3.27 3.66

45.01 50.00 10 1.56 1.86 2.26 2.66 3.06 3.46 3.86

50.01 55.00 11 1.84 2.14 2.45 2.85 3.25 3.66 3.95

55.01 60.00 12 2.03 2.33 2.64 3.04 3.44 3.85 4.15

60.01 65.00 13 2.22 2.52 2.83 3.23 3.64 4.04 4.34

65.01 70.00 14 2.40 2.71 3.02 3.43 3.83 4.24 4.54

70.01 75.00 15 2.68 2.90 3.21 3.62 4.02 4.43 4.63

75.01 80.00 16 2.87 3.09 3.42 3.81 4.22 4.53 4.73

80.01 85.00 17 3.27 3.47 3.77 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97

85.01 90.00 18 3.67 3.87 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97 5.17

90.01 95.00 19 4.07 4.27 4.57 4.97 5.07 5.17 5.37

95.01 100.00 20 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40

(f) The contribution rate for each employer not qualified to be in
the array shall be as follows:
(i) Employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified
employer" by reason of failure to pay contributions when due shall be
assigned a contribution rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class
20 for the applicable rate year, except employers who have an approved
agency-deferred payment contract by September 30 of the previous rate
year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred payment
contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely
manner, the employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to a
contribution rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class 20 for the
applicable rate year; and
(ii) For all other employers not qualified to be in the array, the
contribution rate shall be a rate equal to the average industry rate as
determined by the commissioner; however, the rate may not be less than
one percent.
(2) Beginning with contributions assessed for rate year 2005, the
contribution rate for each employer subject to contributions under RCW
50.24.010 shall be the sum of the array calculation factor rate and the
graduated social cost factor rate determined under this subsection, and
the solvency surcharge determined under RCW 50.29.041, if any.
(a) The array calculation factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i) An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in
ascending order of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each
qualified employer: (A) Identification number; (B) benefit ratio; and
(C) taxable payrolls for the four consecutive calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date and reported to the
employment security department by the cut-off date.
(ii) Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of forty
rate classes according to his or her benefit ratio as follows, and,
except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the array calculation factor rate
for each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the rate
class to which the employer has been assigned:

Benefit Ratio Rate
Class Rate
(percent)

At least Less than

0.000001 1 0.00

0.000001 0.001250 2 0.13

0.001250 0.002500 3 0.25

0.002500 0.003750 4 0.38

0.003750 0.005000 5 0.50

0.005000 0.006250 6 0.63

0.006250 0.007500 7 0.75

0.007500 0.008750 8 0.88

0.008750 0.010000 9 1.00

0.010000 0.011250 10 1.15

0.011250 0.012500 11 1.30

0.012500 0.013750 12 1.45

0.013750 0.015000 13 1.60

0.015000 0.016250 14 1.75

0.016250 0.017500 15 1.90

0.017500 0.018750 16 2.05

0.018750 0.020000 17 2.20

0.020000 0.021250 18 2.35

0.021250 0.022500 19 2.50

0.022500 0.023750 20 2.65

0.023750 0.025000 21 2.80

0.025000 0.026250 22 2.95

0.026250 0.027500 23 3.10

0.027500 0.028750 24 3.25

0.028750 0.030000 25 3.40

0.030000 0.031250 26 3.55

0.031250 0.032500 27 3.70

0.032500 0.033750 28 3.85

0.033750 0.035000 29 4.00

0.035000 0.036250 30 4.15

0.036250 0.037500 31 4.30

0.037500 0.040000 32 4.45

0.040000 0.042500 33 4.60

0.042500 0.045000 34 4.75

0.045000 0.047500 35 4.90

0.047500 0.050000 36 5.05

0.050000 0.052500 37 5.20

0.052500 0.055000 38 5.30

0.055000 0.057500 39 5.35

0.057500 40 5.40

(b) The graduated social cost factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i)(A) Except as provided in (b)(i)(B)((,)) and (C)((, and (D))) of
this subsection, the commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost
factor for a rate year by dividing the total social cost by the total
taxable payroll. The division shall be carried to the second decimal
place with the remaining fraction disregarded unless it amounts to five
hundredths or more, in which case the second decimal place shall be
rounded to the next higher digit. The flat social cost factor shall be
expressed as a percentage.
(B) If, on the cut-off date, the balance in the unemployment
compensation fund is determined by the commissioner to be an amount
that will provide more than ten months of unemployment benefits, the
commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost factor for the rate
year immediately following the cut-off date by reducing the total
social cost by the dollar amount that represents the number of months
for which the balance in the unemployment compensation fund on the cut-off date will provide benefits above ten months and dividing the result
by the total taxable payroll. However, the calculation under this
subsection (2)(b)(i)(B) for a rate year may not ((result in a)) reduce
the flat social cost factor ((that is more than two-tenths lower than))
below the calculation under (b)(i)(A) of this subsection for that rate
year by more than:
(I) Two-tenths, if the balance in the unemployment compensation
fund will provide benefits for more than ten months but less than
twelve months;
(II) Three-tenths, if the balance in the unemployment compensation
fund will provide benefits for at least twelve months but less than
fourteen months; or
(III) Four-tenths, if the balance in the unemployment compensation
fund will provide benefits for fourteen months or more.
For the purposes of this subsection, the commissioner shall
determine the number of months of unemployment benefits in the
unemployment compensation fund using the benefit cost rate for the
average of the three highest calendar benefit cost rates in the twenty
consecutive completed calendar years immediately preceding the cut-off
date or a period of consecutive calendar years immediately preceding
the cut-off date that includes three recessions, if longer.
(C) The minimum flat social cost factor calculated under this
subsection (2)(b) shall be six-tenths of one percent, except that if
(b)(i)(B)(II) of this subsection applies, the minimum shall be
fifty-five one-hundredths of one percent, and if (b)(i)(B)(III) of this
subsection applies, the minimum shall be five-tenths of one percent.
(((D) With respect to rate year 2007, the flat social cost factor
shall be the lesser of:
(I) The flat social cost factor determined under (b)(i)(A) through
(C) of this subsection; or
(II) The flat social cost factor that would be determined under
(b)(i)(A) through (C) of this subsection if RCW 50.20.120(2)(c)(i) had
been in effect during the immediately preceding rate year.))
(ii)(A) Except as provided in (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection, the
graduated social cost factor rate for each employer in the array is the
flat social cost factor multiplied by the percentage specified as
follows for the rate class to which the employer has been assigned in
(a)(ii) of this subsection, except that the sum of an employer's array
calculation factor rate and the graduated social cost factor rate may
not exceed six and five-tenths percent or, for employers whose North
American industry classification system code is within "111," "112,"
"1141," "115," "3114," "3117," or "42448," may not exceed six percent
through rate year 2006 and may not exceed five and seven-tenths percent
for rate year 2007 and thereafter:
(I) Rate class 1 - 78 percent;
(II) Rate class 2 - 82 percent;
(III) Rate class 3 - 86 percent;
(IV) Rate class 4 - 90 percent;
(V) Rate class 5 - 94 percent;
(VI) Rate class 6 - 98 percent;
(VII) Rate class 7 - 102 percent;
(VIII) Rate class 8 - 106 percent;
(IX) Rate class 9 - 110 percent;
(X) Rate class 10 - 114 percent;
(XI) Rate class 11 - 118 percent; and
(XII) Rate classes 12 through 40 - 120 percent.
(B) For contributions assessed beginning July 1, 2005, through
((June 30,)) December 2007, for employers whose North American industry
classification system code is "111," "112," "1141," "115," "3114,"
"3117," "42448," or "49312," the graduated social cost factor rate is
zero.
(iii) For the purposes of this section:
(A) "Total social cost" means((:
(I) Except as provided in (b)(iii)(A)(II) of this subsection,)) the
amount calculated by subtracting the array calculation factor
contributions paid by all employers with respect to the ((four))
sixteen consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding the
computation date and paid to the employment security department by the
cut-off date from the total unemployment benefits paid to claimants in
the same ((four)) sixteen consecutive calendar quarters, and dividing
the amount by four. To calculate the flat social cost factor for rate
year 2005, the commissioner shall calculate the total social cost using
the array calculation factor contributions that would have been
required to be paid by all employers in the calculation period if (a)
of this subsection had been in effect for the relevant period.
(((II) For rate year 2007, the amount calculated under
(b)(iii)(A)(I) of this subsection reduced by the amount of benefits
charged that exceed the contributions paid in the four consecutive
calendar quarters immediately preceding the applicable computation date
because, as applicable, specified employers are subject to the social
cost contributions under (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection, and/or because
the social cost factor contributions are paid under (b)(i)(D)(II) of
this subsection.))
(B) "Total taxable payroll" means the total amount of wages subject
to tax, as determined under RCW 50.24.010, for all employers in the
((four)) sixteen consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding
the computation date and reported to the employment security department
by the cut-off date, divided by four.
(c) The array calculation factor rate for each employer not
qualified to be in the array shall be as follows:
(i) Employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified
employer" by reason of failure to pay contributions when due shall be
assigned an array calculation factor rate two-tenths higher than that
in rate class 40, except employers who have an approved agency-deferred
payment contract by September 30th of the previous rate year. If any
employer with an approved agency-deferred payment contract fails to
make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or fails to submit any
succeeding tax report and payment in a timely manner, the employer's
tax rate shall immediately revert to an array calculation factor rate
two-tenths higher than that in rate class 40; and
(ii) For all other employers not qualified to be in the array, the
array calculation factor rate shall be a rate equal to the average
industry array calculation factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, plus fifteen percent of that amount; however, the rate
may not be less than one percent or more than the array calculation
factor rate in rate class 40.
(d) The graduated social cost factor rate for each employer not
qualified to be in the array shall be as follows:
(i) For employers whose array calculation factor rate is determined
under (c)(i) of this subsection, the social cost factor rate shall be
the social cost factor rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of
this subsection.
(ii) For employers whose array calculation factor rate is
determined under (c)(ii) of this subsection, the social cost factor
rate shall be a rate equal to the average industry social cost factor
rate as determined by the commissioner, plus fifteen percent of that
amount, but not more than the social cost factor rate assigned to rate
class 40 under (b)(ii) of this subsection.
(3) Assignment of employers by the commissioner to industrial
classification, for purposes of this section, shall be in accordance
with established classification practices found in the "Standard
Industrial Classification Manual" issued by the federal office of
management and budget to the third digit provided in the standard
industrial classification code, or in the North American industry
classification system code.

Sec. 4 RCW 50.29.041 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 16 are each amended
to read as follows:
Beginning with contributions assessed for rate year 2005, the
contribution rate of each employer subject to contributions under RCW
50.24.010 shall include a solvency surcharge determined as follows:
(1) This section shall apply to employers' contributions for a rate
year immediately following a cut-off date only if, on the cut-off date,
the balance in the unemployment compensation fund is determined by the
commissioner to be an amount that will provide fewer than ((six)) eight
months of unemployment benefits.
(2) The solvency surcharge shall be the lowest rate necessary, as
determined by the commissioner, but not more than two-tenths of one
percent, to provide revenue during the applicable rate year that will
fund unemployment benefits for the number of months that is the
difference between ((eight)) ten months and the number of months for
which the balance in the unemployment compensation fund on the cut-off
date will provide benefits.
(3) The basis for determining the number of months of unemployment
benefits shall be the same basis used in RCW 50.29.025(2)(b)(i)(B).

Sec. 5 RCW 50.16.030 and 2005 c 133 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) ((and (c))) of this subsection,
moneys shall be requisitioned from this state's account in the
unemployment trust fund solely for the payment of benefits and
repayment of loans from the federal government to guarantee solvency of
the unemployment compensation fund in accordance with regulations
prescribed by the commissioner, except that money credited to this
state's account pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as
amended, shall be used exclusively as provided in RCW 50.16.030(5).
The commissioner shall from time to time requisition from the
unemployment trust fund such amounts, not exceeding the amounts
standing to its account therein, as he or she deems necessary for the
payment of benefits for a reasonable future period. Upon receipt
thereof the treasurer shall deposit such moneys in the benefit account
and shall issue his or her warrants for the payment of benefits solely
from such benefits account.
(b) Moneys for the payment of regular benefits as defined in RCW
50.22.010 shall be requisitioned during fiscal year((s)) 2006 ((and
2007)) in the following order:
(i) First, from the moneys credited to this state's account in the
unemployment trust fund pursuant to section 903 of the social security
act, as amended in section 209 of the temporary extended unemployment
compensation act of 2002 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1103(d)), the amount equal to
the amount of benefits charged that exceed the contributions paid in
the four consecutive calendar quarters ending on June 30, 2006, ((for
the fiscal year 2006 calculation, and ending on June 30, 2007, for the
fiscal year 2007 calculation,)) because the social cost factor
contributions that employers are subject to under RCW
50.29.025(2)(b)(ii)(B) are less than the social cost factor
contributions that these employers would have been subject to if RCW
50.29.025(2)(b)(ii)(A) had applied to these employers; and
(ii) Second, after the requisitioning required under (b)(i) of this
subsection ((in the respective fiscal year)), from all other moneys
credited to this state's account in the unemployment trust fund.
(((c) After the requisitioning required under (b) of this
subsection, if applicable, moneys for the payment of regular benefits
as defined in RCW 50.22.010 shall be requisitioned during calendar year
2007 in the following order:
(i) First, from the moneys credited to this state's account in the
unemployment trust fund pursuant to section 903 of the social security
act, as amended in section 209 of the temporary extended unemployment
compensation act of 2002 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1103(d)), the amount equal to
the amount of benefits paid under RCW 50.20.120(2)(c)(ii) beginning on
the first Sunday following April 22, 2005, and ending on June 30, 2007,
that exceed the amount of benefits that would have been paid if the
weekly benefit amount had been determined as one percent of the total
wages paid in the individual's base year; and
(ii) Second, after the requisitioning required under (c)(i) of this
subsection in the respective calendar year, from all other moneys
credited to this state's account in the unemployment trust fund.))
(2) Expenditures of such moneys in the benefit account and refunds
from the clearing account shall not be subject to any provisions of law
requiring specific appropriations or other formal release by state
officers of money in their custody, and RCW 43.01.050, as amended,
shall not apply. All warrants issued by the treasurer for the payment
of benefits and refunds shall bear the signature of the treasurer and
the countersignature of the commissioner, or his or her duly authorized
agent for that purpose.
(3) Any balance of moneys requisitioned from the unemployment trust
fund which remains unclaimed or unpaid in the benefit account after the
expiration of the period for which sums were requisitioned shall either
be deducted from estimates for, and may be utilized for the payment of,
benefits during succeeding periods, or in the discretion of the
commissioner, shall be redeposited with the secretary of the treasury
of the United States of America to the credit of this state's account
in the unemployment trust fund.
(4) Money credited to the account of this state in the unemployment
trust fund by the secretary of the treasury of the United States of
America pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as amended,
may be requisitioned and used for the payment of expenses incurred for
the administration of this title pursuant to a specific appropriation
by the legislature, provided that the expenses are incurred and the
money is requisitioned after the enactment of an appropriation law
which:
(a) Specifies the purposes for which such money is appropriated and
the amounts appropriated therefor;
(b) Limits the period within which such money may be obligated to
a period ending not more than two years after the date of the enactment
of the appropriation law; and
(c) Limits the amount which may be obligated during a twelve-month
period beginning on July 1st and ending on the next June 30th to an
amount which does not exceed the amount by which (i) the aggregate of
the amounts credited to the account of this state pursuant to section
903 of the social security act, as amended, during the same twelve-month period and the thirty-four preceding twelve-month periods,
exceeds (ii) the aggregate of the amounts obligated pursuant to RCW
50.16.030 (4), (5) and (6) and charged against the amounts credited to
the account of this state during any of such thirty-five twelve-month
periods. For the purposes of RCW 50.16.030 (4), (5) and (6), amounts
obligated during any such twelve-month period shall be charged against
equivalent amounts which were first credited and which are not already
so charged; except that no amount obligated for administration during
any such twelve-month period may be charged against any amount credited
during such a twelve-month period earlier than the thirty-fourth
twelve-month period preceding such period: PROVIDED, That any amount
credited to this state's account under section 903 of the social
security act, as amended, which has been appropriated for expenses of
administration, whether or not withdrawn from the trust fund shall be
excluded from the unemployment compensation fund balance for the
purpose of experience rating credit determination.
(5) Money credited to the account of this state pursuant to section
903 of the social security act, as amended, may not be withdrawn or
used except for the payment of benefits and for the payment of expenses
of administration and of public employment offices pursuant to RCW
50.16.030 (4), (5) and (6). However, moneys credited because of excess
amounts in federal accounts in federal fiscal years 1999, 2000, and
2001 shall be used solely for the administration of the unemployment
compensation program and are not subject to appropriation by the
legislature for any other purpose.
(6) Money requisitioned as provided in RCW 50.16.030 (4), (5) and
(6) for the payment of expenses of administration shall be deposited in
the unemployment compensation fund, but until expended, shall remain a
part of the unemployment compensation fund. The commissioner shall
maintain a separate record of the deposit, obligation, expenditure and
return of funds so deposited. Any money so deposited which either will
not be obligated within the period specified by the appropriation law
or remains unobligated at the end of the period, and any money which
has been obligated within the period but will not be expended, shall be
returned promptly to the account of this state in the unemployment
trust fund.

Sec. 6 RCW 50.29.021 and 2005 c 133 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies to benefits charged to the experience
rating accounts of employers for claims that have an effective date on
or after January 4, 2004.
(2)(a) An experience rating account shall be established and
maintained for each employer, except employers as described in RCW
50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly elected to make payments in
lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers as described
in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make payments
in lieu of contributions, based on existing records of the employment
security department.
(b) Benefits paid to an eligible individual shall be charged to the
experience rating accounts of each of such individual's employers
during the individual's base year in the same ratio that the wages paid
by each employer to the individual during the base year bear to the
wages paid by all employers to that individual during that base year,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(c) When the eligible individual's separating employer is a covered
contribution paying base year employer, benefits paid to the eligible
individual shall be charged to the experience rating account of only
the individual's separating employer if the individual qualifies for
benefits under:
(i) RCW 50.20.050(2)(b)(i), as applicable, and became unemployed
after having worked and earned wages in the bona fide work; or
(ii) RCW 50.20.050(2)(b)(v) through (x).
(3) The legislature finds that certain benefit payments, in whole
or in part, should not be charged to the experience rating accounts of
employers except those employers described in RCW 50.44.010 and
50.44.030 who have properly elected to make payments in lieu of
contributions, taxable local government employers described in RCW
50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make payments in
lieu of contributions, as follows:
(a) Benefits paid to any individual later determined to be
ineligible shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer.
(b) Benefits paid to an individual filing under the provisions of
chapter 50.06 RCW shall not be charged to the experience rating account
of any contribution paying employer only if:
(i) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(1) after receiving
crime victims' compensation for a disability resulting from a nonwork-related occurrence; or
(ii) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(2).
(c) Benefits paid which represent the state's share of benefits
payable as extended benefits defined under RCW 50.22.010(6) shall not
be charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.
(d) In the case of individuals who requalify for benefits under RCW
50.20.050 or 50.20.060, benefits based on wage credits earned prior to
the disqualifying separation shall not be charged to the experience
rating account of the contribution paying employer from whom that
separation took place.
(e) Individuals who qualify for benefits under RCW
50.20.050(2)(b)(iv), as applicable, shall not have their benefits
charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.
(f) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after the
first Sunday following April 22, 2005, and before July ((1, 2007)) 2,
2006, benefits paid that exceed the benefits that would have been paid
if the weekly benefit amount for the claim had been determined as one
percent of the total wages paid in the individual's base year shall not
be charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.
(4)(a) A contribution paying base year employer, not otherwise
eligible for relief of charges for benefits under this section, may
receive such relief if the benefit charges result from payment to an
individual who:
(i) Last left the employ of such employer voluntarily for reasons
not attributable to the employer;
(ii) Was discharged for misconduct or gross misconduct connected
with his or her work not a result of inability to meet the minimum job
requirements;
(iii) Is unemployed as a result of closure or severe curtailment of
operation at the employer's plant, building, worksite, or other
facility. This closure must be for reasons directly attributable to a
catastrophic occurrence such as fire, flood, or other natural disaster;
or
(iv) Continues to be employed on a regularly scheduled permanent
part-time basis by a base year employer and who at some time during the
base year was concurrently employed and subsequently separated from at
least one other base year employer. Benefit charge relief ceases when
the employment relationship between the employer requesting relief and
the claimant is terminated. This subsection does not apply to shared
work employers under chapter 50.60 RCW.
(b) The employer requesting relief of charges under this subsection
must request relief in writing within thirty days following mailing to
the last known address of the notification of the valid initial
determination of such claim, stating the date and reason for the
separation or the circumstances of continued employment. The
commissioner, upon investigation of the request, shall determine
whether relief should be granted.

Sec. 7 RCW 50.20.050 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) With respect to claims that have an effective date before
January 4, 2004:
(a) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning
with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she has left
work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for seven calendar
weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment
covered by this title and earned wages in that employment equal to
seven times his or her weekly benefit amount.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(i) The duration of the work;
(ii) The extent of direction and control by the employer over the
work; and
(iii) The level of skill required for the work in light of the
individual's training and experience.
(b) An individual shall not be considered to have left work
voluntarily without good cause when:
(i) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona
fide work as described in (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The separation was because of the illness or disability of the
claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a member of the
claimant's immediate family if the claimant took all reasonable
precautions, in accordance with any regulations that the commissioner
may prescribe, to protect his or her employment status by having
promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence and by
having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment: PROVIDED, That these precautions need not have been taken
when they would have been a futile act, including those instances when
the futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system;
(iii) He or she has left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that is due to an employer-initiated mandatory transfer that
is outside the existing labor market area if the claimant remained
employed as long as was reasonable prior to the move; or
(iv) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110.
(c) In determining under this subsection whether an individual has
left work voluntarily without good cause, the commissioner shall only
consider work-connected factors such as the degree of risk involved to
the individual's health, safety, and morals, the individual's physical
fitness for the work, the individual's ability to perform the work, and
such other work connected factors as the commissioner may deem
pertinent, including state and national emergencies. Good cause shall
not be established for voluntarily leaving work because of its distance
from an individual's residence where the distance was known to the
individual at the time he or she accepted the employment and where, in
the judgment of the department, the distance is customarily traveled by
workers in the individual's job classification and labor market, nor
because of any other significant work factor which was generally known
and present at the time he or she accepted employment, unless the
related circumstances have so changed as to amount to a substantial
involuntary deterioration of the work factor or unless the commissioner
determines that other related circumstances would work an unreasonable
hardship on the individual were he or she required to continue in the
employment.
(d) Subsection (1)(a) and (c) of this section shall not apply to an
individual whose marital status or domestic responsibilities cause him
or her to leave employment. Such an individual shall not be eligible
for unemployment insurance benefits beginning with the first day of the
calendar week in which he or she left work and thereafter for seven
calendar weeks and until he or she has requalified, either by obtaining
bona fide work in employment covered by this title and earning wages in
that employment equal to seven times his or her weekly benefit amount
or by reporting in person to the department during ten different
calendar weeks and certifying on each occasion that he or she is ready,
able, and willing to immediately accept any suitable work which may be
offered, is actively seeking work pursuant to customary trade
practices, and is utilizing such employment counseling and placement
services as are available through the department. This subsection does
not apply to individuals covered by (b)(ii) or (iii) of this
subsection.
(2) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 4, 2004:
(a) An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning
with the first day of the calendar week in which he or she has left
work voluntarily without good cause and thereafter for seven calendar
weeks and until he or she has obtained bona fide work in employment
covered by this title and earned wages in that employment equal to
seven times his or her weekly benefit amount.
The disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere
sham to qualify for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining
whether work is of a bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider
factors including but not limited to the following:
(i) The duration of the work;
(ii) The extent of direction and control by the employer over the
work; and
(iii) The level of skill required for the work in light of the
individual's training and experience.
(b) An individual is not disqualified from benefits under (a) of
this subsection when:
(i) He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona
fide work as described in (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The separation was necessary because of the illness or
disability of the claimant or the death, illness, or disability of a
member of the claimant's immediate family if:
(A) The claimant pursued all reasonable alternatives to preserve
his or her employment status by requesting a leave of absence, by
having promptly notified the employer of the reason for the absence,
and by having promptly requested reemployment when again able to assume
employment. These alternatives need not be pursued, however, when they
would have been a futile act, including those instances when the
futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management
dispatch system; and
(B) The claimant terminated his or her employment status, and is
not entitled to be reinstated to the same position or a comparable or
similar position;
(iii) He or she((: (A))) left work to relocate for the spouse's
employment that, due to a mandatory military transfer((: (I))) is
outside the existing labor market area; and (((II) is in Washington or
another state that, pursuant to statute, does not consider such an
individual to have left work voluntarily without good cause; and (B)))
he or she remained employed as long as was reasonable prior to the
move;
(iv) The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the
claimant's immediate family members from domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;
(v) The individual's usual compensation was reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vi) The individual's usual hours were reduced by twenty-five
percent or more;
(vii) The individual's worksite changed, such change caused a
material increase in distance or difficulty of travel, and, after the
change, the commute was greater than is customary for workers in the
individual's job classification and labor market;
(viii) The individual's worksite safety deteriorated, the
individual reported such safety deterioration to the employer, and the
employer failed to correct the hazards within a reasonable period of
time;
(ix) The individual left work because of illegal activities in the
individual's worksite, the individual reported such activities to the
employer, and the employer failed to end such activities within a
reasonable period of time; or
(x) The individual's usual work was changed to work that violates
the individual's religious convictions or sincere moral beliefs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 In June 2005, the employment security
department issued a report regarding the impact of chapter 4, Laws of
2003 2nd sp. sess. on the voluntary quit provision changes contained in
the act. The report indicated that a number of the changes seemed to
disproportionately impact women, although the department indicated that
because chapter 4, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. had gone into effect less
than a year before the report was due, it did not have sufficient data
to definitively state the impact of the voluntary quit provisions. The
department is directed to continue this study from the effective date
of the voluntary quit provisions of chapter 4, Laws of 2003 2nd sp.
sess. to September 30, 2006, and report to the appropriate committees
of the legislature by December 15, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 2005 c 133 s 10 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 3 and 4 of this act apply to rate
years beginning on or after January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---