BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The county auditor shall provide bilingual voting registration
forms, ballots, and all voting materials for any language group that
meets the following criteria:
(a)(i) More than three and three-fourths percent of the voting-age
citizens in a county belong to a single language minority community and
have limited English abilities; or
(ii) More than seven thousand five hundred voting-age citizens in
a county belong to a single language community and have limited English
abilities; and
(b) The illiteracy rate of the citizens in the language group is
higher than the national illiteracy rate.
(2) If more than three percent of the voting-age population in a
given county speak a common native language other than English, the
county must recruit staff members and poll workers who are fluent in
that native language and in English to assist with elections.
(3) The percentage requirements of this section must be based on
information contained in the most recent United States census.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.44.240 and 2003 c 111 s 1123 and 2003 c 53 s 180
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Voting shall be secret except to the extent necessary to assist
sensory or physically disabled voters, or voters who require
translation.
(2) If any voter declares in the presence of the election officers
that because of sensory or physical disability or a language barrier he
or she is unable to register or record his or her vote, he or she may
designate a person of his or her choice or two election officers from
opposite political parties to enter the voting machine booth with him
or her and record his or her vote as he or she directs. If a voter
cannot speak English, he or she may use an interpreter to communicate
with election officials.
(3) A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

--- END ---