BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.36.150 and 2004 c 127 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in section 2 of this act, jurors shall receive
for each day's attendance, besides mileage at the rate determined under
RCW 43.03.060, the following expense payments:
(1) Grand jurors may receive up to twenty-five dollars but in no
case less than ten dollars;
(2) Petit jurors may receive up to twenty-five dollars but in no
case less than ten dollars;
(3) Coroner's jurors may receive up to twenty-five dollars but in
no case less than ten dollars;
(4) District court jurors may receive up to twenty-five dollars but
in no case less than ten dollars:
PROVIDED, That a person excused from jury service at his or her own
request shall be allowed not more than a per diem and such mileage, if
any, as to the court shall seem just and equitable under all
circumstances: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the state shall fully reimburse
the county in which trial is held for all jury fees and witness fees
related to criminal cases which result from incidents occurring within
an adult or juvenile correctional institution: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
the expense payments paid to jurors shall be determined by the county
legislative authority and shall be uniformly applied within the county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 2.36 RCW
to read as follows:
In any state fiscal period in which funds are appropriated for this
purpose, the superior court juror fee under RCW 2.36.150 shall be at
least twenty dollars per juror per day and shall not exceed forty
dollars. During such fiscal periods, the state shall reimburse each
county at least ten dollars per juror per day, and the state shall
reimburse each county up to an additional ten dollars per juror per
day, on a dollar-for-dollar matching basis, for any increased fee in
excess of twenty dollars per juror per day.

--- END ---