BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 50.13 RCW
to read as follows:
Prior to requesting an individual's social security number, all
private and public business enterprises must state that the request is
not mandatory and that no penalty for withholding this information can
be exacted on the individual by the business enterprise. All
organizations holding social security numbers that have not been
specifically granted the authority by federal or state law to possess
this information must purge their files of these numbers within one
hundred twenty days of the effective date of this act.

--- END ---