BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Only to the extent that funds are appropriated for this
purpose, the department shall provide drug benefits to a full-benefit
dual eligible beneficiary who is not able to obtain drug benefits from
his or her medicare drug plan only when one or more of the following
conditions are met:
(a) The pharmacy has submitted a claim for the provision of drug
benefits to the full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary's medicare drug
plan and the claim has been denied payment for reasons other than
processing errors or omissions made by the pharmacy, lack of medical
necessity, or health or safety reasons.
(b) The pharmacy is unable to submit a claim for the provision of
drug benefits solely due to the unavailability of complete or accurate
medicare drug plan enrollment information from the full-benefit dual
eligible beneficiary's medicare drug plan, the federal centers for
medicare and medicaid services, or entities under contract with the
centers for medicare and medicaid services to provide enrollment
information.
(c) The medicare drug plan provides information that the full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary's deductible or copayment amount is
higher than the copayment amounts that are established by medicare for
full-benefit dual eligible beneficiaries.
(d) The full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary cannot pay, in whole
or in part, the copayment amounts that are established by medicare for
full-benefit dual eligible beneficiaries.
(2) The secretary may impose a preservice or postservice prepayment
or postpayment review or audit to determine whether a pharmacy has
accurately and in good faith established the existence of any condition
certified by the pharmacy pursuant to subsection (1)(a), (b), (c), or
(d) of this section in support of a submitted claim to the department.
(3) If the claim submitted by the pharmacy to the medicare drug
plan meets the circumstances described in subsection (1)(c) of this
section, the department shall pay the medicaid rate less the medicare
drug plan reimbursement amount.
(4) To obtain reimbursement from the department, a pharmacy must be
an enrolled provider in the medicaid program and certify on its claims
under penalty of perjury that one of the conditions specified in
subsection (1) of this section exists.
(5) The department shall seek reimbursement from the federal
government of all funds spent to comply with the provisions of this
section.
(6) To the extent that the department reimburses a pharmacy for
claims authorized under this section, the secretary may recover or
recoup the full cost expended by the state for that reimbursement from
the full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary's medicare drug plan.
(7) Any drug benefits made available to full-benefit dual eligible
beneficiaries under the authority of this section shall be limited to
the funds appropriated by the legislature to the department for this
purpose. These drug benefits shall not be deemed to be an entitlement.
(8) Drug benefits under this section shall be available only until
the secretary declares that operational problems associated with the
implementation of the medicare drug plan have been resolved.
(9) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary" means an individual
who meets both of the following criteria:
(i) The beneficiary is eligible or would be eligible for coverage
for the month for covered part D drugs under a prescription drug plan
under part D of Title XVIII of the social security act (42 U.S.C. Sec.
1395w-101 et seq.) or under a MA-PD plan under part C of Title XVIII of
the social security act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-21 et seq.).
(ii) The beneficiary is determined eligible for full scope
services, including drug benefits, for which federal financial
participation is available.
(b) "Medicare drug plan" means a prescription drug plan under part
D of Title XVIII of the social security act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-101
et seq.) or under a MA-PD plan under part C of Title XVIII of the
social security act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-21 et seq.).

--- END ---