BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.99N.060 and 2000 c 137 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The stadium and exhibition center account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the taxes imposed
under RCW 82.14.0494 and distributions under RCW 67.70.240(5) shall be
deposited into the account. Only the director of the office of
financial management or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. An appropriation is not required
for expenditures from this account.
(2) Until bonds are issued under RCW 43.99N.020, up to five million
dollars per year beginning January 1, 1999, shall be used for the
purposes of subsection (3)(b) of this section, all remaining moneys in
the account shall be transferred to the public stadium authority,
created under RCW 36.102.020, to be used for public stadium authority
operations and development of the stadium and exhibition center.
(3) After bonds are issued under RCW 43.99N.020, all moneys in the
stadium and exhibition center account shall be used exclusively for the
following purposes in the following priority:
(a) On or before June 30th of each year, the office of financial
management shall accumulate in the stadium and exhibition center
account an amount at least equal to the amount required in the next
succeeding twelve months for the payment of principal of and interest
on the bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020;
(b) An additional reserve amount not in excess of the expected
average annual principal and interest requirements of bonds issued
under RCW 43.99N.020 shall be accumulated and maintained in the
account, subject to withdrawal by the state treasurer at any time if
necessary to meet the requirements of (a) of this subsection, and,
following any withdrawal, reaccumulated from the first tax revenues and
other amounts deposited in the account after meeting the requirements
of (a) of this subsection; and
(c) The balance, if any, shall be transferred to the youth athletic
facility account under subsection (((4))) (5) of this section.
Any revenues derived from the taxes authorized by RCW 36.38.010(5)
and 36.38.040 or other amounts that if used as provided under (a) and
(b) of this subsection would cause the loss of any tax exemption under
federal law for interest on bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 shall be
deposited in and used exclusively for the purposes of the youth
athletic facility account and shall not be used, directly or
indirectly, as a source of payment of principal of or interest on bonds
issued under RCW 43.99N.020, or to replace or reimburse other funds
used for that purpose.
(4) The 2006 Seattle professional football championship account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. The account is
established to celebrate the 2006 Seattle professional football season
by matching private donations with state funds for the purpose of
funding youth athletic fields. All receipts for this purpose from
donations by representatives of the owners of the Seattle professional
football team, any members of the team, or any organizations or persons
that consider themselves Seattle professional football fans must be
deposited into the account. At the end of each fiscal year, the
treasurer must transfer an amount equal to the amount of donations
received by the account for that year, plus an equal amount of state
funds from within available funds appropriated to the account, to the
youth athletic facility account established in subsection (5) of this
section. If donors grant permission, the interagency committee for
outdoor recreation may post the names of donors on the web site of the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation. The account is subject
to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation
is not required for expenditures. After the transfer at the end of
fiscal year 2008, the treasurer shall transfer any remaining amounts in
the 2006 Seattle professional football championship account to the
general fund, and the account shall be abolished.
(5) Any moneys in the stadium and exhibition center account not
required or permitted to be used for the purposes described in
subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section shall be deposited in the
youth athletic facility account hereby created in the state treasury.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for purposes of grants
or loans to cities, counties, and qualified nonprofit organizations for
community outdoor athletic facilities. Only the director of the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures. The athletic facility grants or loans
may be used for acquiring, developing, equipping, maintaining, and
improving community outdoor athletic facilities. Funds shall be
divided equally between the development of new community outdoor
athletic facilities, the improvement of existing community outdoor
athletic facilities, and the maintenance of existing community outdoor
athletic facilities. Cities, counties, and qualified nonprofit
organizations must submit proposals for grants or loans from the
account. To the extent that funds are available, cities, counties, and
qualified nonprofit organizations must meet eligibility criteria as
established by the director of the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation. The grants and loans shall be awarded on a competitive
application process and the amount of the grant or loan shall be in
proportion to the population of the city or county for where the
community outdoor athletic facility is located. Grants or loans
awarded in any one year need not be distributed in that year. The
director of the interagency committee for outdoor recreation may expend
up to one and one-half percent of the moneys deposited in the account
created in this subsection for administrative purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of ten million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the 2006 Seattle professional
football championship account for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---