BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends that the gambling
commission, in exercising its oversight pursuant to RCW 9.46.070(7),
shall not require review of individual shareholders of corporations
publicly traded on a major exchange, including the New York stock
exchange, American stock exchange, or NASDAQ national market, that are
regulated by the United States securities and exchange commission and
in full compliance therewith when said corporations are included in the
ownership structure of applications for licenses to operate amusement
games.

--- END ---