BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 50.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Before an entity can claim an exemption provided in RCW
50.44.040(1), it must first indicate to the department in a manner
established by rule that it has informed all of its employees before
they were hired that the entity is exempt from paying unemployment
insurance taxes.

--- END ---