BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 For the purpose of providing funds for
state correctional facilities, the state finance committee is
authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington
in the sum of fifty million dollars, or as much thereof as may be
required, to finance the projects and all costs incidental thereto.
Bonds authorized in this section may be sold at such price as the state
finance committee shall determine. No bonds authorized in this section
may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the
net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The proceeds from the sale of the bonds
authorized in section 101 of this act shall be deposited in the state
building construction account created in RCW 43.83.020. If the state
finance committee deems it necessary to issue the bonds authorized in
section 101 of this act as taxable bonds in order to comply with
federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to
the use of nontaxable bond proceeds, the proceeds of such taxable bonds
shall be transferred to the state taxable building construction account
in lieu of any deposit otherwise provided by this section. The state
treasurer shall submit written notice to the director of financial
management if it is determined that any such transfer to the state
taxable building construction account is necessary. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. The proceeds shall be
used exclusively for the purposes specified in section 101 of this act
and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the bonds. These proceeds shall be administered by the office of
financial management, subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 The debt-limit general fund bond
retirement account shall be used for the payment of the principal of
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 101 of this act.
The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each
year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing
twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest requirements.
On each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is
due, the state treasurer shall withdraw from any general state revenues
received in the state treasury and deposit in the debt-limit general
fund bond retirement account an amount equal to the amount certified by
the state finance committee to be due on the payment date.
Bonds issued under section 101 of this act shall state that they
are a general obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge the
full faith and credit of the state to the payment of the principal
thereof and the interest thereon, and shall contain an unconditional
promise to pay the principal and interest as the same shall become due.
The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the
owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 The legislature may provide additional
means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of and
interest on the bonds authorized in section 101 of this act, and
section 103 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive
method for the payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 The bonds authorized in section 101 of
this act shall be a legal investment for all state funds or funds under
state control and for all funds of any other public body.

PART 2
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 For the purpose of providing funds for the
Columbia river basin water supply development program, the state
finance committee is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of
the state of Washington in the sum of two hundred million dollars, or
as much thereof as may be required, to finance the projects and all
costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this section may be sold
at such price as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds
authorized in this section may be offered for sale without prior
legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 It is the intent of the legislature that
the proceeds of the new bonds authorized in section 201 of this act
will be appropriated in phases over five biennia, beginning with the
2005-2007 biennium. This is not intended to limit the legislature's
ability to appropriate bond proceeds if the full amount authorized in
section 201 of this act has not been appropriated after five biennia.
The authorization to issue bonds contained in section 201 of this act
does not expire until the full authorization has been appropriated and
issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 The proceeds from the sale of the bonds
authorized in section 201 of this act shall be deposited in the
Columbia river basin water supply development account created in
chapter ... (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2860), Laws of
2006. If the state finance committee deems it necessary to issue the
bonds authorized in section 201 of this act as taxable bonds in order
to comply with federal internal revenue service rules and regulations
pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds, the proceeds of such
taxable bonds shall be transferred to the state taxable building
construction account in lieu of any deposit otherwise provided by this
section. The state treasurer shall submit written notice to the
director of financial management if it is determined that any such
transfer to the state taxable building construction account is
necessary. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. The proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes
specified in section 201 of this act and for the payment of expenses
incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds. These proceeds shall
be administered by the office of financial management, subject to
legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 The debt-limit general fund bond
retirement account shall be used for the payment of the principal of
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 201 of this act.
The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each
year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing
twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest requirements.
On each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is
due, the state treasurer shall withdraw from any general state revenues
received in the state treasury and deposit in the debt-limit general
fund bond retirement account an amount equal to the amount certified by
the state finance committee to be due on the payment date.
Bonds issued under section 201 of this act shall state that they
are a general obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge the
full faith and credit of the state to the payment of the principal
thereof and the interest thereon, and shall contain an unconditional
promise to pay the principal and interest as the same shall become due.
The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the
owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 The legislature may provide additional
means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of and
interest on the bonds authorized in section 201 of this act, and
section 204 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive
method for the payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 The bonds authorized in section 201 of
this act shall be a legal investment for all state funds or funds under
state control and for all funds of any other public body.

PART 3
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 Sections 101 through 105 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 Sections 201 through 206 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2860 is not enacted by June 30, 2006, sections 201 through 206 of
this act are null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---