BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A majority of students in Washington do not
have the chance to study any language other than English until they are
in middle school, or more often, high school. Education systems of
other nations, some of them much less economically developed than the
United States, begin second language study in the early elementary
grades. Washington's economy is tied to world trade. To enable
Washington citizens to more effectively compete in the world
marketplace and develop a greater sense of the world's culture and
geography, our students, at all levels, must be provided the
opportunity to develop fluency in a second language.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning with the 2006-07 school year:
(1) Each school district shall provide a sequentially, articulated
world language program from elementary through secondary levels that
provides instruction in Spanish and a Chinese language. The program
shall be offered in grades kindergarten through twelve.
(2) Each student may participate in the district program
established under subsection (1) of this section and receive
instruction in Spanish or a Chinese language.
(3) Second class school districts may seek a one-year waiver from
the state board of education to delay implementation of the requirement
to provide the program in subsection (1) of this section. The waiver
may be renewed up to three times.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.410.025 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.67.010 are each
amended to read as follows:
No person shall be accounted as a qualified teacher within the
meaning of the school law who is not the holder of a valid teacher's
certificate or permit issued by lawful authority of this state, except
that a school district may use noncertificated staff or school
volunteers to provide the language instruction in the programs or
classes taught in accordance with section 2 of this act. However, the
noncertificated staff providing the language instruction must: (1) Be
able to speak and write the language fluently; and (2) speak English.

--- END ---