BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
DISTINGUISHED FLYING CROSS AWARD LICENSE PLATE. "Distinguished
flying cross award license plate" means a license plate that displays
a depiction of the distinguished flying cross award.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
A distinguished flying cross award license plate, as defined in
section 1 of this act, is available for purchase by recipients of the
award.
Documentation proving recipient status is required for purchase of
the distinguished flying cross award license plate. This includes:
(1) A photocopy of the recipient's honorable discharge, DD-214, or
release from active duty;
(2) A photocopy of the recipient's current vehicle registration;
and
(3) A photocopy of any general orders or DD-215 amending the DD-214
granting the award which is needed only if the award is not annotated
on separation documents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are not
any part of the law.

--- END ---