BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In response to recent national and
international disasters, it is the legislature's intent to ensure
during times of state and local emergencies and disasters every health
care resource available to the state is utilized. The legislature
recognizes one of its most important resources during such times is the
availability of in-state and out-of-state volunteer health care
providers, specifically physicians, physician assistants, and other
health care providers with extensive primary care training. The
legislature knows that such providers are often reluctant to volunteer
their services out of fear they may be found liable for their acts or
omissions while assisting those in need during an emergency or
disaster. As a way to ensure the maximum number of volunteer health
care providers are available during an emergency or disaster, the
legislature intends to grant immunity from civil liability to all such
providers who provide emergency, medical, or other health care during
emergency or disaster situations.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.24.300 and 2004 c 87 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Any person, including but not limited to a volunteer provider
of emergency or medical services, who without compensation or the
expectation of compensation renders emergency care at the scene of an
emergency or who participates in transporting, not for compensation,
therefrom an injured person or persons for emergency medical treatment
shall not be liable for civil damages resulting from any act or
omission in the rendering of such emergency care or in transporting
such persons, other than acts or omissions constituting gross
negligence or willful or wanton misconduct. Any person rendering
emergency care during the course of regular employment and receiving
compensation or expecting to receive compensation for rendering such
care is excluded from the protection of this subsection.
(2) Any licensed health care provider regulated by a disciplining
authority under RCW 18.130.040 in the state of Washington who, without
compensation or the expectation of compensation, provides health care
services at a community health care setting is not liable for civil
damages resulting from any act or omission in the rendering of such
care, other than acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or
willful or wanton misconduct.
(3) Any physician or physician's assistant licensed to practice in
this state under chapter 18.57, 18.57A, 18.71, or 18.71A RCW, or any
physician or physician's assistant licensed or authorized to practice
medicine in any other United States jurisdiction or credentialed as a
physician assistant by a federal employer who, without compensation or
the expectation of compensation, provides medical or other health-related care: (a) At the scene of an emergency; (b) in connection with
an emergency or disaster under chapter 38.52 RCW; or (c) in connection
with an incident that is man-made or natural disaster that endangers or
threatens to endanger individuals, property, or the environment; and in
which the care is provided at the request of an authorized
representative of a local, state, or federal agency or body including,
but not limited to, a fire department, police department, emergency
management agency, or a disaster response agency, is not liable for
civil damages resulting from any act or omission in the rendering of
such care, other than acts or omissions constituting gross negligence
or willful or wanton misconduct.
(4) For purposes of subsection (2) of this section, "community
health care setting" means an entity that provides health care services
and:
(a) Is a clinic operated by a public entity or private tax exempt
corporation, except a clinic that is owned, operated, or controlled by
a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW unless the hospital-based
clinic either:
(i) Maintains and holds itself out to the public as having
established hours on a regular basis for providing free health care
services to members of the public to the extent that care is provided
without compensation or expectation of compensation during those
established hours; or
(ii) Is participating, through a written agreement, in a community-based program to provide access to health care services for uninsured
persons, to the extent that:
(A) Care is provided without compensation or expectation of
compensation to individuals who have been referred for care through
that community-based program; and
(B) The health care provider's participation in the community-based
program is conditioned upon his or her agreement to provide health
services without expectation of compensation;
(b) Is a for-profit corporation that maintains and holds itself out
to the public as having established hours on a regular basis for
providing free health care services to members of the public to the
extent that care is provided without compensation or expectation of
compensation during those established hours; or
(c) Is a for-profit corporation that is participating, through a
written agreement, in a community-based program to provide access to
health care services for uninsured persons, to the extent that:
(i) Care is provided without compensation or expectation of
compensation to individuals who have been referred for care through
that community-based program; and
(ii) The health care provider's participation in the community-
based program is conditioned upon his or her agreement to provide
health services without expectation of compensation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.57A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An osteopathic physician's assistant licensed in this state or
licensed or authorized to practice in any other United States
jurisdiction or who is credentialed as an osteopathic physician's
assistant by a federal employer who is responding to a need for medical
care created by an emergency or a state or local disaster, as set forth
in RCW 4.24.300, may render such care that the osteopathic physician's
assistant is able to provide without supervision as it is defined in
this chapter, or with such supervision as is available, if any.
(2) An osteopathic physician who supervises an osteopathic
physician's assistant providing medical care in response to an
emergency or state or local disaster is not required to meet the
requirements set forth in this chapter for a supervising physician.
(3) An osteopathic physician who supervises an osteopathic
physician's assistant voluntarily and gratuitously providing emergency
care is not liable for civil damages for any personal injuries that
result from acts or omissions by the osteopathic physician's assistant
rendering emergency care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.71A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A physician assistant licensed in this state or licensed or
authorized to practice in any other United States jurisdiction or who
is credentialed as a physician assistant by a federal employer who is
responding to a need for medical care created by an emergency or a
state or local disaster, as set forth in RCW 4.24.300, may render such
care that the physician assistant is able to provide without
supervision as it is defined in this chapter, or with such supervision
as is available, if any.
(2) A physician who supervises a physician assistant providing
medical care in response to an emergency or state or local disaster is
not required to meet the requirements set forth in this chapter for a
supervising physician.
(3) A physician who supervises a physician assistant voluntarily
and gratuitously providing emergency care is not liable for civil
damages for any personal injuries that result from acts or omissions by
the physician assistant rendering emergency care.

--- END ---