BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that when Washington
state voters passed Initiative Measure No. 747 on November 6, 2001,
they intended to limit the growth of taxing districts' regular property
tax levies to a maximum of one percent higher than the previous year.
While taxing districts have abided by the one percent limit, the
legislature finds that a recent superior court decision has resulted in
ambiguity as to property taxing districts' taxing authority, both
prospectively and retroactively dating back to the passage of the
initiative. It is the purpose of this act to resolve any ambiguity in
the law and to make retroactive, remedial, and curative changes that
reenact and reaffirm the one percent limit approved by voters in 2001.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.55.005 and 2002 c 1 s 2 are each reenacted to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of
economic analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of
the year before the taxes are payable;
(2) "Limit factor" means:
(a) For taxing districts with a population of less than ten
thousand in the calendar year prior to the assessment year, one hundred
one percent;
(b) For taxing districts for which a limit factor is authorized
under RCW 84.55.0101, the lesser of the limit factor under that section
or one hundred one percent;
(c) For all other districts, the lesser of one hundred one percent
or one hundred percent plus inflation; and
(3) "Regular property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW
84.04.140.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.55.0101 and 2002 c 1 s 3 are each reenacted to read
as follows:
Upon a finding of substantial need, the legislative authority of a
taxing district other than the state may provide for the use of a limit
factor under this chapter of one hundred one percent or less unless an
increase greater than this limit is approved by the voters at an
election as provided in RCW 84.55.050. In districts with legislative
authorities of four members or less, two-thirds of the members must
approve an ordinance or resolution under this section. In districts
with more than four members, a majority plus one vote must approve an
ordinance or resolution under this section. The new limit factor shall
be effective for taxes collected in the following year only.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---