BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Washington state parks will mark its
centennial year in 2013. The park system has long been one of the
jewels of the state, drawing millions of visitors each year. Yet, in
recent years, a sizable portion of the park system's facilities has
fallen into disrepair, due to forgoing routine maintenance and
postponing necessary renovations. Under the direction of the
legislature to develop a centennial 2013 vision and plan, the state
parks and recreation commission has identified two hundred twenty major
renovation projects and more than one thousand three hundred
uncompleted deferred maintenance projects. The legislature recognizes
that the longer prudent park repairs remain unfunded or are postponed,
the greater the cost grows.
(2) The legislature further finds that the last major state funding
dedicated for state parks' capital improvements occurred in the early
1970s and, as stewards of the future, it is necessary once again to
dedicate revenues to restore and renovate our park system, ensuring
that future generations may enjoy the same first-rate public park
system as prior generations. Therefore, the legislature intends to
create the state parks and recreation commission centennial 2013
account from which funds shall be used to eliminate the parks'
maintenance backlog and complete the critical renovations identified in
the state parks and recreation commission's centennial 2013 plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79A.75 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state parks and recreation commission centennial 2013
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts
from the appropriation in section 5 of this act must be deposited in
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures. Only the director of the state parks and recreation
commission, or the director's designee, may authorize expenditures from
the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
purposes listed in section 3 of this act.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the account on June 30, 2013, must be
transferred to the state general fund.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79A.75 RCW
to read as follows:
The state parks and recreation commission shall expend funds from
the state parks and recreation commission centennial 2013 account
solely for the purposes of the projects listed in appendix C of the
Washington state parks and recreation commission's strategic plan from
2007-2013, submitted in June 2006. The commission may expend more or
less funds on each project than the amounts listed therein, provided
that the total expenditures do not exceed the funds in the account.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2006 c 311 s 21 and 2006 c 120 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers
conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the
grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the state parks and recreation commission centennial
2013 account, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing commission
class C purse fund account, the individual development account program
account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account
(earnings from the Washington horse racing commission operating account
must be credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account), the life sciences discovery fund, and the reading
achievement account. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The sum of one hundred sixty-five million
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the
state parks and recreation commission centennial 2013 account, created
in section 2 of this act, for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---