BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the
following project loans recommended by the public works board are
authorized to be made with funds appropriated from the public works
assistance account:
(1) Airway Heights--sanitary sewer project--collection system
improvements and an approximately 1 million gallon per day annual
average flow wastewater treatment, reclamation, and groundwater
recharge facility . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(2) Annapolis water district--domestic water project--interior and
exterior of surface water reservoir will be sandblasted and painted to
preserve structural integrity of the tank and eliminate breaches in the
paint coating systems. Structural repairs will also be made to the
tank and foundation . . . . . . . . . . . . $595,000
(3) Blaine--sanitary sewer project--construct a new wastewater
treatment plant to serve the projected demand for the next twenty
years, using the latest membrane filtering technology to produce
reuse-quality water effluent to minimize impacts to local shell fishing
. . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(4) Bremerton--sanitary sewer project--upgrade a sewage pump
station to increase capacity from 1,900 gallons per minute to 3,500
gallons per minute, eliminating combined sewer overflows into the Puget
Sound and meet a court order . . . . . . . . . . . . $675,000
(5) Bremerton--sanitary sewer project--design and construct a
treatment plant upgrade to address the vital needs of the plant, create
redundancy for essential treatment processes, and replace twenty year
old components and meet a court order . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
(6) Bremerton--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
1,300 feet new sewer interceptor and collector pipe to replace old,
failing shallow sewer and meet a court order . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
(7) Chelan county public utility district no. 1--domestic water
project--design and construct: Two pump stations to increase capacity
from approximately 4,000 gallons per minute to approximately 6,000
gallons per minute; a two million gallon reservoir; and approximately
5,000 feet of twelve and sixteen-inch water transmission mains to
provide a reliable water source for approximately 4,500 customers
. . . . . . . . . . . . $5,267,000
(8) Cowlitz county--domestic water project--recoat the interior and
exterior of four reservoirs to address areas of failure with the
original coatings and protect the structural integrity of the
reservoirs . . . . . . . . . . . . $340,000
(9) Cross Valley water district--domestic water project--relocation
and replacement of a failing water supply line that is located in an
extremely wet cow pasture. Approximately 3,500 linear feet of asbestos
cement line will be replaced with twelve-inch ductile iron pipe,
including all valves, hydrants, and appurtenances as well as complete
restoration and paving . . . . . . . . . . . . $532,525
(10) East Wenatchee water district--domestic water project--construct approximately 6,000 lineal feet of twelve-inch water main
that will serve as the supply main to the new approximately 1.5 million
gallon reservoir . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,772,700
(11) Friday Harbor--sanitary sewer project--construct a new
offshore marine pipeline approximately 1,900 feet in length; a new pump
station and approximately 3,650 feet of pipeline to the wastewater
treatment plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,378,000
(12) Grays Harbor county water district no. 1--domestic water
project--provide adequate water supply from primary source to the north
end of the system to mitigate low pressure problems and comply with a
bilateral compliance agreement; extend distribution system to provide
service to residences with failing individual supplies; construct
standby power generation facilities for primary source of supply; and
construct additional storage and pumping facilities to provide reliable
service and fire flow . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,717,575
(13) Lake Stevens sewer district--sanitary sewer project--construction of a state of the art membrane bioreactor wastewater
treatment facility outside the flood plain and an interceptor line and
pump station . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(14) Mattawa--sanitary sewer project--complete public bidding and
construction of the improvements consisting of an approximately 622,000
cubic foot HDPE lined long-term biosolids digestion basin, associated
piping, rehabilitation of the existing biosolids drying beds, and
fencing . . . . . . . . . . . . $465,585
(15) Port Angeles--sanitary sewer project--design and construction
of approximately 4,500 feet of thirty-inch sewer main to the headworks
of the wastewater treatment plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,875,000
(16) Snohomish--sanitary sewer project--construct a fifteen and
ten-inch sewer to reach an existing pump station; extend the above
sewer using an eight-inch pipe to another pump station; and replace an
existing sewer with a ten-inch pipe to provide additional capacity for
future service and to meet the conditions of a stipulated court order
. . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(17) Toppenish--sanitary sewer project--construct a single
activated sludge process to replace the existing wastewater treatment
facility, including the installation of ultraviolet disinfection
channels to replace chlorine gas. The solids handling system will also
be improved . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(18) Walla Walla--sanitary sewer project--the third and final
upgrade at the wastewater treatment plant to meet class A water reuse
standards and to comply with an agreed order from the department of
ecology . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,856,875
(19) Yakima--sanitary sewer project--replacement of chlorine gas
with ultraviolet disinfection at the Yakima regional wastewater
treatment plant to complete the first phase of the facility
improvements . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---