BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2006 c 119 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount ((shall)) must be calculated pursuant to the laws
and rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount ((shall)) must be the sum of (a)
plus or minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this
subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsections (3) and (4)
of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as
defined in subsection (5) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount ((shall)) must be reduced and the
nonhigh school district's maximum levy amount ((shall)) must be
increased by an amount equal to the estimated amount of the nonhigh
payment due to the high school district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and
28A.545.050 for the school year commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount ((shall)) must be
reduced and the resident school district's maximum levy amount
((shall)) must be increased by an amount equal to the per pupil basic
education allocation included in the nonresident district's levy base
under subsection (3) of this section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (5) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount ((shall)) must be reduced by
the maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 2005 and
thereafter, a district's levy base ((shall)) must be the sum of
allocations in (a) through (c) of this subsection received by the
district for the prior school year and the amounts determined under
subsection (4) of this section, including allocations for compensation
increases, plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent
increase per full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic
education appropriation section of the biennial budget between the
prior school year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five
percent. A district's levy base ((shall)) must not include local
school district property tax levies or other local revenues, or state
and federal allocations not identified in (a) through (c) of this
subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) For levy collections in calendar years 2005 through 2011, in
addition to the allocations included under subsection (3)(a) through
(c) of this section, a district's levy base ((shall)) must also include
the following:
(a) The difference between the allocation the district would have
received in the current school year had RCW 84.52.068 not been amended
by chapter 19, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocation the
district received in the current school year pursuant to RCW 84.52.068.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offset the
amount added to a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection
(4)(a) by any additional per student allocations included in a
district's levy base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the
people subsequent to June 10, 2004; and
(b) The difference between the allocations the district would have
received the prior school year had RCW 28A.400.205 not been amended by
chapter 20, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocations the district
actually received the prior school year pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offset the
amount added to a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection
(4)(b) by any additional salary increase allocations included in a
district's levy base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the
people subsequent to June 10, 2004.
(5) A district's maximum levy percentage ((shall)) must be
((twenty-two)) thirty-five percent ((in 1998 and twenty-four percent in
1999 and every year thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the
grandfathered percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (6) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection)).
(6) "Levy reduction funds" ((shall)) means increases in state funds
from the prior school year for programs included under subsections (3)
and (4) of this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment
changes, compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b)
that are or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year" means the
most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies
are to be collected.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "current school year" means
the year immediately following the prior school year.
(9) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.52.0531 and 1997 c 259 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as defined
in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (4) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year, including allocations for compensation increases,
plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per
full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) A district's maximum levy percentage ((shall)) must be
((twenty-two)) thirty-five percent ((in 1998 and twenty-four percent in
1999 and every year thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the
grandfathered percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (5) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection)).
(5) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from
the prior school year for programs included under subsection (3) of
this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment changes,
compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b) that are
or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year" means the
most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies
are to be collected.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "current school year" means
the year immediately following the prior school year.
(8) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.52.053 and 1997 c 260 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and
84.52.043 shall not prevent the levy of taxes by school districts, when
authorized so to do by the voters of such school district in the manner
and for the purposes and number of years allowable under Article VII,
section 2(a) of the Constitution of this state. Elections for such
taxes shall be held in the year in which the levy is made or, in the
case of propositions authorizing two-year through four-year levies for
maintenance and operation support of a school district, authorizing
two-year levies for transportation vehicle funds established in RCW
28A.160.130, or authorizing two-year through six-year levies to support
the construction, modernization, or remodeling of school facilities, in
the year in which the first annual levy is made: PROVIDED, That once
additional tax levies have been authorized for maintenance and
operation support of a school district for a two-year through four-year
period, no further additional tax levies for maintenance and operation
support of the district for that period may be authorized except that
where a tax levy has already been authorized for the maintenance and
operation support of a school district for a two-year through four-year
period at the time sections 1 and 2 of this act take effect and the
school district's 2008 maximum levy percentage has increased as
compared to its 2007 maximum levy percentage under RCW 84.52.0531, the
school district may seek authorization for an additional tax levy up to
the maximum levy percentage authorized under RCW 84.52.0531 for the
remainder of the two-year through four-year period.
A special election may be called and the time therefor fixed by the
board of school directors, by giving notice thereof by publication in
the manner provided by law for giving notices of general elections, at
which special election the proposition authorizing such excess levy
shall be submitted in such form as to enable the voters favoring the
proposition to vote "yes" and those opposed thereto to vote "no".

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.500.020 and 2004 c 21 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(a) "Prior tax collection year" means the year immediately
preceding the year in which the local effort assistance shall be
allocated.
(b) "Statewide average twelve percent levy rate" means ((twelve))
fourteen percent of the total levy bases as defined in RCW 84.52.0531
(3) and (4) summed for all school districts, and divided by the total
assessed valuation for excess levy purposes in the prior tax collection
year for all districts as adjusted to one hundred percent by the county
indicated ratio established in RCW 84.48.075.
(c) The "district's ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy amount" means
the school district's maximum levy authority after transfers determined
under RCW 84.52.0531(2) (a) through (c) divided by the district's
maximum levy percentage determined under RCW 84.52.0531(5) multiplied
by ((twelve)) fourteen percent.
(d) The "district's ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy rate" means
the district's ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy amount divided by the
district's assessed valuation for excess levy purposes for the prior
tax collection year as adjusted to one hundred percent by the county
indicated ratio.
(e) "Districts eligible for local effort assistance" means those
districts with a ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy rate that exceeds the
statewide average ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy rate.
(2) Unless otherwise stated all rates, percents, and amounts are
for the calendar year for which local effort assistance is being
calculated under this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.500.020 and 1999 c 317 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(a) "Prior tax collection year" means the year immediately
preceding the year in which the local effort assistance ((shall)) must
be allocated.
(b) "Statewide average ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy rate" means
((twelve)) fourteen percent of the total levy bases as defined in RCW
84.52.0531(3) summed for all school districts, and divided by the total
assessed valuation for excess levy purposes in the prior tax collection
year for all districts as adjusted to one hundred percent by the county
indicated ratio established in RCW 84.48.075.
(c) The "district's ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy amount" means
the school district's maximum levy authority after transfers determined
under RCW 84.52.0531(2) (a) through (c) divided by the district's
maximum levy percentage determined under RCW 84.52.0531(4) multiplied
by ((twelve)) fourteen percent.
(d) The "district's ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy rate" means
the district's ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy amount divided by the
district's assessed valuation for excess levy purposes for the prior
tax collection year as adjusted to one hundred percent by the county
indicated ratio.
(e) "Districts eligible for local effort assistance" means those
districts with a ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy rate that exceeds the
statewide average ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy rate.
(2) Unless otherwise stated all rates, percents, and amounts are
for the calendar year for which local effort assistance is being
calculated under this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.500.030 and 2006 c 372 s 904 and 2006 c 119 s 1
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Allocation of state matching funds to eligible districts for local
effort assistance ((shall)) must be determined as follows:
(1) Funds raised by the district through maintenance and operation
levies shall be matched with state funds using the following ratio of
state funds to levy funds:
(a) The difference between the district's ((twelve)) fourteen
percent levy rate and the statewide average ((twelve)) fourteen percent
levy rate; to
(b) The statewide average ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy rate.
(2) The maximum amount of state matching funds for districts
eligible for local effort assistance ((shall)) must be the district's
((twelve)) fourteen percent levy amount, multiplied by the following
percentage:
(a) The difference between the district's ((twelve)) fourteen
percent levy rate and the statewide average ((twelve)) fourteen percent
levy rate; divided by
(b) The district's ((twelve)) fourteen percent levy rate.
(3) Calendar year 2003 allocations and maximum eligibility under
this chapter ((shall)) must be multiplied by 0.99.
(4) From January 1, 2004, to December 31, 2005, allocations and
maximum eligibility under this chapter ((shall)) must be multiplied by
0.937.
(5) From January 1, 2006, to December 31, 2006, allocations and
maximum eligibility under this chapter ((shall)) must be multiplied by
0.9563. Beginning with calendar year 2007, allocations and maximum
eligibility under this chapter shall be fully funded at one hundred
percent and shall not be reduced.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1, 3, and 4 of this act take effect
January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2 and 5 of this act take effect
January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 and 4 of this act expire January
1, 2012.

--- END ---