BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.865 and 2006 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
diesel fuel, biodiesel fuel, or aircraft fuel as defined in RCW
82.42.010(5), to a farm fuel user for nonhighway use. This exemption
is available only if the buyer provides the seller with an exemption
certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. Fuel
used for space or water heating for human habitation is not exempt
under this section.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.04.213 and this subsection apply to
this section.
(a) "Biodiesel fuel" is defined as provided in RCW 19.112.010.
(b) "Diesel fuel" is defined as provided in 26 U.S.C. 4083, as
amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2006.
(((b))) (c) "Farm fuel user" means: (i) A farmer; or (ii) a person
who provides horticultural services for farmers, such as soil
preparation services, crop cultivation services, and crop harvesting
services.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.865 and 2006 c 7 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
nonhighway use of diesel fuel, nonhighway use of biodiesel fuel as
defined in RCW 19.112.010, or aircraft fuel as defined in RCW
82.42.010(5), by a farm fuel user. Fuel used for space or water
heating for human habitation is not exempt under this section.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.08.865 apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---