BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.065 and 2007 c 441 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The commission shall grant to any person who meets the
eligibility requirements specified in this section a senior citizen's
pass which shall: (i) Entitle such a person, and members of his or her
camping unit, to a fifty percent reduction in the campsite rental fee
prescribed by the commission((,)); and (ii) entitle such a person to
free admission to any state park.
(b) The commission shall grant a senior citizen's pass to any
person who applies for the ((same)) senior citizen's pass and who meets
the following requirements:
(i) The person is at least sixty-two years of age; ((and))
(ii) The person is a domiciliary of the state of Washington and
meets reasonable residency requirements prescribed by the commission;
and
(iii) The person and his or her spouse have a combined income
((which)) that would qualify the person for a property tax exemption
pursuant to RCW 84.36.381. The financial eligibility requirements of
this subsection (1)(b)(iii) ((shall)) apply regardless of whether the
applicant for a senior citizen's pass owns taxable property or has
obtained or applied for such property tax exemption.
(c) Each senior citizen's pass granted pursuant to this section is
valid ((so)) as long as the senior citizen meets the requirements of
(b)(ii) of this subsection. ((Notwithstanding, any)) A senior citizen
meeting the eligibility requirements of this section may make a
voluntary donation for the upkeep and maintenance of state parks.
(d) A holder of a senior citizen's pass shall surrender the pass
upon request of a commission employee when the employee has reason to
believe the holder fails to meet the criteria in (b) of this
subsection. The holder shall have the pass returned upon providing
proof to the satisfaction of the director ((of the parks and recreation
commission)) that the holder ((does)) meets the eligibility criteria
for obtaining the senior citizen's pass.
(2)(a) Any resident of Washington who is disabled as defined by the
social security administration and who receives social security
benefits for that disability, or any other benefits for that disability
from any other governmental or nongovernmental source, or who is
entitled to benefits for permanent disability under RCW 71A.10.020(3)
due to unemployability full time at the minimum wage, or who is legally
blind or profoundly deaf, or who has been issued a card, decal, or
special license plate for a permanent disability under RCW 46.16.381
shall be entitled to receive, regardless of age and upon making
application therefor, a disability pass at no cost to the holder. The
pass shall: (i) Entitle such a person, and members of his or her
camping unit, to a fifty percent reduction in the campsite rental fee
prescribed by the commission((,)); and (ii) entitle such a person to
free admission to any state park.
(b) A card, decal, or special license plate issued for a permanent
disability under RCW 46.16.381 may serve as a pass for the holder to
entitle that person and members of the person's camping unit to a fifty
percent reduction in the campsite rental fee prescribed by the
commission, and to allow the holder free admission to state parks.
(3) Any resident of Washington who is a veteran and has a service-connected disability of at least thirty percent shall be entitled to
receive a lifetime veteran's disability pass at no cost to the holder.
The pass shall: (a) Entitle such a person, and members of his or her
camping unit, to free use of any campsite within any state park; (b)
entitle such a person to free admission to any state park; and (c)
entitle such a person to an exemption from any reservation fees.
(4)(a) Any Washington state resident who provides out-of-home care
to a child, as either a licensed foster-family home or a person related
to the child, is entitled to a foster home pass.
(b) An applicant for a foster home pass must request a pass in the
manner required by the commission. Upon receipt of a properly
submitted request, the commission shall verify with the department of
social and health services that the applicant qualifies under (a) of
this subsection. Once issued, a foster home pass is valid for the
period, which may not be less than one year, designated by the
commission.
(c) When accompanied by a child receiving out-of-home care from the
pass holder, a foster home pass: (i) Entitles such a person, and
members of his or her camping unit, to free use of any campsite within
any state park; and (ii) entitles such a person to free admission to
any state park.
(d) For the purposes of this subsection (4):
(i) "Out-of-home care" means placement in a foster-family home or
with a person related to the child under the authority of chapter
13.32A, 13.34, or 74.13 RCW;
(ii) "Foster-family home" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
74.15.020; and
(iii) "Person related to the child" means those persons referred to
in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a) (i) through (vi).
(5) All passes issued pursuant to this section ((shall be)) are
valid at all parks any time during the year. However, the pass
((shall)) is not ((be)) valid for admission to concessionaire operated
facilities.
(((5))) (6) The commission shall negotiate payment and costs, to
allow holders of a foster home pass free access and usage of park
campsites, with the following nonoperated, nonstate-owned parks:
Central Ferry, Chief Timothy, Crow Butte, and Lyons Ferry. The
commission shall seek state general fund reimbursement on a biennial
basis.
(7) The commission may deny or revoke any Washington state park
pass issued under this section for cause, including but not limited to
the following:
(a) Residency outside the state of Washington;
(b) Violation of laws or state park rules resulting in eviction
from a state park;
(c) Intimidating, obstructing, or assaulting a park employee or
park volunteer who is engaged in the performance of official duties;
(d) Fraudulent use of a pass;
(e) Providing false information or documentation in the application
for a state parks pass;
(f) Refusing to display or show the pass to park employees when
requested; or
(g) Failing to provide current eligibility information upon request
by the agency or when eligibility ceases or changes.
(((6))) (8) This section shall not affect or otherwise impair the
power of the commission to continue or discontinue any other programs
it has adopted for senior citizens.
(((7))) (9) The commission may engage in a mutually agreed upon
reciprocal or discounted program for all or specific pass programs with
other outdoor recreation agencies.
(((8))) (10) The commission shall adopt ((such)) those rules as it
finds appropriate for the administration of this section. Among other
things, ((such)) the rules shall prescribe a definition of "camping
unit" which will authorize a reasonable number of persons traveling
with the person having a pass to stay at the campsite rented by such a
person, a minimum Washington residency requirement for applicants for
a senior citizen's pass, and an application form to be completed by
applicants for a senior citizen's pass.

--- END ---