BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.24.026 and 2005 c 514 s 1102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the tax imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes set forth in RCW
82.24.020, there is imposed a tax in an amount equal to the rate of
thirty mills per cigarette.
(2) The revenue collected under this section shall be deposited as
follows:
(a) 21.7 percent shall be deposited into the health services
account.
(b) ((2.8 percent shall be deposited into the general fund.
(c))) 2.3 percent shall be deposited into the violence reduction
and drug enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520.
(((d))) (c) 1.7 percent shall be deposited into the water quality
account under RCW 70.146.030.
(((e))) (d) The remainder shall be deposited into the ((education
legacy trust account)) state general fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.505.220 and 2005 c 514 s 1103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Total distributions from the student achievement fund to each
school district shall be based upon the average number of full-time
equivalent students in the school district during the previous school
year as reported to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction by August 31st of the previous school year.
(2) The allocation rate per full-time equivalent student shall be
three hundred dollars in the ((2005-06)) 2006-07 school year, three
hundred seventy-five dollars in the ((2006-07)) 2007-08 school year,
and four hundred fifty dollars in the ((2007-08)) 2008-09 school year.
For each subsequent school year, the amount allocated per full-time
equivalent student shall be adjusted for inflation as defined in RCW
((43.135.025(8))) 84.52.068. These allocations per full-time
equivalent student from the student achievement fund shall be supported
from ((the following sources:
(a) Distributions from state property tax proceeds deposited into
the student achievement fund under RCW 84.52.068; and
(b))) distributions from the education legacy trust account created
in RCW 83.100.230.
(3) Any funds deposited in the student achievement fund under RCW
43.135.045 shall be allocated to school districts on a one-time basis
using a rate per full-time equivalent student. These funds are
provided in addition to any amounts allocated in subsection (2) of this
section.
(4) The school district annual amounts as defined in subsection (2)
of this section shall be distributed on the monthly apportionment
schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.52.068 and 2005 c 514 s 1104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A portion of the proceeds of the state property tax levy shall
be deposited into the ((student achievement fund)) education legacy
trust account as provided in this section.
(2)(a) The amount of the deposit shall be based upon the average
number of full-time equivalent students in the school districts during
the previous school year as reported to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction by August 31st of the previous
school year.
(b) ((For the 2004-2005 through 2007-2008 school years, an annual
amount equal to two hundred fifty-four dollars per full-time equivalent
student in all school districts shall be deposited in the student
achievement fund.
(c) For the 2008-2009 school year, an annual amount equal to two
hundred sixty-five dollars per full-time equivalent student in all
school districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(d) For the 2009-2010 school year, an annual amount equal to two
hundred seventy-seven dollars per full-time equivalent student in all
school districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(e) For the 2010-2011 school year and each year thereafter, an
annual amount equal to two hundred seventy-eight dollars per full-time
equivalent student in all school districts shall be deposited in the
student achievement fund)) For the 2006-07 school year, an amount equal
to three hundred dollars per full-time equivalent student in all school
districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(c) For the 2007-08 school year, an amount equal to three hundred
seventy-five dollars per full-time equivalent student in all school
districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(d) For the 2008-09 school year, an amount equal to four hundred
fifty dollars per full-time equivalent student in all school districts
shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(e) For each subsequent school year, the amount deposited per full-time equivalent student shall be adjusted for inflation.
(f) The school district annual amounts shall be deposited based on
the monthly apportionment schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall notify the
department of the monthly amounts to be deposited into the student
achievement fund to meet the apportionment schedule.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "inflation" means the
percentage change in the implicit price deflator for the United States
for each fiscal year as published by the federal bureau of labor
statistics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---