BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is imperative
for Washington citizens to have access to higher education. A well-educated citizenry is essential to both Washington's public well-being
and its economic future. The legislature further finds that
affordability is a key factor in whether Washington citizens have
access to higher education. At a time when college is more important
than ever to a person's educational and economic well-being, rising
tuition costs make the dream of going to college even harder to
realize. Tuition and fees at the University of Washington have
increased eighty-two percent over the past ten years. During the same
time, the cost of consumer goods increased on average twenty-two
percent and Washington's personal income increased by forty percent.
Washington was recently given a D- for affordability by the national
center for public policy and higher education. It is the legislature's
intent that tuition levels should be predictable for families,
students, and institutions, and limiting the amount by which it can be
raised will assist in that endeavor.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2006 c 161 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
((2008-09)) 2006-07 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time
tuition fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the
omnibus appropriations act.
(3) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities,
the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students.
(4) Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2009-10, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2008-09 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
under RCW 28C.04.610.
(7) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the University
of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases beginning
in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to assist needy
low and middle income resident law students.
(8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, institutions of
higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of graduate academic school tuition
increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through academic year
2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident graduate
academic students.
(9) Beginning with the 2007-08 academic year and ending with the
2016-17 academic year, tuition fees charged to full-time resident
undergraduate students may increase no greater than five and one-half
percent over the previous academic year in any institution of higher
education. Annual reductions or increases in full-time tuition fees
for resident undergraduate students shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act, within the five and one-half percent increase limit
established in this section. To the extent that state appropriations
combined with tuition and fee revenues are insufficient to achieve the
total per-student funding goals established in subsection (10) of this
section, the legislature may authorize enrollment levels and changes in
tuition fees for any given fiscal year.
(10) The state shall adopt as its goal total per-student funding
levels, from state appropriations plus tuition and fees, of at least
the sixtieth percentile of total per-student funding at similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states. The
office of financial management shall develop a funding trajectory for
each four-year institution of higher education and for the community
and technical college system as a whole that when combined with tuition
and fees revenue allows the state to achieve its funding goal for each
four-year institution and the community and technical college system as
a whole no later than fiscal year 2017. The state shall not reduce
enrollment levels below fiscal year 2007 budgeted levels in order to
improve or alter the per-student funding amount at any four-year
institution of higher education or the community and technical college
system as a whole.
(11) By September 1st of each year beginning in 2008, the office of
financial management shall report to the governor, the higher education
coordinating board, and appropriate committees of the legislature with
updated estimates of the total per-student funding level that
represents the sixtieth percentile of funding for comparable
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states, and
the progress toward that goal that was made for each of the public
institutions of higher education.
(12) As used in this section, "global challenge states" are the top
performing states on the new economy index published by the progressive
policy institute as of the effective date of this section.

--- END ---