BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Birds are both a fundamental part of
Washington's biota and a source of daily viewing pleasure for all
Washingtonians. The occurrence of rare wild birds, such as transient
species from other continents, generates enormous interest from bird
watchers and the public generally, and provides economic benefits to
the community hosting the rare bird or birds. There is great public
interest in promoting backyard bird habitat and feeding, and gaining
greater understanding of bird types, behavior, and conservation needs.
The designation of a state ornithologist will serve the public's
interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall appoint a person with avian expertise as the
Washington state ornithologist. In making the appointment the director
shall consider recommendations of candidates from public and private
avian research institutions, the ornithology department at the Burke
museum of natural history and culture, the private research sector, and
public organizations relating to ornithology. The state ornithologist
serves at the pleasure of the director. The position shall be
honorary, and the state ornithologist shall serve without compensation
except the department may pay travel and per diem costs as requested.
(2) The state ornithologist serves primarily as a source of
expertise to the department and other state agencies regarding bird
research and conservation. He or she also serves to assist the public
in bird conservation efforts, including bird feeding, bird nesting, and
designing bird friendly yards. The state ornithologist will also
assist the governor, state agencies, and the legislature in the design
of bird conservation programs and policies. These conservation efforts
shall be pursued as one part of the ecosystem-based management approach
by the department and other wildlife management agencies and
organizations.

--- END ---