BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.88.030 and 1996 c 249 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person or entity may petition for the appointment of a
qualified person, trust company, national bank, or nonprofit
corporation authorized in RCW 11.88.020 as the guardian or limited
guardian of an incapacitated person. No liability for filing a
petition for guardianship or limited guardianship shall attach to a
petitioner acting in good faith and upon reasonable basis. A
professional guardian who files a petition for guardianship must comply
with the ethical advisory opinions issued by the certified professional
guardian board with respect to petitions for self-appointment. A
petition for guardianship or limited guardianship shall state:
(a) The name, age, residence, and post office address of the
alleged incapacitated person;
(b) The nature of the alleged incapacity in accordance with RCW
11.88.010;
(c) The approximate value and description of property, including
any compensation, pension, insurance, or allowance, to which the
alleged incapacitated person may be entitled;
(d) Whether there is, in any state, a guardian or limited guardian,
or pending guardianship action for the person or estate of the alleged
incapacitated person;
(e) The residence and post office address of the person whom
petitioner asks to be appointed guardian or limited guardian;
(f) The names and addresses, and nature of the relationship, so far
as known or can be reasonably ascertained, of the persons most closely
related by blood or marriage to the alleged incapacitated person;
(g) The name and address of the person or facility having the care
and custody of the alleged incapacitated person;
(h) The reason why the appointment of a guardian or limited
guardian is sought and the interest of the petitioner in the
appointment, and whether the appointment is sought as guardian or
limited guardian of the person, the estate, or both;
(i) A description of any alternate arrangements previously made by
the alleged incapacitated person, such as trusts or powers of attorney,
including identifying any guardianship nominations contained in a power
of attorney, and why a guardianship is nevertheless necessary;
(j) The nature and degree of the alleged incapacity and the
specific areas of protection and assistance requested and the
limitation of rights requested to be included in the court's order of
appointment;
(k) The requested term of the limited guardianship to be included
in the court's order of appointment;
(l) Whether the petitioner is proposing a specific individual to
act as guardian ad litem and, if so, the individual's knowledge of or
relationship to any of the parties, and why the individual is proposed.
(2)(a) The attorney general may petition for the appointment of a
guardian or limited guardian in any case in which there is cause to
believe that a guardianship is necessary and no private party is able
and willing to petition.
(b) Prepayment of a filing fee shall not be required in any
guardianship or limited guardianship brought by the attorney general.
Payment of the filing fee shall be ordered from the estate of the
incapacitated person at the hearing on the merits of the petition,
unless in the judgment of the court, such payment would impose a
hardship upon the incapacitated person, in which case the filing shall
be waived.
(3) No filing fee shall be charged by the court for filing either
a petition for guardianship or a petition for limited guardianship if
the petition alleges that the alleged incapacitated person has total
assets of a value of less than three thousand dollars.
(4)(a) Notice that a guardianship proceeding has been commenced
shall be personally served upon the alleged incapacitated person and
the guardian ad litem along with a copy of the petition for appointment
of a guardian. Such notice shall be served not more than five court
days after the petition has been filed.
(b) Notice under this subsection shall include a clear and easily
readable statement of the legal rights of the alleged incapacitated
person that could be restricted or transferred to a guardian by a
guardianship order as well as the right to counsel of choice and to a
jury trial on the issue of incapacity. Such notice shall be in
substantially the following form and shall be in capital letters,
double-spaced, and in a type size not smaller than ten-point type:

IMPORTANT NOTICE PLEASE READ CAREFULLY

A PETITION TO HAVE A GUARDIAN APPOINTED FOR YOU HAS BEEN FILED IN THE
. . . . . . COUNTY SUPERIOR COURT BY . . . . . . IF A GUARDIAN IS
APPOINTED, YOU COULD LOSE ONE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING RIGHTS:
(1) TO MARRY OR DIVORCE;
(2) TO VOTE OR HOLD AN ELECTED OFFICE;
(3) TO ENTER INTO A CONTRACT OR MAKE OR REVOKE A WILL;
(4) TO APPOINT SOMEONE TO ACT ON YOUR BEHALF;
(5) TO SUE AND BE SUED OTHER THAN THROUGH A GUARDIAN;
(6) TO POSSESS A LICENSE TO DRIVE;
(7) TO BUY, SELL, OWN, MORTGAGE, OR LEASE PROPERTY;
(8) TO CONSENT TO OR REFUSE MEDICAL TREATMENT;
(9) TO DECIDE WHO SHALL PROVIDE CARE AND ASSISTANCE;
(10) TO MAKE DECISIONS REGARDING SOCIAL ASPECTS OF YOUR LIFE.

UNDER THE LAW, YOU HAVE CERTAIN RIGHTS.

YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO BE REPRESENTED BY A LAWYER OF YOUR OWN CHOOSING.
THE COURT WILL APPOINT A LAWYER TO REPRESENT YOU IF YOU ARE UNABLE TO
PAY OR PAYMENT WOULD RESULT IN A SUBSTANTIAL HARDSHIP TO YOU.

YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO ASK FOR A JURY TO DECIDE WHETHER OR NOT YOU NEED
A GUARDIAN TO HELP YOU.

YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO BE PRESENT IN COURT AND TESTIFY WHEN THE HEARING
IS HELD TO DECIDE WHETHER OR NOT YOU NEED A GUARDIAN. IF A GUARDIAN AD
LITEM IS APPOINTED, YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO REQUEST THE COURT TO REPLACE
THAT PERSON.

(5) All petitions filed under the provisions of this section shall
be heard within sixty days unless an extension of time is requested by
a party or the guardian ad litem within such sixty day period and
granted for good cause shown. If an extension is granted, the court
shall set a new hearing date.

--- END ---