BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.88.090 and 2000 c 124 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing contained in RCW 11.88.080 through 11.88.120, 11.92.010
through 11.92.040, 11.92.060 through 11.92.120, 11.92.170, and
11.92.180 shall affect or impair the power of any court to appoint a
guardian ad litem to defend the interests of any incapacitated person
interested in any suit or matter pending therein, or to commence and
prosecute any suit in his or her behalf.
(2) Prior to the appointment of a guardian or a limited guardian,
whenever it appears that the incapacitated person or incapacitated
person's estate could benefit from mediation and such mediation would
likely result in overall reduced costs to the estate, upon the motion
of the alleged incapacitated person or the guardian ad litem, or
subsequent to such appointment, whenever it appears that the
incapacitated person or incapacitated person's estate could benefit
from mediation and such mediation would likely result in overall
reduced costs to the estate, upon the motion of any interested person,
the court may:
(a) Require any party or other person subject to the jurisdiction
of the court to participate in mediation;
(b) Establish the terms of the mediation; and
(c) Allocate the cost of the mediation ((pursuant to RCW
11.96.140)) to the substantially prevailing party, if any. Otherwise,
each party shall pay its own costs and attorneys' fees.
(3) Upon receipt of a petition for appointment of guardian or
limited guardian, except as provided herein, the court shall appoint a
guardian ad litem to represent the best interests of the alleged
incapacitated person, who shall be a person found or known by the court
to:
(a) Be free of influence from anyone interested in the result of
the proceeding; and
(b) Have the requisite knowledge, training, or expertise to perform
the duties required by this section.
The guardian ad litem shall within five days of receipt of notice
of appointment file with the court and serve, either personally or by
certified mail with return receipt, each party with a statement
including: His or her training relating to the duties as a guardian ad
litem; his or her criminal history as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 for the
period covering ten years prior to the appointment; his or her hourly
rate, if compensated; whether the guardian ad litem has had any contact
with a party to the proceeding prior to his or her appointment; and
whether he or she has an apparent conflict of interest. Within three
days of the later of the actual service or filing of the guardian ad
litem's statement, any party may set a hearing and file and serve a
motion for an order to show cause why the guardian ad litem should not
be removed for one of the following three reasons: (i) Lack of
expertise necessary for the proceeding; (ii) an hourly rate higher than
what is reasonable for the particular proceeding; or (iii) a conflict
of interest. Notice of the hearing shall be provided to the guardian
ad litem and all parties. If, after a hearing, the court enters an
order replacing the guardian ad litem, findings shall be included,
expressly stating the reasons for the removal. If the guardian ad
litem is not removed, the court has the authority to assess to the
moving party, attorneys' fees and costs related to the motion. The
court shall assess attorneys' fees and costs for frivolous motions.
No guardian ad litem need be appointed when a parent is petitioning
for a guardian or a limited guardian to be appointed for his or her
minor child and the minority of the child, as defined by RCW 11.92.010,
is the sole basis of the petition. The order appointing the guardian
ad litem shall recite the duties set forth in subsection (5) of this
section. The appointment of a guardian ad litem shall have no effect
on the legal competency of the alleged incapacitated person and shall
not overcome the presumption of competency or full legal and civil
rights of the alleged incapacitated person.
(4)(a) The superior court of each county shall develop and maintain
a registry of persons who are willing and qualified to serve as
guardians ad litem in guardianship matters. The court shall choose as
guardian ad litem a person whose name appears on the registry in a
system of consistent rotation, except in extraordinary circumstances
such as the need for particular expertise. The court shall develop
procedures for periodic review of the persons on the registry and for
probation, suspension, or removal of persons on the registry for
failure to perform properly their duties as guardian ad litem. In the
event the court does not select the person next on the list, it shall
include in the order of appointment a written reason for its decision.
(b) To be eligible for the registry a person shall:
(i) Present a written statement outlining his or her background and
qualifications. The background statement shall include, but is not
limited to, the following information:
(A) Level of formal education;
(B) Training related to the guardian ad litem's duties;
(C) Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;
(D) Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and the county or
counties of appointment;
(E) Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and
(F) Evidence of the person's knowledge, training, and experience in
each of the following: Needs of impaired elderly people, physical
disabilities, mental illness, developmental disabilities, and other
areas relevant to the needs of incapacitated persons, legal procedure,
and the requirements of chapters 11.88 and 11.92 RCW.
The written statement of qualifications shall include the names of
any counties in which the person was removed from a guardian ad litem
registry pursuant to a grievance action, and the name of the court and
the cause number of any case in which the court has removed the person
for cause; and
(ii) Complete the training as described in (e) of this subsection.
The training is not applicable to guardians ad litem appointed pursuant
to special proceeding Rule 98.16W.
(c) Superior court shall remove any person from the guardian ad
litem registry who misrepresents his or her qualifications pursuant to
a grievance procedure established by the court.
(d) The background and qualification information shall be updated
annually.
(e) The department of social and health services shall convene an
advisory group to develop a model guardian ad litem training program
and shall update the program biennially. The advisory group shall
consist of representatives from consumer, advocacy, and professional
groups knowledgeable in developmental disabilities, neurological
impairment, physical disabilities, mental illness, domestic violence,
aging, legal, court administration, the Washington state bar
association, and other interested parties.
(f) The superior court shall require utilization of the model
program developed by the advisory group as described in (e) of this
subsection, to assure that candidates applying for registration as a
qualified guardian ad litem shall have satisfactorily completed
training to attain these essential minimum qualifications to act as
guardian ad litem.
(5) The guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to this section shall
have the following duties:
(a) To meet and consult with the alleged incapacitated person as
soon as practicable following appointment and explain, in language
which such person can reasonably be expected to understand, the
substance of the petition, the nature of the resultant proceedings, the
person's right to contest the petition, the identification of the
proposed guardian or limited guardian, the right to a jury trial on the
issue of his or her alleged incapacity, the right to independent legal
counsel as provided by RCW 11.88.045, and the right to be present in
court at the hearing on the petition;
(b) To obtain a written report according to RCW 11.88.045; and such
other written or oral reports from other qualified professionals as are
necessary to permit the guardian ad litem to complete the report
required by this section;
(c) To meet with the person whose appointment is sought as guardian
or limited guardian and ascertain:
(i) The proposed guardian's knowledge of the duties, requirements,
and limitations of a guardian; and
(ii) The steps the proposed guardian intends to take or has taken
to identify and meet the needs of the alleged incapacitated person;
(d) To consult as necessary to complete the investigation and
report required by this section with those known relatives, friends, or
other persons the guardian ad litem determines have had a significant,
continuing interest in the welfare of the alleged incapacitated person;
(e) To investigate alternate arrangements made, or which might be
created, by or on behalf of the alleged incapacitated person, such as
revocable or irrevocable trusts, durable powers of attorney, or blocked
accounts; whether good cause exists for any such arrangements to be
discontinued; and why such arrangements should not be continued or
created in lieu of a guardianship;
(f) To provide the court with a written report which shall include
the following:
(i) A description of the nature, cause, and degree of incapacity,
and the basis upon which this judgment was made;
(ii) A description of the needs of the incapacitated person for
care and treatment, the probable residential requirements of the
alleged incapacitated person and the basis upon which these findings
were made;
(iii) An evaluation of the appropriateness of the guardian or
limited guardian whose appointment is sought and a description of the
steps the proposed guardian has taken or intends to take to identify
and meet current and emerging needs of the incapacitated person;
(iv) A description of any alternative arrangements previously made
by the alleged incapacitated person or which could be made, and whether
and to what extent such alternatives should be used in lieu of a
guardianship, and if the guardian ad litem is recommending
discontinuation of any such arrangements, specific findings as to why
such arrangements are contrary to the best interest of the alleged
incapacitated person;
(v) A description of the abilities of the alleged incapacitated
person and a recommendation as to whether a guardian or limited
guardian should be appointed. If appointment of a limited guardian is
recommended, the guardian ad litem shall recommend the specific areas
of authority the limited guardian should have and the limitations and
disabilities to be placed on the incapacitated person;
(vi) An evaluation of the person's mental ability to rationally
exercise the right to vote and the basis upon which the evaluation is
made;
(vii) Any expression of approval or disapproval made by the alleged
incapacitated person concerning the proposed guardian or limited
guardian or guardianship or limited guardianship;
(viii) Identification of persons with significant interest in the
welfare of the alleged incapacitated person who should be advised of
their right to request special notice of proceedings pursuant to RCW
11.92.150; and
(ix) Unless independent counsel has appeared for the alleged
incapacitated person, an explanation of how the alleged incapacitated
person responded to the advice of the right to jury trial, to
independent counsel and to be present at the hearing on the petition.
Within forty-five days after notice of commencement of the
guardianship proceeding has been served upon the guardian ad litem, and
at least fifteen days before the hearing on the petition, unless an
extension or reduction of time has been granted by the court for good
cause, the guardian ad litem shall file its report and send a copy to
the alleged incapacitated person and his or her counsel, spouse, all
children not residing with a notified person, those persons described
in (f)(viii) of this subsection, and persons who have filed a request
for special notice pursuant to RCW 11.92.150. If the guardian ad litem
needs additional time to finalize his or her report, then the guardian
ad litem shall petition the court for a postponement of the hearing or,
with the consent of all other parties, an extension or reduction of
time for filing the report. If the hearing does not occur within sixty
days of filing the petition, then upon the two-month anniversary of
filing the petition and on or before the same day of each following
month until the hearing, the guardian ad litem shall file interim
reports summarizing his or her activities on the proceeding during that
time period as well as fees and costs incurred;
(g) To advise the court of the need for appointment of counsel for
the alleged incapacitated person within five court days after the
meeting described in (a) of this subsection unless (i) counsel has
appeared, (ii) the alleged incapacitated person affirmatively
communicated a wish not to be represented by counsel after being
advised of the right to representation and of the conditions under
which court-provided counsel may be available, or (iii) the alleged
incapacitated person was unable to communicate at all on the subject,
and the guardian ad litem is satisfied that the alleged incapacitated
person does not affirmatively desire to be represented by counsel.
(6) If the petition is brought by an interested person or entity
requesting the appointment of some other qualified person or entity and
a prospective guardian or limited guardian cannot be found, the court
shall order the guardian ad litem to investigate the availability of a
possible guardian or limited guardian and to include the findings in a
report to the court pursuant to subsection (5)(f) of this section.
(7) The parties to the proceeding may file responses to the
guardian ad litem report with the court and deliver such responses to
the other parties and the guardian ad litem at any time up to the
second day prior to the hearing. If a guardian ad litem fails to file
his or her report in a timely manner, the hearing shall be continued to
give the court and the parties at least fifteen days before the hearing
to review the report. At any time during the proceeding upon motion of
any party or on the court's own motion, the court may remove the
guardian ad litem for failure to perform his or her duties as specified
in this chapter, provided that the guardian ad litem shall have five
days' notice of any motion to remove before the court enters such
order. In addition, the court in its discretion may reduce a guardian
ad litem's fee for failure to carry out his or her duties.
(8) The court appointed guardian ad litem shall have the authority,
in the event that the alleged incapacitated person is in need of
emergency life-saving medical services, and is unable to consent to
such medical services due to incapacity pending the hearing on the
petition to give consent for such emergency life-saving medical
services on behalf of the alleged incapacitated person.
(9) The court-appointed guardian ad litem shall have the authority
to move for temporary relief under chapter 7.40 RCW to protect the
alleged incapacitated person from abuse, neglect, abandonment, or
exploitation, as those terms are defined in RCW 74.34.020, or to
address any other emergency needs of the alleged incapacitated person.
Any alternative arrangement executed before filing the petition for
guardianship shall remain effective unless the court grants the relief
requested under chapter 7.40 RCW, or unless, following notice and a
hearing at which all parties directly affected by the arrangement are
present, the court finds that the alternative arrangement should not
remain effective.
(10) The guardian ad litem shall receive a fee determined by the
court. The fee shall be charged to the alleged incapacitated person
unless the court finds that such payment would result in substantial
hardship upon such person, in which case the county shall be
responsible for such costs: PROVIDED, That the court may charge such
fee to the petitioner, the alleged incapacitated person, or any person
who has appeared in the action; or may allocate the fee, as it deems
just. If the petition is found to be frivolous or not brought in good
faith, the guardian ad litem fee shall be charged to the petitioner.
The court shall not be required to provide for the payment of a fee to
any salaried employee of a public agency.
(11) Upon the presentation of the guardian ad litem report and the
entry of an order either dismissing the petition for appointment of
guardian or limited guardian or appointing a guardian or limited
guardian, the guardian ad litem shall be dismissed and shall have no
further duties or obligations unless otherwise ordered by the court.
If the court orders the guardian ad litem to perform further duties or
obligations, they shall not be performed at county expense.
(12) The guardian ad litem shall appear in person at all hearings
on the petition unless all parties provide a written waiver of the
requirement to appear.
(13) At any hearing the court may consider whether any person who
makes decisions regarding the alleged incapacitated person or estate
has breached a statutory or fiduciary duty.

Sec. 2 RCW 11.92.180 and 1995 c 297 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
A guardian or limited guardian shall be allowed such compensation
for his or her services as guardian or limited guardian as the court
shall deem just and reasonable. In the case of a professional
guardian, as defined in RCW 11.88.008, petitioning the court to be
appointed as the guardian or limited guardian or in an action to modify
or terminate a guardianship or limited guardianship, neither the
professional guardian nor any attorney employed by the professional
guardian shall be compensated by the alleged incapacitated person for
time spent bringing or opposing a petition or action to modify or
terminate the guardianship unless the professional guardian is the
substantially prevailing party. Guardians and limited guardians shall
not be compensated at county or state expense. Additional compensation
may be allowed for other administrative costs, including services of an
attorney and for other services not provided by the guardian or limited
guardian. Where a guardian or limited guardian is an attorney, the
guardian or limited guardian shall separately account for time for
which compensation is requested for services as a guardian or limited
guardian as contrasted to time for which compensation for legal
services provided to the guardianship is requested. In all cases,
compensation of the guardian or limited guardian and his or her
expenses including attorney's fees shall be fixed by the court and may
be allowed at any annual or final accounting; but at any time during
the administration of the estate, the guardian or limited guardian or
his or her attorney may apply to the court for an allowance upon the
compensation or necessary expenses of the guardian or limited guardian
and for attorney's fees for services already performed. If the court
finds that the guardian or limited guardian has failed to discharge his
or her duties as such in any respect, it may deny the guardian any
compensation whatsoever or may reduce the compensation which would
otherwise be allowed. Where the incapacitated person is a department
of social and health services client residing in a nursing facility or
in a residential or home setting and is required by the department of
social and health services to contribute a portion of their income
towards the cost of residential or supportive services then the
department shall be entitled to notice of proceedings as described in
RCW 11.92.150. The amount of guardianship fees and additional
compensation for administrative costs shall not exceed the amount
allowed by the department of social and health services by rule.

--- END ---