BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.88.010 and 2005 c 236 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The superior court of each county shall have power to appoint
guardians for the persons and/or estates of incapacitated persons, and
guardians for the estates of nonresidents of the state who have
property in the county needing care and attention.
(a) For purposes of this chapter, a person may be deemed
incapacitated as to person when the superior court determines the
individual has a significant risk of personal harm based upon a
demonstrated inability to adequately provide for nutrition, health,
housing, or physical safety.
(b) For purposes of this chapter, a person may be deemed
incapacitated as to the person's estate when the superior court
determines the individual is at significant risk of financial harm
based upon a demonstrated inability to adequately manage property or
financial affairs.
(c) A determination of incapacity is a legal not a medical
decision, based upon a demonstration of management insufficiencies over
time in the area of person or estate. Age, eccentricity, poverty, or
medical diagnosis alone shall not be sufficient to justify a finding of
incapacity.
(d) A person may also be determined incapacitated if he or she is
under the age of majority as defined in RCW 26.28.010.
(e) For purposes of giving informed consent for health care
pursuant to RCW 7.70.050 and 7.70.065, an "incompetent" person is any
person who is (i) incompetent by reason of mental illness,
developmental disability, senility, habitual drunkenness, excessive use
of drugs, or other mental incapacity, of either managing his or her
property or caring for himself or herself, or both, or (ii)
incapacitated as defined in (a), (b), or (d) of this subsection.
(f) For purposes of the terms "incompetent," "disabled," or "not
legally competent," as those terms are used in the Revised Code of
Washington to apply to persons incapacitated under this chapter, those
terms shall be interpreted to mean "incapacitated" persons for purposes
of this chapter.
(2) The superior court for each county shall have power to appoint
limited guardians for the persons and estates, or either thereof, of
incapacitated persons, who by reason of their incapacity have need for
protection and assistance, but who are capable of managing some of
their personal and financial affairs. After considering all evidence
presented as a result of such investigation, the court shall impose, by
order, only such specific limitations and restrictions on an
incapacitated person to be placed under a limited guardianship as the
court finds necessary for such person's protection and assistance. A
person shall not be presumed to be incapacitated nor shall a person
lose any legal rights or suffer any legal disabilities as the result of
being placed under a limited guardianship, except as to those rights
and disabilities specifically set forth in the court order establishing
such a limited guardianship. In addition, the court order shall state
the period of time for which it shall be applicable.
(3) Venue for petitions for guardianship or limited guardianship
shall lie in the county wherein the alleged incapacitated person is
domiciled, or if such person resides in a facility supported in whole
or in part by local, state, or federal funding sources, in either the
county where the facility is located, the county of domicile prior to
residence in the supported facility, or the county where a parent or
spouse of the alleged incapacitated person is domiciled.
If the alleged incapacitated person's residency has changed within
one year of the filing of the petition, any interested person may move
for a change of venue for any proceedings seeking the appointment of a
guardian or a limited guardian under this chapter to the county of the
alleged incapacitated person's last place of residence of one year or
more. The motion shall be granted when it appears to the court that
such venue would be in the best interests of the alleged incapacitated
person and would promote more complete consideration of all relevant
matters.
(4) Under RCW 11.94.010, a principal may nominate, by a durable
power of attorney, the guardian or limited guardian of his or her
estate or person for consideration by the court if guardianship
proceedings for the principal's person or estate are thereafter
commenced. The court shall make its appointment in accordance with the
principal's most recent nomination in a durable power of attorney
except for good cause or disqualification.
(5) Imposition of a guardianship for an incapacitated person shall
not result in the loss of the right to vote unless the court determines
that the person is incompetent for purposes of rationally exercising
the franchise in that the individual lacks the capacity to understand
the nature and effect of voting such that she or he cannot make an
individual choice. The court order establishing guardianship shall
specify whether or not the individual retains voting rights. When a
court determines that the person is incompetent for the purpose of
rationally exercising the right to vote, the court shall notify the
appropriate county auditor.
(6) A professional guardian shall not serve as both a guardian or
limited guardian and an attorney or guardian ad litem for the same
incapacitated person, except that a professional guardian may serve as
both a guardian or limited guardian and an attorney or guardian ad
litem for the same incapacitated person only in extraordinary
circumstances and only for as long as the extraordinary circumstances
exist, including but not limited to situations in which there is no
person who is qualified and willing to serve as guardian or limited
guardian. In such circumstances, the guardian ad litem must show that
due diligence has been used to locate a suitable guardian or limited
guardian.

Sec. 2 RCW 11.88.090 and 2000 c 124 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing contained in RCW 11.88.080 through 11.88.120, 11.92.010
through 11.92.040, 11.92.060 through 11.92.120, 11.92.170, and
11.92.180 shall affect or impair the power of any court to appoint a
guardian ad litem to defend the interests of any incapacitated person
interested in any suit or matter pending therein, or to commence and
prosecute any suit in his or her behalf.
(2) Prior to the appointment of a guardian or a limited guardian,
whenever it appears that the incapacitated person or incapacitated
person's estate could benefit from mediation and such mediation would
likely result in overall reduced costs to the estate, upon the motion
of the alleged incapacitated person or the guardian ad litem, or
subsequent to such appointment, whenever it appears that the
incapacitated person or incapacitated person's estate could benefit
from mediation and such mediation would likely result in overall
reduced costs to the estate, upon the motion of any interested person,
the court may:
(a) Require any party or other person subject to the jurisdiction
of the court to participate in mediation;
(b) Establish the terms of the mediation; and
(c) Allocate the cost of the mediation pursuant to RCW
((11.96.140)) 11.96A.150.
(3) Upon receipt of a petition for appointment of guardian or
limited guardian, except as provided herein, the court shall appoint a
guardian ad litem to represent the best interests of the alleged
incapacitated person, who shall be a person found or known by the court
to:
(a) Be free of influence from anyone interested in the result of
the proceeding; ((and))
(b) Have the requisite knowledge, training, or expertise to perform
the duties required by this section; and
(c) Not be a professional guardian seeking appointment as a
guardian or limited guardian unless the person has complied with the
ethical advisory opinions issued by the certified professional guardian
board with respect to petitions for self-appointment.
The guardian ad litem shall within five days of receipt of notice
of appointment file with the court and serve, either personally or by
certified mail with return receipt, each party with a statement
including: His or her training relating to the duties as a guardian ad
litem; his or her criminal history as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 for the
period covering ten years prior to the appointment; his or her hourly
rate, if compensated; whether the guardian ad litem has had any contact
with a party to the proceeding prior to his or her appointment; and
whether he or she has an apparent conflict of interest. Within three
days of the later of the actual service or filing of the guardian ad
litem's statement, any party may set a hearing and file and serve a
motion for an order to show cause why the guardian ad litem should not
be removed for one of the following three reasons: (i) Lack of
expertise necessary for the proceeding; (ii) an hourly rate higher than
what is reasonable for the particular proceeding; or (iii) a conflict
of interest. Notice of the hearing shall be provided to the guardian
ad litem and all parties. If, after a hearing, the court enters an
order replacing the guardian ad litem, findings shall be included,
expressly stating the reasons for the removal. If the guardian ad
litem is not removed, the court has the authority to assess to the
moving party, attorneys' fees and costs related to the motion. The
court shall assess attorneys' fees and costs for frivolous motions.
No guardian ad litem need be appointed when a parent is petitioning
for a guardian or a limited guardian to be appointed for his or her
minor child and the minority of the child, as defined by RCW 11.92.010,
is the sole basis of the petition. The order appointing the guardian
ad litem shall recite the duties set forth in subsection (5) of this
section. The appointment of a guardian ad litem shall have no effect
on the legal competency of the alleged incapacitated person and shall
not overcome the presumption of competency or full legal and civil
rights of the alleged incapacitated person.
(4)(a) The superior court of each county shall develop and maintain
a registry of persons who are willing and qualified to serve as
guardians ad litem in guardianship matters. The court shall choose as
guardian ad litem a person whose name appears on the registry in a
system of consistent rotation, except in extraordinary circumstances
such as the need for particular expertise. The court shall develop
procedures for periodic review of the persons on the registry and for
probation, suspension, or removal of persons on the registry for
failure to perform properly their duties as guardian ad litem. In the
event the court does not select the person next on the list, it shall
include in the order of appointment a written reason for its decision.
(b) To be eligible for the registry a person shall:
(i) Present a written statement outlining his or her background and
qualifications. The background statement shall include, but is not
limited to, the following information:
(A) Level of formal education;
(B) Training related to the guardian ad litem's duties;
(C) Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;
(D) Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and the county or
counties of appointment;
(E) Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and
(F) Evidence of the person's knowledge, training, and experience in
each of the following: Needs of impaired elderly people, physical
disabilities, mental illness, developmental disabilities, and other
areas relevant to the needs of incapacitated persons, legal procedure,
and the requirements of chapters 11.88 and 11.92 RCW.
The written statement of qualifications shall include the names of
any counties in which the person was removed from a guardian ad litem
registry pursuant to a grievance action, and the name of the court and
the cause number of any case in which the court has removed the person
for cause; and
(ii) Complete the training as described in (e) of this subsection.
The training is not applicable to guardians ad litem appointed pursuant
to special proceeding Rule 98.16W.
(c) Superior court shall remove any person from the guardian ad
litem registry who misrepresents his or her qualifications pursuant to
a grievance procedure established by the court.
(d) The background and qualification information shall be updated
annually.
(e) The department of social and health services shall convene an
advisory group to develop a model guardian ad litem training program
and shall update the program biennially. The advisory group shall
consist of representatives from consumer, advocacy, and professional
groups knowledgeable in developmental disabilities, neurological
impairment, physical disabilities, mental illness, domestic violence,
aging, legal, court administration, the Washington state bar
association, and other interested parties.
(f) The superior court shall require utilization of the model
program developed by the advisory group as described in (e) of this
subsection, to assure that candidates applying for registration as a
qualified guardian ad litem shall have satisfactorily completed
training to attain these essential minimum qualifications to act as
guardian ad litem.
(5) The guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to this section shall
have the following duties:
(a) To meet and consult with the alleged incapacitated person as
soon as practicable following appointment and explain, in language
which such person can reasonably be expected to understand, the
substance of the petition, the nature of the resultant proceedings, the
person's right to contest the petition, the identification of the
proposed guardian or limited guardian, the right to a jury trial on the
issue of his or her alleged incapacity, the right to independent legal
counsel as provided by RCW 11.88.045, and the right to be present in
court at the hearing on the petition;
(b) To obtain a written report according to RCW 11.88.045; and such
other written or oral reports from other qualified professionals as are
necessary to permit the guardian ad litem to complete the report
required by this section;
(c) To meet with the person whose appointment is sought as guardian
or limited guardian and ascertain:
(i) The proposed guardian's knowledge of the duties, requirements,
and limitations of a guardian; and
(ii) The steps the proposed guardian intends to take or has taken
to identify and meet the needs of the alleged incapacitated person;
(d) To consult as necessary to complete the investigation and
report required by this section with those known relatives, friends, or
other persons the guardian ad litem determines have had a significant,
continuing interest in the welfare of the alleged incapacitated person;
(e) To investigate alternate arrangements made, or which might be
created, by or on behalf of the alleged incapacitated person, such as
revocable or irrevocable trusts, durable powers of attorney, or blocked
accounts; whether good cause exists for any such arrangements to be
discontinued; and why such arrangements should not be continued or
created in lieu of a guardianship;
(f) To provide the court with a written report which shall include
the following:
(i) A description of the nature, cause, and degree of incapacity,
and the basis upon which this judgment was made;
(ii) A description of the needs of the incapacitated person for
care and treatment, the probable residential requirements of the
alleged incapacitated person and the basis upon which these findings
were made;
(iii) An evaluation of the appropriateness of the guardian or
limited guardian whose appointment is sought and a description of the
steps the proposed guardian has taken or intends to take to identify
and meet current and emerging needs of the incapacitated person;
(iv) A description of any alternative arrangements previously made
by the alleged incapacitated person or which could be made, and whether
and to what extent such alternatives should be used in lieu of a
guardianship, and if the guardian ad litem is recommending
discontinuation of any such arrangements, specific findings as to why
such arrangements are contrary to the best interest of the alleged
incapacitated person;
(v) A description of the abilities of the alleged incapacitated
person and a recommendation as to whether a guardian or limited
guardian should be appointed. If appointment of a limited guardian is
recommended, the guardian ad litem shall recommend the specific areas
of authority the limited guardian should have and the limitations and
disabilities to be placed on the incapacitated person;
(vi) An evaluation of the person's mental ability to rationally
exercise the right to vote and the basis upon which the evaluation is
made;
(vii) Any expression of approval or disapproval made by the alleged
incapacitated person concerning the proposed guardian or limited
guardian or guardianship or limited guardianship;
(viii) Identification of persons with significant interest in the
welfare of the alleged incapacitated person who should be advised of
their right to request special notice of proceedings pursuant to RCW
11.92.150; and
(ix) Unless independent counsel has appeared for the alleged
incapacitated person, an explanation of how the alleged incapacitated
person responded to the advice of the right to jury trial, to
independent counsel and to be present at the hearing on the petition.
Within forty-five days after notice of commencement of the
guardianship proceeding has been served upon the guardian ad litem, and
at least fifteen days before the hearing on the petition, unless an
extension or reduction of time has been granted by the court for good
cause, the guardian ad litem shall file its report and send a copy to
the alleged incapacitated person and his or her counsel, spouse, all
children not residing with a notified person, those persons described
in (f)(viii) of this subsection, and persons who have filed a request
for special notice pursuant to RCW 11.92.150. If the guardian ad litem
needs additional time to finalize his or her report, then the guardian
ad litem shall petition the court for a postponement of the hearing or,
with the consent of all other parties, an extension or reduction of
time for filing the report. If the hearing does not occur within sixty
days of filing the petition, then upon the two-month anniversary of
filing the petition and on or before the same day of each following
month until the hearing, the guardian ad litem shall file interim
reports summarizing his or her activities on the proceeding during that
time period as well as fees and costs incurred;
(g) To advise the court of the need for appointment of counsel for
the alleged incapacitated person within five court days after the
meeting described in (a) of this subsection unless (i) counsel has
appeared, (ii) the alleged incapacitated person affirmatively
communicated a wish not to be represented by counsel after being
advised of the right to representation and of the conditions under
which court-provided counsel may be available, or (iii) the alleged
incapacitated person was unable to communicate at all on the subject,
and the guardian ad litem is satisfied that the alleged incapacitated
person does not affirmatively desire to be represented by counsel.
(6) If the petition is brought by an interested person or entity
requesting the appointment of some other qualified person or entity and
a prospective guardian or limited guardian cannot be found, the court
shall order the guardian ad litem to investigate the availability of a
possible guardian or limited guardian and to include the findings in a
report to the court pursuant to subsection (5)(f) of this section. In
no case shall the court order the guardian ad litem to also serve as a
professional guardian for the same client.
(7) The parties to the proceeding may file responses to the
guardian ad litem report with the court and deliver such responses to
the other parties and the guardian ad litem at any time up to the
second day prior to the hearing. If a guardian ad litem fails to file
his or her report in a timely manner, the hearing shall be continued to
give the court and the parties at least fifteen days before the hearing
to review the report. At any time during the proceeding upon motion of
any party or on the court's own motion, the court may remove the
guardian ad litem for failure to perform his or her duties as specified
in this chapter, provided that the guardian ad litem shall have five
days' notice of any motion to remove before the court enters such
order. In addition, the court in its discretion may reduce a guardian
ad litem's fee for failure to carry out his or her duties.
(8) The court appointed guardian ad litem shall have the authority,
in the event that the alleged incapacitated person is in need of
emergency life-saving medical services, and is unable to consent to
such medical services due to incapacity pending the hearing on the
petition to give consent for such emergency life-saving medical
services on behalf of the alleged incapacitated person.
(9) The court-appointed guardian ad litem shall have the authority
to move for temporary relief under chapter 7.40 RCW to protect the
alleged incapacitated person from abuse, neglect, abandonment, or
exploitation, as those terms are defined in RCW 74.34.020, or to
address any other emergency needs of the alleged incapacitated person.
Any alternative arrangement executed before filing the petition for
guardianship shall remain effective unless the court grants the relief
requested under chapter 7.40 RCW, or unless, following notice and a
hearing at which all parties directly affected by the arrangement are
present, the court finds that the alternative arrangement should not
remain effective.
(10) The guardian ad litem shall receive a fee determined by the
court.
(a) If a full or limited guardianship is established, or no
guardianship is established but a less restrictive alternative
arrangement is approved by the court and the alleged incapacitated
person is determined by the court to be incapacitated, the fee shall be
charged to the alleged incapacitated person unless the court finds that
such payment would result in substantial hardship upon such person, in
which case the county shall be responsible for such costs((: PROVIDED,
That)).
(b) If there is no finding of incapacity by the court, the court
may charge such fee to the petitioner, the alleged incapacitated
person, or any person who has appeared in the action; or may allocate
the fee, as it deems just. If the petition is found to be frivolous or
not brought in good faith, the guardian ad litem fee shall be charged
to the petitioner. The court shall not be required to provide for the
payment of a fee to any salaried employee of a public agency.
(11) Upon the presentation of the guardian ad litem report and the
entry of an order either dismissing the petition for appointment of
guardian or limited guardian or appointing a guardian or limited
guardian, the guardian ad litem shall be dismissed and shall have no
further duties or obligations unless otherwise ordered by the court.
If the court orders the guardian ad litem to perform further duties or
obligations, they shall not be performed at county expense.
(12) The guardian ad litem shall appear in person at all hearings
on the petition unless all parties provide a written waiver of the
requirement to appear.
(13) At any hearing the court may consider whether any person who
makes decisions regarding the alleged incapacitated person or estate
has breached a statutory or fiduciary duty.

--- END ---