BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the purpose of this section to address growing concerns
about the academic staffing crisis in the state's public two-year
colleges. Staffing issues, including the overuse of adjunct faculty
along with the shrinking ranks of full-time tenured faculty, limit the
ability of the state system of higher education to provide high quality
education, improve graduation rates, conduct research, and provide
support for economic development.
(2)(a) It is the goal of this section to increase the number of
positions designated as full-time tenure-track faculty positions by ten
percent in each individual college by 2013. The base number shall be
the number of full-time tenure-track positions budgeted in fall quarter
2006, including those positions not currently filled.
(b) It is further the goal of this section to have salaries in
institutions of higher education that will attract and retain the best
faculty possible to educate the citizens of Washington state. Faculty
salaries are of particular concern because average salaries for
two-year faculty are substantially below average salaries in comparable
global challenge states. To achieve this goal, salaries for full-time
faculty should be increased above a regular cost-of-living increase
until by 2013 salaries are in the top quarter for faculty of comparable
rank in global challenge states. In addition, to achieve this goal,
each institution of higher education should determine a salary standard
for adjunct faculty members employed in each academic, technical, basic
studies, or other department that, subject to collective bargaining
with the exclusive representatives of faculty, constitutes a pro rata
salary compared to the salaries of full-time tenured faculty members of
comparable qualifications doing comparable work.
(c) It is further the goal of this section to improve the job
security of nontenure-track faculty.
(3) By December 2007, each institution of higher education shall
create a plan to meet its goals in subsection (2) of this section,
subject to collective bargaining with the exclusive representatives of
the faculty.
(a) In its plan, the institution shall state how it intends to meet
its goal of increasing full-time, tenure-track positions by converting
work done by adjuncts while making every effort to protect the
employment of currently employed adjuncts. The plan shall give
priority for increasing tenure-track positions in mathematics, science,
English, basic studies, early learning, and high demands fields but may
include other disciplines.
(b) In its plan, the institution shall create a process for
ensuring that qualified internal applicants receive priority
consideration for attaining a tenure-track position when one becomes
available consistent with institutional and state affirmative action
and other personnel policies.
(c) In its plan, the institution shall determine the level at which
the salaries for its full-time tenure-track faculty are below the
seventy-fifth percentile of comparable institutions in global challenge
states and the cost of increasing its salaries to the seventy-fifth
percentile with a method for equitably increasing individual salaries.
(d) In its plan, the institution shall determine the method by
which prorated salaries for adjuncts will be determined and the method
for equitably increasing individual salaries, taking into account
experience within the institution as well as qualifications.
(e) In its plan, the institution shall establish a process, subject
to collective bargaining, under which adjunct faculty, after successful
completion of a probationary period, receives timely notice of and
priority consideration for adjunct teaching assignments in coming
academic terms. The priority consideration shall include either rights
of first refusal for eligible classes or an annual contract with due
process rights.
(f) The individual college plans shall be reviewed by the state
board for community and technical colleges in determining its biennial
budget request.
(4) Each institution shall establish a faculty restoration and
equity account. To the extent funds are appropriated to the state
board for community and technical colleges in furtherance of the goals
of this section, moneys shall be allocated to the individual college
accounts on an equitable basis when full funds are not available;
however, colleges may use existing funds to supplement legislative
appropriations.
(5) This section shall not be construed to either limit or reduce
salaries, benefits, or hiring rights in existence at an institution of
higher education on the effective date of this section or subsequently
established.
(6) As used in this section, "institution of higher education" has
the same meaning as in RCW 28B.10.016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) It is the purpose of this section to
address growing concerns about the academic staffing crisis in higher
education. Staffing issues limit the ability of the state system of
higher education to provide high quality education, improve retention
rates, conduct research, and provide support for economic development.
Faculty salaries are of particular concern because the salaries for
four-year faculty are in the bottom quarter of comparable global
challenge states. The legislature finds that in order to attract the
highest quality faculty, the salaries should be in the top quarter of
global challenge states.
(2) The Washington state institute for public policy shall conduct
a study of the faculty employment practices of Washington state's
public four-year colleges and universities and comparable four-year
institutions in the top quartile global challenge states. The study
shall identify academic disciplines with significant staffing
challenges in Washington state, then compare the conditions of
employment of faculty in these disciplines with the faculty in similar
institutions in the top quartile global challenge states. The purpose
of the study is to guide the state in making future determinations on
funding and legislation on these issues.
(3) For the purpose of this study, the institute shall convene an
advisory committee. The committee shall include a representative from:
The higher education coordinating board, the council of presidents, the
administration of each four-year and research institution of higher
education, and the faculty of each four-year and research institution
of higher education. In selecting the faculty representatives for the
committee, the institute shall confer with the exclusive bargaining
representatives of faculty where they exist and the faculty governing
bodies where there is no bargaining representative. Before conducting
the study, the institute shall convene the advisory group to identify
academic disciplines with significant staffing challenges and to
develop the study methodology. In addition to offering advice on the
conduct of the study, the committee shall ensure the cooperation of
necessary staff at Washington state institutions and assist in seeking
the cooperation of out-of-state institutions.
(4) The Washington state institute for public policy shall report
its findings to the legislature, local governing boards, and other
interested parties by June 30, 2008. The report shall identify key
differences in faculty hiring and compensation practices of public
colleges and universities in Washington state and similar institutions
in the top quartile global challenge states, and describe the possible
outcomes and fiscal consequences associated with adopting those
practices. The report shall include but not be limited to comparisons
of salaries, benefits, and other tangible or intangible compensation
for tenured, nontenured, full-time, and part-time faculty, and the
effect of compensation on recruitment and retention. The report shall
also examine issues specifically related to nontenured and part-time
faculty, including but not limited to job security and the implications
of increased reliance on nontenured and part-time faculty.

--- END ---