BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.10.170 and 2003 c 361 s 408 are each amended to
read as follows:
From time to time, but at least once each four years, the
department shall determine the amount of moneys paid to it as motor
vehicle fuel tax that is tax on snowmobile fuel. ((Such)) This
determination ((shall)) must use one hundred thirty-five gallons as the
average yearly fuel usage per snowmobile, the number of registered
snowmobiles during the calendar year under determination, and a fuel
tax rate ((of: (1) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel
from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (2) twenty cents per gallon
of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; (3)
twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2007,
through June 30, 2009; (4) twenty-two cents per gallon of motor vehicle
fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; and (5) twenty-three
cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1, 2011, and
thereafter)) equal to the motor vehicle fuel tax rate, in current use
during the calendar year under determination, as provided in RCW
82.36.025.

--- END ---