BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that over one million
four hundred thousand individuals receive traumatic brain injuries
nationally per year, and that motor vehicle accidents are a leading
cause of traumatic brain injuries.
The legislature also finds that many individuals recovering from a
traumatic brain injury need assistance not only with physical tasks,
but also have unique mental health and cognitive needs. The
legislature finds that community-based organizations are best able to
provide prevention services and support that assist beyond an
individual's basic physical care needs, such as managing temper and
behaviors, improving memory, and acquiring new job and life skills.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The traumatic brain injury account is created in the state
treasury. Two dollars of the fee imposed under RCW 46.63.110(7) must
be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation, and may be used only to contract with qualified
community-based organizations to provide prevention, referral, and
support services relating to traumatic brain injury, and to cover
reasonable costs related to monitoring the contracts. The secretary of
the department of social and health services has the authority to
administer the funds.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.84.092 and 2006 c 337 s 11, 2006 c 311 s 23, 2006
c 171 s 10, 2006 c 56 s 10, and 2006 c 6 s 8 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the Columbia river basin water supply development
account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization
account, the data processing building construction account, the
deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of retirement systems expense
account, the developmental disabilities community trust account, the
drinking water assistance account, the drinking water assistance
administrative account, the drinking water assistance repayment
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account,
the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account,
the election account, the emergency reserve fund, the energy freedom
account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the
federal forest revolving account, the freight mobility investment
account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the health services
account, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the personal health services account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll
lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public works
assistance account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the regional mobility grant
program account, the resource management cost account, the rural
Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the small city pavement
and sidewalk account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the
traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.63.110 and 2005 c 413 s 2, 2005 c 320 s 2, and 2005
c 288 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and
fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by this chapter or
title.
(2) The monetary penalty for a violation of (a) RCW 46.55.105(2) is
two hundred fifty dollars for each offense; (b) RCW 46.61.210(1) is
five hundred dollars for each offense. No penalty assessed under this
subsection (2) may be reduced.
(3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of
monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions. This rule shall
also specify the conditions under which local courts may exercise
discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic infractions.
The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust this
schedule every two years for inflation.
(4) There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction
relates to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty imposed pursuant to
this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary penalty not
to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of
traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law,
ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty
set by the local legislative body.
(5) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are
civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed for violations of
chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles
are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary penalties
which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.
(6) Whenever a monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other
monetary obligation is imposed by a court under this chapter it is
immediately payable. If the court determines, in its discretion, that
a person is not able to pay a monetary obligation in full, and not more
than one year has passed since the later of July 1, 2005, or the date
the monetary obligation initially became due and payable, the court
shall enter into a payment plan with the person, unless the person has
previously been granted a payment plan with respect to the same
monetary obligation, or unless the person is in noncompliance of any
existing or prior payment plan, in which case the court may, at its
discretion, implement a payment plan. If the court has notified the
department that the person has failed to pay or comply and the person
has subsequently entered into a payment plan and made an initial
payment, the court shall notify the department that the infraction has
been adjudicated, and the department shall rescind any suspension of
the person's driver's license or driver's privilege based on failure to
respond to that infraction. "Payment plan," as used in this section,
means a plan that requires reasonable payments based on the financial
ability of the person to pay. The person may voluntarily pay an amount
at any time in addition to the payments required under the payment
plan.
(a) If a payment required to be made under the payment plan is
delinquent or the person fails to complete a community restitution
program on or before the time established under the payment plan,
unless the court determines good cause therefor and adjusts the payment
plan or the community restitution plan accordingly, the court shall
notify the department of the person's failure to meet the conditions of
the plan, and the department shall suspend the person's driver's
license or driving privilege until all monetary obligations, including
those imposed under subsections (3) and (4) of this section, have been
paid, and court authorized community restitution has been completed, or
until the department has been notified that the court has entered into
a new time payment or community restitution agreement with the person.
(b) If a person has not entered into a payment plan with the court
and has not paid the monetary obligation in full on or before the time
established for payment, the court shall notify the department of the
delinquency. The department shall suspend the person's driver's
license or driving privilege until all monetary obligations have been
paid, including those imposed under subsections (3) and (4) of this
section, or until the person has entered into a payment plan under this
section.
(c) If the payment plan is to be administered by the court, the
court may assess the person a reasonable administrative fee to be
wholly retained by the city or county with jurisdiction. The
administrative fee shall not exceed ten dollars per infraction or
twenty-five dollars per payment plan, whichever is less.
(d) Nothing in this section precludes a court from contracting with
outside entities to administer its payment plan system. When outside
entities are used for the administration of a payment plan, the court
may assess the person a reasonable fee for such administrative
services, which fee may be calculated on a periodic, percentage, or
other basis.
(e) If a court authorized community restitution program for
offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court may allow
conversion of all or part of the monetary obligations due under this
section to court authorized community restitution in lieu of time
payments if the person is unable to make reasonable time payments.
(7) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section
and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a
person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed
a fee of ((five)) seven dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances
shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be
forwarded as follows: Five dollars to the state treasurer for deposit
in the emergency medical services and trauma care system trust account
under RCW 70.168.040 and two dollars to the state treasurer for deposit
in the traumatic brain injury account under section 2 of this act.
(8)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this
section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this
section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction other
than of RCW 46.61.527 shall be assessed an additional penalty of twenty
dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend the additional
penalty unless the court finds the offender to be indigent. If a court
authorized community restitution program for offenders is available in
the jurisdiction, the court shall allow offenders to offset all or a
part of the penalty due under this subsection (8) by participation in
the court authorized community restitution program.
(b) Eight dollars and fifty cents of the additional penalty under
(a) of this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer. The
remaining revenue from the additional penalty must be remitted under
chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited as
provided in RCW 43.08.250. The balance of the revenue received by the
county or city treasurer under this subsection must be deposited into
the county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city
or county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any
liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.
(9) If a legal proceeding, such as garnishment, has commenced to
collect any delinquent amount owed by the person for any penalty
imposed by the court under this section, the court may, at its
discretion, enter into a payment plan.
(10) The monetary penalty for violating RCW 46.37.395 is: (a) Two
hundred fifty dollars for the first violation; (b) five hundred dollars
for the second violation; and (c) seven hundred fifty dollars for each
violation thereafter.

--- END ---