BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to:
(a) Sales of recovered wood waste boiler equipment used primarily
in the production or generation of steam for sale to be used in its
original state primarily for: (i) Sterilizing tangible personal
property; (ii) heating water or other tangible personal property; and
(iii) heating structures;
(b) Sales of repair parts and replacement parts for recovered wood
waste boiler equipment described in (a) of this subsection; or
(c) Sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
recovered wood waste boiler equipment described in (a) of this
subsection.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. This exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection (3) apply throughout this
section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Recovered wood waste" means discarded wood, such as wood from
pallets and crate materials, shredded wood waste from land clearing,
saw dust and wood trimmings from cabinet shops, and wood waste from saw
mills.
(b) "Recovered wood waste boiler equipment" means recovered wood
waste-fired boilers; recovered wood waste storage silos located on the
site of a recovered wood waste-fired boiler plant; indoor covered
conveyers to transport recovered wood waste to a recovered wood waste-fired boiler; and recovered wood waste-fired boiler plant emissions
control equipment, including multicyclone dust collectors and
electrostatic precipitators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of:
(a) Recovered wood waste boiler equipment used primarily in the
production or generation of steam for sale to be used in its original
state primarily for: (i) Sterilizing tangible personal property; (ii)
heating water or other tangible personal property; and (iii) heating
structures;
(b) Repair parts and replacement parts for recovered wood waste
boiler equipment described in (a) of this subsection; or
(c) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving recovered wood waste boiler
equipment described in (a) of this subsection.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in section 1
of this act apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---