BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The three hundred sixty-six acre Vancouver
national historic reserve was created by Congress through Public Law
104-333: The "Omnibus Parks and Public Lands Management Act of 1996"
in recognition of the significant cultural, historic, and natural
resources of the area. The historic reserve includes Fort Vancouver
national historic site, Pearson airfield, Pearson air museum, officers
row, Vancouver barracks, and a section of the Columbia river
waterfront. The four legislatively designated partners in the reserve
are the national park service, the United States army, the state of
Washington, and the city of Vancouver.
The Vancouver national historic reserve trust, a 501(c)(3), was
created in 1998 as the official nonprofit for the reserve. P.L. 104-333 required that the reserve be administered under a general
management plan to be developed no later than three years after the
enactment of the law. The management plan was adopted in February 2000
with the state of Washington as one of the signatories.
The legislature finds that the state of Washington, as one of four
federally designated partners in the Vancouver national historic
reserve, should be actively engaged in the protection, preservation,
interpretation, and rehabilitation of the historic reserve for the use
and benefit of the people of the state. Southwest Washington is a
traditionally underserved area of the state with regard to cultural and
recreational opportunities. The Vancouver national historic reserve is
a unique historic site that offers a variety of historic, cultural,
natural, and recreational opportunities and currently serves almost one
million visitors per year. From the Hudson's Bay company fort, the
story of the early settlers and fur traders to Vancouver barracks, over
one hundred fifty years of military history, to the story of pioneering
aviation and the golden age of flight at Pearson field, the historic
reserve is unique because of the layers of history visitors can
experience in one location. In addition, the historic reserve offers
acres of green space and waterfront in the midst of the large
Portland/Vancouver metropolitan area.
The legislature has declared through RCW 27.34.200 that it is the
public policy and in the public interest of the state to designate,
preserve, protect, enhance, and perpetuate those structures, sites,
districts, buildings, and objects that reflect outstanding elements of
the state's historic, archaeological, architectural, or cultural
heritage, for the inspiration and enrichment of the people of the
state. The Vancouver national historic reserve is on both the state
and federal registers as a historic district and encompasses some of
the richest historic, archaeological, architectural, and cultural
resources in the state.
It is the purpose of this act to:
(1) Confirm the role of the state of Washington in the development
and management of the Vancouver national historic reserve;
(2) Identify the role of state agencies in the Vancouver national
historic reserve; and
(3) Establish an account in the state treasury through the
Washington state historical society for funds designated specifically
for the Vancouver national historic reserve.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature affirms that the state of
Washington is partner in the Vancouver national historic reserve as
mandated under Public Law 104-333: The Omnibus Parks and Public Lands
Management Act of 1996. As such, the state will take an active role in
supporting the protection, preservation, interpretation, and
rehabilitation of the Vancouver national historic reserve.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legislature affirms that the Washington
state historical society is the state's designated partner
representative for the Vancouver national historic reserve.
Accordingly, the Washington state historical society shall:
(1) Participate in the regularly scheduled coordination meetings of
the Vancouver national historic reserve partners;
(2) Participate in the development of management, education, and
interpretive plans and policies associated with the Vancouver national
historic reserve;
(3) Partner with Washington State University and other agencies for
purposes of managing the center for Columbia river history,
headquartered on the Vancouver national historic reserve, and with the
department for preservation and rehabilitation of the site; and
(4) Develop and submit to the office of financial management and
the legislature operating and capital budget requests concurrent with
the biennial cycle and oversee the management of all funds appropriated
by the state for the Vancouver national historic reserve.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added
to chapter 27.34 RCW.

--- END ---