BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Polybrominated diphenyl ethers (PBDEs) have
been used extensively as flame retardants in a large number of common
household products for the past thirty years. Studies on animals show
that PBDEs can impact the developing brain, affecting behavior and
learning after birth and into adulthood, making exposure to fetuses and
children a particular concern. Levels of PBDEs are increasing in
people, and in the environment, particularly in North America. Because
people can be exposed to these chemicals through house dust and indoor
air as well as through food, it is important to phase out their use in
common household products, provided that effective flame retardants
that are safer and technically feasible are available at a reasonable
cost.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Comestible" means edible.
(2) "Commercial decabromo diphenyl ether" or "commercial deca-bde"
means the chemical mixture of decabromo diphenyl ether, including
associated polybrominated diphenyl ether impurities not intentionally
added.
(3) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(4) "Electronic enclosure" means the plastic housing that encloses
the components of electronic products, including but not limited to
televisions and computers.
(5) "Manufacturer" means any person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint
venture that produces a product containing polybrominated diphenyl
ethers or an importer or domestic distributor of a noncomestible
product containing polybrominated diphenyl ethers. A manufacturer does
not include a retailer who:
(a) Adds a private label brand or cobrands a product for sale; or
(b) Assembles components to create a single noncomestible product
based on an individual consumer preference.
(6) "Mattress" has the same meaning as defined by the United States
consumer product safety commission in 16 C.F.R. Part 1633 (2007) and
includes mattress pads, mattress sets, box springs, futons, crib
mattresses, and youth mattresses.
(7) "Medical device" means an instrument, machine, implant, or
diagnostic test used to help diagnose a disease or other condition or
to cure, treat, or prevent disease.
(8) "Polybrominated diphenyl ethers" or "PBDEs" means chemical
forms that consist of diphenyl ethers bound with bromine atoms.
Polybrominated diphenyl ethers include, but are not limited to, the
three primary forms of the commercial mixtures known as pentabromo
diphenyl ether (penta-bde), octabromo diphenyl ether (octa-bde), and
decabromo diphenyl ether (deca-bde).
(9) "Residential upholstered furniture" means residential seating
products intended for indoor use in a home or other dwelling intended
for residential occupancy that consists in whole or in part of
resilient cushioning materials enclosed within a covering consisting of
fabric or related materials, if the resilient cushioning materials are
sold with the item of upholstered furniture and the upholstered
furniture is constructed with a contiguous upholstered seat and back
that may include arms.
(10) "Retailer" means a person who offers a product for sale at
retail through any means including, but not limited to, remote
offerings such as sales outlets, catalogs, or the internet, but does
not include a sale that is a wholesale transaction with a distributor
or a retailer. A retailer does not include a person, firm,
association, partnership, corporation, governmental entity,
organization, or joint venture that both manufactures and sells a
product at retail.
(11) "Technically feasible" means an alternative that is available
at a cost and in sufficient quantity to permit the manufacturer to
produce an economically viable product.
(12) "Transportation vehicle" means a mechanized vehicle that is
used to transport goods or people including, but not limited to,
airplanes, automobiles, motorcycles, trucks, buses, trains, boats,
ships, streetcars, or monorail cars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This chapter does not apply to any of the
following:
(1) Products containing deca-bde except as provided in sections
4(2) and 5 of this act;
(2) The sale or distribution of any used transportation vehicle
manufactured before January 1, 2008, with component parts containing
PBDEs;
(3) The sale or distribution of any used transportation vehicle
parts or new transportation vehicle parts manufactured before January
1, 2008, that contain PBDEs;
(4) The manufacture, sale, repair, distribution, maintenance,
refurbishment, or modification of equipment containing PBDEs and used
primarily for military or federally funded space program applications.
The exemption in this subsection (4) does not cover consumer-based
goods with broad applicability;
(5) Federal aviation administration fire worthiness requirements
and recommendations;
(6) The manufacture, sale, repair, distribution, maintenance,
refurbishment, or modification of any new raw material or component
part used in a transportation vehicle with component parts, including
original spare parts, containing deca-bde;
(7) The use of commercial deca-bde in the maintenance,
refurbishment, or modification of transportation equipment;
(8) The sale or distribution of any product containing PBDEs that
has been previously owned, purchased, or sold in commerce, provided it
was manufactured before the effective date of the ban;
(9) The sale or purchase of any previously owned product containing
PBDEs made in casual or isolated sales as defined in RCW 82.04.040 and
to sales by nonprofit organizations;
(10) The manufacture, sale, or distribution of any new product or
product component consisting of recycled or used materials containing
deca-bde;
(11) The manufacture, sale, or distribution of new carpet cushion
made from recycled foam containing less than one-tenth of one percent
penta-bde; and
(12) Medical devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as provided in sections 3 and 12
of this act, after January 1, 2008, no person may manufacture,
knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for
use in this state noncomestible products containing PDBEs.
(2) Except as provided in sections 3 and 12 of this act, after
January 1, 2008, no person may manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for
sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for use in this state,
mattresses containing deca-bde.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Except as provided in sections 3, 7, and 12
of this act, after January 1, 2011, no person may manufacture,
knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or distribute, for
use in this state, residential upholstered furniture that contains
commercial deca-bde or any television or computer that has an
electronic enclosure that contains commercial deca-bde.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) No ban on deca-bde in televisions,
computers, or upholstered furniture may go into effect until the
department, the department of health, and the fire safety committee
determine that a safer and technically feasible alternative that meets
applicable fire safety standards is available.
(2) By December 15, 2008, the department and the department of
health shall review risk assessments, scientific studies, and other
relevant findings regarding alternatives to the use of commercial deca-bde in residential upholstered furniture, televisions, and computers.
(3)(a) If the department and the department of health jointly find
that safer and technically feasible alternatives are available for any
of these uses, the department shall convene a fire safety committee to
determine if the identified alternatives meet applicable fire safety
standards.
(b) A representative from the department shall chair the fire
safety committee and serve as an ex officio nonvoting member.
(c) A majority vote of the fire safety committee members
constitutes a finding that an alternative meets applicable fire safety
standards.
(d) The fire safety committee consists of five voting members,
appointed by the governor, from each of the following five firefighting
organizations:
(i) The office of the state fire marshal;
(ii) The Washington fire chiefs;
(iii) The Washington fire commissioners association;
(iv) The Washington state council of firefighters; and
(v) The Washington state firefighters association.
(4) If the fire safety committee determines that an alternative
identified under subsection (3)(a) of this section meets applicable
fire safety standards, the effective date of the ban is the date
established in section 5 of this act.
(5) If the fire safety committee determines that no alternative
identified under subsection (3)(a) of this section meets applicable
fire safety standards, the ban established in section 5 of this act
does not take effect and the department shall proceed as required in
section 7 of this act.
(6) The department and the department of health shall document
their findings and the findings of the fire safety committee in a
report to the legislature by December 15, 2008. The report must also
include any additional evidence of the potential harm posed by deca-bde.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) If the department and the department of
health jointly find, by December 15, 2008, that an effective flame
retardant that is safer than commercial deca-bde and technically
feasible for use in residential upholstered furniture, televisions, or
computers is not available or if the fire safety committee finds that
an alternative to commercial deca-bde does not meet applicable fire
safety standards, the department shall by rule grant an exemption to
allow for the manufacture, sale, or distribution of products prohibited
from manufacture, sale, or distribution under section 5 of this act.
(2) If the department grants an exemption under subsection (1) of
this section, the department and the department of health shall
evaluate the exemption annually. When an effective flame retardant
that is safer and technically feasible becomes available, the
department shall convene the fire safety committee to determine if the
identified alternative meets applicable fire safety standards. If the
fire safety committee makes such a finding, the agencies shall report
these findings to the legislature by December 15th of the year in which
the finding is made. The department shall subsequently rescind the
exemption granted under subsection (1) of this section no earlier than
two years after this report is submitted to the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department and the department of health
shall review risk assessments, scientific studies, and other relevant
findings regarding alternatives to the use of commercial deca-bde in
products not directly addressed in this chapter. If a flame retardant
that is safer and technically feasible becomes available, the
department shall convene the fire safety committee to determine if the
identified alternative meets applicable fire safety standards. A
report on findings of these assessments must be presented to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15th of the year
in which the finding is made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Nothing in this chapter restricts the
ability of a manufacturer, importer, or distributor from transporting
products containing PBDEs through the state, or storing the products in
the state for later distribution outside the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A manufacturer of products containing PBDEs
that are restricted under this chapter must notify persons that sell
the manufacturer's products in this state about the provisions of this
chapter no less than ninety days prior to the effective date of the
restrictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The department shall assist state agencies
to give priority and preference to the purchase of equipment, supplies,
and other products that do not contain PBDEs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) Retailers who unknowingly sell products
banned under section 4, 5, or 7 of this act are not liable under this
chapter.
(2) In-state retailers in possession of products on the date that
restrictions on the sale of the products become effective under section
4, 5, or 7 of this act may exhaust their existing stock through sales
to the public.
(3) The department must assist in-state retailers in identifying
potential products containing PBDEs.
(4) If a retailer unknowingly possesses products that are banned
for sale under section 4, 5, or 7 of this act and the manufacturer does
not recall the products as required under section 13(2) of this act,
the retailer may exhaust its existing stock through sales to the
public. However, no additional banned stock may be sold or offered for
sale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) Enforcement of this chapter must rely
on notification and information exchange between the department and
manufacturers. The department shall achieve compliance with this
chapter using the following enforcement sequence:
(a) Before the effective date of the product bans in section 4, 5,
or 7 of this act, the department shall prepare and distribute
information to in-state manufacturers and out-of-state manufacturers,
to the maximum extent practicable, to assist them in identifying
products prohibited for manufacture, sale, or distribution under this
chapter.
(b) The department may request a certificate of compliance from a
manufacturer. A certificate of compliance attests that a
manufacturer's product or products meets the requirements of this
chapter.
(c) The department may issue a warning letter to a manufacturer
that produces, sells, or distributes banned products in violation of
this chapter. The department shall offer information or other
appropriate assistance to the manufacturer in complying with this
chapter. If, after one year, compliance is not achieved, penalties may
be assessed under subsection (3) of this section.
(2) A manufacturer that knowingly produces, sells, or distributes
a product prohibited from manufacture, sale, or distribution in this
state under this chapter shall recall the products and reimburse the
retailer or any other purchaser for the product and any applicable
shipping and handling for returning the products.
(3) A manufacturer of products containing PBDEs in violation of
this chapter is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed one
thousand dollars for each violation in the case of a first offense.
Manufacturers who are repeat violators are liable for a civil penalty
not to exceed five thousand dollars for each repeat offense. Penalties
collected under this section must be deposited in the state toxics
control account created in RCW 70.l05D.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The department may adopt rules to fully
implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 14 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---