BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.33.088 and 2003 c 315 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A purchaser of privately owned timber in an amount in excess of
two hundred thousand board feet in a voluntary sale made in the
ordinary course of business shall, on or before the last day of the
month following the purchase of the timber, report the particulars of
the purchase to the department as required in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) The report required in subsection (1) of this section ((shall))
must contain all information relevant to the value of the timber
purchased including, but not limited to, the following, as applicable:
Purchaser's name and address, sale date, termination date in sale
agreement, total sale price, total acreage involved in the sale, net
volume of timber purchased, legal description of the area involved in
the sale, road construction or improvements required or completed,
timber cruise data, and timber thinning data. A report may be
submitted in any reasonable form or, at the purchaser's option, by
submitting relevant excerpts of the timber sales contract. A purchaser
may comply by submitting the information in the following form:

Purchaser's name: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Purchaser's address: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Sale date: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Termination date: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total sale price: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Total acreage involved: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Net volume of timber purchased: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Legal description of sale area: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Property improvements: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Timber cruise data: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Timber thinning data: . . . . . . . . . . . .

(3) A purchaser of privately owned timber involved in a purchase
described in subsection (1) of this section, who fails to report a
purchase as required, may be liable for a penalty of two hundred fifty
dollars for each failure to report, as determined by the department.
(4) This section expires July 1, ((2007)) 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---