BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.131.397 (Intermediate driver's license program -- Review)
and 2000 c 115 s 12; and
(2) RCW 43.131.398 (Intermediate driver's license program--Repeal)
and 2000 c 115 s 13.

--- END ---