BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Automobiles are an essential part of our everyday lives. The
west coast is the only region of the United States with an increase of
over three percent in motor vehicle thefts over the last several years.
The family car is a priority of most individuals and families. The
family car is typically the second largest investment a person has next
to the home, so when a car is stolen, it causes a significant loss and
inconvenience to people, imposes financial hardship, and negatively
impacts their work, school, and personal activities. Appropriate and
meaningful penalties that are proportionate to the crime committed must
be imposed on those who steal motor vehicles;
(b) In Washington, more than one car is stolen every eleven
minutes, one hundred thirty-eight cars are stolen every day, someone's
car has a one in one hundred seventy-nine chance of being stolen, and
more vehicles were stolen in 2005 than in any other previous year.
Since 1994, auto theft has increased over fifty-five percent, while
other property crimes like burglary are on the decline or holding
steady. The national crime insurance bureau reports that Seattle and
Tacoma ranked in the top ten places for the most auto thefts, ninth and
tenth respectively, in 2004. In 2005, over fifty thousand auto thefts
were reported costing Washington citizens more than three hundred
twenty-five million dollars in higher insurance rates and lost
vehicles. Nearly eighty percent of these crimes occurred in the
central Puget Sound region consisting of the heavily populated areas of
King, Pierce, and Snohomish counties;
(c) Law enforcement has determined that auto theft, along with all
the grief it causes the immediate victims, is linked more and more to
offenders engaged in other crimes. Many stolen vehicles are used by
criminals involved in such crimes as robbery, burglary, and assault.
In addition, many people who are stopped in stolen vehicles are found
to possess the personal identification of other persons, or to possess
methamphetamine, precursors to methamphetamine, or equipment used to
cook methamphetamine;
(d) Juveniles account for over half of the reported auto thefts
with many of these thefts being their first criminal offense. It is
critical that they, along with first time adult offenders, are
appropriately punished for their crimes. However, it is also important
that first time offenders who qualify receive appropriate counseling
treatment for associated problems that may have contributed to the
commission of the crime, such as drugs, alcohol, and anger management;
and
(e) A coordinated and concentrated enforcement mechanism is
critical to an effective statewide offensive against motor vehicle
theft. Such a system provides for better communications between and
among law enforcement agencies, more efficient implementation of
efforts to discover, track, and arrest auto thieves, quicker recovery,
and the return of stolen vehicles, saving millions of dollars in
potential loss to victims and their insurers.
(2) It is the intent of this act to deter motor vehicle theft
through a statewide cooperative effort by combating motor vehicle theft
through tough laws, supporting law enforcement activities, improving
enforcement and administration, effective prosecution, public
awareness, and meaningful treatment for first time offenders where
appropriate. It is also the intent of the legislature to ensure that
adequate funding is provided to implement this act in order for real,
observable reductions in the number of auto thefts in Washington state.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.56.030 and 2005 c 212 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft in the first degree if he or she
commits theft of:
(a) Property or services which exceed(s) one thousand five hundred
dollars in value other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010;
(b) Property of any value other than a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 taken from the person of another; ((or))
(c) A search and rescue dog, as defined in RCW 9.91.175, while the
search and rescue dog is on duty; or
(d) A motor vehicle.
(2) Theft in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.56.040 and 1995 c 129 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft in the second degree if he or she
commits theft of:
(a) Property or services which exceed(s) two hundred ((and)) fifty
dollars in value other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010, but
does not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars in value; or
(b) A public record, writing, or instrument kept, filed, or
deposited according to law with or in the keeping of any public office
or public servant; or
(c) An access device((; or
(d) A motor vehicle, of a value less than one thousand five hundred
dollars)).
(2) Theft in the second degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 4 RCW 9A.56.150 and 1995 c 129 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of possessing stolen property in the first
degree if he or she possesses stolen property other than a firearm as
defined in RCW 9.41.010 which exceeds one thousand five hundred dollars
in value, or he or she possesses a stolen motor vehicle.
(2) Possessing stolen property in the first degree is a class B
felony.

Sec. 5 RCW 9A.56.160 and 1995 c 129 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of possessing stolen property in the second
degree if:
(a) He or she possesses stolen property other than a firearm as
defined in RCW 9.41.010 which exceeds two hundred fifty dollars in
value but does not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars in value;
or
(b) He or she possesses a stolen public record, writing or
instrument kept, filed, or deposited according to law; or
(c) He or she possesses a stolen access device((; or
(d) He or she possesses a stolen motor vehicle of a value less than
one thousand five hundred dollars)).
(2) Possessing stolen property in the second degree is a class C
felony.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.94A.525 and 2006 c 128 s 6 and 2006 c 73 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The offender score is measured on the horizontal axis of the
sentencing grid. The offender score rules are as follows:
The offender score is the sum of points accrued under this section
rounded down to the nearest whole number.
(1) A prior conviction is a conviction which exists before the date
of sentencing for the offense for which the offender score is being
computed. Convictions entered or sentenced on the same date as the
conviction for which the offender score is being computed shall be
deemed "other current offenses" within the meaning of RCW 9.94A.589.
(2)(a) Class A and sex prior felony convictions shall always be
included in the offender score.
(b) Class B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall
not be included in the offender score, if since the last date of
release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment)
pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and
sentence, the offender had spent ten consecutive years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(c) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, class C prior
felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not be included in the
offender score if, since the last date of release from confinement
(including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had
spent five consecutive years in the community without committing any
crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(d) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, serious traffic
convictions shall not be included in the offender score if, since the
last date of release from confinement (including full-time residential
treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of
judgment and sentence, the offender spent five years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(e) If the present conviction is felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)), prior convictions
of felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, felony physical control of a vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, and serious traffic
offenses shall be included in the offender score if: (i) The prior
convictions were committed within five years since the last date of
release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment) or
entry of judgment and sentence; or (ii) the prior convictions would be
considered "prior offenses within ten years" as defined in RCW
46.61.5055.
(f) This subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior
convictions.
(3) Out-of-state convictions for offenses shall be classified
according to the comparable offense definitions and sentences provided
by Washington law. Federal convictions for offenses shall be
classified according to the comparable offense definitions and
sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no clearly
comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is
usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the
offense shall be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a
felony under the relevant federal statute.
(4) Score prior convictions for felony anticipatory offenses
(attempts, criminal solicitations, and criminal conspiracies) the same
as if they were convictions for completed offenses.
(5)(a) In the case of multiple prior convictions, for the purpose
of computing the offender score, count all convictions separately,
except:
(i) Prior offenses which were found, under RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), to
encompass the same criminal conduct, shall be counted as one offense,
the offense that yields the highest offender score. The current
sentencing court shall determine with respect to other prior adult
offenses for which sentences were served concurrently or prior juvenile
offenses for which sentences were served consecutively, whether those
offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate offenses using
the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), and
if the court finds that they shall be counted as one offense, then the
offense that yields the highest offender score shall be used. The
current sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses
were not the same criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate
dates, or in separate counties or jurisdictions, or in separate
complaints, indictments, or informations;
(ii) In the case of multiple prior convictions for offenses
committed before July 1, 1986, for the purpose of computing the
offender score, count all adult convictions served concurrently as one
offense, and count all juvenile convictions entered on the same date as
one offense. Use the conviction for the offense that yields the
highest offender score.
(b) As used in this subsection (5), "served concurrently" means
that: (i) The latter sentence was imposed with specific reference to
the former; (ii) the concurrent relationship of the sentences was
judicially imposed; and (iii) the concurrent timing of the sentences
was not the result of a probation or parole revocation on the former
offense.
(6) If the present conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses
of criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior
conviction as if the present conviction were for a completed offense.
When these convictions are used as criminal history, score them the
same as a completed crime.
(7) If the present conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not
covered by subsection (11) or (12) of this section, count one point for
each adult prior felony conviction and one point for each juvenile
prior violent felony conviction and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior
nonviolent felony conviction.
(8) If the present conviction is for a violent offense and not
covered in subsection (9), (10), (11), or (12) of this section, count
two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent felony conviction,
one point for each prior adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2
point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony conviction.
(9) If the present conviction is for a serious violent offense,
count three points for prior adult and juvenile convictions for crimes
in this category, two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent
conviction (not already counted), one point for each prior adult
nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.
(10) If the present conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior
convictions as in subsection (8) of this section; however count two
points for each prior adult Burglary 2 or residential burglary
conviction, and one point for each prior juvenile Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction.
(11) If the present conviction is for a felony traffic offense
count two points for each adult or juvenile prior conviction for
Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular Assault; for each felony offense count
one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior
conviction; for each serious traffic offense, other than those used for
an enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each
adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction.
(12) If the present conviction is for manufacture of
methamphetamine count three points for each adult prior manufacture of
methamphetamine conviction and two points for each juvenile manufacture
of methamphetamine offense. If the present conviction is for a drug
offense and the offender has a criminal history that includes a sex
offense or serious violent offense, count three points for each adult
prior felony drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile
drug offense. All other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in
subsection (8) of this section if the current drug offense is violent,
or as in subsection (7) of this section if the current drug offense is
nonviolent.
(13) If the present conviction is for Escape from Community
Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape convictions in the
offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one point and
juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.
(14) If the present conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or
Escape 2, RCW 9A.76.120, count adult prior convictions as one point and
juvenile prior convictions as 1/2 point.
(15) If the present conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential
burglary, count priors as in subsection (7) of this section; however,
count two points for each adult and juvenile prior Burglary 1
conviction, two points for each adult prior Burglary 2 or residential
burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile prior Burglary 2
or residential burglary conviction.
(16) If the present conviction is for a sex offense, count priors
as in subsections (7) through (15) of this section; however count three
points for each adult and juvenile prior sex offense conviction.
(17) If the present conviction is for failure to register as a sex
offender under RCW 9A.44.130(10), count priors as in subsections (7)
through (15) of this section; however count three points for each adult
and juvenile prior sex offense conviction, excluding prior convictions
for failure to register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130(10),
which shall count as one point.
(18) If the present conviction is for an offense committed while
the offender was under community placement, add one point.
(19) If the present conviction is for Theft 1, Possession of Stolen
Property 1, Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1, or Taking a
Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2, count priors as in subsections (7)
through (18) of this section; however count one point for prior
convictions of Vehicle Prowling 2.
(20) If the present conviction is Theft 1 (of a motor vehicle),
Possession of Stolen Property 1 (of a motor vehicle), Taking a Motor
Vehicle without Permission 1, or Taking a Motor Vehicle without
Permission 2, count three points for each adult and juvenile prior
Theft 1 (of a motor vehicle), Possession of Stolen Property 1 (of a
motor vehicle), Taking a Motor Vehicle without Permission 1, or Taking
a Motor Vehicle without Permission 2 conviction.
(21) The fact that a prior conviction was not included in an
offender's offender score or criminal history at a previous sentencing
shall have no bearing on whether it is included in the criminal history
or offender score for the current offense. Accordingly, prior
convictions that were not counted in the offender score or included in
criminal history under repealed or previous versions of the sentencing
reform act shall be included in criminal history and shall count in the
offender score if the current version of the sentencing reform act
requires including or counting those convictions.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.94A.734 and 2003 c 53 s 62 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Home detention may not be imposed for offenders convicted of:
(a) A violent offense;
(b) Any sex offense;
(c) Any drug offense;
(d) Reckless burning in the first or second degree as defined in
RCW 9A.48.040 or 9A.48.050;
(e) Assault in the third degree as defined in RCW 9A.36.031;
(f) Assault of a child in the third degree;
(g) Unlawful imprisonment as defined in RCW 9A.40.040; or
(h) Harassment as defined in RCW 9A.46.020.
Home detention may be imposed for offenders convicted of possession of
a controlled substance under RCW 69.50.4013 or forged prescription for
a controlled substance under RCW 69.50.403 if the offender fulfills the
participation conditions set forth in this section and is monitored for
drug use by a treatment alternatives to street crime program or a
comparable court or agency-referred program.
(2) Home detention may be imposed for offenders convicted of
burglary in the second degree as defined in RCW 9A.52.030 or
residential burglary conditioned upon the offender:
(a) Successfully completing twenty-one days in a work release
program;
(b) Having no convictions for burglary in the second degree or
residential burglary during the preceding two years and not more than
two prior convictions for burglary or residential burglary;
(c) Having no convictions for a violent felony offense during the
preceding two years and not more than two prior convictions for a
violent felony offense;
(d) Having no prior charges of escape; and
(e) Fulfilling the other conditions of the home detention program.
(3) Home detention may be imposed for offenders convicted of taking
a motor vehicle without permission in the second degree as defined in
RCW 9A.56.075, theft of a motor vehicle in the first degree as defined
in RCW 9A.56.030(1)(d), or possession of a stolen motor vehicle in the
first degree as defined in RCW 9A.56.150 conditioned upon the offender:
(a) Having no convictions for taking a motor vehicle without
permission, theft of a motor vehicle or possession of a stolen motor
vehicle during the preceding five years and not more than two prior
convictions for taking a motor vehicle without permission, theft of a
motor vehicle or possession of a stolen motor vehicle;
(b) Having no convictions for a violent felony offense during the
preceding two years and not more than two prior convictions for a
violent felony offense;
(c) Having no prior charges of escape; and
(d) Fulfilling the other conditions of the home detention program.
(4) Participation in a home detention program shall be conditioned
upon:
(a) The offender obtaining or maintaining current employment or
attending a regular course of school study at regularly defined hours,
or the offender performing parental duties to offspring or minors
normally in the custody of the offender;
(b) Abiding by the rules of the home detention program; and
(c) Compliance with court-ordered legal financial obligations. The
home detention program may also be made available to offenders whose
charges and convictions do not otherwise disqualify them if medical or
health-related conditions, concerns or treatment would be better
addressed under the home detention program, or where the health and
welfare of the offender, other inmates, or staff would be jeopardized
by the offender's incarceration. Participation in the home detention
program for medical or health-related reasons is conditioned on the
offender abiding by the rules of the home detention program and
complying with court-ordered restitution.

Sec. 8 RCW 13.40.0357 and 2006 c 73 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:

DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

JUVENILE
DISPOSITION
OFFENSE
CATEGORY DESCRIPTION (RCW CITATION) JUVENILE DISPOSITION
CATEGORY FOR
ATTEMPT, BAILJUMP,
CONSPIRACY, OR
SOLICITATION

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A Arson 1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson 2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090(2) (a) and
(c)) E

E Malicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090(2)(b)) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus
(9.40.100) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus with
Intent to Commit Arson (9.40.105) E

A Possession of Incendiary Device (9.40.120)
B+

Assault and Other Crimes Involving
Physical Harm

A Assault 1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault 2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault 3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault 4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless Endangerment (9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting Suicide Attempt (9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion (9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+ Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential Burglary (9A.52.025) C

B Burglary 2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools (Possession of) (9A.52.060) E

D Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Mineral Trespass (78.44.330) C

C Vehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption of Alcohol
(66.44.270) E

C Illegally Obtaining Legend Drug
(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery, Possession of Legend Drug
with Intent to Sell (69.41.030(2)(a)) D+

E Possession of Legend Drug
(69.41.030(2)(b)) E

B+ Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or
Flunitrazepam Sale (69.50.401(2) (a) or
(b)) B+

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic Sale (69.50.401(2)(c)) C

E Possession of Marihuana <40 grams
(69.50.4014) E

C Fraudulently Obtaining Controlled
Substance (69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of Controlled Substance for Profit
(69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or
Flunitrazepam Counterfeit Substances
(69.50.4011(2) (a) or (b)) B

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic Counterfeit Substances
(69.50.4011(2) (c), (d), or (e)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance
(69.50.4013) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance
(69.50.4012)
C

Firearms and Weapons

B Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of Stolen Firearm (9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded Pistol Without Permit
(9.41.050) E

C Possession of Firearms by Minor (<18)
(9.41.040(2)(a)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of Dangerous Weapon
(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating Another Person by use of
Weapon (9.41.270)
E

Homicide

A+ Murder 1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder 2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful Imprisonment (9A.40.040)
D+

Obstructing Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a Law Enforcement Officer
(9A.76.020) E

E Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing Contraband 1 (9A.76.140) C

C Introducing Contraband 2 (9A.76.150) D

E Introducing Contraband 3 (9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a Public Servant (9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a Witness (9A.72.110)
C+

Public Disturbance

C+ Riot with Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(b)) D+

D+ Riot Without Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(a)) E

E Failure to Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape 1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape 2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape 3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent Exposure (Victim <14)
(9A.88.010) E

E Indecent Exposure (Victim 14 or over)
(9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting Prostitution 1 (9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting Prostitution 2 (9A.88.080) D+

E O & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and Forgery

B Theft 1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft 2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft 3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft of Livestock 1 and 2 (9A.56.080 and
9A.56.083) C

C Forgery (9A.60.020) D

A Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery 2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion 1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion 2 (9A.56.130) D+

C Identity Theft 1 (9.35.020(2)) D

D Identity Theft 2 (9.35.020(3)) E

D Improperly Obtaining Financial Information
(9.35.010) E

B Possession of Stolen Property 1
(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of Stolen Property 2
(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of Stolen Property 3
(9A.56.170) E

C Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission
1 ((and 2)) (9A.56.070 ((and 9A.56.075)))
D

C Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission
2 (9A.56.075) D

B Theft of a Motor Vehicle 1 (9A.56.030(1)) C

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving Without a License (46.20.005) E

B+ Hit and Run - Death (46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run - Injury (46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and Run-Attended (46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and Run-Unattended (46.52.010) E

C Vehicular Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to Elude Pursuing Police
Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While Under the Influence
(46.61.502 and 46.61.504)
E

B+ Felony Driving While Under the Influence
(46.61.502(6)) B

B+ Felony Physical Control of a Vehicle While
Under the Influence (46.61.504(6)) B

Other

B Animal Cruelty 1 (16.52.205) C

B Bomb Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape 11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape 21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape 3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene, Harassing, Etc., Phone Calls
(9.61.230) E

A Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
A Felony B+

B Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
B Felony C

C Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
C Felony D

D Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Gross
Misdemeanor E

E Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation of Order of Restitution,
Community Supervision, or Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C offenses
and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks
confinement
2nd escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks
confinement
3rd and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month
period - 12 weeks confinement

2If the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order,
it may impose a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may
select sentencing option A, B, C, D, or RCW 13.40.167.

OPTION A
JUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID
STANDARD RANGE

A+
180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

EXCEPT

30-40

WEEKS FOR

15-17

YEAR OLDS

Current B+ 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

Offense WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL 52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) 15-36 WEEKS WEEKS

C+ LS

15-36 WEEKS

C LS 15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions:

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Restitution

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4
or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of
confinement.
(1) The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category.
The current offense category is determined by the offense of
adjudication.
(2) The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior
adjudications included in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior
felony adjudication shall count as one point. Each prior violation,
misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count as 1/4
point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.
(3) The standard range disposition for each offense is determined
by the intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications
and the row defined by the current offense category.
(4) RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for
more than one offense.
(5) A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an
offense category of E. However, a disposition for a violation shall
not include confinement.

OR

OPTION B
SUSPENDED DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

(1) If the offender is subject to a standard range disposition
involving confinement by the department, the court may impose the
standard range and suspend the disposition on condition that the
offender comply with one or more local sanctions and any educational or
treatment requirement. The treatment programs provided to the offender
must be research-based best practice programs as identified by the
Washington state institute for public policy or the joint legislative
audit and review committee.
(2) If the offender fails to comply with the suspended disposition,
the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or may revoke
the suspended disposition and order the disposition's execution.
(3) An offender is ineligible for the suspended disposition option
under this section if the offender is:
(a) Adjudicated of an A+ offense;
(b) Fourteen years of age or older and is adjudicated of one or
more of the following offenses:
(i) A class A offense, or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation
to commit a class A offense;
(ii) Manslaughter in the first degree (RCW 9A.32.060); or
(iii) Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021), extortion in
the first degree (RCW 9A.56.120), kidnapping in the second degree (RCW
9A.40.030), robbery in the second degree (RCW 9A.56.210), residential
burglary (RCW 9A.52.025), burglary in the second degree (RCW
9A.52.030), drive-by shooting (RCW 9A.36.045), vehicular homicide (RCW
46.61.520), hit and run death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a)), intimidating a
witness (RCW 9A.72.110), violation of the uniform controlled substances
act (RCW 69.50.401 (2)(a) and (b)), or manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070),
when the offense includes infliction of bodily harm upon another or
when during the commission or immediate withdrawal from the offense the
respondent was armed with a deadly weapon;
(c) Ordered to serve a disposition for a firearm violation under
RCW 13.40.193; or
(d) Adjudicated of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

OR

OPTION C
CHEMICAL DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition
of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not
committed an A- or B+ offense, the court may impose a disposition under
RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION D
MANIFEST INJUSTICE

If the court determines that a disposition under option A, B, or C
would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a
disposition outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).

Sec. 9 RCW 13.40.038 and 1992 c 205 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the policy of this state that all county juvenile detention
facilities provide a humane, safe, and rehabilitative environment and
that unadjudicated youth remain in the community whenever possible,
consistent with public safety and the provisions of chapter 13.40 RCW.
The counties shall develop and implement detention intake standards
and risk assessment standards to determine whether detention is
warranted and if so whether the juvenile should be placed in secure,
nonsecure, or home detention to implement the goals of this section.
Additionally, in any case where a juvenile is arrested for an offense
involving theft of a motor vehicle in the first degree as defined in
RCW 9A.56.030(1)(d), possession of a stolen motor vehicle in the first
degree as defined in RCW 9A.56.150, taking a motor vehicle without
permission in the first degree as defined in RCW 9A.56.070(1), or
taking a motor vehicle without permission in the second degree as
defined in RCW 9A.56.075(1), the juvenile shall be given a risk
assessment to determine whether the juvenile is in need of treatment.
Inability to pay for a less restrictive detention placement shall not
be a basis for denying a respondent a less restrictive placement in the
community. The detention and risk assessment standards shall be
developed and implemented no later than December 31, 1992.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a respondent is adjudicated of an offense involving theft of
a motor vehicle in the first degree as defined in RCW 9A.56.030(1)(d),
possession of a stolen motor vehicle in the first degree as defined in
RCW 9A.56.150, or taking a motor vehicle without permission in the
first degree as defined in RCW 9A.56.070, the court shall impose a
standard range as follows:
(a) Juveniles with no prior adjudications shall be sentenced to no
less than five days home detention, forty-five hours of community
service, and a two hundred dollar fine;
(b) Juveniles with one prior adjudication shall be sentenced to no
less than ten days detention, ninety hours of community service, and a
four hundred dollar fine; and
(c) Juveniles with two or more prior adjudications shall be
sentenced to no less than 15-36 weeks confinement, seven days home
detention, four months supervision, ninety hours of community service,
and a four hundred dollar fine.
(2) If a respondent is adjudicated of an offense involving taking
a motor vehicle without permission in the second degree as defined in
RCW 9A.56.075, the court shall impose a standard range as follows:
(a) Juveniles with no prior adjudications shall be sentenced to no
less than one day home detention, one month supervision, fifteen hours
of community service, and a fifty dollar fine;
(b) Juveniles with one prior adjudication shall be sentenced to no
less than one day detention, two days home detention, two months
supervision, thirty hours of community service, and a one hundred fifty
dollar fine; and
(c) Juveniles with two or more prior adjudications shall be
sentenced to no less than three days detention, seven days home
detention, three months supervision, forty-five hours of community
service, and a one hundred fifty dollar fine.

Sec. 11 RCW 13.40.210 and 2002 c 175 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall set a release date for each juvenile
committed to its custody. The release date shall be within the
prescribed range to which a juvenile has been committed under RCW
13.40.0357 or 13.40.030 except as provided in RCW 13.40.320 concerning
offenders the department determines are eligible for the juvenile
offender basic training camp program. Such dates shall be determined
prior to the expiration of sixty percent of a juvenile's minimum term
of confinement included within the prescribed range to which the
juvenile has been committed. The secretary shall release any juvenile
committed to the custody of the department within four calendar days
prior to the juvenile's release date or on the release date set under
this chapter. Days spent in the custody of the department shall be
tolled by any period of time during which a juvenile has absented
himself or herself from the department's supervision without the prior
approval of the secretary or the secretary's designee.
(2) The secretary shall monitor the average daily population of the
state's juvenile residential facilities. When the secretary concludes
that in-residence population of residential facilities exceeds one
hundred five percent of the rated bed capacity specified in statute, or
in absence of such specification, as specified by the department in
rule, the secretary may recommend reductions to the governor. On
certification by the governor that the recommended reductions are
necessary, the secretary has authority to administratively release a
sufficient number of offenders to reduce in-residence population to one
hundred percent of rated bed capacity. The secretary shall release
those offenders who have served the greatest proportion of their
sentence. However, the secretary may deny release in a particular case
at the request of an offender, or if the secretary finds that there is
no responsible custodian, as determined by the department, to whom to
release the offender, or if the release of the offender would pose a
clear danger to society. The department shall notify the committing
court of the release at the time of release if any such early releases
have occurred as a result of excessive in-residence population. In no
event shall an offender adjudicated of a violent offense be granted
release under the provisions of this subsection.
(3)(a) Following the release of any juvenile under subsection (1)
of this section, the secretary may require the juvenile to comply with
a program of parole to be administered by the department in his or her
community which shall last no longer than eighteen months, except that
in the case of a juvenile sentenced for rape in the first or second
degree, rape of a child in the first or second degree, child
molestation in the first degree, or indecent liberties with forcible
compulsion, the period of parole shall be twenty-four months and, in
the discretion of the secretary, may be up to thirty-six months when
the secretary finds that an additional period of parole is necessary
and appropriate in the interests of public safety or to meet the
ongoing needs of the juvenile. A parole program is mandatory for
offenders released under subsection (2) of this section and for
offenders who receive a juvenile residential commitment sentence under
section 10 of this act. The decision to place an offender on parole
shall be based on an assessment by the department of the offender's
risk for reoffending upon release. The department shall prioritize
available parole resources to provide supervision and services to
offenders at moderate to high risk for reoffending.
(b) The secretary shall, for the period of parole, facilitate the
juvenile's reintegration into his or her community and to further this
goal shall require the juvenile to refrain from possessing a firearm or
using a deadly weapon and refrain from committing new offenses and may
require the juvenile to: (i) Undergo available medical, psychiatric,
drug and alcohol, sex offender, mental health, and other offense-related treatment services; (ii) report as directed to a parole officer
and/or designee; (iii) pursue a course of study, vocational training,
or employment; (iv) notify the parole officer of the current address
where he or she resides; (v) be present at a particular address during
specified hours; (vi) remain within prescribed geographical boundaries;
(vii) submit to electronic monitoring; (viii) refrain from using
illegal drugs and alcohol, and submit to random urinalysis when
requested by the assigned parole officer; (ix) refrain from contact
with specific individuals or a specified class of individuals; (x) meet
other conditions determined by the parole officer to further enhance
the juvenile's reintegration into the community; (xi) pay any court-ordered fines or restitution; and (xii) perform community restitution.
Community restitution for the purpose of this section means compulsory
service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the
community by the offender. Community restitution may be performed
through public or private organizations or through work crews.
(c) The secretary may further require up to twenty-five percent of
the highest risk juvenile offenders who are placed on parole to
participate in an intensive supervision program. Offenders
participating in an intensive supervision program shall be required to
comply with all terms and conditions listed in (b) of this subsection
and shall also be required to comply with the following additional
terms and conditions: (i) Obey all laws and refrain from any conduct
that threatens public safety; (ii) report at least once a week to an
assigned community case manager; and (iii) meet all other requirements
imposed by the community case manager related to participating in the
intensive supervision program. As a part of the intensive supervision
program, the secretary may require day reporting.
(d) After termination of the parole period, the juvenile shall be
discharged from the department's supervision.
(4)(a) The department may also modify parole for violation thereof.
If, after affording a juvenile all of the due process rights to which
he or she would be entitled if the juvenile were an adult, the
secretary finds that a juvenile has violated a condition of his or her
parole, the secretary shall order one of the following which is
reasonably likely to effectuate the purpose of the parole and to
protect the public: (i) Continued supervision under the same
conditions previously imposed; (ii) intensified supervision with
increased reporting requirements; (iii) additional conditions of
supervision authorized by this chapter; (iv) except as provided in
(a)(v) and (vi) of this subsection, imposition of a period of
confinement not to exceed thirty days in a facility operated by or
pursuant to a contract with the state of Washington or any city or
county for a portion of each day or for a certain number of days each
week with the balance of the days or weeks spent under supervision; (v)
the secretary may order any of the conditions or may return the
offender to confinement for the remainder of the sentence range if the
offense for which the offender was sentenced is rape in the first or
second degree, rape of a child in the first or second degree, child
molestation in the first degree, indecent liberties with forcible
compulsion, or a sex offense that is also a serious violent offense as
defined by RCW 9.94A.030; and (vi) the secretary may order any of the
conditions or may return the offender to confinement for the remainder
of the sentence range if the youth has completed the basic training
camp program as described in RCW 13.40.320.
(b) If the department finds that any juvenile in a program of
parole has possessed a firearm or used a deadly weapon during the
program of parole, the department shall modify the parole under (a) of
this subsection and confine the juvenile for at least thirty days.
Confinement shall be in a facility operated by or pursuant to a
contract with the state or any county.
(5) A parole officer of the department of social and health
services shall have the power to arrest a juvenile under his or her
supervision on the same grounds as a law enforcement officer would be
authorized to arrest the person.
(6) If so requested and approved under chapter 13.06 RCW, the
secretary shall permit a county or group of counties to perform
functions under subsections (3) through (5) of this section.

Sec. 12 RCW 9A.56.096 and 2003 c 53 s 77 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who, with intent to deprive the owner or owner's
agent, wrongfully obtains, or exerts unauthorized control over, or by
color or aid of deception gains control of personal property that is
rented ((or)), leased, or loaned by written agreement to the person, is
guilty of theft of rental, leased, ((or)) lease-purchased, or loaned
property.
(2) The finder of fact may presume intent to deprive if the finder
of fact finds either of the following:
(a) That the person who rented or leased the property failed to
return or make arrangements acceptable to the owner of the property or
the owner's agent to return the property to the owner or the owner's
agent within seventy-two hours after receipt of proper notice following
the due date of the rental, lease, ((or)) lease-purchase, or loan
agreement; or
(b) That the renter ((or)), lessee, or borrower presented
identification to the owner or the owner's agent that was materially
false, fictitious, or not current with respect to name, address, place
of employment, or other appropriate items.
(3) As used in subsection (2) of this section, "proper notice"
consists of a written demand by the owner or the owner's agent made
after the due date of the rental, lease, ((or)) lease-purchase, or loan
period, mailed by certified or registered mail to the renter ((or)),
lessee, or borrower at: (a) The address the renter ((or)), lessee, or
borrower gave when the contract was made; or (b) the renter ((or)),
lessee(('s)), or borrower's last known address if later furnished in
writing by the renter, lessee, borrower, or the agent of the renter
((or)), lessee, or borrower.
(4) The replacement value of the property obtained must be utilized
in determining the amount involved in the theft of rental, leased,
((or)) lease-purchased, or loaned property.
(5)(a) Theft of rental, leased, ((or)) lease-purchased, or loaned
property is a class B felony if the rental, leased, ((or)) lease-purchased, or loaned property is valued at one thousand five hundred
dollars or more.
(b) Theft of rental, leased, ((or)) lease-purchased, or loaned
property is a class C felony if the rental, leased, ((or)) lease-purchased, or loaned property is valued at two hundred fifty dollars or
more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars.
(c) Theft of rental, leased, ((or)) lease-purchased, or loaned
property is a gross misdemeanor if the rental, leased, ((or)) lease-purchased, or loaned property is valued at less than two hundred fifty
dollars.
(6) This section applies to rental agreements that provide that the
renter may return the property any time within the rental period and
pay only for the time the renter actually retained the property, in
addition to any minimum rental fee, to lease agreements, ((and)) to
lease-purchase agreements as defined under RCW 63.19.010, and to
vehicles loaned to prospective purchasers borrowing a vehicle by
written agreement from a motor vehicle dealer licensed under chapter
46.70 RCW. This section does not apply to rental or leasing of real
property under the residential landlord-tenant act, chapter 59.18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person who makes or mends, or causes to be made or mended,
or have in his or her possession any implement listed in subsection (2)
of this section, that is adapted, designed, or commonly used for the
commission of burglary or motor vehicle related theft, under
circumstances evincing an intent to use or employ, or allow the same to
be used or employed, in the commission of a burglary or motor vehicle
related theft, or knowing that the same is intended to be so used, is
guilty of making or having burglar tools or motor vehicle theft tools.
(2) The following tools are considered prohibited implements: Slim
jim, false master key, master purpose key, altered or shaved key, trial
or jiggler keys, slide hammer, lock puller, picklock, bit, nippers, any
other implement shown by facts and circumstances that is intended to be
used in the commission of a burglary or motor vehicle related theft, or
knowing that the same is intended to be so used. A person who uses the
tools listed in this subsection is guilty of making or having burglar
tools or motor vehicle theft tools.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "False master" or "master key" is any key or other device made
or altered to fit locks or ignitions of multiple vehicles, or vehicles
other than that for which the key was originally manufactured.
(b) "Altered or shaved key" is any key so altered, by cutting,
filing, or other means, to fit multiple vehicles or vehicles other than
the vehicles for which the key was originally manufactured.
(c) "Trial keys" or "jiggler keys" are keys or sets designed or
altered to manipulate a vehicle locking mechanism other than the lock
for which the key was originally manufactured.
(4) It shall be prima facie evidence of circumstances evincing an
intent to use for commission of a burglary or motor vehicle related
theft for a person to be in possession of multiple vehicle keys or
altered vehicle keys unless such person is a bona fide locksmith or an
employee of a motor vehicle dealer licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW or
other position for which the possession of such keys is required in the
performance of their duties.
(5) Making or having burglar or motor vehicle theft tools is a
gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) The Washington auto theft prevention
authority is established. The authority shall consist of the following
members:
(a) The chief of the Washington state patrol, or the chief's
designee;
(b) Two police chiefs to be selected by the Washington association
of sheriffs and police chiefs;
(c) Two sheriffs to be selected by the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs;
(d) One prosecuting attorney to be selected by the Washington
association of prosecuting attorneys;
(e) A representative from the insurance industry who is responsible
for writing property and casualty liability insurance in the state of
Washington, selected by the governor;
(f) A representative from the automobile dealer industry or the
industry representing automobile repair facilities, selected by the
governor; and
(g) One member of the general public, appointed by the governor.
(2) In addition, the authority may, where feasible, consult with
other governmental entities or individuals from the public and private
sector in carrying out its duties under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) The Washington auto theft prevention
authority shall initially convene at the call of the chief of the
Washington state patrol, or the chief's designee, no later than the
third Monday in January 2008. Subsequent meetings of the authority
shall be at the call of the chair or seven members.
(2) The authority shall annually elect a chairperson and other such
officers as it deems appropriate from its membership.
(3) Members of the authority shall serve terms of four years each
on a staggered schedule to be established by the first authority. For
purposes of initiating a staggered schedule of terms, some members of
the first authority may initially serve two years and some members may
initially serve four years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) The Washington auto theft prevention
authority may obtain or contract for staff services, including an
executive director, and any facilities and equipment as the authority
requires to carry out its duties.
(2) The director may enter into contracts with any public or
private organization to carry out the purposes of this section and
sections 14, 15, and 17 through 21 of this act.
(3) The authority shall review and make recommendations to the
legislature and the governor regarding motor vehicle theft in
Washington state. In preparing the recommendations, the authority
shall, at a minimum, review the following issues:
(a) Determine the scope of the problem of motor vehicle theft,
including particular areas of the state where the problem is the
greatest;
(b) Analyze the various methods of combating the problem of motor
vehicle theft;
(c) Develop and implement a plan of operation; and
(d) Develop and implement a financial plan.
(4) The authority shall annually report its activities, findings,
and recommendations during the preceding year to the legislature by
December 31st.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The Washington auto theft prevention
authority may solicit and accept gifts, grants, bequests, devises, or
other funds from public and private sources to support its activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The governor may remove any member of the
Washington auto theft prevention authority for cause including but not
limited to neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance or misfeasance in
office, or upon written request of two-thirds of the members of the
authority under this chapter. Upon the death, resignation, or removal
of a member, the governor shall appoint a replacement to fill the
remainder of the unexpired term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Members of the Washington auto theft
prevention authority who are not public employees shall be compensated
in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the authority in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Any member serving in their official
capacity on the Washington auto theft prevention authority, or either
their employer or employers, or other entity that selected the members
to serve, are immune from a civil action based upon an act performed in
good faith.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 (1) The Washington auto theft prevention
authority account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All receipts from gifts, grants, bequests, devises, or other funds from
public and private sources to support its activities must be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
purposes of this act. Only the director of the authority or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2) The authority shall allocate moneys in the account to public
agencies for the purpose of establishing, maintaining, and supporting
programs that are designed to prevent motor vehicle theft, including:
(a) Financial support to prosecution agencies to increase the
effectiveness of motor vehicle theft prosecution;
(b) Financial support to a unit of local government or a team
consisting of units of local governments to increase the effectiveness
of motor vehicle theft enforcement;
(c) Financial support for the procurement of equipment and
technologies for use by law enforcement agencies for the purpose of
enforcing motor vehicle theft laws; and
(d) Financial support for programs that are designed to educate and
assist the public in the prevention of motor vehicle theft.
(3) The costs of administration shall not exceed ten percent of the
moneys in the account in any one year so that the greatest possible
portion of the moneys available to the authority is expended on
combating motor vehicle theft.
(4) Prior to awarding any moneys from the Washington auto theft
prevention authority account for motor vehicle theft enforcement or
prosecution efforts, the auto theft prevention authority must verify
that the financial award includes sufficient funding to cover proposed
activities, which include, but are not limited to: (a) Administration
costs; (b) law enforcement costs; (c) prosecutor costs; (d) court
costs; and (e) county offender confinement costs.
(5) Moneys expended from the Washington auto theft prevention
authority account shall be used to supplement, not supplant, other
moneys that are available for motor vehicle theft prevention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 48.22 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2007, a surcharge of fifty cents every six months
per insured automobile shall be charged by each insurer to each person
purchasing automobile insurance, which will be in addition to any other
charge authorized by law. The insurance commissioner may retain up to
two percent of the funds collected to administer collection. The
remaining funds shall be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer who
will deposit the funds into the Washington auto theft prevention
authority account created in section 21 of this act. The funds will be
used to carry out the Washington auto theft prevention authority
program duties and functions as set forth in section 14 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 This act shall be known as the Elizabeth
Nowak Washington auto theft prevention act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Sections 14 through 21 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 46 RCW.

--- END ---