BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to honor those who
lost their lives in service-connected activities while engaged in
military service in combat zones. The legislature further intends to
assist the families of such veterans by providing an endowed
scholarship for postsecondary education to the veterans' surviving
children and spouses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(2) "Cost of attendance" means the cost associated with obtaining
a postsecondary education as determined by the board, which may
include, but is not limited to, tuition, room, board, and books, as
appropriate for each student.
(3) "Deceased military veteran" means a veteran or national guard
member who:
(a) Was a Washington state resident at the time he or she was
deployed to a combat zone and died as a result of that deployment; or
(b) Served on a military base in Washington state at the time he or
she was deployed to a combat zone and died as a result of that
deployment.
(4) "Eligible scholarship recipient" means a person who:
(a) Is a child of a deceased military veteran and who:
(i) Is between the ages of sixteen and twenty-six;
(ii) Was a resident of Washington state at the time of his or her
parent's deployment to a combat zone or death resulting from that
deployment;
(iii) Has graduated from high school or has successfully completed
his or her GED; and
(iv) Makes satisfactory progress towards the completion of a degree
or certificate program and maintains at least a 2.00 grade point
average; or
(b) Is a surviving spouse of a deceased military veteran and who:
(i) Was a Washington resident at the time of the spouse's
deployment to a combat zone or death resulting from that deployment;
(ii) Applies for the scholarship within ten years of the date of
the death of the veteran;
(iii) Has graduated from high school or has successfully completed
his or her GED; and
(iv) Makes satisfactory progress towards the completion of a degree
or certificate program and maintains at least a 2.00 grade point
average.
(5) "Postsecondary education" means:
(a) A degree program at a public or private college or university
in the state of Washington;
(b) A certificate program at a public or private college or
university or at a private vocational school licensed by the work force
training and education coordinating board;
(c) An apprenticeship approved by the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The survivors' endowed scholarship program
is created. The purpose of the program is to help the surviving
children and spouse of a deceased military veteran obtain a
postsecondary education in the state of Washington. The survivors'
endowed scholarship program shall be administered by the board. In
administering the program, the board's powers and duties shall include,
but not be limited to:
(1) Selecting students to receive scholarships, with the assistance
of a screening committee composed of persons involved in helping
survivors' students to obtain a higher education. The membership of
the committee may include, but is not limited to:
(a) One representative of the governor's office;
(b) Two representatives of institutions of higher education,
appointed by the governor;
(c) Two surviving spouses of deceased military veterans, appointed
by the governor; and
(d) One representative each, from the Washington national guard,
the Washington air national guard, and the Washington state guard,
appointed by the governor;
(2) Adopting necessary rules and guidelines;
(3) Administering the survivors' endowed scholarship trust fund and
the survivors' scholarship endowment fund;
(4) Publicizing the program;
(5) Accepting and depositing donations into the endowment fund
created in section 7 of this act;
(6) Requesting and accepting from the state investment board moneys
earned from the trust fund and the endowment fund created in sections
6 and 7 of this act; and
(7) Soliciting and accepting grants and donations from public and
private sources for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The higher education coordinating board
shall establish an advisory committee to assist in program design and
to develop criteria for the screening and selection of scholarship
recipients. The committee shall be composed of representatives of the
same groups as the screening committee described in section 3 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The board may award scholarships to
eligible scholarship recipients from the survivors' scholarship
endowment fund in section 7 of this act, from funds appropriated to the
board for this purpose, from any private donations, or from any other
funds given to the board for the program.
(2) The board may award scholarships to eligible scholarship
recipients from moneys earned from the survivors' scholarship endowment
fund created in section 7 of this act, or from funds appropriated to
the board for this purpose, or from any private donations, or from any
other funds given to the board for this program. The amount of the
scholarship shall not exceed the student's demonstrated financial need.
In calculating a student's need, the board shall consider the costs for
tuition, fees, books, supplies, transportation, room, board, personal
expenses, and child care. The scholarship awarded under this chapter
shall not exceed the amount received by a student attending a state
research university. A student is eligible to receive a scholarship
for a maximum of four years. However, the length of the scholarship
shall be determined at the discretion of the board.
(3) Grants under this chapter shall not affect eligibility for the
state student financial aid program.
(4) The board may adopt rules to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The survivors' endowed scholarship trust
fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
(2) Funds appropriated by the legislature for the survivors'
endowed scholarship trust fund shall be deposited in the survivors'
endowed scholarship trust fund. When conditions in section 8 of this
act are met, the board shall deposit state matching moneys from the
trust fund into the survivors' scholarship endowment fund.
(3) No appropriation is required for expenditures from the trust
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The survivors' scholarship endowment fund is
created in the custody of the state treasurer.
(1) Moneys received from the board, private donations, state
matching moneys, and funds received from any other source may be
deposited into the survivors' scholarship endowment fund. Private
moneys received as a gift subject to conditions may be deposited into
the endowment fund if the conditions do not violate state or federal
law.
(2) The state investment board has the full power to invest,
reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investment moneys in the
survivors' scholarship endowment fund. All investment and operating
costs associated with the investment of money shall be paid pursuant to
RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the exception of these expenses,
the earnings from the investment of the money shall be retained by the
fund. All investments made by the state investment board shall be made
with the exercise of that degree of judgment and care pursuant to RCW
43.33A.140 and the investment policies established by the state
investment board. As deemed appropriate by the state investment board,
moneys in the fund may be commingled for investment with other funds
subject to investment by the state investment board.
(3) The board may disburse grants to eligible scholarship
recipients from the survivors' scholarship endowment fund. No
appropriation is required for expenditures from the endowment fund.
(4) When notified by court order that a condition attached to a
gift of private moneys from the survivors' scholarship endowment fund
has failed, the board shall release those moneys to the donors
according to the terms of the conditional gift.
(5) The principal of the survivors' scholarship endowment fund
shall not be invaded. For the purposes of this section, only the first
twenty-five thousand dollars deposited into the survivors' scholarship
endowment fund shall be considered the principal. The release of
moneys under subsection (4) of this section shall not constitute an
invasion of the corpus.
(6) The survivors' scholarship endowment fund shall be used solely
for the purposes in this chapter, except when the conditional gift of
private moneys in the endowment fund require a portion of the earnings
on such moneys be reinvested in the endowment fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The board may deposit twenty-five
thousand dollars of state matching funds into the survivors'
scholarship endowment fund when the board can match state funds with an
equal amount of private cash donations.
(2) After the initial match of twenty-five thousand dollars, state
matching funds from the survivors' endowed scholarship trust fund shall
be released to the survivors' scholarship endowment fund semiannually
so long as there are funds available in the survivors' endowed
scholarship trust fund.

Sec. 9 RCW 28B.76.540 and 2004 c 275 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to administrative responsibilities assigned in this
chapter, the board shall administer the programs set forth in the
following statutes: RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 (Washington
scholars); chapter 28B.85 RCW (degree-granting institutions); chapter
28B.92 RCW (state need grant); chapter 28B.12 RCW (work study); RCW
28B.15.543 (tuition waivers for Washington scholars); RCW 28B.15.760
through 28B.15.766 (math and science loans); RCW 28B.15.100
(reciprocity agreement); RCW 28B.15.730 through 28B.15.736 (Oregon
reciprocity); RCW 28B.15.750 through 28B.15.754 (Idaho reciprocity);
RCW 28B.15.756 and 28B.15.758 (British Columbia reciprocity); chapter
28B.101 RCW (educational opportunity grant); chapter 28B.102 RCW
(future teachers conditional scholarship); chapter 28B.108 RCW
(American Indian endowed scholarship); chapter 28B.109 RCW (Washington
international exchange scholarship); chapter 28B.115 RCW (health
professional conditional scholarship); chapter 28B.119 RCW (Washington
promise scholarship); ((and)) chapter 28B.133 RCW (gaining independence
for students with dependents); and chapter 28B.-- RCW (sections 1
through 8 of this act) (survivors' endowed scholarship).

Sec. 10 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2006 c 311 s 21 and 2006 c 120 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers
conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the
grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the survivors'
scholarship endowment fund, the children's trust fund, the Washington
horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the
Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, the
individual development account program account, the Washington horse
racing commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse
racing commission operating account must be credited to the Washington
horse racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, and the reading achievement account. However, the
earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to
the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---