BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any homeowner may file an action in tort against the builder,
general contractor, subcontractor, material supplier, individual
product manufacturer, or design professional to recover damages arising
out of, or related to deficiencies in, the construction, design,
specifications, surveying, planning, supervision, or testing of the
homeowner's residence. This act applies to original construction
intended to be sold as an individual dwelling unit as well as
remodeling construction on an existing residence. This act does not
apply to condominium conversions.
(2) Each of the persons listed in subsection (1) of this section
against whom the homeowner may file an action shall be liable for, and
the homeowner's claims or causes of action shall be limited to
violation of, the following standards, except as specifically set forth
in this act:
(a) With respect to water issues:
(i) Unintended water shall not pass beyond, around, or through a
door or its designed or actual moisture barriers, if any.
(ii) Water shall not pass beyond, around, or through windows, patio
doors, deck doors, and their systems or their designed or actual
moisture barriers, including, without limitation, internal barriers
within the systems themselves. For purposes of this subsection
(2)(a)(ii), "systems" includes, without limitation, windows, window
assemblies, framing, substrate, flashings, and trim, if any.
(iii) Excessive condensation shall not pass through windows, patio
doors, deck doors, and their systems to enter the structure and cause
damage to another component. For purposes of this subsection
(2)(a)(iii), "systems" includes, without limitation, windows, window
assemblies, framing, substrate, flashings, and trim, if any.
(iv) Roofs, roofing systems, chimney caps, and ventilation
components shall not allow water to enter the structure or to pass
beyond, around, or through the designed or actual moisture barriers,
including, without limitation, internal barriers located within the
systems themselves. For purposes of this subsection (2)(a)(iv),
"systems" includes, without limitation, framing, substrate, and
sheathing, if any.
(v) Water shall not pass into the adjacent structure through decks,
deck systems, balconies, balcony systems, exterior stairs, and stair
systems. For purposes of this subsection (2)(a)(v), "systems"
includes, without limitation, framing, substrate, flashing, and
sheathing, if any.
(vi) Decks, deck systems, balconies, balcony systems, exterior
stairs, and stair systems shall not allow unintended water to pass
within the systems themselves and cause damage to the systems. For
purposes of this subsection (2)(a)(vi), "systems" includes, without
limitation, framing, substrate, flashing, and sheathing, if any.
(vii) Water or vapor shall not enter into the structure so as to
cause damage to another building component through the foundation
systems and slabs.
(viii) Foundation systems and slabs shall not allow water or vapor
to enter into the structure so as to limit the installation of the type
of flooring materials typically used for the particular application.
(ix) Hardscape, including paths and patios, irrigation systems,
landscaping systems, and drainage systems, that are installed as part
of the original construction, shall not be installed in such a way as
to cause water or soil erosion to enter into or come in contact with
the structure so as to cause damage to another building component.
(x) Stucco, exterior siding, exterior walls, including, without
limitation, exterior framing, and other exterior wall finishes and
fixtures and the systems of those components and fixtures, including,
but not limited to, pot shelves, horizontal surfaces, columns, and
plant-ons, shall be installed in such a way so as not to allow
unintended water to pass into the structure or to pass beyond, around,
or through the designed or actual moisture barriers of the system,
including any internal barriers located within the system itself. For
purposes of this subsection (2)(a)(x), "systems" includes, without
limitation, framing, substrate, flashings, trim, wall assemblies, and
internal wall cavities, if any.
(xi) Stucco, exterior siding, and exterior walls shall be
constructed in such a way as to not allow excessive condensation to
enter the structure and cause damage to another component. For
purposes of this subsection (2)(a)(xi), "systems" includes, without
limitation, framing, substrate, flashings, trim, wall assemblies, and
internal wall cavities, if any.
(xii) Retaining walls and site walls and their associated drainage
systems shall be constructed in such a way so as to not allow
unintended water to pass beyond, around, or through their designed or
actual moisture barriers including, without limitation, any internal
barriers, so as to cause damage. This standard does not apply to those
portions of any wall or drainage system that are designed to have water
flow beyond, around, or through them.
(xiii) Retaining walls and site walls, and their associated
drainage systems, shall only allow water to flow beyond, around, or
through the areas designated by design.
(xiv) The lines and components of the plumbing system, sewer
system, and utility systems shall not leak.
(xv) Plumbing lines, sewer lines, and utility lines shall not
corrode so as to impede the useful life of the systems.
(xvi) Sewer systems shall be installed in such a way as to allow
the designated amount of sewage to flow through the system.
(xvii) Shower and bath enclosures shall not leak water into the
interior of walls, flooring systems, or the interior of other
components.
(xviii) Ceramic tile and tile countertops shall not allow water
into the interior of walls, flooring systems, or other components so as
to cause damage.
(b) With respect to structural issues:
(i) Foundations, load-bearing components, and slabs, shall not
contain significant cracks or significant vertical displacement.
(ii) Foundations, load-bearing components, and slabs shall not
cause the structure, in whole or in part, to be structurally unsafe.
(iii) Foundations, load-bearing components, and slabs, and
underlying soils shall be constructed so as to materially comply with
the design criteria set by applicable government building codes,
regulations, and ordinances for chemical deterioration or corrosion
resistance in effect at the time of original construction.
(iv) A structure shall be constructed so as to materially comply
with the design criteria for earthquake and wind load resistance, as
set forth in the applicable government building codes, regulations, and
ordinances in effect at the time of original construction.
(c) With respect to soil issues:
(i) Soils and engineered retaining walls shall not cause, in whole
or in part, damage to the structure built upon the soil or engineered
retaining wall.
(ii) Soils and engineered retaining walls shall not cause, in whole
or in part, the structure to be structurally unsafe.
(iii) Soils shall not cause, in whole or in part, the land upon
which no structure is built to become unusable for the purpose
represented at the time of original sale by the builder or for the
purpose for which that land is commonly used.
(d) With respect to fire protection issues:
(i) A structure shall be constructed so as to materially comply
with the design criteria of the applicable government building codes,
regulations, and ordinances for fire protection of the occupants in
effect at the time of the original construction.
(ii) Fireplaces, chimneys, chimney structures, and chimney
termination caps shall be constructed and installed in such a way so as
not to cause an unreasonable risk of fire outside the fireplace
enclosure or chimney.
(iii) Electrical and mechanical systems shall be constructed and
installed in such a way so as not to cause an unreasonable risk of
fire.
(e) With respect to plumbing and sewer issues: Plumbing and sewer
systems shall be installed to operate properly and shall not materially
impair the use of the structure by its inhabitants.
(f) With respect to electrical system issues: Electrical systems
shall operate properly and shall not materially impair the use of the
structure by its inhabitants.
(g) With respect to issues regarding other areas of construction:
(i) Exterior pathways, driveways, hardscape, sidewalls, sidewalks,
and patios installed by the original builder shall not contain cracks
that display significant vertical displacement or that are excessive by
industry standards.
(ii) Stucco, exterior siding, and other exterior wall finishes and
fixtures, including, but not limited to, pot shelves, horizontal
surfaces, columns, and plant-ons, shall not contain significant cracks
or separations.
(iii)(A) To the extent not otherwise covered by the standards
listed in this subsection (2)(g), manufactured products, including, but
not limited to, windows, doors, roofs, plumbing products and fixtures,
fireplaces, electrical fixtures, HVAC units, countertops, cabinets,
paint, and appliances shall be installed so as not to interfere with
the products' useful life, if any.
(B) For purposes of (g)(iii)(A) of this subsection, "useful life"
means a representation of how long a product is warranted or
represented, through its limited warranty or any written
representations, to last by its manufacturer, including recommended or
required maintenance. If there is no representation by a manufacturer,
a builder shall install manufactured products so as not to interfere
with the product's utility.
(C) For purposes of (g)(iii)(B) of this subsection, "manufactured
product" means a product that is completely manufactured off-site.
(D) If no useful life representation is made, or if the
representation is less than one year, the period shall be no less than
one year. If a manufactured product is damaged as a result of a
violation of these standards, damage to the product is a recoverable
element of damages. This subsection (2)(g)(iii)(D) does not limit
recovery if there has been damage to another building component caused
by a manufactured product during the manufactured product's useful
life.
(E) This act does not apply in any action seeking recovery solely
for a defect in a manufactured product located within or adjacent to a
structure.
(3) Heating, if any, shall be installed so as to be capable of
maintaining a room temperature of seventy degrees Fahrenheit at a point
three feet above the floor in all living spaces.
(4) Attached structures shall be constructed to comply with
interunit noise transmission standards set by the applicable government
building codes, ordinances, or regulations in effect at the time of the
original construction. If there is no applicable code, ordinance, or
regulation, this subsection does not apply.
(5) Irrigation systems and drainage shall operate properly so as
not to damage landscaping or other external improvements.
(6) Untreated wood posts shall not be installed in contact with
soil so as to cause unreasonable decay to the wood based upon the
finish grade at the time of original construction.
(7) Untreated steel fences and adjacent components shall be
installed so as to prevent unreasonable corrosion.
(8) Paint and stains shall be applied in such a manner so as not to
cause deterioration of the building surfaces for the length of time
specified by the paint or stain manufacturers' representations, if any.
(9) Roofing materials shall be installed so as to avoid materials
falling from the roof.
(10) The landscaping systems shall be installed in such a manner so
as to survive for not less than one year.
(11) Ceramic tile and tile backing shall be installed in such a
manner that the tile does not detach when subject to normal wear and
tear.
(12) Dryer ducts shall be installed and terminated pursuant to
manufacturer installation requirements.
(13) Structures shall be constructed in such a manner so as not to
impair the occupants' safety because they contain public health hazards
as determined by a duly authorized public health official, health
agency, or governmental entity having jurisdiction. This subsection
does not limit recovery for any damages caused by a violation of any
other subsection of this section on the grounds that the damages do not
constitute a health hazard.
(14) The standards set forth in this act are intended to address
every function or component of a structure. To the extent that a
function or component of a structure is not addressed by these
standards, it shall be actionable if it causes damage.
(15) Notwithstanding the standards listed in this act, the
violation of any applicable government building code by any of the
persons listed in subsection (1) of this section shall establish a
prima facie case of negligence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Privity of contract is not necessary to maintain an action for
damages under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
No action for damages under this act shall be maintained unless it
is commenced within four years of the date the claimant discovered, or
with reasonable diligence should have discovered, that a standard
listed in section 1 of this act was not followed.

--- END ---