BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Appliances, fixtures, and items of equipment" means furnaces,
boilers, oil tanks and fittings, air purifiers, air handling equipment,
ventilating fans, ceiling fans, air conditioning equipment, water
heaters, pumps, stoves, ranges, ovens, refrigerators, garbage
disposals, compactors, dishwashers, automatic door openers, washers and
dryers, bathtubs, sinks, toilets, faucets and fittings, lighting
fixtures, lighting control and energy management systems, security
systems, circuit breakers, and other similar items.
(2) "Builder" means any person, corporation, general contractor, or
other legal entity that:
(a) Is engaged in the business of erecting or otherwise
constructing a new home; or
(b) Purchases a completed new home for resale in the course of its
business.
(3) "Electrical systems" means all wiring, electrical boxes,
switches, outlets, and connections to the public utility system.
(4) "Heating, cooling, and ventilating systems" means all duct
work, gas, steam, water and refrigerant lines, registers, convectors,
solar panels, radiation elements, and dampers.
(5) "Load-bearing portions of the home" means the load-bearing
portions of the:
(a) Foundation system and footings;
(b) Beams;
(c) Girders;
(d) Lintels;
(e) Columns;
(f) Walls and partitions;
(g) Floor systems; and
(h) Roof framing systems.
(6)(a) "New home" means:
(i) Every newly constructed private dwelling unit in the state and
the appliances, fixtures, and items of equipment and structure that are
made a part of a newly constructed private dwelling unit at the time of
construction; and
(ii) A condominium, as defined in RCW 64.34.020, used for
residential purposes, as defined in RCW 64.34.020.
(b) "New home" does not include:
(i) A residential timeshare as defined in RCW 64.36.010;
(ii) A manufactured home or mobile home as defined in RCW
65.20.020;
(iii) Outbuildings, including detached garages and carports, except
outbuildings that contain plumbing, electrical, heating, cooling, or
ventilation systems serving the new home, and then only to the extent
that defects to the outbuildings could affect these systems;
(iv) Driveways;
(v) Walkways;
(vi) Boundary walls;
(vii) Retaining walls not necessary for the structural stability of
the new home;
(viii) Landscaping;
(ix) Sprinkler or irrigation systems;
(x) Fences;
(xi) Off-site improvements;
(xii) Appurtenant recreational facilities; and
(xiii) Other similar items as determined by the director of the
department of labor and industries by rule.
(7) "New home warranty" means the warranty created in section 2 of
this act.
(8) "Owner" means the purchaser of a new home.
(9) "Plumbing systems" means:
(a) Gas supply lines and fittings;
(b) Water supply, waste, and vent pipes and their fittings;
(c) Septic tanks and their drain fields; and
(d) Water, gas, and sewer service piping and their extensions to
the tie-in of a public utility connection, or on-site wells and sewage
disposal systems.
(10)(a) "Structural defect" means any defect in the load-bearing
portions of a new home that adversely affects its load-bearing function
to the extent that the home becomes or is in serious danger of becoming
unsafe, unsanitary, or otherwise not reasonably safely inhabitable.
(b) "Structural defect" also includes damage due to subsidence,
expansion, or lateral movement of soil that has been disturbed or
relocated by the builder.
(c) "Structural defect" does not include damage caused by movement
of the soil:
(i) Resulting from a flood or earthquake; or
(ii) For which compensation has been provided.
(11) "Warranty date" means the first day on which the owner
occupies the new home, closes on the new home, makes the final contract
payment on the new home, or obtains an occupancy permit for the new
home if the home is built on the owner's property, whichever is
earlier.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) Except as excluded under (b) of this
subsection, every contract for the construction or sale of a new home
includes, as a matter of law, a warranty from the residential builder
that shall warrant at a minimum that:
(i) For two years, beginning on the warranty date, the new home is
free from any defects in materials and workmanship;
(ii) For three years, beginning on the warranty date, the new home
is free from any defects in the electrical, plumbing, heating, cooling,
and ventilating systems, except that in the case of appliances,
fixtures, and items of equipment, the warranty need not exceed the
length and scope of the warranty offered by the manufacturer, and the
warranty of merchantability, fitness, and all other implied warranties
with respect to appliances, fixtures, and items of equipment shall be
governed by the Washington uniform commercial code;
(iii) For five years, beginning on the warranty date, the new home
is free from any defects resulting from water penetration; and
(iv) For ten years, beginning on the warranty date, the new home is
free from any structural defects.
(b) The new home warranty excludes the following:
(i) Damage to real property that is not part of the home covered by
the warranty or that is not included in the purchase price of the home;
(ii) Bodily injury or damage to personal property;
(iii) Any defect in materials supplied or work performed by anyone
other than the builder or the builder's employees, agents, or
subcontractors;
(iv) Any damage that the owner has not taken timely action to
minimize;
(v) Normal wear and tear or normal deterioration;
(vi) Insect damage, except where the builder has failed to use
proper materials or construction methods designed to prevent insect
infestation;
(vii) Any loss or damage that arises while the home is being used
primarily for nonresidential purposes;
(viii) Any damage to the extent it is caused or made worse by
negligence, improper maintenance, or improper operations by anyone
other than the builder or its employees, agents, or subcontractors;
(ix) Any damage to the extent it is caused or made worse by changes
of the grading of the ground by anyone other than the builder, its
employees, agents, or subcontractors; and
(x) Any loss or damage caused by acts of God.
(2) The warranty created by this section runs from the builder to
the owner. This warranty entitles the owner to recover from the
builder all costs associated with repairing the defect, together with
the cost of repair of damage proximately caused by the defect,
including the cost of repairing driveways, sidewalks, lawns,
landscaping, or similar associated facilities and fixtures necessarily
damaged as a result of the required repairs. The liability of a
builder under the new home warranty shall be limited to the purchase
price of the home in the first good faith sale or the fair market value
of the home on its completion date if there is no good faith sale.
Absence of privity of contract between the owner and the builder is not
a defense to the enforcement of this warranty.
(3) If the defect is the result of work performed by a
subcontractor, the builder has a right of contribution from that
subcontractor for amounts paid to the owner as a result of the new home
warranty.
(4) No action to enforce the new home warranty created by this
section may be commenced after four years has passed from the time the
defect is discovered, or, with reasonable diligence, should have been
discovered. Providing written notice and a reasonable description of
a defect to the builder has the effect of tolling the limitation
periods established by this subsection and subsection (5) of this
section. Tolling continues until the builder completes the repair to
the owner's satisfaction, or the builder gives the owner written notice
that the builder refuses to make the repair or has completed as much of
the repair as the builder intends to complete.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, no action
to enforce the new home warranty created by this section may be filed
later than the time periods described in subsection (1)(a) of this
section.
(6) The new home warranty is a cumulative remedy, and shall not
have the effect of diminishing or replacing any other remedy or
warranty created by law or equity or agreement between the parties.
The new home warranty is in addition to the warranties created under
chapter 64.34 RCW.
(7) The new home warranty does not expire on the subsequent sale of
a new home by the owner to a subsequent purchaser, but continues to
protect later purchasers until the warranties provided in subsection
(1)(a) of this section expire.
(8) A general disclaimer of the new home warranty is not effective
except that a purchaser of real property consisting of, or improved by,
more than four dwelling units may make a written disclaimer of the new
home warranty. A builder and any owner or any successor in title to
the owner may disclaim liability in a written instrument signed by the
purchaser for a specified defect, if the defect entered into and became
a part of the basis of the bargain.

Sec. 3 RCW 4.16.300 and 2004 c 257 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
RCW 4.16.300 through 4.16.320 shall apply to all claims or causes
of action of any kind against any person, arising from such person
having constructed, altered or repaired any improvement upon real
property, or having performed or furnished any design, planning,
surveying, architectural or construction or engineering services, or
supervision or observation of construction, or administration of
construction contracts for any construction, alteration or repair of
any improvement upon real property. This section is specifically
intended to benefit persons having performed work for which the persons
must be registered or licensed under RCW 18.08.310, 18.27.020,
18.43.040, 18.96.020, or 19.28.041, and shall not apply to claims or
causes of action against persons not required to be so registered or
licensed. This section does not apply to a new home warranty under
chapter 64.-- RCW (sections 1 and 2 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 64 RCW.

--- END ---