BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the unique
sacrifices made by veterans and their family members. The legislature
recognizes further that while all veterans are entitled to interment at
the Tahoma national cemetery, veterans and families living in eastern
Washington desire a veterans' cemetery location closer to their homes.
The legislature requested and received the department of veterans
affairs feasibility study and business plan outlining the need and
feasibility and now intends to establish a state veterans' cemetery to
honor veterans in their final resting place.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and maintain in this state an
eastern Washington state veterans' cemetery.
(2) All honorably discharged veterans, as defined by RCW 41.04.007,
and their spouses are eligible for interment in the eastern Washington
state veterans' cemetery.
(3) The department shall collect all federal veterans' burial
benefits and other available state or county resources.
(4) The department shall adopt rules defining the services
available, eligibility, fees, and the general operations associated
with the eastern Washington state veterans' cemetery.

--- END ---