BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 1" to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2007, and ending September 30, 2007, an
eligible member of plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system may make
a one-time irrevocable election, filed in writing with the department,
to leave any service credit earned as a member of plan 1 of the
teachers' retirement system in that system and join plan 1 of the
public employees' retirement system. An eligible member who makes such
an election may, upon satisfying the requirements of chapter 41.54 RCW,
become a dual member of the two systems in order to combine service in
each system for the purpose of determining benefit eligibility.
(2) For the purpose of this section, an "eligible member" means a
member of plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system who, at the time of
election, has at least ten and not more than twenty years of service
credit in that system and who is employed by the public school
employees of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---