BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to make
technical changes throughout chapters 41.08, 41.12, 41.16, and 41.18
RCW with regard to gender-specific terminology. The legislature finds
that gender-neutral terms must be used in accordance with RCW
44.04.210. This act is technical in nature and no substantive legal
changes are intended or implied.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.08.020 and 1935 c 31 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
If any of the cities or towns referred to in RCW 41.08.010 shall at
any time repeal the charter provisions or other local acts of said
cities or towns providing for civil service for ((firemen))
firefighters as referred to in RCW 41.08.010, in that event this
chapter shall apply to all of such cities and towns which have at any
time abolished civil service for members of the fire department.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.08.030 and 1935 c 31 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created in every city, town or municipality except
those referred to in RCW 41.08.010, having a full paid fire department
a civil service commission which shall be composed of three persons.
The members of such commission shall be appointed by the person or
group of persons who, acting singly or in conjunction, as a mayor, city
manager, council, common council, commission, or otherwise, is or are
vested by law with power and authority to select, appoint, or employ
the chief of a fire department in any such city, prior to the enactment
of this chapter. The members of such commission shall serve without
compensation. No person shall be appointed a member of such commission
who is not a citizen of the United States, a resident of such city for
at least three years immediately preceding such appointment, and an
elector of the county wherein he or she resides. The term of office of
such commissioners shall be for six years, except that the first three
members of such commission shall be appointed for different terms, as
follows: One to serve for a period of two years, one to serve for a
period of four years, and one to serve for a period of six years. Any
member of such commission may be removed from office for incompetency,
incompatibility or dereliction of duty, or malfeasance in office, or
other good cause: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no member of the commission
shall be removed until charges have been preferred, in writing, due
notice and a full hearing had. The members of such commission shall
devote due time and attention to the performance of the duties
hereinafter specified and imposed upon them by this chapter. Two
members of such commission shall constitute a quorum and the votes of
any two members of such commission concurring shall be sufficient for
the decision of all matters and the transaction of all business to be
decided or transacted by the commission under or by virtue of the
provisions of this chapter. Confirmation of said appointment or
appointments of commissioners by any legislative body shall not be
required. At the time of any appointment not more than two
commissioners shall be adherents of the same political party.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.08.075 and 1972 ex.s. c 37 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
No city, town, or municipality shall require any person applying
for or holding an office, place, position, or employment under the
provisions of this chapter or under any local charter or other
regulations described in RCW 41.08.010 to reside within the limits of
such municipal corporation as a condition of employment, or to
discriminate in any manner against any such person because of his or
her residence outside of the limits of such city, town, or
municipality.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.08.080 and 1935 c 31 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The tenure of every one holding an office, place, position or
employment under the provisions of this chapter shall be only during
good behavior, and any such person may be removed or discharged,
suspended without pay, demoted, or reduced in rank, or deprived of
vacation privileges or other special privileges for any of the
following reasons:
(1) Incompetency, inefficiency or inattention to or dereliction of
duty;
(2) Dishonesty, intemperance, immoral conduct, insubordination,
discourteous treatment of the public, or a fellow employee, or any
other act of omission or commission tending to injure the public
service; or any other willful failure on the part of the employee to
properly conduct himself or herself; or any willful violation of the
provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulations to be adopted
hereunder;
(3) Mental or physical unfitness for the position which the
employee holds;
(4) Dishonest, disgraceful, immoral or prejudicial conduct;
(5) Drunkenness or use of intoxicating liquors, narcotics, or any
other habit forming drug, liquid or preparation to such extent that the
use thereof interferes with the efficiency or mental or physical
fitness of the employee, or which precludes the employee from properly
performing the functions and duties of any position under civil
service;
(6) Conviction of a felony, or a misdemeanor, involving moral
turpitude;
(7) Any other act or failure to act which in the judgment of the
civil service commissioners is sufficient to show the offender to be an
unsuitable and unfit person to be employed in the public service.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.08.090 and 1935 c 31 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person in the classified civil service who shall have been
permanently appointed or inducted into civil service under provisions
of this chapter, shall be removed, suspended, demoted or discharged
except for cause, and only upon the written accusation of the
appointing power, or any citizen or taxpayer, a written statement of
which accusation, in general terms, shall be served upon the accused,
and a duplicate filed with the commission. Any person so removed,
suspended, demoted or discharged may within ten days from the time of
his or her removal, suspension, demotion or discharge, file with the
commission a written demand for an investigation, whereupon the
commission shall conduct such investigation. The investigation shall
be confined to the determination of the question of whether such
removal, suspension, demotion or discharge was or was not made for
political or religious reasons and was or was not made in good faith
(([f]or)) for cause. After such investigation the commission may
affirm the removal, or if it shall find that the removal, suspension,
or demotion was made for political or religious reasons, or was not
made in good faith for cause, shall order the immediate reinstatement
or reemployment of such person in the office, place, position or
employment from which such person was removed, suspended, demoted or
discharged, which reinstatement shall, if the commission so provides in
its discretion, be retroactive, and entitle such person to pay or
compensation from the time of such removal, suspension, demotion or
discharge. The commission upon such investigation, in lieu of
affirming the removal, suspension, demotion or discharge may modify the
order of removal, suspension, demotion or discharge by directing a
suspension, without pay, for a given period, and subsequent restoration
to duty, or demotion in classification, grade, or pay; the findings of
the commission shall be certified, in writing to the appointing power,
and shall be forthwith enforced by such officer.
All investigations made by the commission pursuant to the
provisions of this section shall be by public hearing, after reasonable
notice to the accused of the time and place of such hearing, at which
hearing the accused shall be afforded an opportunity of appearing in
person and by counsel, and presenting his or her defense. If such
judgment or order be concurred in by the commission or a majority
thereof, the accused may appeal therefrom to the court of original and
unlimited jurisdiction in civil suits of the county wherein he or she
resides. Such appeal shall be taken by serving the commission, within
thirty days after the entry of such judgment or order, a written notice
of appeal, stating the grounds thereof, and demanding that a certified
transcript of the record and of all papers on file in the office of the
commission affecting or relating to such judgment or order, be filed by
the commission with such court. The commission shall, within ten days
after the filing of such notice, make, certify and file such transcript
with such court. The court of original and unlimited jurisdiction in
civil suits shall thereupon proceed to hear and determine such appeal
in a summary manner: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That such hearing shall be
confined to the determination of whether the judgment or order of
removal, discharge, demotion or suspension made by the commission, was
or was not made in good faith for cause, and no appeal to such court
shall be taken except upon such ground or grounds.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.08.100 and 1935 c 31 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever a position in the classified service becomes vacant, the
appointing power, if it desires to fill the vacancy, shall make
requisition upon the commission for the name and address of a person
eligible for appointment thereto. The commission shall certify the
name of the person highest on the eligible list for the class to which
the vacant position has been allocated, who is willing to accept
employment. If there is no appropriate eligible list for the class,
the commission shall certify the name of the person standing highest on
said list held appropriate for such class. If more than one vacancy is
to be filled an additional name shall be certified for each additional
vacancy. The appointing power shall forthwith appoint such person to
such vacant position.
Whenever requisition is to be made, or whenever a position is held
by a temporary appointee and an eligible list for the class of such
position exists, the commission shall forthwith certify the name of the
person eligible for appointment to the appointing power, and said
appointing power shall forthwith appoint the person so certified to
said position. No person so certified shall be laid off, suspended, or
given leave of absence from duty, transferred or reduced in pay or
grade, except for reasons which will promote the good of the service,
specified in writing, and after an opportunity to be heard by the
commission and then only with its consent and approval.
To enable the appointing power to exercise a choice in the filling
of positions, no appointment, employment or promotion in any position
in the classified service shall be deemed complete until after the
expiration of a period of three to six months' probationary service, as
may be provided in the rules of the civil service commission during
which the appointing power may terminate the employment of the person
certified to him or her, or it, if during the performance test thus
afforded, upon observation or consideration of the performance of duty,
the appointing power deems him or her unfit or unsatisfactory for
service in the department. Whereupon the appointing power shall
designate the person certified as standing next highest on any such
list and such person shall likewise enter upon said duties until some
person is found who is deemed fit for appointment, employment or
promotion for the probationary period provided therefor, whereupon the
appointment, employment or promotion shall be deemed to be complete.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.08.150 and 1935 c 31 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
No commissioner or any other person((,)) shall, by himself or
herself, or in cooperation with one or more persons, defeat, deceive,
or obstruct any person in respect of his or her right of examination or
registration according to the rules and regulations of this chapter, or
falsely mark, grade, estimate or report upon the examination or proper
standing of any person examined, registered or certified pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter, or aid in so doing, or make any false
representation concerning the same, or concerning the person examined,
or furnish any person any special or secret information for the purpose
of improving or injuring the prospects or chances of any person so
examined, registered or certified, or to be examined, registered or
certified or persuade any other person, or permit or aid in any manner
any other person to personate him or her, in connection with any
examination or registration or application or request to be examined or
registered.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.08.220 and 1935 c 31 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following mentioned terms shall have
the following described meanings:
The term "commission" means the civil service commission herein
created, and the term "commissioner" means any one of the three
commissioners of that commission.
The term "appointing power" includes every person or group of
persons who, acting singly or in conjunction, as a mayor, city manager,
council, common council, commission, or otherwise, is or are, vested by
law with power and authority to select, appoint, or employ any person
to hold any office, place, position or employment subject to civil
service.
The term "appointment" includes all means of selection, appointing
or employing any person to hold any office, place, position or
employment subject to civil service.
The term "city" includes all cities, towns and municipalities
having a full paid fire department.
The term "full paid fire department" means that the officers and
((firemen)) firefighters employed in such are paid regularly by the
city and devote their whole time to firefighting.

Sec. 10 RCW 41.12.020 and 1937 c 13 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
If any of the cities or towns referred to in RCW 41.12.010 shall at
any time repeal the charter provisions or other local acts of said
cities or towns providing for civil service for ((policemen)) police
officers as referred to in RCW 41.12.010, in that event this chapter
shall apply to all of such cities and towns which have at any time
abolished civil service for members of the police department.

Sec. 11 RCW 41.12.030 and 1937 c 13 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created in every city, town or municipality except
those referred to in RCW 41.12.010, having fully paid ((policemen))
police officers a civil service commission which shall be composed of
three persons.
The members of such commission shall be appointed by the person or
group of persons who, acting singly or in conjunction, as a mayor, city
manager, council, common council, commission, or otherwise, is or are
vested by law with the power and authority to select, appoint, or
employ the chief of a police department in any such city, prior to the
enactment of this chapter. The members of such commission shall serve
without compensation. No person shall be appointed a member of such
commission who is not a citizen of the United States, a resident of
such city for at least three years immediately preceding such
appointment, and an elector of the county wherein he or she resides.
The term of office of such commissioners shall be for six years, except
that the first three members of such commission shall be appointed for
different terms, as follows: One to serve for a period of two years,
one to serve for a period of four years, and one to serve for a period
of six years. Any member of such commission may be removed from office
for incompetency, incompatibility or dereliction of duty, or
malfeasance in office, or other good cause: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no
member of the commission shall be removed until charges have been
preferred, in writing, due notice and a full hearing had. The members
of such commission shall devote due time and attention to the
performance of the duties hereinafter specified and imposed upon them
by this chapter. Two members of such commission shall constitute a
quorum and the votes of any two members of such commission concurring
shall be sufficient for the decision of all matters and the transaction
of all business to be decided or transacted by the commission under or
by virtue of the provisions of this chapter. Confirmation of said
appointment or appointments of commissioners by any legislative body
shall not be required. At the time of any appointment not more than
two commissioners shall be adherents of the same political party.

Sec. 12 RCW 41.12.075 and 1972 ex.s. c 37 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
No city, town, or municipality shall require any person applying
for or holding an office, place, position, or employment under the
provisions of this chapter or under any local charter or other
regulations described in RCW 41.12.010 to reside within the limits of
such municipal corporation as a condition of employment or to
discriminate in any manner against any such person because of his or
her residence outside of the limits of such city, town, or
municipality.

Sec. 13 RCW 41.12.080 and 1937 c 13 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The tenure of everyone holding an office, place, position or
employment under the provisions of this chapter shall be only during
good behavior, and any such person may be removed or discharged,
suspended without pay, demoted, or reduced in rank, or deprived of
vacation privileges or other special privileges for any of the
following reasons:
(1) Incompetency, inefficiency or inattention to or dereliction of
duty;
(2) Dishonesty, intemperance, immoral conduct, insubordination,
discourteous treatment of the public, or a fellow employee, or any
other act of omission or commission tending to injure the public
service; or any other willful failure on the part of the employee to
properly conduct himself or herself; or any willful violation of the
provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulation to be adopted
hereunder;
(3) Mental or physical unfitness for the position which the
employee holds;
(4) Dishonest, disgraceful, immoral or prejudicial conduct;
(5) Drunkenness or use of intoxicating liquors, narcotics, or any
other habit forming drug, liquid or preparation to such extent that the
use thereof interferes with the efficiency or mental or physical
fitness of the employee, or which precludes the employee from properly
performing the function and duties of any position under civil service;
(6) Conviction of a felony, or a misdemeanor, involving moral
turpitude;
(7) Any other act or failure to act which in the judgment of the
civil service commissioners is sufficient to show the offender to be an
unsuitable and unfit person to be employed in the public service.

Sec. 14 RCW 41.12.090 and 1937 c 13 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person in the classified civil service who shall have been
permanently appointed or inducted into civil service under provisions
of this chapter, shall be removed, suspended, demoted or discharged
except for cause, and only upon written accusation of the appointing
power, or any citizen or taxpayer; a written statement of which
accusation, in general terms, shall be served upon the accused, and a
duplicate filed with the commission. Any person so removed, suspended,
demoted or discharged may within ten days from the time of his or her
removal, suspension, demotion or discharge, file with the commission a
written demand for an investigation, whereupon the commission shall
conduct such investigation. The investigation shall be confined to the
determination of the question of whether such removal, suspension,
demotion or discharge was or was not made for political or religious
reasons and was or was not made in good faith (([f]or)) for cause.
After such investigation the commission may affirm the removal, or if
it shall find that the removal, suspension, or demotion was made for
political or religious reasons, or was not made in good faith for
cause, shall order the immediate reinstatement ((of [or])) or
reemployment of such person in the office, place, position or
employment from which such person was removed, suspended, demoted or
discharged, which reinstatement shall, if the commission so provides in
its discretion, be retroactive, and entitle such person to pay or
compensation from the time of such removal, suspension, demotion or
discharge. The commission upon such investigation, (([in])) in lieu of
affirming the removal, suspension, demotion or discharge may modify the
order of removal, suspension, demotion or discharge by directing a
suspension, without pay, for a given period, and subsequent restoration
to duty, or demotion in classification, grade, or pay; the findings of
the commission shall be certified, in writing to the appointing power,
and shall be forthwith enforced by such officer.
All investigations made by the commission pursuant to the
provisions of this section shall be had by public hearing, after
reasonable notice to the accused of the time and place of such hearing,
at which hearing the accused shall be afforded an opportunity of
appearing in person and by counsel, and presenting his or her defense.
If such judgment or order be concurred in by the commission or a
majority thereof, the accused may appeal therefrom to the court of
original and unlimited jurisdiction in civil suits of the county
wherein he or she resides. Such appeal shall be taken by serving the
commission, within thirty days after the entry of such judgment or
order, a written notice of appeal, stating the grounds thereof, and
demanding that a certified transcript of the record and of all papers
on file in the office of the commission affecting or relating to such
judgment or order, be filed by the commission with such court. The
commission shall, within ten days after the filing of such notice,
make, certify and file such transcript with such court. The court of
original and unlimited jurisdiction in civil suits shall thereupon
proceed to hear and determine such appeal in a summary manner:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That such hearing shall be confined to the
determination of whether the judgment or order of removal, discharge,
demotion or suspension made by the commission, was or was not made in
good faith for cause, and no appeal to such court shall be taken except
upon such ground or grounds.

Sec. 15 RCW 41.12.100 and 1937 c 13 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever a position in the classified service becomes vacant, the
appointing power, if it desires to fill the vacancy, shall make
requisition upon the commission for the name and address of a person
eligible for appointment thereto. The commission shall certify the
name of the person highest on the eligible list for the class to which
the vacant position has been allocated, who is willing to accept
employment. If there is no appropriate eligible list for the class,
the commission shall certify the name of the person standing highest on
said list held appropriate for such class. If more than one vacancy is
to be filled an additional name shall be certified for each additional
vacancy. The appointing power shall forthwith appoint such person to
such vacant position.
Whenever requisition is to be made, or whenever a position is held
by a temporary appointee and an eligible list for the class of such
position exists, the commission shall forthwith certify the name of the
person eligible for appointment to the appointing power, and said
appointing power shall forthwith appoint the person so certified to
said position. No person so certified shall be laid off, suspended, or
given leave of absence from duty, transferred or reduced in pay or
grade, except for reasons which will promote the good of the service,
specified in writing, and after an opportunity to be heard by the
commission and then only with its consent and approval.
To enable the appointing power to exercise a choice in the filling
of positions, no appointment, employment or promotion in any position
in the classified service shall be deemed complete until after the
expiration of a period of three to six months' probationary service, as
may be provided in the rules of the civil service commission during
which the appointing power may terminate the employment of the person
certified to him or her, or it, if during the performance test thus
afforded, upon observation or consideration of the performance of duty,
the appointing power deems him or her unfit or unsatisfactory for
service in the department, whereupon the appointing power shall
designate the person certified as standing next highest on any such
list and such person shall likewise enter upon said duties until some
person is found who is deemed fit for appointment, employment or
promotion for the probationary period provided therefor, whereupon the
appointment, employment or promotion shall be deemed to be complete.

Sec. 16 RCW 41.12.150 and 1937 c 13 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
No commissioner or any other person((,)) shall, by himself or
herself, or in cooperation with one or more persons, defeat, deceive,
or obstruct any person in respect of his or her right of examination or
registration according to the rules and regulations of this chapter, or
falsely mark, grade, estimate or report upon the examination or proper
standing of any person examined, registered or certified pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter, or aid in so doing, or make any false
representation concerning the same, or concerning the person examined,
or furnish any person any special or secret information for the purpose
of improving or injuring the prospects or chances of any person so
examined, registered or certified, or to be examined, registered or
certified or persuade any other person, or permit or aid in any manner
any other person to personate him or her, in connection with any
examination or registration of application or request to be examined or
registered.

Sec. 17 RCW 41.12.220 and 1937 c 13 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following mentioned terms shall have
the following described meanings:
The term "commission" means the civil service commission herein
created, and the term "commissioner" means any one of the three
commissioners of that commission.
The term "appointing power" includes every person or group of
persons who, acting singly or in conjunction, as a mayor, city manager,
council, common council, commission, or otherwise, is or are, invested
by law with power and authority to select, appoint, or employ any
person to hold any office, place, position or employment subject to
civil service.
The term "appointment" includes all means of selection, appointing
or employing any person to hold any office, place, position or
employment subject to civil service.
The term "city" includes all cities, towns and municipalities
having a full paid police department.
The term "full paid police department" means that the officers and
((policemen)) police officers employed in such are paid regularly by
the city and devote their whole time to police duty: PROVIDED, "full
paid police department" whenever used in this chapter shall also mean
"full paid ((policemen".)) police officers."

Sec. 18 RCW 41.16.010 and 2003 c 30 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of this chapter, unless clearly indicated by the
context, words and phrases shall have the following meaning:
(1) "Beneficiary" shall mean any person or persons designated by a
((fireman)) firefighter in a writing filed with the board, and who
shall be entitled to receive any benefits of a deceased ((fireman))
firefighter under this chapter.
(2) "Board" shall mean the municipal ((firemen's)) firefighters'
pension board.
(3) "Child or children" shall mean a child or children unmarried
and under eighteen years of age.
(4) "Contributions" shall mean and include all sums deducted from
the salary of ((firemen)) firefighters and paid into the fund as
hereinafter provided.
(5) "Disability" shall mean and include injuries or sickness
sustained as a result of the performance of duty.
(6) (("Fireman" or)) "Firefighter" shall mean any person regularly
or temporarily, or as a substitute, employed and paid as a member of a
fire department, who has passed a civil service examination for
((fireman)) firefighter and who is actively employed as a ((fireman))
firefighter; and shall include any "prior ((fireman)) firefighter."
(7) "Fire department" shall mean the regularly organized, full
time, paid, and employed force of ((firemen)) firefighters of the
municipality.
(8) "Fund" shall mean the ((firemen's)) firefighters' pension fund
created herein.
(9) "Municipality" shall mean every city and town having a
regularly organized full time, paid, fire department employing
((firemen)) firefighters.
(10) "Performance of duty" shall mean the performance of work and
labor regularly required of ((firemen)) firefighters and shall include
services of an emergency nature rendered while off regular duty, but
shall not include time spent in traveling to work before answering roll
call or traveling from work after dismissal at roll call.
(11) "Prior ((fireman)) firefighter" shall mean a ((fireman))
firefighter who was actively employed as a ((fireman)) firefighter of
a fire department prior to the first day of January, 1947, and who
continues such employment thereafter.
(12) "Retired ((fireman)) firefighter" shall mean and include a
person employed as a ((fireman)) firefighter and retired under the
provisions of chapter 50, Laws of 1909, as amended.
(13) "Widow or widower" means the surviving wife or husband of a
retired ((fireman)) firefighter who was retired on account of length of
service and who was lawfully married to such ((fireman)) firefighter;
and whenever that term is used with reference to the wife or former
wife or husband or former husband of a retired ((fireman)) firefighter
who was retired because of disability, it shall mean his or her
lawfully married wife or husband on the date he or she sustained the
injury or contracted the illness that resulted in his or her
disability. Said term shall not mean or include a surviving wife or
husband who by process of law within one year prior to the retired
((fireman's)) firefighter's death, collected or attempted to collect
from him or her funds for the support of herself or himself or for his
or her children.

Sec. 19 RCW 41.16.020 and 2003 c 30 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created in each city and town a municipal
((firemen's)) firefighters' pension board to consist of the following
five members, ex officio, the mayor, or in a city of the first class,
the mayor or a designated representative who shall be an elected
official of the city, who shall be ((chairman)) chairperson of the
board, the city comptroller or clerk, the ((chairman)) chairperson of
finance of the city council, or if there is no ((chairman)) chairperson
of finance, the city treasurer, and in addition, two regularly employed
or retired firefighters elected by secret ballot of those employed and
retired firefighters who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board.
The members to be elected by the firefighters shall be elected annually
for a two year term. The two firefighters elected as members shall, in
turn, select a third eligible member who shall serve as an alternate in
the event of an absence of one of the regularly elected members. In
case a vacancy occurs in the membership of the firefighters or retired
members, the members shall in the same manner elect a successor to
serve the unexpired term. The board may select and appoint a secretary
who may, but need not be a member of the board. In case of absence or
inability of the ((chairman)) chairperson to act, the board may select
a ((chairman)) chairperson pro tempore who shall during such absence or
inability perform the duties and exercise the powers of the
((chairman)) chairperson. A majority of the members of the board shall
constitute a quorum and have power to transact business.

Sec. 20 RCW 41.16.030 and 2002 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall meet at least once quarterly, the date to be fixed
by regulation of the board, at such other regular times as may be fixed
by a regulation of the board; and at any time upon call of the
((chairman)) chairperson, of which due advance notice shall be given
the other members of the board.

Sec. 21 RCW 41.16.040 and 1992 c 89 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall have such general powers as are vested in it by the
provisions of this chapter, and in addition thereto, the power to:
(1) Generally supervise and control the administration of this
chapter and the ((firemen's)) firefighters' pension fund created
hereby.
(2) Pass upon and allow or disallow all applications for pensions
or other benefits provided by this chapter.
(3) Provide for payment from said fund of necessary expenses of
maintenance and administration of said pension system and fund.
(4) Invest the moneys of the fund in a manner consistent with the
investment policies outlined in RCW 35.39.060. Authorized investments
shall include investment grade securities issued by the United States,
state, municipal corporations, other public bodies, corporate bonds,
and other investments authorized by RCW 35.39.030, 35.58.510,
35.81.070, 35.82.070, 36.29.020, 39.58.020, 39.58.080, 39.58.130,
39.60.010, 39.60.020, 68.52.060, 68.52.065, and 72.19.120.
(5) Employ such agents, employees and other personnel as the board
may deem necessary for the proper administration of this chapter.
(6) Compel witnesses to appear and testify before it, in the same
manner as is or may be provided by law for the taking of depositions in
the superior court. Any member of the board may administer oaths to
witnesses who testify before the board of a nature and in a similar
manner to oaths administered by superior courts of the state of
Washington.
(7) Issue vouchers approved by the ((chairman)) chairperson and
secretary and to cause warrants therefor to be issued and paid from
said fund for the payment of claims allowed by it.
(8) Keep a record of all its proceedings, which record shall be
public; and prepare and file with the city treasurer and city clerk or
comptroller prior to the date when any payments are to be made from the
fund, a list of all persons entitled to payment from the fund, stating
the amount and purpose of such payment, said list to be certified to
and signed by the ((chairman)) chairperson and secretary of the board
and attested under oath.
(9) Make rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter
for the purpose of carrying out and effecting the same.
(10) Appoint one or more duly licensed and practicing physicians
who shall examine and report to the board upon all applications for
relief and pension under this chapter. Such physicians shall visit and
examine all sick firefighters and ((disabled firemen)) firefighters who
are disabled when, in their judgment, the best interests of the relief
and pension fund require it or when ordered by the board. They shall
perform all operations on such sick and injured ((firemen))
firefighters and render all medical aid and care necessary for the
recovery of such ((firemen)) firefighters on account of sickness or
disability received while in the performance of duty as defined in this
chapter. Such physicians shall be paid from said fund, the amount of
said fees or salary to be set and agreed upon by the board and the
physicians. No physician not regularly appointed or specially
appointed and employed, as hereinafter provided, shall receive or be
entitled to any fees or compensation from said fund as attending
physician to a sick or injured ((fireman)) firefighter. If any sick or
injured ((fireman)) firefighter refuses the services of the appointed
physicians, or the specially appointed and employed physician, he or
she shall be personally liable for the fees of any other physician
employed by him or her. No person shall have a right of action against
the board or the municipality for negligence of any physician employed
by it. The board shall have the power and authority to select and
employ, besides the regularly appointed physician, such other
physician, surgeon or specialist for consultation with, or assistance
to the regularly appointed physician, or for the purpose of performing
operations or rendering services and treatment in particular cases, as
it shall deem advisable, and to pay fees for such services from said
fund. Said board shall hear and decide all applications for such
relief or pensions under this chapter, and its decisions on such
applications shall be final and conclusive and not subject to revision
or reversal except by the board.

Sec. 22 RCW 41.16.050 and 1999 c 117 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created and established in the treasury of each
municipality a fund which shall be known and designated as the
((firemen's)) firefighters' pension fund, which shall consist of: (1)
All bequests, fees, gifts, emoluments, or donations given or paid
thereto; (2) twenty-five percent of all moneys received by the state
from taxes on fire insurance premiums; (3) taxes paid pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 41.16.060; (4) interest on the investments of the
fund; and (5) contributions by firefighters as provided for herein.
The moneys received from the tax on fire insurance premiums under the
provisions of this chapter shall be distributed in the proportion that
the number of paid firefighters in the city, town, or fire protection
district bears to the total number of paid firefighters throughout the
state to be ascertained in the following manner: The secretary of the
((firemen's)) firefighters' pension board of each city, town, and fire
protection district now or hereafter coming under the provisions of
this chapter shall within thirty days after June 7, 1961, and on or
before the fifteenth day of January thereafter, certify to the state
treasurer the number of paid firefighters in the fire department in
such city, town, or fire protection district. For any city or town
annexed by a fire protection district at any time before, on, or after
June 9, 1994, the city or town shall continue to certify to the state
treasurer the number of paid firefighters in the city or town fire
department immediately before annexation until all obligations against
the ((firemen's)) firefighters' pension fund in the city or town have
been satisfied. For the purposes of the calculation in this section,
the state treasurer shall subtract the number certified by the annexed
city or town from the number of paid firefighters certified by an
annexing fire protection district. The state treasurer shall on or
before the first day of June of each year deliver to the treasurer of
each city, town, and fire protection district coming under the
provisions of this chapter his or her warrant, payable to each city,
town, or fire protection district for the amount due such city, town or
fire protection district ascertained as herein provided and the
treasurer of each such city, town, or fire protection district shall
place the amount thereof to the credit of the ((firemen's))
firefighters' pension fund of such city, town, or fire protection
district.

Sec. 23 RCW 41.16.070 and 1947 c 91 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every ((fireman)) firefighter employed on and after January 1,
1947, shall contribute to the fund and there shall be deducted from his
or her pay and placed in the fund an amount in accordance with the
following table:

((Fireman))
Firefighter whose

age at last birthday Contributions and

at time of entry deductions from

of service was: salary

21 and under . . . . . . . . . . . . 5.00%

22 . . . . . . . . . . . . 5.24%

23 . . . . . . . . . . . . 5.50%

24 . . . . . . . . . . . . 5.77%

25 . . . . . . . . . . . . 6.07%

26 . . . . . . . . . . . . 6.38%

27 . . . . . . . . . . . . 6.72%

28 . . . . . . . . . . . . 7.09%

29 . . . . . . . . . . . . 7.49%

30 and over . . . . . . . . . . . . 7.92%

(2) Every ((fireman)) firefighter employed prior to January 1,
1947, and continuing active employment shall contribute to the fund and
there shall be deducted from his or her salary and placed in the fund,
five percent of his or her salary.
(3) Every ((fireman)) firefighter actively employed and eligible
for retirement and not retired shall contribute to the fund and there
shall be deducted from his or her salary and placed in the fund, four
percent of his or her salary.

Sec. 24 RCW 41.16.080 and 1959 c 5 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any ((fireman)) firefighter employed in a fire department on and
before the first day of January, 1947, hereinafter in this section and
RCW 41.16.090 to 41.16.190 inclusive, referred to as (("fireman",))
"firefighter," and who shall have served twenty-five or more years and
having attained the age of fifty-five years, as a member of the fire
department, shall be eligible for retirement and shall be retired by
the board upon his or her written request. Upon his or her retirement
any ((fireman)) firefighter shall be paid a pension based upon the
average monthly salary drawn for the five calendar years before
retirement, the number of years of his or her service and a percentage
factor based upon his or her age on entering service, as follows:

Entrance age at Salary

last birthday percentage factor

20 and under . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.50%

21 . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.55%

22 . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.60%

23 . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.65%

24 . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.70%

25 . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.75%

26 . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.80%

27 . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.85%

28 . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.90%

29 . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.95%

30 and over . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.00%

Said monthly pension shall be in the amount of his or her average
monthly salary for the five calendar years before retirement, times the
number of years of service, times the applicable percentage factor.

Sec. 25 RCW 41.16.100 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 62 are each
amended to read as follows:
The widow or widower, child, children or beneficiary of any
((fireman)) firefighter retired under this chapter shall receive an
amount equal to his or her accumulated contributions to the fund, plus
earned interest thereon compounded semiannually: PROVIDED, That there
shall be deducted from said sum the amount paid to decedent in pensions
and the remainder shall be paid to his or her widow or widower, child,
children or beneficiary: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the amount paid shall
not be less than one thousand dollars.

Sec. 26 RCW 41.16.110 and 1959 c 5 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever any ((fireman)) firefighter shall die while eligible to
retirement on account of years of service, and shall not have been
retired, benefits shall be paid in accordance with RCW 41.16.100.

Sec. 27 RCW 41.16.120 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 63 are each
amended to read as follows:
Whenever any active ((fireman)) firefighter or ((fireman))
firefighter retired for disability shall die as the result of an
accident or other fortuitous event occurring while in the performance
of his or her duty, his widow or her widower may elect to accept a
monthly pension equal to one-half the deceased ((fireman's))
firefighter's salary but in no case in excess of one hundred fifty
dollars per month, or the sum of five thousand dollars cash. The right
of election must be exercised within sixty days of the ((fireman's))
firefighter's death. If not so exercised, the pension benefits shall
become fixed and shall be paid from the date of death. Such pension
shall cease if, and when, he or she remarries. If there is no widow or
widower, then such pension benefits shall be paid to his or her child
or children.

Sec. 28 RCW 41.16.130 and 1959 c 5 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any ((fireman)) firefighter who shall become disabled as a
result of the performance of his or her duty or duties as defined in
this chapter, may be retired at the expiration of six months from the
date of his or her disability, upon his or her written request filed
with his or her retirement board. The board may upon such request
being filed, consult such medical advice as it sees fit, and may have
the applicant examined by such physicians as it deems desirable. If
from the reports of such physicians the board finds the applicant
capable of performing his or her duties in the fire department, the
board may refuse to recommend his or her retirement.
(2) If the board deems it for the good of the fire department or
the pension fund, it may recommend the applicant's retirement without
any request therefor by him or her, after giving him or her a thirty
days' notice. Upon his or her retirement he or she shall be paid a
monthly disability pension in amount equal to one-half of his or her
monthly salary at date of retirement, but which shall not exceed one
hundred fifty dollars a month. If he or she recovers from his or her
disability he or she shall thereupon be restored to active service,
with the same rank he or she held when he or she retired.
(3) If the ((fireman)) firefighter dies during disability and not
as a result thereof, RCW 41.16.160 shall apply.

Sec. 29 RCW 41.16.140 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 64 are each
amended to read as follows:
Any ((fireman)) firefighter who has served more than fifteen years
and sustains a disability not in the performance of his or her duty
which renders him or her unable to continue his or her service, shall
within sixty days exercise his or her choice either to receive his or
her contribution to the fund, plus earned interest compounded
semiannually, or be retired and paid a monthly pension based on the
factor of his or her age shown in RCW 41.16.080, times his or her
average monthly salary as a member of the fire department of his or her
municipality at the date of his or her retirement, times the number of
years of service rendered at the time he or she sustained such
disability. If such ((fireman)) firefighter shall die leaving
surviving him a wife or surviving her a husband, or child or children,
then such wife or husband, or if he leaves no wife or she leaves no
husband, then his or her child or children shall receive the sum of his
or her contributions, plus accumulated compound interest, and such
payment shall be reduced in the amount of the payments made to
deceased.

Sec. 30 RCW 41.16.145 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 44 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
The amount of all benefits payable under the provisions of RCW
41.16.080, 41.16.120, 41.16.130, 41.16.140 and 41.16.230 ((as now or
hereafter amended,)) shall be increased annually as hereafter in this
section provided. The local pension board shall meet subsequent to
March 31st but prior to June 30th of each year for the purposes of
adjusting benefit allowances payable pursuant to the aforementioned
sections. The local board shall determine the increase in the consumer
price index between January 1st and December 31st of the previous year
and increase in dollar amount the benefits payable subsequent to July
1st of the year in which said board makes such determination by a
dollar amount proportionate to the increase in the consumer price
index: PROVIDED, That regardless of the change in the consumer price
index, such increase shall be at least two percent each year such
adjustment is made.
Each year effective with the July payment all benefits specified
herein, shall be increased by this section. This benefit increase
shall be paid monthly as part of the regular pension payment and shall
be cumulative. The increased benefits authorized by this section shall
not affect any benefit payable under the provisions of chapter 41.16
RCW in which the benefit payment is attached to a current salary of the
rank held at time of retirement. A beneficiary of benefit increases
provided for pursuant to this section is hereby authorized to appeal a
decision on such increases or the failure of the local pension board to
order such increased benefits or the amount of such benefits to the
Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system
retirement board provided for in RCW 41.26.050.
For the purpose of this section the term
"Consumer price index" shall mean, for any calendar year, the
consumer price index for the Seattle, Washington area as compiled by
the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of
labor.

Sec. 31 RCW 41.16.150 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 65 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any ((fireman)) firefighter who has served twenty years or more
and who shall resign or be dismissed, shall have the option of
receiving all his or her contributions plus earned interest compounded
semiannually, or a monthly pension in the amount of his or her average
monthly salary times the number of years of service rendered, times one
and one-half percent. Payment of such pension shall commence at the
time of severance from the fire department, or at the age of fifty-five
years, whichever shall be later. The ((fireman)) firefighter shall
have sixty days from the severance date to elect which option he or she
will take. In the event he or she fails to exercise his or her right
of election then he or she shall receive the amount of his or her
contributions plus accrued compounded interest. In the event he or she
elects such pension, but dies before attaining the age of fifty-five,
his widow or her widower, or if he leaves no widow or she leaves no
widower, then his or her child or children shall receive only his or
her contribution, plus accrued compounded interest. In the event he or
she elects to take a pension and dies after attaining the age of fifty-five, his widow or her widower, or if he leaves no widow or she leaves
no widower, then child or children shall receive his or her
contributions, plus accrued compounded interest, less the amount of
pension payments made to such ((fireman)) firefighter during his or her
lifetime.
(2) Any ((fireman)) firefighter who shall have served for a period
of less than twenty years, and shall resign or be dismissed, shall be
paid the amount of his or her contributions, plus accrued compounded
interest.

Sec. 32 RCW 41.16.160 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 66 are each
amended to read as follows:
Whenever any ((fireman)) firefighter, after four years of service,
shall die from natural causes, or from an injury not sustained in the
performance of his or her duty and for which no pension is provided in
this chapter, and who has not been retired on account of disability,
his widow or her widower, if he or she was his wife or her husband at
the time he or she was stricken with his or her last illness, or at the
time he or she received the injuries from which he or she died; or if
there is no such widow, then his or her child or children shall be
entitled to the amount of his or her contributions, plus accrued
compounded interest, or the sum of one thousand dollars, whichever sum
shall be the greater. In case of death as above stated, before the end
of four years of service, an amount based on the proportion of the time
of service to four years shall paid such beneficiaries.

Sec. 33 RCW 41.16.170 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 67 are each
amended to read as follows:
Whenever a ((fireman)) firefighter dies leaving no widow or widower
or children, the amount of his or her accumulated contributions, plus
accrued compounded interest only, shall be paid his or her beneficiary.

Sec. 34 RCW 41.16.180 and 1959 c 5 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the death of any active firefighter, ((disabled)) firefighter
who is disabled, or retired ((fireman)) firefighter, the board shall
pay from the fund the sum of two hundred dollars to assist in defraying
the funeral expenses of such ((fireman)) firefighter.

Sec. 35 RCW 41.16.190 and 1959 c 5 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
No ((fireman)) firefighter disabled in the performance of duty
shall receive a pension until six months has elapsed after such
disability was sustained. Therefore, whenever the retirement board,
pursuant to examination by the board's physician and such other
evidence as it may require, shall find a ((fireman)) firefighter has
been disabled while in the performance of his or her duties, it shall
declare him or her inactive. For a period of six months from the time
he or she became disabled, he or she shall continue to draw full pay
from his or her municipality and in addition thereto he or she shall,
at the expense of the municipality, be provided with such medical,
hospital and nursing care as the retirement board deems proper. If the
board finds at the expiration of six months that the ((fireman))
firefighter is unable to return to and perform his or her duties, then
he or she shall be retired as herein provided.

Sec. 36 RCW 41.16.200 and 1947 c 91 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall require all ((firemen)) firefighters receiving
disability pensions to be examined every six months. All such
examinations shall be made by physicians duly appointed by the board.
If a ((fireman)) firefighter shall fail to submit to such examination
within ten days of having been so ordered in writing by said retirement
board all pensions or benefits paid to said ((fireman)) firefighter
under this chapter, shall immediately cease and the disbursing officer
in charge of such payments shall issue no further payments to such
((fireman)) firefighter. If such ((fireman)) firefighter fails to
present himself or herself for examination within thirty days after
being ordered so to do, he or she shall forfeit all rights under this
chapter. If such ((fireman)) firefighter, upon examination as
aforesaid, shall be found fit for service, he or she shall be restored
to duty in the same rank held at the time of his or her retirement, or
if unable to perform the duties of said rank, then, at his or her
request, in such other rank, the duties of which he or she is then able
to perform. The board shall thereupon so notify the ((fireman))
firefighter and shall require him or her to resume his or her duties as
a member of the fire department. If, upon being so notified, such
member shall fail to report for employment within ten days, he or she
shall forfeit all rights to any benefits under this chapter.

Sec. 37 RCW 41.16.210 and 1947 c 91 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Funds or assets on hand in the ((firemen's)) firefighters'
relief and pension fund of any municipality established under the
provisions of chapter 50, Laws of 1909, as amended, after payment of
warrants drawn upon and payable therefrom, shall, by the city
treasurer, be transferred to and placed in the ((firemen's))
firefighters' pension fund created by this chapter; and the
((firemen's)) firefighters' pension fund created by this chapter shall
be liable for and there shall be paid therefrom in the order of their
issuance any and all unpaid warrants drawn upon said ((firemen's))
firefighters' relief and pension fund.
(2) Any moneys loaned or advanced by a municipality from the
general or any other fund of such municipality to the ((firemen's))
firefighters' relief and pension fund created under the provisions of
chapter 50, Laws of 1909, as amended, and not repaid shall be an
obligation of the ((firemen's)) firefighters' pension fund created
under this chapter, and shall at such times and in such amounts as is
directed by the board be repaid.

Sec. 38 RCW 41.16.220 and 1969 ex.s. c 269 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any person who was a member of the fire department and within the
provisions of chapter 50, Laws of 1909, as amended, at the time he or
she entered, and who is a veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.005, shall
have added and accredited to his or her period of employment as a
((fireman)) firefighter as computed under this chapter his or her
period of war service in such armed forces upon payment by him or her
of his or her contribution for the period of his or her absence, at the
rate provided by chapter 50, Laws of 1909, as amended, for other
members: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, Such accredited service shall not in any
case exceed five years.

Sec. 39 RCW 41.16.230 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 68 are each
amended to read as follows:
Chapter 50, Laws of 1909; chapter 196, Laws of 1919; chapter 86,
Laws of 1929, and chapter 39, Laws of 1935 (secs. 9559 to 9578, incl.,
Rem. Rev. Stat.; secs. 396-1 to 396-43, incl., PPC) and all other acts
or parts of acts in conflict herewith are hereby repealed: PROVIDED,
That the repeal of said laws shall not affect any (("prior fireman",))
"prior firefighter," his widow, her widower, child or children, any
((fireman)) firefighter eligible for retirement but not retired, his
widow, her widower, child or children, or the rights of any retired
((fireman)) firefighter, his widow, her widower, child or children, to
receive payments and benefits from the ((firemen's)) firefighters'
pension fund created under this chapter, in the amount, and in the
manner provided by said laws which are hereby repealed and as if said
laws had not been repealed.

Sec. 40 RCW 41.16.250 and 1963 c 63 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
If all or any portion of a fire protection district is annexed to
or incorporated into a city or town, or is succeeded by a metropolitan
municipal corporation or county fire department, no full time paid
((fireman)) firefighter affected by such annexation, incorporation or
succession shall receive a reduction in his or her retirement and job
security rights: PROVIDED, That this section shall not apply to any
retirement and job security rights authorized under chapter 41.24 RCW.

Sec. 41 RCW 41.18.010 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 69 are each
amended to read as follows:
For the purpose of this chapter, unless clearly indicated otherwise
by the context, words and phrases shall have the meaning hereinafter
ascribed.
(1) "Beneficiary" shall mean any person or persons designated by a
((fireman)) firefighter in a writing filed with the board, and who
shall be entitled to receive any benefits of a deceased ((fireman))
firefighter under this chapter.
(2) (("Fireman")) "Firefighter" means any person hereafter
regularly or temporarily, or as a substitute newly employed and paid as
a member of a fire department, who has passed a civil service
examination for ((fireman)) firefighters and who is actively employed
as a ((fireman)) firefighter or, if provided by the municipality by
appropriate local legislation, as a fire dispatcher: PROVIDED, Nothing
in this 1969 amendatory act shall impair or permit the impairment of
any vested pension rights of persons who are employed as fire
dispatchers at the time this 1969 amendatory act takes effect; and any
person heretofore regularly or temporarily, or as a substitute,
employed and paid as a member of a fire department, and who has
contributed under and been covered by the provisions of chapter 41.16
RCW as now or hereafter amended and who has come under the provisions
of this chapter in accordance with RCW 41.18.170 and who is actively
engaged as a ((fireman)) firefighter or as a member of the fire
department as a ((fireman)) firefighter or fire dispatcher.
(3) "Retired ((fireman)) firefighter" means and includes a person
employed as a ((fireman)) firefighter and retired under the provisions
of this chapter.
(4) "Basic salary" means the basic monthly salary, including
longevity pay, attached to the rank held by the retired ((fireman))
firefighter at the date of his or her retirement, without regard to
extra compensation which such ((fireman)) firefighter may have received
for special duties assignments not acquired through civil service
examination: PROVIDED, That such basic salary shall not be deemed to
exceed the salary of a battalion chief.
(5) "Widow or widower" means the surviving spouse of a ((fireman))
firefighter and shall include the surviving wife or husband of a
((fireman)) firefighter, retired on account of length of service, who
was lawfully married to him or to her for a period of five years prior
to the time of his or her retirement; and the surviving wife or husband
of a ((fireman)) firefighter, retired on account of disability, who was
lawfully married to him or her at and prior to the time he or she
sustained the injury or contracted the illness resulting in his or her
disability. The word shall not mean the divorced wife or husband of an
active or retired ((fireman)) firefighter.
(6) "Child" or "children" means a ((fireman's)) firefighter's child
or children under the age of eighteen years, unmarried, and in the
legal custody of such ((fireman)) firefighter at the time of his death
or her death.
(7) "Earned interest" means and includes all annual increments to
the ((firemen's)) firefighters' pension fund from income earned by
investment of the fund. The earned interest payable to any ((fireman))
firefighter when he or she leaves the service and accepts his or her
contributions, shall be that portion of the total earned income of the
fund which is directly attributable to each individual ((fireman's))
firefighter's contributions. Earnings of the fund for the preceding
year attributable to individual contributions shall be allocated to
individual ((firemen's)) firefighters' accounts as of January 1st of
each year.
(8) "Board" shall mean the municipal ((firemen's)) firefighters'
pension board.
(9) "Contributions" shall mean and include all sums deducted from
the salary of ((firemen)) firefighters and paid into the fund as
hereinafter provided.
(10) "Disability" shall mean and include injuries or sickness
sustained by a ((fireman)) firefighter.
(11) "Fire department" shall mean the regularly organized, full
time, paid, and employed force of ((firemen)) firefighters of the
municipality.
(12) "Fund" shall have the same meaning as in RCW 41.16.010 as now
or hereafter amended. Such fund shall be created in the manner and be
subject to the provisions specified in chapter 41.16 RCW as now or
hereafter amended.
(13) "Municipality" shall mean every city, town and fire protection
district having a regularly organized full time, paid, fire department
employing ((firemen)) firefighters.
(14) "Performance of duty" shall mean the performance of work or
labor regularly required of ((firemen)) firefighters and shall include
services of an emergency nature normally rendered while off regular
duty.

Sec. 42 RCW 41.18.015 and 1992 c 6 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created in each fire protection district which
qualifies under this chapter, a ((firemen's)) firefighters' pension
board to consist of the following five members, the ((chairman))
chairperson of the fire commissioners for said district who shall be
((chairman)) chairperson of the board, the county auditor, county
treasurer, and in addition, two regularly employed or retired
firefighters elected by secret ballot of the employed and retired
firefighters. Retired members who are subject to the jurisdiction of
the pension board have both the right to elect and the right to be
elected under this section. The first members to be elected by the
firefighters shall be elected annually for a two-year term. The two
firefighter elected members shall, in turn, select a third eligible
member who shall serve in the event of an absence of one of the
regularly elected members. In case a vacancy occurs in the membership
of the firefighter or retired members, the members shall in the same
manner elect a successor to serve the unexpired term. The board may
select and appoint a secretary who may, but need not be a member of the
board. In case of absence or inability of the ((chairman)) chairperson
to act, the board may select a ((chairman)) chairperson pro tempore who
shall during such absence or inability perform the duties and exercise
the powers of the ((chairman)) chairperson. A majority of the members
of said board shall constitute a quorum and have power to transact
business.

Sec. 43 RCW 41.18.020 and 1955 c 382 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board, in addition to such general and special powers as are
vested in it by the provisions of chapter 41.16 RCW, which powers the
board shall have with respect to this chapter shall have power to:
(1) Generally supervise and control the administration of this
chapter;
(2) Pass upon and allow or disallow applications for pensions or
other benefits provided by this chapter;
(3) Provide for payment from the ((firemen's)) firefighters'
pension fund of necessary expenses of maintenance and administration
required by the provisions of this chapter;
(4) Make rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter
for the purpose of carrying out and effecting the same;
(5) Require the physicians appointed under the provisions of
chapter 41.16 RCW, to examine and report to the board upon all
applications for relief and pensions under this chapter; and
(6) Perform such acts, receive such compensation and enjoy such
immunity as provided in RCW 41.16.040.

Sec. 44 RCW 41.18.030 and 1961 c 255 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every ((fireman)) firefighter to whom this chapter applies shall
contribute to the ((firemen's)) firefighters' pension fund a sum equal
to six percent of his or her basic salary which shall be deducted
therefrom and placed in the fund.

Sec. 45 RCW 41.18.040 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 70 are each
amended to read as follows:
Whenever any ((fireman)) firefighter, at the time of taking effect
of this act or thereafter, shall have been appointed under civil
service rules and have served for a period of twenty-five years or more
as a member in any capacity of the regularly constituted fire
department of any city, town or fire protection district which may be
subject to the provisions of this chapter, and shall have attained the
age of fifty years, he or she shall be eligible for retirement and
shall be retired by the board upon his or her written request. Upon
his or her retirement such ((fireman)) firefighter shall be paid a
monthly pension which shall be equal to fifty percent of the basic
salary now or hereafter attached to the same rank and status held by
the said ((fireman)) firefighter at the date of his or her retirement:
PROVIDED, That a ((fireman)) firefighter hereafter retiring who has
served as a member for more than twenty-five years, shall have his or
her pension payable under this section increased by two percent of the
basic salary per year for each full year of such additional service to
a maximum of five additional years.
Upon the death of any such retired ((fireman)) firefighter, his or
her pension shall be paid to his widow or her widower, at the same
monthly rate that the retired ((fireman)) firefighter would have
received had he or she lived, if such widow or widower was his wife or
her husband for a period of five years prior to the time of his or her
retirement. If there be no widow or widower, then such monthly
payments shall be distributed to and divided among his or her children,
share and share alike, until they reach the age of eighteen or are
married, whichever occurs first.

Sec. 46 RCW 41.18.045 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 71 are each
amended to read as follows:
Upon the death of a ((fireman)) firefighter who is eligible to
retire under RCW 41.18.040 as now or hereafter amended, but who has not
retired, a pension shall be paid to his widow or her widower at the
same monthly rate that he or she was eligible to receive at the time of
his or her death, if such widow or widower was his wife or her husband
for a period of five years prior to his or her death. If there be no
widow or widower, then such monthly payments shall be distributed to
and divided among his or her children, share and share alike, until
they reach the age of eighteen or are married, whichever comes first.
This section shall apply retroactively for the benefit of all
widows or widowers and survivors of ((firemen)) firefighters who died
after January 1, 1967, if such ((firemen)) firefighters were otherwise
eligible to retire on the date of death.

Sec. 47 RCW 41.18.050 and 1955 c 382 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every ((fireman)) firefighter who shall become disabled as a result
of the performance of duty may be retired at the expiration of six
months from the date of his or her disability, upon his or her written
request filed with his or her retirement board. The board may, upon
such request being filed, consult such medical advice as it sees fit,
and may have the applicant examined by such physicians as it deems
desirable. If from the reports of such physicians the board finds the
applicant capable of performing his or her duties in the fire
department, the board may refuse to recommend his or her retirement.
If, after the expiration of six months from the date of his or her
disability, the board deems it for the good of the fire department or
the pension fund it may recommend the retirement of a ((fireman))
firefighter disabled as a result of the performance of duty without any
request for the same by him or her, and after having been given by the
board a thirty days' written notice of such recommendation he or she
shall be retired.

Sec. 48 RCW 41.18.060 and 1992 c 22 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever the retirement board, pursuant to examination by the
board's physician and such other evidence as it may require, shall find
a firefighter has been disabled while in the performance of his or her
duties it shall declare the firefighter inactive. For a period of six
months from the time of the disability the firefighter shall draw from
the pension fund a disability allowance equal to his or her basic
monthly salary and, in addition, shall be provided with medical,
hospital and nursing care as long as the disability exists. The board
may, at its discretion, elect to reimburse the ((disabled)) firefighter
who is disabled for premiums the firefighter has paid for medical
insurance that supplements medicare, including premiums the firefighter
has paid for medicare part B coverage. If the board finds at the
expiration of six months that the firefighter is unable to return to
and perform his or her duties, the firefighter shall be retired at a
monthly sum equal to fifty percent of the amount of his or her basic
salary at any time thereafter attached to the rank which he or she held
at the date of retirement: PROVIDED, That where, at the time of
retirement hereafter for disability under this section, the firefighter
has served honorably for a period of more than twenty-five years as a
member, in any capacity of the regularly constituted fire department of
a municipality, the firefighter shall have his or her pension payable
under this section increased by two percent of his or her basic salary
per year for each full year of additional service to a maximum of five
additional years.

Sec. 49 RCW 41.18.080 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 72 are each
amended to read as follows:
Any ((fireman)) firefighter who has completed his or her
probationary period and has been permanently appointed, and sustains a
disability not in the performance of his or her duty which renders him
or her unable to continue his or her service, may request to be retired
by filing a written request with his or her retirement board within
sixty days from the date of his or her disability. The board may, upon
such request being filed, consult such medical advice as it deems fit
and proper. If the board finds the ((fireman)) firefighter capable of
performing his or her duties, it may refuse to recommend retirement and
order the ((fireman)) firefighter back to duty. If no request for
retirement has been received after the expiration of sixty days from
the date of his or her disability, the board may recommend retirement
of the ((fireman)) firefighter. The board shall give the ((fireman))
firefighter a thirty-day written notice of its recommendation, and he
or she shall be retired upon expiration of said notice. Upon
retirement he or she shall receive a pension equal to fifty percent of
his or her basic salary. For a period of ninety days following such
disability the ((fireman)) firefighter shall receive an allowance from
the fund equal to his or her basic salary. He or she shall during said
ninety days be provided with such medical, hospital, and nursing care
as the board deems proper. No funds shall be expended for such
disability if the board determines that the ((fireman)) firefighter was
gainfully employed or engaged for compensation in other than fire
department duty when the disability occurred, or if such disability was
the result of dissipation or abuse. Whenever any ((fireman))
firefighter shall die as a result of a disability sustained not in the
line of duty, his widow or her widower shall receive a monthly pension
equal to one-third of his or her basic salary until remarried; if such
widow or widower has dependent upon her or him for support a child or
children of such deceased ((fireman)) firefighter, he or she shall
receive an additional pension as follows: One child, one-eighth of the
deceased's basic salary; two children, one-seventh; three or more
children, one-sixth. If there be no widow or widower, monthly payments
equal to one-third of the deceased ((fireman's)) firefighter's basic
salary shall be made to his or her child or children. The widow or
widower may elect at any time in writing to receive a cash settlement,
and if the board after hearing finds it financially beneficial to the
pension fund, he or she may receive the sum of five thousand dollars
cash in lieu of all future monthly pension payments, and other
benefits, including benefits to any child and/or children.

Sec. 50 RCW 41.18.090 and 1955 c 382 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board shall require all ((firemen)) firefighters receiving
disability pensions to be examined every six months: PROVIDED, That no
such examinations shall be required if upon certification by physicians
the board shall formally enter upon its records a finding of fact that
the disability is and will continue to be of such a nature that return
to active duty can never reasonably be expected. All examinations
shall be made by physicians duly appointed by the board. If a
((fireman)) firefighter shall willfully fail to present himself or
herself for examination, within thirty days after being ordered so to
do, he or she shall forfeit all rights under this chapter. If such
((fireman)) firefighter, upon examination as aforesaid, shall be found
fit for service, he or she shall be restored to duty in the same rank
held at the time of his or her retirement, or if unable to perform the
duties of said rank then, at his or her request, in such other like or
lesser rank as may be or become open and available, the duties of which
he or she is then able to perform. The board shall thereupon so notify
the ((fireman)) firefighter and shall require him or her to resume his
or her duties as a member of the fire department. If, upon being so
notified, such member shall willfully fail to report for employment
within ten days, he or she shall forfeit all rights to any benefit
under this chapter.

Sec. 51 RCW 41.18.100 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 178 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
In the event a ((fireman)) firefighter is killed in the performance
of duty, or in the event a ((fireman)) firefighter retired on account
of service connected disability shall die from any cause, his widow or
her widower shall receive a monthly pension under one of the following
applicable provisions: (1) If a ((fireman)) firefighter is killed in
the line of duty his widow or her widower shall receive a monthly
pension equal to fifty percent of his or her basic salary at the time
of his or her death; (2) if a ((fireman)) firefighter who has retired
on account of a service connected disability dies, his widow or her
widower shall receive a monthly pension equal to the amount of the
monthly pension such retired ((fireman)) firefighter was receiving at
the time of his or her death. If she or he at any time so elects in
writing and the board after hearing finds it to be financially
beneficial to the pension fund, he or she may receive in lieu of all
future monthly pension and other benefits, including benefits to child
or children, the sum of five thousand dollars in cash. If there be no
widow or widower at the time of such ((fireman's)) firefighter's death
or upon the widow's or widower's death the monthly pension benefits
hereinabove provided for shall be paid to and divided among his or her
child or children share and share alike, until they reach the age of
eighteen or are married, whichever occurs first. The widow's or
widower's monthly pension benefit, including increased benefits to his
or her children shall cease if and when he or she remarries: PROVIDED,
That no pension payable under the provisions of this section shall be
less than that specified under RCW 41.18.200.

Sec. 52 RCW 41.18.102 and 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 32 are each amended
to read as follows:
The provisions of RCW 41.18.040 and 41.18.100 shall be applicable
to all ((firemen)) firefighters employed prior to March 1, 1970, but
shall not apply to any former ((fireman)) firefighter who has
terminated his or her employment prior to July 1, 1969.

Sec. 53 RCW 41.18.130 and 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 31 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any ((fireman)) firefighter who shall have served for a period of
less than twenty-five years, or who shall be less than fifty years of
age, and shall resign, or be dismissed from the fire department for a
reason other than conviction for a felony, shall be paid the amount of
his or her contributions to the fund plus earned interest: PROVIDED,
That in the case of any ((fireman)) firefighter who has completed
twenty years of service, such ((fireman)) firefighter, upon termination
for any cause except for a conviction of a felony, shall have the
option of electing, in lieu of recovery of his or her contributions as
herein provided, to be classified as a vested ((fireman)) firefighter
in accordance with the following provisions:
(1) Written notice of such election shall be filed with the board
within thirty days after the effective date of such ((fireman's))
firefighter's termination;
(2) During the period between the date of his or her termination
and the date upon which he or she becomes a retired ((fireman))
firefighter as hereinafter provided, such vested ((fireman))
firefighter and his or her spouse or dependent children shall be
entitled to all benefits available under chapter 41.18 RCW to a retired
((fireman)) firefighter and his or her spouse or dependent children
with the exception of the service retirement allowance as herein
provided for: PROVIDED, That any claim for medical coverage under RCW
41.18.060 shall be attributable to service connected illness or injury;
(3) Any ((fireman)) firefighter electing to become a vested
((fireman)) firefighter shall be entitled at such time as he or she
otherwise would have completed twenty-five years of service had he or
she not terminated, to receive a service retirement allowance computed
on the following basis: Two percent of the amount of salary attached
to the position held by the vested ((fireman)) firefighter for the year
preceding the date of his or her termination, for each year of service
rendered prior to the date of his or her termination.

Sec. 54 RCW 41.18.140 and 1961 c 255 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall pay from the ((firemen's)) firefighters' pension
fund upon the death of any active or retired ((fireman)) firefighter
the sum of five hundred dollars, to assist in defraying the funeral
expenses of such ((fireman)) firefighter.

Sec. 55 RCW 41.18.150 and 1955 c 382 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every person who was a member of the fire department at the time he
or she entered and served in the armed forces of the United States in
time of war, whether as a draftee, or inductee, and who shall have been
discharged from such armed forces under conditions other than
dishonorable, shall have added and accredited to his or her period of
employment as a ((fireman)) firefighter his or her period of war or
peacetime service in the armed forces: PROVIDED, That such added and
accredited service shall not as to any individual exceed five years.

Sec. 56 RCW 41.18.160 and 1955 c 382 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every ((fireman)) firefighter as defined in this chapter heretofore
employed as a member of a fire department, whether or not as a prior
((fireman)) firefighter as defined in chapter 41.16 RCW, who desires to
make the contributions and avail himself or herself of the pension and
other benefits of said chapter 41.16 RCW, can do so by handing to and
leaving with the ((firemen's)) firefighters' pension board of his or
her municipality a written notice of such intention within sixty days
of the effective date of this chapter, or if he or she was on
disability retirement under chapter 41.16 RCW, at the effective date of
this chapter and has been recalled to active duty by the retirement
board, shall give such notice within sixty days of his or her return to
active duty, and not otherwise.

Sec. 57 RCW 41.18.165 and 1959 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person who was a member of a fire-fighting organization
operated by a private enterprise, which fire-fighting organization
shall be hereafter acquired before September 1, 1959, by a municipality
as its fire department as a matter of public convenience or necessity,
where it is in the public interest to retain the trained personnel of
such fire-fighting organization, shall have added and accredited to his
or her period of employment as a ((fireman)) firefighter his or her
period of service with said private enterprise, except that this shall
apply only to those persons who are in the service of such fire-fighting organization at the time of its acquisition by the
municipality and who remain in the service of that municipality until
this chapter shall become applicable to such persons.
No such person shall have added and accredited to his or her period
of employment as a ((fireman)) firefighter his or her period of service
with said private enterprise unless he, she, or a third party shall pay
to the municipality his or her contribution for the period of such
service with the private enterprise at the rate provided in RCW
41.18.030, or, if he or she shall be entitled to any private pension or
retirement benefits as a result of such service with the private
enterprise, unless he or she agrees at the time of his or her
employment by the municipality to accept a reduction in the payment of
any benefits payable under this chapter that are based in whole or in
part on such added and accredited service by the amount of those
private pension or retirement benefits received. For the purposes of
RCW 41.18.030, the date of entry of service shall be deemed the date of
entry into service with the private enterprise, which service is
accredited by this section, and the amount of contributions for the
period of accredited service shall be based on the wages or salary of
such person during that added and accredited period of service with the
private enterprise.
The city may receive payments for these purposes from a third party
and shall make from such payments contributions with respect to such
prior service as may be necessary to enable the fund to assume its
obligations.

Sec. 58 RCW 41.18.170 and 1955 c 382 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter governing contributions, pensions,
and benefits shall have exclusive application (1) to ((firemen))
firefighters as defined in this chapter hereafter becoming members of
a fire department, (2) to ((firemen)) firefighters as defined in this
chapter heretofore employed in a department who have not otherwise
elected as provided for in RCW 41.18.160, and (3) to ((firemen))
firefighters on disability retirement under chapter 41.16 RCW, at the
effective date of this chapter, who thereafter shall have been returned
to active duty by the retirement board, and who have not otherwise
elected as provided for in RCW 41.18.160 within sixty days after return
to active duty.

Sec. 59 RCW 41.18.180 and 1961 c 255 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any ((fireman)) firefighter who has made contributions under any
prior act may elect to avail himself or herself of the benefits
provided by this chapter or under such prior act by filing written
notice with the board within sixty days from the effective date of this
1961 amendatory act: PROVIDED, That any ((fireman)) firefighter who
has received refunds by reason of selecting the benefits of prior acts
shall return the amount of such refunds as a condition to coverage
under this 1961 amendatory act.

Sec. 60 RCW 41.18.190 and 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 41 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any ((fireman)) firefighter as defined in RCW 41.18.010 who has
prior to July 1, 1969 been employed as a member of a fire department
and who desires to make contributions and avail himself or herself of
the pension and other benefits of chapter 41.18 RCW as now law or
hereafter amended, may transfer his or her membership from any other
pension fund, except the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system, to the pension fund provided in
chapter 41.18 RCW: PROVIDED, That such ((fireman)) firefighter
transmits written notice of his or her intent to transfer to the
pension board of his or her municipality prior to September 1, 1969.

Sec. 61 RCW 41.18.210 and 1974 ex.s. c 148 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any former employee of a department of a city of the first class,
who (1) was a member of the employees' retirement system of such city,
and (2) is now employed within the fire department of such city, may
transfer his or her former membership credit from the city employees'
retirement system to the ((fireman's)) firefighter's pension system
created by chapters 41.16 and 41.18 RCW by filing a written request
with the board of administration and the municipal ((fireman's))
firefighters' pension board, respectively.
Upon the receipt of such request, the transfer of membership to the
city's ((fireman's)) firefighter's pension system shall be made,
together with a transfer of all accumulated contributions credited to
such member. The board of administration shall transmit to the
municipal ((fireman's)) firefighters' pension board a record of service
credited to such member which shall be computed and credited to such
member as a part of his or her period of employment in the city's
((fireman's)) firefighter's pension system. For the purpose of the
transfer contemplated by this section, those affected individuals who
have formerly withdrawn funds from the city employees' retirement
system shall be allowed to restore contributions withdrawn from that
retirement system directly to the ((fireman's)) firefighter's pension
system and receive credit in the ((fireman's)) firefighter's pension
system for their former membership service in the prior system.
Any employee so transferring shall have all the rights, benefits,
and privileges that he or she would have been entitled to had he or she
been a member of the city's ((fireman's)) firefighter's pension system
from the beginning of his or her employment with the city.
No person so transferring shall thereafter be entitled to any other
public pension, except that provided by chapter 41.26 RCW or social
security, which is based upon such service with the city.
The right of any employee to file a written request for transfer of
membership as set forth in this section shall expire December 31, 1974.

Sec. 62 RCW 9.40.130 and 1971 ex.s. c 302 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
RCW 9.40.120, as now or hereafter amended, shall not prohibit the
authorized use or possession of any material, substance, or device
described therein by a member of the armed forces of the United States
or by ((firemen)) firefighters, or peace officers, nor shall these
sections prohibit the use or possession of any material, substance, or
device described therein when used solely for scientific research or
educational purposes or for any lawful purpose. RCW 9.40.120, as now
or hereafter amended, shall not prohibit the manufacture or disposal of
an incendiary device for the parties or purposes described in this
section.

Sec. 63 RCW 9A.48.020 and 1981 c 203 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of arson in the first degree if he or she
knowingly and maliciously:
(a) Causes a fire or explosion which is manifestly dangerous to any
human life, including ((firemen)) firefighters; or
(b) Causes a fire or explosion which damages a dwelling; or
(c) Causes a fire or explosion in any building in which there shall
be at the time a human being who is not a participant in the crime; or
(d) Causes a fire or explosion on property valued at ten thousand
dollars or more with intent to collect insurance proceeds.
(2) Arson in the first degree is a class A felony.

Sec. 64 RCW 19.09.100 and 1994 c 287 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following conditions apply to solicitations as defined by RCW
19.09.020:
(1) A charitable organization, whether or not required to register
pursuant to this chapter, that directly solicits contributions from the
public in this state shall make the following clear and conspicuous
disclosures at the point of solicitation:
(a) The name of the individual making the solicitation;
(b) The identity of the charitable organization and the city of the
principal place of business of the charitable organization;
(c) If requested by the solicitee, the published number in the
office of the secretary for the donor to obtain additional financial
disclosure information on file with the secretary.
(2) A commercial fund raiser shall clearly and conspicuously
disclose at the point of solicitation:
(a) The name of the individual making the solicitation;
(b) The name of the entity for which the fund raiser is an agent or
employee and the name and city of the charitable organization for which
the solicitation is being conducted; and
(c) If requested by the solicitee, the published number in the
office of the secretary for the donor to obtain additional financial
disclosure information on file with the secretary. The disclosure must
be made during an oral solicitation of a contribution, and at the same
time at which a written request for a contribution is made.
(3) A person or organization soliciting charitable contributions by
telephone shall make the disclosures required under subsection (1) or
(2) of this section in the course of the solicitation but prior to
asking for a commitment for a contribution from the solicitee, and in
writing to any solicitee that makes a pledge within five working days
of making the pledge. If the person or organization sends any
materials to the person or organization solicited before the receipt of
any contribution, those materials shall include the disclosures
required in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, whichever is
applicable.
(4) In the case of a solicitation by advertisement or mass
distribution, including posters, leaflets, automatic dialing machines,
publication, and audio or video broadcasts, it shall be clearly and
conspicuously disclosed in the body of the solicitation material that:
(a) The solicitation is conducted by a named commercial fund
raiser, if it is;
(b) The notice of solicitation required by the charitable
solicitation act is on file with the secretary's office; and
(c) The potential donor can obtain additional financial disclosure
information at a published number in the office of the secretary.
(5) A container or vending machine displaying a solicitation must
also display in a clear and conspicuous manner the name of the
charitable organization for which funds are solicited, the name,
business address, and telephone number of the individual and any
commercial fund raiser responsible for collecting funds placed in the
containers or vending machines, and the following statement: "This
charity is currently registered with the secretary's office under the
charitable solicitation act, registration number . . . ."
(6) A commercial fund raiser shall not represent that tickets to
any fund raising event will be donated for use by another person unless
all the following requirements are met:
(a) The commercial fund raiser prior to conducting a solicitation
has written commitments from persons stating that they will accept
donated tickets and specifying the number of tickets they will accept;
(b) The written commitments are kept on file by the commercial fund
raiser for three years and are made available to the secretary,
attorney general, or county prosecutor on demand;
(c) The contributions solicited for donated tickets may not be more
than the amount representing the number of ticket commitments received
from persons and kept on file under (a) of this subsection; and
(d) Not later than seven calendar days prior to the date of the
event for which ticket donations are solicited, the commercial fund
raiser shall give all donated tickets to the persons who made the
written commitments to accept them.
(7) Each person or organization soliciting charitable contributions
shall not represent orally or in writing that:
(a) The charitable contribution is tax deductible unless the
charitable organization for which charitable contributions are being
solicited or to which tickets for fund raising events or other services
or goods will be donated, has applied for and received from the
internal revenue service a letter of determination granting tax
deductible status to the charitable organization;
(b) The person soliciting the charitable contribution is a
volunteer or words of similar meaning or effect that create the
impression that the person soliciting is not a paid solicitor unless
such person is unpaid for his or her services;
(c) The person soliciting the charitable contribution is a member,
staffer, helper, or employee of the charitable organization or words of
similar meaning or effect that create the impression that the person
soliciting is not a paid solicitor if the person soliciting is
employed, contracted, or paid by a commercial fund raiser.
(8) If the charitable organization is associated with, or has a
name that is similar to, any unit of government each person or
organization soliciting contributions shall disclose to each person
solicited whether the charitable organization is or is not part of any
unit of government and the true nature of its relationship to the unit
of government. This subsection does not apply to a foundation or other
charitable organization that is organized, operated, or controlled by
or in connection with a registered public charity, including any
governmental agency or unit, from which it derives its name.
(9) No person may, in conducting any solicitation, use the name
"police," "sheriff," "fire fighter," (("firemen,")) "firefighters," or
a similar name unless properly authorized by a bona fide police,
sheriff, or fire fighter organization or police, sheriff, or fire
department. A proper authorization shall be in writing and signed by
two authorized officials of the organization or department and shall be
filed with the secretary.
(10) A person may not, in conducting any solicitation, use the name
of a federally chartered or nationally recognized military veterans'
service organization as determined by the United States veterans'
administration unless authorized in writing by the highest ranking
official of that organization in this state.
(11) A charitable organization shall comply with all local
governmental regulations that apply to soliciting for or on behalf of
charitable organizations.
(12) The advertising material and the general promotional plan for
a solicitation shall not be false, misleading, or deceptive, and shall
afford full and fair disclosure.
(13) Solicitations shall not be conducted by a charitable
organization or commercial fund raiser that has, or if a corporation,
its officers, directors, or principals have, been convicted of a crime
involving solicitations for or on behalf of a charitable organization
in this state, the United States, or any other state or foreign country
within the past ten years or has been subject to any permanent
injunction or administrative order or judgment under RCW 19.86.080 or
19.86.090, involving a violation or violations of RCW 19.86.020, within
the past ten years, or of restraining a false or misleading promotional
plan involving solicitations for charitable organizations.
(14) No charitable organization or commercial fund raiser subject
to this chapter may use or exploit the fact of registration under this
chapter so as to lead the public to believe that registration
constitutes an endorsement or approval by the state, but the use of the
following is not deemed prohibited: "Currently registered with the
Washington state secretary of state as required by law. Registration
number . . . ."
(15) No entity may engage in any solicitation for contributions for
or on behalf of any charitable organization or commercial fund raiser
unless the charitable organization or commercial fund raiser is
currently registered with the secretary.
(16) No entity may engage in any solicitation for contributions
unless it complies with all provisions of this chapter.
(17)(a) No entity may place a telephone call for the purpose of
charitable solicitation that will be received by the solicitee before
eight o'clock a.m. or after nine o'clock p.m.
(b) No entity may, while placing a telephone call for the purpose
of charitable solicitation, engage in any conduct the natural
consequence of which is to harass, intimidate, or torment any person in
connection with the telephone call.
(18) Failure to comply with subsections (1) through (17) of this
section is a violation of this chapter.

Sec. 65 RCW 35.17.100 and 1965 c 7 s 35.17.100 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every member of the city commission, before qualifying, shall give
a good and sufficient bond to the city in a sum equivalent to five
times the amount of his or her annual salary, conditioned for the
faithful performance of the duties of his or her office. The bonds
must be approved by a judge of the superior court for the county in
which the city is located and filed with the clerk thereof. The
commission, by resolution, may require any of its appointees to give
bond to be fixed and approved by the commission and filed with the
mayor.

Sec. 66 RCW 35A.11.020 and 1993 c 83 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislative body of each code city shall have power to organize
and regulate its internal affairs within the provisions of this title
and its charter, if any; and to define the functions, powers, and
duties of its officers and employees; within the limitations imposed by
vested rights, to fix the compensation and working conditions of such
officers and employees and establish and maintain civil service, or
merit systems, retirement and pension systems not in conflict with the
provisions of this title or of existing charter provisions until
changed by the people: PROVIDED, That nothing in this section or in
this title shall permit any city, whether a code city or otherwise, to
enact any provisions establishing or respecting a merit system or
system of civil service for ((firemen)) firefighters and ((policemen))
police officers which does not substantially accomplish the same
purpose as provided by general law in chapter 41.08 RCW for ((firemen))
firefighters and chapter 41.12 RCW for ((policemen)) police officers
now or as hereafter amended, or enact any provision establishing or
respecting a pension or retirement system for ((firemen)) firefighters
or ((policemen)) police officers which provides different pensions or
retirement benefits than are provided by general law for such classes.
Such body may adopt and enforce ordinances of all kinds relating to
and regulating its local or municipal affairs and appropriate to the
good government of the city, and may impose penalties of fine not
exceeding five thousand dollars or imprisonment for any term not
exceeding one year, or both, for the violation of such ordinances,
constituting a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor as provided therein.
However, the punishment for any criminal ordinance shall be the same as
the punishment provided in state law for the same crime. Such a body
alternatively may provide that violation of such ordinances constitutes
a civil violation subject to monetary penalty, but no act which is a
state crime may be made a civil violation.
The legislative body of each code city shall have all powers
possible for a city or town to have under the Constitution of this
state, and not specifically denied to code cities by law. By way of
illustration and not in limitation, such powers may be exercised in
regard to the acquisition, sale, ownership, improvement, maintenance,
protection, restoration, regulation, use, leasing, disposition,
vacation, abandonment or beautification of public ways, real property
of all kinds, waterways, structures, or any other improvement or use of
real or personal property, in regard to all aspects of collective
bargaining as provided for and subject to the provisions of chapter
41.56 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, and in the rendering of local
social, cultural, recreational, educational, governmental, or corporate
services, including operating and supplying of utilities and municipal
services commonly or conveniently rendered by cities or towns.
In addition and not in limitation, the legislative body of each
code city shall have any authority ever given to any class of
municipality or to all municipalities of this state before or after the
enactment of this title, such authority to be exercised in the manner
provided, if any, by the granting statute, when not in conflict with
this title. Within constitutional limitations, legislative bodies of
code cities shall have within their territorial limits all powers of
taxation for local purposes except those which are expressly preempted
by the state as provided in RCW 66.08.120, 82.36.440, 48.14.020, and
48.14.080.

Sec. 67 RCW 35.27.240 and 1987 c 3 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of police in a town shall be under the direction and
control of the marshal subject to the direction of the mayor. He or
she may pursue and arrest violators of town ordinances beyond the town
limits.
((His)) The marshal's lawful orders shall be promptly executed by
deputies, police officers and ((watchmen)) watchpersons. Every citizen
shall lend him or her aid, when required, for the arrest of offenders
and maintenance of public order. He or she may appoint, subject to the
approval of the mayor, one or more deputies, for whose acts he and his
((bondsmen)) or her bondspersons shall be responsible, whose
compensation shall be fixed by the council. With the concurrence of
the mayor, ((he)) the marshal may appoint additional ((policemen))
police officers for one day only when necessary for the preservation of
public order.
((He)) The marshal shall have the same authority as that conferred
upon sheriffs for the suppression of any riot, public tumult,
disturbance of the peace, or resistance against the laws or public
authorities in the lawful exercise of their functions and shall be
entitled to the same protection.
((He)) The marshal shall execute and return all process issued and
directed to him or her by any legal authority and for his or her
services shall receive the same fees as are paid to constables. ((He))
The marshal shall perform such other services as the council by
ordinance may require.

Sec. 68 RCW 35.66.040 and 1965 c 7 s 35.66.040 are each amended
to read as follows:
A police matron must be paid such compensation for her services as
shall be fixed by the city council and at such time as may be appointed
for the payment of ((policemen)) police officers.

Sec. 69 RCW 35.75.050 and 1965 c 7 s 35.75.050 are each amended
to read as follows:
The city or town council shall by ordinance provide that the whole
amount or any amount not less than seventy-five percent of all license
fees, penalties or other moneys collected under the authority of this
chapter shall be paid into and placed to the credit of a special fund
to be known as the "bicycle road fund." The moneys in the bicycle road
fund shall not be transferred to any other fund and shall be paid out
for the sole purpose of building and maintaining bicycle paths and
roadways authorized to be constructed and maintained by this chapter or
for special ((policemen)) police officers, bicycle tags, stationery and
other expenses growing out of the regulating and licensing of the
riding of bicycles and other vehicles and the construction, maintenance
and regulation of the use of bicycle paths and roadways.

Sec. 70 RCW 35.88.020 and 1965 c 7 s 35.88.020 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every city and town may by ordinance prescribe what acts shall
constitute offenses against the purity of its water supply and the
punishment or penalties therefor and enforce them. The mayor of each
city and town may appoint special ((policemen)) police officers, with
such compensation as the city or town may fix, who shall, after taking
oath, have the powers of constables, and who may arrest with or without
warrant any person committing, within the territory over which any city
or town is given jurisdiction by this chapter, any offense declared by
law or by ordinance, against the purity of the water supply, or which
violate any rule or regulation lawfully promulgated by the state board
of health for the protection of the purity of such water supply. Every
special ((policeman)) police officer whose appointment is authorized
herein may take any person arrested for any such offense or violation
before any court having jurisdiction thereof to be proceeded with
according to law. Every such special ((policeman)) police officer
shall, when on duty wear in plain view a badge or shield bearing the
words "special police" and the name of the city or town by which he or
she has been appointed.

Sec. 71 RCW 41.44.060 and 1951 c 275 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Policemen)) Police officers in first class cities and all city
((firemen)) firefighters shall be excluded from the provisions of this
chapter, except those employees of the fire department who are not
eligible to the benefits of any ((firemen's)) firefighters' pension
system established by or pursuant to state law, and who shall be
included in the miscellaneous personnel.

Sec. 72 RCW 41.48.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 257 s 19 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The governor is hereby authorized to enter on behalf of the
state into an agreement with the secretary of health, education, and
welfare consistent with the terms and provisions of this chapter, for
the purpose of extending the benefits of the federal old-age and
survivors insurance system to employees of the state or any political
subdivision not members of an existing retirement system, or to members
of a retirement system established by the state or by a political
subdivision thereof or by an institution of higher learning with
respect to services specified in such agreement which constitute
"employment" as defined in RCW 41.48.020. Such agreement may contain
such provisions relating to coverage, benefits, contributions,
effective date, modification and termination of the agreement,
administration, and other appropriate provisions as the governor and
secretary of health, education, and welfare shall agree upon, but,
except as may be otherwise required by or under the social security act
as to the services to be covered, such agreement shall provide in
effect that --
(a) Benefits will be provided for employees whose services are
covered by the agreement (and their dependents and survivors) on the
same basis as though such services constituted employment within the
meaning of title II of the social security act;
(b) The state will pay to the secretary of the treasury, at such
time or times as may be prescribed under the social security act,
contributions with respect to wages (as defined in RCW 41.48.020),
equal to the sum of the taxes which would be imposed by the federal
insurance contributions act if the services covered by the agreement
constituted employment within the meaning of that act;
(c) Such agreement shall be effective with respect to services in
employment covered by the agreement or modification thereof performed
after a date specified therein but in no event may it be effective with
respect to any such services performed prior to the first day of the
calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year in which such
agreement or modification of the agreement is accepted by the secretary
of health, education and welfare.
(d) All services which constitute employment as defined in RCW
41.48.020 and are performed in the employ of the state by employees of
the state, shall be covered by the agreement;
(e) All services which (i) constitute employment as defined in RCW
41.48.020, (ii) are performed in the employ of a political subdivision
of the state, and (iii) are covered by a plan which is in conformity
with the terms of the agreement and has been approved by the governor
under RCW 41.48.050, shall be covered by the agreement; and
(f) As modified, the agreement shall include all services described
in either paragraph (d) or paragraph (e) of this subsection and
performed by individuals to whom section 218(c)(3)(C) of the social
security act is applicable, and shall provide that the service of any
such individual shall continue to be covered by the agreement in case
he thereafter becomes eligible to be a member of a retirement system;
and
(g) As modified, the agreement shall include all services described
in either paragraph (d) or paragraph (e) of this subsection and
performed by individuals in positions covered by a retirement system
with respect to which the governor has issued a certificate to the
secretary of health, education, and welfare pursuant to subsection (5)
of this section.
(h) Law enforcement officers and ((firemen)) firefighters of each
political subdivision of this state who are covered by the Washington
Law Enforcement Officers' and Fire Fighters' Retirement System Act
(chapter 209, Laws of 1969 ex. sess.) as now in existence or hereafter
amended shall constitute a separate "coverage group" for purposes of
the agreement entered into under this section and for purposes of
section 218 of the social security act. To the extent that the
agreement between this state and the federal secretary of health,
education, and welfare in existence on the date of adoption of this
subsection is inconsistent with this subsection, the governor shall
seek to modify the inconsistency.
(2) Any instrumentality jointly created by this state and any other
state or states is hereby authorized, upon the granting of like
authority by such other state or states, (a) to enter into an agreement
with the secretary of health, education, and welfare whereby the
benefits of the federal old-age and survivors insurance system shall be
extended to employees of such instrumentality, (b) to require its
employees to pay (and for that purpose to deduct from their wages)
contributions equal to the amounts which they would be required to pay
under RCW 41.48.040(1) if they were covered by an agreement made
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, and (c) to make payments to
the secretary of the treasury in accordance with such agreement,
including payments from its own funds, and otherwise to comply with
such agreements. Such agreement shall, to the extent practicable, be
consistent with the terms and provisions of subsection (1) and other
provisions of this chapter.
(3) The governor is empowered to authorize a referendum, and to
designate an agency or individual to supervise its conduct, in
accordance with the requirements of section 218(d)(3) of the social
security act, and subsection (4) of this section on the question of
whether service in all positions covered by a retirement system
established by the state or by a political subdivision thereof should
be excluded from or included under an agreement under this chapter. If
a retirement system covers positions of employees of the state of
Washington, of the institutions of higher learning, and positions of
employees of one or more of the political subdivisions of the state,
then for the purpose of the referendum as provided herein, there may be
deemed to be a separate retirement system with respect to employees of
the state, or any one or more of the political subdivisions, or
institutions of higher learning and the governor shall authorize a
referendum upon request of the subdivisions' or institutions' of higher
learning governing body: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That if a referendum of
state employees generally fails to produce a favorable majority vote
then the governor may authorize a referendum covering positions of
employees in any state department who are compensated in whole or in
part from grants made to this state under title III of the federal
social security act: PROVIDED, That any city or town affiliated with
the statewide city employees retirement system organized under chapter
41.44 RCW may at its option agree to a plan submitted by the board of
trustees of said statewide city employees retirement system for
inclusion under an agreement under this chapter if the referendum to be
held as provided herein indicates a favorable result: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the teachers' retirement system be considered one system
for the purpose of the referendum except as applied to the several
colleges of education. The notice of referendum required by section
218(d)(3)(C) of the social security act to be given to employees shall
contain or shall be accompanied by a statement, in such form and such
detail as the agency or individual designated to supervise the
referendum shall deem necessary and sufficient, to inform the employees
of the rights which will accrue to them and their dependents and
survivors, and the liabilities to which they will be subject, if their
services are included under an agreement under this chapter.
(4) The governor, before authorizing a referendum, shall require
the following conditions to be met:
(a) The referendum shall be by secret written ballot on the
question of whether service in positions covered by such retirement
system shall be excluded from or included under the agreement between
the governor and the secretary of health, education, and welfare
provided for in RCW 41.48.030(1);
(b) An opportunity to vote in such referendum shall be given and
shall be limited to eligible employees;
(c) Not less than ninety days' notice of such referendum shall be
given to all such employees;
(d) Such referendum shall be conducted under the supervision (of
the governor or) of an agency or individual designated by the governor;
(e) The proposal for coverage shall be approved only if a majority
of the eligible employees vote in favor of including services in such
positions under the agreement;
(f) The state legislature, in the case of a referendum affecting
the rights and liabilities of state employees covered under the state
employees' retirement system and employees under the teachers'
retirement system, and in all other cases the local legislative
authority or governing body, shall have specifically approved the
proposed plan and approved any necessary structural adjustment to the
existing system to conform with the proposed plan.
(5) Upon receiving satisfactory evidence that with respect to any
such referendum the conditions specified in subsection (4) of this
section and section 218(d)(3) of the social security act have been met,
the governor shall so certify to the secretary of health, education,
and welfare.
(6) If the legislative body of any political subdivision of this
state certifies to the governor that a referendum has been held under
the terms of RCW 41.48.050(1)(i) and gives notice to the governor of
termination of social security for any coverage group of the political
subdivision, the governor shall give two years advance notice in
writing to the federal department of health, education, and welfare of
such termination of the agreement entered into under this section with
respect to said coverage group.

Sec. 73 RCW 46.37.185 and 1987 c 330 s 709 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Firemen)) Firefighters, when approved by the chief of their
respective service, shall be authorized to use a green light on the
front of their private cars when on emergency duty only. Such green
light shall be visible for a distance of two hundred feet under normal
atmospheric conditions and shall be of a type and mounting approved by
the Washington state patrol. The use of the green light shall only be
for the purpose of identification and the operator of a vehicle so
equipped shall not be entitled to any of the privileges provided in RCW
46.61.035 for the operators of authorized emergency vehicles.

Sec. 74 RCW 81.28.080 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 117 are each
amended to read as follows:
No common carrier shall charge, demand, collect or receive a
greater or less or different compensation for transportation of persons
or property, or for any service in connection therewith, than the
rates, fares and charges applicable to such transportation as specified
in its schedules filed and in effect at the time; nor shall any such
carrier refund or remit in any manner or by any device any portion of
the rates, fares, or charges so specified excepting upon order of the
commission as hereinafter provided, nor extend to any shipper or person
any privileges or facilities in the transportation of passengers or
property except such as are regularly and uniformly extended to all
persons and corporations under like circumstances. No common carrier
shall, directly or indirectly, issue or give any free ticket, free pass
or free or reduced transportation for passengers between points within
this state, except its employees and their families, surgeons and
physicians and their families, its officers, agents and attorneys at
law; to ministers of religion, traveling secretaries of railroad Young
Men's Christian Associations, inmates of hospitals, charitable and
eleemosynary institutions and persons exclusively engaged in charitable
and eleemosynary work; to indigent, destitute and homeless persons and
to such persons when transported by charitable societies or hospitals,
and the necessary agents employed in such transportation; to inmates of
the national homes or state homes for disabled volunteer soldiers and
of soldiers' and sailors' homes, including those about to enter and
those returning home after discharge; to necessary caretakers of
livestock, poultry, milk and fruit; to employees of sleeping car
companies, express companies, and to ((linemen)) lineworkers of
telegraph and telephone companies; to railway mail service employees,
post office inspectors, customs inspectors and immigration inspectors;
to ((newsboys)) newspaper delivery persons on trains; baggage agents,
witnesses attending any legal investigation in which the common carrier
is interested; to persons injured in accidents or wrecks and physicians
and nurses attending such persons; to the National Guard of Washington
when on official duty, and students going to and returning from state
institutions of learning: PROVIDED, That this provision shall not be
construed to prohibit the interchange of passes for the officers,
attorneys, agents and employees and their families, of railroad
companies, steamboat companies, express companies and sleeping car
companies with other railroad companies, steamboat companies, express
companies and sleeping car companies, nor to prohibit any common
carrier from carrying passengers free with the object of providing
relief in cases of general epidemic, pestilence, or other calamitous
visitation: AND PROVIDED, FURTHER, That this provision shall not be
construed to prohibit the exchange of passes or franks for the
officers, attorneys, agents, employees, and their families of such
telegraph, telephone and cable lines, and the officers, attorneys,
agents, employees, and their families of other telegraph, telephone or
cable lines, or with railroad companies, express companies or sleeping
car companies: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the term "employee" as used in
this section shall include furloughed, pensioned, and superannuated
employees, persons who have become disabled or infirm in the service of
any such common carrier, and the remains of a person killed or dying in
the employment of a carrier, those entering or leaving its service and
ex-employees traveling for the purpose of entering the service of any
such common carrier; and the term "families" as used in this section
shall include the families of those persons named in this proviso, also
the families of persons killed and the surviving spouses prior to
remarriage and minor children during minority, of persons who died
while in the service of any such common carrier: AND PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That nothing herein contained shall prevent the issuance of
mileage, commutation tickets or excursion passenger tickets: AND
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That nothing in this section shall be construed to
prevent the issuance of free or reduced transportation by any street
railroad company for mail carriers, or ((policemen)) police officers or
members of fire departments, city officers, and employees when engaged
in the performance of their duties as such city employees.
Common carriers subject to the provisions of this title may carry,
store or handle, free or at reduced rates, property for the United
States, state, county or municipal governments, or for charitable
purposes, or to or from fairs and exhibitions for exhibition thereat,
and may carry, store or handle, free or at reduced rates, the household
goods and personal effects of its employees and those entering or
leaving its service and those killed or dying while in its service.
Nothing in this title shall be construed to prohibit the making of
a special contract providing for the mutual exchange of service between
any railroad company and any telegraph or telephone company, where the
line of such telegraph or telephone company is situated upon or along
the railroad right of way and used by both of such companies.

Sec. 75 RCW 35.23.121 and 1995 c 301 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
The city clerk shall keep a full and true record of every act and
proceeding of the city council and keep such books, accounts and make
such reports as may be required by the state auditor. The city clerk
shall record all ordinances, annexing thereto his or her certificate
giving the number and title of the ordinance, stating that the
ordinance was published and posted according to law and that the record
is a true and correct copy thereof. The record copy with the clerk's
certificate shall be prima facie evidence of the contents of the
ordinance and of its passage and publication and shall be admissible as
such evidence in any court or proceeding.
The city clerk shall be custodian of the seal of the city and shall
have authority to acknowledge the execution of all instruments by the
city which require acknowledgment.
The city clerk may appoint a deputy for whose acts he or she and
his or her ((bondsmen)) bondspersons shall be responsible, and he or
she and his or her deputy shall have authority to take all necessary
affidavits to claims against the city and certify them without charge.
The city clerk shall perform such other duties as may be required
by statute or ordinance.

Sec. 76 RCW 35.27.220 and 1965 c 7 s 35.27.220 are each amended
to read as follows:
The town clerk shall be custodian of the seal of the town. ((He))
The town clerk may appoint a deputy for whose acts he or she and his
((bondsmen)) or her bondspersons shall be responsible((; he)). The
town clerk and his or her deputy may administer oaths or affirmations
and certify to them, and may take affidavits and depositions to be used
in any court or proceeding in the state.
((He)) The town clerk shall make a quarterly statement in writing
showing the receipts and expenditures of the town for the preceding
quarter and the amount remaining in the treasury.
At the end of every fiscal year ((he)) the town clerk shall make a
full and detailed statement of receipts and expenditures of the
preceding year and a full statement of the financial condition of the
town which shall be published.
((He)) The town clerk shall perform such other services as may be
required by statute or by ordinances of the town council.
((He)) The town clerk shall keep a full and true account of all the
proceedings of the council.

Sec. 77 RCW 59.12.110 and 1905 c 86 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The plaintiff or defendant at any time, upon two days' notice to
the adverse party, may apply to the court or any judge thereof for an
order raising or lowering the amount of any bond in this chapter
provided for. Either party may, upon like notice, apply to the court
or any judge thereof for an order requiring additional or other surety
or sureties upon any such bond. Upon the hearing or any application
made under the provisions of this section evidence may be given. The
judge after hearing any such application shall make such an order as
shall be just in the premises. The ((bondsmen)) bondspersons may be
required to be present at such hearing if so required in the notice
thereof, and shall answer under oath all questions that may be asked
them touching their qualifications as ((bondsmen)) bondspersons, and in
the event the ((bondsmen)) bondspersons shall fail or refuse to appear
at such hearing and so answer such questions the bond shall be
stricken. In the event the court shall order a new or additional bond
to be furnished by defendant, and the same shall not be given within
twenty-four hours, the court shall order the sheriff to forthwith
execute the writ. In the event the defendant shall file a second or
additional bond and it shall also be found insufficient after hearing,
as above provided, the right to retain the premises by bond shall be
lost and the sheriff shall forthwith put the plaintiff in possession of
the premises.

Sec. 78 RCW 82.38.230 and 1998 c 176 s 77 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever any licensee is delinquent in the payment of any
obligation imposed hereunder, and such delinquency continues after
notice and demand for payment by the department, the department shall
proceed to collect the amount due from the licensee in the following
manner: The department shall seize any property subject to the lien of
said excise tax, penalty, and interest and thereafter sell it at public
auction to pay said obligation and any and all costs that may have been
incurred on account of the seizure and sale. Notice of such intended
sale and the time and place thereof shall be given to such delinquent
licensee and to all persons appearing of record to have an interest in
such property. The notice shall be given in writing at least ten days
before the date set for the sale by enclosing it in an envelope
addressed to the licensee at the licensee's address as the same appears
in the records of the department and, in the case of any person
appearing of record to have an interest in such property, addressed to
such person at his or her last known residence or place of business,
and depositing such envelope in the United States mail, postage
prepaid. In addition, the notice shall be published for at least ten
days before the date set for the sale in a newspaper of general
circulation published in the county in which the property seized is to
be sold. If there is no newspaper of general circulation in such
county, the notice shall be posted in three public places in the county
for a period of ten days. The notice shall contain a description of
the property to be sold, together with a statement of the amount due
under this chapter, the name of the licensee and the further statement
that unless such amount is paid on or before the time fixed in the
notice the property will be sold in accordance with law.
The department shall then proceed to sell the property in
accordance with the law and the notice, and shall deliver to the
purchaser a bill of sale or deed which shall vest title in the
purchaser. If upon any such sale the moneys received exceed the amount
due to the state under this chapter from the delinquent licensee, the
excess shall be returned to the licensee and the licensee's receipt
obtained for the excess. If any person having an interest in or lien
upon the property has filed with the department prior to such sale,
notice of such interest or lien, the department shall withhold payment
of any such excess to the licensee pending a determination of the
rights of the respective parties thereto by a court of competent
jurisdiction. If for any reason the receipt of the licensee is not
available, the department shall deposit such excess with the state
treasurer as trustee for the licensee or the licensee's heirs,
successors, or assigns: PROVIDED, That prior to making any seizure of
property as provided for in this section, the department may first
serve upon the licensee's ((bondsman)) bondsperson a notice of the
delinquency, with a demand for the payment of the amount due.

Sec. 79 RCW 87.03.020 and 1988 c 127 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of organizing an irrigation district, a petition,
signed by the required number of holders of title or evidence of title
to land within the proposed district, shall be presented to the board
of county commissioners of the county in which the lands, or the
greater portion thereof, are situated, which petition shall contain the
following:
(1) A description of the lands to be included in the operation of
the district, in legal subdivisions or fractions thereof, and the name
of the county or counties in which said lands are situated.
(2) The signature and post office address of each petitioner,
together with the legal description of the particular lands within the
proposed district owned by said respective petitioners.
(3) A general statement of the probable source or sources of water
supply and a brief outline of the plan of improvement, which may be in
the alternative, contemplated by the organization of the district.
(4) A statement of the number of directors, either three or five,
desired for the administration of the district and of the name by which
the petitioners desire the district to be designated.
(5) Any other matter deemed material.
(6) A prayer requesting the board to take the steps necessary to
organize the district.
The petition must be accompanied by a good and sufficient bond, to
be approved by the board of county commissioners, in double the amount
of the probable cost of organizing the district, and conditioned that
the ((bondsmen)) bondspersons will pay all of the cost in case such
organization shall not be effected. Said petition shall be presented
at a regular meeting of the said board, or at any special meeting
ordered to consider and act upon said petition, and shall be published
once a week, for at least two weeks (three issues) before the time at
which the same is to be presented, in some newspaper of general
circulation printed and published in the county where said petition is
to be presented, together with a notice signed by the clerk of the
board of county commissioners stating the time of the meeting at which
the same will be presented. There shall also be published a notice of
the hearing on said petition in a newspaper published at Olympia,
Washington, to be designated by the director of ecology from year to
year, which said notice shall be published for at least two weeks
(three issues) prior to the date of said meeting and shall contain the
name of the county or counties and the number of each township and
range in which the lands embraced within the boundaries of the proposed
district are situated, also the time, place and purpose for said
meeting, which said notice shall be signed by the petitioner whose name
first appears upon the said petition. If any portion of the lands
within said proposed district lie within another county or counties,
then the said petition and notice shall be published for the time above
provided in one newspaper printed and published in each of said
counties. The said notice, together with a map of the district, shall
also be served by registered mail at least thirty days before the said
hearing upon the state director of ecology at Olympia, Washington, who
shall, at the expense of the district in case it is later organized,
otherwise at the expense of the petitioners' ((bondsmen)) bondspersons,
make such investigation of the sufficiency of the source and supply of
water for the purposes of the proposed district, as he or she may deem
necessary, and file a report of his or her findings, together with a
statement of his or her costs, with the board of county commissioners
at or prior to the time set for said hearing. When the petition is
presented, the board of county commissioners shall hear the same, shall
receive such evidence as it may deem material, and may adjourn such
hearing from time to time, not exceeding four weeks in all, and on the
final hearing shall establish and define the boundaries of the district
along such lines as in the judgment of the board will best reclaim the
lands involved and enter an order to that effect: PROVIDED, That said
board shall not modify the boundaries so as to except from the
operation of the district any territory within the boundaries outlined
in the petition, which is susceptible of irrigation by the same system
of works applicable to other lands in such proposed district and for
which a water supply is available; nor shall any lands which, in the
judgment of said board, will not be benefited, be included within such
district; any lands included within any district, which have a partial
or full water right shall be given equitable credit therefor in the
apportionment of the assessments in this act provided for: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That any owner, whose lands are susceptible of
irrigation from the same source, and in the judgment of the board it is
practicable to irrigate the same by the proposed district system,
shall, upon application to the board at the time of the hearing, be
entitled to have such lands included in the district.
At said hearing the board shall also give the district a name and
shall order that an election be held therein for the purpose of
determining whether or not the district shall be organized under the
provisions of this act and for the purpose of electing directors.
The clerk of the board of county commissioners shall then give
notice of the election ordered to be held as aforesaid, which notice
shall describe the district boundaries as established, and shall give
the name by which said proposed district has been designated, and shall
state the purposes and objects of said election, and shall be published
once a week, for at least two weeks (three issues) prior to said
election, in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county
where the petition aforesaid was presented; and if any portion of said
proposed district lies within another county or counties, then said
notice shall be published in like manner in a newspaper within each of
said counties. Said election notice shall also require the electors to
cast ballots which shall contain the words "Irrigation District -- Yes,"
and "Irrigation District -- No," and also the names of persons to be
voted for as directors of the district: PROVIDED, That where in this
act publication is required to be made in a newspaper of any county,
the same may be made in a newspaper of general circulation in such
county, selected by the person or body charged with making the
publication and such newspaper shall be the official paper for such
purpose.

Sec. 80 RCW 87.84.020 and 1961 c 226 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A petition to convert an existing irrigation district to an
irrigation and rehabilitation district shall be signed by at least
fifty holders of title or evidence of title to land within the
district. The petition shall contain the following:
(1) The legal description of the property to be served.
(2) The signature and address of each petitioner, together with the
legal description of the lands within the district owned by each.
(3) Any other matter deemed material.
The petition shall be accompanied by a bond, to be approved by the
board, in double the amount of the probable cost of organizing the
district, and conditioned that the ((bondsman)) bondsperson will pay
all the costs if the organization is not effected.

Sec. 81 RCW 19.29.010 and 1989 c 12 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be unlawful from and after the passage of this chapter for
any officer, agent, or employee of the state of Washington, or of any
county, city or other political subdivision thereof, or for any other
person, firm or corporation, or its officers, agents or employees, to
run, place, erect, maintain, or use any electrical apparatus or
construction, except as provided in the rules of this chapter.
Rule 1. No wire or cable, except the neutral, carrying a current
of less than seven hundred fifty volts of electricity within the
corporate limits of any city or town shall be run, placed, erected,
maintained or used on any insulator the center of which is less than
thirteen inches from the center line of any pole. And no such wire,
except the neutral, shall be run past any pole to which it is not
attached at a distance of less than thirteen inches from the center
line thereof. This rule shall not apply to any wire or cable where the
same is run from under ground and placed vertically on the pole; nor to
any wire or cable where the same is attached to the top of the pole;
nor to a pole top fixture as between it and the same pole; nor to any
wire or cable between the points where the same is made to leave any
pole or fixture thereon for the purpose of entering any building or
other structure and the point of attachment to such building or
structure; nor to any jumper wire or cable carrying a current or
connected with a transformer or other appliance on the same pole; nor
to bridle or jumper wires on any pole which are attached to or
connected with signal wires on the same pole; nor to any aerial cable
as between such cable and any pole upon which it originates or
terminates; nor to exclusive telephone or telegraph toll lines; nor to
aerial cables containing telephone, telegraph, or signal wires, or
wires continuing from same, where the cable is attached to poles on
which no wires or cables other than the wires continuing from said
cable are maintained, provided, that electric light or power wires or
cables are in no case maintained on the same side of the street or
highway on which said aerial cable is placed.
Rule 2. No wire or cable used to carry a current of over seven
hundred fifty volts of electricity within the incorporate limits of any
city or town shall be run, placed, erected, maintained or used on any
insulator the center of which is nearer than twenty-four inches to the
center line of any pole. And no such wire or cable shall be run past
any pole to which it is not attached at a distance of less than twenty-four inches from the center line thereof: PROVIDED, That this shall
not apply to any wire or cable where the same is run from under ground
and placed vertically on the pole; nor to any wire or cable where the
same is attached to the top of the pole; nor to a pole top fixture, as
between it and the same pole; nor to any wire or cable between the
points where the same is made to leave any pole or fixture thereon for
the purpose of entering any building or other structure, and the point
of attachment to said building or structure; nor to any jumper wire or
cable carrying a current or connected with transformers or other
appliances on the same pole: PROVIDED FURTHER, That where said wire or
cable is run vertically, it shall be rigidly supported and where
possible run on the ends of the cross-arms.
Rule 3. No wire or cable carrying a current of more than seven
hundred fifty volts, and less than seventy-five hundred volts of
electricity, shall be run, placed, erected, maintained or used within
three feet of any wire or cable carrying a current of seven hundred
fifty volts or less of electricity; and no wire or cable carrying a
current of more than seventy-five hundred volts of electricity shall be
run, placed, erected, maintained, or used within seven feet of any wire
or cable carrying less than seventy-five hundred volts: PROVIDED, That
the foregoing provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to any wire
or cable within buildings or other structures; nor where the same are
run from under ground and placed vertically upon the pole; nor to any
service wire or cable where the same is made to leave any pole or
fixture thereon for the purpose of entering any building or other
structure, and the point of attachment to said building or structure;
nor to any jumper wire or cable carrying a current or connected with a
transformer or other appliance on the same pole: PROVIDED, That where
run vertically, wires or cables shall be rigidly supported, and where
possible run on the ends of the cross-arms: PROVIDED FURTHER, That as
between any two wires or cables mentioned in Rules 1, 2 and 3 of this
section, only the wires or cables last in point of time so run, placed,
erected or maintained, shall be held to be in violation of the
provisions thereof.
Rule 4. No wire or cable used for telephone, telegraph, district
messenger, or call bell circuit, fire or burglar alarm, or any other
similar system, shall be run, placed, erected, maintained or used on
any pole at a distance of less than three feet from any wire or cable
carrying a current of over three hundred volts of electricity; and in
all cases (except those mentioned in exceptions to Rules 1, 2 and 3)
where such wires or cables are run, above or below, or cross over or
under electric light or power wires, or a trolley wire, a suitable
method of construction, or insulation or protection to prevent contact
shall be maintained as between such wire or cable and such electric
light, power or trolley wire; and said methods of construction,
insulation or protection shall be installed by, or at the expense of
the person owning the wire last placed in point of time: PROVIDED,
That telephone, telegraph or signal wires or cables operated for
private use and not furnishing service to the public, may be placed
less than three feet from any line carrying a voltage of less than
seven hundred and fifty volts.
Rule 5. Transformers, either single or in bank, that exceed a
total capacity of over ten K.W. shall be supported by a double cross-arm, or some fixture equally as strong. No transformer shall be
placed, erected, maintained or used on any cross-arm or other appliance
on a pole upon which is placed a series electric arc lamp or arc light:
PROVIDED, This shall not apply to a span wire supporting a lamp only.
All aerial and underground transformers used for low potential
distribution shall be subjected to an insulation test in accordance
with the standardized rules of the American Institute of Electrical
Engineers. In addition to this each transformer shall be tested at
rated line voltage prior to each installation and shall have attached
to it a tag showing the date on which the test was made, and the name
of the person making the test.
Rule 6. No wire or cable, other than ground wires, used to conduct
or carry electricity, shall be placed, run, erected, maintained or used
vertically on any pole without causing such wire or cable to be at all
times sufficiently insulated the full length thereof to insure the
protection of anyone coming in contact with said wire or cable.
Rule 7. The neutral point or wire of all transformer secondaries
strung or erected for use in low potential distributing systems shall
be grounded in all cases where the normal maximum difference of
potential between the ground and any point in the secondary circuit
will not exceed one hundred and fifty volts. When no neutral point or
wire is accessible one side of the secondary circuit shall be grounded
in the case of single phase transformers, and any one common point in
the case of interconnected polyphase bank or banks of transformers.
Where the maximum difference of potential between the ground and any
point in the secondary circuit will, when grounded, exceed one hundred
fifty volts, grounding shall be permitted. Such grounding shall be
done in the manner provided in Rule 30.
Rule 8. In all cases where a wire or cable larger than No. 14
B.W.G. originates or terminates on insulators attached to any pin or
other appliance, said wire or cable shall be attached to at least two
insulators: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That this section shall not apply to
service wires to buildings; nor to wires run vertically on a pole; nor
to wires originating or terminating on strain insulators or circuit
breakers; nor to telephone, telegraph or signal wires outside the
limits of any incorporated city or town.
Rule 9. Fixtures placed or erected for the support of wires on the
roofs of buildings shall be of sufficient strength to withstand all
strains to which they may be subjected, due to the breaking of all
wires on one side thereof, and except where insulated wires or cables
are held close to fire walls by straps or rings, shall be of such
height and so placed that all of the wires supported by such fixtures
shall be at least seven feet above any point of roofs less than one-quarter pitch over which they pass or may be attached, and no roof
fixtures or wire shall be so placed that they will interfere with the
free passage of persons upon, over, to or from the roofs.
Rule 10. No guy wire or cable shall be placed, run, erected,
maintained or used within the incorporate limits of any city or town on
any pole or appliance to which is attached any wire or cable used to
conduct electricity without causing said guy wire or cable to be
efficiently insulated with circuit breakers at all times at a distance
of not less than eight feet nor more than ten feet measured along the
line of said guy wire or cable from each end thereof: PROVIDED, No
circuit breaker shall be required at the lower end of the guy wire or
cable where the same is attached to a ground anchor, nor shall any
circuit breaker be required where said guy wire or cable runs direct
from a grounded messenger wire to a grounded anchor rod.
Rule 11. In all span wires used for the purpose of supporting
trolley wires or series arc lamps there shall be at least two circuit
breakers, one of which shall at all times be maintained no less than
four feet nor more than six feet distant from the trolley wire or
series arc lamp, and in cases where the same is supported by a building
or metallic pole, the other circuit breaker shall be maintained at the
building or at the pole: PROVIDED, That in span wires which support
two or more trolley wires no circuit breaker shall be required in the
span wire between any two of the trolley wires: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
in span wires supporting trolley wires attached to wooden poles only
the circuit breaker adjacent to the trolley wire shall be required.
Rule 12. At all points where in case of a breakdown of trolley
span wires, the trolley wire would be liable to drop within seven feet
of the ground, there shall be double span wires and hangers placed at
such points.
Rule 13. All energized wires or appliances installed inside of any
building or vault, for the distribution of electrical energy, shall be
sufficiently insulated, or so guarded, located, or arranged as to
protect any person from injury.
Rule 14. The secondary circuit of current transformers, the
casings of all potential regulators and arc light transformers, all
metal frames of all switch boards, metal oil tanks used on oil switches
except where the tank is part of the conducting system, all motor and
generator frames, the entire frame of the crane and the tracks of all
traveling cranes and hoisting devices, shall be thoroughly grounded, as
provided in Rule 30.
Rule 15. All generators and motors having a potential of more than
three hundred volts shall be provided with a suitable insulated
platform or mat so arranged as to permit the attendant to stand upon
such platform or mat when working upon the live parts of such
generators or motors.
Rule 16. Suitable insulated platforms or mats shall be provided
for the use of all persons while working on any live part of
switchboards on which any wire or appliance carries a potential in
excess of three hundred volts.
Rule 17. Every generator, motor, transformer, switch or other
similar piece of apparatus and device used in the generation,
transmission or distribution of electrical energy in stations or
substations, shall be either provided with a name plate giving the
capacity in volts and amperes, or have this information stamped thereon
in such a manner as to be clearly legible.
Rule 18. When lines of seven hundred fifty volts or over are cut
out at the station or substation to allow employees to work upon them,
they shall be short-circuited and grounded at the station, and shall in
addition, if the line wires are bare, be short-circuited, and where
possible grounded at the place where the work is being done.
Rule 19. All switches installed with overload protection devices,
and all automatic overload circuit breakers must have the trip coils so
adjusted as to afford complete protection against overloads and short
circuits, and the same must be so arranged that no pole can be opened
manually without opening all the poles, and the trip coils shall be
instantly operative upon closing.
Rule 20. All feeders for electric railways must, before leaving
the plant or substation, be protected by an approved circuit breaker
which will cut off the circuit in case of an accidental ground or short
circuit.
Rule 21. There shall be provided in all distributing stations a
ground detecting device.
Rule 22. There shall be provided in all stations, plants, and
buildings herein specified warning cards printed on red cardboard not
less than two and one-quarter by four and one-half inches in size,
which shall be attached to all switches opened for the purpose of
((linemen)) lineworkers or other employees working on the wires. The
person opening any line switch shall enter upon said card the name of
the person ordering the switch opened, the time opened, the time line
was reported clear and by whom, and shall sign his own name.
Rule 23. No manhole containing any wire carrying a current of over
three hundred volts shall be less than six feet from floor to inside of
roof; if circular in shape it shall not be less than six feet in
diameter; if square it shall be six feet from wall to wall: PROVIDED
HOWEVER, That this paragraph shall not apply to any manhole in which it
shall not be required that any person enter to perform work: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the foregoing provisions of this paragraph shall not
apply where satisfactory proof shall be submitted to the proper
authorities that it is impracticable or physically impossible to comply
with this law within the space or location designated by the proper
authorities.
Rule 24. All manholes containing any wires or appliances carrying
electrical current shall be kept in a sanitary condition, free from
stagnant water or seepage or other drainage which is offensive or
dangerous to health, either by sewer connection or otherwise, while any
person is working in the same.
Rule 25. No manhole shall have an opening to the outer air of less
than twenty-six inches in diameter, and the cover of same shall be
provided with vent hole or holes equivalent to three square inches in
area.
Rule 26. No manhole shall have an opening which is, at the surface
of the ground, within a distance of three feet at any point from any
rail of any railway or street car track: PROVIDED, That this shall not
apply where satisfactory proof shall be submitted to the proper
authorities that it is impracticable or physically impossible to comply
with the provisions of this paragraph: PROVIDED, That in complying
with the provisions of this rule only the construction last in point of
time performed, placed or erected shall be held to be in violation
thereof.
Rule 27. Whenever persons are working in any manhole whose opening
to the outer air is less than three feet from the rail of any railway
or street car track, a ((watchman)) watchperson or attendant shall be
stationed on the surface at the entrance of such manhole at all times
while work is being performed therein.
Rule 28. All persons employed in manholes shall be furnished with
insulated platforms so as to protect the workers while at work in the
manholes: PROVIDED, That this paragraph shall not apply to manholes
containing only telephone, telegraph or signal wires or cables.
Rule 29. No work shall be permitted to be done on any live wire,
cable or appliance carrying more than seven hundred fifty volts of
electricity by less than two competent and experienced persons, who, at
all times while performing such work shall be in the same room,
chamber, manhole or other place in which, or on the same pole on which,
such work is being done: PROVIDED, That in districts where only one
competent and experienced person is regularly employed, and a second
competent and experienced person cannot be obtained without delay at
prevailing rate of pay in said district, such work shall be permitted
to be done by one competent and experienced person and a helper who
need not be on the same pole on which said work is being done.
No work shall be permitted to be done in any manhole or subway on
any live wire, cable or appliance carrying more than three hundred
volts of electricity by less than two competent and experienced
persons, who at all times while performing such work shall be in the
same manhole or subway in which such work is being done.
Rule 30. The grounding provided for in these rules shall be done
in the following manner: By connecting a wire or wires not less than
No. 6 B.&S. gauge to a water pipe of a metallic system outside of the
meter, if there is one, or to a copper plate one-sixteenth inch thick
and not less than three feet by six feet area buried in coke below the
permanent moisture level, or to other device equally as efficient. The
ground wire or wires of a direct current system of three or more wires
shall not be smaller than the neutral wire at the central station, and
not smaller than a No. 6 B.&S. gauge elsewhere: PROVIDED, That the
maximum cross section area of any ground wire or wires at the central
station need not exceed one million circular mils. The ground wires
shall be carried in as nearly a straight line as possible, and kinks,
coils and short bends shall be avoided: PROVIDED, That the provisions
of this rule shall not apply as to size to ground wires run from
instrument transformers or meters.

Sec. 82 RCW 22.09.860 and 1963 c 124 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
All railroad companies and ((warehousemen)) warehouse workers
operating in the cities provided for inspection by this chapter shall
furnish ample and sufficient police protection to all their several
terminal yards and terminal tracks to securely protect all cars
containing commodities while the same are in their possession. They
shall prohibit and restrain all unauthorized persons, whether under the
guise of sweepers, or under any other pretext whatever, from entering
or loitering in or about their railroad yards or tracks and from
entering any car of commodities under their control, or removing
commodities therefrom, and shall employ and detail such number of
((watchmen)) watchpersons as may be necessary for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of this section.

Sec. 83 RCW 81.40.095 and 1961 c 14 s 81.40.095 are each amended
to read as follows:
The utilities and transportation commission shall adopt and enforce
rules and regulations relating to sanitation and adequate shelter as it
affects the health of all railroad employees, including but not limited
to railroad ((trainmen, enginemen, yardmen)) workers, maintenance of
way employees, highway crossing ((watchmen)) watchpersons, clerical,
platform, freight house and express employees.

Sec. 84 RCW 19.28.261 and 2003 c 399 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed
to require that a person obtain a license or a certified electrician in
order to do electrical work at his or her residence or farm or place of
business or on other property owned by him or her unless the electrical
work is on the construction of a new building intended for rent, sale,
or lease. However, if the construction is of a new residential
building with up to four units intended for rent, sale, or lease, the
owner may receive an exemption from the requirement to obtain a license
or use a certified electrician if he or she provides a signed affidavit
to the department stating that he or she will be performing the work
and will occupy one of the units as his or her principal residence.
The owner shall apply to the department for this exemption and may only
receive an exemption once every twenty-four months. It is intended
that the owner receiving this exemption shall occupy the unit as his or
her principal residence for twenty-four months after completion of the
units.
(2) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be intended to
derogate from or dispense with the requirements of any valid electrical
code enacted by a city or town pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3), except
that no code shall require the holder of a certificate of competency to
demonstrate any additional proof of competency or obtain any other
license or pay any fee in order to engage in the electrical
construction trade.
(3) RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not apply to common
carriers subject to Part I of the Interstate Commerce Act, nor to their
officers and employees.
(4) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be deemed to
apply to the installation or maintenance of telephone, telegraph,
radio, or television wires and equipment; nor to any electrical utility
or its employees in the installation, repair, and maintenance of
electrical wiring, circuits, and equipment by or for the utility, or
comprising a part of its plants, lines or systems.
(5) The licensing provisions of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271
shall not apply to:
(a) Persons making electrical installations on their own property
or to regularly employed employees working on the premises of their
employer, unless the electrical work is on the construction of a new
building intended for rent, sale, or lease;
(b) Employees of an employer while the employer is performing
utility type work of the nature described in RCW 19.28.091 so long as
such employees have registered in the state of Washington with or
graduated from a state-approved outside ((lineman)) lineworker
apprenticeship course that is recognized by the department and that
qualifies a person to perform such work;
(c) Any work exempted under RCW 19.28.091(6); and
(d) Certified plumbers, certified residential plumbers, or plumber
trainees meeting the requirements of chapter 18.106 RCW and performing
exempt work under RCW 19.28.091(8).
(6) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed
to restrict the right of any householder to assist or receive
assistance from a friend, neighbor, relative or other person when none
of the individuals doing the electrical installation hold themselves
out as engaged in the trade or business of electrical installations.
(7) Nothing precludes any person who is exempt from the licensing
requirements of this chapter under this section from obtaining a
journeyman or specialty certificate of competency if they otherwise
meet the requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 85 RCW 19.28.321 and 2001 c 211 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director of labor and industries of the state of Washington and
the officials of all incorporated cities and towns where electrical
inspections are required by local ordinances shall have power and it
shall be their duty to enforce the provisions of this chapter in their
respective jurisdictions. The director of labor and industries shall
appoint a chief electrical inspector and may appoint other electrical
inspectors as the director deems necessary to assist the director in
the performance of the director's duties. The chief electrical
inspector, subject to the review of the director, shall be responsible
for providing the final interpretation of adopted state electrical
standards, rules, and policies for the department and its inspectors,
assistant inspectors, electrical plan examiners, and other individuals
supervising electrical program personnel. If a dispute arises within
the department regarding the interpretation of adopted state electrical
standards, rules, or policies, the chief electrical inspector, subject
to the review of the director, shall provide the final interpretation
of the disputed standard, rule, or policy. All electrical inspectors
appointed by the director of labor and industries shall have not less
than: Four years experience as ((journeyman)) journeyperson
electricians in the electrical construction trade installing and
maintaining electrical wiring and equipment, or two years electrical
training in a college of electrical engineering of recognized standing
and four years continuous practical electrical experience in
installation work, or four years of electrical training in a college of
electrical engineering of recognized standing and two years continuous
practical electrical experience in electrical installation work; or
four years experience as a ((journeyman)) journeyperson electrician
performing the duties of an electrical inspector employed by the
department or a city or town with an approved inspection program under
RCW 19.28.141, except that for work performed in accordance with the
national electrical safety code and covered by this chapter, such
inspections may be performed by a person certified as an outside
((journeyman lineman)) journeyperson lineworker, under RCW
19.28.261(((2))) (5)(b), with four years experience or a person with
four years experience as a certified outside ((journeyman lineman))
journeyperson lineworker performing the duties of an electrical
inspector employed by an electrical utility. Such state inspectors
shall be paid such salary as the director of labor and industries shall
determine, together with their travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended. As a
condition of employment, inspectors hired exclusively to perform
inspections in accordance with the national electrical safety code must
possess and maintain certification as an outside ((journeyman lineman))
journeyperson lineworker. The expenses of the director of labor and
industries and the salaries and expenses of state inspectors incurred
in carrying out the provisions of this chapter shall be paid entirely
out of the electrical license fund, upon vouchers approved by the
director of labor and industries.

Sec. 86 RCW 50.04.240 and 1945 c 35 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
The term "employment" shall not include service as a ((newsboy))
newspaper delivery person selling or distributing newspapers on the
street or from house to house.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 87 The code reviser must recommend legislation
correcting gender-specific references in all existing statutes by
December 1, 2007, and advise the legislature of gender-specific
language changes that would result in substantive changes to the law.

--- END ---