BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Garry Oak
tree occupies unique and special prairie communities in south Puget
Sound and southwestern Washington. These grassy, savannah-like
openings occur in gravelly dry soils and are frequently associated with
glacial outwash. It is here that rich meadow communities of grasses
and wildflowers intermingle with massive oak trees that may be more
than three hundred years old. Idaho fescue, Henderson's shooting star,
and the extraordinary blue camas create a striking blaze of color in
the spring. The yellow prairie violet, the western long-spurred
violet, blue-eyed Mary, and the showy yellow balsam root are all common
in these unique prairies. Garry Oak meadows and prairies have been
important to people since the earliest habitation. Aboriginal people
tended the Garry Oak ecosystems, using fire and cultivation as
management tools. The edible bulbs of camas and other species were the
focus of the plant harvest. European explorers and settlers were
attracted to the aesthetic qualities of the oak landscape. Modern
residents appreciate the spectacular wildflower shows that the meadows
exhibit.
Unfortunately, less than five percent of Garry Oak ecosystems in
Washington remain in a near-natural state, and the remaining areas are
threatened due to habitat loss, fragmentation and degradation due to
invasions of exotic species, and development for agricultural,
industrial, and urban use. Therefore, recognition of the Garry Oak as
the state oak tree is appropriate and will support local efforts to
protect Garry Oak groves and to replant and restore Garry Oaks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The Garry Oak, Quercus Garryana, is hereby designated the official
oak tree of the state of Washington.

--- END ---