BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that efficient,
expedited security screening in international airports in Washington
state is important to both our economy and the security of our
airports. As a trade-dependent state with an economy and culture that
often requires extensive travel from its citizens, efficient and
effective air travel plays a vital role in creating opportunities and
growing the economy. Additionally, a more efficient security screening
system will improve the traveling public's safety by allowing security
agents to focus screening efforts on unknown travelers. As a result,
an evaluation of whether Washington should participate in a federal
program to expedite airport security screening processes will aid the
decision makers in this state to develop a more efficient and effective
security screening policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The international airport expedited
security screening task force is established.
(2) The task force is composed of the following members:
(a) A representative of the airline industry;
(b) A representative of the port of Seattle;
(c) A representative of the Washington/Inland division of the
American automobile association;
(d) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development or the director's designee; and
(e) A representative from the Seattle/King county convention and
visitors bureau.
(3) The task force shall convene by July 1, 2007. Upon convening,
the task force shall select a chair to preside over task force meetings
and a vice chair to preside in the chair's absence.
(4) Staff to the task force must be provided by the department of
community, trade, and economic development. Upon request by the task
force, any state agency must provide information within the scope of
the task force's work.
(5) Members of the task force shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The international airport expedited security
screening task force shall, upon convening, examine the findings and
recommendations of the United States transportation security
administration's registered traveler pilot program and any and all
other information that may be pertinent to expediting security
screening at international airports in Washington state, including the
use of a driver's license. The task force shall report its findings to
the port of Seattle and the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The international airport expedited security
screening task force and its powers and duties terminate June 30, 2008.

--- END ---