BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All personal property owned or leased by a qualifying fraternal
organization is exempt from taxation. If the personal property for
which exemption is sought is leased, the benefit of the exemption must
inure to the qualifying fraternal organization.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Qualifying fraternal organization," except as provided in (b)
of this subsection, means a nonprofit:
(i) Fraternal beneficiary society, order, or association exempt
from federal income tax under section 501(c)(8) of the internal revenue
code; or
(ii) Domestic fraternal society, order, or association exempt from
federal income tax under section 501(c)(10) of the internal revenue
code.
(b) "Qualifying fraternal organization" does not include a
separately organized insurance branch of a fraternal beneficiary
society, order, or association when the insurance branch:
(i) Does not itself operate under the lodge system but operates
exclusively for the benefit of the members of a fraternal beneficiary
society, order, or association that does operate under the lodge
system; and
(ii) Provides for the payment of life, sick, accident, or other
benefits to the members of the fraternal beneficiary society, order, or
association operating under the lodge system.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.36.805 and 2006 c 319 s 1 and 2006 c 226 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In order to qualify for an exemption under this chapter, the
nonprofit organizations, associations, or corporations must satisfy the
conditions in this section.
(2)(a) The property must be used exclusively for the actual
operation of the activity for which exemption is granted, unless
otherwise provided, and does not exceed an amount reasonably necessary
for that purpose, except:
(((a))) (i) The loan or rental of the property does not subject the
property to tax if:
(((i))) (A) The rents and donations received for the use of the
portion of the property are reasonable and do not exceed the
maintenance and operation expenses attributable to the portion of the
property loaned or rented; and
(((ii))) (B) Except for the exemptions under RCW 84.36.030(4),
84.36.037, 84.36.050, and 84.36.060(1) (a) and (b), the property would
be exempt from tax if owned by the organization to which it is loaned
or rented;
(((b))) (ii) The use of the property for fund-raising activities
does not subject the property to tax if the fund-raising activities are
consistent with the purposes for which the exemption is granted.
(b) This subsection does not apply to any personal property exempt
under section 1 of this act.
(3) The facilities and services must be available to all regardless
of race, color, national origin or ancestry.
(4) The organization, association, or corporation must be duly
licensed or certified where such licensing or certification is required
by law or regulation.
(5) Property sold to organizations, associations, or corporations
with an option to be repurchased by the seller shall not qualify for
exempt status. This subsection does not apply to property sold to a
nonprofit entity, as defined in RCW 84.36.560(7), by:
(a) A nonprofit as defined in RCW 84.36.800 that is exempt from
income tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code;
(b) A governmental entity established under RCW 35.21.660,
35.21.670, or 35.21.730;
(c) A housing authority created under RCW 35.82.030;
(d) A housing authority meeting the definition in RCW
35.82.210(2)(a); or
(e) A housing authority established under RCW 35.82.300.
(6) The department shall have access to its books in order to
determine whether the nonprofit organization, association, or
corporation is exempt from taxes under this chapter.
(7) This section does not apply to exemptions granted under RCW
84.36.020, 84.36.032, 84.36.250, and 84.36.260.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.36.840 and 1973 2nd ex.s. c 40 s 14 are each
amended to read as follows:
In order to determine whether organizations, associations,
corporations or institutions except those exempted under RCW 84.36.020
((and)), 84.36.030, and section 1 of this act, are exempt from taxes
within the intent of this chapter, and before the exemption shall be
allowed for any year, the superintendent or manager or other proper
officer of the organization, association, corporation or institution
claiming exemption from taxation shall file, with the department of
revenue on forms ((furnished by the director)) prescribed by the
department of revenue, a signed statement made under oath that the
income and the receipts thereof, including donations to it, have been
applied to the actual expenses of operating and maintaining it, or for
its capital expenditures, and to no other purpose. ((Such)) The forms
shall also include a statement of the receipts and disbursements of
said organization((: PROVIDED, That)). However, institutions claiming
exemption under RCW 84.36.050 shall also file ((in addition)) a list of
all property claimed to be exempt, the purpose for which it is used,
the revenue derived from it for the preceding year, the use to which
such revenue was applied, the number of students in attendance at the
school or college, the total revenues of the institution with the
source from which they were derived, and the purposes to which such
revenues were applied, giving the items of such revenues and
expenditures in detail.
((Such report)) This signed statement shall be submitted on or
before April 1st following the close of the accounting period for the
fiscal year ended during the previous calendar year. The department of
revenue shall remove the tax exemption from the property and assets of
any organization, association, corporation, or institution ((which))
that does not file ((such report)) this statement with the department
of revenue on or before the due date((: PROVIDED, That)). The
department of revenue shall allow a reasonable extension of time for
filing upon written request filed on or before the required filing date
and for good cause shown therein.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2008 and thereafter.

--- END ---