BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.743 and 2004 c 213 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Consistent with the policy of the state to reduce outdoor
burning to the greatest extent practical:
(a) Outdoor burning shall not be allowed in any area of the state
where federal or state ambient air quality standards are exceeded for
pollutants emitted by outdoor burning.
(b) Outdoor burning shall not be allowed in any urban growth area
as defined by RCW 36.70A.030, or any city of the state having a
population greater than ten thousand people if such cities are
threatened to exceed state or federal air quality standards, and
alternative disposal practices consistent with good solid waste
management are reasonably available or practices eliminating production
of organic refuse are reasonably available. In no event shall such
burning be allowed after December 31, 2000, except that within the
urban growth areas for cities having a population of less than five
thousand people, that are neither within nor contiguous with any
nonattainment or maintenance area designated under the federal clean
air act, in no event shall such burning be allowed after December 31,
2006.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, outdoor
burning may be allowed for the exclusive purpose of managing storm or
flood-related debris. The decision to allow burning shall be made by
the entity with permitting jurisdiction as determined under RCW
70.94.660 or 70.94.755. If outdoor burning is allowed in areas subject
to (a) or (b) of this subsection, a permit shall be required, and a fee
may be collected to cover the expenses of administering and enforcing
the permit. All conditions and restrictions pursuant to RCW
70.94.750(1) and 70.94.775 apply to outdoor burning allowed under this
section.
(d)(i) Outdoor burning that is normal, necessary, and customary to
ongoing agricultural activities, that is consistent with agricultural
burning authorized under RCW 70.94.650 and 70.94.656, is allowed within
the urban growth area as defined in (b) of this subsection if the
burning is not conducted during air quality episodes, or where a
determination of impaired air quality has been made as provided in RCW
70.94.473, and the agricultural activities preceded the designation as
an urban growth area.
(ii) Outdoor burning of cultivated orchard trees, whether or not
agricultural crops will be replanted on the land, shall be allowed as
an ongoing agricultural activity under this section if a local
horticultural pest and disease board formed under chapter 15.09 RCW, an
extension office agent with Washington State University that has
horticultural experience, or an entomologist employed by the department
of agriculture, has determined in writing that burning is an
appropriate method to prevent or control the spread of horticultural
pests or diseases.
(e)(i) In rural counties with a population density of fewer than
one hundred persons per square mile, as determined by the office of
financial management, cut brush and timber may be burned within an
urban growth area as defined by RCW 36.70A.030 to protect life or
property from a fire hazard when a federal, state, or local fire
official has determined in writing that the material at the site poses
a fire hazard and that properly burning the material is an appropriate
method to eliminate the hazard, unless:
(A) The urban growth area is within an area of the state identified
as nonattainment or maintenance for federal ambient air quality
standards for pollutants emitted by outdoor burning;
(B) There is an air quality episode, or a determination of impaired
air quality has been made as provided in RCW 70.94.473; or
(C) The department or local air authorities have identified either
alternative disposal methods or facilities, or both that are: Located
within a reasonable distance; consistent with good solid-waste
management practices and will accept the type and volume of organic
refuse; and available at a reasonable cost, including any anticipated
labor, material, and equipment costs incurred to handle, pile, chip,
haul, or dispose of the material, that is less than or equivalent to
the median of all county tipping fees in the state for disposal of
municipal solid waste.
(ii) If the conditions of this subsection (1)(e) are met, the
appropriate permitting entity under this chapter shall issue, but may
require fire containment and weather-related conditions on, a site
specific permit to allow burning consistent with this subsection
(1)(e). A local fire district making a fire hazard determination or
issuing a site-specific burning permit, or both, may collect a fee, not
to exceed thirty-five dollars. Other entities issuing a site-specific
burning permit may collect a fee not to exceed five dollars.
(2) "Outdoor burning" means the combustion of material of any type
in an open fire or in an outdoor container without providing for the
control of combustion or the control of emissions from the combustion.
(3) This section shall not apply to silvicultural burning used to
improve or maintain fire dependent ecosystems for rare plants or
animals within state, federal, and private natural area preserves,
natural resource conservation areas, parks, and other wildlife areas.

--- END ---