BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.865 and 2006 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
diesel fuel, propane, or aircraft fuel as defined in RCW 82.42.010(5),
to a farm fuel user for nonhighway use. This exemption is available
only if the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in
a form and manner prescribed by the department. Fuel used for space or
water heating for human habitation is not exempt under this section.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.04.213 and this subsection apply to
this section.
(a) "Diesel fuel" is defined as provided in 26 U.S.C. 4083, as
amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2006.
(b) "Farm fuel user" means: (i) A farmer; or (ii) a person who
provides horticultural services for farmers, such as soil preparation
services, crop cultivation services, and crop harvesting services.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.865 and 2006 c 7 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
nonhighway use of diesel fuel, propane, or aircraft fuel as defined in
RCW 82.42.010(5), by a farm fuel user. Fuel used for space or water
heating for human habitation is not exempt under this section.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.08.865 apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---