BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.212 and 2005 c 413 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The driver of any motor vehicle, upon approaching a stationary
authorized emergency vehicle that is making use of audible and/or
visual signals meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.190, a tow truck
that is making use of visual red lights meeting the requirements of RCW
46.37.196, other vehicles providing roadside assistance that are making
use of warning lights with three hundred sixty degree visibility, or
((of)) a police vehicle properly and lawfully displaying a flashing,
blinking, or alternating emergency light or lights, shall:
(1) On a highway having ((at least)) four or more lanes, at least
two of which are intended for traffic proceeding in the same direction
as the approaching vehicle, proceed with caution and, if reasonable,
with due regard for safety and traffic conditions, yield the
right-of-way by making a lane change or moving away from the lane or
shoulder occupied by the stationary authorized emergency vehicle or
police vehicle; ((or))
(2) On a highway having less than four lanes, proceed with caution,
reduce the speed of the vehicle, and, if reasonable, with due regard
for safety and traffic conditions, and under the rules of this chapter,
yield the right-of-way by passing to the left at a safe distance and
simultaneously yield the right-of-way to all vehicles traveling in the
proper direction upon the highway; or
(3) If changing lanes or moving away would be unreasonable or
unsafe, proceed with due caution and reduce the speed of the vehicle.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.100 and 1997 c 253 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon all roadways of sufficient width a vehicle shall be driven
upon the right half of the roadway, except as follows:
(a) When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the
same direction under the rules governing such movement;
(b) When an obstruction exists making it necessary to drive to the
left of the center of the highway; provided, any person so doing shall
yield the right-of-way to all vehicles traveling in the proper
direction upon the unobstructed portion of the highway within such
distance as to constitute an immediate hazard;
(c) Upon a roadway divided into three marked lanes and providing
for two-way movement traffic under the rules applicable thereon; ((or))
(d) Upon a street or highway restricted to one-way traffic; or
(e) Upon a highway having three lanes or less, when approaching a
stationary authorized emergency vehicle, tow truck or other vehicle
providing roadside assistance while operating warning lights with three
hundred sixty degree visibility, or police vehicle as described under
RCW 46.61.212(2).
(2) Upon all roadways having two or more lanes for traffic moving
in the same direction, all vehicles shall be driven in the right-hand
lane then available for traffic, except (a) when overtaking and passing
another vehicle proceeding in the same direction, (b) when traveling at
a speed greater than the traffic flow, (c) when moving left to allow
traffic to merge, or (d) when preparing for a left turn at an
intersection, exit, or into a private road or driveway when such left
turn is legally permitted. On any such roadway, a vehicle or
combination over ten thousand pounds shall be driven only in the right-hand lane except under the conditions enumerated in (a) through (d) of
this subsection.
(3) No vehicle towing a trailer or no vehicle or combination over
ten thousand pounds may be driven in the left-hand lane of a limited
access roadway having three or more lanes for traffic moving in one
direction except when preparing for a left turn at an intersection,
exit, or into a private road or driveway when a left turn is legally
permitted. This subsection does not apply to a vehicle using a high-occupancy vehicle lane. A high-occupancy vehicle lane is not
considered the left-hand lane of a roadway. The department of
transportation, in consultation with the Washington state patrol, shall
adopt rules specifying (a) those circumstances where it is permissible
for other vehicles to use the left lane in case of emergency or to
facilitate the orderly flow of traffic, and (b) those segments of
limited access roadway to be exempt from this subsection due to the
operational characteristics of the roadway.
(4) It is a traffic infraction to drive continuously in the left
lane of a multilane roadway when it impedes the flow of other traffic.
(5) Upon any roadway having four or more lanes for moving traffic
and providing for two-way movement of traffic, a vehicle shall not be
driven to the left of the center line of the roadway except when
authorized by official traffic control devices designating certain
lanes to the left side of the center of the roadway for use by traffic
not otherwise permitted to use such lanes, or except as permitted under
subsection (1)(b) of this section. However, this subsection shall not
be construed as prohibiting the crossing of the center line in making
a left turn into or from an alley, private road or driveway.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.61.120 and 2005 c 396 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
No vehicle shall be driven to the left side of the center of the
roadway in overtaking and passing other traffic proceeding in the same
direction unless authorized by the provisions of RCW 46.61.100 through
46.61.160 and 46.61.212 and unless such left side is clearly visible
and is free of oncoming traffic for a sufficient distance ahead to
permit such overtaking and passing to be completely made without
interfering with the operation of any traffic approaching from the
opposite direction or any traffic overtaken. In every event the
overtaking vehicle must return to an authorized lane of travel as soon
as practicable and in the event the passing movement involves the use
of a lane authorized for vehicles approaching from the opposite
direction, before coming within two hundred feet of any approaching
traffic.

--- END ---