BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.04.050 and 1987 c 291 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following named officers and persons, active or retired, are
hereby authorized to solemnize marriages, to wit: Justices of the
supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of the superior
courts, supreme court commissioners, court of appeals commissioners,
superior court commissioners, any regularly licensed or ordained
minister or any priest of any church or religious denomination, and
judges of courts of limited jurisdiction as defined in RCW 3.02.010.

--- END ---