BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.64.170 and 2006 c 164 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any ferry employee organization certified as the bargaining
representative shall be the exclusive representative of all ferry
employees in the bargaining unit and shall represent all such employees
fairly.
(2) A ferry employee organization or organizations and the governor
may each designate any individual as its representative to engage in
collective bargaining negotiations.
(3) Negotiating sessions, including strategy meetings of the
employer or employee organizations, mediation, and the deliberative
process of arbitrators are exempt from the provisions of chapter 42.30
RCW. Hearings conducted by arbitrators may be open to the public by
mutual consent of the parties.
(4) Terms of any collective bargaining agreement may be enforced by
civil action in Thurston county superior court upon the initiative of
either party.
(5) Ferry system employees or any employee organization shall not
negotiate or attempt to negotiate directly with anyone other than the
person who has been appointed or authorized a bargaining representative
for the purpose of bargaining with the ferry employees or their
representative.
(6)(a) Within ten working days after the first Monday in September
of every odd-numbered year, the parties shall attempt to agree on an
interest arbitrator to be used if the parties are not successful in
negotiating a comprehensive collective bargaining agreement. If the
parties cannot agree on an arbitrator within the ten-day period, either
party may request a list of seven arbitrators from the federal
mediation and conciliation service. The parties shall select an
interest arbitrator using the coin toss/alternate strike method within
thirty calendar days of receipt of the list. Immediately upon
selecting an interest arbitrator, the parties shall cooperate to
reserve dates with the arbitrator for potential arbitration between
August 1st and September 15th of the following even-numbered year. The
parties shall also prepare a schedule of at least five negotiation
dates for the following year, absent an agreement to the contrary. The
parties shall execute a written agreement before November 1st of each
odd-numbered year setting forth the name of the arbitrator and the
dates reserved for bargaining and arbitration. This subsection (6)(a)
imposes minimum obligations only and is not intended to define or limit
a party's full, good faith bargaining obligation under other sections
of this chapter.
(b) The negotiation of a proposed collective bargaining agreement
by representatives of the employer and a ferry employee organization
shall commence on or about ((September)) February 1st of every ((odd-numbered)) even-numbered year. ((However, negotiations for the 2007-2009 biennial agreements may commence at any time after March 21, 2006.
Negotiations for agreements pertaining to the 2009-2011 biennium and
all subsequent negotiations must conclude on or about April 1st of the
year following the year in which the negotiations commence. If
negotiations are not concluded by April 1st, the parties shall be
deemed to be at impasse and shall proceed to mediation under RCW
47.64.230 and 47.64.300 through 47.64.320.
(b))) (c) For negotiations covering the 2009-2011 biennium and
subsequent biennia, the time periods specified in this section, and in
RCW 47.64.210 and 47.64.300 through 47.64.320, must ensure conclusion
of all agreements on or before ((September 1st)) October 1st of the
even-numbered year next preceding the biennial budget period during
which the agreement should take effect. These time periods may only be
altered by mutual agreement of the parties in writing. Any such
agreement and any impasse procedures agreed to by the parties under RCW
47.64.200 must include an agreement regarding the new time periods that
will allow final resolution by negotiations or arbitration by
((September)) October 1st of each even-numbered year. ((Negotiations
for the 2007-2009 biennium must be concluded on or before October 1,
2006.))
(7) Until a new collective bargaining agreement is in effect, the
terms and conditions of the previous collective bargaining agreement
shall remain in force. It is the intent of this section that the
collective bargaining agreement or arbitrator's award shall commence on
July 1st of each odd-numbered year and shall terminate on June 30th of
the next odd-numbered year to coincide with the ensuing biennial budget
year, as defined by RCW 43.88.020(7), to the extent practical. It is
further the intent of this section that all collective bargaining
agreements be concluded by ((September)) October 1st of the even-numbered year before the commencement of the biennial budget year
during which the agreements are to be in effect.
(8)(a) The governor shall submit a request either for funds
necessary to implement the collective bargaining agreements including,
but not limited to, the compensation and fringe benefit provisions or
for legislation necessary to implement the agreement, or both.
Requests for funds necessary to implement the collective bargaining
agreements shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor
unless such requests:
(i) Have been submitted to the director of the office of financial
management by October 1st before the legislative session at which the
requests are to be considered; and
(ii) Have been certified by the director of the office of financial
management as being feasible financially for the state.
(b) The governor shall submit a request either for funds necessary
to implement the arbitration awards or for legislation necessary to
implement the arbitration awards, or both. Requests for funds
necessary to implement the arbitration awards shall not be submitted to
the legislature by the governor unless such requests have been
submitted to the director of the office of financial management by
October 1st before the legislative session at which the requests are to
be considered.
(c) The legislature shall approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds necessary to implement the collective bargaining
agreements or arbitration awards as a whole for each agreement or
award. The legislature shall not consider a request for funds to
implement a collective bargaining agreement or arbitration award unless
the request is transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's
budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060. If the
legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, either party may
reopen all or part of the agreement and award or the exclusive
bargaining representative may seek to implement the procedures provided
for in RCW 47.64.210 and 47.64.300.
(9) If, after the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of an
agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue
shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by
proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both
parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a
mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.64.210 and 2006 c 164 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the absence of an impasse agreement between the parties or the
failure of either party to utilize its procedures by ((April)) August
1st in the even-numbered year preceding the biennium, either party may
request the commission to appoint an impartial and disinterested person
to act as mediator. It is the function of the mediator to bring the
parties together to effectuate a settlement of the dispute, but the
mediator shall not compel the parties to agree.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.64.230 and 2006 c 164 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
By mutual agreement, the parties may waive mediation and proceed
with binding arbitration as provided for in the impasse procedures
agreed to under RCW 47.64.200 or in 47.64.300 through 47.64.320, as
applicable. The waiver shall be in writing and be signed by the
representatives of the parties. Regardless of the status of mediation,
the parties must comply with the interest arbitration agreement under
RCW 47.64.170(6)(a), absent any subsequent agreement to the contrary.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.64.300 and 2006 c 164 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an agreement has not been reached following a reasonable
period of negotiations and, when applicable, mediation, ((but in either
event by April 15th,)) upon the recommendation of the assigned mediator
that the parties remain at impasse or, with respect to biennial
bargaining, in compliance with the interest arbitration agreement under
RCW 47.64.170(6)(a), all impasse items shall be submitted to
arbitration under this section. The issues for arbitration shall be
limited to the issues certified by the commission.
(2) The parties may agree to submit the dispute to a single
arbitrator, whose authority and duties shall be the same as those of an
arbitration panel. If the parties cannot agree on the arbitrator
within five working days, the selection shall be made under subsection
(3) of this section, except with respect to biennial bargaining
described under RCW 47.64.170(6). The full costs of arbitration under
this section shall be shared equally by the parties to the dispute.
(3) Within seven days following the issuance of the determination
of the commission, each party shall, absent an agreement to the
contrary, name one person to serve as its arbitrator on the arbitration
panel. Except with respect to biennial bargaining described under RCW
47.64.170(6), the two members so appointed shall meet within seven days
following the appointment of the later appointed member to attempt to
choose a third member to act as the neutral chair of the arbitration
panel. Upon the failure of the arbitrators to select a neutral chair
within seven days, either party may apply to the federal mediation and
conciliation service, or, with the consent of the parties, the American
arbitration association to provide a list of five qualified arbitrators
from which the neutral chair shall be chosen. Each party shall pay the
fees and expenses of its arbitrator, and the fees and expenses of the
neutral chair shall be shared equally between the parties.
(4) In consultation with the parties, the arbitrator or arbitration
panel shall promptly establish a date, time, and place for a hearing
and shall provide reasonable notice thereof to the parties to the
dispute. The parties shall exchange final positions in writing, with
copies to the arbitrator or arbitration panel, with respect to every
issue to be arbitrated, on a date mutually agreed upon, but in no event
later than ten working days before the date set for hearing. A
hearing, which shall be informal, shall be held, and each party shall
have the opportunity to present evidence and make argument. No member
of the arbitration panel may present the case for a party to the
proceedings. The rules of evidence prevailing in judicial proceedings
may be considered, but are not binding, and any oral testimony or
documentary evidence or other data deemed relevant by the chair of the
arbitration panel may be received in evidence. A recording of the
proceedings shall be taken. The arbitration panel has the power to
administer oaths, require the attendance of witnesses, and require the
production of such books, papers, contracts, agreements, and documents
as may be deemed by the panel to be material to a just determination of
the issues in dispute. If any person refuses to obey a subpoena issued
by the arbitration panel, or refuses to be sworn or to make an
affirmation to testify, or any witness, party, or attorney for a party
is guilty of any contempt while in attendance at any hearing held
hereunder, the arbitration panel may invoke the jurisdiction of the
superior court in the county where the labor dispute exists, and the
court has jurisdiction to issue an appropriate order. Any failure to
obey the order may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.
(5) The neutral chair shall consult with the other members of the
arbitration panel, if a panel has been created. Within thirty days
following the conclusion of the hearing, or sooner as the October 1st
deadline set forth in RCW 47.64.170 (6)(c) and (7) necessitates, the
neutral chair shall make written findings of fact and a written
determination of the issues in dispute, based on the evidence
presented. A copy thereof shall be served on each of the other members
of the arbitration panel, and on each of the parties to the dispute.
That determination is final and binding upon both parties, subject to
review by the superior court upon the application of either party
solely upon the question of whether the decision of the panel was
arbitrary or capricious.

--- END ---