BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.228 and 2005 c 274 s 264 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each city or town that owns or operates a rail fixed guideway
system as defined in RCW 81.104.015 shall submit a system safety
program plan and a system security ((program)) and emergency
preparedness plan for that guideway to the state department of
transportation by September 1, 1999, or at least ((three months)) one
hundred eighty calendar days before beginning operations or instituting
revisions to its plans. ((This)) These plans must describe the city's
procedures for (a) reporting and investigating reportable accidents,
unacceptable hazardous conditions, and security breaches, (b)
submitting corrective action plans and annual safety and security audit
reports, (c) facilitating on-site safety and security reviews by the
state department of transportation, and (d) addressing passenger and
employee security. The plans must, at a minimum, conform to the
standards adopted by the state department of transportation. If
required by the department, the city or town shall revise its plans to
incorporate the department's review comments within sixty days after
their receipt, and resubmit its revised plans for review.
(2) Each city or town shall implement and comply with its system
safety program plan and system security ((program)) and emergency
preparedness plan. The city or town shall perform internal safety and
security audits to evaluate its compliance with the plans, and submit
its audit schedule to the department of transportation no later than
December 15th each year. The city or town shall prepare an annual
report for its internal safety and security audits undertaken in the
prior year and submit it to the department no later than February 15th.
This annual report must include the dates the audits were conducted,
the scope of the audit activity, the audit findings and
recommendations, the status of any corrective actions taken as a result
of the audit activity, and the results of each audit in terms of the
adequacy and effectiveness of the plans.
(3) Each city or town shall notify the department of transportation
within ((twenty-four)) two hours of an occurrence of a reportable
accident, unacceptable hazardous condition, or security breach. The
department may adopt rules further defining a reportable accident,
unacceptable hazardous condition, or security breach. The city or town
shall investigate all reportable accidents, unacceptable hazardous
conditions, or security breaches and provide a written investigation
report to the department within forty-five calendar days after the
reportable accident, unacceptable hazardous condition, or security
breach.
(4) The system security ((section of the safety)) and ((security))
emergency preparedness plan required in subsection (1)(((d))) of this
section is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.
However, the ((activities and plans)) system safety program plan as
described in ((subsections (1)(a), (b), and (c), (2), and (3) of)) this
section ((are)) is not subject to this exemption.

Sec. 2 RCW 35A.21.300 and 2005 c 274 s 267 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each code city that owns or operates a rail fixed guideway
system as defined in RCW 81.104.015 shall submit a system safety
program plan and a system security ((program)) and emergency
preparedness plan for that guideway to the state department of
transportation by September 1, 1999, or at least ((three months)) one
hundred eighty calendar days before beginning operations or instituting
revisions to its plans. ((This)) These plans must describe the code
city's procedures for (a) reporting and investigating reportable
accidents, unacceptable hazardous conditions, and security breaches,
(b) submitting corrective action plans and annual safety and security
audit reports, (c) facilitating on-site safety and security reviews by
the state department of transportation, and (d) addressing passenger
and employee security. The plans must, at a minimum, conform to the
standards adopted by the state department of transportation. If
required by the department, the code city shall revise its plans to
incorporate the department's review comments within sixty days after
their receipt, and resubmit its revised plans for review.
(2) Each code city shall implement and comply with its system
safety program plan and system security ((program)) and emergency
preparedness plan. The code city shall perform internal safety and
security audits to evaluate its compliance with the plans, and submit
its audit schedule to the department of transportation no later than
December 15th each year. The code city shall prepare an annual report
for its internal safety and security audits undertaken in the prior
year and submit it to the department no later than February 15th. This
annual report must include the dates the audits were conducted, the
scope of the audit activity, the audit findings and recommendations,
the status of any corrective actions taken as a result of the audit
activity, and the results of each audit in terms of the adequacy and
effectiveness of the plans.
(3) Each code city shall notify the department of transportation
within ((twenty-four)) two hours of an occurrence of a reportable
accident, unacceptable hazardous condition, or security breach. The
department may adopt rules further defining a reportable accident,
unacceptable hazardous condition, or security breach. The code city
shall investigate all reportable accidents, unacceptable hazardous
conditions, or security breaches and provide a written investigation
report to the department within forty-five calendar days after the
reportable accident, unacceptable hazardous condition, or security
breach.
(4) The system security ((section of the safety and security)) and
emergency preparedness plan required in subsection (1)(((d))) of this
section is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.
However, the ((activities and plans)) system safety program plan as
described in ((subsections (1)(a), (b), and (c), (2), and (3) of)) this
section ((are)) is not subject to this exemption.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.01.210 and 2005 c 274 s 268 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each county functioning under chapter 36.56 RCW that owns or
operates a rail fixed guideway system as defined in RCW 81.104.015
shall submit a system safety program plan and a system security
((program)) and emergency preparedness plan for that guideway to the
state department of transportation by September 1, 1999, or at least
((three months)) one hundred eighty calendar days before beginning
operations or instituting revisions to its plans. ((This)) These plans
must describe the county's procedures for (a) reporting and
investigating reportable accidents, unacceptable hazardous conditions,
and security breaches, (b) submitting corrective action plans and
annual safety and security audit reports, (c) facilitating on-site
safety and security reviews by the state department of transportation,
and (d) addressing passenger and employee security. The plans must, at
a minimum, conform to the standards adopted by the state department of
transportation. If required by the department, the county shall revise
its plans to incorporate the department's review comments within sixty
days after their receipt, and resubmit its revised plans for review.
(2) Each county functioning under chapter 36.56 RCW shall implement
and comply with its system safety program plan and system security
((program)) and emergency preparedness plan. The county shall perform
internal safety and security audits to evaluate its compliance with the
plans, and submit its audit schedule to the department of
transportation no later than December 15th each year. The county shall
prepare an annual report for its internal safety and security audits
undertaken in the prior year and submit it to the department no later
than February 15th. This annual report must include the dates the
audits were conducted, the scope of the audit activity, the audit
findings and recommendations, the status of any corrective actions
taken as a result of the audit activity, and the results of each audit
in terms of the adequacy and effectiveness of the plans.
(3) Each county shall notify the department of transportation
within ((twenty-four)) two hours of an occurrence of a reportable
accident, unacceptable hazardous condition, or security breach. The
department may adopt rules further defining a reportable accident,
unacceptable hazardous condition, or security breach. The county shall
investigate all reportable accidents, unacceptable hazardous
conditions, or security breaches and provide a written investigation
report to the department within forty-five calendar days after the
reportable accident, unacceptable hazardous condition, or security
breach.
(4) The system security ((section of the safety and security)) and
emergency preparedness plan required in subsection (1)(((d))) of this
section is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.
However, the ((activities and plans)) system safety program plan as
described in ((subsections (1)(a), (b), and (c), (2), and (3) of)) this
section ((are)) is not subject to this exemption.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.57.120 and 2005 c 274 s 270 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each county transportation authority that owns or operates a
rail fixed guideway system as defined in RCW 81.104.015 shall submit a
system safety program plan and a system security ((program)) and
emergency preparedness plan for that guideway to the state department
of transportation by September 1, 1999, or at least ((three months))
one hundred eighty calendar days before beginning operations or
instituting revisions to its plans. ((This)) These plans must describe
the county transportation authority's procedures for (a) reporting and
investigating reportable accidents, unacceptable hazardous conditions,
and security breaches, (b) submitting corrective action plans and
annual safety and security audit reports, (c) facilitating on-site
safety and security reviews by the state department of transportation,
and (d) addressing passenger and employee security. The plans must, at
a minimum, conform to the standards adopted by the state department of
transportation. If required by the department, the county
transportation authority shall revise its plans to incorporate the
department's review comments within sixty days after their receipt, and
resubmit its revised plans for review.
(2) Each county transportation authority shall implement and comply
with its system safety program plan and system security ((program)) and
emergency preparedness plan. The county transportation authority shall
perform internal safety and security audits to evaluate its compliance
with the plans, and submit its audit schedule to the department of
transportation no later than December 15th each year. The county
transportation authority shall prepare an annual report for its
internal safety and security audits undertaken in the prior year and
submit it to the department no later than February 15th. This annual
report must include the dates the audits were conducted, the scope of
the audit activity, the audit findings and recommendations, the status
of any corrective actions taken as a result of the audit activity, and
the results of each audit in terms of the adequacy and effectiveness of
the plans.
(3) Each county transportation authority shall notify the
department of transportation within ((twenty-four)) two hours of an
occurrence of a reportable accident, unacceptable hazardous condition,
or security breach. The department may adopt rules further defining a
reportable accident, unacceptable hazardous condition, or security
breach. The county transportation authority shall investigate all
reportable accidents, unacceptable hazardous conditions, or security
breaches and provide a written investigation report to the department
within forty-five calendar days after the reportable accident,
unacceptable hazardous condition, or security breach.
(4) The system security ((section of the safety and security)) and
emergency preparedness plan required in subsection (1)(((d))) of this
section is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.
However, the ((activities and plans)) system safety program plan as
described in ((subsections (1)(a), (b), and (c), (2), and (3) of)) this
section ((are)) is not subject to this exemption.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.57A.170 and 2005 c 274 s 271 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each public transportation benefit area that owns or operates
a rail fixed guideway system as defined in RCW 81.104.015 shall submit
a system safety program plan and a system security ((program)) and
emergency preparedness plan for that guideway to the state department
of transportation by September 1, 1999, or at least ((three months))
one hundred eighty calendar days before beginning operations or
instituting revisions to its plans. ((This)) These plans must describe
the public transportation benefit area's procedures for (a) reporting
and investigating reportable accidents, unacceptable hazardous
conditions, and security breaches, (b) submitting corrective action
plans and annual safety and security audit reports, (c) facilitating
on-site safety and security reviews by the state department of
transportation, and (d) addressing passenger and employee security.
The plans must, at a minimum, conform to the standards adopted by the
state department of transportation. If required by the department, the
public transportation benefit area shall revise its plans to
incorporate the department's review comments within sixty days after
their receipt, and resubmit its revised plans for review.
(2) Each public transportation benefit area shall implement and
comply with its system safety program plan and system security
((program)) and emergency preparedness plan. The public transportation
benefit area shall perform internal safety and security audits to
evaluate its compliance with the plans, and submit its audit schedule
to the department of transportation no later than December 15th each
year. The public transportation benefit area shall prepare an annual
report for its internal safety and security audits undertaken in the
prior year and submit it to the department no later than February 15th.
This annual report must include the dates the audits were conducted,
the scope of the audit activity, the audit findings and
recommendations, the status of any corrective actions taken as a result
of the audit activity, and the results of each audit in terms of the
adequacy and effectiveness of the plans.
(3) Each public transportation benefit area shall notify the
department of transportation within ((twenty-four)) two hours of an
occurrence of a reportable accident, unacceptable hazardous condition,
or security breach. The department may adopt rules further defining a
reportable accident, unacceptable hazardous condition, or security
breach. The public transportation benefit area shall investigate all
reportable accidents, unacceptable hazardous conditions, or security
breaches and provide a written investigation report to the department
within forty-five calendar days after the reportable accident,
unacceptable hazardous condition, or security breach.
(4) The system security ((section of the safety and security)) and
emergency preparedness plan required in subsection (1)(((d))) of this
section is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.
However, the ((activities and plans)) system safety program plan as
described in ((subsections (1)(a), (b), and (c), (2), and (3) of)) this
section ((are)) is not subject to this exemption.

Sec. 6 RCW 81.112.180 and 2005 c 274 s 360 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each regional transit authority that owns or operates a rail
fixed guideway system as defined in RCW 81.104.015 shall submit a
system safety program plan and a system security ((program)) and
emergency preparedness plan for that guideway to the state department
of transportation by September 1, 1999, or at least ((three months))
one hundred eighty calendar days before beginning operations or
instituting revisions to its plans. ((This)) These plans must describe
the authority's procedures for (a) reporting and investigating
reportable accidents, unacceptable hazardous conditions, and security
breaches, (b) submitting corrective action plans and annual safety and
security audit reports, (c) facilitating on-site safety and security
reviews by the state department of transportation, and (d) addressing
passenger and employee security. The plans must, at a minimum, conform
to the standards adopted by the state department of transportation. If
required by the department, the regional transit authority shall revise
its plans to incorporate the department's review comments within sixty
days after their receipt, and resubmit its revised plans for review.
(2) Each regional transit authority shall implement and comply with
its system safety program plan and system security ((program)) and
emergency preparedness plan. The regional transit authority shall
perform internal safety and security audits to evaluate its compliance
with the plans, and submit its audit schedule to the department of
transportation no later than December 15th each year. The regional
transit authority shall prepare an annual report for its internal
safety and security audits undertaken in the prior year and submit it
to the department no later than February 15th. This annual report must
include the dates the audits were conducted, the scope of the audit
activity, the audit findings and recommendations, the status of any
corrective actions taken as a result of the audit activity, and the
results of each audit in terms of the adequacy and effectiveness of the
plans.
(3) Each regional transit authority shall notify the department of
transportation within ((twenty-four)) two hours of an occurrence of a
reportable accident, unacceptable hazardous condition, or security
breach. The department may adopt rules further defining a reportable
accident, unacceptable hazardous condition, or security breach. The
regional transit authority shall investigate all reportable accidents,
unacceptable hazardous conditions, or security breaches and provide a
written investigation report to the department within forty-five
calendar days after the reportable accident, unacceptable hazardous
condition, or security breach.
(4) The system security ((section of the safety and security)) and
emergency preparedness plan required in subsection (1)(((d))) of this
section is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.
However, the ((activities and plans)) system safety program plan as
described in ((subsections (1)(a), (b), and (c), (2), and (3) of)) this
section ((are)) is not subject to this exemption.

Sec. 7 RCW 81.104.115 and 2005 c 274 s 359 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may collect and review the system safety program
plan and the system security ((program)) and emergency preparedness
plan prepared by each owner or operator of a rail fixed guideway
system. In carrying out this function, the department may adopt rules
specifying the elements and standard to be contained in a system safety
program plan and a system security ((program)) and emergency
preparedness plan, and the content of any investigation report,
corrective action plan, and accompanying implementation schedule
resulting from a reportable accident, unacceptable hazardous condition,
or security breach. These rules may include due dates for the
department's timely receipt of and response to required documents.
(2) The ((security section of the)) system ((safety and)) security
and emergency preparedness plan as described in ((subsection (1)(d)
of)) RCW 35.21.228, 35A.21.300, 36.01.210, 36.57.120, 36.57A.170, and
81.112.180 ((are)) is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56
RCW by the department when collected from the owners and operators of
fixed railway systems. However, the ((activities and plans)) system
safety program plan as described in ((subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c)
of)) RCW 35.21.228, 35A.21.300, 36.01.210, 36.57.120, 36.57A.170, and
81.112.180 ((are)) is not exempt from public disclosure.
(3) The department shall audit each system safety program plan and
each system security ((program)) and emergency preparedness plan at
least once every three years. The department may contract with other
persons or entities for the performance of duties required by this
subsection. The department shall provide at least thirty days' advance
notice to the owner or operator of a rail fixed guideway system before
commencing the audit. The owner or operator of each rail fixed
guideway system shall reimburse the reasonable expenses of the
department in carrying out its responsibilities of this subsection
within ninety days after receipt of an invoice. The department shall
notify the owner or operator of the estimated expenses at least six
months in advance of when the department audits the system.
(4) In the event of a reportable accident, unacceptable hazardous
condition, or security breach, the department shall review the
investigation report, corrective action plan, and accompanying
implementation schedule, submitted by the owner or operator of the rail
fixed guideway system to ensure that it meets the goal of preventing
and mitigating a recurrence of the reportable accident, unacceptable
hazardous condition, or security breach.
(a) The department may, at its option, perform a separate,
independent investigation of a reportable accident, unacceptable
hazardous condition, or security breach. The department may contract
with other persons or entities for the performance of duties required
by this subsection.
(b) If the department does not concur with the investigation
report, corrective action plan, and accompanying implementation
schedule, submitted by the owner or operator, the department shall
notify that owner or operator in writing within forty-five days of its
receipt of the complete investigation report, corrective action plan,
and accompanying implementation schedule.
(5) The secretary may adopt rules to implement this section and RCW
35.21.228, 35A.21.300, 36.01.210, 36.57.120, 36.57A.170, and
81.112.180, including rules establishing procedures and timelines for
owners and operators of rail fixed guideway systems to comply with RCW
35.21.228, 35A.21.300, 36.01.210, 36.57.120, 36.57A.170, and 81.112.180
and the rules adopted under this section. If noncompliance by an owner
or operator of a rail fixed guideway system results in the loss of
federal funds to the state of Washington or a political subdivision of
the state, the owner or operator is liable to the affected entity or
entities for the amount of the lost funds.
(6) The department may impose sanctions upon owners and operators
of rail fixed guideway systems, but only for failure to meet reasonable
deadlines for submission of required reports and audits. The
department is expressly prohibited from imposing sanctions for any
other purposes, including, but not limited to, differences in format or
content of required reports and audits.
(7) The department and its employees have no liability arising from
the adoption of rules; the review of or concurrence in a system safety
program plan and a system security ((program)) and emergency
preparedness plan; the separate, independent investigation of a
reportable accident, unacceptable hazardous condition, or security
breach; and the review of or concurrence in a corrective action plan
for a reportable accident, unacceptable hazardous condition, or
security breach.
(8) The department shall set by rule an annual fee for owners and
operators of rail fixed guideway systems to defray the department's
costs associated with the system safety program plans, system security
and emergency preparedness plans, and incident investigations, as
described in this section. The department shall establish by rule the
manner and timing of the collection of the fee.

--- END ---