BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
A state agency or program may not expend funds to implement or
comply with the REAL ID Act of 2005, P.L. 109-13, unless: (1) The
requirements of section 2 of this act are met; and (2) federal funds
are received by the state of Washington and are (a) allocated to fund
the implementation of the REAL ID Act of 2005 in the state, and (b) in
amounts sufficient to cover the costs of the state implementing or
complying with the REAL ID Act of 2005, as those costs are estimated by
the office of financial management. The director of the office of
financial management shall ensure compliance with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Before issuing a driver's license or identicard that complies with
the requirements of the REAL ID Act of 2005, P.L. 109-13, and before
storing or including data about Washington state residents in any
database, records facility, or computer system for purposes of meeting
the requirements of the REAL ID Act of 2005, the department of
licensing shall certify that the driver's license, identicard,
database, records facility, computer system, and the department's
personnel screening and training procedures: (1) Include all
reasonable security measures to protect the privacy of Washington state
residents; (2) include all reasonable safeguards to protect against
unauthorized disclosure of data; and (3) do not place unreasonable
costs or recordkeeping burdens on a driver's license or identicard
applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of licensing and the office of financial
management may analyze the costs and burdens to the state of
Washington, and to applicants of drivers' licenses or identicards, of
complying with the requirements of the REAL ID Act of 2005, P.L. 109-13, and any related federal regulations.
(2) The attorney general may, with approval of the governor,
challenge the legality or constitutionality of the REAL ID Act of 2005.

--- END ---