BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
It is a traffic infraction for a driver of a motor vehicle
intending to board a Washington state ferry, to: (1) Block a
residential driveway while waiting to board the ferry; or (2) move in
front of another vehicle in a queue already waiting to board the ferry,
without the authorization of a state ferry system employee. Vehicles
qualifying for preferential loading privileges under rules adopted by
the department of transportation are exempt from this section. In
addition to any other penalty imposed for a violation of this section,
the driver will be directed to immediately move the motor vehicle to
the end of the queue of vehicles waiting to board the ferry.

--- END ---