BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington is
home to some of the world's most innovative companies, researchers,
entrepreneurs, and workers. Talent and creativity exist in all areas
of Washington. The legislature further finds that economic potential
can be enhanced when the state facilitates partnerships between
talented leaders from research institutions, industry, and local
economic development and workforce development organizations to attract
additional talent and build on the strengths found in existing industry
clusters. Washington is a national leader in economic strategy based
on clusters of industries, promoting the connections among firms,
suppliers, customers, and public resources. It is the intent of the
legislature that Washington support innovation partnerships and
partnership zones around the state that will become globally recognized
as hubs of expertise, innovation, and commercialization and advance
Washington's position in the world economy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall administer, with the advice of the Washington economic
development council, an innovation partnership zone program consisting
of the designation of innovation partnership zones, the awarding of
innovation partnership grants, and the provision of technical and
planning assistance.
(2) On October 1st of each year, the director shall designate
innovation partnership zones. Applications for state designation of an
area as an innovation partnership zone may be submitted by associate
development organizations, port districts, workforce development
councils, cities, or counties. Applicants must demonstrate:
(a) The support of a local jurisdiction, a research institution, an
educational institution, an industry or cluster association, a
workforce development council, and an associate development
organization, port, or chamber of commerce;
(b) Evidence of planning for the innovation partnership zone;
(c) Identifiable boundaries for the zone within which the applicant
will concentrate efforts to connect innovative researchers,
entrepreneurs, investors, industry associations or clusters, and
training providers. The geographic area defined should lend itself to
a distinct identity and have the capacity to accommodate firm growth;
(d) The presence within the proposed innovation partnership zone of
research capacity, including research teams focused on emerging
technologies and their commercialization or faculty and researchers
that could increase their focus on commercialization of technology if
provided the appropriate technical assistance;
(e) Using labor market information from the employment security
department and local labor markets as well as data on revenue growth
rates, wage levels, and other factors, a concentration of firms within
the proposed innovation partnership zone that are important to the
economic prosperity of the state and have comparative competitive
advantage or the potential for comparative competitive advantage;
(f) Training capacity either within the zone or readily accessible
to the zone.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall disburse innovation partnership zone grants.
Innovation partnership zone grants must be used to improve the
commercialization facilities within an area designated as an innovation
partnership zone and be used to facilitate the collaboration between
research teams, industry, and workforce training providers that will
lead to the formation and financing of new innovative firms, the
commercialization of research results, and the movement of firms and
industry clusters into globally competitive niches. The grants will be
awarded only to applicants operating within a designated innovation
partnership zone consistent with the following criteria and such other
criteria as the director develops in consultation with the Washington
state economic development commission:
(a) Each grant must be matched by a commitment of financial support
from the private sector equal to or greater than fifty percent of the
requested grant amount;
(b) Eligible grant applicants may include associate development
organizations, port districts, workforce development councils,
educational or research institutions, and local jurisdictions;
(c) During the biennium ending June 30, 2009, more than two
partnership zone grants shall be awarded to recipients in the central
Puget Sound region, a minimum of two such grants shall be awarded in
eastern Washington and a minimum of one such grant shall be awarded in
western Washington outside the central Puget Sound region;
(d) Applicants for innovation partnership zone grants must:
(i) Disclose the service delivery mechanisms to be used to allow
industry associations, cluster associations, and businesses to access
the technical assistance, advisory, research, and commercialization
capabilities of research teams within the zone;
(ii) Detail how training services will be coordinated and delivered
to industry associations, cluster associations, and businesses within
the zone; and
(iii) Describe the methods by which the applicant will facilitate
the competitiveness of firms, the commercialization of research, and
the upgrading of worker skills within the zone.
(2) The department may provide technical and planning assistance,
either directly or through grants, to prospective applicants for
innovation partnership zone grants who may need additional analyses or
assistance to meet the requirements of the designation process or the
criteria for selection as an innovation partnership zone grant
recipient. The department may reserve up to twenty-five percent of
innovation partnership zone grant funds available for the purposes of
this subsection.
(3) The department shall assist successful innovation partnership
zone grant applicants in identifying and accessing any appropriate
private, federal, or state program that provides funding for planning,
infrastructure, technical assistance, or training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission shall,
with the advice of an innovation partnership advisory group selected by
the commission, have oversight responsibility for the implementation of
the state's efforts to further innovation partnerships throughout the
state. The commission shall:
(a) Provide information and advice to the department of community,
trade, and economic development to assist in the implementation of the
innovation partnership zone program, including criteria to be used in
the selection of grant applicants for funding;
(b) Document clusters of companies throughout the state that have
comparative competitive advantage or the potential for comparative
competitive advantage, using the process and criteria for identifying
strategic clusters developed by the working group specified in
subsection (2) of this section;
(c) Conduct an innovation opportunity analysis to identify (i) the
strongest current intellectual assets and research teams in the state
focused on emerging technologies and their commercialization, and (ii)
faculty and researchers that could increase their focus on
commercialization of technology if provided the appropriate technical
assistance and resources;
(d) Based on its findings and analysis, and in conjunction with the
higher education coordinating board and research institutions:
(i) Develop a plan to build on existing, and develop new,
intellectual assets and innovation research teams in the state in
research areas where there is a high potential to commercialize
technologies. The commission shall present the plan to the governor
and legislature by December 31, 2007. The higher education
coordinating board shall be responsible for implementing the plan in
conjunction with the publicly funded research institutions in the
state. The plan shall address the following elements and such other
elements as the commission deems important:
(A) Specific mechanisms to support, enhance, or develop innovation
research teams and strengthen their research and commercialization
capacity in areas identified as useful to strategic clusters and
innovative firms in the state;
(B) Identification of the funding necessary for laboratory
infrastructure needed to house innovation research teams;
(C) Specification of the most promising research areas meriting
enhanced resources and recruitment of significant entrepreneurial
researchers to join or lead innovation research teams;
(D) The most productive approaches to take in the recruitment, in
the identified promising research areas, of a minimum of ten
significant entrepreneurial researchers over the next ten years to join
or lead innovation research teams;
(E) Steps to take in solicitation of private sector support for the
recruitment of entrepreneurial researchers and the commercialization
activity of innovation research teams; and
(F) Mechanisms for ensuring the location of innovation research
teams in innovation partnership zones;
(ii) Provide direction for the development of comprehensive
entrepreneurial assistance programs at research institutions. The
programs may involve multidisciplinary students, faculty,
entrepreneurial researchers, entrepreneurs, and investors in building
business models and evolving business plans around innovative ideas.
The programs may provide technical assistance and the support of an
entrepreneur-in-residence to innovation research teams and offer
entrepreneurial training to faculty, researchers, undergraduates, and
graduate students. Curriculum leading to a certificate in
entrepreneurship may also be offered;
(e) Develop performance measures to be used in evaluating the
performance of innovation research teams, the implementation of the
plan and programs under (d)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, and the
performance of innovation partnership zone grant recipients, including
but not limited to private investment measures, business initiation
measures, job creation measures, and measures of innovation such as
licensing of ideas in research institutions, patents, or other
recognized measures of innovation. The performance measures developed
shall be consistent with the economic development commission's
comprehensive plan for economic development and its standards and
metrics for program evaluation. The commission shall report to the
legislature and the governor by December 31, 2008, on the measures
developed; and
(f) Using the performance measures developed, perform a biennial
assessment and report, the first of which shall be due December 31,
2012, on:
(i) Commercialization of technologies developed at state
universities, found at other research institutions in the state, and
facilitated with public assistance at existing companies;
(ii) Outcomes of the funding of innovation research teams and
recruitment of significant entrepreneurial researchers;
(iii) Comparison with other states of Washington's outcomes from
the innovation research teams and efforts to recruit significant
entrepreneurial researchers; and
(iv) Outcomes of the grants for innovation partnership zones.
The report shall include recommendations for modifications of this act
and of state commercialization efforts that would enhance the state's
economic competitiveness.
(2) The economic development commission and the workforce training
and education coordinating board shall jointly convene a working group
to:
(a) Specify the process and criteria for identification of substate
geographic concentrations of firms or employment in an industry and the
industry's customers, suppliers, supporting businesses, and
institutions, which process will include the use of labor market
information from the employment security department and local labor
markets; and
(b) Establish criteria for identifying strategic clusters which are
important to economic prosperity in the state, considering cluster
size, growth rate, and wage levels among other factors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
The innovation partnership fund is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. Only the state economic development commission, with
the concurrence of the higher education coordinating board, may
authorize expenditures from the fund. Expenditures from the fund may
be made only for the purposes of section 4 of this act. Revenues to
the fund consist of transfers or appropriations made by the
legislature, transfers made by state research institutions, and private
donations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of this act, "commercialization" means a sequence
of steps, including technology transfer, technical assistance in
product development, production process design, and technical skills
development, necessary to achieve market entry and general market
competitiveness of innovative technologies, processes, and products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---