BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that economic
development success requires coordinated state and local efforts.
Associate development organizations serve as a networking tool and
resource hub for business retention, expansion, and relocation in
Washington. Economic development success requires an adequately funded
and coordinated state effort and an adequately funded and coordinated
local effort. The legislature intends to bolster the partnership
between state and local economic development efforts, provide increased
funding for local economic development services, and increase local
economic development service effectiveness, efficiency, and outcomes.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.330.080 and 1997 c 60 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall contract with county designated associate
development organizations ((or other local organizations)) to increase
the support for and coordination of community and economic development
services in communities or regional areas. The organizations
contracted with in each community or regional area shall be broadly
representative of community and economic interests. The organization
shall be capable of identifying key economic and community development
problems, developing appropriate solutions, and mobilizing broad
support for recommended initiatives. The contracting organization
shall work with and include local governments, local chambers of
commerce, ((private industry councils,)) workforce developing councils,
port districts, labor groups, institutions of higher education,
community action programs, and other appropriate private, public, or
nonprofit community and economic development groups. The ((department
shall be responsible for determining the)) scope of services delivered
under these contracts((.
(2) Associate development organizations or other local development
organizations contracted with shall promote and coordinate, through
local service agreements with local governments, small business
development centers, port districts, community and technical colleges,
private industry councils, and other development organizations, for the
efficient delivery of community and economic development services in
their areas.
(3) The department shall consult with associate development
organizations, port districts, local governments, and other local
development organizations in the establishment of service delivery
regions throughout the state. The legislature encourages local
associate development organizations to form partnerships with other
associate development organizations in their region to combine
resources for better access to available services, to encourage
regional delivery of state services, and to build the local capacity of
communities in the region more effectively.
(4) The department shall contract on a regional basis for surveys
of key sectors of the regional economy and the coordination of
technical assistance to businesses and employees within the key
sectors. The department's selection of contracting organizations or
consortiums shall be based on the sufficiency of the organization's or
consortium's proposal to examine key sectors of the local economy
within its region adequately and its ability to coordinate the delivery
of services required by businesses within the targeted sectors.
Organizations contracting with the department shall work closely with
the department to examine the local economy and to develop strategies
to focus on developing key sectors that show potential for long-term
sustainable growth. The contracting organization shall survey
businesses and employees in targeted sectors on a periodic basis to
gather information on the sector's business needs, expansion plans,
relocation decisions, training needs, potential layoffs, financing
needs, availability of financing, and other appropriate information
about economic trends and specific employer and employee needs in the
region.
(5) The contracting organization shall participate with the
workforce training and education coordinating board as created in
chapter 28C.18 RCW, and any regional entities designated by that board,
in providing for the coordination of job skills training within its
region)) shall include:
(a) The development of a countywide economic development plan
consistent with the state comprehensive plan for economic development
developed by the state economic development commission;
(b) Providing an inventory of sites available for development, and
assisting in site location and selection;
(c) Collecting and maintaining demographic, labor market, and other
data useful for the economic health of the county;
(d) Providing directly, or coordinating the delivery of, permit and
licensing assistance and information to businesses seeking to locate or
expand in the county;
(e) Marketing the county and the state as an excellent location to
expand or locate a business, in coordination with the department's
marketing efforts;
(f) Identifying gaps in the delivery of business start-up
assistance and coordinating efforts with local small business
development centers and other assistance providers to fill the gaps;
(g) Providing business retention and expansion services, including
business surveys and outreach efforts, early detection of potential
relocations or layoffs, and identification of employers' needs;
(h) Partnering with local governments, workforce development
organizations, port districts, export assistance providers, local
colleges and universities, the Washington state quality award council,
the Washington manufacturing service, and small business development
centers to facilitate the alignment of planning efforts and the
seamless delivery of business support services in the county;
(i) Collecting and maintaining data as specified by the state
economic development commission for use in program and system
evaluation; and
(j) Participating in region-wide economic development planning and
research to identify customer needs, identify gaps in services, and
identify methods and organizations available to meet business needs.
Additional regional efforts shall include working with regional
partners to identify opportunities for promoting increased
competitiveness of firms within the region and to coordinate and align
regional workforce development and economic development efforts.
(2) Associate development organizations contracting with the
department under this act that apply for the Washington state quality
award or its equivalent shall receive a ten thousand dollar award but
may not receive this award more than once every three years.
(3) The contracting organization shall participate with the state
board for community and technical colleges as created in RCW
28B.50.050, and any community or technical colleges designated by that
board, in providing for the coordination of job skills training within
its region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Contracting associate development
organizations shall provide the department with measures of their
performance. Annual reports shall include information on the impact of
the contracting organization on employment, wages, tax revenue, and
capital investment. Specific measures consistent with the requirements
of RCW 43.330.080(1) and the direction provided by the economic
development commission shall be developed in the contracting process
between the department and the contracting organization every two
years. Performance measures should be consistent across regions to
allow for statewide evaluation.
(2)(a) The department and contracting organizations shall agree
upon specific target levels for the performance measures developed as
provided in subsection (1) of this section. Comparison of agreed
thresholds and actual performance shall occur annually.
(b) Contracting organizations that fail to achieve the agreed
performance targets in more than one-half of the agreed measures shall
develop remediation plans to address performance gaps. The remediation
plans shall include revised performance thresholds specifically chosen
to provide evidence of progress in making the identified service
changes.
(c) Contracts and state funding shall be terminated for one year
for organizations that fail to achieve the agreed upon progress toward
improved performance defined under (b) of this subsection. During the
year in which termination for nonperformance is in effect,
organizations shall review alternative delivery strategies to include
reorganization of the contracting organization, merging of previous
efforts with existing regional partners, and other specific steps
toward improved performance. At the end of the period of termination,
the department may contract with the associate development organization
or its successor as it deems appropriate.
(3) The department shall report to the legislature and the economic
development commission by December 31st of each year on the performance
results of contracts with associate development organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 To the extent that funds are specifically
appropriated therefor, contracts with associate development
organizations for the provision of services under RCW 43.330.080(1)
shall be awarded according to the following annual schedule:
(1) For associate development associations serving urban counties,
which are counties other than rural counties as defined in RCW
43.160.020, a locally matched allocation of up to ninety cents per
capita, totaling no more than three hundred thousand dollars per
organization;
(2) For associate development associations in rural counties, as
defined in RCW 43.160.020, a per county base allocation of up to forty
thousand dollars and a locally matched allocation of up to ninety cents
per capita.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 3 and 4 of this act are each added
to chapter 43.330 RCW.

--- END ---