BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.402 and 2005 c 279 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Improving the health of children in Washington state is an
investment in a productive and successful next generation. The health
of ((the)) children ((of Washington state)) is critical to their
success in school and throughout their lives((.));
(b) Healthy children are ready to learn. In order to provide
students with the opportunity to become responsible citizens, to
contribute to their own economic well-being and to that of their
families and communities, and to enjoy productive and satisfying lives,
the state recognizes the importance that access to appropriate health
services and improved health brings to the children of Washington
state. In addition, fully immunized children are themselves protected,
and in turn protect others, from contracting communicable diseases;
(c) Children with health insurance coverage have better health
outcomes than those who lack coverage. Children without health
insurance coverage are more likely to be in poor health and more likely
to delay receiving, or go without, needed health care services;
(((b) Access to preventive and well-child health services for
children is a cost-effective investment of both public and private
dollars that improves the health of children and of our communities at
large; and
(c))) (d) Health care coverage for children in Washington state is
the product of critical efforts in both the private and public sectors
to help children succeed. Private health insurance coverage is
complemented by public programs that meet needs of low-income children
whose parents are not offered health insurance coverage through their
employer or who cannot otherwise afford the costs of coverage. In
((2004)) 2006, thirty-five percent of children in Washington state had
some form of public health coverage. Washington state is making
progress in its efforts to increase the number of children with health
care coverage. Yet, even with ((the)) these efforts of both ((the))
private and public sectors, ((too)) many children in Washington state
continue to lack health insurance coverage. ((In 2004, almost one
hundred)) In 2006, over seventy thousand children were uninsured.
Almost two-thirds of these children are ((low income)) in families
whose income is under two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty
level; and
(e) Improved health outcomes for the children of Washington state
are the expected result of improved access to health care coverage.
Linking children with a medical home that provides preventive and well
child health services and referral to needed specialty services,
linking children with needed behavioral health and dental services,
more effectively managing childhood diseases, improving nutrition, and
increasing physical activity are key to improving children's health.
Care should be provided in appropriate settings by efficient providers,
consistent with high quality care and at an appropriate stage, soon
enough to avert the need for overly expensive treatment.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature that:
(a) All children in the state of Washington have health care
coverage by 2010. This should be accomplished by building upon and
strengthening the successes of private health insurance coverage and
publicly supported children's health insurance programs in Washington
state. Access to coverage should be streamlined and efficient, with
reductions in unnecessary administrative costs and mechanisms to
expeditiously link children with a medical home;
(b) The state, in collaboration with parents, schools, communities,
health plans, and providers, take steps to improve health outcomes for
the children of Washington state by linking children with a medical
home, identifying health improvement goals for children, and linking
innovative purchasing strategies to those goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Consistent with the goals established in RCW 74.09.402, through
the program authorized in this section, the department shall provide
affordable health care coverage to children under the age of nineteen
who reside in Washington state and whose family income at the time of
enrollment is not greater than two hundred fifty percent of the federal
poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by
the federal department of health and human services, and effective
January 1, 2009, and only to the extent that funds are specifically
appropriated therefor, to children whose family income is not greater
than three hundred percent of the federal poverty level. In
administering the program, the department shall take such actions as
may be necessary to ensure the receipt of federal financial
participation under the medical assistance program, as codified at
Title XIX of the federal social security act, the state children's
health insurance program, as codified at Title XXI of the federal
social security act, and any other federal funding sources that are now
available or may become available in the future. The department and
the caseload forecast council shall estimate the anticipated caseload
and costs of the program established in this section.
(2) The department shall accept applications for enrollment for
children's health care coverage; establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods, as may be necessary; and determine eligibility
based on current family income. The department shall make eligibility
determinations within the time frames for establishing eligibility for
children on medical assistance, as defined by RCW 74.09.510. The
application and annual renewal processes shall be designed to minimize
administrative barriers for applicants and enrolled clients, and to
minimize gaps in eligibility for families who are eligible for
coverage. If a change in family income results in a change in program
eligibility, the department shall transfer the family members to the
appropriate programs and notify the family with respect to any change
in premium obligation, without a break in eligibility. The department
shall use the same eligibility redetermination and appeals procedures
as those provided for children on medical assistance programs. The
department shall modify its eligibility renewal procedures to lower the
percentage of children failing to annually renew. The department shall
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on its progress
in this regard by December 2007.
(3) To ensure continuity of care and ease of understanding for
families and health care providers, and to maximize the efficiency of
the program, the amount, scope, and duration of health care services
provided to children under this section shall be the same as that
provided to children under medical assistance, as defined in RCW
74.09.520.
(4) The primary mechanism for purchasing health care coverage under
this section shall be through contracts with managed health care
systems as defined in RCW 74.09.522 except when utilization patterns
suggest that fee-for-service purchasing could produce equally effective
and cost-efficient care. However, the department shall make every
effort within available resources to purchase health care coverage for
uninsured children whose families have access to dependent coverage
through an employer-sponsored health plan or another source when it is
cost-effective for the state to do so, and the purchase is consistent
with requirements of Title XIX and Title XXI of the federal social
security act. To the extent allowable under federal law, the
department shall require families to enroll in available employer-sponsored coverage, as a condition of participating in the program
established under this act, when it is cost-effective for the state to
do so. Families who enroll in available employer-sponsored coverage
under this act shall be accounted for separately in the annual report
required by RCW 74.09.053.
(5)(a) To reflect appropriate parental responsibility, the
department shall develop and implement a schedule of premiums for
children's health care coverage due to the department from families
with income greater than two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level. For families with income greater than two hundred fifty percent
of the federal poverty level, the premiums shall be established in
consultation with the senate majority and minority leaders and the
speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives. Premiums
shall be set at a reasonable level that does not pose a barrier to
enrollment. The amount of the premium shall be based upon family
income and shall not exceed the premium limitations in Title XXI of the
federal social security act. Premiums shall not be imposed on children
in households at or below two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level as articulated in RCW 74.09.055.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2009, the department shall offer families
whose income is greater than three hundred percent of the federal
poverty level the opportunity to purchase health care coverage for
their children through the programs administered under this section
without a premium subsidy from the state. The amount paid by the
family shall be in an amount equal to the rate paid by the state to the
managed health care system for coverage of the child, including any
associated and administrative costs to the state of providing coverage
for the child.
(6) The department shall undertake a proactive, targeted outreach
and education effort with the goal of enrolling children in health
coverage and improving the health literacy of youth and parents. The
department shall collaborate with the department of health, local
public health jurisdictions, the office of superintendent of public
instruction, the department of early learning, health educators, health
care providers, health carriers, and parents in the design and
development of this effort. The outreach and education effort shall
include the following components:
(a) Broad dissemination of information about the availability of
coverage, including media campaigns;
(b) Assistance with completing applications, and community-based
outreach efforts to help people apply for coverage. Community-based
outreach efforts should be targeted to the populations least likely to
be covered;
(c) Use of existing systems, such as enrollment information from
the free and reduced price lunch program, the department of early
learning child care subsidy program, the department of health's women,
infants, and children program, and the early childhood education and
assistance program, to identify children who may be eligible but not
enrolled in coverage;
(d) Contracting with community-based organizations and government
entities to support community-based outreach efforts to help families
apply for coverage. These efforts should be targeted to the
populations least likely to be covered. The department shall provide
informational materials for use by government entities and community-based organizations in their outreach activities, and should identify
any available federal matching funds to support these efforts;
(e) Development and dissemination of materials to engage and inform
parents and families statewide on issues such as: The benefits of
health insurance coverage; the appropriate use of health services,
including primary care provided by health care practitioners licensed
under chapters 18.71, 18.57, 18.36A, and 18.79 RCW, and emergency
services; the value of a medical home, well-child services and
immunization, and other preventive health services with linkages to
department of health child profile efforts; identifying and managing
chronic conditions such as asthma and diabetes; and the value of good
nutrition and physical activity;
(f) An evaluation of the outreach and education efforts, based upon
clear outcome measures that are included in contracts with entities
that undertake components of the outreach and education effort;
(g) A feasibility study and implementation plan to develop online
application capability that is integrated with the department's
automated client eligibility system, and to develop data linkages with
the office of superintendent of public instruction for free and reduced
price lunch enrollment information and the department of early learning
for child care subsidy program enrollment information. The department
shall submit a feasibility study on the implementation of the
requirements in this subsection to the governor and legislature by July
2008.
(7) The department shall take action to increase the number of
primary care physicians providing dental disease preventive services
including oral health screenings, risk assessment, family education,
the application of fluoride varnish, and referral to a dentist as
needed.
(8) The department shall monitor the rates of substitution between
private-sector health care coverage and the coverage provided under
this section and shall report to appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that parents have a responsibility to:
(a) Enroll their children in affordable health coverage;
(b) Ensure that their children receive appropriate well-child
preventive care;
(c) Link their child with a medical home; and
(d) Understand and act upon the health benefits of good nutrition
and physical activity.
(2) The legislature intends that the programs and outreach and
education efforts established in section 2(6) of this act, as well as
partnerships with the public and private sectors, provide the support
and information needed by parents to meet the responsibilities set
forth in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department, in collaboration with the department of health,
health carriers, local public health jurisdictions, children's health
care providers including pediatricians, family practitioners, and
pediatric subspecialists, parents, and other purchasers, shall identify
explicit performance measures that indicate that a child has an
established and effective medical home, such as:
(a) Childhood immunization rates;
(b) Well child care utilization rates, including the use of
validated, structured developmental assessment tools that include
behavioral and oral health screening;
(c) Care management for children with chronic illnesses;
(d) Emergency room utilization; and
(e) Preventive oral health service utilization.
Performance measures and targets for each performance measure must
be reported to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2007.
(2) Beginning in calendar year 2009, targeted provider rate
increases shall be linked to quality improvement measures established
under this section. The department, in conjunction with those groups
identified in subsection (1) of this section, shall develop parameters
for determining criteria for increased payment or other incentives for
those practices and health plans that incorporate evidence-based
practice and improve and achieve sustained improvement with respect to
the measures in both fee for service and managed care.
(3) The department shall provide an annual report to the governor
and the legislature related to provider performance on these measures,
beginning in September 2010 and annually thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
It is the goal of Washington state to ensure that:
(1) By 2010, all K-12 districts have school health advisory
committees that advise school administration and school board members
on policies, environmental changes, and programs needed to support
healthy food choice and physical activity and childhood fitness.
Districts shall include school nurses or other school personnel as
advisory committee members.
(2) By 2010, only healthy food and beverages provided by schools
during school hours or for school-sponsored activities shall be
available on school campuses. Minimum standards for available food and
beverages, except food served as part of a United States department of
agriculture meal program, are:
(a) Not more than thirty-five percent of its total calories shall
be from fat. This restriction does not apply to nuts, nut butters,
seeds, eggs, fresh or dried fruits, vegetables that have not been deep-fried, legumes, reduced-fat cheese, part-skim cheese, nonfat dairy
products, or low-fat dairy products;
(b) Not more than ten percent of its total calories shall be from
saturated fat. This restriction does not apply to eggs, reduced-fat
cheese, part-skim cheese, nonfat dairy products, or low-fat dairy
products;
(c) Not more than thirty-five percent of its total weight or
fifteen grams per food item shall be composed of sugar, including
naturally occurring and added sugar. This restriction does not apply
to the availability of fresh or dried fruits and vegetables that have
not been deep-fried; and
(d) The standards for food and beverages in this subsection do not
apply to:
(i) Low-fat and nonfat flavored milk with up to thirty grams of
sugar per serving;
(ii) Nonfat or low-fat rice or soy beverages; or
(iii) One hundred percent fruit or vegetable juice.
(3) By 2010, all students in grades one through eight should have
at least one hundred fifty minutes of quality physical education every
week.
(4) By 2010, all student health and fitness instruction shall be
conducted by appropriately certified instructors.
(5) Beginning with the 2011-2012 school year, any district waiver
or exemption policy from physical education requirements for high
school students should be based upon meeting both health and fitness
curricula concepts as well as alternative means of engaging in physical
activity, but should acknowledge students' interest in pursuing their
academic interests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) There is hereby established a select
interim legislative task force on comprehensive school health reform.
The task force shall consist of two members of each caucus of the
senate, and two members of each caucus of the house of representatives.
The task force shall review and make recommendations on policies,
environmental changes, and programs needed to support healthy schools,
including but not limited to food choice, physical activity, and
childhood fitness. The task force shall also review the delivery of
health care services in the schools by school personnel providing
health services. The task force may establish technical advisory
committees related to nutrition, fitness, and child health.
(2) The task force shall submit its findings and recommendations to
the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives
by October 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
When the department of social and health services has determined
that it is cost-effective to enroll a child participating in a medical
assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW in an employer-sponsored
health plan, the carrier shall permit the enrollment of the participant
who is otherwise eligible for coverage in the health plan without
regard to any open enrollment restrictions. The request for special
enrollment shall be made by the department or participant within sixty
days of the department's determination that the enrollment would be
cost-effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 74.09.405 (Children's health program -- Purpose) and 1990 c
296 s 1;
(2) RCW 74.09.415 (Children's health program established) and 2005
c 279 s 2, 2002 c 366 s 2, 1998 c 245 s 144, & 1990 c 296 s 2;
(3) RCW 74.09.425 (Children's health care accessibility -- Community
action) and 1990 c 296 s 4;
(4) RCW 74.09.435 (Children's health program -- Biennial evaluation)
and 1990 c 296 s 5; and
(5) RCW 74.09.450 (Children's health insurance program -- Intent--Department duties) and 1999 c 370 s 1.

--- END ---