BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.370 and 2004 c 130 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a ((rural)) county may impose a
sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county. For a rural county, the rate of tax shall not
exceed ((0.08)) 1.50 percent of the selling price in the case of a
sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax((,
except that for rural counties with population densities between sixty
and one hundred persons per square mile, the rate shall not exceed 0.04
percent before January 1, 2000)). For an urban county, the rate of tax
shall not exceed a rate that generates proceeds of one million dollars
annually.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.
(3)(a) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used to
finance public facilities serving economic development purposes in
rural counties. The public facility must be listed as an item in the
officially adopted county overall economic development plan, or the
economic development section of the county's comprehensive plan, or the
comprehensive plan of a city or town located within the county for
those counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040. For those counties that
do not have an adopted overall economic development plan and do not
plan under the growth management act, the public facility must be
listed in the county's capital facilities plan or the capital
facilities plan of a city or town located within the county.
(b) In implementing this section, the county shall consult with
cities, towns, and port districts located within the county and the
associate development organization serving the county to ensure that
the expenditure meets the goals of chapter 130, Laws of 2004 and the
requirements of (a) of this subsection. Each county collecting money
under this section shall report, as follows, to the office of the state
auditor, ((no later than October 1st)) within one hundred fifty days
after the close of each fiscal year((,)): (i) A list of new projects
((from)) begun during the ((prior)) fiscal year, showing that the
county has used the funds for those projects consistent with the goals
of chapter 130, Laws of 2004 and the requirements of (a) of this
subsection; and (ii) expenditures during the fiscal year on projects
begun in a previous year. Any projects financed prior to June 10,
2004, from the proceeds of obligations to which the tax imposed under
subsection (1) of this section has been pledged shall not be deemed to
be new projects under this subsection.
(c) For the purposes of this section((,)):
(i) "Public facilities" means bridges, roads, domestic and
industrial water facilities, sanitary sewer facilities, earth
stabilization, storm sewer facilities, railroad, electricity, natural
gas, buildings, structures, telecommunications infrastructure,
transportation infrastructure, or commercial infrastructure, and port
facilities in the state of Washington; and
(ii) "Economic development purposes" means those purposes which
facilitate the creation or retention of businesses and jobs in a
county.
(4) No tax may be collected under this section before July 1, 1998.
No tax may be collected under this section by a county more than
twenty-five years after the date that a tax is first imposed under this
section.
(5) For purposes of this section((,)):
(a) "Rural county" means a county with a population density of less
than one hundred persons per square mile or a county smaller than two
hundred twenty-five square miles as determined by the office of
financial management and published each year by the department for the
period July 1st to June 30th; and
(b) "Urban county" means a county that does not meet the definition
of a rural county under (a) of this subsection.

--- END ---