BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.410 and 2003 c 111 s 146 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every city, town, and district is liable for its proportionate
share of the costs when such elections are held in conjunction with
other elections held under RCW ((29A.04.320)) 29A.04.321 and
29A.04.330.
Whenever any city, town, or district holds any ((primary or
election,)) general or special((,)) election on an isolated date, all
costs of such elections must be borne by the city, town, or district
concerned.
The purpose of this section is to clearly establish that the county
is not responsible for any costs involved in the holding of any city,
town, or district election.
In recovering such election expenses, including a reasonable pro-ration of administrative costs, the county auditor shall certify the
cost to the county treasurer with a copy to the clerk or auditor of the
city, town, or district concerned. Upon receipt of such certification,
the county treasurer shall make the transfer from any available and
appropriate city, town, or district funds to the county current expense
fund or to the county election reserve fund if such a fund is
established. Each city, town, or district must be promptly notified by
the county treasurer whenever such transfer has been completed.
However, in those districts wherein a treasurer, other than the county
treasurer, has been appointed such transfer procedure does not apply,
but the district shall promptly issue its warrant for payment of
election costs.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.04.420 and 2003 c 111 s 147 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever state officers or measures are voted upon at a ((state
primary or)) general election held in an odd-numbered year under RCW
((29A.04.320)) 29A.04.321, the state of Washington shall assume a
prorated share of the costs of that ((state primary or)) general
election.
(2) Whenever a ((primary or)) vacancy election is held to fill a
vacancy in the position of United States senator or United States
representative under chapter 29A.28 RCW, the state of Washington shall
assume a prorated share of the costs of that ((primary or)) vacancy
election.
(3) The county auditor shall apportion the state's share of these
expenses when prorating election costs under RCW 29A.04.410 and shall
file such expense claims with the secretary of state.
(4) The secretary of state shall include in his or her biennial
budget requests sufficient funds to carry out this section.
Reimbursements for election costs shall be from appropriations
specifically provided by law for that purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 29A.04 RCW
under the subchapter heading "election costs" to read as follows:
Major political parties, as defined in RCW 29A.04.086, shall pay
for all costs associated with partisan primaries, as described in RCW
29A.52.111. Costs shall be divided equally among the parties including
a reasonable amount for administrative costs. The secretary of state
shall adopt by rule the calculation for assessment of each party's
ratable share of administrative costs pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
The county auditor shall certify the costs to the county treasurer with
a copy to be delivered to the political parties. Upon receipt of such
certification, each party must pay its share to the county's current
expense fund or to the county election reserve fund if such a fund is
established.

--- END ---