BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to inspire and
encourage all Washington students to dream big by creating a guaranteed
four-year tuition scholarship program for students from low-income
families. The legislature finds that, too often, financial barriers
prevent many of the brightest students from considering college as a
future possibility. Often the cost of tuition coupled with the
complexity of finding and applying for financial aid is enough to
prevent a student from even applying to college. Many students become
disconnected from the education system early on and may give up or drop
out before graduation. It is the intent of the legislature to alert
students early in their educational career to the options and
opportunities available beyond high school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The higher education coordinating board
shall design the Washington college bound scholarship program in
accordance with this section.
(1) "Eligible students" are those students who qualify for free or
reduced-price lunches. If a student qualifies in the seventh grade,
the student remains eligible even if the student does not receive free
or reduced-price lunches thereafter.
(2) Eligible students shall be notified of their eligibility for
the Washington college bound scholarship program beginning in their
seventh grade year. Students shall also be notified of the
requirements for award of the scholarship.
(3) To be eligible for a Washington college bound scholarship, a
student must sign a pledge during seventh or eighth grade that includes
a commitment to graduate from high school with at least a C average and
with no felony convictions. The pledge must be witnessed by a parent
or guardian and forwarded to the higher education coordinating board by
mail or electronically, as indicated on the pledge form.
(4)(a) Scholarships shall be awarded to eligible students
graduating from public high schools, approved private high schools
under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or who received home-based instruction under
chapter 28A.200 RCW.
(b) To receive the Washington college bound scholarship, a student
must graduate with at least a "C" average from a public high school or
an approved private high school under chapter 28A.195 RCW in Washington
or have received home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, must
have no felony convictions, and must be a resident student as defined
in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) through (d).
(5) A student's family income will be assessed upon graduation
before awarding the scholarship.
(6) If at graduation from high school the student's family income
does not exceed sixty-five percent of the state median family income,
scholarship award amounts shall be as provided in this section.
(a) For students attending two or four-year institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the value of the award shall be
(i) the difference between the student's tuition and required fees,
less the value of any state-funded grant, scholarship, or waiver
assistance the student receives; (ii) plus five hundred dollars for
books and materials.
(b) For students attending private four-year institutions of higher
education in Washington, the award amount shall be the representative
average of awards granted to students in public research universities
in Washington.
(c) For students attending private vocational schools in
Washington, the award amount shall be the representative average of
awards granted to students in public community and technical colleges
in Washington.
(7) Recipients may receive no more than four full-time years' worth
of scholarship awards.
(8) Institutions of higher education shall award the student all
need-based and merit-based financial aid for which the student would
otherwise qualify. The Washington college bound scholarship is
intended to replace unmet need, loans, and, at the student's option,
work-study award before any other grants or scholarships are reduced.
(9) The first scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating
in 2012.
(10) The state of Washington retains legal ownership of tuition
units awarded as scholarships under this chapter until the tuition
units are redeemed. These tuition units shall remain separately held
from any tuition units owned under chapter 28B.95 RCW by a Washington
college bound scholarship recipient.
(11) The scholarship award must be used within five years of
receipt. Any unused scholarship tuition units revert to the Washington
college bound scholarship account.
(12) Should the recipient terminate his or her enrollment for any
reason during the academic year, the unused portion of the scholarship
tuition units shall revert to the Washington college bound scholarship
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall:
(1) Notify elementary, middle, and junior high school students,
parents, teachers, counselors, and principals about the Washington
college bound scholarship program; and
(2) Work with the higher education coordinating board to develop
application collection and student tracking procedures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The higher education coordinating board
shall:
(1) With the assistance of the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, implement and administer the Washington college
bound scholarship program;
(2) Develop and distribute, to all schools with students enrolled
in grade seven or eight, a pledge form that can be completed and
returned electronically or by mail by the student or the school to the
higher education coordinating board;
(3) Develop and implement a student application, selection, and
notification process for scholarships;
(4) Track scholarship recipients to ensure continued eligibility
and determine student compliance for awarding of scholarships;
(5) Subject to appropriation, deposit funds into the state
educational trust fund;
(6) Purchase tuition units under the advanced college tuition
payment program in chapter 28B.95 RCW to be owned and held in trust by
the board, for the purpose of scholarship awards as provided for in
this section; and
(7) Distribute scholarship funds, in the form of tuition units
purchased under the advanced college tuition payment program in chapter
28B.95 RCW or through direct payments from the state educational trust
fund, to institutions of higher education on behalf of scholarship
recipients identified by the board, as long as recipients maintain
satisfactory academic progress.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The higher education coordinating board may
accept grants, gifts, bequests, and devises of real and personal
property from any source for the purpose of granting financial aid in
addition to that funded by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The higher education coordinating board may
adopt rules to implement this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.95.020 and 2005 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Academic year" means the regular nine-month, three-quarter, or
two-semester period annually occurring between August 1st and July
31st.
(2) "Account" means the Washington advanced college tuition payment
program account established for the deposit of all money received by
the board from eligible purchasers and interest earnings on investments
of funds in the account, as well as for all expenditures on behalf of
eligible beneficiaries for the redemption of tuition units and for the
development of any authorized college savings program pursuant to RCW
28B.95.150.
(3) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board as
defined in chapter 28B.76 RCW.
(4) "Committee on advanced tuition payment" or "committee" means a
committee of the following members: The state treasurer, the director
of the office of financial management, the executive director of the
higher education coordinating board, or their designees, and two
members to be appointed by the governor, one representing program
participants and one private business representative with marketing,
public relations, or financial expertise.
(5) "Governing body" means the committee empowered by the
legislature to administer the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program.
(6) "Contractual obligation" means a legally binding contract of
the state with the purchaser and the beneficiary establishing that
purchases of tuition units will be worth the same number of tuition
units at the time of redemption as they were worth at the time of the
purchase.
(7) "Eligible beneficiary" means the person for whom the tuition
unit will be redeemed for attendance at an institution of higher
education. The beneficiary is that person named by the purchaser at
the time that a tuition unit contract is accepted by the governing
body. Qualified organizations, as allowed under section 529 of the
federal internal revenue code, purchasing tuition unit contracts as
future scholarships need not designate a beneficiary at the time of
purchase.
(8) "Eligible purchaser" means an individual or organization that
has entered into a tuition unit contract with the governing body for
the purchase of tuition units for an eligible beneficiary. The state
of Washington may be an eligible purchaser for purposes of purchasing
tuition units to be held for granting Washington college bound
scholarships.
(9) "Full-time tuition charges" means resident tuition charges at
a state institution of higher education for enrollments between ten
credits and eighteen credit hours per academic term.
(10) "Institution of higher education" means an institution that
offers education beyond the secondary level and is recognized by the
internal revenue service under chapter 529 of the internal revenue
code.
(11) "Investment board" means the state investment board as defined
in chapter 43.33A RCW.
(12) "State institution of higher education" means institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(13) "Tuition and fees" means undergraduate tuition and services
and activities fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041 rounded
to the nearest whole dollar. For purposes of this chapter, services
and activities fees do not include fees charged for the payment of
bonds heretofore or hereafter issued for, or other indebtedness
incurred to pay, all or part of the cost of acquiring, constructing, or
installing any lands, buildings, or facilities.
(14) "Tuition unit contract" means a contract between an eligible
purchaser and the governing body, or a successor agency appointed for
administration of this chapter, for the purchase of tuition units for
a specified beneficiary that may be redeemed at a later date for an
equal number of tuition units.
(15) "Unit purchase price" means the minimum cost to purchase one
tuition unit for an eligible beneficiary. Generally, the minimum
purchase price is one percent of the undergraduate tuition and fees for
the current year, rounded to the nearest whole dollar, adjusted for the
costs of administration and adjusted to ensure the actuarial soundness
of the account. The analysis for price setting shall also include, but
not be limited to consideration of past and projected patterns of
tuition increases, program liability, past and projected investment
returns, and the need for a prudent stabilization reserve.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---