BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.42.010 and 2003 c 71 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office of regulatory assistance is created in the office of
financial management and shall be administered by the office of the
governor to assist citizens, businesses, and project applicants.
(2) The office shall:
(a) Maintain and furnish information as provided in RCW 43.42.040;
(b) Furnish facilitation as provided in RCW 43.42.050;
(c) Furnish coordination as provided in RCW 43.42.060;
(d) Coordinate cost reimbursement as provided in RCW 43.42.070;
(e) Work with state agencies and local governments to continue to
develop a range of permit assistance options for project applicants;
(f) Review initiatives developed by the transportation permit
efficiency and accountability committee established in chapter 47.06C
RCW and determine if any would be beneficial if implemented for other
types of projects;
(g) Work to develop informal processes for dispute resolution
between agencies and permit applicants;
(h) Conduct customer surveys to evaluate its effectiveness; and
(i) Provide the following ((biennial)) reports by June 1, 2008, and
biennially thereafter, to the governor and the appropriate committees
of the legislature:
(i) A performance report, based on the customer surveys required in
(h) of this subsection;
(ii) A report on any statutory or regulatory conflicts identified
by the office in the course of its duties that arise from differing
legal authorities and roles of agencies and how these were resolved.
The report may include recommendations to the legislature and to
agencies; and
(iii) A report regarding negotiation and implementation of
voluntary cost reimbursement agreements and use of outside independent
consultants under RCW 43.42.070, including the nature and amount of
work performed and implementation of requirements relating to costs.
(3) A director of the office shall be hired no later than June 1,
2003.
(4) The office shall give priority to furnishing assistance to
small projects when expending general fund moneys allocated to it.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.131.401 and 2003 c 71 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of regulatory assistance established in RCW 43.42.010
and its powers and duties shall be terminated June 30, ((2007)) 2011,
as provided in RCW 43.131.402.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.131.402 and 2003 c 71 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, ((2008)) 2012:
(1) RCW 43.42.005 and 2003 c 71 s 1 & 2002 c 153 s 1;
(2) RCW 43.42.010 and 2007 c ... s 1 (section 1 of this act), 2003
c 71 s 2, & 2002 c 153 s 2;
(3) RCW 43.42.020 and 2002 c 153 s 3;
(4) RCW 43.42.030 and 2003 c 71 s 3 & 2002 c 153 s 4;
(5) RCW 43.42.040 and 2003 c 71 s 4 & 2002 c 153 s 5;
(6) RCW 43.42.050 and 2003 c 54 s 4 & 2002 c 153 s 6;
(7) RCW 43.42.060 and 2003 c 54 s 5 & 2002 c 153 s 7;
(8) RCW 43.42.070 and 2003 c 70 s 7 & 2002 c 153 s 8;
(9) RCW 43.42.905 and 2002 c 153 s 10;
(10) RCW 43.42.900 and 2002 c 153 s 11; and
(11) RCW 43.42.901 and 2002 c 153 s 12.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 By July 1, 2008, the joint legislative audit
and review committee shall provide a status report to the governor and
appropriate committees of the legislature on the compliance to the
office of regulatory assistance with the sunset review proposed final
report, January 4, 2007, findings and recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2007.

--- END ---