BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.558 and 2005 c 249 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community colleges
may waive all or a portion of the tuition and services and activities
fees for state employees as defined under subsection (2) of this
section. The enrollment of these persons is pursuant to the following
conditions:
(a) Such persons shall register for and be enrolled in courses on
a space available basis and no new course sections shall be created as
a result of the registration;
(b) Enrollment information on persons registered pursuant to this
section shall be maintained separately from other enrollment
information and shall not be included in official enrollment reports,
nor shall such persons be considered in any enrollment statistics that
would affect budgetary determinations; and
(c) Persons registering on a space available basis shall be charged
a registration fee of not less than five dollars.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "state employees" means
persons employed half-time or more in one or more of the following
employee classifications:
(a) Permanent employees in classified service under chapter 41.06
RCW;
(b) Permanent employees governed by chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to
the exercise of the option under RCW 41.56.201;
(c) Permanent classified employees and exempt paraprofessional
employees of technical colleges; ((and))
(d) Faculty, counselors, librarians, and exempt professional and
administrative employees at institutions of higher education as defined
in RCW 28B.10.016; and
(e) Teachers and other certificated instructional staff employed at
public common and vocational schools, holding or seeking a valid
endorsement and assignment in a state-identified shortage area.
(3) In awarding waivers, an institution of higher education may
award waivers to eligible persons employed by the institution before
considering waivers for eligible persons who are not employed by the
institution.
(4) If an institution of higher education exercises the authority
granted under this section, it shall include all eligible state
employees in the pool of persons eligible to participate in the
program.
(5) In establishing eligibility to receive waivers, institutions of
higher education may not discriminate between full-time employees and
employees who are employed half-time or more.

--- END ---