BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the legislative
youth advisory council provides a unique opportunity for middle and
high school students to be actively involved in government. Council
members not only learn about, but exercise, the core values and
democratic principles of our state and nation, along with the rights
and responsibilities of citizenship and democratic civic involvement.
As such, they are engaged in authentic practice of the essential
academic learning requirements in civics. In the short time since its
creation, the legislative youth advisory council has studied, debated,
and begun to formulate positions and recommendations on such important
topics as education reform, school finance, public school learning
environments, health and fitness education, and standardized testing.
The legislature continues to stress the importance of civics education
and support the type of civic involvement by students exemplified by
the legislative youth advisory council. The legislature intends to
make improvements to the program and expand the opportunities for
students to participate by creating regional councils.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.300.801 and 2005 c 355 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The)) Nine regional legislative youth advisory councils
((is)) are established to examine issues of importance to youth,
including but not limited to education, employment, strategies to
increase youth participation in state and municipal government, safe
environments for youth, substance abuse, emotional and physical health,
foster care, poverty, homelessness, and youth access to services on a
statewide and municipal basis. The boundaries of the nine regional
councils shall be the same as the boundaries of the nine educational
service districts.
(2) ((The council consists of twenty-two members as provided in
this subsection who, at the time of appointment, are aged fourteen to
eighteen. The council shall select a chair from among its members.
(a) Five members shall be selected by each of the two major
caucuses in the senate, appointed by the secretary of the senate.
(b) Five members shall be selected by each of the two major
caucuses in the house of representatives, appointed by the chief clerk
of the house of representatives.
(c) The governor shall appoint two members)) Each regional council
shall consist of at least five but no more than nine members who, at
the time of appointment, are students age fourteen to eighteen.
(a) Students may apply to the program by completing an application
form and submitting the form to the office of the lieutenant governor.
The lieutenant governor is encouraged to make the application forms
available online. Students are encouraged to seek a letter of
recommendation from a local state legislator to submit with the
application.
(b) By July 2, 2007, and annually thereafter, the lieutenant
governor shall select the members for the regional councils from the
applications.
(c) Each regional council shall select a chair from among its
members.
(3) Except for initial members, members shall serve two-year terms,
and if eligible, may be reappointed for subsequent two-year terms.
One-half of the initial members shall be appointed to one-year terms((,
and these appointments shall be made in such a way as to preserve
overall representation on the committee)).
(4) ((The)) Each regional council shall have the following duties:
(a) Meeting three times a year at the educational service district
within the region to discuss policy issues of importance to youth.
Each regional council shall consider conducting at least some of the
meetings via the K-20 telecommunications network. Councils are
encouraged to invite local state legislators to participate in the
meetings. Each regional council is encouraged to poll other students
in order to get a broad perspective on the various issues. The
regional councils are encouraged to use technology to conduct the
polling, including the council's web site, if the council has a web
site;
(b) Advising the legislature on proposed and pending legislation((,
including state budget expenditures)) and policy matters relating to
youth;
(((b) Advising the standing committees of the legislature and study
commissions, committees, and task forces regarding issues relating to
youth;
(c) Conducting periodic seminars for its members regarding
leadership, government, and the legislature)) (c) Selecting one member
to attend a state meeting to present information to the lieutenant
governor and members of the legislature. The presentation could
include proposals that a legislator could subsequently have drafted as
legislation; ((and))
(d) Accepting grants and donations from public and private sources
to support the activities of the council; and
(e) Reporting annually by December 1st to the legislature on its
activities, including proposed legislation that implements
recommendations of the council.
(5) ((In carrying out its duties under subsection (4) of this
section, the council may meet at least three times but not more than
six times per year, including not more than two public hearings on
issues of importance to youth.
(6))) Regional council members shall not receive per diem but shall
be reimbursed as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(((7))) (6) The ((office of superintendent of public instruction))
educational service districts shall provide administration,
coordination, and facilitation assistance to the regional councils.
((The senate and house of representatives may provide policy and fiscal
briefings and assistance with drafting proposed legislation. The
senate and the house of representatives shall each develop internal
policies relating to staff assistance provided to the council. Such
policies may include applicable internal personnel and practices
guidelines, resource use and expense reimbursement guidelines, and
applicable ethics mandates. Provision of funds, resources, and staff,
as well as the assignment and direction of staff, remains at all times
within the sole discretion of the chamber making the provision)) Each
educational service district shall consider creating a web site for the
regional council on the web site of the educational service district
and is encouraged to conduct outreach to students to publicize the
program.
(((8))) (7) The office of the lieutenant governor shall provide the
administration, coordination, and facilitation assistance for the state
meeting.
(8) The ((office of superintendent of public instruction, the))
educational service districts, office of the lieutenant governor,
legislature, any agency of the legislature, and any official or
employee of such office or agency are immune from liability for any
injury that is incurred by or caused by a member of the regional youth
advisory councils ((and)) that occurs while the member of ((the)) a
council is performing duties of ((the)) a council or is otherwise
engaged in activities or receiving services for which reimbursement is
allowed under subsection (((6))) (5) of this section. The immunity
provided by this subsection does not apply to an injury intentionally
caused by the act or omission of an employee or official of the
superintendent of public instruction or the legislature or any agency
of the legislature.
(9) This section expires June 30, ((2007)) 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 28A.300.801 is recodified as a section
in chapter 28A.310 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---