BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The economy of the state of Washington requires a well-prepared
work force. To meet the need, more Washington students must be
prepared for postsecondary education and training. Further, the
personal enrichment and success of Washington citizens increasingly
relies on their ability to use the state's postsecondary education and
training system. To accomplish those ends, the legislature desires to
increase the number of students who begin earning college credits while
still in high school.
(2) Not all Washington high school students realize that they are
capable of college-level work, nor do all students have ready and
affordable access to college-level courses. The legislature finds that
an effective means of increasing the number of students earning college
credit in high school is to bring the college courses to the students.
The legislature believes the ability to earn college credit during the
regular high school day and on the high school campus may greatly
expand students' willingness and ability to attempt college-credit-bearing courses.
(3) Many high school students who wish to earn college credits are
unable to participate in the running start program because they live in
areas that do not have local colleges or participating universities;
some students who would like to earn college credits while in high
school do not participate in running start because they do not want to
leave their high school campus in order to do so; and some students who
would like to earn college credits are unable to afford the cost of
books, fees, transportation and other costs not covered by running
start.
(4) Some high schools are currently working with colleges and
universities to offer college credit courses on high school campuses to
serve those students. However, since there is no established statewide
program or funding provided, rules governing these programs vary and
high school students pay varying amounts to cover the colleges' and
universities' costs of working with high schools to offer the classes.
(5) It is the intent of the legislature to establish the college in
the high school program as a statewide option for high school students.
High schools, colleges, and universities that wish to work together to
offer this option are encouraged to do so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, the state board for
community and technical colleges, and the public baccalaureate
institutions shall jointly develop and adopt rules governing the
college in the high school program. The rules shall be written to
encourage the maximum use of the program and shall not narrow or limit
the enrollment options.
(2) College in the high school programs shall each be governed by
a local contract in compliance with the guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction, the state board for community and
technical colleges, and the public baccalaureate institutions.
(3) The college in the high school program shall provide that:
(a) To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, the
superintendent of public instruction may distribute to school districts
an incentive allocation equivalent to seven percent of the basic
education allocation for each student enrolled in a five credit college
in the high school course. The amount of the actual incentive
allocation generated by each student enrolled in a five college credits
in the college in high school program shall be calculated as seven
percent of the statewide average basic education amount generated for
a 1.0 average annual full-time equivalent position, pursuant to RCW
28A.150.260, excluding small high school enhancements. School
districts shall report no student for more than 1.0 full-time
equivalent combining both their high school enrollment and college in
the high school courses.
(b) The institution of higher education shall not require the
student to pay any other fees. The funds received by the institution
of higher education from the school district shall not be deemed
tuition or operating fees and may be retained by the institution of
higher education. A student enrolled under this subsection shall not
be counted for the purpose of determining any enrollment restrictions
imposed by the state on the institution of higher education.
(c) A school district shall grant high school credit to a student
enrolled in a program course if the student successfully completes the
course. If no comparable course is offered by the school district, the
school district superintendent shall determine how many credits to
award for the course. The determination shall be made in writing
before the student enrolls in the course. The credits shall be applied
toward graduation requirements and subject area requirements. Evidence
of successful completion of each program course shall be included in
the student's secondary school records and transcript.
(d) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not
yet received a high school diploma or its equivalent and are eligible
to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades may participate in the college
in the high school program. Participating school districts and
institutions of higher education may establish standards for admission
to program courses.
(e) Participating school districts shall provide general
information about the college in the high school program to all
students in grades ten, eleven, and twelve and the parents and
guardians of those students.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning in RCW
28B.10.016 and also includes a public tribal college located in
Washington and accredited by the Northwest commission on colleges and
universities or another accrediting association recognized by the
United States department of education.
(b) "Program course" means a college course offered in a high
school under the college in the high school program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall develop advising
guidelines to ensure that students and parents understand that college
credits earned in high school dual credit programs may impact
eligibility for financial aid.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.150.275 and 1995 c 77 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The basic education allocation, including applicable vocational
entitlements and special education program money, generated under this
chapter and under state appropriation acts by school districts for
students enrolled in a technical college program established by an
interlocal agreement under RCW 28B.50.533 shall be allocated in amounts
as determined by the superintendent of public instruction to the
serving college rather than to the school district, unless the college
chooses to continue to receive the allocations through the school
districts. This section does not apply to students enrolled in the
running start program established in RCW 28A.600.310 or the college in
the high school program established in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.225.290 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 207 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall prepare and
annually distribute an information booklet outlining parents' and
guardians' enrollment options for their children.
(2) Before the 1991-92 school year, the booklet shall be
distributed to all school districts by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction. School districts shall have a copy of the
information booklet available for public inspection at each school in
the district, at the district office, and in public libraries.
(3) The booklet shall include:
(a) Information about enrollment options and program opportunities,
including but not limited to programs in RCW 28A.225.220, 28A.185.040,
28A.225.200 through 28A.225.215, 28A.225.230 through 28A.225.250,
((28A.175.090,)) 28A.340.010 through 28A.340.070 (small high school
cooperative projects), and 28A.335.160.
(b) Information about the running start - community college or
vocational-technical institute choice program under RCW 28A.600.300
through ((28A.600.395)) 28A.600.400 and about the college in the high
school program under section 2 of this act; and
(c) Information about the seventh and eighth grade choice program
under RCW 28A.230.090.
(4) The booklet may be distributed in an electronic format.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.600.160 and 1998 c 225 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any middle school, junior high school, or high school using
educational pathways shall ensure that all participating students will
continue to have access to the courses and instruction necessary to
meet admission requirements at baccalaureate institutions. Students
shall be allowed to enter the educational pathway of their choice.
Before accepting a student into an educational pathway, the school
shall inform the student's parent of the pathway chosen, the
opportunities available to the student through the pathway, and the
career objectives the student will have exposure to while pursuing the
pathway. Parents and students dissatisfied with the opportunities
available through the selected educational pathway shall be provided
with the opportunity to transfer the student to any other pathway
provided in the school. Schools may not develop educational pathways
that retain students in high school beyond the date they are eligible
to graduate, and may not require students who transfer between pathways
to complete pathway requirements beyond the date the student is
eligible to graduate. Educational pathways may include, but are not
limited to, programs such as work-based learning, school-to-work
transition, tech prep, vocational-technical education, running start,
college in the high school, and preparation for technical college,
community college, or university education.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.600.300 and 2005 c 207 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The program established in this section and RCW 28A.600.310
through 28A.600.400 shall be known as the running start program.
(2) For the purposes of RCW 28A.600.310 through 28A.600.400,
"participating institution of higher education" or "institution of
higher education" means:
(((1))) (a) A community or technical college as defined in RCW
28B.50.030;
(((2))) (b) A public tribal college located in Washington and
accredited by the northwest commission on colleges and universities or
another accrediting association recognized by the United States
department of education; and
(((3))) (c) Central Washington University, Eastern Washington
University, Washington State University, and The Evergreen State
College, if the institution's governing board decides to participate in
the program in RCW 28A.600.310 through 28A.600.400.

--- END ---