BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.120A.010 and 2005 c 295 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Pursuant to the federal clean air act, the legislature adopts
the California motor vehicle emission standards in Title 13 of the
California Code of Regulations, effective January 1, 2005, except as
provided in this chapter. The department of ecology shall adopt rules
to implement the emission standards of the state of California for
passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles,
and shall amend the rules from time to time, to maintain consistency
with the California motor vehicle emission standards and 42 U.S.C. Sec.
7507 (section 177 of the federal clean air act). Notwithstanding other
provisions of this chapter, the department of ecology shall not adopt
the zero emission vehicle program regulations contained in Title 13
section 1962 of the California Code of Regulations effective January 1,
2005. During rule development, the department of ecology shall convene
an advisory group composed of industry and consumer group
representatives. Any proposed rules or changes to rules shall be
subject to review and comment by the advisory group, prior to rule
adoption. The order of adoption for the rules required in this section
shall include the signature of the governor. ((The rules shall be
effective only for those model years for which the state of Oregon has
adopted the California motor vehicle emission standards.)) This
section does not limit the department of ecology's authority to
regulate motor vehicle emissions for any other class of vehicle.
(2) Motor vehicles with a model year equal to or later than the
first model year for which new vehicles sold to Washington state
residents are required to comply with California motor vehicle emission
standards are exempt from emission inspections under chapter 70.120
RCW.

--- END ---