BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.160.170 and 1990 c 33 s 143 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each district shall submit to the superintendent of public
instruction during October of each year a report containing the
following:
(1)(a) The number of eligible students transported to and from
school as provided for in RCW 28A.160.150 for the current school year
and the number of miles estimated to be driven for pupil transportation
services, along with a map describing student route stop locations and
school locations, and (b) the number of miles driven for pupil
transportation services as authorized in RCW 28A.160.150 the previous
school year; and
(2) Other operational data and descriptions as required by the
superintendent to determine allocation requirements for each district.
The superintendent shall require that districts separate the costs of
operating the program for the transportation of eligible students to
and from school as defined by RCW 28A.160.160(3) from non-to-and-from-school pupil transportation costs in the annual financial statement.
Each district shall submit the information required in this section
on a timely basis as a condition of the continuing receipt of school
transportation moneys.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The office of financial management, in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and the
joint legislative audit and review committee, shall contract for
development of two options for a pupil transportation funding
methodology. The consultants shall have expertise in school funding
methodologies, pupil transportation, and commercial transportation
logistics.
(2) In developing these options, the first priority shall be to
create a methodology that reflects actual costs and builds incentives
for the efficient use of resources. As a secondary priority, the
funding methodology, to the extent possible, shall provide school
districts with predictable levels of funding.
(3) In developing the funding methodology options, the office of
financial management and the contractor shall consult with the office
of the superintendent of public instruction, regional transportation
coordinators, and professional associations representing pupil
transportation coordinators, school business managers, school
administrators, and classified staff.
(4) By December 1, 2008, the office of financial management shall
report to the governor and the education and fiscal committees of the
legislature details of the pupil funding methodology options and
outline any legislation that would be required to implement those
options. The report submitted by the office of financial management
shall include an evaluation of the feasibility of some or all of the K-12 pupil transportation program being supported by the state
transportation budget including reviewing the potential use of local
transit agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act takes effect September
1, 2007.

--- END ---