BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.102.020 and 2006 c 181 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Annual state contribution limit" means ((five)) ten million
dollars statewide per fiscal year.
(2) "Assessed value" means the valuation of taxable real property
as placed on the last completed assessment roll.
(3) "Base year" means the first calendar year following the
((creation of a revenue development area. For a local government that
meets the requirements of RCW 39.102.040(2), "base year" is the
calendar year after it amends its ordinance as provided in RCW
39.102.040(2))) calendar year in which a sponsoring local government,
and any cosponsoring local government, receives approval by the board
for a project award, provided that the approval is granted before
October 15th. If approval by the board is received on or after October
15th but on or before December 31st, the "base year" is the second
calendar year following the calendar year in which a sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local government, receives approval by
the board for a project award.
(4) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board under
chapter 43.160 RCW.
(5) "Demonstration project" means one of the following projects:
(a) Bellingham waterfront redevelopment project;
(b) Spokane river district project at Liberty Lake; and
(c) Vancouver riverwest project.
(6) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(7) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning July 1st
and ending the following June 30th.
(8) "Local excise taxes" means local revenues derived from the
imposition of sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030 at the
tax rate that was in effect at the time the revenue development area
was ((created)) approved by the board, except that if a local
government reduces the rate of such tax after the revenue development
area was ((created)) approved by the board, "local excise taxes" means
the local revenues derived from the imposition of the sales and use
taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030 at the lower tax rate.
(9) "Local excise tax allocation revenue" means the amount of local
excise taxes received by the local government during the measurement
year from taxable activity within the revenue development area over and
above the amount of local excise taxes received by the local government
during the base year from taxable activity within the revenue
development area, except that:
(a) If a sponsoring local government ((creates)) adopts a revenue
development area and reasonably determines that no activity subject to
tax under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred within the boundaries
of the revenue development area in the twelve months immediately
preceding the ((creation)) approval of the revenue development area
((within the boundaries of the area that became the revenue development
area)) by the board, "local excise tax allocation revenue" means the
entire amount of local excise taxes received by the sponsoring local
government during a calendar year period beginning with the calendar
year immediately following the ((creation)) approval of the revenue
development area by the board and continuing with each measurement year
thereafter; and
(b) For revenue development areas ((created)) approved by the board
in calendar years 2006 and 2007 that do not meet the requirements in
(a) of this subsection and if legislation is enacted in this state ((by
July 1, 2006,)) during the 2007 legislative session that adopts the
sourcing provisions of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement,
"local excise tax allocation revenue" means the amount of local excise
taxes received by the sponsoring local government during the
measurement year from taxable activity within the revenue development
area over and above an amount of local excise taxes received by the
sponsoring local government during the 2007 or 2008 base year, as the
case may be, adjusted by the department for any estimated impacts from
retail sales and use tax sourcing changes effective ((July 1, 2007)) in
2008. The amount of base year adjustment determined by the department
is final.
(10) "Local government" means any city, town, county, port
district, and any federally recognized Indian tribe.
(11) "Local infrastructure financing" means the use of revenues
received from local excise tax allocation revenues, local property tax
allocation revenues, ((dedicated)) other revenues from local public
sources, and revenues received from the local option sales and use tax
authorized in RCW 82.14.475, dedicated to pay either the principal and
interest on bonds authorized under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public
improvement costs on a pay-as-you-go basis as provided in section 15 of
this act, or both.
(12) "Local property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the receipt of regular property taxes levied on
the property tax allocation revenue value and used for local
infrastructure financing.
(13)(a) "Revenues from local public sources" means ((federal and
private monetary contributions, amounts of local excise tax allocation
revenues, and amounts of local property tax allocation revenues
dedicated by participating taxing districts and participating local
governments for local infrastructure financing)):
(i) Amounts of local excise tax allocation revenues and local
property tax allocation revenues, dedicated by sponsoring local
governments, participating local governments, and participating taxing
districts, for local infrastructure financing; and
(ii) Any other local revenues, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, including revenues derived from federal and private
sources.
(b) Revenues from local public sources do not include any local
funds derived from state grants, state loans, or any other state moneys
including any local sales and use taxes credited against the state
sales and use taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.
(14) "Low-income housing" means residential housing for low-income
persons or families who lack the means which is necessary to enable
them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe, and
sanitary dwellings, without overcrowding. For the purposes of this
subsection, "low income" means income that does not exceed eighty
percent of the median family income for the standard metropolitan
statistical area in which the revenue development area is located.
(15) "Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure state and local excise tax
allocation revenues.
(16) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government.
(17) "Participating local government" means a local government
having a revenue development area within its geographic boundaries that
has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring local government
as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of all or some of its
local excise tax allocation revenues or other revenues from local
public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(18) "Participating taxing district" means a local government
having a revenue development area within its geographic boundaries that
has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring local government
as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of some or all of its
local property tax allocation revenues or other revenues from local
public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(19)(a)(i) "Property tax allocation revenue value" means
seventy-five percent of any increase in the assessed value of real
property in a revenue development area resulting from:
(A) The placement of new construction, improvements((, or both)) to
property, or both, on the assessment roll((s after the revenue
development area is created)), where the new construction ((or)) and
improvements ((occur entirely after the revenue development area is
created)) are initiated after the revenue development area is approved
by the board;
(B) The cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as provided in RCW
84.14.020, and the new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements are initiated after the revenue development
area is approved by the board;
(C) The cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as
provided in RCW 84.26.070, and the rehabilitation is initiated after
the revenue development area is approved by the board.
(ii) Increases in the assessed value of real property in a revenue
development area resulting from (a)(i)(A) through (C) of this
subsection are included in the property tax allocation revenue value in
the initial year. These same amounts are also included in the property
tax allocation revenue value in subsequent years unless the property
becomes exempt from property taxation.
(b) ((If any new construction added to the assessment rolls
consists of entire buildings, "property tax allocation revenue value"
includes seventy-five percent of any increase in the assessed value of
the buildings in the years following their initial placement on the
assessment rolls.
(c) "Property tax allocation revenue value" does not include any
increase in the assessed value of improvements to property or new
construction that do not consist of an entire building, occurring after
their initial placement on the assessment rolls)) "Property tax
allocation revenue value" includes seventy-five percent of any increase
in the assessed value of new construction consisting of an entire
building in the years following the initial year, unless the building
becomes exempt from property taxation.
(c) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "property tax
allocation revenue value" does not include any increase in the assessed
value of real property after the initial year.
(d) There is no property tax allocation revenue value if the
assessed value of real property in a revenue development area has not
increased ((due to new construction or improvements to property
occurring after the revenue development area is created)) as a result
of any of the reasons specified in (a)(i)(A) through (C) of this
subsection.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, "initial year" means:
(i) For new construction and improvements to property added to the
assessment roll, the year during which the new construction and
improvements are initially placed on the assessment roll;
(ii) For the cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW, the year when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of levying taxes for
collection in the following year; and
(iii) For the cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when
such cost is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55
RCW, the year when such cost is treated as new construction for
purposes of levying taxes for collection in the following year.
(20) "Taxing district" means a government entity that levies or has
levied for it regular property taxes upon real property located within
a proposed or approved revenue development area.
(21) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the revenue development area
that include:
(i) Street, bridge, and road construction and maintenance,
including highway interchange construction;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements,
including wastewater reuse facilities;
(iii) Sidewalks, traffic controls, and streetlights;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas, including trails; and
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems;
(b) Expenditures for facilities and improvements that support
affordable housing as defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
(22) "Public improvement costs" means the cost of: (a) Design,
planning, acquisition including land acquisition, site preparation
including land clearing, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation,
improvement, and installation of public improvements; (b) demolishing,
relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending construction of
public improvements; (c) the local government's portion of relocating
utilities as a result of public improvements; (d) financing public
improvements, including interest during construction, legal and other
professional services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs
on general indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any
necessary reserves for general indebtedness; (e) assessments incurred
in revaluing real property for the purpose of determining the property
tax allocation revenue base value that are in excess of costs incurred
by the assessor in accordance with the revaluation plan under chapter
84.41 RCW, and the costs of apportioning the taxes and complying with
this chapter and other applicable law; ((and)) (f) administrative
expenses and feasibility studies reasonably necessary and related to
these costs((, including related)); and (g) any of the above-described
costs that may have been incurred before adoption of the ordinance
authorizing the public improvements and the use of local infrastructure
financing to fund the costs of the public improvements.
(23) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as
defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied by
public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making
required payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness;
(b) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of the
common schools under RCW 84.52.065; and (c) regular property taxes
authorized by RCW 84.55.050 that are limited to a specific purpose.
"Regular property taxes" do not include excess property tax levies that
are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and senior taxing
districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.
(24) "Property tax allocation revenue base value" means the
assessed value of real property located within a revenue development
area for taxes levied in the year in which the revenue development area
is ((created)) adopted for collection in the following year, plus one
hundred percent of any increase in the assessed value of real property
located within a revenue development area that is placed on the
assessment rolls after the revenue development area is ((created))
adopted, less the property tax allocation revenue value.
(25) "Relocating a business" means the closing of a business and
the reopening of that business, or the opening of a new business that
engages in the same activities as the previous business, in a different
location within a one-year period, when an individual or entity has an
ownership interest in the business at the time of closure and at the
time of opening or reopening. "Relocating a business" does not include
the closing and reopening of a business in a new location where the
business has been acquired and is under entirely new ownership at the
new location, or the closing and reopening of a business in a new
location as a result of the exercise of the power of eminent domain.
(26) "Revenue development area" means the geographic area
((created)) adopted by a sponsoring local government and approved by
the board, from which local excise and property tax allocation revenues
are derived for local infrastructure financing.
(27) "Small business" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
19.85.020.
(28) "Sponsoring local government" means a city, town, or county,
and for the purpose of this chapter a federally recognized Indian tribe
or any combination thereof, that ((creates)) adopts a revenue
development area and applies to the board to use local infrastructure
financing.
(29) "State contribution" means the lesser of:
(a) One million dollars;
(b) The state excise tax allocation revenue and state property tax
allocation revenue received by the state during the preceding calendar
year;
(c) The total amount of local excise tax allocation revenues, local
property tax allocation revenues, and other revenues from local public
sources, that are dedicated by a sponsoring local government, any
participating local governments, and participating taxing districts, in
the preceding calendar year to the payment of principal and interest on
bonds issued under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public improvement costs on
a pay-as-you-go basis as provided in section 15 of this act, or both;
or
(d) The amount of project award granted by the board in the notice
of approval to use local infrastructure financing under RCW 39.102.040.
(30) "State excise taxes" means revenues derived from state retail
sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, less the amount
of tax distributions from all local retail sales and use taxes, other
than the local sales and use taxes authorized by RCW 82.14.475, imposed
on the same taxable events that are credited against the state retail
sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
(31) "State excise tax allocation revenue" means the amount of
state excise taxes received by the state during the measurement year
from taxable activity within the revenue development area over and
above the amount of state excise taxes received by the state during the
base year from taxable activity within the revenue development area,
except that:
(a) If a sponsoring local government ((creates)) adopts a revenue
development area and reasonably determines that no activity subject to
tax under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred within the boundaries
of the revenue development area in the twelve months immediately
preceding the ((creation)) approval of the revenue development area
((within the boundaries of the area that became the revenue development
area)) by the board, "state excise tax allocation revenue" means the
entire amount of state excise taxes received by the state during a
calendar year period beginning with the calendar year immediately
following the ((creation)) approval of the revenue development area by
the board and continuing with each measurement year thereafter; and
(b) For revenue development areas ((created)) approved by the board
in calendar years 2006 and 2007 that do not meet the requirements in
(a) of this subsection and if legislation is enacted in this state ((by
July 1, 2006,)) during the 2007 legislative session that adopts the
sourcing provisions of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement,
"state excise tax allocation revenue" means the amount of state excise
taxes received by the state during the measurement year from taxable
activity within the revenue development area over and above an amount
of state excise taxes received by the state during the 2007 or 2008
base year, as the case may be, adjusted by the department for any
estimated impacts from retail sales and use tax sourcing changes
effective ((July 1, 2007)) in 2008. The amount of base year adjustment
determined by the department is final.
(32) "State property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the imposition of property taxes levied by the
state for the support of common schools under RCW 84.52.065 on the
property tax allocation revenue value.
(33) "Real property" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.04.090 and
also includes any privately owned improvements located on publicly
owned land that are subject to property taxation.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.102.040 and 2006 c 181 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Prior to applying to the board to use local infrastructure
financing, a sponsoring local government shall:
(a) Designate a revenue development area within the limitations in
RCW 39.102.060;
(b) Certify that the conditions in RCW 39.102.070 are met;
(c) Complete the process in RCW 39.102.080;
(d) Provide public notice as required in RCW 39.102.100; and
(e) Pass an ordinance adopting the revenue development area as
required in RCW 39.102.090.
(2) Any local government that has created an increment area under
chapter 39.89 RCW ((that)) and has not issued bonds to finance any
public improvement ((shall be)) may apply to the board and have its
increment area considered for approval as a revenue development area
under this chapter without ((creating)) adopting a new ((increment))
revenue development area under RCW 39.102.090 and 39.102.100 if it
amends its ordinance to comply with RCW 39.102.090(1) and otherwise
meets the conditions and limitations under this chapter.
(3) As a condition to imposing a sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.475, a sponsoring local government, including any cosponsoring
local government seeking authority to impose a sales and use tax under
RCW 82.14.475, must apply to the board and be approved for a project
award amount. The application shall be in a form and manner prescribed
by the board and include but not be limited to information establishing
that the applicant is an eligible candidate to impose the local sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.475, the anticipated effective date for
imposing the tax, the estimated number of years that the tax will be
imposed, and the estimated amount of tax revenue to be received in each
fiscal year that the tax will be imposed. The board shall make
available forms to be used for this purpose. As part of the
application, each applicant must provide to the board a copy of the
ordinance or ordinances creating the revenue development area as
required in RCW 39.102.090. A notice of approval to use local
infrastructure financing shall contain a project award that represents
the maximum amount of state contribution that the applicant, including
any cosponsoring local governments, can earn each year that local
infrastructure financing is used. The total of all project awards
shall not exceed the annual state contribution limit. The
determination of a project award shall be made based on information
contained in the application and the remaining amount of annual state
contribution limit to be awarded. Determination of a project award by
the board is final.
(4)(a) Sponsoring local governments, and any cosponsoring local
governments, applying in calendar year 2007 for a competitive project
award, must submit completed applications to the board no later than
July 1, 2007. By September 15, 2007, in consultation with the
department of revenue and the department of community, trade, and
economic development, the board shall approve ((qualified)) competitive
project((s, up to the annual state contribution limit)) awards from
competitive applications submitted by the 2007 deadline. No more than
two million five hundred thousand dollars in competitive project awards
shall be approved in 2007. For projects not approved by the board in
2007, sponsoring and cosponsoring local governments may apply again to
the board in 2008 for approval of a project.
(b) Sponsoring local governments, and any cosponsoring local
governments, applying in calendar year 2008 for a competitive project
award, must submit completed applications to the board no later than
July 1, 2008. By September 18, 2008, in consultation with the
department of revenue and the department of community, trade, and
economic development, the board shall approve competitive project
awards from competitive applications submitted by the 2008 deadline.
No more than two million five hundred thousand dollars in competitive
project awards shall be approved in 2008, except as provided in RCW
39.102.050(2). For projects not approved in 2008, sponsoring and
cosponsoring local governments may apply again to the board for
approval of a project.
(c) Sponsoring local governments, and any cosponsoring local
governments, applying in calendar year 2009 for a competitive project
award, must submit completed applications to the board no later than
July 1, 2009. By September 15, 2009, in consultation with the
department of revenue and the department of community, trade, and
economic development, the board shall approve competitive project
awards from competitive applications submitted by the 2009 deadline.
(d) Except as provided in RCW 39.102.050(2), a total of no more
than seven million five hundred thousand dollars in competitive project
awards shall be approved for local infrastructure financing. ((Except
as provided in RCW 39.102.050, approvals shall be based on the
following criteria))
(e) In evaluating applications for a competitive project award, the
board shall develop criteria, and the relative weight to be assigned
criteria, in conjunction with the Washington state economic development
commission. The criteria developed and applied in the application
evaluation and approval process shall include the following and such
other criteria as the board and the commission consider appropriate:
(((a))) (i) The ((project)) project's potential to enhance the
sponsoring local government's regional and/or international
competitiveness;
(((b))) (ii) The project's ability to encourage mixed use
development and the redevelopment of a geographic area;
(((c))) (iii) Achieving an overall distribution of projects
statewide that reflect geographic diversity;
(((d))) (iv) The estimated wages and benefits for the project is
greater than the average labor market area;
(((e))) (v) The estimated state and local net employment change
over the life of the project;
(((f))) (vi) The estimated state and local net property tax change
over the life of the project; ((and))
(((g))) (vii) The estimated state and local sales and use tax
increase over the life of the project; and
(viii) Evidence that the project will not contribute to sprawl and
that the project's revenue development area either has or is
immediately adjacent to an area that has a rich transportation
infrastructure to serve it, including: State highways, arterials,
collectors and distributors, and other road capacity sufficient to meet
the traffic needs and traffic congestion levels anticipated for the new
development; and public transit and park and ride lots sufficient to
meet the transport needs of a significant portion of the anticipated
workforce in the revenue development area, special needs services, and
other transportation services.
(5) ((A revenue development area is considered created when the
sponsoring local government, including any cosponsoring local
government, has adopted an ordinance creating the revenue development
area and the board has approved the sponsoring local government to use
local infrastructure financing. If a sponsoring local government
receives approval from the board after the fifteenth day of October to
use local infrastructure financing, the revenue development area is
considered created in the calendar year following the approval.)) Once
the board has approved the sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local governments, to use local infrastructure financing,
notification ((shall)) must be sent by the board to the sponsoring
local government, and any cosponsoring local governments, authorizing
the sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local
governments, to impose the local sales and use tax authorized under RCW
82.14.475, subject to the conditions in RCW 82.14.475.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.102.050 and 2006 c 181 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to a competitive process, demonstration projects
are provided to determine the feasibility of the local infrastructure
financing tool. Notwithstanding RCW 39.102.040, the board shall
approve each demonstration project ((before approving any other
application)). Demonstration project applications must be received by
the board no later than July 1, 2008. The Bellingham waterfront
redevelopment project award shall not exceed one million dollars per
year, the Spokane river district project award shall not exceed one
million dollars per year, and the Vancouver riverwest project award
shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars per year. The board
shall approve by September 15, 2007, demonstration project applications
submitted no later than July 1, 2007. The board shall approve by
September 18, 2008, demonstration project applications submitted by
July 1, 2008.
(2) If before board approval of the final competitive project award
in 2008, a demonstration project has not received approval by the
board, the state dollars set aside for the demonstration project in
subsection (1) of this section shall be available for the competitive
application process. If a demonstration project has received a partial
award before the approval of the final competitive project award, the
remaining state dollars set aside for the demonstration project in
subsection (1) of this section shall be available for the competitive
process.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.102.060 and 2006 c 181 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
The designation of a revenue development area is subject to the
following limitations:
(1) The taxable real property within the revenue development area
boundaries may not exceed one billion dollars in assessed value at the
time the revenue development area is designated;
(2) ((The average assessed value per square foot of taxable land
within the revenue development area boundaries may not exceed seventy
dollars at the time the revenue development area is designated;
(3) No more than one revenue development area may be created in a
county)) No revenue development area shall have within its geographic
boundaries any part of a hospital benefit zone under chapter 39.100 RCW
or any part of another revenue development area created under this
chapter;
(((4))) (3) A revenue development area is limited to contiguous
tracts, lots, pieces, or parcels of land without the creation of
islands of property not included in the revenue development area;
(((5) The boundaries may not be drawn to purposely exclude parcels
where economic growth is unlikely to occur;
(6))) (4) The public improvements financed through local
infrastructure financing must be located in the revenue development
area;
(((7))) (5) A revenue development area cannot comprise an area
containing more than twenty-five percent of the total assessed value of
the taxable real property within the boundaries of the sponsoring local
government, including any cosponsoring local government, at the time
the revenue development area is designated;
(((8))) (6) The boundaries of the revenue development area shall
not be changed for the time period that local infrastructure financing
is used; and
(((9))) (7) A revenue development area cannot include any part of
an increment area created under chapter 39.89 RCW, except those
increment areas created prior to January 1, 2006.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.102.070 and 2006 c 181 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
The use of local infrastructure financing under this chapter is
subject to the following conditions:
(1) No funds may be used to finance, design, acquire, construct,
equip, operate, maintain, remodel, repair, or reequip public facilities
funded with taxes collected under RCW 82.14.048;
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection no funds may be
used for public improvements other than projects identified within the
capital facilities, utilities, housing, or transportation element of a
comprehensive plan required under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(b) Funds may be used for public improvements that are historical
preservation activities as defined in RCW 39.89.020;
(3) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in
part using local infrastructure financing are expected to encourage
private development within the revenue development area and to increase
the fair market value of real property within the revenue development
area;
(4) A sponsoring local government, participating local government,
or participating taxing district has entered or expects to enter into
a contract with a private developer relating to the development of
private improvements within the revenue development area or has
received a letter of intent from a private developer relating to the
developer's plans for the development of private improvements within
the revenue development area;
(5) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the
revenue development area, as a result of the public improvements, will
be consistent with the county-wide planning policy adopted by the
county under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's comprehensive
plan and development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(6) The governing body of the sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local government, must make a finding that local
infrastructure financing:
(a) Is not expected to be used for the purpose of relocating a
business from outside the revenue development area, but within this
state, into the revenue development area; ((and))
(b) Will improve the viability of existing business entities within
the revenue development area; and
(c) Will be used in a manner that will not encourage sprawl and
will support development in, or adjacent to, areas with rich
transportation infrastructure including: State highways, arterials,
collectors and distributors, and other road capacity sufficient to meet
the traffic needs and traffic congestion levels anticipated for the new
development; and public transit and park and ride lots sufficient to
meet the transport needs of a significant portion of the anticipated
workforce in the revenue development area, special needs services, and
other transportation services;
(7) The governing body of the sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local government, finds that the public improvements
proposed to be financed in whole or in part using local infrastructure
financing are reasonably likely to:
(a) Increase private residential and commercial investment within
the revenue development area;
(b) Increase employment within the revenue development area;
(c) Improve the viability of any existing communities that are
based on mixed-use development within the revenue development area; and
(d) Generate, over the period of time that the local option sales
and use tax will be imposed under RCW 82.14.475, state excise tax
allocation revenues and state property tax allocation revenues derived
from the revenue development area that are equal to or greater than the
respective state contributions made under this chapter;
(8) The sponsoring local government may only use local
infrastructure financing in areas deemed in need of economic
development or redevelopment within boundaries of the sponsoring local
government.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.102.090 and 2006 c 181 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To ((create)) adopt a revenue development area, a sponsoring
local government, and any cosponsoring local government, must adopt an
ordinance establishing the revenue development area that:
(a) Describes the public improvements proposed to be made in the
revenue development area;
(b) Describes the boundaries of the revenue development area,
subject to the limitations in RCW 39.102.060;
(c) Estimates the cost of the proposed public improvements and the
portion of these costs to be financed by local infrastructure
financing;
(d) Estimates the time during which local excise tax allocation
revenues, local property tax allocation revenues, and other revenues
from local public sources are to be used for local infrastructure
financing;
(e) Provides the date when the use of local excise tax allocation
revenues and local property tax allocation revenues will commence; and
(f) Finds that the conditions in RCW 39.102.070 are met and the
findings in RCW 39.102.080 are complete.
(2) The sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local
government, must hold a public hearing on the proposed financing of the
public improvements in whole or in part with local infrastructure
financing ((at least thirty days)) before passage of the ordinance
establishing the revenue development area. The public hearing may be
held by either the governing body of the sponsoring local government
and the governing body of any cosponsoring local government, or by a
committee of those governing bodies that includes at least a majority
of the whole governing body or bodies. The public hearing is subject
to the notice requirements in RCW 39.102.100.
(3) The sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local
government, shall deliver a certified copy of the adopted ordinance to
the county treasurer, the governing body of each participating local
government and participating taxing district within which the revenue
development area is located, the board, and the department.

Sec. 7 RCW 39.102.110 and 2006 c 181 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government or participating local government
that has received approval by the board to use local infrastructure
financing may use annually its local excise tax allocation revenues to
finance public improvements in the revenue development area financed in
whole or in part by local infrastructure financing. The use of local
excise tax allocation revenues dedicated by participating local
governments must cease ((when such allocation revenues are no longer
necessary or obligated to pay bonds issued to finance the public
improvements in the revenue development area)) on the date specified in
the written agreement required in RCW 39.102.080(1), or if no date is
specified then the date when the local tax under RCW 82.14.475 expires.
Any participating local government is authorized to dedicate local
excise tax allocation revenues to the sponsoring local government as
authorized in RCW 39.102.080(1).
(2) A sponsoring local government shall provide the board accurate
information describing the geographical boundaries of the revenue
development area at the time of application. The information shall be
provided in an electronic format or manner as prescribed by the
department. The sponsoring local government shall ensure that the
boundary information provided to the board and department is kept
current.
(3) In the event a city annexes a county area located within a
county-sponsored revenue development area, the city shall remit to the
county the portion of the local excise tax allocation revenue that the
county would have received had the area not been annexed to the county.
The city shall remit such revenues until such time as the bonds issued
under RCW 39.102.150 are retired.

Sec. 8 RCW 39.102.120 and 2006 c 181 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Commencing in the second calendar year following ((the passage
of the ordinance creating a revenue development area and authorizing
the use of local infrastructure financing)) board approval of a revenue
development area, the county treasurer shall distribute receipts from
regular taxes imposed on real property located in the revenue
development area as follows:
(a) Each participating taxing district and the sponsoring local
government shall receive that portion of its regular property taxes
produced by the rate of tax levied by or for the taxing district on the
property tax allocation revenue base value for that local
infrastructure financing project in the taxing district, or upon the
total assessed value of real property in the taxing district, whichever
is smaller; and
(b) The sponsoring local government shall receive an additional
portion of the regular property taxes levied by it and by or for each
participating taxing district upon the property tax allocation revenue
value within the revenue development area. However, if there is no
property tax allocation revenue value, the sponsoring local government
shall not receive any additional regular property taxes under this
subsection (1)(b). The sponsoring local government may agree to
receive less than the full amount of the additional portion of regular
property taxes under this subsection (1)(b) as long as bond debt
service, reserve, and other bond covenant requirements are satisfied,
in which case the balance of these tax receipts shall be allocated to
the participating taxing districts that levied regular property taxes,
or have regular property taxes levied for them, in the revenue
development area for collection that year in proportion to their
regular tax levy rates for collection that year. The sponsoring local
government may request that the treasurer transfer this additional
portion of the property taxes to its designated agent. The portion of
the tax receipts distributed to the sponsoring local government or its
agent under this subsection (1)(b) may only be expended to finance
public improvement costs associated with the public improvements
financed in whole or in part by local infrastructure financing.
(2) The county assessor shall allocate any increase in the assessed
value of real property occurring in the revenue development area to the
property tax allocation revenue value and property tax allocation
revenue base value as appropriate. This section does not authorize
revaluations of real property by the assessor for property taxation
that are not made in accordance with the assessor's revaluation plan
under chapter 84.41 RCW or under other authorized revaluation
procedures.
(3) The apportionment of increases in assessed valuation in a
revenue development area, and the associated distribution to the
sponsoring local government of receipts from regular property taxes
that are imposed on the property tax allocation revenue value, must
cease when property tax allocation revenues are no longer ((necessary
or)) obligated to pay the costs of the public improvements. Any excess
local property tax allocation revenues derived from regular property
taxes and earnings on these tax allocation revenues, remaining at the
time the allocation of tax receipts terminates, must be returned to the
county treasurer and distributed to the participating taxing districts
that imposed regular property taxes, or had regular property taxes
imposed for it, in the revenue development area for collection that
year, in proportion to the rates of their regular property tax levies
for collection that year.
(4) The allocation to the revenue development area of portions of
the local regular property taxes levied by or for each taxing district
upon the property tax allocation revenue value within that revenue
development area is declared to be a public purpose of and benefit to
each such taxing district.
(5) The allocation of local property tax allocation revenues
pursuant to this section shall not affect or be deemed to affect the
rate of taxes levied by or within any taxing district or the
consistency of any such levies with the uniformity requirement of
Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution.
(6) This section does not apply to those revenue development areas
that include any part of an increment area created under chapter 39.89
RCW.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.14.475 and 2006 c 181 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local
government, that has been approved by the board to use local
infrastructure financing may impose a sales and use tax in accordance
with the terms of this chapter and subject to the criteria set forth in
this section. Except as provided in this section, the tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from
those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing
jurisdiction of the sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local
government. The rate of tax shall not exceed the rate provided in RCW
82.08.020(1), less the aggregate rates of any other local sales and use
taxes imposed on the same taxable events that are credited against the
state sales and use taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
The rate of tax may be changed only on the first day of a fiscal year
as needed. Notice of rate changes must be provided to the department
on the first day of March to be effective on July 1st of the next
fiscal year.
(2) The tax authorized under subsection (1) of this section shall
be credited against the state taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or
82.12 RCW. The department shall perform the collection of such taxes
on behalf of the sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local
government at no cost to the sponsoring local government or
cosponsoring local government and shall remit the taxes as provided in
RCW 82.14.060.
(3)(a) No tax may be imposed under the authority of this section:
(i) Before July 1, 2008;
(ii) Before approval by the board under RCW 39.102.040; and
(iii) ((Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, unless))
Before the sponsoring local government has received ((and dedicated to
the payment of bonds authorized in RCW 39.102.150, in whole or in part,
both)) local excise tax allocation revenues ((and)), local property tax
allocation revenues, or both, during the preceding calendar year.
(b) ((The requirement to receive local property tax allocation
revenues under (a) of this subsection is waived if the revenue
development area coincides with or is contained entirely within the
boundaries of an increment area adopted by a local government under the
authority of chapter 39.89 RCW for the purposes of utilizing community
revitalization financing.
(c))) The tax imposed under this section shall expire when the
bonds issued under the authority of RCW 39.102.150 are retired, but not
more than twenty-five years after the tax is first imposed.
(4) An ordinance adopted by the legislative authority of a
sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local government imposing
a tax under this section shall provide that:
(a) The tax shall first be imposed on the first day of a fiscal
year;
(b) The cumulative amount of tax received by the sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local government, in any fiscal year
shall not exceed the amount of the state contribution;
(c) The tax shall cease to be distributed for the remainder of any
fiscal year in which either:
(i) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring local government,
and any cosponsoring local government, equals the amount of the state
contribution;
(ii) The amount of revenue from taxes imposed under this section by
all sponsoring and cosponsoring local governments equals the annual
state contribution limit; or
(iii) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring local government
equals the amount of project award granted in the approval notice
described in RCW 39.102.040;
(d) ((Except when the requirement to receive local property tax
allocation revenues is waived as provided in subsection (3)(b) of this
section, neither the local excise tax allocation revenues nor the local
property tax allocation revenues can be more than eighty percent of the
total local funds as described in RCW 39.102.020(29)(c);
(e))) The tax shall be distributed again, should it cease to be
distributed for any of the reasons provided in (c) of this subsection,
at the beginning of the next fiscal year, subject to the restrictions
in this section; and
(((f))) (e) Any revenue generated by the tax in excess of the
amounts specified in (c) of this subsection shall belong to the state
of Washington.
(5) If a county and city cosponsor a revenue development area, the
combined rates of the city and county tax shall not exceed the rate
provided in RCW 82.08.020(1), less the aggregate rates of any other
local sales and use taxes imposed on the same taxable events that are
credited against the state sales and use taxes imposed under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The combined amount of distributions received by
both the city and county may not exceed the state contribution.
(6) The department shall determine the amount of tax receipts
distributed to each sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring
local government, imposing sales and use tax under this section and
shall advise a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government when tax
distributions for the fiscal year equal the amount of state
contribution for that fiscal year as provided in subsection (8) of this
section. Determinations by the department of the amount of tax
distributions attributable to each sponsoring or cosponsoring local
government are final and shall not be used to challenge the validity of
any tax imposed under this section. The department shall remit any tax
receipts in excess of the amounts specified in subsection (4)(c) of
this section to the state treasurer who shall deposit the money in the
general fund.
(7) If a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government fails to
comply with RCW 39.102.140, no tax may be distributed in the subsequent
fiscal year until such time as the sponsoring or cosponsoring local
government complies and the department calculates the state
contribution amount for such fiscal year.
(8) Each year, the amount of taxes approved by the department for
distribution to a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government in the
next fiscal year shall be equal to the state contribution and shall be
no more than the total local funds as described in RCW
39.102.020(29)(c). The department shall consider information from
reports described in RCW 39.102.140 when determining the amount of
state contributions for each fiscal year. A sponsoring or cosponsoring
local government shall not receive, in any fiscal year, more revenues
from taxes imposed under the authority of this section than the amount
approved annually by the department. The department shall not approve
the receipt of more distributions of sales and use tax under this
section to a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government than is
authorized under subsection (4) of this section.
(9) The amount of tax distributions received from taxes imposed
under the authority of this section by all sponsoring and cosponsoring
local governments is limited annually to not more than ((five)) ten
million dollars. ((The tax distributions shall be available to the
sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local government,
imposing a tax under this section only as long as the sponsoring local
government has outstanding indebtedness under RCW 39.102.150.))
(10) The definitions in RCW 39.102.020 apply to this section unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(11) If a sponsoring local government is a federally recognized
Indian tribe, the distribution of the sales and use tax authorized
under this section shall be authorized through an interlocal agreement
pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW.
(12) Subject to section 15 of this act, the tax imposed under the
authority of this section may be applied either to provide for the
payment of debt service on bonds issued under RCW 39.102.150 by the
sponsoring local government or to pay public improvement costs on a
pay-as-you-go basis, or both.
(13) The tax imposed under the authority of this section shall
cease to be imposed if the sponsoring local government or cosponsoring
local government fails to issue bonds under the authority of RCW
39.102.150 by June 30th of the fifth fiscal year in which the local tax
authorized under this section is imposed.

Sec. 10 RCW 39.102.140 and 2006 c 181 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government shall provide a report to the
board and the department by March 1st of each year. The report shall
contain the following information:
(a) The amount of local excise tax allocation revenues, ((and))
local property tax allocation revenues, other revenues from local
public sources, and taxes under RCW 82.14.475((, and revenues from
local public sources)) received by the sponsoring local government
during the preceding calendar year that were dedicated to pay the
public improvements financed in whole or in part with local
infrastructure financing, and a summary of how these revenues were
expended;
(b) The names of any businesses locating within the revenue
development area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by
the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with
local infrastructure financing;
(c) The total number of permanent jobs created in the revenue
development area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by
the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with
local infrastructure financing;
(d) The average wages and benefits received by all employees of
businesses locating within the revenue development area as a result of
the public improvements undertaken by the sponsoring local government
and financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure financing;
and
(e) That the sponsoring local government is in compliance with RCW
39.102.070.
(2) The board shall make a report available to the public and the
legislature by June 1st of each year. The report shall include a list
of public improvements undertaken by sponsoring local governments and
financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure financing and it
shall also include a summary of the information provided to the
department by sponsoring local governments under subsection (1) of this
section.

Sec. 11 RCW 39.102.150 and 2006 c 181 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government that has designated a revenue
development area and been authorized the use of local infrastructure
financing may incur general indebtedness, and issue general obligation
bonds, to finance the public improvements and retire the indebtedness
in whole or in part from local excise tax allocation revenues, local
property tax allocation revenues, and sales and use taxes imposed under
the authority of RCW 82.14.475 that it receives, subject to the
following requirements:
(a) The ordinance adopted by the sponsoring local government and
authorizing the use of local infrastructure financing indicates an
intent to incur this indebtedness and the maximum amount of this
indebtedness that is contemplated; and
(b) The sponsoring local government includes this statement of the
intent in all notices required by RCW ((39.102.090)) 39.102.100.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the general
indebtedness incurred under subsection (1) of this section may be
payable from other tax revenues, the full faith and credit of the local
government, and nontax income, revenues, fees, and rents from the
public improvements, as well as contributions, grants, and nontax money
available to the local government for payment of costs of the public
improvements or associated debt service on the general indebtedness.
(b) A sponsoring local government that issues bonds under this
section shall not pledge any money received from the state of
Washington for the payment of such bonds, other than the local sales
and use taxes imposed under the authority of RCW 82.14.475 and
collected by the department.
(3) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, a sponsoring local government designating a revenue
development area and authorizing the use of local infrastructure
financing may require the nonpublic participant to provide adequate
security to protect the public investment in the public improvement
within the revenue development area.
(4) Bonds issued under this section shall be authorized by
ordinance of the governing body of the sponsoring local government and
may be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates,
be payable upon demand or mature at such time or times, bear interest
at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in
such form either coupon or registered as provided in RCW 39.46.030,
carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or
priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of
payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of
redemption with or without premium, be secured in such manner, and have
such other characteristics, as may be provided by such ordinance or
trust indenture or mortgage issued pursuant thereto.
(5) The sponsoring local government may annually pay into a fund to
be established for the benefit of bonds issued under this section a
fixed proportion or a fixed amount of any local excise tax allocation
revenues and local property tax allocation revenues derived from
property or business activity within the revenue development area
containing the public improvements funded by the bonds, such payment to
continue until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full. The
local government may also annually pay into the fund established in
this section a fixed proportion or a fixed amount of any revenues
derived from taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.475, such payment to
continue until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full.
Revenues derived from taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.475 are subject to
the use restriction in RCW 39.102.130.
(6) In case any of the public officials of the sponsoring local
government whose signatures appear on any bonds or any coupons issued
under this chapter shall cease to be such officials before the delivery
of such bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and
sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such officials had remained
in office until such delivery. Any provision of any law to the
contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued under this chapter are fully
negotiable.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (4) through (6) of this section,
bonds issued under this section may be issued and sold in accordance
with chapter 39.46 RCW.

Sec. 12 RCW 39.102.130 and 2006 c 181 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
Money collected from the taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.475
((shall)) may be used only for the purpose of ((principal and interest
payments on bonds issued under the authority of RCW 39.102.150)) paying
debt service on bonds issued under the authority of RCW 39.102.150 or
to pay public improvement costs on a pay-as-you-go basis as provided in
section 15 of this act, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 RCW 39.102.180 (General indebtedness,
general obligation bonds -- Authority -- Security) and 2006 c 181 s 504 are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 39.102
RCW to read as follows:
The department of revenue and the community economic revitalization
board may adopt any rules under chapter 34.05 RCW they consider
necessary for the administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 39.102
RCW to read as follows:
Local excise tax allocation revenues, local property tax allocation
revenues, other revenues from local public sources, that are dedicated
to local infrastructure financing, and revenues received from the local
option sales and use tax authorized in RCW 82.14.475, may not be used
to pay for public improvement costs on a pay-as-you-go basis after the
date that the sponsoring local government that issued the bonds as
provided in RCW 39.102.150 is required to begin paying debt service on
those bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act applies retroactively as well as
prospectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 This act expires June 30, 2039.

--- END ---