BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
WASHINGTON TOURISM COMMISSION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the Washington tourism commission.
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department.
(4) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 (1) The Washington tourism commission is
created.
(2) The commission shall be cochaired by the director of the
department or the director's designee, and by an industry-member
representative who is elected by the commission members.
(3) The commission shall have nineteen members. In appointing
members, the governor shall endeavor to balance the geographic and
demographic composition of the commission to include members with
special expertise from tourism organizations, local jurisdictions, and
small businesses directly engaged in tourism-related activities.
Before making appointments to the Washington tourism commission, the
governor shall consider nominations from recognized organizations that
represent the entities or interests identified in this section.
Commission members shall be appointed by the governor as follows:
(a) Three members to represent the lodging industry, at least two
of which shall be chosen from a list of three nominees per position
submitted by the state's largest lodging industry trade association.
Members should represent all property categories and different regions
of the state;
(b) Three representatives from nonprofit destination marketing
organizations or visitor and convention bureaus;
(c) Three industry representatives from the arts, entertainment,
attractions, or recreation industry;
(d) Four private industry representatives, two from each of the
business categories in this subsection:
(i) The food, beverage, and wine industries; and
(ii) The travel and transportation industries;
(e) Four legislative members, one from each major caucus of the
senate, designated by the president of the senate, and one from each
major caucus of the house of representatives, designated by the speaker
of the house of representatives;
(f) The chairman of the Washington convention and trade center; and
(g) The director or the director's designee.
(4)(a) Terms of nonlegislative members shall be three years, except
that initial terms shall be staggered such that terms of one-third of
the initial members shall expire each year.
(b) Terms of legislative members shall be two years.
(c) Vacancies shall be appointed in the same manner as the original
appointment.
(d) A member appointed by the governor may not be absent from more
than fifty percent of the regularly scheduled meetings in any one
calendar year. Any member who exceeds this absence limitation is
deemed to have withdrawn from the office and may be replaced by the
governor.
(5) Members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The commission shall meet at least four times per year, but may
meet more frequently as necessary.
(7) A majority of members currently appointed constitutes a quorum.
(8) Staff support shall be provided by the department, and staff
shall report to the executive director.
(9) The director, in consultation with the commission, shall
appoint an executive director.
(10) The commission may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 (1) The commission shall pursue a
coordinated program to expand the tourism industry throughout the state
in cooperation with the public and private tourism development
organizations. The commission shall develop and approve, and update as
necessary, a six-year strategic plan that includes, but is not limited
to:
(a) Promoting Washington as a tourism destination to national and
international markets to include nature-based and wildlife viewing
tourism;
(b) Providing information to businesses and local communities on
tourism opportunities that could expand local revenues;
(c) Assisting local communities to strengthen their tourism
partnerships, including their relationships with state and local
agencies;
(d) Providing leadership training and assistance to local
communities to facilitate the development and implementation of local
tourism plans;
(e) Coordinating the development of a statewide tourism marketing
plan that must be adopted by March 31, 2008, and every two years
thereafter. If the commission does not adopt a marketing plan by March
31st of even-numbered years, the director has the authority to approve
a tourism marketing plan for implementation. The plan shall
specifically address mechanisms for: (i) Funding national and
international marketing and nature-based tourism efforts; (ii)
interagency cooperation; and (iii) integrating the state plan with
local tourism plans.
(2) The commission may, in carrying out its efforts to expand the
tourism industry in the state:
(a) Solicit and receive gifts, grants, funds, fees, and endowments,
in trust or otherwise, from tribal, local, or other governmental
entities, as well as private sources, and may expend the same or any
income therefrom for tourism purposes. All revenue received for
tourism purposes shall be deposited into the tourism enterprise account
created in section 105 of this act;
(b) Host conferences and strategic planning workshops relating to
the promotion of nature-based and wildlife viewing tourism;
(c) Conduct or contract for tourism-related studies;
(d) Contract with individuals, businesses, or public entities to
carry out its tourism-related activities under this section; and
(e) Provide tourism-related organizations with marketing and other
technical assistance.
(3) Staff shall implement the strategic plan and the tourism
marketing plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 (1) A tourism competitive grant program is
created as an ongoing program to enhance local efforts that support
tourism-related activities. The commission shall develop and publicize
formal selection criteria for the grant program. Subject to available
funding, the commission shall solicit applications and award grants to
successful applicants at least once a year.
(2) Eligible applicants include, but are not limited to, local
governments, nonprofit organizations, and federally recognized Indian
tribes.
(3) Criteria should include the return on investment of state
funding, the availability of other financial resources to the
applicant, the level of community support, and other criteria deemed
necessary by the commission.
(4) Maximum grant amounts shall be determined by the commission.
Grant awards must reflect geographic and demographic diversity and a
variety of activities. Successful applicants must provide matching
funds equal to the amount of the grant. In-kind donations shall not be
considered in the match calculation.
(5) No portion of the grant may be used for an applicant's
administrative costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 The tourism enterprise account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer.
(1) All receipts from section 103(2)(a) of this act must be
deposited into the account. Only the executive director or the
executive director's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2) Moneys transferred from the state convention and trade account
to this account, as provided in RCW 67.40.040, shall be available for
expenditure in accordance with the requirements of this section. As
provided under subsection (3) of this section, moneys must be matched
with private sector cash contributions, the value of an advertising
equivalency contribution, or through an in-kind contribution. The
commission shall determine criteria for what qualifies as an in-kind
contribution. The moneys subject to match may be expended as private
match is received or with evidence of qualified expenditure.
(3)(a) Twenty-five percent of the moneys transferred in fiscal year
2009 are subject to a match;
(b) Fifty percent of the moneys transferred in fiscal year 2010 are
subject to a match; and
(c) One hundred percent of the moneys transferred in fiscal year
2011, and thereafter, are subject to a match.
(4) Expenditures from the account may be used by the department of
community, trade, and economic development only for the purposes of
expanding and promoting the tourism industry in the state of
Washington.

Sec. 106 RCW 67.40.040 and 2005 c 518 s 936 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW
67.40.030, proceeds of the taxes imposed under RCW 67.40.090 and
67.40.130, and all other moneys received by the state convention and
trade center from any public or private source which are intended to
fund the acquisition, design, construction, expansion, exterior cleanup
and repair of the Eagles building, conversion of various retail and
other space to meeting rooms, purchase of the land and building known
as the McKay Parcel, development of low-income housing, or renovation
of the center, and those expenditures authorized under RCW 67.40.170
shall be deposited in the state convention and trade center account
hereby created in the state treasury and in such subaccounts as are
deemed appropriate by the directors of the corporation.
(2) Moneys in the account, including unanticipated revenues under
RCW 43.79.270, shall be used exclusively for the following purposes in
the following priority:
(a) For reimbursement of the state general fund under RCW
67.40.060;
(b) After appropriation by statute:
(i) For payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030;
(ii) For expenditures authorized in RCW 67.40.170;
(iii) For acquisition, design, and construction of the state
convention and trade center; ((and))
(iv) For debt service for the acquisition, design, and construction
and retrofit of the museum of history and industry museum property or
other future expansions of the convention center as approved by the
legislature; and
(v) For reimbursement of any expenditures from the state general
fund in support of the state convention and trade center; and
(c) For transfer to the state convention and trade center
operations account.
(3) The corporation shall identify with specificity those
facilities of the state convention and trade center that are to be
financed with proceeds of general obligation bonds, the interest on
which is intended to be excluded from gross income for federal income
tax purposes. The corporation shall not permit the extent or manner of
private business use of those bond-financed facilities to be
inconsistent with treatment of such bonds as governmental bonds under
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(4) In order to ensure consistent treatment of bonds authorized
under RCW 67.40.030 with applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, and notwithstanding RCW 43.84.092, investment
earnings on bond proceeds deposited in the state convention and trade
center account in the state treasury shall be retained in the account,
and shall be expended by the corporation for the purposes authorized
under chapter 386, Laws of 1995 and in a manner consistent with
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(5) ((During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state convention and trade center account to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the account.)) Subject to the conditions in subsection (6) of this
section, starting in fiscal year 2008, the state treasurer shall
transfer:
(a) The sum of four million dollars, or as much as may be available
pursuant to conditions set forth in this section, from the state
convention and trade center account to the tourism enterprise account,
with the maximum transfer being four million dollars per fiscal year;
and
(b) The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much as may be
available pursuant to conditions set forth in this section, from the
state convention and trade center account to the tourism development
and promotion account, with the maximum transfer being five hundred
thousand dollars per fiscal year.
(6)(a) Funds required for debt service payments and reserves for
bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030; for debt service authorized under RCW
67.40.170; and for the issuance and sale of financial instruments
associated with the acquisition, design, construction, and retrofit of
the museum of history and industry museum property or for other future
expansions of the center, as approved by the legislature, shall be
maintained within the state convention and trade center account.
(b) No less than six million one hundred fifty thousand dollars per
year shall be retained in the state convention and trade center account
for funding capital maintenance as required by the center's long-term
capital plan, facility enhancements, unanticipated replacements, and
operating reserves for the convention center operation. This amount
shall be escalated annually as follows:
(i) Four percent for annual inflation for capital maintenance,
repairs, and replacement;
(ii) An additional two percent for enhancement to the facility; and
(iii) An additional three percent for growth in expenditure due to
aging of the facility and the need to maintain an operating reserve.
(c) Sufficient funds shall be reserved within the state convention
and trade center account to fund operating appropriations for the
annual operation of the convention center.

Sec. 107 RCW 43.330.096 and 1998 c 299 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) On or before June 30th of each fiscal year, the
((department)) commission shall submit a report to the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate
that describes the tourism development program for the previous fiscal
year and quantifies the financial benefits to the state. The report
must contain information concerning targeted markets, benefits to
different areas of the state, return on the state's investment, grants
disbursed under the tourism competitive grant program, a copy of the
most recent strategic plan, and other relevant information related to
tourism development.
(((2) This section expires June 30, 2008.))

PART 2
TECHNICAL AND MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
Sec. 201 RCW 43.330.090 and 2006 c 105 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall work with private sector organizations,
industry and cluster associations, federal agencies, state agencies
that use a cluster-based approach to service delivery, local
governments, local associate development organizations, and higher
education and training institutions in the development of industry
cluster-based strategies to diversify the economy, facilitate
technology transfer and diffusion, and increase value-added production.
The industry clusters targeted by the department may include, but are
not limited to, aerospace, agriculture, food processing, forest
products, marine services, health and biomedical, software, digital and
interactive media, transportation and distribution, and
microelectronics. The department shall, on a continuing basis,
evaluate the potential return to the state from devoting additional
resources to an industry cluster-based approach to economic development
and identifying and assisting additional clusters. The department
shall use information gathered in each service delivery region in
formulating its industry cluster-based strategies and shall assist
local communities in identifying regional industry clusters and
developing industry cluster-based strategies.
(2) ((The department shall pursue a coordinated program to expand
the tourism industry throughout the state in cooperation with the
public and private tourism development organizations. The department,
in operating its tourism program, shall:
(a) Promote Washington as a tourism destination to national and
international markets to include nature-based and wildlife viewing
tourism;
(b) Provide information to businesses and local communities on
tourism opportunities that could expand local revenues;
(c) Assist local communities to strengthen their tourism
partnerships, including their relationships with state and local
agencies;
(d) Provide leadership training and assistance to local communities
to facilitate the development and implementation of local tourism
plans;
(e) Coordinate the development of a statewide tourism and marketing
plan. The department's tourism planning efforts shall be carried out
in conjunction with public and private tourism development
organizations including the department of fish and wildlife and other
appropriate agencies. The plan shall specifically address mechanisms
for: (i) Funding national and international marketing and nature-based
tourism efforts; (ii) interagency cooperation; and (iii) integrating
the state plan with local tourism plans.
(3) The department may, in carrying out its efforts to expand the
tourism industry in the state:
(a) Solicit and receive gifts, grants, funds, fees, and endowments,
in trust or otherwise, from tribal, local or other governmental
entities, as well as private sources, and may expend the same or any
income therefrom for tourism purposes. All revenue received for
tourism purposes shall be deposited into the tourism development and
promotion account created in RCW 43.330.094;
(b) Host conferences and strategic planning workshops relating to
the promotion of nature-based and wildlife viewing tourism;
(c) Conduct or contract for tourism-related studies;
(d) Contract with individuals, businesses, or public entities to
carry out its tourism-related activities under this section;
(e) Provide tourism-related organizations with marketing and other
technical assistance;
(f) Evaluate and make recommendations on proposed tourism-related
policies.
(4)))(a) The department shall promote, market, and encourage growth
in the production of films and videos, as well as television
commercials within the state; to this end the department is directed to
assist in the location of a film and video production studio within the
state.
(b) The department may, in carrying out its efforts to encourage
film and video production in the state, solicit and receive gifts,
grants, funds, fees, and endowments, in trust or otherwise, from
tribal, local, or other governmental entities, as well as private
sources, and may expend the same or any income therefrom for the
encouragement of film and video production. All revenue received for
such purposes shall be deposited into the film and video promotion
account created in RCW 43.330.092.
(((5))) (3) In assisting in the development of regional and
statewide industry cluster-based strategies, the department's
activities shall include, but are not limited to:
(a) Facilitating regional focus group discussions and conducting
studies to identify industry clusters, appraise the current information
linkages within a cluster, and identify issues of common concern within
a cluster;
(b) Supporting industry and cluster associations, publications of
association and cluster directories, and related efforts to create or
expand the activities of industry and cluster associations;
(c) Administering a competitive grant program to fund activities
designed to further regional cluster growth. In administering the
program, the department shall work with an industry cluster advisory
committee with equal representation from the work force training and
education coordinating board, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the employment security department, business, and
labor.
(i) The industry cluster advisory committee shall recommend
criteria for evaluating applications for grant funds and recommend
applicants for receipt of grant funds.
(ii) Applicants must include organizations from at least two
counties and participants from the local business community. Eligible
organizations include, but are not limited to, local governments,
economic development councils, chambers of commerce, federally
recognized Indian tribes, work force development councils, and
educational institutions.
(iii) Applications must evidence financial participation of the
partner organizations.
(iv) Priority shall be given to applicants which will use the grant
funds to build linkages and joint projects, to develop common resources
and common training, and to develop common research and development
projects or facilities.
(v) The maximum amount of a grant is one hundred thousand dollars.
(vi) A maximum of one hundred thousand dollars total can go to
King, Pierce, Kitsap, and Snohomish counties combined.
(vii) No more than ten percent of funds received for the grant
program may be used by the department for administrative costs.
(((6))) (4) As used in subsection (((5))) (3) of this section,
"industry cluster" means a geographic concentration of interdependent
competitive firms that do business with each other. "Industry cluster"
also includes firms that sell inside and outside of the geographic
region as well as support firms that supply raw materials, components,
and business services.

Sec. 202 RCW 43.330.094 and 2003 c 153 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tourism development and promotion account is created in the
state treasury. All receipts from RCW 36.102.060(10) ((and
43.330.090(3)(a))) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the
account ((received under RCW 36.102.060(10))) may be spent only after
appropriation. ((No appropriation is required for expenditures from
moneys received under RCW 43.330.090(3)(a).)) Expenditures from the
account may be used by the department of community, trade, and economic
development only for the purposes of expanding and promoting the
tourism industry in the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 RCW 43.330.095 (Tourism development
advisory committee) and 1998 c 299 s 2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 RCW 43.330.096 is recodified in the new
chapter created in section 206 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 Sections 101 through 105 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---