BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.04.030 and 2001 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The fish and wildlife commission consists of nine registered voters
of the state. In January of each odd-numbered year, the governor shall
appoint with the advice and consent of the senate three registered
voters to the commission to serve for terms of six years from that
January or until their successors are appointed and qualified. If a
vacancy occurs on the commission prior to the expiration of a term, the
governor shall appoint a registered voter within sixty days to complete
the term. Three members shall be residents of that portion of the
state lying east of the summit of the Cascade mountains, and three
shall be residents of that portion of the state lying west of the
summit of the Cascade mountains. Three additional members shall be
appointed at-large. ((No)) Only two members may be residents of the
same county. The legal office of the commission is at the
administrative office of the department in Olympia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---