BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall adopt rules establishing guidelines for
policies, procedures, and mandatory training programs on sexual
harassment for state employees to be adopted by state agencies and
establishing reporting requirements for state agencies on compliance
with section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Agencies as defined in RCW 41.06.020 shall:
(1) Update or develop and disseminate among all agency employees
and contractors a policy that:
(a) Defines and prohibits sexual harassment in the workplace;
(b) Includes procedures that describe how the agency will address
concerns of employees who are affected by sexual harassment in the
workplace;
(c) Identifies appropriate sanctions and disciplinary actions; and
(d) Complies with guidelines adopted by the director of personnel
under section 1 of this act;
(2) Respond promptly and effectively to sexual harassment concerns;
(3) Conduct training and education for all employees in order to
prevent and eliminate sexual harassment in the organization;
(4) Inform employees of their right to file a complaint with the
Washington state human rights commission under chapter 49.60 RCW, or
with the federal equal employment opportunity commission under Title
VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964; and
(5) Report to the department of personnel on compliance with this
section.
The cost of the training programs shall be borne by state agencies
within existing resources.

--- END ---