BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.118.020 and 1987 c 514 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions contained in this section shall apply throughout
this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant group" includes any business professional group or
organization, any individual, or any other interested party which
proposes that any business professional group not presently regulated
be regulated or which proposes legislation to substantially increase
the scope of practice or the level of regulation of the profession.
(2) "Business professions" means those business occupations or
professions which are not health professions under chapter 18.120 RCW
and includes, in addition to real estate brokers and salespersons under
chapter 18.85 RCW, the following professions and occupations:
Accountancy under chapter 18.04 RCW; architects under chapter 18.08
RCW; auctioneering under chapter 18.11 RCW; cosmetologists, barbers,
and manicurists under chapter 18.16 RCW; contractors under chapter
18.27 RCW; debt adjusting under chapter 18.28 RCW; engineers and
surveyors under chapter 18.43 RCW; escrow agents under chapter 18.44
RCW; landscape architects under chapter 18.96 RCW; water well
construction under chapter 18.104 RCW; plumbers under chapter 18.106
RCW; and art dealers under chapter 18.110 RCW.
(3) (("Certificate" and)) "Certification" means a voluntary process
by which a statutory regulatory entity grants recognition to an
individual who (a) has met certain prerequisite qualifications
specified by that regulatory entity, and (b) may assume or use
"certified" in the title or designation to perform prescribed
professional tasks.
(4) "Grandfather clause" means a provision in a regulatory statute
applicable to practitioners actively engaged in the regulated
profession prior to the effective date of the regulatory statute which
exempts the practitioners from meeting the prerequisite qualifications
set forth in the regulatory statute to perform prescribed occupational
tasks.
(5) "Inspection" means the periodic examination of practitioners by
a state agency in order to ascertain whether the practitioners'
occupation is being carried out in a fashion consistent with the public
health, safety, and welfare.
(6) "Legislative committees of reference" means the standing
legislative committees designated by the respective rules committees of
the senate and house of representatives to consider proposed
legislation to regulate business professions not previously regulated.
(7) "License", "licensing", and "licensure" mean permission to
engage in a business profession which would otherwise be unlawful in
the state in the absence of the permission. A license is granted to
those individuals who meet prerequisite qualifications to perform
prescribed professional tasks and for the use of a particular title.
(8) (("Professional license" means an individual, nontransferable
authorization to carry on an activity based on qualifications which
include: (a) Graduation from an accredited or approved program, and
(b) acceptable performance on a qualifying examination or series of
examinations.
(9))) "Practitioner" means an individual who (a) has achieved
knowledge and skill by practice, and (b) is actively engaged in a
specified business profession.
(((10))) (9) "Public member" means an individual who is not, and
never was, a member of the business profession being regulated or the
spouse of a member, or an individual who does not have and never has
had a material financial interest in either the rendering of the
business professional service being regulated or an activity directly
related to the profession being regulated.
(((11))) (10) "Registration" means the formal notification which,
prior to rendering services, a practitioner shall submit to a state
agency setting forth the name and address of the practitioner; the
location, nature and operation of the business activity to be
practiced; and, if required by the regulatory entity, a description of
the service to be provided.
(((12))) (11) "Regulatory entity" means any board, commission,
agency, division, or other unit or subunit of state government which
regulates one or more professions, occupations, industries, businesses,
or other endeavors in this state.
(((13))) (12) "State agency" includes every state office,
department, board, commission, regulatory entity, and agency of the
state, and, where provided by law, programs and activities involving
less than the full responsibility of a state agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.118 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) When the legislature requests the department of licensing to
conduct a review under this chapter, the department must gather, as
appropriate, the information detailed in RCW 18.118.030. In gathering
this information, the department of licensing must seek input from
public members. Unless the public hearing requirements of (b) of this
subsection are met, a review is not complete if it consists only of
input from members of the business profession of which the legislature
seeks review.
(b) The department must hold a public hearing during which the
department will receive public comment. At least twenty days before
the public hearing, the department of licensing must cause notice of
the hearing to be filed with the code reviser for publication in the
Washington State Register. The notice must include:
(i) The business profession for which information is sought;
(ii) As appropriate, the information requested under RCW
18.118.030; and
(iii) When, where, and how public members may present information
about the business profession.
(c) The department of licensing must request names of individuals
and organizations that may have information needed for the review from
legislators and other identified interested parties. These individuals
and organizations must be sent copies of the notice under (b) of this
subsection.
(2) If the department of licensing determines that regulation of
the business profession is not necessary, the evidence gathered by the
department must clearly demonstrate that: (a) Unregulated practice
will not result in harm or endanger the health, safety, or welfare of
the public; (b) the public does not need nor reasonably expects to
benefit from an assurance of initial and continuing professional
ability; and (c) the public can be effectively protected by other means
in a more cost-beneficial manner.
(3) The department of licensing must submit a report detailing its
findings under this section to the legislative committees of reference.
This report must also detail the department's efforts to contact public
members and whether a public hearing was conducted under this section.

--- END ---