BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that broadband
technologies, which enable the high-speed transmission of electronic
information, play a fundamental role in the state's economy, are
essential for electronic commerce and telecommuting, and are critical
for 21st century learning and medicine. However, broadband
technologies are not evenly dispersed and utilized among the state's
citizens. Rural, inner-city, and low-income households may be unable
to reap the benefits of broadband access. In order to develop a
strategy for encouraging the cost-effective deployment of broadband
technologies in the state, the legislature intends to identify factors
preventing the widespread availability and use of broadband
technologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall commission a survey on the deployment of
broadband technologies among households in the state. The survey shall
be conducted by an appropriate entity having expertise in the access
and utilization of modern information technologies among underserved
populations.
The survey shall collect and interpret statistically reliable
geographic, demographic, and telecommunications technology information
to identify any broadband deployment disparities in the state. The
survey shall also produce a statistically reliable profile of the
following:
(1) Households and businesses in the state with no available
broadband options;
(2) Households and businesses in the state with access to broadband
options, but who choose not to purchase an option; and
(3) Purposes for which broadband is used by households and
businesses in the state.
The survey is due by December 31, 2007, and shall be presented to
the appropriate committees of the legislature having jurisdiction over
telecommunications issues. The study may be presented in an electronic
form.
The following definitions apply to this act unless the context
clearly requires otherwise:
"Broadband" means any transmission technology capable of speeds in
excess of two hundred kilobits per second in at least one direction.
"Geographic information" includes postal zip code groupings
representative of the diverse populations of the state.
"Demographic information" includes age, income, and education
level.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The names and identification data of any person, household, or
business participating in a survey under this act are exempt from
disclosure under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of one hundred sixty-five thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the
department of community, trade, and economic development for the
purpose of commissioning a survey on the deployment of broadband
technologies among households in the state in accordance with the
provisions of this act.

--- END ---