BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.08.150 and 2003 c 320 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The action, order, or decision of the board as to any denial of an
application for the reissuance of a permit or license or as to any
revocation, suspension, or modification of any permit or license shall
be an adjudicative proceeding and subject to the applicable provisions
of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(1) An opportunity for a hearing may be provided an applicant for
the reissuance of a permit or license prior to the disposition of the
application, and if no such opportunity for a prior hearing is provided
then an opportunity for a hearing to reconsider the application must be
provided the applicant.
(2) An opportunity for a hearing must be provided a permittee or
licensee prior to a revocation or modification of any permit or license
and, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, prior to the
suspension of any permit or license.
(3) No hearing shall be required until demanded by the applicant,
permittee, or licensee.
(4) The board may summarily suspend a license or permit for a
period of up to one hundred eighty days without a prior hearing if it
finds that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively require
emergency action, and it incorporates a finding to that effect in its
order((; and)). Proceedings for revocation or other action must be
promptly instituted and determined. An administrative law judge may
extend the summary suspension period for up to one calendar year in the
event the proceedings for revocation or other action cannot be
completed during the initial one hundred eighty day period due to
actions by the licensee or permittee. The board's enforcement division
shall complete a preliminary staff investigation of the violation
before requesting an emergency suspension by the board.

--- END ---