BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.42.005 and 2003 c 71 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the health and safety of its
citizens, natural resources, and the environment are vital interests of
the state that must be protected to preserve the state's quality of
life. The legislature also finds that the state's economic well-being
is a vital interest that depends upon the development of fair,
accessible, and coordinated permitting and regulatory ((processes))
requirements that ensure that the state not only protects public health
and safety and natural resources but also encourages appropriate
activities that stimulate growth and development. The legislature
further finds that Washington's permitting and regulatory programs have
established strict standards to protect public health and safety and
the environment.
(2) The legislature also finds that, as the number of environmental
and land use laws and requirements have grown in Washington, so have
the number of permits required of business and government. The
increasing number of ((individual)) permits and ((permit)) permitting
agencies has generated the potential for conflict, overlap, and
duplication among ((various)) state, local, and federal ((permits.
Lack of coordination in the processing of project applications may
cause costly delays and frustration to applicants)) permitting and
regulatory requirements.
(3) The legislature further finds that not all project
((applicants)) proponents require the same type of assistance.
((Applicants)) Proponents with small projects may merely need
information ((about local and state permits)) and assistance in
((applying for those permits)) starting the permitting and application
process, while intermediate-sized projects may require more of a
facilitated ((permit)) and periodically assisted permitting process,
and large complex projects may need extensive and more continuous
coordination among local, state, and federal agencies and tribal
governments.
(4) The legislature further finds that persons doing business in
Washington state should have access to clear and appropriate
information regarding ((state)) regulations, permit requirements, and
agency rule-making processes.
(5) The legislature, therefore, finds that a range of assistance
and coordination options should be available to project ((applicants))
proponents from a state office independent of any local, state, or
federal permit agency. The legislature finds that citizens,
businesses, and project ((applicants)) proponents should be provided
with:
(a) A reliable and consolidated source of information concerning
federal, state, and local environmental and land use laws and
procedures that may apply to any given project;
(b) Facilitated interagency forums for discussion of significant
issues related to the multiple permitting processes if needed for some
project ((applicants)) proponents; and
(c) Active coordination of all applicable regulatory and land use
permitting procedures if needed for some project ((applicants))
proponents.
(6) The legislature declares that the purpose of this chapter is to
((transfer the existing permit assistance center in the department of
ecology to a new office of permit assistance in the office of financial
management to)):
(a) Assure that citizens, businesses, and project ((applicants))
proponents will continue to be provided with vital information
regarding environmental and land use laws and with assistance in
complying with environmental and land use laws to promote understanding
of these laws and to protect public health and safety and the
environment;
(b) Ensure that facilitation of project permit decisions by permit
agencies promotes both process efficiency and environmental protection;
(c) Allow for coordination of permit processing for large projects
upon project ((applicants')) proponents' request and at project
((applicants')) proponents' expense to promote efficiency, ensure
certainty, and avoid conflicts among permit agencies; and
(d) Provide these services through an office independent of any
permit agency to ensure that any potential or perceived conflicts of
interest related to providing these services or making permit decisions
can be avoided.
(7) The legislature also declares that the purpose of this chapter
is to provide citizens of the state with access to information
regarding state regulations, permit requirements, and agency rule-making processes in Washington state.
(8) The legislature intends that establishing an office of
regulatory assistance will provide these services without abrogating or
limiting the authority of any ((permit)) agency to make decisions on
permits and regulatory requirements that it ((issues)) requires or any
rule-making agency to make decisions on regulations. The legislature
therefore declares that the office of regulatory assistance shall have
authority to provide these services but shall not have any authority to
make decisions on permits.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.42.010 and 2003 c 71 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office of regulatory assistance is created in the office of
financial management and shall be administered by the office of the
governor to assist citizens, businesses, and project ((applicants))
proponents.
(2) The office shall:
(a) Maintain and furnish information as provided in RCW 43.42.040;
(b) Furnish facilitation as provided in RCW 43.42.050;
(c) Furnish coordination as provided in RCW 43.42.060;
(d) Coordinate cost reimbursement as provided in RCW 43.42.070;
(e) Work with ((state)) governmental agencies ((and local
governments)) to continue to develop a range of ((permit)) permitting
and regulatory assistance options for project ((applicants))
proponents;
(f) ((Review initiatives developed by the transportation permit
efficiency and accountability committee established in chapter 47.06C
RCW and determine if any would be beneficial if implemented for other
types of projects;
(g))) Work to develop informal processes for dispute resolution
between agencies and permit ((applicants)) proponents;
(((h))) (g) Conduct customer surveys to evaluate its effectiveness;
and
(((i))) (h) Provide the following ((biennial)) reports by June 1,
2008, and biennially thereafter, to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature:
(i) A performance report, based on the customer surveys required in
(((h))) (g) of this subsection;
(ii) A report on any ((statutory or regulatory)) conflicts
identified by the office in the course of its duties ((that arise))
arising from differing ((legal)) statutory or regulatory authorities
((and)), roles and missions of agencies, timing and sequencing of
permitting and procedural requirements, or otherwise, and how these
were resolved((. The report may include recommendations to the
legislature and to agencies)); and
(iii) A report regarding negotiation and implementation of
voluntary cost-reimbursement agreements and use of outside independent
consultants under RCW 43.42.070, including the nature and amount of
work performed and implementation of requirements relating to costs.
(3) ((A director of the office shall be hired no later than June 1,
2003.
(4))) The office shall ((give priority to furnishing assistance to
small projects when expending general fund moneys allocated to it))
ensure the equitable delivery and provision of assistance services,
regardless of project type, scale, fund source, or assistance request.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.42.020 and 2002 c 153 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office shall operate on the principle that citizens of the
state of Washington should receive the following information regarding
permits:
(a) A date and time for a decision on a permit or regulatory
requirement;
(b) The information required for an agency to make a decision on a
permit or regulatory requirement, recognizing that changes in the
project or other circumstances may change the information required; and
(c) An estimate of the maximum amount of costs in fees, studies, or
public processes that will be incurred by the project ((applicant))
proponent.
(2) This section does not create an independent cause of action,
affect any existing cause of action, or establish time limits for
purposes of RCW 64.40.020.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.42.030 and 2003 c 71 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Office" means the office of regulatory assistance in the
office of financial management established in RCW 43.42.010.
(2) "Permit" means any permit, certificate, use authorization, or
other form of governmental review or approval required in order to
construct, expand, or operate a project in the state of Washington.
(3) "Permit agency" means any state ((or)), local, or federal
agency authorized by law to issue permits.
(4) "Project" means any activity, the conduct of which requires a
permit or permits from one or more permit agencies.
(5) "Project ((applicant)) proponent" means a citizen, business, or
any entity applying for or seeking a permit or permits in the state of
Washington.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.42.040 and 2003 c 71 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office shall assist citizens, businesses, and project
((applicants)) proponents by maintaining and furnishing information,
including, but not limited to:
(a) To the extent possible, compiling and periodically updating one
or more handbooks containing lists and explanations of permit laws,
including all relevant local, state, federal, and tribal laws. In
providing this information, the office shall seek the cooperation of
relevant local, state, and federal agencies and tribal governments;
(b) Establishing and providing notice of a point of contact for
obtaining information;
(c) Working closely and cooperatively with ((the)) business license
centers ((in providing)) to provide efficient and nonduplicative
service; and
(d) ((Collecting and making available information regarding
federal, state, local, and tribal government programs that rely on
private professional expertise to assist agencies in project permit
review; and
(e))) Developing a ((call)) service center and a web site.
(2) The office shall coordinate among state agencies to develop an
office web site that is linked through the office of the governor's web
site and that contains information regarding permitting and regulatory
requirements for businesses and citizens in Washington state. At a
minimum, the web site shall provide information or links to information
on:
(a) Federal, state, and local rule-making processes and ((permit))
permitting and regulatory requirements applicable to Washington
businesses and citizens;
(b) Federal, state, and local licenses, permits, and approvals
necessary to start and operate a business or develop real property in
Washington;
(c) State and local building codes;
(d) Federal, state, and local economic development programs that
may be available to businesses in Washington; and
(e) State and local agencies regulating or providing assistance to
citizens and businesses operating a business or developing real
property in Washington.
(3) This section does not create an independent cause of action,
affect any existing cause of action, or create any new cause of action
regarding the application of regulatory or permit requirements.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.42.050 and 2003 c 54 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
At the request of a project ((applicant)) proponent, the office
shall assist the project ((applicant)) proponent in determining what
regulatory requirements, processes, and permits apply to the project,
as provided in this section.
(1) The office shall assign a project facilitator who shall discuss
applicable regulatory requirements, permits, and processes with the
project ((applicant)) proponent and explain the available options for
obtaining required permits and regulatory review.
(2) If the project ((applicant)) proponent and the project
facilitator agree that the project would benefit from a project
scoping, ((or if the project is an industrial project of statewide
significance, as defined in RCW 43.157.010,)) the project facilitator
shall conduct a project scoping ((by)) with the project ((applicant))
proponent and the relevant ((state and local permit)) permitting and
regulatory agencies. The project facilitator shall invite the
participation of the relevant federal ((permit)) agencies and tribal
governments.
(a) The purpose of the project scoping is to identify the issues
and information needs of the project ((applicant)) proponent and the
participating permit agencies regarding the project, share
perspectives, and jointly develop a strategy for the processing of
required permits by each participating permit agency.
(b) The scoping shall address:
(i) The permits that are required for the project;
(ii) The permit application forms and other application
requirements of the participating permit agencies;
(iii) The specific information needs and issues of concern of each
participant and their significance;
(iv) Any statutory or regulatory conflicts that might arise from
the differing authorities and roles of the permit agencies;
(v) Any natural resources, including federal or state listed
species, that might be adversely affected by the project and might
cause an alteration of the project or require mitigation; and
(vi) The anticipated time required for permit decisions by each
participating permit agency, including the time required to determine
if the permit application is complete, to conduct environmental review,
and to review and process the application. In determining the time
required, full consideration must be given to achieving the greatest
possible efficiencies through any concurrent studies and any
consolidated applications, hearings, and comment periods.
(c) The outcome of the project scoping shall be documented in
writing, furnished to the project ((applicant)) proponent, and be made
available to the public.
(d) The project scoping shall be completed within sixty days of the
project ((applicant's)) proponent's request for a project scoping.
(e) Upon completion of the project scoping, the participating
permit agencies shall proceed under their respective authority. The
agencies are encouraged to remain in communication for purposes of
coordination until their final permit decisions are made.
(3) This section does not create an independent cause of action,
affect any existing cause of action, or establish time limits for
purposes of RCW 64.40.020.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.42.060 and 2003 c 54 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office may coordinate the processing by participating
permit agencies of permits required for a project, at the request of
the project ((applicant)) proponent through a cost reimbursement
agreement as provided in subsection (3) of this section or with the
agreement of the project ((applicant)) proponent as provided in
subsection (4) of this section.
(2) The office shall assign a project coordinator to perform any or
all of the following functions, as specified by the terms of a cost
reimbursement agreement under subsection (3) of this section or an
agreement under subsection (4) of this section:
(a) Serve as the main point of contact for the project
((applicant)) proponent;
(b) Conduct a project scoping as provided in RCW 43.42.050(2);
(c) Verify that the project ((applicant)) proponent has all the
information needed to complete applications;
(d) Coordinate the permit processes of the permit agencies;
(e) Manage the applicable administrative procedures;
(f) Work to assure that timely permit decisions are made by the
permit agencies and maintain contact with the project ((applicant))
proponent and the permit agencies to ensure adherence to schedules;
(g) Assist in resolving any conflict or inconsistency among permit
requirements and conditions; and
(h) Coordinate with relevant federal permit agencies and tribal
governments to the extent possible.
(3) At the request of a project ((applicant)) proponent and as
provided in RCW 43.42.070, the project coordinator shall coordinate
negotiations among the project ((applicant)) proponent, the office, and
participating permit agencies to enter into a cost reimbursement
agreement and shall coordinate implementation of the agreement, which
shall govern coordination of permit processing by the participating
permit agencies.
(4) For industrial projects of statewide significance or if the
office determines that it is in the public interest to coordinate the
processing of permits for certain projects that are complex in scope,
require multiple permits, involve multiple jurisdictions, or involve a
significant number of affected parties, the office shall, upon the
((applicant's)) proponent's request, enter into an agreement with the
project ((applicant)) proponent and the participating permit agencies
to coordinate the processing of permits for the project. The office
may limit the number of such agreements according to the resources
available to the office and the permit agencies at the time.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.42.070 and 2003 c 70 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office may coordinate negotiation and implementation of a
written agreement among the project ((applicant)) proponent, the
office, and participating permit agencies to recover from the project
((applicant)) proponent the reasonable costs incurred by the office in
carrying out the provisions of RCW 43.42.050(2) and 43.42.060(2) and by
participating permit agencies in carrying out permit processing tasks
specified in the agreement.
(2) The office may coordinate negotiation and implementation of a
written agreement among the project ((applicant)) proponent, the
office, and participating permit agencies to recover from the project
((applicant)) proponent the reasonable costs incurred by outside
independent consultants selected by the office and participating permit
agencies to perform permit processing tasks.
(3) Outside independent consultants may only bill for the costs of
performing those permit processing tasks that are specified in a cost-reimbursement agreement under this section. The billing process shall
provide for accurate time and cost accounting and may include a billing
cycle that provides for progress payments.
(4) The office shall adopt a policy to coordinate cost-reimbursement agreements with outside independent consultants. Cost-reimbursement agreements coordinated by the office under this section
must be based on competitive bids that are awarded for each agreement
from a prequalified consultant roster.
(5) Independent consultants hired under a cost-reimbursement
agreement shall report directly to the permit agency. The office shall
assure that final decisions are made by the permit agency and not by
the consultant.
(6) The office shall develop procedures for determining,
collecting, and distributing cost reimbursement for carrying out the
provisions of this chapter.
(7) For a cost-reimbursement agreement, the office and
participating permit agencies shall negotiate a work plan and schedule
for reimbursement. Prior to distributing scheduled reimbursement to
the agencies, the office shall verify that the agencies have met the
obligations contained in their work plan.
(8) Prior to commencing negotiations with the project ((applicant))
proponent for a cost-reimbursement agreement, the office shall request
work load analyses from each participating permitting agency. These
analyses shall be available to the public. The work load of a
participating permit agency may only be modified with the concurrence
of the agency and if there is both good cause to do so and no
significant impact on environmental review.
(9) The office shall develop guidance to ensure that, in developing
cost-reimbursement agreements, conflicts of interest are eliminated.
(10) For project permit processes that it coordinates, the office
shall coordinate the negotiation of all cost-reimbursement agreements
executed under RCW 43.21A.690, ((43.30.420)) 43.30.490, 43.70.630,
43.300.080, and 70.94.085. The office and the permit agencies shall be
signatories to the agreements. Each permit agency shall manage
performance of its portion of the agreement.
(11) If a permit agency or the project ((applicant)) proponent
foresees, at any time, that it will be unable to meet its obligations
under the cost-reimbursement agreement, it shall notify the office and
state the reasons. The office shall notify the participating permit
agencies and the project ((applicant)) proponent and, upon agreement of
all parties, adjust the schedule, or, if necessary, coordinate revision
of the work plan.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.42.080 and 2004 c 32 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) The legislature finds that there are numerous efforts ongoing
to streamline and improve permitting processes. These include the work
of the transportation permit efficiency and accountability committee,
chapter 47.06C RCW, and the efforts of the office of regulatory
assistance to develop an integrated permit system, chapter 245, Laws of
2003. While these efforts are ongoing and likely to yield procedural
improvements in permit processing by 2006, there is an immediate need
to coordinate permitting timelines for large, multiagency permit
streamlining efforts.
(2))) With the agreement of all participating permitting agencies
and the permit applicant or project proponent, state permitting
agencies may establish timelines to make permit decisions, including
the time periods required to determine that the permit applications are
complete, to review the applications, and to process the permits.
Established timelines shall not be shorter than those otherwise
required for each permit under other applicable provisions of law, but
may extend and coordinate such timelines. The goal of the established
timelines is to achieve the maximum efficiencies possible through
concurrent studies and consolidation of applications, permit review,
hearings, and comment periods. A timeline established under this
subsection with the agreement of each permitting agency shall commit
each permitting agency to act within the established timeline.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.21A.690 and 2003 c 70 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit applicant or project proponent to recover from
the applicant or proponent the reasonable costs incurred by the
department in carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as well as
the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies, and permit processing. The cost-reimbursement agreement shall
identify the specific tasks, costs, and schedule for work to be
conducted under the agreement.
(2) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be negotiated
with the permit applicant or project proponent. Under the provisions
of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant shall be
used by the department to contract with an independent consultant to
carry out the work covered by the cost-reimbursement agreement. The
department may also use funds provided under a cost-reimbursement
agreement to assign current staff to review the work of the consultant,
to provide necessary technical assistance when an independent
consultant with comparable technical skills is unavailable, and to
recover reasonable and necessary direct and indirect costs that arise
from processing the permit. The department shall, in developing the
agreement, ensure that final decisions that involve policy matters are
made by the agency and not by the consultant. The department shall
make an estimate of the number of permanent staff hours to process the
permits, and shall contract with consultants to replace the time and
functions committed by these permanent staff to the project. The
billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost accounting and
may include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments. Use
of cost-reimbursement agreements shall not reduce the current level of
staff available to work on permits not covered by cost-reimbursement
agreements. The department may not use any funds under a cost-
reimbursement agreement to replace or supplant existing funding. The
restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any cost-reimbursement
agreement, and to any person hired as a result of a cost-reimbursement
agreement.
(((3) The department may not enter into any new cost-reimbursement
agreements on or after July 1, 2007. The department may continue to
administer any cost-reimbursement agreement that was entered into
before July 1, 2007, until the project is completed.))

Sec. 11 RCW 43.30.490 and 2003 c 70 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit or lease applicant or project proponent to
recover from the applicant or proponent the reasonable costs incurred
by the department in carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as
well as the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to
permit coordination, environmental review, application review,
technical studies, and permit or lease processing. The cost-reimbursement agreement shall identify the specific tasks, costs, and
schedule for work to be conducted under the agreement. ((An applicant
for a lease issued under chapter 79.90 RCW may not enter into a cost-reimbursement agreement under this section for projects conducted under
the lease.))
(2) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be negotiated
with the permit or lease applicant or project proponent. Under the
provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant
or proponent shall be used by the department to contract with an
independent consultant to carry out the work covered by the cost-reimbursement agreement. The department may also use funds provided
under a cost-reimbursement agreement to assign current staff to review
the work of the consultant, to provide necessary technical assistance
when an independent consultant with comparable technical skills is
unavailable, and to recover reasonable and necessary direct and
indirect costs that arise from processing the permit or lease. The
department shall, in developing the agreement, ensure that final
decisions that involve policy matters are made by the agency and not by
the consultant. The department shall make an estimate of the number of
permanent staff hours to process the permits or leases, and shall
contract with consultants to replace the time and functions committed
by these permanent staff to the project. The billing process shall
provide for accurate time and cost accounting and may include a billing
cycle that provides for progress payments. Use of cost-reimbursement
agreements shall not reduce the current level of staff available to
work on permits or leases not covered by cost-reimbursement agreements.
The department may not use any funds under a cost-reimbursement
agreement to replace or supplant existing funding. The restrictions of
chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any
person hired as a result of a cost-reimbursement agreement.
(((3) The department may not enter into any new cost-reimbursement
agreements on or after July 1, 2007. The department may continue to
administer any cost-reimbursement agreement that was entered into
before July 1, 2007, until the project is completed.))

Sec. 12 RCW 43.70.630 and 2003 c 70 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit applicant or project proponent to recover from
the applicant or proponent the reasonable costs incurred by the
department in carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as well as
the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies, and permit processing. The cost-reimbursement agreement shall
identify the specific tasks, costs, and schedule for work to be
conducted under the agreement.
(2) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be negotiated
with the permit applicant or project proponent. Under the provisions
of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant or
proponent shall be used by the department to contract with an
independent consultant to carry out the work covered by the cost-reimbursement agreement. The department may also use funds provided
under a cost-reimbursement agreement to assign current staff to review
the work of the consultant, to provide necessary technical assistance
when an independent consultant with comparable technical skills is
unavailable, and to recover reasonable and necessary direct and
indirect costs that arise from processing the permit. The department
shall, in developing the agreement, ensure that final decisions that
involve policy matters are made by the agency and not by the
consultant. The department shall make an estimate of the number of
permanent staff hours to process the permits, and shall contract with
consultants to replace the time and functions committed by these
permanent staff to the project. The billing process shall provide for
accurate time and cost accounting and may include a billing cycle that
provides for progress payments. Use of cost-reimbursement agreements
shall not reduce the current level of staff available to work on
permits not covered by cost-reimbursement agreements. The department
may not use any funds under a cost-reimbursement agreement to replace
or supplant existing funding. The restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW
apply to any cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any person hired as
a result of a cost-reimbursement agreement.
(((3) The department may not enter into any new cost-reimbursement
agreements on or after July 1, 2007. The department may continue to
administer any cost-reimbursement agreement that was entered into
before July 1, 2007, until the project is completed.))

Sec. 13 RCW 43.300.080 and 2003 c 70 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit applicant or project proponent to recover from
the applicant or proponent the reasonable costs incurred by the
department in carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as well as
the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies, and permit processing. The cost-reimbursement agreement shall
identify the specific tasks, costs, and schedule for work to be
conducted under the agreement.
(2) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be negotiated
with the permit applicant or project proponent. Under the provisions
of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant shall be
used by the department to contract with an independent consultant to
carry out the work covered by the cost-reimbursement agreement. The
department may also use funds provided under a cost-reimbursement
agreement to assign current staff to review the work of the consultant,
to provide necessary technical assistance when an independent
consultant with comparable technical skills is unavailable, and to
recover reasonable and necessary direct and indirect costs that arise
from processing the permit. The department shall, in developing the
agreement, ensure that final decisions that involve policy matters are
made by the agency and not by the consultant. The department shall
make an estimate of the number of permanent staff hours to process the
permits, and shall contract with consultants to replace the time and
functions committed by these permanent staff to the project. The
billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost accounting and
may include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments. Use
of cost-reimbursement agreements shall not reduce the current level of
staff available to work on permits not covered by cost-reimbursement
agreements. The department may not use any funds under a cost-reimbursement agreement to replace or supplant existing funding. The
restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any cost-reimbursement
agreement, and to any person hired as a result of a cost-reimbursement
agreement.
(((3) The department may not enter into any new cost-reimbursement
agreements on or after July 1, 2007. The department may continue to
administer any cost-reimbursement agreement that was entered into
before July 1, 2007, until the project is completed.))

Sec. 14 RCW 70.94.085 and 2003 c 70 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An authority may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with a permit applicant or project proponent to recover from
the applicant or proponent the reasonable costs incurred by the
authority in carrying out the requirements of this chapter, as well as
the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical
studies, and permit processing. The cost-reimbursement agreement shall
identify the specific tasks, costs, and schedule for work to be
conducted under the agreement.
(2) The written cost-reimbursement agreement shall be negotiated
with the permit applicant or project proponent. Under the provisions
of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant or
proponent shall be used by the air pollution control authority to
contract with an independent consultant to carry out the work covered
by the cost-reimbursement agreement. The air pollution control
authority may also use funds provided under a cost-reimbursement
agreement to assign current staff to review the work of the consultant,
to provide necessary technical assistance when an independent
consultant with comparable technical skills is unavailable, and to
recover reasonable and necessary direct and indirect costs that arise
from processing the permit. The air pollution control authority shall,
in developing the agreement, ensure that final decisions that involve
policy matters are made by the agency and not by the consultant. The
air pollution control authority shall make an estimate of the number of
permanent staff hours to process the permits, and shall contract with
consultants to replace the time and functions committed by these
permanent staff to the project. The billing process shall provide for
accurate time and cost accounting and may include a billing cycle that
provides for progress payments. Use of cost-reimbursement agreements
shall not reduce the current level of staff available to work on
permits not covered by cost-reimbursement agreements. The air
pollution control authority may not use any funds under a cost-reimbursement agreement to replace or supplant existing funding. The
provisions of chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any cost-reimbursement
agreement, and to any person hired as a result of a cost-reimbursement
agreement. Members of the air pollution control authority's board of
directors shall be considered as state officers, and employees of the
air pollution control authority shall be considered as state employees,
for the sole purpose of applying the restrictions of chapter 42.52 RCW
to this section.
(((3) An air pollution control authority may not enter into any new
cost-reimbursement agreements on or after July 1, 2007. The authority
may continue to administer any cost-reimbursement agreement that was
entered into before July 1, 2007, until the project is completed.))

Sec. 15 RCW 43.131.401 and 2003 c 71 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of regulatory assistance established in RCW 43.42.010
and its powers and duties shall be terminated June 30, ((2007)) 2011,
as provided in RCW 43.131.402.

Sec. 16 RCW 43.131.402 and 2003 c 71 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, ((2008)) 2012:
(1) RCW 43.42.005 and 2003 c 71 § 1 & 2002 c 153 § 1;
(2) RCW 43.42.010 and 2003 c 71 § 2 & 2002 c 153 § 2;
(3) RCW 43.42.020 and 2002 c 153 § 3;
(4) RCW 43.42.030 and 2003 c 71 § 3 & 2002 c 153 § 4;
(5) RCW 43.42.040 and 2003 c 71 § 4 & 2002 c 153 § 5;
(6) RCW 43.42.050 and 2002 c 153 § 6;
(7) RCW 43.42.060 and 2002 c 153 § 7;
(8) RCW 43.42.070 and 2002 c 153 § 8;
(9) RCW 43.42.905 and 2002 c 153 § 10;
(10) RCW 43.42.900 and 2002 c 153 § 11; and
(11) RCW 43.42.901 and 2002 c 153 § 12.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 RCW 43.42.905 is decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 By July 1, 2008, the joint legislative
audit and review committee shall report to the governor and appropriate
committees of the legislature on the compliance of the office of
regulatory assistance with the sunset review proposed final report,
January 4, 2007, findings and recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Section 15 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---