BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Seven rockfish stocks, including canary and yelloweye rockfish,
have been designated under federal law by the national marine fisheries
services as overfished on the west coast.
(b) The department of fish and wildlife has classified certain
rockfish species within Puget Sound as critically depressed. These
common species of rockfish have undergone dramatic declines in Puget
Sound and the coast during the past three decades.
(c) The Pacific fishery management council and the department of
fish and wildlife have eliminated the directed commercial fisheries and
greatly reduced the recreational fishing opportunity for these species.
(d) Due to the interactions of these depleted stocks with the
healthier ones, commercial and recreational fisheries have been
severely constrained in recent years in order to rebuild the
populations of these overfished rockfish. For many of these stocks
there have been no recent stock assessments, or the current assessments
are based on poor data. Improved survey information is essential for
assessing abundance and to monitor progress toward rebuilding efforts
on the coast and in Puget Sound.
(e) Department of fish and wildlife staff have been developing
underwater robot technology or remote operated vehicles to
scientifically estimate the abundance of rockfish populations in both
the nearshore and in deep waters. These new assessment techniques,
coupled with existing bottom trawl surveys, will be used to estimate
current abundance and future recovery of rockfish populations along the
coast of Washington and in Puget Sound.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to implement a targeted,
short-term surcharge on commercial licenses issued by the department of
fish and wildlife in 2008 through 2010 that provide for the retention
or landing of groundfish, and a targeted, short-term surcharge on 2008
through 2010 recreational saltwater fishing licenses. Funds derived
from the surcharge will be used by the department of fish and wildlife
solely for the purpose of conducting rockfish research and stock
assessments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department is directed to develop and implement a rockfish
research and stock assessment program. Using funds from the rockfish
research account created in subsection (2) of this section, the
department must conduct Puget Sound basin and coastal surveys with new
and existing technology to estimate the current abundance and future
recovery of rockfish populations and other groundfish species.
(2) The rockfish research account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from surcharges assessed on commercial
and recreational fishing licenses for the purposes of rockfish research
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for rockfish research, including stock assessments. Only
the director of the department or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.65.150 and 2006 c 186 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall issue the charter licenses and angler
permits listed in this section according to the requirements of this
title. The licenses and permits and their annual fees and surcharges
are:

License or Permit
Annual Fee
(RCW 77.95.090 Surcharge)
(Section 2 of this act Surcharge)
Governing
Section

Resident
Nonresident

(a) Nonsalmon charter $225
(plus $35 for section 2
of this act Surcharge) $375
(plus $35 for section 2 of
this act Surcharge)

(b) Salmon charter $380
(plus $100)
(plus $35 for section 2
of this act Surcharge) $685
(plus $100)
(plus $35 for section 2 of
this act Surcharge) RCW 77.70.050

(c) Salmon angler $ 0 $ 0 RCW 77.70.060

(d) Salmon roe $ 95 $ 95 RCW 77.65.350

(2) A salmon charter license designating a vessel is required to
operate a charter boat from which persons may, for a fee, fish for
salmon, other food fish, and shellfish. The director may issue a
salmon charter license only to a person who meets the qualifications of
RCW 77.70.050.
(3) A nonsalmon charter license designating a vessel is required to
operate a charter boat from which persons may, for a fee, fish for food
fish other than salmon and shellfish.
(4)(a) "Charter boat" means a vessel from which persons may, for a
fee, fish for food fish or shellfish for personal use in those state
waters set forth in (b) of this subsection. "Charter boat" also means
a vessel from which persons may, for a fee, fish for food fish or
shellfish for personal use in offshore waters or in the waters of other
states. The director may specify by rule when a vessel is a "charter
boat" within this definition.
(b) A person may not operate a vessel from which persons may, for
a fee, fish for food fish or shellfish in Puget Sound, Grays Harbor,
Willapa Bay, Pacific Ocean waters, Lake Washington, or the Columbia
river below the bridge at Longview unless the vessel is designated on
a charter boat license.
(5) A charter boat licensed in Oregon may fish without a Washington
charter license under the same rules as Washington charter boat
operators in ocean waters within the jurisdiction of Washington state
from the southern border of the state of Washington to Leadbetter
Point, as long as the Oregon vessel does not take on or discharge
passengers for any purpose from any Washington port, the Washington
shore, or a dock, landing, or other point in Washington. The
provisions of this subsection shall be in effect as long as the state
of Oregon has reciprocal laws and regulations.
(6) A salmon charter license under subsection (1)(b) of this
section may be renewed if the license holder notifies the department by
May 1st of that year that he or she will not participate in the fishery
during that calendar year. The license holder must pay the one
hundred-dollar enhancement surcharge and the thirty-five-dollar
rockfish research surcharge under section 2 of this act, plus a
fifteen-dollar handling charge, in order to be considered a valid
renewal and eligible to renew the license the following year.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.65.210 and 2005 c 20 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person
may not use a commercial fishing vessel to deliver food fish or
shellfish taken for commercial purposes in offshore waters to a port in
the state without a nonlimited entry delivery license. As used in this
section, "deliver" and "delivery" mean arrival at a place or port, and
include arrivals from offshore waters to waters within the state and
arrivals ashore from offshore waters. As used in this section, "food
fish" does not include salmon. As used in this section, "shellfish"
does not include ocean pink shrimp, coastal crab, or fish or shellfish
taken under an emerging commercial fisheries license if taken from off-shore waters. The annual license fee for a nonlimited entry delivery
license is one hundred ten dollars for residents and two hundred
dollars for nonresidents, and an additional thirty-five dollars for
both residents and nonresidents for the rockfish research surcharge
under section 2 of this act.
(2) Holders of salmon troll fishery licenses issued under RCW
77.65.160, salmon delivery licenses issued under RCW 77.65.170, crab
pot fishery licenses issued under RCW 77.65.220, food fish trawl -- Non-Puget Sound fishery licenses, and emerging commercial fishery licenses
issued under RCW 77.65.200, Dungeness crab -- coastal fishery licenses,
ocean pink shrimp delivery licenses, shrimp trawl -- Non-Puget Sound
fishery licenses, and emerging commercial fishery licenses issued under
RCW 77.65.220 may deliver food fish or shellfish taken in offshore
waters without a nonlimited entry delivery license.
(3) A nonlimited entry delivery license authorizes no taking of
food fish or shellfish from state waters.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.32.470 and 2005 c 192 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A personal use saltwater, freshwater, combination, temporary,
or family fishing weekend license is required for all persons fifteen
years of age or older to fish for or possess fish taken for personal
use from state waters or offshore waters.
(2) The fees for annual personal use saltwater, freshwater, or
combination licenses are as follows:
(a) A combination license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish, shellfish, and seaweed from state waters or offshore waters. The
fee for this license is thirty-six dollars for residents, seventy-two
dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth. There is an
additional fifty-cent surcharge for this license, to be deposited in
the rockfish research account created section 2 of this act.
(b) A saltwater license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish taken from saltwater areas. The fee for this license is eighteen
dollars for residents, thirty-six dollars for nonresidents, and five
dollars for resident seniors. There is an additional fifty-cent
surcharge for this license, to be deposited in the rockfish research
account created section 2 of this act.
(c) A freshwater license allows the holder to fish for, take, or
possess food fish or game fish species in all freshwater areas. The
fee for this license is twenty dollars for residents, forty dollars for
nonresidents, and five dollars for resident seniors.
(3)(a) A temporary combination fishing license is valid for one to
five consecutive days and allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish, shellfish, and seaweed taken from state waters or offshore
waters. The fee for this temporary fishing license is:
(i) One day - Seven dollars for residents and fourteen dollars for
nonresidents;
(ii) Two days - Ten dollars for residents and twenty dollars for
nonresidents;
(iii) Three days - Thirteen dollars for residents and twenty-six
dollars for nonresidents;
(iv) Four days - Fifteen dollars for residents and thirty dollars
for nonresidents; and
(v) Five days - Seventeen dollars for residents and thirty-four
dollars for nonresidents.
(b) The fee for a charter stamp is seven dollars for a one-day
temporary combination fishing license for residents and nonresidents
for use on a charter boat as defined in RCW 77.65.150.
(c) A transaction fee to support the automated licensing system
will be taken from the amounts set forth in this subsection for
temporary licenses.
(d) Except for active duty military personnel serving in any branch
of the United States armed forces, the temporary combination fishing
license is not valid on game fish species for an eight-consecutive-day
period beginning on the opening day of the lowland lake fishing season.
(e) There is an additional fifty-cent surcharge on the temporary
combination fishing license, to be deposited in the rockfish research
account created in section 2 of this act.
(4) A family fishing weekend license allows for a maximum of six
anglers: One resident and five youth; two residents and four youth; or
one resident, one nonresident, and four youth. This license allows the
holders to fish for or possess fish taken from state waters or offshore
waters. The fee for this license is twenty dollars. This license is
only valid during periods as specified by rule of the department.
(5) The commission may adopt rules to create and sell combination
licenses for all hunting and fishing activities at or below a fee equal
to the total cost of the individual license contained within any
combination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act expires December 31, 2010.

--- END ---