BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.15.085 and 2000 c 107 s 232 are each amended to
read as follows:
Fish and wildlife officers and ex officio fish and wildlife
officers may seize without a warrant wildlife, fish, and shellfish they
have probable cause to believe have been taken, transported, or
possessed in violation of this title ((or)), a rule of the commission
or director, or while committing the crime of criminal trespass in the
second degree under RCW 9A.52.080.

--- END ---