BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends that inspections of
facilities and vessels and sampling of fish, wildlife, and shellfish by
department of fish and wildlife employees will ensure the conservation
and management of fish, shellfish, and wildlife. Because the harvest
of fish and wildlife is regulated by the department of fish and
wildlife, the legislature finds that inspections and sampling by
departmental employees will benefit the resource. The legislature
further finds that inspection and sampling will further the department
of fish and wildlife's research related to fish, wildlife, and
shellfish.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Department employees, in carrying out their duties under this
title, may:
(1) Inspect all fish, wildlife, and shellfish taken or possessed in
the field or state waters;
(2) Inspect at a reasonable time and in a reasonable manner fish,
wildlife, and shellfish stored at a processing plant or locker plant or
other facility open for commercial purposes;
(3) Collect samples of tissue, fluids, or other bodily parts of
fish, wildlife, or shellfish;
(4) Board vessels in state waters engaged in commercial harvest
activities to inspect fish or shellfish, harvesting gear or devices, or
harvest record data; or
(5) Board and remain for a reasonable time as observers on board
vessels that are engaged in commercial harvest operations of fish or
shellfish.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.15.360 and 2000 c 107 s 243 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful interfering in department
operations if the person prevents department employees from carrying
out duties authorized by this title, including but not limited to
interfering:
(a) In the operation of department vehicles, vessels, or aircraft;
(b) With the inspection of fish, wildlife, and shellfish taken or
possessed in the field or stored at a facility open for commercial
purposes;
(c) With the collection of samples of tissue, fluids, or other
bodily parts of fish, wildlife, and shellfish;
(d) In the boarding of vessels engaged in recreational or
commercial harvest of fish or shellfish.
(2) Unlawful interfering in department operations is a gross
misdemeanor.

--- END ---