BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
2007-09 BIENNIUM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The transportation budget of the state
is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several
amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish
the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several
accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices
for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and
for other specified purposes, including the payment of any final
judgments arising out of such activities, for the period ending June
30, 2009.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2008" or "FY 2008" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2008.
(b) "Fiscal year 2009" or "FY 2009" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2009.
(c) "FTE" means full-time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in
this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified
purpose which is not expended subject to the specified conditions and
limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.
(f) "Reappropriation" means appropriation and, unless the context
clearly provides otherwise, is subject to the relevant conditions and
limitations applicable to appropriations.
(g) "LEAP" means the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES -- OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION
Grade Crossing Protective Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $505,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Per current law, funds will be transferred
from the public service revolving fund's miscellaneous fees and
penalties accounts to the grade crossing protection account -- state as
needed to implement the commission's railroad safety program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,269,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $760,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the office of regulatory assistance integrated
permitting project. If Z-0316/07 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $75,000 of the motor vehicle account state appropriation is to
address transportation budget and reporting requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $426,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $985,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation in this section
is provided solely for road maintenance purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,358,000
Energy Freedom Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,858,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $351,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for costs associated with the motor fuel quality
program.
(2) $1,007,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
and $500,000 of the energy freedom account--state appropriation are
provided solely to test the quality of biodiesel fuel. The department
must test fuel quality at the biodiesel manufacturer, distributor, and
retailer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $223,000

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES -- OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY
COMMISSION
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,882,000
School Zone Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,782,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $905,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,069,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $918,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,892,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,790,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,792,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,582,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS
Pilotage Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,155,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $939,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,504,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,616,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The Washington state transportation
commission shall review the ferry tariff structure, including long-term
system revenue requirements necessary to balance the ferry operations
account and evaluate how travel demand management strategies can
improve system capacity utilization. The commission shall conduct
surveys of ferry customers in performing their review. The commission
shall report its findings to the office of financial management and the
legislative transportation committees by September 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC
INVESTMENT BOARD
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,003,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,131,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The freight mobility strategic investment board shall, on a
quarterly basis, provide status reports to the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature on the
delivery of projects funded by this act.
(2) The freight mobility strategic investment board and the
department of transportation shall develop a list of freight highway
and rail projects funded by the board and the department. The board
and the department shall collaborate to submit a report to the office
of financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature by September 1, 2007, describing how the freight projects
address state freight priorities. The criteria used for selecting
among competing projects shall be clearly identified.
(3) $320,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation and
$128,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are
provided solely for development of a freight database to help guide
freight investment decisions and track project effectiveness. The
database will be based on truck movement tracked through geographic
information system technology. TransNow will contribute an additional
$192,000 in federal funds which are not appropriated in the
transportation budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD
OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $227,973,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,602,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $410,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $238,985,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed
employment providing traffic control services to the department of
transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles
for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by
the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol
shall be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state
employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines
developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.
(2) In addition to the user fees, the patrol shall transfer into
the state patrol nonappropriated airplane revolving account under RCW
43.79.470 no more than the amount of appropriated state patrol highway
account and general fund funding necessary to cover the costs for the
patrol's use of the aircraft. The state patrol highway account and
general fund -- state funds shall be transferred proportionately in
accordance with a cost allocation that differentiates between highway
traffic enforcement services and general policing purposes.
(3) The patrol shall not account for or record locally provided DUI
cost reimbursement payments as expenditure credits to the state patrol
highway account. The patrol shall report the amount of expected
locally provided DUI cost reimbursements to the governor and
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives by
September 30th of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL--INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,597,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL--TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,332,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,008,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,340,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- CRIMINAL
HISTORY AND BACKGROUND CHECKS. In accordance with RCW 10.97.100 and
chapter 43.43 RCW, the Washington state patrol is authorized to perform
criminal history and background checks for state and local agencies and
nonprofit and other private entities and disseminate the records
resulting from these activities. The Washington state patrol is
required to charge a fee for these activities, for which it is the
policy of the state of Washington that the fees cover the direct and
indirect costs of performing the criminal history and background checks
and disseminating the information. For each type of criminal history
and background check and dissemination of these records, the Washington
state patrol shall, as nearly as practicable, set fees at levels
sufficient to cover the direct and indirect costs. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the Washington state
patrol may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the
increases are necessary to fully fund the cost of supervision and
regulation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING--MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,268,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,317,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Department of Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,046,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $434,000 of the highway safety
account--state appropriation is provided solely for costs associated
with the systems development and issuance of enhanced drivers' licenses
and identicards to facilitate crossing the Canadian border. If agency
request legislation Z-0234/07 (relating to the issuance of enhanced
drivers' licenses and identicards) is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
this amount shall lapse. The department may expend funds only after
acceptance of the enhanced Washington state driver's license for border
crossing purposes by the Canadian and United States governments. The
department may expend funds only after prior written approval of the
director of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING--INFORMATION SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,244,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,056,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Department of Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,643,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,562,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $6,014,000 of the highway safety
account--state appropriation is provided solely for costs associated
with the systems development and issuance of enhanced drivers' licenses
and identicards to facilitate crossing the Canadian border. If agency
request legislation Z-0234/07 (relating to the issuance of enhanced
drivers' licenses and identicards) is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
this amount shall lapse. The department may expend funds only after
acceptance of the enhanced Washington state driver's license for border
crossing purposes by the Canadian and United States governments. The
department may expend funds only after prior written approval of the
director of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- VEHICLE
SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $694,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,462,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $872,000
Department of Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,670,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,286,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- DRIVER
SERVICES
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,675,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,795,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $233,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,703,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $2,544,000 of the highway safety
account--state appropriation is provided solely for costs associated
with the systems development and issuance of enhanced drivers' licenses
and identicards to facilitate crossing the Canadian border. If agency
request legislation Z-0234/07 (relating to the issuance of enhanced
drivers' licenses and identicards) is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
this amount shall lapse. The department may expend funds only after
acceptance of the enhanced Washington state driver's license for border
crossing purposes by the Canadian and United States governments. The
department may expend funds only after prior written approval of the
director of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM B
High-Occupancy Toll Lanes Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,596,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,345,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,198,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,139,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM C
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,510,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,096,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,184,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,153,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall consult with the
office of financial management and the department of information
services to ensure that (1) the department's current and future system
development is consistent with the overall direction of other key state
systems; and (2) when possible, use or develop common statewide
information systems to encourage coordination and integration of
information used by the department and other state agencies and to
avoid duplication.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,536,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--AVIATION -- PROGRAM F
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,673,000
Aeronautics Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $631,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,454,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire multimodal transportation
account -- state appropriation is provided solely for the aviation
planning council as provided for in RCW 47.68.410.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,250,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,374,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,250,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,624,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS -- PROGRAM K
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,151,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $2,200,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is for the professional services and administration
necessary to evaluate proposals solicited under the state's
transportation innovative partnership program as provided in chapter
47.29 RCW. If a solicited proposal is received for a project that is
currently funded, the cost of evaluating the proposal may be charged to
the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $321,618,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,797,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $329,415,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) If portions of the appropriations in this section are required
to fund maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by
federal emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides,
supplemental appropriations must be requested to restore state funding
for ongoing maintenance activities.
(2) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
federal moneys received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall
place an equal amount of the motor vehicle account -- state into
unallotted status. This exchange shall not affect the amount of
funding available for snow and ice removal.
(3) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
private or local funds received for reimbursements of third party
damages that are in excess of the motor vehicle account -- private/local
appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,980,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $127,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,157,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $654,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to time state-owned and operated
traffic signals. This funding may also be used to program incident,
emergency, or special event signal timing plans.
(2) $346,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to implement a pilot tow truck
incentive program. The department may provide incentive payments to
towing companies that meet clearance goals on accidents that involve
heavy trucks.
(3) $6,800,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give
priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or
provide congestion relief. The department shall prioritize low-cost
enhancement projects on a statewide rather than regional basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,371,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,321,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,695,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall conduct a study to
determine the resources needed to transition from using the
transportation executive information system for budget preparation to
possibly using the capital budget system being developed by the office
of financial management. The report must include the amount of
additional effort necessary for the department to prepare, submit, and
report on capital budget requests submitted using the office of
financial management's capital budget system. The department shall
give consideration to future approaches to developing and presenting
the department's budget such as those recommended in the joint
transportation committee's budget methodology study. The department
must submit its report to the office of financial management and the
legislative transportation committees by September 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,425,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,035,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,177,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,809,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,446,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $3,900,000 of the transportation
partnership account -- state appropriation is provided solely for the
costs of the regional transportation investment district (RTID) and
department of transportation project oversight. The department shall
provide support from its urban corridors region to assist in preparing
project costs, expenditure plans, and modeling. The department shall
not deduct a management reserve, nor charge management or overhead
fees. These funds, including those expended since 2003, are provided
as a loan to the RTID and shall be repaid to the state motor vehicle
account within one year following the certification of the election
results related to the RTID.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,070,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $259,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,729,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $33,229,000 of the motor vehicle fund -- state appropriation is
provided solely for the liabilities attributable to the department of
transportation. The office of financial management must provide a
detailed accounting of the revenues and expenditures of the self-insurance fund to the transportation committees of the legislature on
December 31st and June 30th of each year.
(2) Payments in this section represent charges from other state
agencies to the department of transportation.
(a) FOR PAYMENT OF OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
DIVISION OF RISK MANAGEMENT FEES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,520,000
(b) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,150,000
(c) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED
MAIL SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,157,000
(d) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,033,000
(e) FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY
PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,229,000
(f) FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS SURCHARGE . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,838,000
(g) FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . $647,000
(h) FOR OFFICE OF MINORITIES AND WOMEN BUSINESS
ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,070,000
(i) FOR USE OF FINANCIAL SYSTEMS PROVIDED BY
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . $930,000
(j) FOR POLICY ASSISTANCE FROM THE DEPARTMENT
OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,138,000
(k) FOR LEGAL SERVICE PROVIDED BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL'S OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,859,000
(l) FOR LEGAL SERVICE PROVIDED BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL'S OFFICE FOR THE SECOND PHASE OF THE BOLDT
LITIGATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 227 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V
Regional Mobility Grant Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,766,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,582,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $291,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,639,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs
transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of
transportation.
(a) $5,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs
transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers shall be based on need,
including the availability of other providers of service in the area,
efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost
effectiveness of trips provided.
(b) $19,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons
with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit
agency must have a maintenance of effort for special needs
transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of
effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies
shall be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response
service and route deviated service in calendar year 2005 as reported in
the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2005" published by the
department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than
thirty percent of these distributions.
(2) Funds are provided for the rural mobility grant program as
follows:
(a) $8,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for those transit systems
serving small cities and rural areas as identified in the Summary of
Public Transportation - 2005 published by the department of
transportation. Noncompetitive grants must be distributed to the
transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) $8,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely to providers of rural mobility service
in areas not served or underserved by transit agencies through a
competitive grant process.
(3) $6,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (a)
Public transit agencies to add vanpools; and (b) incentives for
employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for
public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; no operating
costs for public transit agencies are eligible for funding under this
grant program. No additional employees may be hired from the funds
provided in this section for the vanpool grant program, and supplanting
of transit funds currently funding vanpools is not allowed. Additional
criteria for selecting grants must include leveraging funds other than
state funds.
(4) $40,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the regional mobility grant
program. The department shall provide annual status reports on
December 15, 2007, and December 15, 2008, to the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature
regarding the projects receiving grants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 228 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,428,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,830,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $402,258,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $86,438,000 of the total appropriation is provided for auto
ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2007-2009 biennium.
(2) The department shall:
(a) Revise the lifecycle cost model for terminal preservation;
(b) Use the definition of capital improvement and preservation in
the office of financial management capital budget instructions;
(c) Perform a predesign study on all terminal projects that exceed
$5,000,000; and
(d) Hire a consultant or consultants with the expertise to study:
(i) The level of service standards for vehicles, including whether
boat wait is the appropriate level-of-service measurement; and
(ii) The two ridership models used by the ferry division to develop
a single model that can be used for short and long-term planning.
The costs associated with these studies may be charged to the terminal
projects as appropriated in section 308 of this act. The department
shall submit a report of its findings to the office of financial
management and the legislative transportation committees by September
1, 2007.
(3) The Washington state ferries shall work with the department's
information technology division to implement an electronic fare system,
including the integration of the regional fare coordination system
(smart card). Each December and June, the Washington state ferries
shall submit updates to the transportation committees of the
legislature concerning the status of implementing and completing this
project, with updates concluding the first December after full project
implementation.
(4) $1,830,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely to provide passenger-only ferry
service through June 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 229 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,780,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The freight mobility strategic investment board and the
department of transportation shall develop a list of freight highway
and rail projects funded by the board and the department. The board
and the department shall collaborate to submit a report to the office
of financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature by September 1, 2007, describing how the freight projects
address state freight priorities. The criteria used for selecting
among competing projects shall be clearly identified.
(2) The department shall publish a final long-range plan for Amtrak
Cascades by September 30, 2007. By December 31, 2008, the department
shall submit to the office of financial management and the
transportation committees of the legislature a midrange plan for Amtrak
Cascades that identifies specific steps the department would propose to
achieve additional service beyond current levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 230 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,399,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,567,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,966,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,785,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely to the department in accordance
with RCW 46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the
department solely for contract services with the association of
Washington cities and the Washington state association of counties for
improving transportation permitting and mitigation processes.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES -- CAPITAL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,300,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,200,000 is provided solely for minor works projects.
(2) $850,000 is provided for design and construction of regional
wastewater treatment systems for the Washington state patrol Shelton
academy.
(3) $250,000 is provided solely for master planning for the
Washington state patrol academy facility.
(4) $3,000,000 is provided solely for replacement of the aviation
section hanger and offices located at the Olympia airport.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,000,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,368,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,342,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,710,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,069,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for county ferries, as set forth in RCW 47.56.725(4),
for the following projects: Pierce county replacement ferry, $754,000;
Whatcom county replacement ferry, $815,000; and Wahkiakum county ferry
ramp reconstruction, $500,000.
(2) $481,000 of the county arterial preservation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for continued development and
implementation of a maintenance management system to manage county
transportation assets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Small City Pavement and Sidewalk Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,200,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,643,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $209,343,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The transportation improvement account--state appropriation includes up to $7,143,000 in proceeds from the sale
of bonds authorized in RCW 47.26.500.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,956,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $584,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for statewide administration.
(2) $732,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for regional minor projects.
(3) $785,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for the replacement of the existing Ephrata area maintenance facility.
(4) $758,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for the replacement of the northwest region maintenance facility in
Seattle.
(5) $263,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
to acquire a site to replace the Vancouver light industrial facilities
in the department's southwest region.
(6) $176,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
to acquire a site for the tri-cities area maintenance facility that
will replace the Pasco area maintenance facility.
(7) $9,658,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for the Olympic region headquarters project.
(8) The department of transportation is authorized to use
certificates of participation for the following projects in not more
than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.

Ephrata area maintenance facility . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,375,000
Northwest region maintenance facility . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,700,000
Vancouver light industrial site acquisition . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000
Tri-cities area maintenance facility site acquisition . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
Olympic region headquarters facility . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,500,000

(9) The state department of transportation may utilize the design-build process in accordance with chapter 39.10 RCW for the Olympic
region project. If the design-build process is used, it may be
developed in partnership with the department of general administration.
(10) The office of financial management may authorize the transfer
of appropriation authority for the statewide administration to the
appropriation authority for regional minor projects that is in excess
of the amount required for statewide administration.
(11) The office of financial management may authorize the transfer
of appropriation authority between subsections (1) through (7) of this
section if required to ensure the payment of principal and interest on
all certificates of participation that are authorized in subsection (8)
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,194,703,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,746,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $359,527,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,526,000
Special Category C Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,419,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $142,484,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,049,391,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,871,296,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The motor vehicle account -- state appropriation includes up to
$11,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843.
(2) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the
projects and activities as contained in the transportation executive
information system (TEIS) GOV2007 project list, dated December 19,
2006. Limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations
between projects may occur for those amounts listed subject to the
conditions and limitations in section 603 of this act.
(3) The department shall not commence construction on any part of
the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project until a
record of decision has been reached providing reasonable assurance that
project impacts will be avoided, minimized, or mitigated as much as
practicable to protect against further adverse impacts on neighborhood
environmental quality as a result of repairs and improvements made to
the state route 520 bridge and its connecting roadways, and that any
such impacts will be addressed through engineering design choices,
mitigation measures, or a combination of both. The requirements of
this section shall not apply to off-site pontoon construction
supporting the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV
project.
(4) The transportation partnership account -- state appropriation
includes up to $916,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized in RCW 47.10.873.
(5) The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account -- state appropriation
includes up to $131,016,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.843.
(6) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account) -- state
appropriation includes up to $976,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.861.
(7) The special category C account -- state appropriation includes
$30,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in Z-0334/07.
If Z-0334/07 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, this amount shall lapse.
(8) The department should consider using mitigation banking on
appropriate projects whenever possible, without increasing the cost to
projects. The department should consider using the advanced
environmental mitigation revolving account (AEMRA) for corridor and
watershed based mitigation opportunities, in addition to project
specific mitigation.
(9) The department shall apply for surface transportation program
(STP) enhancement funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in Programs I and P,
including, but not limited to, the SR 518, SR 519, SR 520, and Alaskan
Way Viaduct projects.
(10) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for an inland pacific hub study to develop an inland
corridor for the movement of freight and goods to and through eastern
Washington; and $500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the SR3/SR16 corridor study to
plan and prioritize state and local improvements needed over the next
10-20 years to support safety, capacity development, and economic
development within the corridor.
(11)(a) Prior to commencing construction on either project, the
department of transportation shall complete all of the following
requirements for both the Alaskan Way viaduct and Seattle Seawall
replacement project, and the state route number 520 bridge replacement
and HOV project: (i) In accordance with the national environmental
policy act, the department shall designate the preferred alternative,
prepare a substantial project mitigation plan, and complete a
comprehensive cost estimate review using the department's cost estimate
validation process, for each project; (ii) in accordance with all
applicable federal highway administration planning and project
management requirements, the department shall prepare a project finance
plan for each project that clearly identifies secured and anticipated
fund sources, cash flow timing requirements, and project staging and
phasing plans if applicable; and (iii) the department shall report
these results for each project to the joint transportation committee.
(b) The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to (i)
utility relocation work, and related activities, on the Alaskan Way
viaduct and Seattle Seawall replacement project and (ii) off-site
pontoon construction supporting the state route number 520 bridge
replacement and HOV project.
(12) $10,500,000 of the motor vehicle fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to use as directed by the office of
the governor for emergent transportation safety and economic
development needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $195,573,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,357,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,230,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,975,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,791,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $641,926,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the
projects and activities as contained in the transportation executive
information system (TEIS) GOV2007 project list, dated December 19,
2006. Limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations
between projects may occur for those amounts listed subject to the
conditions and limitations in section 603 of this act.
(2) The motor vehicle account -- state appropriation includes up to
$3,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843.
(3) The funding described in this section includes $8,305,759 of
the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation
and $237,241 of the motor vehicle account--private/local appropriation,
which is provided solely for the SR 519 project. The total project is
expected to cost no more than $74,400,000 including contributions from
project partners.
(4) The department shall apply for surface transportation program
(STP) enhancement funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in Programs I and P,
including, but not limited to, the SR 518, SR 519, SR 520, and Alaskan
Way Viaduct projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,340,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,610,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $146,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,096,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for the projects and activities as contained in the
transportation executive information system (TEIS) GOV2007 project
list, dated December 19, 2006. Limited transfers of specific line-item
project appropriations between projects may occur for those amounts
listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 603 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,212,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,529,000
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,940,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,724,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $122,903,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $422,308,000

The appropriations in this section are provided for improving the
Washington state ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel
construction, major and minor vessel preservation, and terminal
preservation, construction, and improvements. The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the
projects and activities as contained in the transportation executive
information system (TEIS) GOV2007 project list, dated December 19,
2006. Limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations
between projects may occur for those amounts listed subject to the
conditions and limitations in section 603 of this act.
(2) The Puget Sound capital construction account -- state
appropriation includes up to $131,416,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and terminal acquisition,
major and minor improvements, and long lead time materials acquisition
for the Washington state ferries.
(3) The multimodal transportation account -- state appropriation
includes up to $60,724,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.867.
(4) The department shall sell the M.V. Chinook and M.V. Snohomish
passenger-only fast ferries as soon as practicable and deposit the
proceeds of the sales into the passenger ferry account created in RCW
47.60.645. Once the department ceases to provide passenger-only ferry
service, the department shall sell the M.V. Kalama and M.V. Skagit
passenger-only ferries and deposit the proceeds of the sales into the
passenger ferry account created in RCW 47.60.645.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL
Essential Rail Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Transportation Infrastructure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $156,415,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,030,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,052,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,497,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for
the projects and activities as contained in the transportation
executive information system (TEIS) GOV2007 project list, dated
December 19, 2006. Limited transfers of specific line-item project
appropriations between projects may occur for those amounts listed
subject to the conditions and limitations in section 603 of this act.
(b) The funding described in (a) of this subsection includes
$2,500,000 of the transportation infrastructure account-state
appropriation, which is provided solely for low-interest loans or
grants for rail capital projects through the freight rail investment
bank program. The department shall submit criteria for the use of such
funds to the office of financial management and the transportation
committees of the legislature prior to issuing a call for projects.
(2) If the department issues a call for projects, applications must
be received by the department by November 1, 2007, and November 1,
2008.
(3) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes up to $136,895,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.867.
(4) The department is directed to seek the use of unprogrammed
federal rail crossing funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in Program Y, including, but
not limited to the "Tacoma - bypass of Pt. Defiance" project.
(5) If new federal funding for freight or passenger rail is
received, the department shall consult with the transportation
committees of the legislature and the office of financial management
prior to spending the funds on existing or additional projects.
(6)(a) The Palouse River and Coulee City (PCC) rail line system is
made up of the CW, P&L and PV Hooper rail lines. The state has
purchased the P&L and PV Hooper right-of-ways and is in the process of
purchasing the CW rail line from the current owner, Watco, as well as
properties adjacent to the CW and P&L rail lines that are necessary for
rail operations. In addition, the state is purchasing operating rights
that were not originally purchased. To complete the purchase, the
office of financial management shall negotiate a memorandum of
understanding with Watco stating the terms of the state's purchase of
the CW rail line right-of-way and all associated properties needed for
the operation of three lines. The memorandum of understanding must be
signed by January 31, 2007.
(b) The memorandum of understanding shall also include a provision
requiring the state to select a rail operator(s) for the CW and P&L
rail lines for the harvest season beginning June 1, 2007. The
operator(s) will be selected through a competitive bid process. Watco
will continue to operate the PV Hooper line for the harvest season
beginning June 1, 2007, as required by contract. The operating
agreement(s) for the harvest season beginning in 2007 will designate
the state subsidy rate. Upon the expiration of the operating
agreements, the state will transfer the operating rights to an
intergovernmental entity or local rail district which will own the long
term operating rights to the CW, P&L and PV Hooper rail lines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL
Transportation Infrastructure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
Freight Mobility Investment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,650,000
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,592,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,886,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,845,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,810,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,756,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,950,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,294,000
Passenger Ferry Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,092,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for
the projects and activities as contained in the transportation
executive information system (TEIS) GOV2007 project list, dated
December 19, 2006. Limited transfers of specific line-item project
appropriations between projects may occur for those amounts listed
subject to the conditions and limitations in section 603 of this act.
(b) The funding described in (a) of this subsection includes
$11,500,000 of the passenger ferry account-state appropriation, which
is provided solely for the establishment of a ferry grant program to
provide operating or capital grants for ferry systems as provided in
chapters 36.54 and 36.57A RCW to operate a passenger-only ferry system.
Priority shall be given to grant applications that provide continuity
of existing passenger-only ferry service and the provision of local or
federal matching funds.
(2) The department shall seek the use of unprogrammed federal rail
crossing funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to state funds
for eligible costs of projects in program Y, including, but not limited
to the "Tacoma - bypass of Pt. Defiance" project.
(3) The department shall apply for surface transportation program
(STP) enhancement funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in programs I and P,
including, but not limited to, the SR 518, SR 519, SR 520, and Alaskan
Way Viaduct projects.
(4) Federal funds may be transferred from program Z to programs I
and P and state funds shall be transferred from programs I and P to
program Z to replace those federal funds in a dollar-for-dollar match.
Fund transfers authorized under this subsection shall not affect
project prioritization status. Appropriations shall initially be
allotted as appropriated in this act. The department may not transfer
funds as authorized under this subsection without approval of the
office of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2007, and December 1, 2008.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND
TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $575,340,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,059,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,749,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,747,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,173,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,298,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,486,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,645,000
Special Category C Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $676,795,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES
Transportation Partnership Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $430,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $248,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,465,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Account -- State Reappropriation:
For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,016,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$131,016,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be
deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.

(2) Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound capital construction
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,315,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$116,315,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and
terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long lead-time
materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $526,320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and statutory transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . $937,181,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING--
TRANSFERS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . $346,657,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- ADMINISTRATIVE
TRANSFERS
(1) Recreational Vehicle Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,954,000
(2) Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the State Patrol Highway Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,686,000
(3) License Plate Technology Account--State
Appropriation: For the Highway Safety Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
(4) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the High-Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations--
State Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
(5) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,921,000
(6) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the State Patrol Highway Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,600,000
(7) Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound
Capital Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,784,000
(8) Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Transportation
Partnership Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000,000
(9) Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows
Toll Bridge Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,700,000
(10) Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound
Ferry Operations Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,700,000
(11) Advanced Right-of-Way Revolving Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
(12) Waste Tire Removal Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,600,000
(13) Licensing Service Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the State Patrol Highway Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS. In addition to
the amounts appropriated in this act for revenue for distribution,
state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system, and bond retirement and interest including ongoing
bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on
registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also
appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for
these purposes under any statutory formula or under any proper bond
covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409 The department of transportation is
authorized to undertake federal advance construction projects under the
provisions of 23 U.S.C. Sec. 115 in order to maintain progress in
meeting approved highway construction and preservation objectives. The
legislature recognizes that the use of state funds may be required to
temporarily fund expenditures of the federal appropriations for the
highway construction and preservation programs for federal advance
construction projects prior to conversion to federal funding.

COMPENSATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 COMPENSATION--NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS. The appropriations for state agencies, are subject
to the following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $707 per eligible employee for
fiscal year 2008. For fiscal year 2009 the monthly employer funding
rate shall not exceed $732 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2008, through December 31, 2008, the
subsidy shall be $165.31. Starting January 1, 2009, the subsidy shall
be $184.26 per month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES
OUTSIDE SUPER COALITION--INSURANCE BENEFITS. The appropriations for
state agencies, are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, for represented employees outside the super
coalition under chapter 41.80 RCW, shall not exceed $707 per eligible
employee for fiscal year 2008. For fiscal year 2009 the monthly
employer funding rate shall not exceed $732 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2008, through December 31, 2008, the
subsidy shall be $165.31. Starting January 1, 2009, the subsidy shall
be $184.26 per month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--SUPER COALITION. Collective bargaining agreements negotiated as part
of the super coalition under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW
include employer contributions to health insurance premiums at 88% of
the cost. Funding rates at this level are currently $707 per month for
fiscal year 2008 and $732 per month for fiscal year 2009. The
agreements also include a one-time payment of $756 for each employee
who is eligible for insurance for the month of June, 2007, as well as
continuation of the salary increases that were negotiated for the
twelve-month period beginning July 1, 2006, and scheduled to terminate
June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 COMPENSATION--PENSION CONTRIBUTIONS. The
appropriations for state agencies, including institutions of higher
education are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
Appropriations are provided to fund employer contributions to state
pension funds at the rates adopted by the pension funding council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 COMPENSATION--REVISE PENSION GAIN
SHARING. The appropriations for (schools) state agencies, including
institutions of higher education are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Appropriations are adjusted to reflect
changes to pension gain sharing as provided in Z-. . . . . ..

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION.
The appropriations for nonrepresented employee compensation adjustments
are provided solely for:
(1) Across the Board Adjustments.
(a) Appropriations are provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective September 1, 2007, for all classified employees, except those
represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapter 41.80 RCW,
and except the certificated employees of the state schools for the deaf
and blind and employees of community and technical colleges covered by
the provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732. Also included are
employees in the Washington management service, and exempt employees
under the jurisdiction of the director of personnel.
The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a 3.2% salary
increase effective September 1, 2007, and for executive, legislative,
and judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose
maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected
officials.
(b) Appropriations are provided for a 2.0% salary increase
effective September 1, 2008, for all classified employees, except those
represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapter 41.80 RCW,
and except for the certificated employees of the state schools of the
deaf and blind and employees of community and technical colleges
covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732. Also included
are employees in the Washington management service, and exempt
employees under the jurisdiction of the director of personnel. The
appropriations are also sufficient to fund a 2.0% salary increase
effective September 1, 2008, for executive, legislative, and judicial
branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries
are not set by the commission on salaries for elected officials.
(2) Salary Survey.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for
implementation of the department of personnel's 2006 salary survey, for
job classes more than 25% below market rates and affected classes.
(3) Classification Consolidation.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for
implementation of the department of personnel's phase 4 job class
consolidation and revisions under the personnel system reform act of
2002.
(4) Agency Request Consolidation.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for
implementation of the department of personnel's agency request job
class consolidation and reclassification plan.
(5) Additional Pay Step.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for a
new pay step L for those who have been in step K for at least one year.
(6) Retain Fiscal Year 2007 Pay Increase.
For all classified state employees, except those represented by a
bargaining unit under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, and except
for the certificated employees of the state schools of the deaf and
blind and employees of community and technical colleges covered by the
provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732, funding is provided for
continuation of the 1.6% salary increase that was provided during
fiscal year 2007. Also included are employees in the Washington
management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the
director of personnel. The appropriations are also sufficient to
continue a 1.6% salary increase for executive, legislative, and
judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum
salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected
officials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS.
Provisions of the collective bargaining agreements contained in
sections 508 through 518 of this act are described in general terms.
Only major economic terms are included in the descriptions. These
descriptions do not contain the complete contents of the agreements.
The collective bargaining agreements contained in sections 506 through
516 may also be funded by expenditures from nonappropriated accounts.
If positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources
with insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not
provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--IBU.
Appropriations in this act contain funding for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the
inlandboatmen's union of the pacific under chapter 47.64 RCW. For
employees covered under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6%
salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase
that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30,
2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007,
a 2% salary increase effective July 1, 2008, and increases ranging from
1.5% to 4% to address specific classifications which are below market
rates as established by the marine employees commission 2006 salary
survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--MEBA-LICENSED. Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the marine engineers'
beneficial association under chapter 47.64 RCW. For employees covered
under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase that went into
effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30, 2007. Also
included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, a 2% salary
increase effective July 1, 2008, and increases ranging from 1% to 6% to
address specific classifications which are below market rates as
established by the marine employees commission 2006 salary survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--MEBA-UNLICENSED. Appropriations in this act reflect the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the marine
engineers' beneficial association under chapter 47.64 RCW. For
employees covered under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6%
salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase
that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30,
2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007,
and a 2% salary increase effective July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--MM&P.
Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the governor and the international organization of
master, mates & pilots, local 6, under chapter 47.64 RCW. For
employees covered under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6%
salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase
that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30,
2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007,
a 2% salary increase effective July 1, 2008, and increases ranging from
2.5% to 7.5% to address specific classifications which are below market
rates as established by the marine employees commission 2006 salary
survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--MM&P-WATCH SUPERVISORS. Appropriations in this act reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the
international organization of master, mates & pilots, watch
supervisors, local 6, under chapter 47.64 RCW. For employees covered
under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase that went into
effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30, 2007. Also
included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, a 2% salary
increase effective July 1, 2008, and a 3% increase to address this
specific classification which is below market rates as established by
the marine employees commission 2006 salary survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--METAL
TRADES COUNCIL. Appropriations in this act reflect the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the Puget Sound
metal trades council under chapter 47.64 RCW. For employees covered
under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase that went into
effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30, 2007. Also
included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, a 2% salary
increase effective July 1, 2008, and a $0.95/hour salary adjustment to
all classifications which are below market rates as established by the
marine employees commission 2006 salary survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--FASPAA.
Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the governor and the ferry agents, supervisors, &
project administrators association under chapter 47.64 RCW. For
employees covered under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6%
salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase
that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30,
2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007,
a 2% salary increase effective July 1, 2008, and a 10% increase to
address specific classifications which are below market rates as
established by the marine employees commission 2006 salary survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--OPEIU.
Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the governor and the office & professional employees
international union, local 8, under chapter 47.64 RCW. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase that went into
effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30, 2007. Also
included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, a 2% salary
increase effective July 1, 2008, and a one salary range (5%) increase
to address specific classifications which are below market rates as
established by the marine employees commission 2006 salary survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--SEIU.
Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the governor and the service employees international
union, local 6, under chapter 47.64 RCW. For employees covered under
this agreement, provisions include a 1.6% salary increase effective
July 1, 2007, which continues the increase that went into effect July
1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30, 2007. Also included is a
3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, a 2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2008, and a 5% increase to address specific
classifications which are below market rates as established by the
marine employees commission 2006 salary survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WSP
TROOPERS ASSOCIATION. Appropriations in this act reflect funding for
the collective bargaining agreement reached between the governor and
the Washington state patrol trooper's association under the provisions
of chapter 41.56 RCW. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 4.0% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, and
a 4.0% salary increase effective July 1, 2008. Also effective July 1,
2007, positions located in King (10%), Snohomish (5%), or Pierce (3%)
counties will receive geographic pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 518 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WSP
LIEUTENANTS ASSOCIATION. Appropriations in this act reflect funding
for the collective bargaining agreement reached between the governor
and the Washington state patrol lieutenant's association under the
provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW. For employees covered under this
agreement, provisions include a 4.0% salary increase effective July 1,
2007, and a 4.0% salary increase effective July 1, 2008. Also
effective July 1, 2007, positions located in King (10%), Snohomish
(5%), or Pierce (3%) counties will receive geographic pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 519 FOR THE GOVERNOR--COMPENSATION-INSURANCE
BENEFITS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section shall
be expended solely for state employee health insurance benefits for
legislative and judicial employees as per the specifications in this
act. The office of financial management shall allocate the moneys
appropriated in this section in the amounts specified and to the state
agencies specified in OFM document #2007 - R01, dated December 19,
2006, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 520 FOR THE GOVERNOR--COMPENSATION-NONREPRESENTED SALARY INCREASE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section shall
be expended solely for nonrepresented state employee salary increases
for legislative and judicial employees as per the specifications in
this act. The office of financial management shall allocate the moneys
appropriated in this section in the amounts specified and to the state
agencies specified in OFM document #2007 - R01, dated December 19,
2006, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 521 FOR THE GOVERNOR--COMPENSATION-CONTINUE
NONREPRESENTED FY 2007 SALARY INCREASE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section shall
be expended solely for continuation of the FY 2007 nonrepresented state
employee salary increase for legislative and judicial employees as per
the specifications in this act. The office of financial management
shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this section in the amounts
specified and to the state agencies specified in OFM document #2007 -R01, dated December 19, 2006, and adjust appropriation schedules
accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 522 FOR THE GOVERNOR--COMPENSATION-PENSION
RATE CHANGES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section shall
be expended solely for pension rate changes for legislative and
judicial employees as per the specifications in this act. The office
of financial management shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this
section in the amounts specified and to the state agencies specified in
OFM document #2007 - R01, dated December 19, 2006, and adjust
appropriation schedules accordingly.

IMPLEMENTING PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 Executive Order number 05-05,
archaeological and cultural resources, was issued effective November
10, 2005. Agencies and higher education institutions that issue grants
or loans for capital projects shall comply with the requirements set
forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies
shall comply with the following requirements regarding information
systems projects when specifically directed to do so by this act.
(1) Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology
shall be made in the context of its information technology portfolio.
"Information technology portfolio" means a strategic management
approach in which the relationships between agency missions and
information technology investments can be seen and understood, such
that: Technology efforts are linked to agency objectives and business
plans; the impact of new investments on existing infrastructure and
business functions are assessed and understood before implementation;
and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative statewide infrastructure.
(2) Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in
making decisions on matters related to the following:
(a) System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;
(b) Setting goals and objectives for using information technology
in meeting legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;
(c) Assessment of overall information processing performance,
resources, and capabilities;
(d) Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for
the operation of any new systems developed using external resources;
and
(e) Progress toward enabling electronic access to public
information.
(3) Each project will be planned and designed to take optimal
advantage of Internet technologies and protocols. Agencies shall
ensure that the project is in compliance with the architecture,
infrastructure, principles, policies, and standards of digital
government as maintained by the information services board.
(4) The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information
technology projects at the direction of the information services board
and in accordance with published department of information services
policies and guidelines. At a minimum, such studies shall include a
statement of: (a) The purpose or impetus for change; (b) the business
value to the agency, including an examination and evaluation of
benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a comprehensive risk assessment
based on the proposed project's impact on both citizens and state
operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing nothing; (d)
the impact on agency and statewide information infrastructure; and (e)
the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.
(5) The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for
each project. The plan or plans shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of each project. The plan(s) shall include, but
is not limited to, the following elements: A description of the
problem or opportunity that the information technology project is
intended to address; a statement of project objectives and assumptions;
a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to be
accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for
the phased approach shall be such that the business case justification
for a project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or
adds measurable value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business
functions within each development cycle.
(6) The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for
information technology projects. Consistent with the direction of the
information services board and the published policies and guidelines of
the department of information services, the quality assurance plan
shall address all factors critical to successful completion of the
project and successful integration with the agency and state
information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality assurance
plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The
quality assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements
for each phase of a project.
(7) A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and
quality assurance plan shall be provided to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and
legislative fiscal committees. The plans and studies shall demonstrate
a sound business case that justifies the investment of taxpayer funds
on any new project, an assessment of the impact of the proposed system
on the existing information technology infrastructure, the disciplined
use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging of
private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval
of the relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan by the department of information services and the office
of financial management.
(8) Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the
department of information services, the office of financial management,
and legislative fiscal committees at intervals specified in the
project's quality assurance plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 FUND TRANSFERS. The 2003 nickel (Nickel)
and the 2005 transportation partnership act (TPA) projects are included
in the legislatively adopted list of transportation projects (LEAP
list), which consists of a list of specific projects by fund source
over a sixteen year period. Current biennium funding for each project
is a line item appropriation, while the outer year funding allocations
represent legislative guidance. Funds from the Nickel and the TPA
accounts are not used interchangeably.
The list of projects submitted by the governor with this act
(titled GOV2007, dated December 19, 2006) groups the Nickel and TPA
projects into designated corridors. Each corridor includes one or more
projects. The purpose of these corridor designations is to ensure
accountability for project delivery, and to provide flexibility to the
department to effectively manage the construction projects. Many
projects are supported with multiple fund sources.
The department of transportation is authorized to use funds for
these projects interchangeably so long as the delivery of the projects
on designated corridors as defined in GOV2007 is not jeopardized and
the total corridor cost is not exceeded. In no event may the total
biennial cost for the projects exceed the sum of the specific biennial
appropriations within each corridor. The scope of a project as defined
in the GOV2007 project list may not be changed. Transfers may not
occur to or from projects not identified on the applicable corridor-level project list.
The department of transportation shall seek approval from the
director of financial management before making fund transfers within a
corridor when (1) a proposed change will result in a cost increase of
more than $200,000 for the biennium; and/or (2) if a projected schedule
change will result in a missed construction season. Project transfer
requests shall be submitted to the office of financial management after
the department of transportation has completed its quarterly project
review, except that the department may submit transfer requests during
interim periods as necessary. The legislature authorizes the director
of financial management to amend project-specific appropriations in the
2007-09 biennium to accommodate these schedule or fund transfers.
The office of financial management shall work with legislative
staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation
committees and the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee to review the requested transfers.
The office of financial management will document approved transfers
and/or schedule changes in the transportation executive information
system (TEIS), compare changes to the last legislative session, and
transmit revised project lists to chairs of the transportation
committees of the legislature on a quarterly basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 MEGA-PROJECT REPORTING. Mega-projects are
defined as individual or groups of related projects that cost
$1,000,000,000 or more. These projects include, but are not limited
to: Alaskan Way Viaduct, SR 520, SR 167, I-405, North Spokane
corridor, I-5 Tacoma HOV, and the Columbia River Crossing. The office
of financial management shall track mega-projects and report the
financial status and schedule of these projects at least once a year to
the transportation committees of the legislature.

MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 701 RCW 46.68.170 and 1996 c 237 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created in the motor vehicle fund the RV account.
All moneys hereafter deposited in said account shall be used by the
department of transportation for the construction, maintenance, and
operation of recreational vehicle sanitary disposal systems at safety
rest areas in accordance with the department's highway system plan as
prescribed in chapter 47.06 RCW. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer from the RV account to the motor vehicle
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the RV account.

Sec. 702 RCW 47.29.170 and 2006 c 370 s 604 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before accepting any unsolicited project proposals, the commission
must adopt rules to facilitate the acceptance, review, evaluation, and
selection of unsolicited project proposals. These rules must include
the following:
(1) Provisions that specify unsolicited proposals must meet
predetermined criteria;
(2) Provisions governing procedures for the cessation of
negotiations and consideration;
(3) Provisions outlining that unsolicited proposals are subject to
a two-step process that begins with concept proposals and would only
advance to the second step, which are fully detailed proposals, if the
commission so directed;
(4) Provisions that require concept proposals to include at least
the following information: Proposers' qualifications and experience;
description of the proposed project and impact; proposed project
financing; and known public benefits and opposition; and
(5) Provisions that specify the process to be followed if the
commission is interested in the concept proposal, which must include
provisions:
(a) Requiring that information regarding the potential project
would be published for a period of not less than thirty days, during
which time entities could express interest in submitting a proposal;
(b) Specifying that if letters of interest were received during the
thirty days, then an additional sixty days for submission of the fully
detailed proposal would be allowed; and
(c) Procedures for what will happen if there are insufficient
proposals submitted or if there are no letters of interest submitted in
the appropriate time frame.
The commission may adopt other rules as necessary to avoid
conflicts with existing laws, statutes, or contractual obligations of
the state.
The commission may not accept or consider any unsolicited proposals
before June 30, ((2007)) 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 To the extent that any appropriation
authorizes expenditures of state funds from the motor vehicle account,
special category C account, Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account,
transportation 2003 account (nickel account), transportation
partnership account, transportation improvement account, Puget Sound
capital construction account, multimodal transportation account, or
other transportation capital project account in the state treasury for
a state transportation program that is specified to be funded with
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in chapter 47.10 RCW, the
legislature declares that any such expenditures made prior to the issue
date of the applicable transportation bonds for that state
transportation program are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of
those transportation bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of
such appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT
FASPAA . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
IBU . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
MEBA-LICENSED . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
MEBA-UNLICENSED . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
METAL TRADES COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
MM&P . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
MM&P-WATCH SUPERVISORS . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
OPEIU . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
SEIU . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
WSP LIEUTENANTS ASSOCIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
WSP TROOPERS ASSOCIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
COMPENSATION
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
PENSION CONTRIBUTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE--SUPER COALITION INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--SUPER COALITION . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
REVISE PENSION GAIN SHARING . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 4, 19
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
DRIVER SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
VEHICLE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AVIATION -- PROGRAM F . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM C . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
MARINE -- PROGRAM X . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM B . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS -- PROGRAM K . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
GOVERNOR
COMPENSATION-CONTINUE NONREPRESENTED FY 2007 SALARY INCREASE . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
COMPENSATION-INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
COMPENSATION-NONREPRESENTED SALARY INCREASE . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
COMPENSATION-PENSION RATE CHANGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
STATE TREASURER
ADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 4, 19
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
CRIMINAL HISTORY AND BACKGROUND CHECKS . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
--- END ---