BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A budget is hereby adopted and, subject
to the provisions set forth in the following sections, the several
amounts specified in parts I through VIII of this act, or so much
thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated,
are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries,
wages, and other expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and
for other specified purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1,
2007, and ending June 30, 2009, except as otherwise provided, out of
the several funds of the state hereinafter named.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2008" or "FY 2008" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2008.
(b) "Fiscal year 2009" or "FY 2009" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2009.
(c) "FTE" means full time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in
this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified
purpose which is not expended subject to the specified conditions and
limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,616,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,923,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,099,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE SENATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,022,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,091,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $467,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW
COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,732,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,812,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,788,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,949,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,778,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,377,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS
COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,887,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,888,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,867,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,669,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,039,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,783,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES. In order to achieve
operating efficiencies within the financial resources available to the
legislative branch, the executive rules committee of the house of
representatives and the facilities and operations committee of the
senate by joint action may transfer funds among the house of
representatives, senate, joint legislative audit and review committee,
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
legislative transportation committee, office of the state actuary,
joint legislative systems committee, and statute law committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,900,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,039,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,939,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,237,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,233,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,470,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,931,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,676,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,607,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,077,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,079,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,156,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,238,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,257,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,018,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,667,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,175,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,175,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,030,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,550,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,540,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,345,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,896,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,285,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,285,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,901,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amounts provided from the public
safety and education account appropriations include funding for expert
and investigative services in death penalty personal restraint
petitions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,922,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,008,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,327,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,378,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $927,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $927,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,494,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,493,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,476,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $120,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $120,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to continue support for the
agricultural dispute resolution system funded through the office of
civil legal aid for disputes between farmers and farm workers.
(2) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and an amount not to exceed $40,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 may be
used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise
eligible persons who are sixty years of age or older on matters
authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2)(a) through (k) regardless of household
income or asset level.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,386,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,512,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,928,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $801,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $836,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,727,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,639,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,686,000
Judicial Independence Act Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,325,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The judicial independence act account is
created in the state treasury pursuant to Z-..../07 (judicial
independence act account). If Z-..../07 (judicial independence act
account) is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the appropriation from the
judicial independence act account in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,473,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,568,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,309,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $134,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,527,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $764,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,698,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,103,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,576,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $13,290,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2) $2,421,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,893,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the verification of initiative
and referendum petitions, maintenance of related voter registration
records, and the publication and distribution of the voters and
candidates pamphlet.
(3) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $118,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for legal advertising of state
measures under RCW 29.27.072.
(4)(a) $2,323,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $2,366,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2007-09 biennium. The funding level
for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in
this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise
contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind,
in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The
office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once
all criteria in (a) and (b) of this subsection have been satisfactorily
documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $318,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $618,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office shall assist the department of
personnel on providing the government-to-government training sessions
for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The
training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal
issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the
training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the
participants of each session. The department of personnel shall be
responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training,
including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN-PACIFIC-AMERICAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $282,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $281,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $563,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 FOR THE STATE TREASURER
State Treasurer's Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,494,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 FOR THE STATE AUDITOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $795,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $827,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,155,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,777,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Audits of school districts by the division of municipal
corporations shall include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a)
Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience and education of the
district's certified instructional staff, as reported to the
superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.
(2) $795,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $827,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for staff and related costs to
verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for
state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state
funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state
funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is
not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits;
and to assist the state special education safety net committee when
requested.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124 FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES
FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $230,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125 FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,886,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,267,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,950,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,144,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,198,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,322,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,052,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,089,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations.
(3) $6,200,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for increases in salaries and benefits
of assistant attorneys general effective July 1, 2007. This funding is
provided solely for increases to address critical recruitment and
retention problems, and shall not be used for the performance
management program or to fund general administration. The attorney
general shall report to the office of financial management and the
fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by October
1, 2008, and provide detailed demographic information regarding
assistant attorneys general who received increased salaries and
benefits as a result of the appropriation. The report shall include at
a minimum information regarding the years of service, division
assignment within the attorney general's office, and client agencies
represented by assistant attorneys general receiving increased salaries
and benefits as a result of the amount provided in this subsection.
The report shall also provide initial findings regarding the effect of
the increases on recruitment and retention of assistant attorneys
general.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126 FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $745,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $793,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,538,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,770,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,672,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $251,605,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,324,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,775,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,733,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,462,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $414,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,178,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,591,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,724,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,684,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,840,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,843,000
Homeless Families Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $677,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $427,756,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
technology center for work essential to the mission of the Washington
technology center and conducted in partnership with universities. The
center shall not pay any increased indirect rate nor increases in other
indirect charges above the absolute amount paid during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium.
(2) $1,658,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,658,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for multijurisdictional drug task
forces.
(3) $515,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $515,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to fund domestic violence legal
advocacy.
(4) Repayments of outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600,
the mortgage and rental assistance program, shall be remitted to the
department, including any current revolving account balances. The
department shall contract with a lender or contract collection agent to
act as a collection agent of the state. The lender or contract
collection agent shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and
deposit them into an interest-bearing account. The funds collected
shall be remitted to the department quarterly. Interest earned in the
account may be retained by the lender or contract collection agent, and
shall be considered a fee for processing payments on behalf of the
state. Repayments of loans granted under this chapter shall be made to
the lender or contract collection agent as long as the loan is
outstanding, notwithstanding the repeal of the chapter.
(5) $145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided to support a task force on human
trafficking.
(6) To improve accountability, oversight, and performance
measurement, the department shall collect geographic location
information on all future grants, loans, and contracts consistent with
the geographic information system codes in the grant, loan, and
contract information system under development by the office of
financial management. The department shall report to the office of
financial management by September 30, 2007, the extent to which such
data may be used in conjunction with similar information managed by
other state agencies.
(7) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant to the Cascade lands
conservancy to develop and demonstrate one or more transfer of
development rights programs. These programs shall involve the purchase
or lease of development rights or conservation easements from family
forest landowners facing pressure to convert their lands and who desire
to keep their land in active forest management. The grant shall
require the conservancy to work in collaboration with the Washington
farm forestry association, the family forest foundation, and affected
local governments, and to solicit matching funds from nonstate sources.
As a condition of the grant, the conservancy shall submit an interim
written progress report to the department by September 15, 2008, and a
final report by June 30, 2009. The department shall then transmit each
report to the governor and natural resources committees of the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 128 FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST
COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $607,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $629,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,236,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,793,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,372,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,586,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,270,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $360,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,652,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $165,000 of the general fund state--appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $115,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a study to develop options for
a new K-12 pupil transportation funding formula. The office of
financial management shall contract with consultants with expertise in
both pupil transportation and K-12 finance formulas. The office of
financial management and the contractors shall consult with the
legislative fiscal committees and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction. The office of financial management shall submit a
final report to the governor, the house of representatives
appropriations committee and senate ways and means committee by
November 15, 2008.
(2) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for development of a new incentive
pay structure for K-12 staff. The office of financial management shall
lead a committee that will develop recommendations. Committee members
shall include, but not be limited to, legislators appointed by each of
the major caucuses in the house of representatives and senate; the
superintendent of public instruction or designee; professional educator
standards board; statewide education organizations including teachers,
principals, superintendents, human resource professionals, and parents;
and business organizations. The office of financial management shall
submit a final report to the governor, the house of representatives
appropriations committee, and senate ways and means committee by
December 15, 2008.
(3) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for a contract with the Ruckelshaus
center to continue the agricultural pilot programs that identify
projects to enhance farm income and improve natural resource
protection. Specific work will include project outreach and
refinement, stakeholder support, staffing the oversight committee,
seeking federal and private match funding, and further refining the
list of projects to be recommended for funding.
(4) $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for a contract with the Ruckelshaus
center to fund "proof-of-concept" model and projects recommended by the
oversight committee, as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) $580,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $580,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the association of Washington
cities and the Washington state association of counties for improving
project permitting and mitigation processes.
(6) $320,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $320,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the office of regulatory
assistance to develop statewide multiagency permits for transportation
infrastructure and other projects that integrate local, state, and
federal permit requirements and mitigation standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130 FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,053,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 131 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,792,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,743,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,535,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall coordinate with the
governor's office of Indian affairs on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal
government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal
historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal
governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through
a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department
shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the
training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the
training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 132 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY
Lottery Administrative Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,397,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section may not
be expended by the Washington state lottery for any purpose associated
with a lottery game offered through any interactive electronic device,
including the internet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133 FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $286,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $304,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $590,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 134 FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $282,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $577,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 135 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS -- OPERATIONS
Dependent Care Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $454,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,856,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,310,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 136 FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD
State Investment Board Expense Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,224,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 137 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,053,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,461,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,838,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,000
Waste Tire Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Real Estate Excise Tax Grant Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,370,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $210,858,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 138 FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,591,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,413,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,004,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 139 FOR THE MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL
County Research Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $859,000
City and Town Research Services -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,522,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,381,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 140 FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S
BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OMWBE Enterprises Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,796,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 141 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $478,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $480,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,655,000
General Administration Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,333,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,946,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 142 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,775,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,425,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,246,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,107,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,397,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143 FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,573,000
Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,952,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144 FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
Certified Public Accountants' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,646,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 145 FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $277,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the death investigation
account appropriation is provided solely for providing financial
assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations.
The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding
these funds for multiple death investigations involving an
unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving
multiple jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 146 FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION
Horse Racing Commission Operating Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,487,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the
commission may increase license fees in excess of the fiscal growth
factor as provided in RCW 43.135.055.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 147 FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,907,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,947,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,517,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,156,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,527,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 148 FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION
Public Service Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,899,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,149,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,535,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,583,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In accordance with RCW 81.66.030, it is the policy of the state
of Washington that the costs of regulating the companies transporting
persons with special needs shall be borne by those companies. For each
company or class of companies covered by RCW 81.66.030 the commission
shall set fees at levels sufficient to fully cover the cost of
supervising and regulating the companies or classes of companies.
Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the
commission may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if
the increases are necessary to fully fund the cost of supervision and
regulation.
(2) In accordance with RCW 81.70.350, it is the policy of the state
of Washington that the cost of regulating charter party carrier and
excursion service carriers shall be borne by those entities. For each
charter party carrier and excursion service carrier covered by RCW
81.70.350, the commission shall set fees at levels sufficient to fully
cover the cost of supervising and regulating such carriers. Pursuant
to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the commission
may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the
increases are necessary to fully fund the cost of the program's
supervision and regulation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 149 FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS
Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers' Administrative Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,296,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 150 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,959,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,057,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $107,542,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,112,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,738,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,363,000
Military Department Rent and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $374,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $340,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $556,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,269,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,312,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,738,000 of the disaster response account -- state
appropriation and $22,363,000 of the disaster response account -- federal
appropriation may be spent only on disasters declared by the governor
and with the approval of the office of financial management. The
military department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2007-2009 biennium based on current revenue
and expenditure patterns.
(2) $556,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account -- state
appropriation and $1,269,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account--federal appropriation are provided solely for response and recovery
costs associated with the February 28, 2001, earthquake. The military
department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing earthquake
recovery costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b)
incremental changes from the previous estimate; (c) actual
expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining costs to be paid; and
(e) estimates of future payments by biennium. This information shall
be displayed by fund, by type of assistance, and by amount paid on
behalf of state agencies or local organizations. The military
department shall also submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the Nisqually earthquake account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2007-2009 biennium based on current revenue
and expenditure patterns.
(3) $61,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee;
(b) This amount shall not be allotted until a spending plan is
reviewed by the governor's domestic security advisory group and
approved by the office of financial management;
(c) The department shall submit a quarterly report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; incremental changes from the
previous estimate, planned and actual homeland security expenditures by
the state and local governments with this federal funding; and matching
or accompanying state or local expenditures; and
(d) The department shall submit a report by December 1st of each
year to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing homeland security revenues and expenditures for
the previous fiscal year by county and legislative district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 151 FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,132,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,233,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,311,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,676,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 152 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,061,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,068,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,651,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,794,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $241,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $255,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
information technology operation and maintenance costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 153 FOR THE GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,880,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,926,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,806,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 154 FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
State Convention and Trade Center Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,910,000
State Convention and Trade Center Operating
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,515,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,425,000

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES. (1) Appropriations made in this act to the department of
social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by
this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include
transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly
provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other
than that purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2008 for fiscal
year 2008 appropriations and after May 1, 2009, for fiscal year 2009
appropriations, unless specifically prohibited by this act, the
department may transfer general fund -- state appropriations among
programs after approval by the director of financial management.
However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in
(b) of this subsection. The director of financial management shall
notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing of any allotment modifications or transfers
approved under this subsection.
(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are
insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year
caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the medical
assistance, long-term care, foster care, adoption support, and child
support programs, the department may transfer state moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose, after approval by the director
of financial management.
(4) The department is authorized to develop an integrated health
care program designed to slow the progression of illness and disability
and better manage Medicaid expenditures for the aged and disabled
population. Under this Washington medicaid integration partnership
(WMIP) the department may combine and transfer such Medicaid funds
appropriated under sections 204, 206, 208, and 209 of this act as may
be necessary to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP program
enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily
enrollment of 6,000 persons during the 2007-2009 biennium. The amount
of funding assigned to the pilot projects from each program may not
exceed the average per capita cost assumed in this act for individuals
covered by that program, actuarially adjusted for the health condition
of persons enrolled in the pilot, times the number of clients enrolled
in the pilot. In implementing the WMIP pilot projects, the department
may: (a) Withhold from calculations of "available resources" as set
forth in RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the capitated rate for
individuals enrolled in the pilots; and (b) employ capitation financing
and risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration with health care service
contractors licensed by the office of the insurance commissioner and
qualified to participate in both the medicaid and medicare programs.
The department shall conduct an evaluation of the WMIP, measuring
changes in participant health outcomes, changes in patterns of service
utilization, participant satisfaction, participant access to services,
and the state fiscal impact.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $313,010,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $322,451,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $485,226,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,251,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,254,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,934,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,934,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,298,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,136,758,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,943,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,202,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,812,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,098,000
Reinvesting in Youth Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,846,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,258,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,267,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,510,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,136,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $353,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $353,000 of the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation for fiscal year
2009 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice
assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code
revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to
provide funding for county adult court costs associated with the
implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $3,078,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $3,078,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in
this subsection are intended to provide funding for county impacts
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and
shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $1,020,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation and
$2,672,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,030,000 of the general fund--state appropriation and $2,673,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation for fiscal year 2009, are provided
solely to implement community juvenile accountability grants pursuant
to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided
in this subsection may be used solely for community juvenile
accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of
programs funded by the grants.
(4) $1,488,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,489,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account for fiscal year 2009
are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment
programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile rehabilitation
administration shall award these moneys on a competitive basis to
counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services approved
by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist
counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $296,338,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,005,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $375,474,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,948,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $976,765,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $253,481,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $254,832,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, and $318,877,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the regional support networks to
provide services covered under the prepaid impatient health plan and
state mental health contracts. Distribution of funds shall be based on
the regional support network funding model. Of these amounts,
$107,807,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2008 and $107,807,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for persons and services not
covered by the Medicaid program and shall be distributed proportional
to each regional support network's percentage of the total state
population, consistent with RCW 71.24.035(13).
(b) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 222 per day
throughout fiscal year 2008. Beginning January 1, 2009, the number of
nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support networks at
eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The number of nonforensic
beds allocated for use by regional support networks at western state
hospital shall be 777 per day in fiscal year 2008. Beginning September
2008, the number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at western state hospital shall be 747 per day until
May 2009, at which time, the bed allocation shall be 717 beds per day.
Beginning January 2008, the department shall separately charge regional
support networks for use of state hospital beds for short-term
commitments or for persons served in the program for adaptive living
skills (PALS).
(c) Beginning July 1, 2007, $3,651,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $3,655,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to
increase the nonmedicaid inpatient psychiatric hospital day rate to a
level equivalent to 86 percent of the Medicaid daily rates paid for
inpatient psychiatric hospitals.
(d) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for evidence based mental health services
for foster children.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $149,823,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,188,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $154,280,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,183,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,058,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $492,532,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The state mental hospitals may use funds
appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through
hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do
so.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,015,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,003,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,055,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,073,000

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,999,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,506,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,748,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,253,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $341,776,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,793,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $626,013,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,332,486,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Individuals receiving family support or
high school transition payments as supplemental security income (SSI)
state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,139,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,360,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,538,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,037,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,614,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $356,688,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The developmental disabilities program is
authorized to use funds appropriated in this section to purchase goods
and supplies through direct contracting with vendors when the program
determines it is cost-effective to do so.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,274,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,371,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,818,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,463,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,840,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,872,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $705,514,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $741,327,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,486,653,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,558,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,448,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,444,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,444,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,959,388,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $156.54 for
fiscal year 2008 and shall not exceed $160.36 for fiscal year 2009.
(2) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue certificates of capital authorization that result in up to $16
million of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in
fiscal year 2007; up to $16 million of increased asset value completed
and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2008; and up to $16 million of
increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year
2009.
(3) Adult day health services shall not be considered a duplication
of services for persons receiving care in long-term care settings
licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW.
(4) In accordance with chapter 74.39 RCW, the department may
implement two medicaid waiver programs for persons who do not qualify
for such services as categorically needy, subject to federal approval
and the following conditions and limitations:
(a) One waiver program shall include coverage of care in community
residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver shall not exceed 600
persons at any time.
(b) The second waiver program shall include coverage of in-home
care. Enrollment in this second waiver shall not exceed 200 persons at
any time.
(c) The department shall identify the number of medically needy
nursing home residents, and enrollment and expenditures on each of the
two medically needy waivers, on monthly management reports.
(d) If it is necessary to establish a waiting list for either
waiver because the budgeted number of enrollment opportunities has been
reached, the department shall track how the long-term care needs of
applicants assigned to the waiting list are met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $601,165,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $640,033,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,008,991,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,920,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,592,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,282,701,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $3,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to acquire
and implement an early learning information system to support the data
and management information systems needs of the department of early
learning. The department of social and health services shall
collaborate with the department of early learning and the department of
information systems in developing a statewide system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,484,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,639,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $137,758,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $632,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,044,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,043,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,752,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,567,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,538,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,538,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $146,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $340,141,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,652,842,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,757,691,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,333,889,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,076,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $646,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $344,287,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,459,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,451,890,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the department estimates that expenditures for the medical
assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the department shall
take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or
elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total
program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.
(2) The department shall continue to extend medicaid eligibility to
children through age 18 residing in households with incomes below 200
percent of the federal poverty level.
(3) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, $6,000,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental
payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The
public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the
required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the
payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules.
(4) $1,110,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $1,110,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $5,402,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, $1,591,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, and $1,591,000 of the general
fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
grants to rural hospitals. The department shall distribute the funds
under a formula that provides a relatively larger share of the
available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a disproportionate share
of low-income and medically indigent patients and (b) have relatively
smaller net financial margins, to the extent allowed by the federal
medicaid program.
(5) $10,545,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $10,545,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $19,725,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for grants to nonrural
hospitals. The department shall distribute the funds under a formula
that provides a relatively larger share of the available funding to
hospitals that (a) serve a disproportionate share of low-income and
medically indigent patients and (b) have relatively smaller net
financial margins, to the extent allowed by the federal medicaid
program.
(6) The department shall continue the inpatient hospital certified
public expenditures program for the 2007-2009 biennium. The department
shall periodically evaluate the extent to which savings continue to
exceed costs for this program. The program shall apply to all public
hospitals, including those owned or operated by the state, except those
classified as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric
institutions. Hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain
(a) one hundred percent of the allowable federal portion of each
medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical assistance;
and (b) one hundred percent of the federal portion of the maximum
disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal
regulations. Inpatient Medicaid payments shall be established using an
allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by
the hospitals. If necessary, hospitals in the program shall receive
additional grants intended to equal the combined state and federal
payments that they would have received had they been paid using the
methodology implemented as directed by subsection (9) of this section.
To the extent that hospitals receive funds in excess of what they would
have received under the methodology in place in fiscal year 2008 as
described in this subsection, the hospitals must repay these amounts to
the state when requested. $60,410,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $57,838,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $45,450,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for new state
grant and upper payment limit programs for the participating hospitals.
(7) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the department shall
provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if
eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.
(8) The medical assistance administration is authorized to use
funds appropriated in this section to purchase goods and supplies
through direct contracting with vendors when the administration
determines it is cost-effective to do so.
(9) The department shall begin to phase-in the new reimbursement
methodology presented in the Washington State Medicaid In-Patient
Reimbursement Study as delivered to the department on November 27,
2006. Beginning July 1, 2007, the department shall implement the
overall methodology so that the fiscal impact projected for each
hospital is 50 percent of the projected amount displayed for each
institution in appendix L of the study. In addition:
(a) $10,000,000 of the general fund state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for transition payments to hospitals where
estimated payment changes due to the implementation of the study are
negative, as shown in appendix L. The amount for each affected
hospital shall be equal to 50 percent of the negative amount listed in
the column titled "Estimated Payment Change" of appendix L of the
study. Payments to each affected hospital will be made in two equal
amounts on July 15, 2007, and January 15, 2008.
(b) During fiscal year 2008, the department shall work with
affected hospitals to further identify specific factors that may be
contributing to variances of 3 percent or more in the projected
payments to individual hospitals under the new methodology as compared
with amounts they would have received under previous reimbursement
methods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,082,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,338,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,097,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and Speech
Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,793,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,426,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,360,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,217,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,742,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $810,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,226,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,226,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $913,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $925,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,408,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $143,827,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,258,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,740,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $107,998,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,611,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,649,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,891,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $174,151,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,260,000
State Health Care Authority Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,893,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $529,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,341,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $302,859,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $642,882,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the health care
authority shall continue to provide an enhanced basic health plan
subsidy for foster parents licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW. Under
this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents with family incomes below
200 percent of the federal poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in
the basic health plan at the minimum premium amount charged to
enrollees with incomes below sixty-five percent of the federal poverty
level.
(2) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals which are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
which choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(3) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from all applicants
and enrollees; (b) check employment security payroll records at least
once every twelve months on all enrollees; (c) require enrollees for
whom employment security payroll records cannot be obtained to document
their current income at least once every six months; (d) not reduce
gross family income for self-employed persons by noncash-flow expenses;
and (e) pursue repayment and civil penalties from persons who have
received excessive subsidies, as provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(4) $21,108,000 of the health services account -- state appropriation
is provided solely for funding for health care services provided
through local community clinics.
(5) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the statewide expansion of the
Puget Sound health alliance. The goal of state participation is to
gain a better understanding of how health care is used across the
state, including the identification of over-utilized procedures and
interventions.
(6) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for health information technology
grants to health and long term care providers. The department shall
partner with the department of information services to determine
successful grant applications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,566,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,672,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,345,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,583,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE
APPEALS
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,095,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,096,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,211,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,510,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,512,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,630,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) During the 2007-2009 biennium, the criminal justice training
commission is authorized to raise existing fees charged for firearms
certification for security guards in excess of the fiscal growth factor
established pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary, to meet the
actual costs of conducting the certification programs and the
appropriation levels in this section.
(2) $1,590,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,662,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs. These funds may be expended only for a crime mapping
enhancement to the national incident-based reporting system (NIBRS),
and the continued development, maintenance, and operation of the jail
booking and reporting system (JBRS) and the statewide automated victim
information and notification system (SAVIN).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,709,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,829,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,302,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,510,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $924,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,411,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,962,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,934,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $233,935,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,622,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $234,206,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,186,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,648,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,667,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $598,873,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $2,413,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is provided solely for conducting utilization
reviews of physical and occupational therapy cases at the 24th visit
and the associated administrative costs, including those of entering
data into the claimant's file. The department shall develop and report
performance measures and targets for these reviews to the office of
financial management. The reports are due September 30th for the prior
fiscal year and must include the amount spent and the estimated savings
per fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW
BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,887,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,899,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,786,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,112,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,164,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Veterans Innovations Program Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,437,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,723,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,143,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,671,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $972,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,985,000
Veteran Estate Management Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,062,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,833,000

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,938,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,342,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,922,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,789,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,991,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,711,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,729,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,440,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,373,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,312,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $480,553,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $113,328,000
Hospital Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,242,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,013,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,609,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,057,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,975,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,517,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,974,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,005,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,562,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,062,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,512,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,482,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $294,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,857,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,149,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,866,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $993,716,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department is authorized to raise existing fees charged for
the clandestine drug lab program, the drinking water program,
radioactive materials license fees, X-ray facility registration fees,
shellfish commercial paralytic shellfish poisoning fees, the water
recreation program, the wastewater management program, newborn
specialty clinic fees, acute care hospitals, psychiatric hospitals,
child birth centers, correctional medical facilities, alcoholism
hospitals, and the midwifery program, in excess of the fiscal growth
factor pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary, to meet the actual
costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in this
section.
(2) $3,200,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $3,200,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, $600,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation, and $676,000 of the general fund -- local appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound
conservation, Puget Sound partnership early implementation items, and
recovery plan and agency action items, DOH-01, DOH-02, DOH-03, DOH-04,
DOH-05, DOH-06, and DOH-07. The department shall consult and sign
performance agreements with the leadership council of the Puget Sound
partnership created by Z-0369/07 regarding these items.
(3) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive,
and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not
anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require
expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated
unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services
authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS. The
appropriations to the department of corrections in this act shall be
expended for the programs and in the amounts specified herein.
However, after May 1, 2008, for fiscal year 2008 appropriations and
after May 1, 2009, for fiscal year 2009 appropriations, after approval
by the director of financial management and unless specifically
prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund -- state
appropriations between programs. The director of financial management
shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house
of representatives in writing of any allotment modifications or
transfers approved under this section.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,207,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,266,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,468,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,501,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,280,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,748,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $9,389,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for completion of
phase three of the department's offender-based tracking system
replacement project.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $623,230,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $679,518,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,489,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,492,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,492,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,321,021,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as recovery
of costs.
(b) The Harborview medical center shall provide inpatient and
outpatient hospital services to offenders confined in department of
corrections facilities at a rate no greater than the average rate that
the department has negotiated with other community hospitals in
Washington state.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,460,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,268,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,323,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,651,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $291,502,000

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $989,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,549,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,538,000

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,277,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,479,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,756,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE
BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,570,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,575,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,665,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $936,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $955,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,891,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $265,760,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,833,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $253,207,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,882,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,989,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $615,791,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,578,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from funds made available to
the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
These funds are authorized to provide direct services to unemployment
insurance claimants and providing job search review.
(2) $2,300,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to continue implementation of chapter 4, Laws
of 2003 2nd sp. sess. and for implementation costs relating to chapter
133, Laws of 2005 (unemployment insurance).
(3) $12,348,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to continue current unemployment insurance
functions.
(4) $12,054,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to fund the unemployment insurance tax
information system (TAXIS) technology initiative.
(5) $430,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to replace high-risk servers.
(6) $503,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to provide a system to track computer
upgrades and changes.
(7) $183,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to conduct a feasibility study to integrate
job search data systems.

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $524,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $547,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $968,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,048,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,072,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,897,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,313,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,646,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,869,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,961,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter
Control -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,835,000
State Drought Preparedness -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities) -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $533,000
Vessel Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,438,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,000
Water Rights Tracking System Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $701,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,767,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,952,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $373,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,267,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,221,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $381,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,705,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,806,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,758,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,410,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,881,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,326,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,922,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,253,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,698,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,078,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $707,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,293,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $464,769,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $3,053,943 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $3,053,943 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, $6,332,400 of the general fund--federal
appropriation, $3,947,000 of the state toxics account--state
appropriation, $10,136,000 of the local toxics account--state
appropriation, $1,185,806 of the water quality account--state
appropriation, $4,236,220 of the water quality permit account--state
appropriation, $200,000 of the hazardous waste assistance
account--state appropriation, and $705,000 of the oil spill prevention
account--state appropriation are for the implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan, and agency action items DOE-01-03, DOE-06-10, DOE-16, and DOE-18-30.
(2) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the Puget Sound
conservation and recovery plan action item UW-02 through a contract
with the University of Washington's sea grant program to continue an
educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing
vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(3) $256,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $ 256,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $200,000 of the general fund--private local
appropriation are provided solely to implement activities associated
with a regional haze program. Funds shall be collected and expended in
accordance with the terms of the contract entered into with affected
businesses and the department of ecology.
(4) $1,257,000 of the reclamation account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement the hydropower licensing and gauging bill,
Z-0168/07. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $679,000 of the underground storage tank account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement the underground storage
tanks reauthorization bill, Z-0172/07. If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $410,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely to the department to facilitate and
support groups established to secure review and advice from other
governments, industry, citizens, and technical experts regarding the
department's oil spill prevention, preparedness, and response programs.
If Z-..../07 (oil spill program advisory groups), is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse and
shall be appropriated to the office of the governor.
(7) $2,000,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to local governments outside of Puget
Sound for municipal storm water programs, including but not limited to,
implementation of phase II municipal storm water permits, source
control for toxics in association with cleanup of contaminated sediment
sites, and source control programs for shellfish protection districts
where storm water is a significant contributor.
(8) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants to Puget Sound local
governments in ten pilot watersheds to improve compliance with existing
environmental laws. This work shall be done by providing information
on existing requirements, providing technical assistance necessary to
comply on a voluntary basis, and taking enforcement actions only when
necessary to secure compliance. Grants shall be contingent upon the
local government match of at least 50% of moneys or in-kind assistance.
(9) Fees approved by the department of ecology in the 2007-09
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(10) $110,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to support development of a wetland
mitigation program in Clark county. The program will engage local,
state, and federal agencies, private investors, property owners, and
others in the creation of one or more wetland banks and other measures
to protect habitat functions and values while accommodating urban
growth in the region.
(11) $260,000 of the state toxics control account -- state
appropriation is provided solely to support pesticide container
recycling activities in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,038,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,873,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,545,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,116,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $238,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,838,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $365,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,969,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,402,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in
the 2007-09 biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor
under RCW 43.135.055.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $191,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound
conservation and recovery plan and agency action item PRC-02.
(4) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for project scoping and cost estimating
for the agency's 2009-11 capital budget submittal.
(5) $2,255,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for costs associated with relocating the
commission's Tumwater headquarters office.
(6) $272,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $271,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for costs associated with
relocating the commission's eastern Washington regional headquarters
office.
(7) $1,902,500 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,902,500 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for replacing vehicles and
equipment.
(8) $2,379,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,204,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for planned and emergency
maintenance of park facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,785,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,827,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,405,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $277,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Firearms Range Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,865,000
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicles Activities Program
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,004,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,650,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $16,025,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the forest and
fish agreement rules. These funds shall be passed through to the
department of natural resources and the department of fish and
wildlife.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,133,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,156,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,289,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,817,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,847,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,178,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,703,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,727,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,272,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $197,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $197,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action item CC-01.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for supplementary basic funding
grants to the state's lowest-income conservation districts. The
supplementary grant process shall be structured to aid recipients in
becoming financially self-sufficient in the future.
(3) $1,000,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the water quality account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and
agency action item CC-02.
(4) $250,000 of the general fund—state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for an office of working farms and
forests within the state conservation commission. The office shall
serve as a voice on the importance of retaining working lands; assist
communities and local governments in establishing and increasing access
to programs that compensate landowners for development rights; work
with land trusts, the department of community, trade, and economic
development, and local governments to develop strategies for financing
infrastructure and conservation acquisitions including transfer of
development rights; and serve as a clearinghouse for rural landowner
incentive programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,907,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,105,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,632,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,425,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $416,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,067,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $268,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,624,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,021,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $754,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $842,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,605,000
Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,528,000
Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,279,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,080,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,922,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $486,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,751,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,104,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $417,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $343,893,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,866,714 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,866,713 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan, and agency action items DFW-01
through DFW-08, DFW-13, and DFW-14.
(2) $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(3) The department shall support the activities of the aquatic
nuisance species coordination committee to foster state, federal,
tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues.
The committee shall strive to prevent the introduction of nonnative
aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species that are
introduced.
(4) The department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to
protection of fish habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and
steelhead. Within the amount provided for the agency, the department
shall provide support to the department of health to enforce state
shellfish harvest laws.
(5) $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
Army Corps of Engineers.
(6) The department shall assist the office of regulatory assistance
in implementing activities consistent with the governor's regulatory
improvement program. The department shall support and provide
expertise to facilitate, coordinate, and simplify citizen and business
interactions so as to improve state regulatory processes involving
state, local, and federal stakeholders.
(7) $634,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for operations and fish production costs
at department-operated Mitchell act hatchery facilities.
(8) $880,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $881,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for salmon abundance and
productivity monitoring necessary to support evaluation of federal
delisting criteria. Of these amounts, $345,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $346,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
implementation of the Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan, and
agency action item WDFW-22.
(9) Within the amount provided for the agency, the department shall
implement a joint management and collaborative enforcement agreement
with the Confederated Tribes of the Colville and the Spokane Tribe.
(10) $423,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,034,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for migration of agency
information technology infrastructure to a platform consistent with
department of information services standards.
(11) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $250,000 of the state wildlife account--state
appropriation are provided solely to the department's performance
improvement and accountability office.
(12) $182,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $182,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of a ballast
water management program. The department shall coordinate with the
department of ecology and the office of financial management to
evaluate the feasability of synchronizing ballast water program and
spills program inspections. The department will submit recommendations
to the office of financial management by November 1, 2007.
(13) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for hatchery facility maintenance
improvements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,074,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,352,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,228,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,264,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,202,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,312,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,539,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,533,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,536,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,280,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Forest and Fish Support Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,352,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,360,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,337,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $570,000
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicles Activities Program
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $982,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,652,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,062,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $311,749,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, $3,024,050 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation, and $500,000 of the derelict vessel removal account--state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action items DNR-01, DNR-02, DNR-03, DNR-08, and DNR-09.
(2) $1,021,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,041,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(3) $11,463,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $13,792,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $5,000,000 of the disaster response account--state appropriation are provided solely for emergency fire suppression.
None of the general fund and disaster response account amounts
provided in this subsection may be used to fund agency indirect and
administrative expenses. Agency indirect and administrative costs
shall be allocated among the agency's remaining accounts and
appropriations.
(4) $694,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for spartina control.
(5) Fees approved by the department of natural resources and the
board of natural resources in the 2007-09 biennium are authorized to
exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.
(6) $397,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $397,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to work with
appropriate stakeholders and state agencies in determining how
privately owned lands, in combination with other land ownership such as
public and tribal lands, contribute to wildlife habitat. The
assessment will also determine how commercial forests, forest lands on
the urban fringe, and small privately-owned forest lands that are
managed according to Washington's forest and fish prescriptions, in
combination with other forest management activities, function as
wildlife habitat now and in the future.
(7) $2,500,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to tribes. If federal funding for this
purpose is reinstated, this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $400,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to the departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife. If federal funding for this purpose is reinstated, this
subsection shall lapse.
(9) $157,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $152,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for assessing geologic hazards
along tsunami evacuation routes, identifying new or alternate routes,
and updating evacuation maps.
(10) $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for creation of a wildfire
prevention and protection work group. The work group shall be composed
of members representing rural counties in eastern and western
Washington, fire districts, environmental protection organizations,
industrial forest landowners, small forest landowners, the building
industry, realtors, the governor or designee, the insurance
commissioner or designee, the office of financial management, the state
fire marshal or designee, the state building code council, and the
commissioner of public lands or designee. The work group, in
consultation with existing groups that address policy matters related
to fire protection and suppression, shall study wildfire prevention and
protection issues, including: (a) Whether all timbered and rangeland
areas of the state that are subject to wildfires have sufficient and
effective fire protection resources commensurate with risk; (b) the
extent to which those who receive wildfire protection and suppression
services pay equitably for those services; (c) whether state and local
building codes address adequately the dangers posed by building in
areas subject to wildfires; (d) whether local government land use
regulations and state advisory and assistance programs adequately
address the dangers posed by building in areas subject to wildfires;
(e) how insurance rates and other incentives can encourage homeowners
to take action to protect their property from wildfires; and (f)
whether federal land-management policies for forest management, fire
prevention and suppression, and leasing adequately protect nonfederal
assets. The work group shall prepare a report with findings and
recommendations, and submit the report to the legislature and office of
financial management by August 1, 2008.
(11) The department shall prepare a feasibility study that analyzes
applicable business processes and develops the scope, requirements, and
alternatives for replacement of the department's current suite of
payroll-support systems. The department shall use an independent
consultant to assist with the study, and shall submit the completed
analysis to the office of financial management, the department of
personnel, and the department of information services by August 1,
2008.
(12) $1,950,000 of the forest fire protection assessment account--state appropriation is provided solely for fire control, preparedness,
and training activities. Funding is subject to the passage of
Z-..../07 (modifying forest fire protection parcel assessments). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(13) $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to continue interagency agreements
with the department of fish and wildlife and the department of ecology
for forest and fish report field implementation tasks.
(14) All department staff serving as recreation-management trail
stewards shall be noncommissioned.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,548,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,552,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,426,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $422,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,060,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $604,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $616,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,115,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,404,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan, and agency action item WSDA-01.
(2) Fees and assessments approved by the department in the 2007-09
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(3) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department, in
addition to the authority provided in RCW 17.26.007, may enter into
agreements with federal agencies to eradicate spartina from private
lands that may provide a source of reinfestation to public lands.
(4) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to develop a long-term strategy to
evaluate the strengths, weaknesses, opportunities, and threats facing
agriculture in Washington state. The department shall assess the
changing dynamics of agricultural production that impacts domestic and
global demand for agricultural products. At minimum, the evaluation
shall consider the impact of new products and varieties, production
costs, transportation, environmental factors, and consumer demand. The
department shall conduct this work with the assistance of a stakeholder
advisory group. The department shall develop recommendations and
submit a preliminary report to the office of financial management and
appropriate legislative committees by November 1, 2007. A final report
shall be submitted by September 1, 2008.
(5) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department, in
addition to the authority provided in RCW 17.26.007, may enter into
agreements with federal agencies to eradicate spartina from private
lands that may provide a source of reinfestation to public lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY
REINSURANCE PROGRAM
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,159,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,432,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,487,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,578,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, $2,500,000 of the general fund--private local appropriation,
$1,159,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, $6,684,000 of
the water quality account appropriation, and $500,000 of the aquatic
lands enhancement account--appropriation are provided solely for the
Puget Sound water quality action team to implement the Puget Sound work
plan, and agency action items PSAT-01 through PSAT-08.
(2) If a bill creating the Puget Sound partnership is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the appropriations for the Puget Sound partnership in
this section shall lapse and shall be appropriated to the office of the
governor.

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,726,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,998,000
Architects' License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $761,000
Cemetery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $241,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,487,000
Real Estate Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,873,000
Master License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,867,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,089,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000
Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,683,000
Business Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,276,000
Real Estate Research Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000
Funeral Directors And Embalmers Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $596,000
Geologists' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,309,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In accordance with RCW 43.24.086, it is
the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of each
professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. For
each licensing program covered by RCW 43.24.086, the department shall
set fees at levels sufficient to fully cover the cost of administering
the licensing program, including any costs associated with policy
enhancements funded in the 2007-09 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, during the 2007-09 fiscal biennium, the department may
increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the increases
are necessary to fully fund the costs of the licensing programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,525,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,407,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,094,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,223,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,041,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,478,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,526,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,572,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,153,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,240,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,684,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $248,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $503,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,007,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,429,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,922,000
DNA Data Base Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $170,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,355,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $233,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $282,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $357,000 of the fingerprint identification
account--state appropriation are provided solely for workload
associated with implementation of the federal Adam Walsh Act -- the
Children's Safety and Violent Crime Reduction Act of 2006.
(2) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $10,000,000 of the enhanced 911 account--state
appropriation are provided solely for acquisition, installation,
operation, and maintenance of enhanced statewide interoperable
emergency communications systems.
(3) In accordance with RCW 10.97.100 and chapter 43.43 RCW, the
Washington state patrol is authorized to perform and charge fees for
criminal history and background checks for state and local agencies,
and nonprofit and other private entities and disseminate the records.
It is the policy of the state of Washington that the fees cover, as
nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs of performing
criminal history and background checks activities. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the Washington state
patrol may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the
increases are necessary to fully fund the direct and indirect cost of
the criminal history and background check activities.

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
(1) STATE AGENCY OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,937,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,340,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,527,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,804,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $12,120,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $12,506,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Within the
amounts provided in this subsection, the superintendent shall recognize
the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have
demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning
requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award. The
students selected for the award must demonstrate understanding through
completion of at least one of the classroom-based civics assessment
models developed by the superintendent of public instruction, and
through leadership in the civic life of their communities. The
superintendent shall select two students from eastern Washington and
two students from western Washington to receive the award, and shall
notify the governor and legislature of the names of the recipients.
(b) $550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,236,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are appropriated solely for the development and
implementation of a school district financial health and monitoring
system. The office of the superintendent of public instruction with
the office of financial management shall identify up to six system
measures that shall be established for financial reporting to the
public. In addition, the superintendent of public instruction with the
office of financial management shall develop a financial health rating
system that will place school districts in one of three financial
health categories based on their ratings on financial indicators. This
system is intended to provide early, public warning of emerging
financial issues in school districts. A proposal for the system
measures and the financial health rating system shall be presented to
the governor by December 1, 2007, and, subject to agreement on this
system between the governor and the superintendent of public
instruction, the measures and monitoring system shall be implemented
during the 2008-09 school year.
(c) $1,080,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $815,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities. Within the amounts provided, the board shall (i) develop
a comprehensive set of recommendations for an accountability system;
(ii) adopt high school graduation requirements aligned with
international performance standards in mathematics and science and, in
conjunction with the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, identify no more than three curricula that are aligned
with these standards; and (iii) review all requirements related to the
high school diploma as directed by section 405, chapter 263, Laws of
2006.
(d) $4,543,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $5,803,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the professional educator
standards board for the following:
(i) $930,000 in fiscal year 2008 and $1,070,000 in fiscal year 2009
are provided for the operation and expenses of the Washington
professional educator standards board, including administering the
alternative routes to certification program, pipeline for paraeducators
conditional scholarship loan program, and the retooling to teach math
conditional loan program. Within the amounts provided in this
subsection (1)(d)(i), the professional educator standards board shall:
(A) Revise the teacher mathematics endorsement competencies and
alignment of teacher tests to the updated competencies; (B) review
teacher preparation requirements in cultural understanding and make
recommendations for strengthening these standards; (C) create a new
professional level teacher assessment; (D) expand the alternative
routes to teacher certification program for business professionals and
instructional assistants who will teach math and science; and (E)
revise requirements for college and university teacher preparation
programs to match a new knowledge- and skill-based performance system;
and
(ii) $3,269,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $4,289,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for conditional scholarship loans
and mentor stipends provided through the alternative routes to
certification program administered by the professional educator
standards board. Of the amounts provided in this subsection
(1)(d)(ii):
(A) $500,000 each year is provided solely for conditional
scholarships to candidates seeking an endorsement in special education,
math, science, or bilingual education;
(B) $2,210,000 in fiscal year 2008 and $3,230,000 in fiscal year
2009 is provided solely for the expansion of conditional scholarship
loans and mentor stipends for individuals enrolled in alternative route
state partnership programs and seeking endorsements in math and science
as follows: (I) For route one interns (those currently holding
associates of arts degrees), in fiscal year 2008, sixty interns seeking
endorsements in mathematics and sixty interns seeking endorsements in
science and in fiscal year 2009, an additional sixty in each subject
area; and (II) for all other routes, funding is provided each year for
seventy interns seeking endorsements in mathematics and seventy interns
seeking endorsements in science; and
(C) Remaining amounts in this subsection (1)(d)(ii) shall be used
to continue existing alternative routes to certification programs.
(iii) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in fiscal
year 2008 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in
fiscal year 2009 provided in this subsection (1)(d) are provided solely
for $4,000 conditional loan stipends for paraeducators participating in
the pipeline for paraeducators established in Z-. . . ./07.
(iv) $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for conditional stipends for
certificated teachers pursuing a mathematics endorsement under the
retooling to teach mathematics program established in Z-. . . ./07.
The conditional stipends shall be for endorsement exam fees as well as
stipends for teachers who must also complete coursework.
(e) $555,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for increased attorney general fees
related to education litigation.
(f) $300,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for replacement of the
apportionment system, which includes the processes that collect school
district budget and expenditure information, staffing characteristics,
and the student enrollments that drive the funding process.
(g) $78,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $78,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to provide direct services and
support to schools around an integrated, interdisciplinary approach to
instruction in conservation, natural resources, sustainability, and
human adaptation to the environment. Specific integration efforts will
focus on science, math, and the social sciences. Integration between
basic education and career and technical education, particularly
agricultural and natural sciences education, is to be a major element.
(h) $1,336,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,227,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the creation of a statewide
data base of longitudinal student information. This amount is
conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements in section
902 of this act.
(i) $325,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $325,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for comprehensive cultural
competence and anti-bias education programs for educators and students.
The office of superintendent of public instruction shall administer
grants to school districts with the assistance and input of groups such
as the anti-defamation league and the Jewish federation of Seattle.
(j) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to promote the financial literacy
of students. The effort will be coordinated through the financial
literacy public-private partnership.

(2) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,335,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,335,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,890,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,560,000

The appropriations in this subsection are provided solely for the
statewide programs specified in this subsection and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at
educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of
public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to
provide direct care to students, health education, and training for
school staff.
(ii) $96,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $96,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the school safety center in
the office of the superintendent of public instruction subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(A) The safety center shall: Disseminate successful models of
school safety plans and cooperative efforts; provide assistance to
schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan; select models of
cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as an
information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state;
coordinate activities relating to school safety; review and approve
manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training; and
develop and maintain a school safety information web site.
(B) The school safety center advisory committee shall develop a
training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all
school safety personnel.
(iii) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a school safety training
program provided by the criminal justice training commission. The
commission, in collaboration with the school safety center advisory
committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school
administrators and school safety personnel, including school safety
personnel hired after the effective date of this section.
(iv) $40,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the safety center advisory
committee to develop and distribute a pamphlet to promote internet
safety for children, particularly in grades seven through twelve. The
pamphlet shall be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's
web site. To the extent possible, the pamphlet shall be distributed in
schools throughout the state and in other areas accessible to youth,
including but not limited to libraries and community centers.
(v) $10,344,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for safe and drug free schools and communities grants for drug
and violence prevention activities and strategies.
(vi) $146,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $146,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a nonviolence and leadership
training program provided by the institute for community leadership.
The program shall provide a request for proposal process, with up to 80
percent funding, for nonviolence leadership workshops serving at least
12 school districts with direct programming in 36 elementary, middle,
and high schools throughout Washington state.
(vii) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a pilot youth suicide
prevention and information program. The office of superintendent of
public instruction will work with selected school districts and
community agencies in identifying effective strategies for preventing
youth suicide.
(b) TECHNOLOGY
$1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year
2008 and $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network
technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and
avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and
video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be
used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the
network.
(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $799,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $799,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the special services pilot
projects. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
allocate these funds to the district or districts participating in the
pilot program according to the provisions of RCW 28A.630.015.
(ii) $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operation of the Cispus
environmental learning center.
(iii) $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support vocational student
leadership organizations.
(iv) $146,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $146,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington civil liberties
education program.
(v) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers
scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support community
involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer
mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.
(vi) $294,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $294,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Lorraine Wojahn dyslexia
pilot reading program in up to five school districts.
(vii) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for developing and disseminating
curriculum and other materials documenting women's role in World War
II.
(viii) $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for incentive grants for districts
to develop preapprenticeship programs. Grant awards up to $10,000 each
shall be used to support the program's design, school/business/labor
agreement negotiations, and recruiting high school students for
preapprenticeship programs in the building trades and crafts.
(ix) $3,220,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,220,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the dissemination of the
Navigation 101 curriculum to all districts, including disseminating
electronic student planning tools and software for analyzing the impact
of the implementation of Navigation 101 on student performance, and
grants to at least one hundred school districts each year for the
implementation of the Navigation 101 program. The implementation
grants will be limited to a maximum of two years and the school
districts selected shall represent various regions of the state and
reflect differences in school district size and enrollment
characteristics.
(x) $36,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the enhancement of civics
education. Of this amount, $25,000 each year is provided solely for
competitive grants to school districts for curriculum alignment,
development of innovative civics projects, and other activities that
support the civics assessment established in chapter 113, Laws of 2006.
(xi) $1,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a pilot grant program related
to serving students in staffed residential homes. The pilot grant
program will be established in at least five school districts. The
districts eligible for the pilot grant program shall be limited to
school districts with a concentration of students residing in staffed
residential homes greater than or equal to 1.3 full time equivalent
students per 1,000 K-12 public students. The amount of funding for
each pilot grant district shall be in proportion to the degree of
concentration of staffed residential home students residing and served
in each respective district, and other criteria as determined by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction. Funding in the
pilot grant program shall not be considered part of the basic education
program.
(A) The pilot grant program is intended to: (I) Identify the
fiscal and educational challenges posed to districts that serve staffed
residential homes students; (II) provide resources to assist school
districts in developing best practices for addressing these challenges;
(III) address costs resulting from high concentrations of staffed
residential home students in some school districts; (IV) develop models
of collaboration between school districts and staffed residential
homes; and (V) gain additional information on the variety of
circumstances and needs present in the staffed residential home
population, including both special education and nonspecial education
eligible students.
(B) As a condition of the pilot grant program, the selected school
districts must meet the following criteria: (I) Jointly develop, with
staffed residential homes in their community, a model policy and plan
for collaboration and information sharing, which includes an agreed
upon routine of regular communication regarding each child's progress,
including for special education students the development and regular
updating of individualized education programs; and (II) provide an
annual progress report regarding the implementation of the model policy
and plan and measured progress toward meeting the educational needs of
students in staffed residential homes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,514,262,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,617,358,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $226,624,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,358,244,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2007-08 and
2008-09 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (e) through (g) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (d)
and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (d) through
(g) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii) Forty-nine certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades K-3;
(iii) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 4-12; and
(iv) An additional 4.2 certificated instructional staff units for
grades K-3 and an additional 7.2 certificated instructional staff units
for grade 4. Any funds allocated for the additional certificated units
provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be considered as basic
education funding;
(A) Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of
the amount required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established
under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the district
documents an actual ratio in grades K-4 equal to or greater than 53.2
certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent
students. For any school district documenting a lower certificated
instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff ratio
achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;
(B) Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per
one thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate
up to 1.3 of the 53.2 funding ratio to employ additional classified
instructional assistants assigned to basic education classrooms in
grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a district's staff ratio under
this section, funds used by the district to employ additional
classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual
certificated instructional staff ratio. Additional classified
instructional assistants, for the purposes of this subsection, shall be
determined using the 1989-90 school year as the base year;
(C) Any district maintaining a ratio in grades K-4 equal to or
greater than 53.2 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students may use allocations generated under this
subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of that required to maintain the
minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ
additional basic education certificated instructional staff or
classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated
under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) shall only be expended to reduce class
size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated instructional
funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants;
(b) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in mathematics
and science classes in grades 6 through 12, additional CIS staffing
units to ensure an average ratio of 25 students per classroom teacher.
Funds provided under this subsection (2)(b) shall be allocated only if
the district documents an actual average class size in mathematics and
science in grades 6 through 12 of no more than 25 students. Any
additional funds allocated for the additional certificated units
provided in this subsection (b) shall not be considered as basic
education funding.
(c) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(d)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(B) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction with a waiver allowed for skills centers in current
operation that are not meeting this standard until the 2007-08 school
year, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent vocational
students;
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and
(iii) Indirect cost charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic
education and vocational enhancement allocations of state funds;
(e) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(f) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(g) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (g)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(h) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(i) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2007-08 and 2008-09
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(e) through (i) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each three certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
sixty average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
14.48 percent in the 2007-08 school year and 16.25 percent in the 2008-09 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 17.80 percent in the
2007-08 school year and 19.11 percent in the 2008-09 school year for
classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d)
through (h) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$9,751 per certificated staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a
maximum of $9,936 per certificated staff unit in the 2008-09 school
year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $23,947 per certificated
staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a maximum of $24,402 per
certificated staff unit in the 2008-09 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $18,580 per certificated
staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a maximum of $18,933 per
certificated staff unit in the 2008-09 school year.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $555.20 for the 2007-08 and
2008-09 school years per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely
for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall
be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio
between the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and
the number of actual basic education certificated instructional staff
reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of $8,938,000
outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2008 and 2009
as follows:
(a) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $549,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2008
and a maximum of $559,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2009;
(b) For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of
$2,385,000 may be expended for the 2008 fiscal year and a maximum of
$2,385,000 for the 2009 fiscal year. 20 percent of each fiscal year
amount may carry over from one year to the next;
(c) A maximum of $390,000 may be expended for school district
emergencies;
(d) A maximum of $485,000 each fiscal year may be expended for
programs providing skills training for secondary students who are
enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at
a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in
those programs; and
(e) $850,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $850,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for incentive grants to encourage
school districts to increase enrollment in vocational skills centers.
Up to $500 for each full-time equivalent student may be proportionally
distributed to a school district or school districts increasing skills
centers enrollment above the levels in the 2004-05 school year. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop
criteria for awarding incentive grants pursuant to this subsection.
The total amount allocated pursuant to this subsection shall be limited
to $1,700,000 for the 2007-09 biennium. Funds provided in this
subsection shall first be expended to provide incentive grants to
school districts increasing skills center enrollment during the school
year. If funds are available after making these allocations, funds may
be distributed for: (i) Increasing enrollment including allowing up to
an additional .2 full time equivalent student enrollment at skills
centers; (ii) increasing enrollment and capacity of summer vocational
programs at the skills centers.
(10) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student is 5.7 percent from the 2006-07 school year to the
2007-08 school year and 5.1 percent from the 2007-08 school year to the
2008-09 school year.
(11) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION. (1) The following
calculations determine the salaries used in the general fund
allocations for certificated instructional, certificated
administrative, and classified staff units under section 502 of this
act:
(a) Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units
shall be determined for each district by multiplying the district's
certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 2
by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated
instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP Document
1; and
(b) Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units
and classified staff units for each district shall be based on the
district's certificated administrative and classified salary allocation
amounts shown on LEAP Document 2.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "LEAP Document 1" means the staff mix factors for certificated
instructional staff according to education and years of experience, as
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee on December 7, 2006, at 19:41 hours; and
(b) "LEAP Document 2" means the school year salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff and classified staff and derived and
total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed
by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on
December 7, 2006, at 19:41 hours.
(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors shall be applied to salary
adjustments at a rate of 14.48 percent for school year 2007-08 and
16.25 percent for school year 2008-09 for certificated staff and for
classified staff 17.80 percent for school year 2007-08 and 19.11
percent for the 2008-09 school year.
(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary
allocation schedules for certificated instructional staff are
established for basic education salary allocations:

K-12 Salary Allocation Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2007-08 School Year

Years of MA+90

Service
BA
BA+15
BA+30
BA+45
BA+90
BA+135
MA
MA+45
or PHD

0 32,651 33,533 34,446 35,362 38,301 40,193 39,146 42,084 43,979

1 33,090 33,984 34,910 35,866 38,835 40,717 39,581 42,550 44,431

2 33,509 34,412 35,347 36,377 39,337 41,239 40,019 42,979 44,881

3 33,941 34,852 35,797 36,860 39,815 41,762 40,434 43,387 45,336

4 34,364 35,315 36,266 37,365 40,338 42,300 40,870 43,842 45,805

5 34,801 35,757 36,717 37,878 40,839 42,840 41,312 44,274 46,276

6 35,250 36,185 37,178 38,397 41,344 43,356 41,766 44,713 46,724

7 36,040 36,989 37,995 39,279 42,270 44,338 42,615 45,605 47,673

8 37,196 38,196 39,226 40,617 43,648 45,792 43,952 46,983 49,126

9 39,447 40,528 41,969 45,071 47,287 45,302 48,406 50,622

10 41,845 43,390 46,533 48,824 46,725 49,869 52,158

11 44,853 48,065 50,401 48,188 51,400 53,735

12 46,269 49,637 52,043 49,708 52,972 55,378

13 51,248 53,725 51,282 54,582 57,060

14 52,866 55,471 52,902 56,307 58,806

15 54,242 56,914 54,277 57,771 60,335

16 or more 55,326 58,052 55,362 58,926 61,541

K-12 Salary Allocation Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2008-09 School Year

Years of MA+90

Service
BA
BA+15
BA+30
BA+45
BA+90
BA+135
MA
MA+45
or PHD

0 33,732 34,643 35,587 36,533 39,569 41,524 40,442 43,478 45,435

1 34,186 35,110 36,066 37,053 40,121 42,065 40,891 43,959 45,902

2 34,618 35,551 36,517 37,581 40,640 42,605 41,344 44,402 46,367

3 35,064 36,006 36,982 38,080 41,133 43,145 41,773 44,823 46,837

4 35,502 36,485 37,467 38,603 41,673 43,700 42,223 45,293 47,321

5 35,953 36,941 37,933 39,132 42,191 44,258 42,680 45,740 47,808

6 36,417 37,383 38,409 39,668 42,712 44,791 43,148 46,193 48,270

7 37,233 38,214 39,253 40,580 43,670 45,806 44,026 47,114 49,251

8 38,427 39,461 40,525 41,962 45,093 47,308 45,407 48,539 50,752

9 40,753 41,870 43,358 46,563 48,853 46,802 50,009 52,298

10 43,230 44,827 48,074 50,440 48,272 51,520 53,885

11 46,338 49,656 52,069 49,783 53,102 55,514

12 47,801 51,280 53,766 51,354 54,725 57,212

13 52,944 55,504 52,979 56,389 58,949

14 54,616 57,307 54,653 58,171 60,753

15 56,038 58,798 56,074 59,683 62,333

16 or more 57,158 59,973 57,195 60,877 63,579

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer
to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate
degree.
(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before
the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be
counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection,
the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:
(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and
(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.
(b) "MA" means a masters degree.
(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.
(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and
28A.415.023.
(6) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by
any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine
compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and
LEAP documents referenced in this act, or any replacement schedules and
documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(7) The certificated instructional staff base salary specified for
each district in LEAP Document 2 and the salary schedules in subsection
(4)(a) of this section include two learning improvement days. A school
district is eligible for the learning improvement day funds only if the
learning improvement days have been added to the 180- day contract
year. If fewer days are added, the additional learning improvement
allocation shall be adjusted accordingly. The additional days shall be
limited to specific activities identified in the state required school
improvement plan related to improving student learning that are
consistent with education reform implementation, and shall not be
considered part of basic education. The principal in each school shall
assure that the days are used to provide the necessary school- wide,
all staff professional development that is tied directly to the school
improvement plan. The school principal and the district superintendent
shall maintain documentation as to their approval of these activities.
The length of a learning improvement day shall not be less than the
length of a full day under the base contract. The superintendent of
public instruction shall ensure that school districts adhere to the
intent and purposes of this subsection.
(8) The salary allocation schedules established in this section are
for allocation purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2)
and subsection (7) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,776,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $340,505,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,267,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $501,548,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $411,882,000 is provided solely for the following:
(a) A cost of living adjustment of 3.4 percent effective September
1, 2007, and another 2.6 percent effective September 1, 2008, pursuant
to Initiative Measure No. 732.
(b) Additional salary increases as necessary to fund the base
salaries for certificated instructional staff as listed for each
district in LEAP Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act.
Allocations for these salary increases shall be provided to all 262
districts that are not grandfathered to receive salary allocations
above the statewide salary allocation schedule, and to certain
grandfathered districts to the extent necessary to ensure that salary
allocations for districts that are currently grandfathered do not fall
below the statewide salary allocation schedule. These additional
salary increases will result in a decrease in the number of
grandfathered districts from the current thirty-four to twenty-four in
the 2007-08 school year and to thirteen in the 2008-09 school year.
(c) Additional salary increases to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff as listed for each district in LEAP
Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act. These additional
salary increases shall ensure a minimum salary allocation for
certificated administrative staff of $54,175 in the 2007-08 school year
and $56,820 in the 2008-09 school year.
(d) Additional salary increases to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for classified
staff as listed for each district in LEAP Document 2, defined in
section 503(2)(b) of this act. These additional salary increases
ensure a minimum salary allocation for classified staff of $29,880 in
the 2007-08 school year and $31,038 in the 2008-09 school year.
(e) The appropriations in this subsection (1) include associated
incremental fringe benefit allocations at rates 13.84 percent for the
2007-08 school year and 15.61 percent for the 2008-09 school year for
certificated staff and 14.30 percent for the 2007-08 school year and
15.61 percent for the 2008-09 school year for classified staff.
(f) The appropriations in this section include the increased
portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant
state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Increases for
general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary
allocation schedules and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of this
act. Increases for special education result from increases in each
district's basic education allocation per student. Increases for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
502 and 503 of this act.
(g) The appropriations in this section provide cost of living and
incremental fringe benefit allocations based on formula adjustments as
follows:

School Year

2007-08 2008-09

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.96 $1.81

Highly Capable (per formula student) $10.37 $19.50

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $27.77 $52.24

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $5.91 $11.13

(h) The appropriations in this section include $866,000 for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,838,000 for fiscal year 2009 for salary increase
adjustments for substitute teachers.
(2)(a) $8,993,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $13,775,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification
from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are
teaching in a Washington public school:
(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of 10 percent of
the salary associated with the recipient's education and experience on
the statewide salary allocation schedule in section 503(4) of this act;
(ii) For national board certified teachers who teach in schools
where at least 70 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible
for the federal free and reduced price lunch program, an additional
$5,000 annual bonus to be paid in one lump sum; and
(iii) For national board certified teachers who meet the criteria
in (a)(ii) of this subsection and whose national board certificate is
in math or science and who also are teaching math or science, an
additional $5,000 annual bonus to be paid in one lump sum.
(b) Included in the amounts provided in this subsection (2) are
amounts for all relevant pension and other fringe benefit rates.
(c) For purposes of this subsection (2), "schools where at least 70
percent of the student headcount enrollment is eligible for the federal
free and reduced price lunch program" shall be defined as: (i) For the
2007-08 and the 2008-09 school years, schools in which the prior year
percentage of students eligible for the federal free and reduced price
lunch program was at least 70 percent; and (ii) in the 2008-09 school
year, any school that met the criterion in (c)(i) of this subsection in
the 2007-08 school year.
(3) $66,545,000 is provided for adjustments to insurance benefit
allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is
$682.54 per month for the 2007-08 and 2008-09 school years. The
appropriations in this section provide for a rate increase to $707.00
per month for the 2007-08 school year and $732.00 per month for the
2008-09 school year. The adjustments to health insurance benefit
allocations are at the following rates:

School Year

2007-08 2008-09

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.22 $0.45

Highly Capable (per formula student) $1.51 $3.05

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $3.95 $8.01

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $0.79 $1.58

(3) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $267,832,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $269,616,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $537,448,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) A maximum of $852,000 of this fiscal year 2008 appropriation
and a maximum of $868,000 of the fiscal year 2009 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(3) $5,000 of the fiscal year 2008 appropriation and $5,000 of the
fiscal year 2009 appropriation are provided solely for the
transportation of students enrolled in "choice" programs.
Transportation shall be limited to low-income students who are
transferring to "choice" programs solely for educational reasons.
(4) Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on
reimbursement rates of $45.07 per weighted mile in the 2007-08 school
year and $45.60 per weighted mile in the 2008-09 school year exclusive
of salary and benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act.
Allocations for transportation of students transported more than one
radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as determined by
superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based
on the number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five
living within one radius mile of their assigned school multiplied by
the per mile reimbursement rate for the school year multiplied by 1.29.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide reimbursement funding to a school district only after the
superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was
purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or
a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote
based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall base
depreciation payments for school district buses on the five-year
average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the
final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall
be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that
school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,159,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,159,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,399,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $286,717,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for state matching money for federal
child nutrition programs.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the 2009 fiscal year appropriation are
provided for summer food programs for children in low-income areas.
(3) $59,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $59,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to reimburse school districts for
school breakfasts served to students enrolled in the free or reduced
price meal program pursuant to chapter 287, Laws of 2005 (requiring
school breakfast programs in certain schools).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $544,657,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $561,820,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $444,882,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,551,359,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) Unless superseded by a new excess cost methodology recommended
by the excess cost accounting work group created pursuant to section
501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006 and adopted by the 2007
legislature, all districts shall use the excess cost methodology first
developed and implemented for the 2001-02 school year using the S-275
personnel reporting system and all related accounting requirements.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state
funds to school districts based on two categories: (a) The first
category includes (i) children birth through age two who are eligible
for the optional program for special education eligible developmentally
delayed infants and toddlers, and (ii) students eligible for the
mandatory special education program and who are age three or four, or
five and not yet enrolled in kindergarten; and (b) the second category
includes students who are eligible for the mandatory special education
program and who are age five and enrolled in kindergarten and students
age six through 21.
(5)(a) For the 2007-08 and 2008-09 school years, the superintendent
shall make allocations to each district based on the sum of:
(i) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of students
ages birth through four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten, as defined in subsection (4) of this section, multiplied
by the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(ii) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment multiplied by the funded enrollment percent
determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, multiplied by
the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district shall be
based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment" means the resident enrollment including students enrolled
through choice (RCW 28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts
(RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding students residing in another district
enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program (RCW
28A.225.250).
(b) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding the birth through age
four enrollment and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
Each district's general fund -- state funded special education
enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment
percent or 12.7 percent.
(7) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with subsection
(6)(b) of this section, and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather
than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student
shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units.
(8) To the extent necessary, $30,690,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation and $29,574,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided for safety net awards for districts with
demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts
provided in subsection (5) of this section. If safety net awards
exceed the amount appropriated in this subsection (8), the
superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds
necessary to meet this need. Safety net funds shall be awarded by the
state safety net oversight committee subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special
education exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas.
In the determination of need, the committee shall also consider
additional available revenues from federal sources. Differences in
program costs attributable to district philosophy, service delivery
choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for safety
net awards.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) The committee shall then consider extraordinary costs
associated with communities that draw a larger number of families with
children in need of special education services.
(d) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(e) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(10) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff from the office of superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor who shall be nonvoting
members of the committee; and
(c) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.
(11) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund -- state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(12) A maximum of $1,000,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for projects to provide special education
students with appropriate job and independent living skills, including
work experience where possible, to facilitate their successful
transition out of the public school system. The funds provided by this
subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.
(13) A maximum of $100,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation shall be expended to support a special education
ombudsman program within the office of superintendent of public
instruction. The purpose of the program is to provide support to
parents, guardians, educators, and students with disabilities. The
program will provide information to help families and educators
understand state laws, rules, and regulations, and access training and
support, technical information services, and mediation services. The
ombudsman program will provide data, information, and appropriate
recommendations to the office of superintendent of public instruction,
school districts, educational service districts, state need projects,
and the parent and teacher information center.
(14) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(15) A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation may be expended by the superintendent for projects
related to use of inclusion strategies by school districts for
provision of special education services.
(16) The superintendent, consistent with the new federal IDEA
reauthorization, shall continue to educate school districts on how to
implement a birth-to-three program and review the cost effectiveness
and learning benefits of early intervention.
(17) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund -- state funds allocated under
this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special
education program.
(18) $262,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for two additional full-time
equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to
provide training and support to districts applying for safety net
awards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,653,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,379,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,032,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish
financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction
and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).
(2) $1,664,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in fiscal
year 2008 and $3,349,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for regional professional
development related to mathematics and science curriculum and
instructional strategies. For each educational service district,
$183,892 is provided in fiscal year 2008 for professional development
activities related to mathematics curriculum and instruction and
$372,156 is provided in fiscal year 2009 for professional development
activities related to mathematics and science curriculum and
instruction. Each educational service district shall use this funding
solely for salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff
with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional
development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures
related to providing regional professional development support. The
office of superintendent of public instruction shall also allocate to
each educational service district additional amounts provided in
section 504 of this act for compensation increases associated with the
salary amounts and staffing provided in this subsection (2).
(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state
board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.310.340, may
receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct
school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education
rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,037,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $210,221,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $410,258,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,422,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,700,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,122,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $173,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $173,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to maintain at least one
certificated instructional staff and related support services at an
institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support
one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish
the educational program. The following types of institutions are
included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, and programs for
juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,370,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,449,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,819,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for school district programs for highly capable
students shall be distributed at a maximum rate of $373.01 per funded
student for the 2007-08 school year and $377.14 per funded student for
the 2008-09 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded students
shall be a maximum of two percent of each district's full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
(3) $170,000 of the fiscal year 2008 appropriation and $170,000 of
the fiscal year 2009 appropriation are provided for the centrum program
at Fort Worden state park.
(4) $90,000 of the fiscal year 2008 appropriation and $90,000 of
the fiscal year 2009 appropriation are provided for the Washington
destination imagination network and future problem-solving programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR MISCELLANEOUS PURPOSES UNDER THE ELEMENTARY AND
SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT AND THE NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,224,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,622,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,610,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,022,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $365,478,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $19,966,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $19,946,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $15,870,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
the Washington assessments of student learning (WASL), including
development and implementation of retake assessments for high school
students who are not successful in one or more content areas of the
WASL and development and implementation of alternative assessments or
appeals procedures to implement the certificate of academic
achievement. The superintendent of public instruction shall report
quarterly on the progress on development and implementation of
alternative assessments or appeals procedures. Within these amounts,
the superintendent of public instruction shall contract for the early
return of 10th grade student WASL results, on or around June 10th of
each year.
(2) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the second grade assessments.
(3) $1,414,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,414,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for (a) the tenth grade
mathematics assessment tool that: (i) Presents the mathematics
essential learnings in segments for assessment; (ii) is comparable in
content and rigor to the tenth grade mathematics WASL when all segments
are considered together; (iii) is reliable and valid; and (iv) can be
used to determine a student's academic performance level; (b) tenth
grade mathematics knowledge and skill learning modules to teach middle
and high school students specific skills that have been identified as
areas of difficulty for tenth grade students; and (c) making the
modules available on-line.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to support the development of state
standards in mathematics that reflect international content and
performance levels. Activities include collecting appropriate
research, consulting with mathematics standards experts, and convening
state education practitioners and community members in an inclusive
process to recommend new standards.
(5) $1,664,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,664,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the development of science
standards and curriculum as follows:
(a) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the development and
communication of state standards in science that reflect international
content and performance levels. Activities include collecting
appropriate research, consulting with mathematics standards experts,
and convening state education practitioners and community members in an
inclusive process to recommend new standards.
(b) $677,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $677,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the evaluation of science
textbooks, instructional materials, and diagnostic tools to determine
the extent to which they are aligned with the state's international
standards. Once the evaluations have been conducted, results will be
shared with science teachers, other educators, and community members
for the purposes of validating the conclusions and then selecting up to
three curricula, supporting materials, and diagnostic instruments as
those best able to assist students learn and teachers teach the content
of the international standards.
(c) $887,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $887,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the development of WASL
knowledge and skill learning modules to assist students performing at
tenth grade Level 1 and Level 2 in science.
(6) $8,936,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for allocations to districts for salaries and
benefits for two additional professional development days each school
year for fourth and fifth grade teachers. The allocations shall be
made based on the calculations of certificated instructional staff
units for fourth and fifth grade provided in section 502 of this act
and on the calculations of compensation provided in sections 503 and
504 of this act. In the 2007-08 school year, one of the additional
professional development days shall be for the development of basic
mathematics knowledge and instructional skills and one of the
additional days shall focus on improving instruction in science. In
the 2008-09 school year, the additional professional development days
shall focus on skills related to implementing the new international
mathematics and science standards and curriculum. Allocations made
pursuant to this subsection are intended to be formula-driven, and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide
updated projections of the relevant budget drivers by November 20,
2007, and by November 20, 2008.
(7) $13,058,000 of the education legacy trust fund appropriation is
provided solely for allocations to districts for salaries and benefits
for three additional professional development days for middle and high
school math teachers and three additional professional development days
for middle and high school science teachers. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules to determine
the number of math and science teachers in middle and high schools
within each district. Allocations made pursuant to this subsection are
intended to be formula-driven, and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide updated projections of the relevant
budget drivers by November 20, 2007, and by November 20, 2008. The
allocations shall be used as follows:
(a) For middle school teachers during the 2007-08 school year the
three math professional development days shall focus on development of
basic mathematics knowledge and instructional skills and the three
science professional development days shall focus on examination of
student science assessment data and identification of science knowledge
and skill areas in need of additional instructional attention. For
middle school teachers during the 2008-09 school year the three math
professional development days shall focus on skills related to
implementing the new international mathematics standards and the three
science professional development days shall focus on skills related to
implementing the new international science standards.
(b) For high school teachers during the 2007-08 school year the
three math professional development days shall focus on skills related
to implementing state math learning modules, the segmented math
class/assessment program, the collection of evidence alternative
assessment, and basic mathematics knowledge and instructional skills,
and the three science professional development days shall focus on
skills related to examination of student science assessment data and
identification of science knowledge and skill areas in need of
additional instructional attention. For high school teachers during
the 2008-09 school year the three math professional development days
shall focus on skills related to implementing the new international
mathematics standards and the three science professional development
days shall focus on skills related to implementing the new
international science standards.
(8) $17,459,000 of the education legacy trust fund appropriation is
provided solely for allocations to districts for specialized
professional development in math for one math teacher and one science
teacher in each middle school and one math teacher and one science
teacher in each high school. The allocations shall be based on five
additional professional development days per teacher and an additional
allocation per teacher of $1,500 for training costs. In order to
generate an allocation under this subsection, a teacher must
participate in specialized professional development that leads to the
implementation of mathematics and science courses that add new rigor to
the math and science course offerings in the school. Allocations made
pursuant to this subsection are intended to be formula-driven, and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide
updated projections of the relevant budget drivers by November 20,
2007, and by November 20, 2008.
(9) $5,369,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for a math and science instructional coaches
demonstration project. Funding shall be used to provide grants to
schools and districts to provide salaries, benefits, and professional
development activities to twenty-five instructional coaches in middle
and high school math in the 2007-08 and 2008-09 school years and
twenty-five instructional coaches in middle and high school science in
the 2008-09 school years; and up to $300,000 may be used by the office
of the superintendent of public instruction to administer and
coordinate the program. Each instructional coach will receive five
days of training at a coaching institute prior to being assigned to
serve two schools each. These coaches will attend meetings during the
year to further their training and assist with coordinating statewide
trainings on math and science. The Washington institute for public
policy will evaluate the effectiveness of the demonstration projects as
provided in section 608(3) of this act.
(10) $143,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $139,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for (a) staff at the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts
to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering
programs in schools and districts across the state; and (b) grants of
$2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year
professional development training for implementing integrated math,
science, technology, and engineering program in their schools.
(11) $8,329,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $8,329,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for in-service training and
educational programs conducted by the Pacific science center and for
the Washington state leadership assistance for science education reform
(LASER) regional partnership coordinated at the Pacific science center.
(12) $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to support state college readiness
assessment fees for eleventh grade students. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall allocate funds for this
purpose to school districts based on the number of eleventh grade
students who complete the college readiness exam. School districts
shall use these funds to reimburse institutions of higher education for
the assessments students take and report to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction on the number of assessments
provided.
(13) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction solely to contract with the health workforce
institute to create high school health care pathway programs. Students
leaving the programs will be prepared to enter the workforce or enroll
in related postsecondary education and training programs. The health
workforce institute will partner with school districts, colleges and
universities, employers, industry and labor associations, and
philanthropic organizations to launch programs at four geographically
dispersed high schools in Washington. Funds provided under this
section are for first-year, start-up expenses only. Each program will
require matching funds and services from program partners, and a plan
for sustaining programs after the first year.
(14) $12,863,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $28,688,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants for
voluntary all-day kindergarten for students eligible for the federal
free and reduced price lunch program at the highest poverty schools.
To qualify, recipient schools must review the quality of their programs
and make appropriate changes, use a kindergarten assessment tool, and
demonstrate strong connections and communication with early learning
providers and parents. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide allocations to districts for recipient
schools in accordance with the funding formulas provided in section 502
of this act. Each kindergarten student who is eligible for the federal
free and reduced price lunch program and who is enrolled in a recipient
school shall count as one-half of one full-time equivalent student for
the purpose of making allocations under this subsection. Although the
allocations are formula-driven, the office of the superintendent shall
consider the funding provided in this subsection as a fixed amount, and
shall limit the number of recipient schools so as to stay within the
amounts appropriated each fiscal year in this subsection. The funding
provided in this subsection is estimated to provide all-day
kindergarten programs for students eligible for free and reduced price
lunch in the top 10 percent highest poverty schools in the 2007-08
school year and in the top 20 percent highest poverty schools in the
2008-09 school year.
(15) $9,455,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely for grants for ten demonstration projects for
kindergarten through grade three. The purpose of the grants is to
implement best practices in developmental learning in kindergarten
through third grade pursuant to Z-. . . ./07.
(16) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the development of a
leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent
organization to design, field test, and implement a state-of-the-art
education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the
state. Initial development of the content of the academy activities
shall be supported by private funds. Semiannually the independent
organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and
others to support the development and implementation of this program.
Leadership academy partners, with varying roles, shall include the
state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the
superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator
standards board, and others as the independent organization shall
identify.
(17) $1,345,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to school districts to
implement emerging best practices activities in support of classroom
teachers' instruction of students, with a first language other than
English, who struggle with acquiring academic English skills. Best
practices shall focus on professional development for classroom
teachers and support of instruction for English language learners in
regular classrooms. School districts qualifying for these grants shall
serve a student population that reflects many different first languages
among their students. The Washington institute for public policy shall
evaluate the effectiveness of the practices supported by the grants as
provided in section 608(4) of this act. Recipients of these grants
shall cooperate with the institute for public policy in the collection
of program data.
(18) $250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for reimbursement of diagnostic
assessments pursuant to RCW 28A.655.200.
(19) $548,000 of the fiscal year 2008 general fund -- state
appropriation and $548,000 of the fiscal year 2009 general fund -- state
appropriation are provided solely for training of paraprofessional
classroom assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom
assistants as provided in RCW 28A.415.310.
(20) $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for mentor teacher assistance,
including state support activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and
28A.415.260, and for a mentor academy. Up to $200,000 of the amount in
this subsection may be used each fiscal year to operate a mentor
academy to help districts provide effective training for peer mentors.
Funds for the teacher assistance program shall be allocated to school
districts based on the number of first year beginning teachers.
(21) $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.
(22) $98,761,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high quality teachers
and principals under Title II of the no child left behind act.
(23)(a) $488,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $488,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a principal support
program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
contract with an independent organization to administer the program.
The program shall include: (i) Development of an individualized
professional growth plan for a new principal or principal candidate;
and (ii) participation of a mentor principal who works over a period of
between one and three years with the new principal or principal
candidate to help him or her build the skills identified as critical to
the success of the professional growth plan. Within the amounts
provided, $25,000 per year shall be used to support additional
participation of secondary principals.
(b) $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for focused assistance. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct
educational audits of low-performing schools and enter into performance
agreements between school districts and the office to implement the
recommendations of the audit and the community. Each educational audit
shall include recommendations for best practices and ways to address
identified needs and shall be presented to the community in a public
meeting to seek input on ways to implement the audit and its
recommendations.
(24) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a high school and school
district improvement program modeled after the office of the
superintendent of public instruction's existing focused assistance
program in subsection (23)(b) of this section. The state funding for
this improvement program will match an equal amount committed by a
nonprofit foundation in furtherance of a jointly funded program.
(25) A maximum of $375,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and a maximum of $500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided for summer
accountability institutes offered by the superintendent of public
instruction. The institutes shall provide school district staff with
training in the analysis of student assessment data, information
regarding successful district and school teaching models, research on
curriculum and instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve
instruction in reading, mathematics, language arts, social studies,
including civics, and guidance and counseling. The superintendent of
public instruction shall offer at least one institute specifically for
improving instruction in mathematics in fiscal years 2008 and 2009 and
at least one institute specifically for improving instruction in
science in fiscal year 2009.
(26) $515,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $515,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for the evaluation of mathematics
textbooks, other instructional materials, and diagnostic tools to
determine the extent to which they are aligned with the state
standards. Once the evaluations have been conducted, results will be
shared with math teachers, other educators, and community members for
the purposes of validating the conclusions and then selecting up to
three curricula, supporting materials, and diagnostic instruments as
those best able to assist students to learn and teachers to teach the
content of international standards. In addition, the office of the
superintendent shall continue to provide support and information on
essential components of comprehensive, school-based reading programs.
(27) $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the mathematics helping corps
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical
mathematics assistance statewide, the superintendent of public
instruction shall employ mathematics school improvement specialists to
provide assistance to schools and districts. The specialists shall be
hired by and work under the direction of a statewide school improvement
coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall not be
permanent employees of the superintendent of public instruction.
(b) The school improvement specialists shall provide the following:
(i) Assistance to schools to disaggregate student performance data
and develop improvement plans based on those data;
(ii) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their
performance on the Washington assessment of student learning and other
assessments emphasizing the performance on the mathematics assessments;
(iii) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the
essential academic learning requirements emphasizing the academic
learning requirements for mathematics, the Washington assessment of
student learning, and meets the needs of diverse learners;
(iv) Assistance in the identification and implementation of
research-based instructional practices in mathematics;
(v) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional
strategies and classroom-based assessment for mathematics;
(vi) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community
involvement programs emphasizing mathematics; and
(vii) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to
improve student mathematics learning.
(28) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the improvement of reading
achievement and implementation of research-based reading models. The
superintendent shall evaluate reading curriculum programs and other
instructional materials to determine the extent to which they are
aligned with state standards. A report of the analyses shall be made
available to school districts. The superintendent shall report to
districts the assessments that are available to screen and diagnose
reading difficulties, and shall provide training on how to implement a
reading assessment system. Resources may also be used to disseminate
grade level expectations and develop professional development modules
and web-based materials.
(29) $30,401,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for the reading first program under Title I of the no child
left behind act.
(a) $500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to award five grants to parent,
community, and school district partnership programs that will meet the
unique needs of different groups of students in closing the achievement
gap. The legislature intends that the pilot programs will help
students meet state learning standards, achieve the skills and
knowledge necessary for college or the workplace, reduce the
achievement gap, prevent dropouts, and improve graduation rates.
(b) The pilot programs shall be designed in such a way as to be
supplemental to educational services provided in the district and shall
utilize a community partnership based approach to helping students and
their parents.
(c) The grant recipients shall work in collaboration with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop
measurable goals and evaluation methodologies for the pilot programs.
$25,000 of this appropriation may be used by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to hold a statewide meeting to
disseminate successful strategies developed by the grantees.
(d) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
issue a report to the legislature in the 2009 session on the progress
of each of the pilot programs.
(30) $400,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the development of mathematics
support activities provided by community organizations in after school
programs. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
administer grants to community organizations that partner with school
districts to provide these activities and develop a mechanism to report
program and student success.
(31) $5,222,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $5,285,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for: (a) The meals for kids
program under RCW 28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155; (b) to eliminate the
breakfast co-pay for students eligible for reduced price lunch; and (c)
for additional assistance for school districts initiating a summer food
service program.
(32) $850,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $850,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps.
The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are implementing
comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more
schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs. Grants
provided under this section may be used by school districts for
expenditures from September 2007 through August 31, 2009.
(33) $3,594,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,594,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants to school districts to
provide a continuum of care for children and families to help children
become ready to learn. Grant proposals from school districts shall
contain local plans designed collaboratively with community service
providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area in which
the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible.
Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.
(34) $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for improving technology
infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district technology
development, promoting standards for school district technology,
promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.
The superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate a process to
facilitate the evaluation and provision of online curriculum courses to
school districts which includes the following: Creation of a general
listing of the types of available online curriculum courses; a survey
conducted by each regional educational technology support center of
school districts in its region regarding the types of online curriculum
courses desired by school districts; a process to evaluate and
recommend to school districts the best online courses in terms of
curriculum, student performance, and cost; and assistance to school
districts in procuring and providing the courses to students.
(35) $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for the development and posting of web-based instructional tools, assessment data, and other information that
assists schools and teachers implementing higher academic standards.
(36) $333,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $333,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the operation of the center
for the improvement of student learning pursuant to RCW 28A.300.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,413,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,960,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,256,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $177,629,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $826.43 per
eligible bilingual student in the 2007-08 school year and $837.50 in
the 2008-09 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
provided in section 504 of this act.
(3) The superintendent may withhold up to 1.5 percent of the school
year allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section,
and adjust the per eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this
section accordingly, solely for the central provision of assessments as
provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2).
(4) $70,000 of the amounts appropriated in this section are
provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual
program students.
(5) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for migrant education under Title I Part C and English
language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III
of the elementary and secondary education act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,092,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,052,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $368,268,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,716,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $542,128,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund -- state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b) Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall
be allocated at maximum rates of $200.39 per funded student for the
2007-08 school year and $203.24 per funded student for the 2008-09
school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided under
section 504 of this act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the following as appropriate:
(i) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12
for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch in the prior school year; and
(ii) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch exceeded forty percent, subtract forty percent from
the district's percentage and multiply the result by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the prior school
year.
(d) In addition to amounts allocated in (b) and (c) of this
subsection, an additional amount shall be allocated to a school
district for each school year in which the district's allocation is
less than the amount the district received for the general fund -- state
learning assistance program allocation in the 2004-05 school year. The
amount of the allocation in this section shall be sufficient to
maintain the 2004-05 school year allocation.
(2) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(3) Small school districts are encouraged to make the most
efficient use of the funding provided by using regional educational
service district cooperatives to hire staff, provide professional
development activities, and implement reading and mathematics programs
consistent with research-based guidelines provided by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund -- state or education legacy trust
funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be
expended for the learning assistance program.
(5) School districts are encouraged to coordinate the use of these
funds with other federal, state, and local sources to serve students
who are below grade level and to make efficient use of resources in
meeting the needs of students with the greatest academic deficits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- PROMOTING ACADEMIC SUCCESS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,366,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,173,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,539,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The amounts appropriated in this section are provided solely
for remediation for students who have not met standard in one or more
content areas of the Washington assessment of student learning in the
spring of their tenth grade year or on a subsequent retake. The funds
may be used for extended learning activities, including summer school,
before and after school, Saturday classes, skill seminars, assessment
preparation, and in-school or out- of-school tutoring. Extended
learning activities may occur on the school campus, via the internet,
or at other locations and times that meet student needs. Funds
allocated under this section shall not be considered basic education
funding. Amounts allocated under this section shall fund new extended
learning opportunities, and shall not supplant funding for existing
programs and services.
(2) School district allocations for promoting academic success
programs shall be calculated as follows:
(a) Allocations shall be made to districts only for students
actually served in a promoting academic success program.
(b) A portion of the district's annual student units shall be the
number of content area assessments (reading, writing, and mathematics)
on which eleventh and twelfth grade students were more than one
standard error of measurement from meeting standard on the WASL in
their most recent attempt to pass the WASL.
(c) The other portion of the district's annual student units shall
be the number of content area assessments (reading, writing, and
mathematics) on which eleventh and twelfth grade students were less
than one standard error of measurement from meeting standard but did
not meet standard on the WASL in their most recent attempt to pass the
WASL.
(d) Districts with at least one but less than 20 student units
combining the student units generated from (b) and (c) of this
subsection shall be counted as having 20 student units for the purposes
of the allocations in (e) and (f)(i) of this subsection.
(e) Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries and
benefits shall be determined using formula-generated staff units
calculated pursuant to this subsection. Ninety-four hours of
certificated instructional staff units are allocated per 13.0 student
units as calculated under (a) of this subsection and thirty-four hours
of certificated instructional staff units are allocated per 13.0
student units as calculated under (b) of this subsection. Allocations
for salaries and benefits for the staff units calculated under this
subsection shall be calculated in the same manner as provided under
section 503 of this act. Salary and benefit increase funding for staff
units generated under this section is included in section 504 of this
act.
(f) The following additional allocations are provided per student
unit, as calculated in (a) and (b) of this subsection:
(i) $12.86 in school year 2007-08 and $13.11 in school year 2008-09
for maintenance, operations, and transportation;
(ii) $12.35 in school year 2007-08 and $12.58 in school year 2008-09 for pre- and post-remediation assessments;
(iii) $17.49 in school year 2007-08 and $17.83 in school year 2008-09 per reading remediation student unit;
(iv) $8.23 in school year 2007-08 and $8.39 in school year 2008-09
per mathematics remediation student unit; and
(v) $8.23 in school year 2007-08 and $8.39 in school year 2008-09
per writing remediation student unit.
(f) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute
school year allocations according to the monthly apportionment schedule
defined in RCW 28A.510.250.
(3) By November 15th of each year, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and to the office of financial management on the use of
these funds in the prior school year, including the types of assistance
selected by students, the number of students receiving each type of
assistance, and the impact on WASL test scores.
(4) School districts may carry over from one year to the next up to
20 percent of funds allocated under this program; however, carryover
funds shall be expended for promoting academic success programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM
Student Achievement Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $423,434,000
Student Achievement Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $445,065,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $868,499,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for school district student achievement programs shall
be allocated at a maximum rate of $450.00 per FTE student for the 2007-08 school year and $458.55 per FTE student for the 2008-09 school year.
For the purposes of this section, FTE student refers to the annual
average full-time equivalent enrollment of the school district in
grades kindergarten through twelve for the prior school year, as
reported to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by
August 31st of the previous school year.
(2) The appropriation is allocated for the following uses as
specified in RCW 28A.505.210:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school; or
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection (2).
(3) In the 2007-08 school year and thereafter, districts shall
prioritize the use of the increase in per student allocations from
$375.00 in the 2006-07 school year to $450.00 in the 2007-08 school
year for class size reductions in kindergarten through third grade.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute the
school year allocation according to the monthly apportionment schedule
defined in RCW 28A.510.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 518 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION. (1) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act, except as
expressly provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2008, unless
specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the director
of financial management, the superintendent of public instruction may
transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2008 among
the following programs to meet the apportionment schedule for a
specified formula in another of these programs: General apportionment;
employee compensation adjustments; pupil transportation; special
education programs; institutional education programs; transitional
bilingual programs; and learning assistance programs.
(3) The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving
any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 519 K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR
ADJUSTMENTS. State general fund and state student achievement fund
appropriations provided to the superintendent of public instruction for
state entitlement programs in the public schools in this part V of this
act may be expended as needed by the superintendent for adjustments to
apportionment for prior fiscal periods. Recoveries of state general
fund moneys from school districts and educational service districts for
a prior fiscal period shall be made as reductions in apportionment
payments for the current fiscal period and shall be shown as prior year
adjustments on apportionment reports for the current period. Such
recoveries shall not be treated as revenues to the state, but as a
reduction in the amount expended against the appropriation for the
current fiscal period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 520 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION. Appropriations made in this act to the office of
superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 The appropriations in sections 603 through
609 of this act are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(1) "Institutions" means the institutions of higher education
receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act.
(2)(a) The salary increases provided or referenced in this
subsection and described in sections 603, 914, and 922 through 937 of
this act shall be the only allowable salary increases provided at
institutions of higher education, excluding increases associated with
normally occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and
professional staff retention, and excluding increases associated with
employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 28B.16.015 and 28B.50.874(1).
(b) For employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.16.015 and 28B.50.874(1), salary
increases will be in accordance with the applicable collective
bargaining agreement. However, an increase shall not be provided to
any classified employee whose salary is above the approved salary range
maximum for the class to which the employee's position is allocated.
(c) Each institution of higher education receiving appropriations
for salary increases under sections 604 through 609 of this act may
provide additional salary increases from other sources to instructional
and research faculty, exempt professional staff, teaching and research
assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and
all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW
28B.16.015. Any additional salary increase granted under the authority
of this subsection (2)(c) shall not be included in an institution's
salary base for future state funding. It is the intent of the
legislature that general fund -- state support for an institution shall
not increase during the current or any future biennium as a result of
any salary increases authorized under this subsection (2)(c).
(d) The legislature, the office of financial management, and other
state agencies need consistent and accurate personnel data from
institutions of higher education for policy planning purposes.
Institutions of higher education shall report personnel data to the
department of personnel for inclusion in the department's data
warehouse. Uniform reporting procedures shall be established by the
department of personnel for use by the reporting institutions,
including provisions for common job classifications and common
definitions of full-time equivalent staff. Annual contract amounts,
number of contract months, and funding sources shall be consistently
reported for employees under contract.
(3) The tuition fees, as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW, charged to
full-time students at the state's institutions of higher education for
the 2007-08 and 2008-09 academic years, other than the summer term,
shall be adjusted by the governing boards of the state universities,
regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state board
for community and technical colleges. Tuition fees may be increased in
excess of the fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.
For the 2007-08 academic year, the governing boards of the research
universities may implement an increase no greater than seven percent
over tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate students
for the 2006-07 academic year. The regional universities and The
Evergreen State College may implement an increase no greater than five
percent over tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate
students for the 2006-07 academic year. The state board for community
and technical colleges may not implement an increase.
For the 2008-09 academic year, the governing boards of the research
universities may implement an increase no greater than seven percent
over tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate students
for the 2007-08 academic year. The regional universities and The
Evergreen State College may implement an increase no greater than five
percent over tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate
students for the 2007-08 academic year. The state board for community
and technical colleges may not implement an increase.
(4) For the 2007-09 biennium, the governing boards and the state
board may adjust full-time operating fees for factors that may include
time of day and day of week, as well as delivery method and campus, to
encourage full use of the state's educational facilities and resources.
(5) Technical colleges may increase their building fee in excess of
the fiscal growth factor until parity is reached with the community
colleges.
(6) In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW
28B.15.910, the governing boards and the state board may waive all or
a portion of operating fees for any student. State general fund
appropriations shall not be provided to replace tuition and fee revenue
foregone as a result of waivers granted under this subsection.
(7) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, institutions of higher education
receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act are
authorized to increase summer term tuition in excess of the fiscal
growth factor during the 2007-09 biennium. Tuition levels increased
pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed the per credit hour rate
calculated from the academic year tuition levels adopted under this
act.
(8) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, community and technical colleges
are authorized to increase services and activities fee charges in
excess of the fiscal growth factor during the 2007-09 biennium. The
services and activities fee charges increased pursuant to this
subsection shall not exceed the maximum level authorized by the state
board for community and technical colleges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 (1) The appropriations in sections 602
through 608 of this act provide state general fund support for full-time equivalent student enrollments at each institution of higher
education. Listed below are the annual full-time equivalent student
enrollments by institutions assumed in this act.

2007-08
Annual
Average 2008-09
Annual
Average

University of Washington

Main campus 33,722 34,077

Bothell branch 1,760 1,980

Tacoma branch 2,007 2,247

Washington State University

Main campus 19,127 19,272

Tri-Cities branch 755 805

Vancouver branch 1,858 2,083

Central Washington University 9,022 9,072

Eastern Washington University 9,046 9,304

The Evergreen State College 4,168 4,243

Western Washington University 11,897 12,165

State Board for Community and Technical Colleges 135,302 137,632

(2) For the state universities, the number of full-time equivalent
student enrollments enumerated in this section for the branch campuses
are the minimum required enrollment levels for those campuses. At the
start of an academic year, the governing board of a state university
may transfer full-time equivalent student enrollments among campuses.
Intent notice shall be provided to the office of financial management
and reassignment of funded enrollment is contingent upon satisfying
data needs of the forecast division who is responsible to track and
monitor state-supported college enrollment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $645,750,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $631,114,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,414,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,429,078,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $17,100,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand general enrollments by 1,000
student FTEs in academic year 2008 and an additional 1,000 student FTEs
in academic year 2009.
(2) $16,995,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand high-demand enrollments by
600 student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and 650 student FTEs in fiscal
year 2009. The programs expanded shall include, but are not limited
to, mathematics, health sciences, and early childhood education. Of
the total enrollments provided, 100 student FTEs in fiscal year 2008
and 150 student FTEs in fiscal year 2009 shall be for early childhood
education programs with a focus on early math and science awareness.
The state board shall provide data to the office of financial
management that is required to track changes in enrollments,
graduations, and the employment of college graduates related to state
investments in high-demand enrollment programs. Data may be provided
through the public centralized higher education enrollment system or
through an alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the
office of financial management.
(3) $346,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to increase enrollments at the North
Snohomish, Island and Skagit county (NSIS) university center, located
at Everett Community College, by 25 student FTEs in fiscal year 2008.
(4) $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely as special funds for training and
related support services, including financial aid, as specified in
chapter 226, Laws of 1993 (employment and training for unemployed
workers). Funding is provided to support up to 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in each fiscal year.
(5) $5,775,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for basic skills education enrollments
at community and technical colleges. Budgeted enrollment levels shall
increase by 250 student FTEs per year.
(6) $7,500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to increase salaries and related
benefits for part-time faculty. It is intended that part-time faculty
salaries will increase relative to full-time faculty salaries after all
salary increases are collectively bargained.
(7) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided to create the regional opportunity grants
program. Grants covering community and technical college tuition and
fees for up to 45 credits and books or other materials will be awarded
to up to 1,600 adults. Program participants will earn credentials or
certificates in industry-defined occupations with a need for skilled
employees.
(8) $1,925,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase enrollment levels in
the integrated basic education, skills, and language program (I-BEST)
by 250 student FTEs per year.
(9) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the transitions math project.
This phase of work shall include the establishment of a single math
placement test to be used at colleges and universities statewide.
(10) $1,925,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase enrollment in
apprenticeship training programs by 200 student FTEs in each fiscal
year.
(11) $4,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the community and technical college system by 1,700
students each year. TRIO eligible students include low-income, first-generation, and college students with disabilities. The state board
for community and technical colleges shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 65% for TRIO students and other low-income and
first-generation students served through this appropriation.
(12)(a) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures and targets in 2006. By July 31, 2007,
the state board for community and technical colleges and the higher
education coordinating board shall revisit these targets based on
per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act. In addition,
the board shall compile comparable data from peer institutions in the
eight "global challenge states" identified in the Washington learns
study.
(b) The targets agreed to by the state board and the higher
education coordinating board are enumerated as follows:
(i) Increase the percentage and number of academic students who are
eligible to transfer to baccalaureate institutions to 18,947;
(ii) Increase the percentage and number of students prepared for
work to 25,234; and
(iii) Increase the percentage and number of basic skills students
who demonstrate substantive skill gain by 23,766.
The state board for community and technical colleges shall report
their progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the provisions of
this section to the higher education coordinating board prior to
October 1, 2008.
(13) $6,450,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $13,287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided to backfill revenue that the state board
for community and technical colleges could have raised through tuition
increases on resident students of 3% in each fiscal year. This amount
may be bargained for faculty increments or other faculty pay items.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $375,870,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $391,743,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,950,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,619,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,447,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $824,929,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $14,562,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand general enrollments by 565
student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and an additional 565 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2009. Of these, 105 FTEs in 2008 and 105 FTEs in 2009 must
be graduate student FTEs.
(2) $9,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand high-demand undergraduate
enrollments by 250 student FTEs in each fiscal year. The programs
expanded shall include mathematics, engineering, and the physical
sciences. The university shall provide data to the office of financial
management that is required to track changes in enrollments,
graduations, and the employment of college graduates related to state
investments in high-demand enrollment programs. Data may be provided
through the public centralized higher education enrollment system or
through an alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the
office of financial management.
(3) $2,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support for the
department of global health.
(4) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the University of Washington
office of technology transfer's gap fund. The funds shall be used to
assist bringing research discoveries to market sooner, and to boost the
licensing revenue of the university.
(5) $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
Washington state academy of sciences, authorized by chapter 70.220 RCW.
(6) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
William D. Ruckelshaus center.
(7) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at the
University of Washington by 250 students each year. TRIO students
include low-income, first-generation, and college students with
disabilities. The student support services program shall report
annually to the office of financial management and the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the retention and
completion rates of students served through this appropriation.
Retention rates shall continue to exceed 85% for TRIO students in this
program.
(8) $84,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $84,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to establish the state
climatologist position.
(9) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to
identify and carry out, or otherwise appropriately support, a process
to identify issues that have led to conflict around land use
requirements and property rights, and explore practical and effective
ways to resolve or reduce that conflict. A report with conclusions and
recommendations shall be submitted to the governor and the chairs of
the appropriate committees of the legislature by no later than October
31, 2007.
(10) $4,506,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand health sciences capacity at
the University of Washington. Consistent with the medical and dental
school extension program appropriations at Washington State University
and Eastern Washington University, funding is provided to expand
classes at the University of Washington. Medical and dental students
shall take the first year of courses for this program at the Riverpoint
campus in Spokane and the second year of courses at the University of
Washington in Seattle.
(11) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures and targets in 2006. By July 31, 2007,
the university and the board shall revisit these targets based on
per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act. In addition,
the board shall compile comparable data from peer institutions in the
eight "global challenge states" identified in the Washington Learns
study.
The targets agreed to by the board and the University of Washington
are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the combined number of baccalaureate degrees conferred
per year at all campuses to 8,850;
(b) Increase the combined number of high-demand baccalaureate
degrees conferred at all campuses per year to 1,380;
(c) Increase the combined number of advanced degrees conferred per
year at all campuses to 3,610;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 74.7%;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 76.0%;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 93.0%;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 92% at the
Seattle campus and 92.5% at the Bothell and Tacoma campuses, measured
by the percent of admitted students who graduate within 125% of the
credits required for a degree; and
(h) Maintain current levels of access for low-income students as
measured by the percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant
recipients.
The University of Washington shall report their progress and
ongoing efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the
higher education coordinating board prior to October 1, 2008.
(12) $165,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $165,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan, Puget Sound partnership early
implementation items, and the agency action items UW-01 and UW-02. The
department shall consult and sign performance agreements with the
leadership council of the Puget Sound partnership created by Z-0369/07
regarding these items.
(13) $1,672,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,672,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operations and maintenance of
the University of Washington Research and Technology building.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $228,421,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,569,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,420,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $502,860,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,141,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand general enrollments by 175
student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and an additional 250 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2009.
(2) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for research and commercialization
in bio-products and bio-fuels. Of this amount, $2,000,000 shall be
targeted at the development of new crops to be used in the bio-products
facility at WSU-Tri-Cities. The remainder shall be used for research
into new bio-products created from agricultural waste to be conducted
in the Tri-Cities in a joint program between Washington State
University and Pacific Northwest national laboratories.
(3) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at Washington
State University by 250 students each year. TRIO students include
low-income, first-generation, and college students with disabilities.
The student support services program shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 85% for TRIO students in this program.
(4) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington State
University office of technology transfer's Cougar gap fund. The funds
shall be used to assist bringing research discoveries to market sooner,
and to boost the licensing revenue of the university.
(5) $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
Washington state academy of sciences, under chapter 70.220 RCW.
(6) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
William D. Ruckelshaus center.
(7) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus center to
identify and carry out, or otherwise appropriately support, a process
to identify issues that have led to conflict around land use
requirements and property rights, and explore practical and effective
ways to resolve or reduce that conflict. A report with conclusions and
recommendations shall be submitted to the governor and the chairs of
the appropriate committees of the legislature by no later than October
31, 2007.
(8) $9,551,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand health sciences offerings in
Spokane. Washington State University shall enroll 30 student FTEs in
nursing programs in fiscal year 2008 and 35 additional FTEs in nursing
programs in fiscal year 2009. In addition, WSU shall enroll 20 student
FTEs in a University of Washington medical school extension program at
the Riverpoint campus of WSU in Spokane. Students shall take the first
year of courses for this program at the Riverpoint campus in Spokane,
and shall do their internships and residency in the inland northwest
(9) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures and targets in 2006. By July 31, 2007,
the university and the board shall revisit these targets based on
per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act. In addition,
the board shall compile comparable data from peer institutions in the
eight "global challenge states" identified in the Washington learns
study.
The targets agreed to by the board and the Washington State
University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the combined number of baccalaureate degrees conferred
per year at all campuses to 4,170;
(b) Increase the combined number of high-demand baccalaureate
degrees conferred at all campuses per year to 630;
(c) Increase the combined number of advanced degrees conferred per
year at all campuses to 1,090;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 63.2%;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 65.4%;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 84.8%;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 92%,
measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate within 125%
of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) Maintain current levels of access for low-income students as
measured by the percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant
recipients.
The Washington State University shall report their progress and
ongoing efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the
higher education coordinating board prior to October 1, 2008.
(10) $210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan, Puget Sound partnership early
implementation items, and agency action item WSU-01. The department
shall consult and sign performance agreements with the leadership
council of the Puget Sound partnership created by Z-0369/07 regarding
these items.
(11) $2,400,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand high-demand undergraduate
enrollments by 115 student FTEs in each fiscal year. The programs
expanded shall include mathematics, engineering, and the physical
sciences. Fifty student FTEs in each year will be shifted from general
enrollments to high-demand, high-cost fields, and thus do not affect
the enrollment levels listed in section 602 of this act. The
university shall provide data to the office of financial management
that is required to track changes in enrollments, graduations, and the
employment of college graduates related to state investments in high
demand enrollment programs. Data may be provided through the public
centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,972,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,751,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,793,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,758,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $118,274,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,250,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand general enrollments by 50
student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and an additional 200 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2009. Of these, 50 FTEs in 2009 must be graduate student
FTEs.
(2) $1,169,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand high-demand undergraduate
enrollments by 50 student FTEs in each fiscal year. The programs
expanded shall include, but are not limited to, mathematics,
engineering, and health sciences. The university shall provide data to
the office of financial management that is required to track changes in
enrollments, graduations, and the employment of college graduates
related to state investments in high-demand enrollment programs. Data
may be provided through the public centralized higher education
enrollment system or through an alternative means agreed to by the
institutions and the office of financial management.
(3) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at Eastern
Washington University by 250 students each year. TRIO students include
low-income, first-generation, and college students with disabilities.
The student support services program shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 85% for TRIO students in this program.
(4) $1,021,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the RIDE program. The program
shall enroll eight student FTEs in the University of Washington School
of Dentistry in fiscal year 2009. Students shall take the first year
of courses for this program at the Riverpoint campus in Spokane, and
their second and third years at the University of Washington School of
Dentistry.
(5) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures and targets in 2006. By July 31, 2007,
the university and the board shall revisit these targets based on
per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act. In addition,
the board shall compile comparable data from peer institutions in the
eight "global challenge states" identified in the Washington learns
study.
The targets agreed to by the board and the Eastern Washington
University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 2035;
(b) Increase the number of high-demand baccalaureate degrees
conferred per year to 405;
(c) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 550;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 50.0%;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 61.0%;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 76.0%;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 81.0%,
measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate within 125%
of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) Maintain current levels of access for low-income students as
measured by the percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant
recipients.
Eastern Washington University shall report their progress and
ongoing efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the
higher education coordinating board prior to October 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,613,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,194,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,770,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,330,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $118,907,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $750,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand general graduate enrollment
by 50 student FTEs in fiscal year 2009.
(2) $4,892,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand high-demand undergraduate
enrollments by 330 student FTEs in fiscal year 2008. The programs
expanded shall include, but are not limited to, mathematics, bilingual
education, information technology, and business. The university shall
provide data to the office of financial management that is required to
track changes in enrollments, graduations, and the employment of
college graduates related to state investments in high-demand
enrollment programs. Data may be provided through the public
centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(3) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at Central
Washington University by 250 students each year. TRIO students include
low-income, first-generation, and college students with disabilities.
The student support services program shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 85% for TRIO students in this program.
(4) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures and targets in 2006. By July 31, 2007,
the university and the board shall revisit these targets based on
per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act. In addition,
the board shall compile comparable data from peer institutions in the
eight "global challenge states" identified in the Washington learns
study.
The targets agreed to by the board and the Central Washington
University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 2,050;
(b) Increase the number of high-demand baccalaureate degrees
conferred per year to 49;
(c) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 196;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 51.1%;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 72.3%;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 78.2%;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 86.6%,
measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate within 125%
of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) Maintain current levels of access for low-income students as
measured by the percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant
recipients.
Central Washington University shall report their progress and
ongoing efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the
higher education coordinating board prior to October 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,076,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,837,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,185,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,098,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $863,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand general enrollments by 25
student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and an additional 75 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2009.
(2) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at The
Evergreen State College by 250 students each year. TRIO students
include low-income, first-generation, and college students with
disabilities. The student support services program shall report
annually to the office of financial management and the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the retention and
completion rates of students served through this appropriation.
Retention rates shall continue to exceed 85% for TRIO students in this
program.
(3) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to conduct a study of the effectiveness of the K-3
demonstration projects and math instructional coaches demonstration
projects.
(4) $440,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $440,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to conduct a field study regarding teacher
preparation, training, and coordinated instructional support strategies
related to effective classroom teacher practices that help students,
with a first language other than English, acquire academic English
skills. Participating schools and school districts shall be among
those currently implementing emerging best practices in these areas.
This study will result in recommendations regarding topics for
inclusion in teacher preparation programs, content of effective
professional development, and practices for supporting instruction in
non-English language learning classes.
(5) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the labor center at The
Evergreen State College.
(6) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures and targets in 2006. By July 31, 2007,
the college and the board shall revisit these targets based on
per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act. In addition,
the board shall compile comparable data from peer institutions in the
eight "global challenge states" identified in the Washington learns
study.
The targets agreed to by the board and The Evergreen State College
are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 1182;
(b) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 92;
(c) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 57.0%;
(d) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 72.8%;
(e) Improve the freshman retention rate to 73.9%;
(f) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 97.0%,
measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate within 125%
of the credits required for a degree; and
(g) Maintain current levels of access for low-income students as
measured by the percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant
recipients.
The Evergreen State College shall report their progress and ongoing
efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the higher
education coordinating board prior to October 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,896,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,152,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,364,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,412,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,163,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand high-demand enrollment by 48
student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and an additional 148 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2009. Programs expanded include cell and molecular
biology, teaching of English-as-a-second-language, early childhood
education, and human services. The university shall provide data to
the office of financial management that is required to track changes in
enrollments, graduations, and the employment of college graduates
related to state investments in high-demand enrollment programs. Data
may be provided through the public centralized higher education
enrollment system or through an alternative means agreed to by the
institutions and the office of financial management.
(2) $3,067,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand general enrollments by 120
student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and an additional 120 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2009. Of these, 24 FTEs in each fiscal year must be
graduate student FTEs.
(3) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of low-income and
first-generation students served in the student outreach services
program at Western Washington University by 250 students each year.
The student outreach services program shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 80% for students served in this program, with a goal
of reaching a retention rate in excess of 85%.
(4) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures and targets in 2006. By July 31, 2007,
the university and the board shall revisit these targets based on
per-student funding in the 2007-09 appropriations act. In addition,
the board shall compile comparable data from peer institutions in the
eight "global challenge states" identified in the Washington learns
study.
The targets agreed to by the board and the Western Washington
University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 2,968;
(b) Increase the number of high-demand baccalaureate degrees
conferred per year to 371;
(c) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 375;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 62.8%;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 61.4%;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 85.0%;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 95.6%,
measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate within 125%
of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) Maintain current levels of access for low-income students as
measured by the percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant
recipients.
Western Washington University shall report their progress and
ongoing efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the
higher education coordinating board prior to October 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD -- POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,568,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,563,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,341,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,472,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,465,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,327,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to collaborate with the state
board for community and technical colleges in developing a statewide,
web-based advising system. The system shall assist prospective and
enrolled students in charting the most efficient means of achieving
their degree goals. The two boards will jointly implement this system
in close collaboration with the institutions of higher education in
Washington.
(2) $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $169,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to maintain and update a
scholarship clearinghouse that lists every scholarship (public and
private) available to Washington students. The higher education
coordinating board shall develop a web-based interface for students and
families as well as a common application for these scholarships.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD -- FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $163,787,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,303,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,121,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,077,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $458,288,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $154,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $154,762,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, and $96,077,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation are provided solely for the financial aid programs
managed by the higher education coordinating board. The state need
grant, Washington scholars, and the Washington award for vocational
excellence will all increase grant awards to hold qualified students
harmless from the tuition increases assumed in this budget.
Furthermore, funding is provided within this appropriation to permit
less-than-halftime students to be eligible for the grant if legislation
is passed in 2007 authorizing this change. After April 1st of each
fiscal year, uncommitted funds from the annual appropriation for these
programs may be transferred to the state work study or educational
opportunity grant program.
(2) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to expand the gaining early
awareness and readiness for undergraduate programs project to up to 30
additional school districts.
(3) $5,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the purchase
of GET shares to be held in trust by the higher education coordinating
board in order to endow the Washington learns scholars program, should
legislation creating this program be enacted in 2007. The board shall
be the owner of the GET units. The board is authorized to deposit
funds for this purpose in the state education trust fund until April
30, 2008.
(4) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for one-time funding for scholarship
credits earned by students participating in the gaining early awareness
and readiness for undergraduate programs. This amount closes a
shortfall in the program caused by stronger than forecasted student
demand.
(5) $14,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the purchase of GET shares to be
held in trust by the higher education coordinating board in order to
endow the GET ready for math and science program, should legislation
creating this program be enacted in 2007. The board shall be the owner
of the GET units. The board is authorized to deposit funds for this
purpose in the state education trust fund until April 30, 2008. Up to
3% of these amounts may be used by the college success foundation for
program administration and notification of students who are eligible to
apply for these scholarships.
(6) $1,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to encourage more students to teach
secondary mathematics and science. $500,000 of this amount is provided
to increase the future teacher scholarship and conditional loan program
by 35 students per year. $500,000 of this amount is provided to
support state work study positions for students to intern in secondary
math and science classrooms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612 FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,416,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,426,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,008,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,850,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $53,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $53,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to improve
the oversight of private vocational and career schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613 FOR THE SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH
AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,719,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,783,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,502,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,368,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,843,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $218,878,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $327,095,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $38,630,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $48,210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for providing early childhood
education assistance. Of this amount, $18,960,000 is provided to
increase the number of children receiving education by up to 2,000
slots and $7,998,000 is provided for a vendor rate increase of 8
percent in fiscal year 2008 and 8 percent in fiscal year 2009.
(2) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the child care career and wage
ladder program created by chapter 507, Laws of 2005.
(3) $4,792,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
to develop and provide culturally relevant supports for parents,
family, and other caregivers. As these supports are provided, the
agency shall evaluate their effectiveness and report outcomes to the
governor and the legislature by October 2008.
(4) $1,843,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $7,437,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided to pilot a quality rating and improvement
system. Of this amount, funding is provided both to implement a tiered
reimbursement system based on a rating scale and to fund supports for
child care providers that will help them move up the rating scale.
(5) Beginning with the 2007-09 biennium, the department shall be
the lead agency for and recipient of the federal child care and
development fund grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to
fund child care licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration,
and other costs associated with child care subsidies. The department
shall transfer a portion of this grant to the department of social and
health services to partially fund the child care subsidies paid by the
department of social and health services on behalf of the department of
early learning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,560,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,577,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,382,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $154,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,673,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 616 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,252,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,295,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,547,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,960,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,084,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,044,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,963,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,173,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,590,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,726,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 619 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,741,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,997,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $232,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,970,000

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $724,362,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $764,561,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,970,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $168,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,790,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retire
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,624,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,502,646,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
deposit into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES

State Convention and Trade Center Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,553,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,204,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,204,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,961,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,068,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,825,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $136,332,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,225,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
deposit into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,546,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $122,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,854,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL
Disaster Response Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation is for the
purpose of making allocations to the Washington state patrol for fire
mobilizations costs or to the department of natural resources for fire
suppression costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--FIRE CONTINGENCY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the disaster response account for the purposes
specified in section 705 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EMERGENCY FUND
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are for
the governor's emergency fund for the critically necessary work of any
agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--SEX OFFENDER SENTENCING IMPACT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,188,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,509,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,697,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
distribution to counties to pay for the costs of implementing chapter
176, Laws of 2004, which makes amendments to the special sex offender
sentencing alternative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT -- COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall distribute the
appropriations to the following counties and health districts in the
amounts designated:

Health District FY 2008
FY 2009 FY 2007-09
Biennium

Adams County Health District $30,951 $30,951 $61,902

Asotin County Health District $67,714 $67,714 $135,428

Benton-Franklin Health District $1,165,612 $1,165,612 $2,331,224

Chelan-Douglas Health District $184,761 $184,761 $369,522

Clallam County Health and Human Services Department $141,752 $141,752 $283,504

Southwest Washington Health District $1,084,473 $1,084,473 $2,168,946

Columbia County Health District $40,529 $40,529 $81,058

Cowlitz County Health Department $278,560 $278,560 $557,120

Garfield County Health District $15,028 $15,028 $30,056

Grant County Health District $118,595 $118,595 $237,191

Grays Harbor Health Department $183,870 183,870 $367,740

Island County Health Department $91,892 $91,892 $183,784

Jefferson County Health and Human Services $85,782 $85,782 $171,564

Seattle-King County Department of Public Health $9,531,747 $9,531,747 $19,063,494

Bremerton-Kitsap County Health District $554,669 $554,669 $1,109,338

Kittitas County Health Department $92,499 $92,499 $184,998

Klickitat County Health Department $62,402 $62,402 $124,804

Lewis County Health Department $105,801 $105,801 $211,602

Lincoln County Health Department $29,705 $29,705 $59,410

Mason County Department of Health Services $95,988 $95,988 $191,976

Okanogan County Health District $63,458 $63,458 $126,916

Pacific County Health Department $77,427 $77,427 $154,854

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department $2,820,590 $2,820,590 $5,641,180

San Juan County Health and Community Services $37,531 $37,531 $75,062

Skagit County Health Department $223,927 $223,927 $447,854

Snohomish Health District $2,258,207 $2,258,207 $4,516,414

Spokane County Health District $2,101,429 $2,101,429 $4,202,858

Northeast Tri-County Health District $110,454 $110,454 $220,908

Thurston County Health Department $600,419 $600,419 $1,200,838

Wahkiakum County Health Department $13,773 $13,772 $27,545

Walla Walla County-City Health Department $172,062 $172,062 $344,124

Whatcom County Health Department $855,863 $855,863 $1,711,726

Whitman County Health Department $78,733 $78,733 $157,466

Yakima Health District $623,797
$623,797 $1,247,594

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS $24,000,000 $24,000,000 $48,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710 BELATED CLAIMS. The agencies and
institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act,
upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of
supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior
fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS -- CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS. The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis beginning July 1,
2007, consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the
judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly
basis consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.
(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,200,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,600,000

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial
retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,600,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,097,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,098,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,195,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for expenditure into the education technology revolving
account for the purpose of covering ongoing operational and equipment
replacement costs incurred by the K-20 educational network program in
providing telecommunication services to network participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 FOR THE GOVERNOR -- COMPENSATION--INSURANCE
BENEFITS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $318,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $664,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
Judicial Information Systems Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,000
Department of Retirement Systems Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,157,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section shall
be expended solely for state employee health insurance benefits for
legislative and judicial employees as per the specifications in this
act. The office of financial management shall allocate the moneys
appropriated in this section in the amounts specified and to the state
agencies specified in OFM document #2007 - R01, dated December 19,
2006, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 FOR THE GOVERNOR -- COMPENSATION--NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE SALARY INCREASE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,067,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,858,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $245,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $457,000
Judicial Information Systems Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $369,000
Department of Retirement Systems Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,068,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section shall
be expended solely for nonrepresented state employee salary increases
for legislative and judicial employees as per the specifications in
this act. The office of financial management shall allocate the moneys
appropriated in this section in the amounts specified and to the state
agencies specified in OFM document #2007 - R01, dated December 19,
2006, and adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 FOR THE GOVERNOR -- COMPENSATION--NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE ADDITIONAL SALARY STEP
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $143,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $157,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,000
Judicial Information Systems Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $216,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $819,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section shall
be expended solely for nonrepresented classified state employees'
additional salary step for legislative and judicial employees as per
the specifications in this act. The office of financial management
shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this section in the amounts
specified and to the state agencies specified in OFM document #2007 -R01, dated December 19, 2006, and adjust appropriation schedules
accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716 FOR THE GOVERNOR -- COMPENSATION--CONTINUE
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE FY 2007 SALARY INCREASE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,241,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,255,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $149,000
Judicial Information Systems Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,000
Department of Retirement Systems Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,997,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section shall
be expended solely for continuation of the FY 2007 nonrepresented state
employee salary increase for legislative and judicial employees as per
the specifications in this act. The office of financial management
shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this section in the amounts
specified and to the state agencies specified in OFM document #2007 -R01, dated December 19, 2006, and adjust appropriation schedules
accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717 FOR THE GOVERNOR -- COMPENSATION--PENSION
RATE CHANGES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $755,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,747,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $97,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,000
Judicial Information Systems Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $163,000
Department of Retirement Systems Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,015,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section shall
be expended solely for pension rate changes for legislative and
judicial employees, as adopted by the pension funding council. The
office of financial management shall allocate the moneys appropriated
in this section in the amounts specified and to the state agencies
specified in OFM document #2007 - R01, dated December 19, 2006, and
adjust appropriation schedules accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718 FOR THE GOVERNOR -- COMPENSATION--REVISE
PENSION GAIN SHARING
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($264,000)
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($264,000)
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($36,000)
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($36,000)
Judicial Information Systems Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($34,000)
Department of Retirement Systems Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($6,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($640,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section shall
be expended solely for revision of pension gain sharing for legislative
and judicial employees as per the specifications in Z-. . . ./07
(revising pension gain sharing). The office of financial management
shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this section in the amounts
specified and to the state agencies specified in OFM document #2007 - R01, dated December 19, 2006, and adjust appropriation schedules
accordingly. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--READING ACHIEVEMENT ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $525,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $525,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,050,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the reading achievement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--JUDICIAL INDEPENDENCE ACT ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the judicial independence act account. If Z-..../07
(judicial independence act) is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
appropriation in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 721 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--WATER QUALITY CAPITAL ACCOUNT
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,535,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the water quality capital account. If Z-..../07
(water quality capital account) is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
appropriation in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 722 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--PUBLIC SAFETY AND EDUCATION ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the public safety and education account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 723 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EQUAL JUSTICE ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the equal justice account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 724 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--WATER POLLUTION CONTROL REVOLVING ACCOUNT
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,027,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,027,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,054,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the water pollution control revolving account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 725 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--MOBILE HOME PARK RELOCATION ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the mobile home park relocation account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 726 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--STATE WILDLIFE ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the state wildlife account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 727 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--REINVESTING IN YOUTH ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,423,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,423,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,846,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the reinvesting in youth account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 728 INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2008. The sum of
one hundred million dollars or so much thereof as may be available on
June 30, 2008, from the total amount of unspent fiscal year 2008 state
general fund appropriations, is appropriated for the purposes of RCW
43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five
million dollars, is appropriated to the education savings account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 729 INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2009. The sum of
one hundred million dollars or so much thereof as may be available on
June 30, 2009, from the total amount of unspent fiscal year 2009 state
general fund appropriations, is appropriated for the purposes of RCW
43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five
million dollars, is appropriated to the education savings account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 730 FOR THE GOVERNOR -- WORKERS COMPENSATION
CHANGES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($1,000)
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($2,000)
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($1,000)
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($2,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section shall
be expended solely for changes to workers compensation charges by the
department of labor and industries. The office of financial management
shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this section in the amounts
specified, and to the state agencies specified in OFM document #2007 -R01, dated December 19, 2006, and adjust appropriation schedules
accordingly.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,325,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,656,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,999,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety
and education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,833,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly
funded autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,192,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation
for harbor improvement revenue distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation
for distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,346,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,906,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,359,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for
liquor excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,472,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor
profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,399,000
City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for local
government financial assistance distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,272,000
Streamline Sales and Use Tax Account Appropriation
for distribution to local taxing jurisdictions
to mitigate the unintended revenue redistribution
effect of the sourcing law changes . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,600,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $441,549,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE COUNTY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,167,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2007-09 biennium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties
for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving
penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,445,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2007-09 biennium to all
cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially
decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and
that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in
which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not
limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties);
chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998
(deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license
suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations);
chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215,
Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FEDERAL REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for federal
grazing fees distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,950,000
General Fund Appropriation for federal flood
control funds distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,000
Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal
forest reserve fund distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,524,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS. For
transfers in this section to the state general fund, pursuant to RCW
43.135.035(5), the state expenditure limit shall be increased by the
amount of the transfer. The increase shall occur in the fiscal year in
which the transfer occurs.

State Treasurer's Service Account: For
transfer to the state general fund,
$10,000,000 for fiscal year 2008 and
$5,000,000 for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
General Fund: For transfer to the water
quality account, $18,413,000 for fiscal
year 2008 and $18,388,000 for fiscal
year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,801,000
Education Legacy Trust Account: For transfer
to the student achievement account for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,714,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance repayment
account, an amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance account,
$3,600,000 for fiscal year 2008 and
$3,600,000 for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,200,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer
to the job development account, $25,000,000
for fiscal year 2008 and $25,000,000 for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer
to the health services account, in an
amount not to exceed the actual amount
of the annual base payment to the tobacco
settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,915,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the
life sciences discovery fund, in an amount
not to exceed the actual amount of the
strategic contribution supplemental payment
to the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000
General Fund: For transfer to the budget
stabilization account for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $134,000,000
General Fund: For transfer to the streamline
sales and use tax account for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,600,000

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS. The
appropriations contained in this act are maximum expenditure
authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys disbursed from the
treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be recorded as
loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes. To
the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding
appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed
from the treasury during the 2005-07 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies
shall comply with the following requirements regarding information
systems projects when specifically directed to do so by this act.
(1) Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology
shall be made in the context of its information technology portfolio.
"Information technology portfolio" means a strategic management
approach in which the relationships between agency missions and
information technology investments can be seen and understood, such
that: Technology efforts are linked to agency objectives and business
plans; the impact of new investments on existing infrastructure and
business functions are assessed and understood before implementation;
and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative statewide infrastructure.
(2) Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in
making decisions on matters related to the following:
(a) System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;
(b) Setting goals and objectives for using information technology
in meeting legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;
(c) Assessment of overall information processing performance,
resources, and capabilities;
(d) Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for
the operation of any new systems developed using external resources;
and
(e) Progress toward enabling electronic access to public
information.
(3) Each project will be planned and designed to take optimal
advantage of Internet technologies and protocols. Agencies shall
ensure that the project is in compliance with the architecture,
infrastructure, principles, policies, and standards of digital
government as maintained by the information services board.
(4) The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information
technology projects at the direction of the information services board
and in accordance with published department of information services
policies and guidelines. At a minimum, such studies shall include a
statement of: (a) The purpose or impetus for change; (b) the business
value to the agency, including an examination and evaluation of
benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a comprehensive risk assessment
based on the proposed project's impact on both citizens and state
operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing nothing; (d)
the impact on agency and statewide information infrastructure; and (e)
the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.
(5) The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for
each project. The plan or plans shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of each project. The plan(s) shall include, but
is not limited to, the following elements: A description of the
problem or opportunity that the information technology project is
intended to address; a statement of project objectives and assumptions;
a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to be
accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for
the phased approach shall be such that the business case justification
for a project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or
adds measurable value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business
functions within each development cycle.
(6) The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for
information technology projects. Consistent with the direction of the
information services board and the published policies and guidelines of
the department of information services, the quality assurance plan
shall address all factors critical to successful completion of the
project and successful integration with the agency and state
information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality assurance
plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The
quality assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements
for each phase of a project.
(7) A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and
quality assurance plan shall be provided to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and
legislative fiscal committees. The plans and studies shall demonstrate
a sound business case that justifies the investment of taxpayer funds
on any new project, an assessment of the impact of the proposed system
on the existing information technology infrastructure, the disciplined
use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging of
private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval
of the relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan by the department of information services and the office
of financial management.
(8) Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the
department of information services, the office of financial management,
and legislative fiscal committees at intervals specified in the
project's quality assurance plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS. The department
of information services shall act as lead agency in coordinating video
telecommunications services for state agencies. As lead agency, the
department shall develop standards and common specifications for leased
and purchased telecommunications equipment and assist state agencies in
developing a video telecommunications expenditure plan. No agency may
spend any portion of any appropriation in this act for new video
telecommunication equipment, new video telecommunication transmission,
or new video telecommunication programming, or for expanding current
video telecommunication systems without first complying with chapter
43.105 RCW, including but not limited to, RCW 43.105.041(2), and
without first submitting a video telecommunications expenditure plan,
in accordance with the policies of the department of information
services, for review and assessment by the department of information
services under RCW 43.105.052. Prior to any such expenditure by a
public school, a video telecommunications expenditure plan shall be
approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall submit the plans to the
department of information services in a form prescribed by the
department. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications in public schools
by providing educational information to local school districts and
shall assist local school districts and educational service districts
in telecommunications planning and curriculum development. Prior to
any such expenditure by a public institution of postsecondary
education, a telecommunications expenditure plan shall be approved by
the higher education coordinating board. The higher education
coordinating board shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications
for instruction and instructional support in postsecondary education,
including the review and approval of instructional telecommunications
course offerings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS. Whenever
allocations are made from the governor's emergency fund appropriation
to an agency that is financed in whole or in part by other than general
fund moneys, the director of financial management may direct the
repayment of such allocated amount to the general fund from any balance
in the fund or funds which finance the agency. No appropriation shall
be necessary to effect such repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS. In addition
to the amounts appropriated in this act for revenues for distribution,
state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2, and bond retirement and interest including
ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on
registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also
appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for
these purposes under any statutory formula or under chapters 39.94 and
39.96 RCW or any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 BOND EXPENSES. In addition to such other
appropriations as are made by this act, there is hereby appropriated to
the state finance committee from legally available bond proceeds in the
applicable construction or building funds and accounts such amounts as
are necessary to pay the expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the subject bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 VOLUNTARY SEPARATION INCENTIVES. As a
management tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of
resources, while improving employee productivity and morale, agencies
may offer voluntary separation and/or downshifting incentives and
options according to procedures and guidelines established by the
department of personnel and the department of retirement systems in
consultation with the office of financial management. The options may
include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for: Voluntary
resignation, voluntary leave-without-pay, voluntary workweek or work
hour reduction, voluntary downward movement, or temporary separation
for development purposes. No employee shall have a contractual right
to a financial incentive offered pursuant to this section. Agencies
shall report on the outcomes of their plans, and offers shall be
reviewed and monitored jointly by the department of personnel and the
department of retirement systems, for reporting to the office of
financial management by June 30, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT INCENTIVES.
Agencies may implement a voluntary retirement incentive program that is
cost neutral or results in cost savings provided that such a program is
approved by the director of retirement systems and the office of
financial management. Agencies participating in this authorization are
required to submit a report by June 30, 2009, to the legislature and
the office of financial management on the outcome of their approved
retirement incentive program. The report should include information on
the details of the program including resulting service delivery
changes, agency efficiencies, the cost of the retirement incentive per
participant, the total cost to the state, and the projected or actual
net dollar savings over the 2007-09 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR MOTOR VEHICLES.
The use of hybrid motor vehicles reduces air contaminants, greenhouse
gas emissions and reliance on imported sources of petroleum. To foster
the use of hybrid motor vehicles, beginning July 1, 2007, before the
purchase or lease of a motor vehicle, state agencies should first
consider the feasibility of hybrid motor vehicles. State agencies
should strive to purchase or lease a hybrid motor vehicle when the use
of such vehicle is consistent with and can accomplish the agency's
mission and when the purchase is financially reasonable. The financial
assessment should include savings accruing from reduced fuel purchases
over the life of the vehicle. Agencies shall report on their purchases
of hybrid vehicles in their biennial sustainability plans as required
under executive order 02-03.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910 COMPENSATION--REVISE PENSION GAIN
SHARING. The appropriations for school districts and state agencies,
including institutions of higher education are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Appropriations are adjusted to reflect
changes to pension gain sharing as provided in Z-..../07 (revise
pension gain sharing).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911 COMPENSATION--NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS. The appropriations for state agencies, including
institutions of higher education are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $707 per eligible employee for
fiscal year 2008. For fiscal year 2009 the monthly employer funding
rate shall not exceed $732 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2008, through December 31, 2008, the
subsidy shall be $165.31. Starting January 1, 2009, the subsidy shall
be $184.26 per month.
(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service
districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW
41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $59.37 per month beginning
September 1, 2007, and $67.10 beginning September 1, 2008;
(b) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $59.37 each month beginning September 1, 2007, and
$67.10 beginning September 1, 2008, prorated by the proportion of
employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the
part-time employee receives. The remittance requirements specified in
this subsection shall not apply to employees of a technical college,
school district, or educational service district who purchase insurance
benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 912 COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES
OUTSIDE SUPER COALITION--INSURANCE BENEFITS. The appropriations for
state agencies, including institutions of higher education are subject
to the following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, for represented employees outside the super
coalition under chapter 41.80 RCW, shall not exceed $707 per eligible
employee for fiscal year 2008. For fiscal year 2009 the monthly
employer funding rate shall not exceed $732 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2008, through December 31, 2008, the
subsidy shall be $165.31. Starting January 1, 2009, the subsidy shall
be $184.26 per month.
(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service
districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW
41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $59.37 per month beginning
September 1, 2007, and $67.10 beginning September 1, 2008;
(b) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $59.37 each month beginning September 1, 2007, and
$67.10 beginning September 1, 2008, prorated by the proportion of
employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the
part-time employee receives. The remittance requirements specified in
this subsection shall not apply to employees of a technical college,
school district, or educational service district who purchase insurance
benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 913 COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--SUPER COALITION. Collective bargaining agreements negotiated as part
of the super coalition under chapter 41.80 RCW include employer
contributions to health insurance premiums at 88% of the cost. Funding
rates at this level are currently $707 per month for fiscal year 2008
and $732 per month for fiscal year 2009. The agreements also include
a one-time payment of $756 for each employee who is eligible for
insurance for the month of June 2007 and is covered by a 2007-2009
collective bargaining agreement negotiated pursuant to chapter 41.80
RCW, and the continuation of the salary increases that were negotiated
for the twelve-month period beginning July 1, 2006, and scheduled to
terminate June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 914 NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION.
The appropriations for nonrepresented employee compensation adjustments
are provided solely for:
(1) Across the Board Adjustments.
(a) Appropriations are provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective September 1, 2007, for all classified employees, except those
represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapters 41.80,
41.56, and 47.64 RCW, and except the certificated employees of the
state schools for the deaf and blind and employees of community and
technical colleges covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure No.
732. Also included are employees in the Washington management service,
and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the director of
personnel.
The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a 3.2% salary
increase effective September 1, 2007, for executive, legislative, and
judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum
salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected
officials.
(b) Appropriations are provided for a 2.0% salary increase
effective September 1, 2008, for all classified employees, except those
represented by a collective bargaining unit under chapters 41.80,
41.56, and 47.64 RCW, and except for the certificated employees of the
state schools of the deaf and blind and employees of community and
technical colleges covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure No.
732. Also included are employees in the Washington management service,
and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the director of
personnel. The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a 2.0%
salary increase effective September 1, 2008, for executive,
legislative, and judicial branch employees exempt from merit system
rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries
for elected officials.
(2) Salary Survey.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for
implementation of the department of personnel's 2006 salary survey, for
job classes more than 25% below market rates and affected classes.
(3) Classification Consolidation.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for
implementation of the department of personnel's phase 4 job class
consolidation and revisions under chapter 41.80 RCW.
(4) Agency Request Consolidation.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for
implementation of the department of personnel's agency request job
class consolidation and reclassification plan. This implementation
fully satisfies the conditions specified in the settlement agreement of
WPEA v State/Shroll v State.
(5) Additional Pay Step.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under chapters 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, funding is provided for a
new pay step L for those who have been in step K for at least one year.
(6) Retain Fiscal Year 2007 Pay Increase.
For all classified state employees, except those represented by a
bargaining unit under chapter 41.80, 41.56, and 47.64 RCW, and except
for the certificated employees of the state schools of the deaf and
blind and employees of community and technical colleges covered by the
provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732, funding is provided for
continuation of the 1.6% salary increase that was provided during
fiscal year 2007. Also included are employees in the Washington
management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the
director of personnel. The appropriations are also sufficient to
continue a 1.6% salary increase for executive, legislative, and
judicial branch employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum
salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected
officials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 915 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS. (1)
Provisions of collective bargaining agreements contained in sections
916 through 939 of this act are described in general terms. Only major
economic terms are included in the descriptions. These descriptions do
not contain the complete contents of the agreements. The collective
bargaining agreements contained in sections 916 through 939 of this act
may also be funded by expenditures from nonappropriated accounts. If
positions are funded with lidded grants or dedicated fund sources with
insufficient revenue, additional funding from other sources is not
provided.
(2) Some contracts contain implementation of the department of
personnel's phase 4 classification consolidation. This implementation
fully satisfies the conditions specified in the settlement agreement of
WPEA v. State/Shroll v. State.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 916 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE.
Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the governor and the Washington federation of state
employees under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase that went into
effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30, 2007. Also
included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, and a 2%
salary increase effective July 1, 2008. Select classifications will
receive wage increases due to phase four of the department of
personnel's class consolidation project, the implementation of the
department of personnel's 2006 salary survey for classes more than 25%
below market rates and agency request packages meeting the specified
criteria outlined in RCW 41.06.152. These increases will be effective
July 1, 2007. All employees covered under the agreement that have been
at the top step of their salary range for a year or longer will
progress to a new step L effective July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 917 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WPEA.
Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the governor and the Washington public employees
association under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 1.6% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase that went into
effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30, 2007. Also
included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, and a 2%
salary increase effective July 1, 2008. Select classifications will
receive wage increases due to phase four of the department of
personnel's class consolidation project, the implementation of the
department of personnel's 2006 salary survey for classes more than 25%
below market rates and agency request packages meeting the specified
criteria outlined in RCW 41.06.152. These increases will be effective
July 1, 2007. All employees covered under the agreement that have been
at the top step of their range for a year or longer will progress to a
new step L effective July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 918 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UFCW.
Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the governor and the united food and commercial workers
under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. For employees covered under
this agreement, provisions include a 1.6% salary increase effective
July 1, 2007, which continues the increase that went into effect July
1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30, 2007. Also included is a
3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, and a 2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2008. All employees covered under the agreement that
have been at the top step of their range for a year or longer will
progress to a new step L effective July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 919 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--TEAMSTERS. Appropriations in this act reflect the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the brotherhood
of teamsters under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 2.9% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, which continues the increase that went into
effect July 1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30, 2007. Also
included is a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, and a 2%
salary increase effective July 1, 2008. Select classifications will
receive wage increases due to phase four of the department of
personnel's class consolidation project, the implementation of the
department of personnel's 2006 salary survey for classes more than 25%
below market rates, and agency request packages meeting the specified
criteria outlined in RCW 41.06.152. These increases will be effective
July 1, 2007.
Also effective July 1, 2007, corrections and custody officers 1s,
2s, and 3s in Franklin, Snohomish, and Walla Walla counties will
receive 5% geographic pay. All employees covered under the agreement
that have been at the top step of their range for a year or longer will
progress to a new step L effective July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 920 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--COALITION. Appropriations in this act reflect the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the coalition
under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW. For employees covered under
this agreement, provisions include a 1.6% salary increase effective
July 1, 2007, which continues the increase that went into effect July
1, 2006, and is set to terminate June 30, 2007. Also included is a
3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, and a 2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2008. Select classifications will receive wage
increases due to phase four of the department of personnel's class
consolidation project, the implementation of the department of
personnel's 2006 salary survey for classes more than 25% below market
rates, and agency request packages meeting the specified criteria
outlined in RCW 41.06.152. These increases will be effective July 1,
2007. All employees covered under the agreement that have been at the
top step of their range for a year or longer will progress to a new
step L effective July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 921 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--IFPTE.
Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the governor and the international federation of
professional and technical engineers under the provisions of chapter
41.80 RCW. For employees covered under this agreement, provisions
include a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which continues
the increase that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set to
terminate June 30, 2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, and a 2% salary increase effective July 1,
2008. Select classifications will receive wage increases due to the
implementation of the department of personnel's 2006 salary survey for
classes more than 25% below market rates. These increases will be
effective July 1, 2007. All employees covered under the agreement that
have been at the top step of their range for a year or longer will
progress to a new step L effective July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 922 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--SEIU
1199. Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the service employee's
international union, local 1199 NW under the provisions of chapter
41.80 RCW. For employees covered under this agreement, provisions
include a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which continues
the increase that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set to
terminate June 30, 2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, and a 2% salary increase effective July 1,
2008. Select classifications will receive wage increases due to phase
four of the department of personnel's class consolidation project and
the implementation of the department of personnel's 2006 salary survey
for classes more than 25% below market rates. These increases will be
effective July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 923 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
HIGHER EDUCATION. Appropriations in this act reflect the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the Washington
federation of state employees in higher education under the provisions
of chapter 41.80 RCW. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which
continues the increase that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set
to terminate June 30, 2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, and a 2% salary increase effective July 1,
2008. Select classifications will receive wage increases due to phase
four of the department of personnel's class consolidation project and
the implementation of the department of personnel's 2006 salary survey
for classes more than 25% below market rates. These increases will be
effective July 1, 2007. All employees covered under the agreement that
have been at the top step of their range for a year or longer will
progress to a new step L effective July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 924 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WPEA
HIGHER EDUCATION. Appropriations in this act reflect the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the Washington
public employees association in higher education under the provisions
of chapter 41.80 RCW. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, which
continues the increase that went into effect July 1, 2006, and is set
to terminate June 30, 2007. Also included is a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2007, and a 2% salary increase effective July 1,
2008. Select classifications will receive wage increases due to phase
four of the department of personnel's class consolidation project and
the implementation of the department of personnel's 2006 salary survey
for classes more than 25% below market rates. These increases will be
effective July 1, 2007. All employees covered under the agreement that
have been at the top step of their range for a year or longer will
progress to a new step L effective July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 925 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE. Appropriations in this act reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between the Western Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
units A, B, and E. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 3.2% pay increase effective July 1, 2007; a second
increase of 2.0% effective July 1, 2008; implementation of the
department of personnel's salary survey for classes more than 25% below
market rate; a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid; and movement of all
classified staff at or below pay range 30 to step G of their range,
effective July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 926 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--PSE BARGAINING UNIT PTE. Appropriations in this
act reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached between the
Western Washington University and the public school employees
bargaining unit PTE. For employees covered under this agreement, the
provisions include a 3.2% increase effective July 1, 2007; a second
increase of 2.0% effective July 1, 2008; implementation of the
department of personnel's salary survey for classes more than 25% below
market rate; a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid; and implementation
of phase four of the department of personnel's class consolidation
project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 927 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--PSE BARGAINING UNIT D. Appropriations in this
act reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached between the
Western Washington University and the public school employees
bargaining unit D. For employees covered under this agreement, the
provisions include a 3.2% increase effective July 1, 2007; a second
increase of 2.0% effective July 1, 2008; implementation of the
department of personnel's salary survey for classes more than 25% below
market rate; a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid; and implementation
of phase four of the department of personnel's class consolidation
project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 928 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE. Appropriations in this act reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between the Central Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees. For
employees covered under this agreement, the provisions include a pay
increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a second increase of 2.0%
effective July 1, 2006; phase four of the department of personnel's
class consolidation project; implementation of the 2006 department of
personnel's salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rate;
and a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 929 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--EASTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE BU 1. Appropriations in this act reflect
the collective bargaining agreement reached between the Eastern
Washington University and the Washington federation of state employees
bargaining unit 1. For employees covered under this agreement, the
provisions include a pay increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a
second increase of 2.0%; phase four of the department of personnel's
class consolidation project; a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid; and
the potential for two $200 one-time payments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 930 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--EASTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE BU 2. Appropriations in this act reflect
the collective bargaining agreement reached between the Eastern
Washington University and the Washington federation of state employees
bargaining unit 2. For employees covered under this agreement, the
provisions include a pay increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a
second increase of 2.0%; phase four of the department of personnel's
class consolidation project; a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid; and
the potential for two $200 one-time payments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 931 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY–WSU POLICE GUILD. Appropriations in this
act reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached between the
Washington State University and the Washington State University police
guild. For employees covered under this agreement, the provisions
include a pay increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a second
increase of 2.0%; effective July 1, 2008; implementation of the 2006
department of personnel's salary survey for classes more than 25% below
market rate; and a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 932 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY--WFSE. Appropriations in this act reflect
the collective bargaining agreement reached between the Washington
State University and the Washington federation of state employees. For
employees covered under this agreement, the provisions include a pay
increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a second increase of 2.0%
effective July 1, 2008; implementation of the 2006 department of
personnel's salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rate;
and a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 933 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--WFSE CAMPUS--WIDE BARGAINING UNIT.
Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the University of Washington and the Washington
federation of state employees campus-wide bargaining unit. For
employees covered under this agreement, the provisions include a pay
increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a second increase of 2.0%
effective July 1, 2008; recruitment and retention adjustments for
specific classes; increases for classes more than 80% below market
according to a survey by the University of Washington; and an
additional pay step in fiscal year 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 934 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--WFSE POLICE MANAGEMENT BARGAINING UNIT.
Appropriations in this act reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the University of Washington and the Washington
federation of state employees police management bargaining unit. For
employees covered under this agreement, the provisions include a pay
increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a second increase of 2.0%
effective July 1, 2008; longevity pay for those with service of 5 years
(1%), 10 years (2%), 15 years (3%), 20 years (4%), and 25 years (5%);
and a new top step effective fiscal year 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 935 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--UWPOA. Appropriations in this act reflect
the collective bargaining agreement reached between the University of
Washington and the University of Washington police officers
association. For employees covered under this agreement, the
provisions include a pay increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a
second pay increase of 2.0% effective July 1, 2008; an additional top
step on the pay grid effective fiscal year 2009; and increases in
midcareer pay increments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 936 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--SEIU 925. Appropriations in this act reflect
the collective bargaining agreement reached between the University of
Washington and the service employees' international union 925. For
employees covered under this agreement, the provisions include a pay
increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; a second pay increase of 3.0%
effective July 1, 2008; and market rate adjustments for specific job
classes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 937 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--YAKIMA
VALLEY COMMUNITY COLLEGE--WPEA/UFCW. Appropriations in this act
reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached between the Yakima
Valley community college and the Washington public employees'
association/united food and commercial workers union local 365. For
employees covered under this agreement, the provisions include a pay
increase of 3.2% effective July 1, 2007; an increase of 2.0% effective
July 1, 2008; implementation of the 2006 department of personnel's
salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rate; phase four
of the department of personnel's class consolidation project; agency
requests for reclassification that meet the criteria outlined in RCW
41.06.152; and a new 2.5% step L on the salary grid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 938 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WSP
TROOPERS ASSOCIATION. Appropriations in this act reflect funding for
the collective bargaining agreement reached between the governor and
the Washington state patrol trooper's association under the provisions
of chapter 41.56 RCW. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 4.0% salary increase effective July 1, 2007, and
a 4.0% salary increase effective July 1, 2008. Also effective July 1,
2007, positions located in King (10%), Snohomish (5%), or Pierce (3%)
counties will receive geographic pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 939 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WSP
LIEUTENANTS ASSOCIATION. Appropriations in this act reflect funding
for the collective bargaining agreement reached between the governor
and the Washington state patrol lieutenant's association under the
provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW. For employees covered under this
agreement, provisions include a 4.0% salary increase effective July 1,
2007, and a 4.0% salary increase effective July 1, 2008. Also
effective July 1, 2007, positions located in King (10%), Snohomish
(5%), or Pierce (3%) counties will receive geographic pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 940 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--SEIU
LOCAL 775 HOMECARE WORKERS. Appropriations in this act reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the
service employee's international union local 775 under the provisions
of chapter 74.39 RCW. For those covered under this agreement,
provisions include a base wage increase of $.30 per hour effective July
1, 2007, a base wage increase of $.30 per hour effective July 1, 2008,
an additional step to the wage grid for providers with over 14,000
hours, an additional $1.00 per hour for mentor and trainer pay,
implementation of mileage reimbursement by July 1, 2008, and state
payment of the provider's share of workers compensation. In addition,
the state will increase the contribution to health care by 10% on July
1, 2008, to $550 per month, and implement an agreed upon approach to
shared living.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 941 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--SEIU
LOCAL 925 CHILDCARE WORKERS. Appropriations in this act reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the
service employee's international union local 925 under the provisions
of chapter 74.15 RCW. For those covered under this agreement,
provisions include a subsidy rate increase of 7% for licensed homes and
4% for exempt providers effective July 1, 2007, a subsidy rate increase
of 3% for both licensed and exempt providers on July 1, 2008,
elimination of a reduced rate for additional children per family on
July 1, 2007, for exempt providers, additional incentive pay for
nonstandard hours and infant care, training for providers on licensing
requirements, and health care for eligible licensed home providers.

Sec. 942 RCW 38.52.540 and 2002 c 371 s 905 and 2002 c 341 s 4
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The enhanced 911 account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from the state enhanced 911 excise taxes imposed by RCW
82.14B.030 shall be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account
shall be used only to support the statewide coordination and management
of the enhanced 911 system, for the implementation of wireless enhanced
911 statewide, and to help supplement, within available funds, the
operational costs of the system, including adequate funding of counties
to enable implementation of wireless enhanced 911 service and
reimbursement of radio communications service companies for costs
incurred in providing wireless enhanced 911 service pursuant to
negotiated contracts between the counties or their agents and the radio
communications service companies.
(2) Funds generated by the enhanced 911 excise tax imposed by RCW
82.14B.030(3) shall not be distributed to any county that has not
imposed the maximum county enhanced 911 tax allowed under RCW
82.14B.030(1). Funds generated by the enhanced 911 excise tax imposed
by RCW 82.14B.030(4) shall not be distributed to any county that has
not imposed the maximum county enhanced 911 tax allowed under RCW
82.14B.030(2).
(3) The state enhanced 911 coordinator, with the advice and
assistance of the enhanced 911 advisory committee, is authorized to
enter into statewide agreements to improve the efficiency of enhanced
911 services for all counties and shall specify by rule the additional
purposes for which moneys, if available, may be expended from this
account.
(4) During the ((2001-2003)) 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, ((the
legislature may transfer)) funds from the enhanced 911 account ((to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the account)) may be used to support the development and implementation
of solutions that will enhance the interoperability between state and
local emergency communications systems.

Sec. 943 RCW 46.09.170 and 2004 c 105 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the
motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on a tax rate of: (a) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor vehicle
fuel from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (b) twenty cents per
gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;
(c) twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2009; (d) twenty-two cents per gallon of motor
vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; and (e) twenty-three cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1, 2011,
and thereafter, less proper deductions for refunds and costs of
collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090.
(2) The treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as
follows:
(a) Thirty-six percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway
vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources
solely for acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and
management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation
facilities, and information programs and maintenance of nonhighway
roads;
(b) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish
and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and the maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(c) Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely
for the acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management
of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities; and
(d) Fifty-eight and one-half percent shall be credited to the
nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account to be
administered by the committee for planning, acquisition, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and for education, information, and law
enforcement programs. The funds under this subsection shall be
expended in accordance with the following limitations:
(i) Not more than thirty percent may be expended for education,
information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than seventy percent may be expended for ORV,
nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities. Except as
provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, of this amount:
(A) Not less than thirty percent, together with the funds the
committee receives under RCW 46.09.110, may be expended for ORV
recreation facilities;
(B) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonmotorized
recreation facilities. Funds expended under this subsection
(2)(d)(ii)(B) shall be known as Ira Spring outdoor recreation
facilities funds; and
(C) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(iii) The committee may waive the minimum percentage cited in
(d)(ii) of this subsection due to insufficient requests for funds or
projects that score low in the committee's project evaluation. Funds
remaining after such a waiver must be allocated in accordance with
committee policy.
(3) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.
(4) During the ((2003-05)) 2007-09 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may appropriate such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the
NOVA account to ((the interagency committee for outdoor recreation,))
the department of natural resources((, the department of fish and
wildlife, and the state parks and recreation commission)) for planning
and designing consistent off-road vehicle signage at department-managed
recreation sites, and for planning recreation opportunities on
department-managed lands in the Reiter block and Ahtanum state forest.
This appropriation is not required to follow the specific distribution
specified in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 944 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2005 c 488 s 926 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship; and
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the top two hazardous waste
management priorities of RCW 70.105.150.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority: (i) Remedial
actions; (ii) hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105
RCW; (iii) solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW; (iv) funds for a program to assist in the
assessment and cleanup of sites of methamphetamine production, but not
to be used for the initial containment of such sites, consistent with
the responsibilities and intent of RCW 69.50.511; and (v) cleanup and
disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or derelict vessels
that pose a threat to human health or the environment. For purposes of
this subsection (3)(a)(v), "abandoned or derelict vessels" means
vessels that have little or no value and either have no identified
owner or have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean
up and dispose of the vessel. Funds for plans and programs shall be
allocated consistent with the priorities and matching requirements
established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW. During
the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be used
for the following activities: Conducting a study of whether dioxins
occur in fertilizers, soil amendments, and soils; reviewing
applications for registration of fertilizers; and conducting a study of
plant uptake of metals. During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the local toxics control account to the
state toxics control account such amounts as specified in the omnibus
capital budget bill. During the ((2005-2007)) 2007-2009 fiscal
biennium, moneys in the account may also be used for grants to local
governments to retrofit public sector diesel equipment and for storm
water planning and implementation activities.
(b) Funds may also be appropriated to the department of health to
implement programs to reduce testing requirements under the federal
safe drinking water act for public water systems. The department of
health shall reimburse the account from fees assessed under RCW
70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) One percent of the moneys deposited into the state and local
toxics control accounts shall be allocated only for public
participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations
in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases
of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and
hazardous waste management priorities. However, during the 1999-2001
fiscal biennium, funding may not be granted to entities engaged in
lobbying activities, and applicants may not be awarded grants if their
cumulative grant awards under this section exceed two hundred thousand
dollars. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be
renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from
either account which are not expended at the close of any biennium
shall revert to the state toxics control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(8) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state toxics control account to the water quality
account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 945 RCW 70.146.030 and 2005 c 518 s 940 and 2005 c 514 s
1108 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The water quality account is hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be used only in a manner
consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the account shall be
administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject to
legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
tax receipts as provided in RCW 82.24.027, 82.24.026(2)(d),
((82.26.025,)) and 82.32.390, principal and interest from the repayment
of any loans granted pursuant to this chapter, and any other moneys
appropriated to the account by the legislature.
(2) The department may use or permit the use of any moneys in the
account to make grants or loans to public bodies, including grants to
public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where federal, local,
or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing basis, for water
pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes of
assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water
pollution control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments
made by a public body to a service provider under a service agreement
entered into pursuant to RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this
chapter and for related administrative expenses. For the period July
1, ((2005)) 2007, to June 30, ((2007)) 2009, moneys in the account may
be used to process applications received by the department that seek to
make changes to or transfer existing water rights and for other water
resources and water quality activities, for water conveyance projects,
shoreline technical assistance. Puget Sound education and outreach and
for grants and technical assistance to public bodies for watershed
planning under chapter 90.82 RCW. No more than three percent of the
moneys deposited in the account may be used by the department to pay
for the administration of the grant and loan program authorized by this
chapter.
(3) Beginning with the biennium ending June 30, 1997, the
department shall present a biennial progress report on the use of
moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate committee on ways
and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.
The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31st of the odd-numbered year. The
report shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description,
and amount of the grant, loan, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 946 The water quality capital account is
created in the state treasury pursuant to Z-..../07 (water quality
capital account). In this act, appropriations from the water quality
capital account are defined as appropriations from that account. If
Z-..../07 (water quality capital account) is not enacted by June 30,
2007, appropriations in this act either from that account or into that
account shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 947 For appropriations under this act which
contribute to Puget Sound protection and recovery, the department of
ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of natural
resources, the state conservation commission, the state parks and
recreation commission, the department of health, and the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation shall sign performance agreements with
the Puget Sound partnership as described in Z-..../07 (Puget Sound
partnership).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 948 The governor's committee on disability
issues and employment is supported through resources provided by state
agencies. Within appropriations contained in this act, the following
agencies shall pay to the governor's committee on disability issues and
employment the amounts listed below.

Agency Fiscal Year 2008 Fiscal Year 2009

Department of Social and Health Services $47,000 $51,000

Department of Licensing $41,000 $43,000

Department of Veteran's Affairs $11,000 $11,000

Division of Vocational Rehabilitation $79,000 $84,000

Department of General Administration $11,000 $11,000

Employment Security Department $113,000 $121,000

Department of Ecology $11,000 $11,000

Department of Corrections $21,000 $22,000

Department of Health $21,000 $22,000

Department of Labor and Industries $11,000 $11,000

Department of Personnel $11,000 $11,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 949 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 950 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR MOTOR VEHICLES . . . . . . . . . . . . 164
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
BELATED CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 147
BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
BOARD OF TAX APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
BOND EXPENSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 163
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 132
CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
COALITION . . . . . . . . . . . . 172
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE BU 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE BU 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
IFPTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 172
SEIU 1199 . . . . . . . . . . . . 173
SEIU LOCAL 925 CHILDCARE WORKERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 179
TEAMSTERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 171
UFCW . . . . . . . . . . . . 171
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--SEIU 925 . . . . . . . . . . . . 177
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--UWPOA . . . . . . . . . . . . 177
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--WFSE CAMPUS-WIDE BARGAINING UNIT . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON--WFSE POLICE MANAGEMENT BARGAINING UNIT . . . . . . . . . . . . 177
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY--WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY--WSU POLICE GUILD . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--PSE BARGAINING UNIT D . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--PSE BARGAINING UNIT PTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 174
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY--WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 174
WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
WFSE HIGHER EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 173
WPEA . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
WPEA HIGHER EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 174
WSP LIEUTENANTS ASSOCIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 178
WSP TROOPERS ASSOCIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 178
YAKIMA VALLEY COMMUNITY COLLEGE--WPEA/UFCW . . . . . . . . . . . . 177
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--SEIU LOCAL 775 HOMECARE WORKERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 178
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
COMMISSION ON ASIAN-PACIFIC-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
COMPENSATION
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 165
REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE--SUPER COALITION INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 166
REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--SUPER COALITION . . . . . . . . . . . . 167
REVISE PENSION GAIN SHARING . . . . . . . . . . . . 165
CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 145
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING . . . . . . . . . . . . 141
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 57
DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 147
OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 130
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 163
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 160
FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
GOVERNOR
COMPENSATION--CONTINUE NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE FY 2007 SALARY INCREASE . . . . . . . . . . . . 149
COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 148
COMPENSATION--NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE ADDITIONAL SALARY STEP . . . . . . . . . . . . 149
COMPENSATION--NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE SALARY INCREASE . . . . . . . . . . . . 148
COMPENSATION--PENSION RATE CHANGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 150
COMPENSATION--REVISE PENSION GAIN SHARING . . . . . . . . . . . . 151
WORKERS COMPENSATION CHANGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 154
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 138
POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 138
HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
HORSE RACING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
INCENTIVE SAVINGS
FY 2008 . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
FY 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . 154
INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 160
INSURANCE COMMISSIONER . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 116
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 168
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 147
EMERGENCY FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 145
EQUAL JUSTICE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
FIRE CONTINGENCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 145
FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL . . . . . . . . . . . . 144
JUDICIAL INDEPENDENCE ACCOUNT ACT . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
MOBILE HOME PARK RELOCATION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
PUBLIC SAFETY AND EDUCATION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
READING ACHIEVEMENT ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 151
REINVESTING IN YOUTH ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
SEX OFFENDER SENTENCING IMPACT . . . . . . . . . . . . 145
STATE WILDLIFE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
WATER POLLUTION CONTROL REVOLVING ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
WATER QUALITY CAPITAL ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 62
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
SENATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 140
STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 121
STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
STATE INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 64
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
STATE TREASURER . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 143, 144
COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 157
FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 158
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 157
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 156
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 158
STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 163
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 66, 116, 117
BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 82
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 98
EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 95
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 74
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 96
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 111
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 96
MISC PURPOSES UNDER SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT AND NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 98
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 97
PROMOTING ACADEMIC SUCCESS . . . . . . . . . . . . 112
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 88
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 85
SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 89
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 90
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 114
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 110
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 134
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 124
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 162
VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT INCENTIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 164
VOLUNTARY SEPARATION INCENTIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 164
WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 62
WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 127
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 136
WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 140
--- END ---