BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.094 and 1969 ex.s. c 168 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
The treasurer of each component city, town, or county shall create
a separate fund into which shall be paid all money collected from taxes
or from any other available sources, levied by or obtained for the
activated authority on property or on any other available sources in
such city, town, or county ((and such)). The collected money shall be
forwarded quarterly by the treasurer of each such city, town, or county
to the treasurer of the county designated by the board as the
((authority)) treasurer for the authority. The treasurer of the county
((so)) designated to serve as treasurer of the authority shall
establish and maintain ((such)) funds as ((may be)) authorized by the
board.
Money shall be disbursed from ((such)) funds collected under this
section upon warrants drawn by either the authority or the auditor of
the county designated by the board as the ((authority)) auditor for the
authority, as authorized by the board.
If an authority chooses to use a county auditor for the
disbursement of funds, the respective county shall be reimbursed by the
board for services rendered by the ((treasurer and)) auditor of the
respective county in connection with the ((receipt and)) disbursement
of ((such)) funds under this section.

--- END ---