BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the decision of
the Washington state supreme court in King County v. Central Puget
Sound Growth Management Hearings Board, 142 Wn.2d 543 (2000) reflects
the original and continuing intent of the legislature regarding
designation and conservation of agricultural lands under the growth
management act, when it says that the act creates an agricultural
conservation imperative that imposes an affirmative duty on local
governments to designate and conserve agricultural lands in order to
assure the maintenance and enhancement of the agricultural resource
industry, and, again, when it says that agricultural lands are
protected not for the sake of their ecological role but to ensure the
viability of the resource-based industries that depend upon them.
Allowing conversion of resource lands to other uses or allowing
incompatible uses impairs the viability of the agricultural industry.
The legislature intends to clarify the existing requirements of the
growth management act that pertain to conservation of agricultural
lands, in order to help assure that comprehensive plans and
corresponding development regulations adopted by local governments
conserve agricultural lands according to the original and continuing
intent of the growth management act as reflected in King County v.
Central Puget Sound Growth Management Hearings Board, 142 Wn.2d 543
(2000).

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.020 and 2002 c 154 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following goals are adopted to guide the development and
adoption of comprehensive plans and development regulations of those
counties and cities that are required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040. The following goals are not listed in order of priority
and shall be used exclusively for the purpose of guiding the
development of comprehensive plans and development regulations:
(1) Urban growth. Encourage development in urban areas where
adequate public facilities and services exist or can be provided in an
efficient manner.
(2) Reduce sprawl. Reduce the inappropriate conversion of
undeveloped land into sprawling, low-density development.
(3) Transportation. Encourage efficient multimodal transportation
systems that are based on regional priorities and coordinated with
county and city comprehensive plans.
(4) Housing. Encourage the availability of affordable housing to
all economic segments of the population of this state, promote a
variety of residential densities and housing types, and encourage
preservation of existing housing stock.
(5) Economic development. Encourage economic development
throughout the state that is consistent with adopted comprehensive
plans, promote economic opportunity for all citizens of this state,
especially for unemployed and for disadvantaged persons, promote the
retention and expansion of existing businesses and recruitment of new
businesses, recognize regional differences impacting economic
development opportunities, and encourage growth in areas experiencing
insufficient economic growth, all within the capacities of the state's
natural resources, public services, and public facilities.
(6) Property rights. Private property shall not be taken for
public use without just compensation having been made. The property
rights of landowners shall be protected from arbitrary and
discriminatory actions.
(7) Permits. Applications for both state and local government
permits should be processed in a timely and fair manner to ensure
predictability.
(8) Natural resource industries. Maintain and enhance natural
resource-based industries, including productive timber, agricultural,
and fisheries industries. Encourage the conservation of productive
forest lands and productive agricultural lands, ((and)) discourage
incompatible uses, and prevent new incompatible uses on designated
agricultural lands of long-term commercial significance unless allowed
under RCW 36.70A.177.
(9) Open space and recreation. Retain open space, enhance
recreational opportunities, conserve fish and wildlife habitat,
increase access to natural resource lands and water, and develop parks
and recreation facilities.
(10) Environment. Protect the environment and enhance the state's
high quality of life, including air and water quality, and the
availability of water.
(11) Citizen participation and coordination. Encourage the
involvement of citizens in the planning process and ensure coordination
between communities and jurisdictions to reconcile conflicts.
(12) Public facilities and services. Ensure that those public
facilities and services necessary to support development shall be
adequate to serve the development at the time the development is
available for occupancy and use without decreasing current service
levels below locally established minimum standards.
(13) Historic preservation. Identify and encourage the
preservation of lands, sites, and structures, that have historical or
archaeological significance.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.177 and 2006 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county or a city may use a variety of innovative zoning
techniques in areas designated as agricultural lands of long-term
commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170. The innovative zoning
techniques should be designed to conserve agricultural lands and
encourage the agricultural economy. Except as provided in subsection
(3) of this section, a county or city should encourage nonagricultural
uses to be limited to lands with poor soils or otherwise not suitable
for agricultural purposes.
(2) Innovative zoning techniques a county or city may consider
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Agricultural zoning, which limits the density of development
and restricts or prohibits nonfarm uses of agricultural land and may
allow accessory uses, including nonagricultural accessory uses and
activities, that support, promote, or sustain agricultural operations
and production, as provided in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Cluster zoning, which allows new development on one portion of
the land, leaving the remainder in agricultural or open space uses;
(c) Large lot zoning, which establishes as a minimum lot size the
amount of land necessary to achieve a successful farming practice;
(d) Quarter/quarter zoning, which permits one residential dwelling
on a one-acre minimum lot for each one-sixteenth of a section of land;
and
(e) Sliding scale zoning, which allows the number of lots for
single-family residential purposes with a minimum lot size of one acre
to increase inversely as the size of the total acreage increases.
(3) Accessory uses allowed under subsection (2)(a) of this section
shall comply with the following:
(a) Accessory uses shall be located, designed, and operated so as
to not interfere with, and to support the continuation of, the overall
agricultural use of the property and neighboring properties, and shall
comply with the requirements of this chapter;
(b) Accessory uses may include:
(i) Agricultural accessory uses and activities, including but not
limited to the storage, distribution, and marketing of regional
agricultural products from one or more producers, agriculturally
related experiences, or the production, marketing, and distribution of
value-added agricultural products, including support services that
facilitate these activities; and
(ii) Nonagricultural accessory uses and activities as long as they
are consistent with the size, scale, and intensity of the existing
agricultural use of the property and the existing buildings on the
site. Nonagricultural accessory uses and activities, including new
buildings, parking, or supportive uses, shall not be located outside
the general area already developed for buildings and residential uses
and shall not otherwise convert more than one acre of agricultural land
to nonagricultural uses; and
(c) Counties and cities have the authority to limit or exclude
accessory uses otherwise authorized in this subsection (3) in areas
designated as agricultural lands of long-term commercial significance.
(4) Except as provided in this subsection, wetland mitigation
banking projects may be permitted by conditional or special use on
agricultural lands, including agricultural lands of long-term
commercial significance, if the local government has adopted the
criteria for evaluating such projects established by rule by the
department. "Wetland mitigation banking project" means any private or
public project on a site where wetlands are restored, created,
enhanced, or in exceptional circumstances, preserved expressly for the
purpose of providing compensatory mitigation in advance of authorized
impacts to similar resources. Conservation projects that consist
exclusively of planting vegetation or on-site mitigation projects
required for permitted activities are allowed. The department shall
work with representatives from the department of agriculture, the
department of ecology, county governments, and interested stakeholders
to develop, and adopt by rule, the permitting criteria that counties
can use to decide whether and how to evaluate proposals for the
establishment of mitigation banks on agricultural lands of long-term
commercial significance. The criteria shall reflect the priority
expressed in this chapter for preserving agricultural lands of long-term commercial significance, without entirely precluding the
establishment of mitigation banks sites necessary to meet long-term
mitigation objectives. The criteria shall minimize the impact on the
continued agricultural use of agricultural lands of long-term
commercial significance. By January 1, 2008, the department shall
provide a written report on the recommended criteria to the chief clerk
of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate.
(5) This section shall not be interpreted to limit agricultural
production on designated agricultural lands.

--- END ---