BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An annual surcharge of two dollars per motor vehicle must be
imposed on every motor vehicle liability insurance policy issued or
renewed on or after the effective date of this section. The surcharge
must be paid by the policyholder to the insurer. The insurer shall
collect the surcharge and remit it to the department of revenue in
accordance with RCW 82.32.045, which will collect, administer, audit,
and enforce the surcharge. All other applicable provisions of chapter
82.32 RCW have full force and application with respect to the surcharge
imposed under this section. The office of the insurance commissioner
shall provide to the department of revenue the information needed by
the department of revenue to collect the surcharge. The surcharge is
not to be considered premiums of the insurer and is not subject to
premium taxes, however, nonpayment of the surcharge by the insured may
be a valid reason for cancellation of the policy. The surcharge
imposed on policyholders under this section is not subject to
retaliatory tax provisions.
(2) All insurers required to collect the surcharge under this
section must register with the department of revenue under RCW
82.32.030.
(3) Two-thirds of the proceeds from the surcharge must be deposited
into the state patrol highway account created in RCW 46.68.030 to be
used for additional emphasis patrols in high-accident-corridor
locations on state routes; and the remainder must be deposited into the
highway safety fund created in RCW 46.68.060 to be used to create a
county road high-accident-corridor emphasis patrol program. The
program must be administered by the Washington state traffic safety
commission. County law enforcement may apply to the commission for
emphasis patrols on specific high-accident-corridors within their
county. The commission shall determine what criteria to use in
awarding these emphasis patrols. The emphasis patrols shall be
performed by the Washington state patrol at no cost to the county. For
purposes of this section, "high-accident-corridor" means a highway
corridor of one mile or more where a five-year analysis of collision
history indicates that the section has higher than average collision
and severity factors.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.18.170 and 1947 c 79 s .18.17 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Premium" as used in this code means all sums charged, received, or
deposited as consideration for an insurance contract or the continuance
thereof. "Premium" does not include the annual surcharge imposed under
section 1 of this act. Any assessment, or any "membership," "policy,"
"survey," "inspection," "service" or similar fee or charge made by the
insurer in consideration for an insurance contract is deemed part of
the premium.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.18.180 and 1994 c 203 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The premium stated in the policy ((shall)) must be inclusive of
all fees, charges, premiums, or other consideration charged for the
insurance or for the procurement thereof.
(2) No insurer or its officer, employee, agent, solicitor, or other
representative ((shall)) may charge or receive any fee, compensation,
or consideration for insurance, which is not included in the premium
specified in the policy.
(3) Each violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor, as
provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(4) This section does not apply to a fee paid to a broker by an
insured as provided in RCW 48.17.270.
(5) This section does not apply to the surcharge imposed under
section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The surcharge required by section 1 of this act, to be
collected by the insurer, shall be deemed to be held in trust by the
insurer until paid to the department of revenue, and any insurer, who
appropriates or converts the surcharge collected to the insurer's own
use or to any use other than the payment of the surcharge to the extent
that the money required to be collected is not available for payment on
the due date, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor as provided in chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(2) If any insurer fails to collect the surcharge imposed in
section 1 of this act or, having collected the surcharge, fails to pay
it to the department of revenue in the manner prescribed by this
chapter, whether such failure is the result of the insurer's own acts
or the result of acts or conditions beyond the insurer's control, the
insurer shall, nevertheless, be personally liable to the state for the
amount of the surcharge.
(3) The amount of the surcharge, until paid by the insured to the
insurer, constitutes a debt from the insured to the insurer and any
insurer, who fails or refuses to collect the surcharge as required with
intent to violate the provisions of this chapter or to gain some
advantage or benefit, either direct or indirect, and any insured who
refuses to pay any surcharge due under section 1 of this act, is guilty
of a misdemeanor as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter may not apply to the surcharge imposed in section 1 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 35.102 RCW
to read as follows:
Taxes imposed under the authority of this chapter may not apply to
the surcharge imposed under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect August 1, 2007.

--- END ---