BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.530 and 2003 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful:
(a) For any person to operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle
not equipped with mirrors on the left and right sides of the motorcycle
which shall be so located as to give the driver a complete view of the
highway for a distance of at least two hundred feet to the rear of the
motorcycle or motor-driven cycle: PROVIDED, That mirrors shall not be
required on any motorcycle or motor-driven cycle over twenty-five years
old originally manufactured without mirrors and which has been restored
to its original condition and which is being ridden to or from or
otherwise in conjunction with an antique or classic motorcycle contest,
show, or other such assemblage: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no mirror is
required on any motorcycle manufactured prior to January 1, 1931;
(b) For any person to operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle
which does not have a windshield unless wearing glasses, goggles, or a
face shield of a type conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol;
(c) For any person to operate or ride upon a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped on a state highway, county road, or city street
unless wearing upon his or her head a motorcycle helmet except when the
vehicle is an antique motor-driven cycle or automobile that is licensed
as a motorcycle or when the vehicle is equipped with seat belts and
roll bars approved by the state patrol. The motorcycle helmet neck or
chin strap must be fastened securely while the motorcycle or motor-driven cycle is in motion. Persons operating electric-assisted
bicycles shall comply with all laws and regulations related to the use
of bicycle helmets;
(d) For any person to transport a child under the age of five on a
motorcycle or motor-driven cycle;
(e) For any person to transport a child who is at least five years
old but less than twelve years old on a motorcycle or motor-driven
cycle whose feet do not rest firmly on passenger foot rests and who is
either not sufficiently supported by a firmly affixed passenger back
rest or is not using a handgrip mechanism; or
(f) For any person to sell or offer for sale a motorcycle helmet
that does not meet the requirements established by this section.
(2) The state patrol may adopt and amend rules, pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act, concerning standards for glasses,
goggles, and face shields.
(3) For purposes of this section, "motorcycle helmet" means a
protective covering for the head consisting of a hard outer shell,
padding adjacent to and inside the outer shell, and a neck or chin
strap type retention system, with a sticker indicating that the
motorcycle helmet meets standards established by the United States
Department of Transportation.

--- END ---