BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.640 and 2001 c 88 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An employer, if requested by an employee, is encouraged but not
required, to become infant-friendly.
(2) An employer may use the designation "infant-friendly" on its
promotional materials and otherwise, if the employer has an approved
workplace breastfeeding policy addressing at least the following:
(a) Flexible work scheduling, including scheduling breaks and
permitting work patterns that provide time for expression of breast
milk;
(b) A convenient, sanitary, safe, and private location, other than
a restroom, allowing privacy for breastfeeding or expressing breast
milk;
(c) A convenient clean and safe water source with facilities for
washing hands and rinsing breast-pumping equipment located in the
private location specified in (b) of this subsection; and
(d) A convenient hygienic refrigerator in the workplace for the
mother's breast milk.
(((2))) (3) Employers seeking approval of a workplace breastfeeding
policy must submit the policy to the department of health. The
department of health shall review and approve those policies that meet
the requirements of this section. The department may directly develop
and implement the criteria for "infant-friendly" employers, or contract
with a vendor for this purpose.
(((3))) (4) If available, an employer shall include in its
personnel policy a section on its infant-friendly policy and whether it
has been approved by the department. If the employer does have a
workplace infant-friendly policy of its own or one that is
department-approved, that information must be given to its employees
upon their request. If an employer does not have an infant-friendly
policy in place, that information must be disclosed to the requesting
employee.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "employer" includes those
employers defined in RCW 49.12.005 and also includes the state, state
institutions, state agencies, political subdivisions of the state, and
municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department will convene a stakeholder group of appropriate
representatives to develop standard model infant-friendly policies that
may be adjusted to accommodate individual businesses.
(2) The department shall disseminate information on how to obtain
the sample infant-friendly policies and obtain an infant-friendly
designation to employers through existing mailings going to employers
from other state agencies.
(3) Within existing resources serving expectant and new mothers,
the department must provide the sample infant-friendly policies to
doctors, licensed midwives, lactation consultants, and hospitals for
distribution to expectant and new mothers to help them talk with their
employers and facilitate a successful return to work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of fifty-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the department of health
for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---