BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A seller of a low-cost single-family dwelling unit
constructed by the seller who has paid the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
is eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance, provided that
the low-cost single-family dwelling unit is sold to a qualified low-income buyer for use as that buyer's primary residence. The amount of
the remittance shall be computed under (b) of this subsection and shall
be based on the state share of sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.
(b) A seller of a low-cost single-family dwelling unit claiming an
exemption from the state tax in the form of a remittance under this
subsection must pay the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020. After the low-cost single-family dwelling unit is sold, the seller may then apply to
the department for a remittance of fifty percent of the tax paid under
RCW 82.08.020 on: (i) Tangible personal property incorporated as an
ingredient or component of the low-cost single-family dwelling unit
during the course of constructing such dwelling unit; (ii) charges made
for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing of the
low-cost single-family dwelling unit; and (iii) charges made for labor
and services rendered in respect to installing building fixtures during
the course of constructing the low-cost single-family dwelling unit.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying sellers under this subsection, who submitted
applications during the previous quarter.
(2)(a) A qualified low-income buyer who constructs, contracts for
the construction of, or purchases a low-cost single-family dwelling
unit and who has paid the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 is eligible for
an exemption in the form of a remittance, provided that the low-cost
single-family dwelling unit is used as the qualified low-income buyer's
primary residence.
(b) A qualified low-income buyer claiming an exemption from the
state tax in the form of a remittance under (a) of this subsection must
pay the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020. After the qualified low-income
buyer obtains an occupancy permit from the local permit issuing
authority or otherwise has the right to occupy the low-cost single-family dwelling unit, the qualified low-income buyer may then apply to
the department for a remittance of fifty percent of the tax paid under
RCW 82.08.020 on: (i) The purchase of the low-cost single-family
dwelling unit; (ii) tangible personal property incorporated as an
ingredient or component of the low-cost single-family dwelling unit
during the course of constructing such dwelling unit; (iii) charges
made for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing of
the low-cost single-family dwelling unit; and (iv) charges made for
labor and services rendered in respect to installing building fixtures
during the course of constructing the low-cost single-family dwelling
unit.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying buyers under this subsection, who submitted
applications during the previous quarter.
(3) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on certification by the housing finance commission and through
audit and other administrative records. A seller or qualified
low-income buyer claiming an exemption under this section shall submit
an application to the department for a remittance under this section,
in a form and manner prescribed by the department, specifying the
amount of exempted tax claimed and the qualifying purchases for which
the exemption is claimed. As part of the application, the seller or
qualified low-income buyer shall provide to the department invoices or
other satisfactory proof of tax paid on the purchases for which an
exemption is claimed. The seller or qualified low-income buyer shall
also provide certification from the housing finance commission that the
low-cost single-family dwelling unit was sold to a qualified low-income
buyer or constructed or purchased by the qualified low-income buyer, to
be used as that buyer's primary residence.
(4) A seller of a low-cost single-family dwelling unit under this
section shall provide the housing finance commission with the name of
the buyer's lender, from which the commission will obtain the
information necessary for the commission or department to determine
whether the low-cost single-family dwelling unit was sold to a
qualified low-income buyer to be used as that buyer's primary
residence. The lender making the loan to the buyer is required to keep
any information regarding the buyer's income confidential and can only
provide such information to the commission or the department for the
purpose of this section.
(5) A buyer claiming the exemption, who meets the requirements of
subsection (2) of this section, must provide the housing finance
commission, or the department upon audit of the buyer's records, with
the information necessary for the commission or department to determine
whether the buyer is a qualified low-income buyer and that the low-cost
single-family dwelling unit is to be used as that buyer's primary
residence.
(6) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Low-cost single-family dwelling unit" means a single-family
dwelling unit, whether that unit be separate or part of a multiunit
dwelling, used as the qualified low-income buyer's primary residence
that had:
(i) A listed sales price;
(ii) An appraised value, if the unit was constructed by a qualified
low-income buyer; or
(iii) A sales price for the transfer of ownership in a condominium,
or other legal business entity where the ownership in the entity
represents the specific unit used as the qualified low-income buyer's
primary residence;
equal to or less than the applicable purchase price limits for new
construction properties for the county in which the dwelling unit is
located as specified in the homeownership program or programs of the
housing finance commission at the time of sale by a seller claiming an
exemption under subsection (1) of this section or at the time an
occupancy permit is obtained by a buyer claiming an exemption under
subsection (2) of this section obtains an occupancy permit or otherwise
has the legal right to occupy the low-cost single-family dwelling unit;
and
(iv) A deed restriction included in the sales documents and
disclosed to the buyer that requires that if the home is sold within
twenty-four months of the date of purchase, the seller must repay to
the department the full amount of the tax exemption remitted by the
department under the exemptions in this section and section 2 of this
act.
The housing finance commission shall determine whether the single-family dwelling unit meets the sales price or appraised value
requirements of this definition. An appraisal for purposes of this act
must be conducted by either the county assessor or an appraiser
licensed to practice in the state approved by the commission.
(b) "Multiunit dwelling" means a building that contains two or more
dwelling units, including a building containing nonresidential units if
the building also contains two or more dwelling units. Multiunit
dwelling includes but is not limited to condominiums and buildings
containing two or more dwelling units where an ownership interest in a
business entity represents the ownership of specific dwelling units
within the building. Multiunit dwelling does not include hotels and
motels, dormitories, nursing homes or other care facilities, or
floating homes.
The exemption in this section only applies to the portion of the
multiunit dwelling in which the qualified low-income buyer resides and
does not apply to common areas. The applicable exemption shall be
determined by an apportionment method or methods provided by department
by rule.
(c) "Qualified low-income buyer" means a buyer who:
(i) Has an income of no more than eighty percent of the higher of
the: (A) Median family income, adjusted for household size, for the
county where the single-family dwelling unit is located; or (B) state
median income; and
(ii) Is an eligible participant in: (A) The homeownership program
or programs of the housing finance commission; or (B) a federal, state,
or local affordable housing program certified by the commission to be
meeting the same goals as the programs of the commission for the
purposes of this act.
(d) "Condominium" has the meaning provided in RCW 64.34.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A seller of a low-cost single-family dwelling unit who has
paid the tax levied by RCW 82.12.020 is eligible for an exemption in
the form of a remittance, provided that the low-cost single-family
dwelling unit is sold to a qualified low-income buyer for use as that
buyer's primary residence. The amount of the remittance shall be
computed under (b) of this subsection and shall be based on the state
share of use tax.
(b) A seller of a low-cost single-family dwelling unit claiming an
exemption from the state tax in the form of a remittance under this
section must pay the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020. After the low-cost
single-family dwelling unit is sold, the seller may then apply to the
department for a remittance of fifty percent of the tax paid under RCW
82.12.020 on tangible personal property incorporated as an ingredient
or component of the low-cost single-family dwelling unit during the
course of constructing such dwelling unit, and charges made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the constructing of the low-cost
single-family dwelling unit, and charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to installing building fixtures during the course
of constructing the low-cost single-family dwelling unit.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying sellers under this section, who submitted
applications during the previous quarter.
(2)(a) A qualified low-income buyer who constructs a low-cost
single-family dwelling unit and who has paid the tax levied by RCW
82.12.020 is eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance,
provided that the low-cost single-family dwelling unit is used as the
qualified low-income buyer's primary residence.
(b) A qualified low-income buyer claiming an exemption from the
state tax in the form of a remittance under (a) of this subsection must
pay the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020. After the qualified low-income
buyer obtains an occupancy permit from the local permit issuing
authority, the qualified low-income buyer may then apply to the
department for a remittance of fifty percent of the tax paid under RCW
82.12.020 on tangible personal property incorporated as an ingredient
or component of the low-cost single-family dwelling unit during the
course of constructing such dwelling unit, and charges made for labor
and services rendered in respect to installing building fixtures during
the course of constructing the low-cost single-family dwelling unit.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying buyers under this section, who submitted
applications during the previous quarter.
(3) A seller of a low-cost single-family dwelling unit claiming the
exemption under this section shall provide the housing finance
commission with the name of the buyer's lender, from which the
commission will obtain the information necessary for the commission or
department to determine whether the low-cost single-family dwelling
unit was sold to a qualified low-income buyer to be used as that
buyer's primary residence. The lender providing the exemption is
required to keep any information regarding the buyer's income
confidential and can only provide such information to the commission or
the department for the purpose of this section.
(4) A qualified low-income buyer claiming the exemption, who meets
the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, must provide the
housing finance commission, or the department upon audit of the buyer's
records, with the information necessary for the commission or
department to determine whether the low-cost single-family dwelling
unit is to be used as that buyer's primary residence.
(5) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on certification by the housing finance commission and through
audit and other administrative records.
(6) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2007.

--- END ---