BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) The legislature finds that in
Washington, there are more than seven thousand three hundred children
in foster family or group care. These children face unique obstacles
and burdens as they transition to adulthood, including lacking
continuity in their elementary and high school educations. As compared
to the general population of students, twice as many foster care youth
change schools at least once during their elementary and secondary
school careers, and three times as many change schools at least three
times. Only thirty-four percent of foster care youth graduate from
high school within four years, compared to seventy percent for the
general population. Of the former foster care youth who earn a high
school diploma, more than twenty-eight percent earn a GED instead of a
traditional high school diploma. This is almost six times the rate of
the general population. Research indicates that GED holders tend not
to be as economically successful as the holders of traditional high
school diplomas. Only twenty percent of former foster care youth who
earn a high school degree enroll in college, compared to over sixty
percent of the population generally. Of the former foster care youth
who do enroll in college, very few go on to earn a degree. Less than
two percent of former foster care youth hold bachelor's degrees,
compared to twenty-eight percent of Washington's population generally.
(b) Former foster care youth face two critical hurdles to enrolling
in college. The first is a lack of information regarding preparation
for higher education and their options for enrolling in higher
education. The second is finding the financial resources to fund their
education. As a result of the unique hurdles and challenges that face
former foster care youth, a disproportionate number of them are part of
society's large group of marginalized youth and are at increased risk
of continuing the cycle of poverty and violence that frequently plagues
their families.
(c) Former foster care youth suffer from mental health problems at
a rate greater than that of the general population. For example, one
in four former foster care youth report having suffered from
posttraumatic stress disorder within the previous twelve months,
compared to only four percent of the general population. Similarly,
the incidence of major depression among former foster care youth is
twice that of the general population, twenty percent versus ten
percent.
(d) There are other barriers for former foster care youth to
achieving successful adulthood. One-third of former foster care youth
live in households that are at or below the poverty level. This is
three times the rate for the general population. The percentage of
former foster care youth who report being homeless within one year of
leaving foster care varies from over ten percent to almost twenty-five
percent. By comparison, only one percent of the general population
reports having been homeless at sometime during the past year. One in
three former foster care youth lack health insurance, compared to less
than one in five people in the general population. One in six former
foster care youth receive cash public assistance. This is five times
the rate of the general population.
(e) Approximately twenty-five percent of former foster care youth
are incarcerated at sometime after leaving foster care. This is four
times the rate of incarceration for the general population. Of the
former foster care youth who "age out" of foster care, twenty-seven
percent of the males and ten percent of the females are incarcerated
within twelve to eighteen months of leaving foster care.
(f) Female former foster care youth become sexually active more
than seven months earlier than their nonfoster care counterparts, have
more sexual partners, and have a mean age of first pregnancy of almost
two years earlier than their peers who were not in foster care.
(2) The legislature intends to create the passport to college
promise pilot program. The pilot program will initially operate for a
six-year period, and will have two primary components, as follows:
(a) Significantly increasing outreach to foster care youth between
the ages of fourteen and eighteen regarding the higher education
opportunities available to them, how to apply to college, and how to
apply for and obtain financial aid; and
(b) Providing financial aid to former foster care youth to assist
with the costs of their public undergraduate college education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cost of attendance" means the cost associated with attending
a particular institution of higher education as determined by the
higher education coordinating board, including but not limited to
tuition, fees, room, board, books, personal expenses, and
transportation, plus the cost of reasonable additional expenses
incurred by an eligible student and approved by a financial aid
administrator at the student's school of attendance.
(2) "Emancipated from foster care" means a person who was a
dependent of the state in accordance with chapter 13.34 RCW and who was
receiving foster care in the state of Washington when he or she reached
his or her eighteenth birthday.
(3) "Financial need" means the difference between a student's cost
of attendance and the student's total family contribution as determined
by the method prescribed by the United States department of education.
(4) "Independent college or university" means a private, nonprofit
institution of higher education, open to residents of the state,
providing programs of education beyond the high school level leading to
at least the baccalaureate degree, and accredited by the Northwest
association of schools and colleges, and other institutions as may be
developed that are approved by the higher education coordinating board
as meeting equivalent standards as those institutions accredited under
this section.
(5) "Institution of higher education" means:
(a) Any public university, college, community college, or technical
college operated by the state of Washington or any political
subdivision thereof; or
(b) Any independent college or university in Washington; or
(c) Any other university, college, school, or institute in the
state of Washington offering instruction beyond the high school level
that is a member institution of an accrediting association recognized
by rule of the higher education coordinating board for the purposes of
this section: PROVIDED, That any institution, branch, extension, or
facility operating within the state of Washington that is affiliated
with an institution operating in another state must be a separately
accredited member institution of any such accrediting association, or
a branch of a member institution of an accrediting association
recognized by rule of the board for purposes of this section, that is
eligible for federal student financial aid assistance and has operated
as a nonprofit college or university delivering on-site classroom
instruction for a minimum of twenty consecutive years within the state
of Washington, and has an annual enrollment of at least seven hundred
full-time equivalent students.
(6) "Program" means the passport to college promise pilot program
created in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The passport to college promise pilot
program is created. The purpose of the program is:
(1) To encourage current and former foster care youth to prepare
for, attend, and successfully complete higher education; and
(2) To provide current and former foster care youth with the
educational planning, information, institutional support, and direct
financial resources necessary for them to succeed in higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The higher education coordinating board
shall design and, to the extent funds are appropriated for this
purpose, implement, a program of supplemental scholarship and student
assistance for students who have emancipated from the state foster care
system after having spent at least one year in care.
(2) The board shall convene and consult with an advisory committee
to assist with program design and implementation. The committee shall
include but not be limited to former foster care youth and their
advocates; representatives from the state board for community and
technical colleges, and from public and private agencies that assist
current and former foster care recipients in their transition to
adulthood; and student support specialists from public and private
colleges and universities.
(3) To the extent that sufficient funds have been appropriated for
this purpose, a student is eligible for assistance under this section
if he or she:
(a) Emancipated from foster care on or after January 1, 2007, after
having spent at least one year in foster care subsequent to his or her
sixteenth birthday;
(b) Is a resident student, as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2);
(c) Is enrolled with or will enroll on at least a half-time basis
with an institution of higher education in Washington state by the age
of twenty-one;
(d) Is making satisfactory academic progress toward the completion
of a degree or certificate program, if receiving supplemental
scholarship assistance;
(e) Has not earned a bachelor's or professional degree; and
(f) Is not pursuing a degree in theology.
(4) A passport to college scholarship under this section:
(a) Shall not exceed resident undergraduate tuition and fees at the
highest-priced public institution of higher education in the state; and
(b) Shall not exceed the student's financial need, less a
reasonable self-help amount defined by the board, when combined with
all other public and private grant, scholarship, and waiver assistance
the student receives.
(5) An eligible student may receive a passport to college
scholarship under this section for a maximum of five years after the
student first enrolls with an institution of higher education or until
the student turns age twenty-six, whichever occurs first. If a student
turns age twenty-six during an academic year, and would otherwise be
eligible for a scholarship under this section, the student shall
continue to be eligible for a scholarship for the remainder of the
academic year.
(6) The higher education coordinating board, in consultation with
and with assistance from the state board for community and technical
colleges, shall perform an annual analysis to verify that those
institutions of higher education at which students have received a
scholarship under this section have awarded the student all available
need-based and merit-based grant and scholarship aid for which the
student qualifies.
(7) In designing and implementing the passport to college student
support program under this section, the board, in consultation with and
with assistance from the state board for community and technical
colleges, shall ensure that a participating college or university:
(a) Has a viable plan for identifying students eligible for
assistance under this section, for tracking and enhancing their
academic progress, for addressing their unique needs for assistance
during school vacations and academic interims, and for linking them to
appropriate sources of assistance in their transition to adulthood;
(b) Receives financial and other incentives for achieving
measurable progress in the recruitment, retention, and graduation of
eligible students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Effective operation of the passport to
college promise pilot program requires early and accurate
identification of former foster care youth so that they can be linked
to the financial and other assistance that will help them succeed in
college. To that end:
(1) All institutions of higher education that receive funding for
student support services under section 4 of this act shall include on
their applications for admission or on their registration materials a
question asking whether the applicant has been in foster care in
Washington state for at least one year since his or her sixteenth
birthday. All other institutions of higher education are strongly
encouraged to include such a question. No institution may consider
whether an applicant may be eligible for a scholarship or student
support services under this chapter when deciding whether the applicant
will be granted admission.
(2) The department of social and health services shall devise and
implement procedures for efficiently, promptly, and accurately
identifying students and applicants who are eligible for services under
section 4 of this act, and for sharing that information with the higher
education coordinating board and with institutions of higher education.
The procedures shall include appropriate safeguards for consent by the
applicant or student before disclosure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) To the extent funds are appropriated for
this purpose, the higher education coordinating board, with input from
the state board for community and technical colleges, the foster care
partnership, and institutions of higher education, shall develop and
maintain an internet web site and outreach program to serve as a
comprehensive portal for foster care youth in Washington state to
obtain information regarding higher education including, but not
necessarily limited to:
(a) Academic, social, family, financial, and logistical information
important to successful postsecondary educational success;
(b) How and when to obtain and complete college applications;
(c) What college placement tests, if any, are generally required
for admission to college and when and how to register for such tests;
(d) How and when to obtain and complete a federal free application
for federal student aid (FAFSA); and
(e) Detailed sources of financial aid likely available to eligible
former foster care youth, including the financial aid provided by this
chapter.
(2) The board shall determine whether to design, build, and operate
such program and web site directly or to use, support, and modify
existing web sites created by government or nongovernmental entities
for a similar purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) To the extent funds are appropriated for
this purpose, the department of social and health services, with input
from the state board for community and technical colleges, the higher
education coordinating board, and institutions of higher education,
shall contract with at least one nongovernmental entity through a
request for proposals process to develop, implement, and administer a
program of supplemental educational transition planning for youth in
foster care in Washington state.
(2) The nongovernmental entity or entities chosen by the department
shall have demonstrated success in working with foster care youth and
assisting foster care youth in successfully making the transition from
foster care to independent adulthood.
(3) The selected nongovernmental entity or entities shall provide
supplemental educational transition planning to foster care youth in
Washington state beginning at age fourteen and then at least every six
months thereafter. The supplemental transition planning shall include:
(a) Comprehensive information regarding postsecondary educational
opportunities including, but not limited to, sources of financial aid,
institutional characteristics and record of support for former foster
care youth, transportation, housing, and other logistical
considerations;
(b) How and when to apply to postsecondary educational programs;
(c) What precollege tests, if any, the particular foster care youth
should take based on his or her postsecondary plans and when to take
the tests;
(d) What courses to take to prepare the particular foster care
youth to succeed at his or her postsecondary plans;
(e) Social, community, educational, logistical, and other issues
that frequently impact college students and their success rates; and
(f) Which web sites, nongovernmental entities, public agencies, and
other foster care youth support providers specialize in which services.
(4) The selected nongovernmental entity or entities shall work
directly with the school counselors at the foster care youths' high
schools to ensure that a consistent and complete transition plan has
been prepared for each foster care youth who emancipates out of the
foster care system in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The higher education coordinating board
shall report to appropriate committees of the legislature by January
15, 2008, on the status of program design and implementation. The
report shall include a discussion of proposed scholarship and student
support service approaches; an estimate of the number of students who
will receive such services; baseline information on the extent to which
former foster care youth who meet the eligibility criteria in section
4 of this act have enrolled and persisted in postsecondary education;
and recommendations for any statutory changes needed to promote
achievement of program objectives.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges and the
higher education coordinating board shall monitor and analyze the
extent to which eligible young people are increasing their
participation, persistence, and progress in postsecondary education,
and shall jointly submit a report on their findings to appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2009, and by December 1,
2011.
(3) The Washington state institute for public policy shall complete
an evaluation of the passport to college promise pilot program and
shall submit a report to appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2012. The report shall estimate the impact of the program
on eligible students' participation and success in postsecondary
education, and shall include recommendations for program revision and
improvement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Nothing in this chapter may be construed to:
(1) Guarantee acceptance by, or entrance into, any institution of
higher education; or
(2) Limit the participation of youth, in or formerly in, foster
care in Washington state in any other program of financial assistance
for postsecondary education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This chapter expires June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---