BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and,
subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar
amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be
sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2009, out of the several funds specified in this act.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Fiscal year 2008" or "FY 2008" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2008.
(b) "Fiscal year 2009" or "FY 2009" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2009.
(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.
Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion
of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is
unnecessary to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (88-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $558,000
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,823,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,381,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $511,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,892,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Program (02-4-008)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $724,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,977,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,701,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Highline School District Aircraft Noise Mitigation (03-H-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the Highline
school district, the port of Seattle, and the federal aviation
administration each matching the appropriation in section 150, chapter
26, Laws of 2003, 1st sp. sess.
(2) This reappropriation does not commit the state to make future
appropriations for this program.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,699,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building for the Arts (04-4-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.750.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
104, chapter 277, Laws of 2004.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,739,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,490,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,229,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
City of Woodland Infrastructure Development (04-4-959)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The project must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) The reappropriation is provided for allocation by the
department to the city of Woodland for infrastructure development,
including drainage improvements and a dike access road.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $194,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Services Facilities Program (04-4-006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of RCW 43.63A.125.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
128, chapter 26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $633,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,298,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,931,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Account (04-4-002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Expenditures of the appropriation shall comply with RCW
70.119A.170.
(2)(a) The state building construction account reappropriation is
provided solely to provide assistance to counties, cities, and special
purpose districts to identify, acquire, and rehabilitate public water
systems that have water quality problems or have been allowed to
deteriorate to a point where public health is an issue. Eligibility is
confined to applicants that already own at least one group A public
water system and that demonstrate a track record of sound drinking
water utility management. Funds may be used for: Planning, design,
and other preconstruction activities; system acquisition; and capital
construction costs.
(b) The state building construction account reappropriation must be
jointly administered by the department of health, the public works
board, and the department of community, trade, and economic development
using the drinking water state revolving fund loan program as an
administrative model. In order to expedite the use of these funds and
minimize administration costs, this reappropriation must be
administered by guidance, rather than rule. Projects must generally be
prioritized using the drinking water state revolving fund loan program
criteria. All financing provided through this program must be in the
form of grants that must partially cover project costs. The maximum
grant to any eligible entity may not exceed twenty-five percent of the
funds allocated to the appropriation in section 201, chapter 277, Laws
of 2004.

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,942,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,631,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,773,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,927,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water SRF - Authorization to Use Loan Repayments
(04-4-010)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Lewis & Clark Confluence Project (04-2-954)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The project must comply with RCW
43.63A.125(2)(c) and other requirements for community projects
administered by the department.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,938,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,062,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local/Community Projects (04-4-011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department,
except that the Highline historical society project is land
acquisition.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
204, chapter 277, Laws of 2004.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,177,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,138,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,315,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Funds (04-4-001)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $177,630,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $184,393,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $362,023,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building for the Arts (06-4-005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.750.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
104, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,549,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,141,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,690,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Services Facilities Program (06-4-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,230,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,345,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local/Community Projects (06-4-008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) Funding for the Inland Northwest Science and Technology Center
shall be held in reserve until the balance of phase I funding has been
secured or committed from local government and community sources.
(3) The Washington state arts commission shall design a plaque that
shall be affixed to buildings or displayed as part of a project
receiving any appropriation from this section. The plaque shall
provide information to the public that the building or project has been
made possible by the tax dollars of Washington citizens. The
commission may contact the secretary of state to obtain approval for
use of the Washington seal in the design of the plaque. The final
design shall be approved by the chairs and ranking members of the house
of representatives capital budget committee and the senate ways and
means committee.
(4) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
106, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,725,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,074,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,799,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Youth Recreational Facilities Program (06-4-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.135.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
136, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,091,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,209,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Economic Revitalization Board (CERB) (06-4-011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: A maximum of twenty-five percent of the
reappropriation in this section may be used for grants.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,449,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,449,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Program (06-4-003)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,100,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,780,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,880,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(06-4-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $9,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
weatherization administered through the energy matchmakers program.
(2) Up to $5,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely to
promote development of safe and affordable housing units for persons
eligible for services from the division of developmental disabilities
within the department of social and health services.
(3) Up to $2,500,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
grants to nonprofit organizations and public housing authorities for
revolving loan, self-help housing programs for low and moderate income
families.
(4) Up to $1,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
shelters, transitional housing, or other housing facilities for victims
of domestic violence.
(5) Up to $5,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
the development of emergency shelters and transitional housing
opportunities for homeless families with children.
(6) Up to $8,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary
farmworkers. It is the intent of the legislature that operation of the
facilities built under this section be in compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec.
1342. The department shall work with the farmworker housing advisory
committee to identify sufficient farmworker housing projects to support
a goal of providing $16,000,000 for farmworker housing, and to
prioritize funding of projects to the areas of highest need. Funding
may also be provided, to the extent qualified projects are submitted,
for health and safety projects.
(7) The reappropriation in this section shall not be used for the
administrative costs of the department. The amount of the
reappropriation shall be included in the calculation of annual funds
available for determining the administrative costs authorized under RCW
43.185.050.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(06-4-851)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $7,800,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for the backlog, as defined by the
department, of projects determined by the department to be eligible
under chapter 43.185 or 43.185A RCW.
(2) $4,500,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for weatherization administered
through the energy matchmakers program.
(3) $850,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely to promote development of safe and
affordable housing units for persons eligible for services from the
division of developmental disabilities within the department of social
and health services.
(4) $500,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for shelters, transitional housing, or
other housing facilities for victims of domestic violence.
(5) $3,000,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for farm worker housing projects and
programs to meet the full spectrum of housing needs of Washington's
farm workers and their families. The department shall work with
stakeholders representing a diversity of farm worker housing interests
to develop a strategic plan in implementing this provision.
(6) $200,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for the implementation and management
of a manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant ombudsman conflict
resolution program by the office of mobile home affairs as generally
described in section 3, chapter 429, Laws of 2005. The office of
mobile home affairs shall also determine the number of complaints made
to the department since May of 2005 that, in the best estimate of the
department, do in fact present violations of chapter 59.20 RCW and
shall produce a summary of the number and types of complaints. The
office of mobile home affairs shall also continue to maintain and
update a database with information about all mobile home parks and
manufactured housing communities. The office of mobile home affairs
shall provide a report regarding the activities and results of the
program to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives
and the senate by December 31, 2007.
(7) $150,000 of the appropriation from the Washington housing trust
account is provided solely for a program to assist individuals and
communities in the home-buying process, including, but not limited to:
Homebuyer education classes, credit and budget counseling, financial
literacy training, and down payment assistance programs. The department
shall contract with a nonprofit organization as defined under section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or similar successor provision
that has experience and expertise in addressing language access
barriers in the home-buying process to implement this program.
(8) The reappropriation in this section must be included in the
calculation of annual funds available for determining the
administrative costs of the department, which shall not exceed five
percent of the annual funds available for the housing assistance
program and the affordable housing program as authorized under RCW
43.185.050 and 43.185A.030.

Reappropriation:
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Job/Economic Development Grants (06-4-950)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
107, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.
(2) Up to $1,000,000 of the reappropriation for the Pacific
Northwest national labs campus infrastructure project is provided
solely for giga-pop infrastructure.
(3) Up to $5,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
military communities infrastructure projects. Military communities
infrastructure projects shall include:
(a) Grants to counties and cities for the purchase of development
easements to restrict the use of accident potential zones and clear
zones. The office of financial management shall establish a
competitive process for selecting projects to receive the grants.
Final allocation of these grants shall be at the discretion and with
the approval of the director of the office of financial management.
The grants are subject to the following conditions:
(i) The county or city must be subject to and in compliance with
RCW 36.70A.530;
(ii) The grants may not be used to remove encroachments into these
zones allowed by county or city zoning or permitting actions;
(iii) The county or city must have an encroachment prevention plan
preventing future encroachment into these zones; and
(iv) The grant provided by the state must not exceed one-third of
the project cost with funds from local and federal sources providing
the balance of the funds.
(b) Up to $481,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
improvements to a military department site on Fairchild air force base.

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,815,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,185,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Jobs in Communities (06-4-951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
140, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,199,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,051,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (06-4-004)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (06-4-010)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,993,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $134,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,127,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Water System Acquisition and Rehabilitation Program (06-4-850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation must be jointly
administered by the department of health, the public works board, and
the department of community, trade, and economic development using the
drinking water state revolving fund loan program as an administrative
model. In order to expedite the use of these funds and minimize
administration costs, this reappropriation must be administered by
guidance, rather than rule. Projects must generally be prioritized
using the drinking water state revolving fund loan program criteria.
All financing provided through this program must be in the form of
grants that must partially cover project costs. The maximum grant to
any eligible entity may not exceed twenty-five percent of the funds
allocated to this appropriation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building for the Arts Grants (07-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.750.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Projects Location Recommendation

Wing Luke Asian museum Seattle $2,000,000

Friends of Gladish Pullman $48,000

Town hall association Seattle $750,000

Duwamish tribal services Seattle $275,000

Seattle art museum Seattle $1,750,000

Village theatre Issaquah $575,000

Artspace projects, Inc. Seattle $1,000,000

Suquamish foundation Suquamish $550,000

Edmonds center for the arts Edmonds $1,000,000

The Merc playhouse society Twisp $9,500

Orcas open arts Eastsound $70,000

Whatcom film association Bellingham $325,000

Whatcom museum society Bellingham $1,000,000

Seattle theatre group Seattle $750,000

Confluence gallery Twisp $77,000

Columbia theatre association Longview $750,000

San Juan community theatre Friday Harbor $193,000

Harlequin productions Olympia $75,000

Northshore performing arts center Bothell $350,000

Tacoma musical playhouse Tacoma $75,000

Wing it productions Seattle $20,000

826 Seattle Seattle $7,500

Cornish College of the Arts Seattle $350,000

Total $12,000,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Economic Revitalization Board (07-4-015)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: A maximum of twenty-five percent of the
appropriation may be used for grants.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,711,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,289,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Services Facilities Grants (07-4-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.125.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Projects Location Recommendation

West Seattle food bank Seattle $400,000

Compass health Lynnwood $37,000

Neighborhood house Seattle $1,000,000

White Center emergency food association White Center $184,000

Garden-raised bounty Olympia $170,000

Food lifeline Seattle $122,000

Marysville food bank Marysville $187,000

Maple Valley food bank Maple Valley $117,000

The Arc of Whatcom county Bellingham $158,000

CAC of Lewis, Mason, and Thurston county Lacey $260,000

South county senior center Edmonds $200,000

Chief Seattle club Seattle $350,000

Senior center of West Seattle Seattle $350,000

YMCA of Snohomish county Monroe $1,000,000

The Salvation Army - Spokane Spokane $275,000

Asian counseling and referral services Seattle $1,000,000

Camas institute foundation Usk $650,000

Youth eastside services Bellevue $750,000

YMCA of Snohomish county Everett $275,000

Bellingham food bank Bellingham $400,000

N.A.T.I.V.E. project Spokane $375,000

Brigid Collins family support center Bellingham $200,000

Family resource center Redmond $150,000

Morningside Olympia $587,000

First step family support center Port Angeles $200,000

Olympic community action programs Port Townsend $400,000

Total $9,797,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,797,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,797,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Program (07-4-004)

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,200,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,100,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $183,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(07-4-009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $9,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
weatherization administered through the energy matchmakers program.
(2) $5,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to promote
development of safe and affordable housing units for persons eligible
for services from the division of developmental disabilities within the
department of social and health services.
(3) $2,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants
to nonprofit organizations and public housing authorities for revolving
loan, self-help housing programs for low and moderate income families.
(4) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
shelters, transitional housing, or other housing facilities for victims
of domestic violence.
(5) $11,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary
farmworkers. The operation of the facilities built under this section
shall be in compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1342. The department shall
work with the farmworker housing advisory committee to prioritize
funding of projects to the areas of highest need. Funding may also be
provided, to the extent qualified projects are submitted, for health
and safety projects.
(6) $5,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
development of emergency shelters and transitional housing
opportunities for homeless families with children.
(7) $2,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
development of farm infrastructure improvements.
(8) The appropriation in this section shall not be used for the
administrative costs of the department. The amount of the
appropriation shall be included in the calculation of annual funds
available for determining the administrative costs authorized under RCW
43.185.050.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Job Development Fund Grants (07-4-010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the following list of projects:

Projects Location Recommendation

Mint farm industrial park phase 2 infrastructure
improvements
City of Longview
$1,982,000

Fruitdale road/McGarigle road improvements Skagit county $2,277,000

Valentine road corridor improvements City of Pacific $4,946,000

Wenatchee waterfront revitalization project City of Wenatchee $10,000,000

Northeast Lacey public infrastructure and economic
stimulus package City of Lacey $9,912,000

Soap Lake spa and wellness center City of Soap Lake $1,000,000

Port of Ephrata transportation center Port of Ephrata $471,000

Project Pier 1 Port of Anacortes $5,610,000

Totem Lake mall and business center City of Kirkland $3,000,000

Burnham/Borgen interchange improvements City of Gig Harbor $5,000,000

Satsop development park turbine/administration
building improvements Grays Harbor public development
authority
$5,053,000

Technical and scientific service incubator City of Tacoma $250,000

Total $49,501,000

Appropriation:
Job Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,930,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Job Economic Development Grant (07-4-007)

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (07-4-005)

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (07-4-008)

Appropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,127,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,508,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,635,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Small Business Loan Capital (07-4-011)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,440,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,440,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (07-4-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.135.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Projects Location Recommendation

YMCA of the inland northwest Spokane $800,000

Boys and girls clubs of south Puget Sound Lakewood $300,000

YMCA of Snohomish county Mukilteo $385,000

YMCA of Snohomish county Everett $800,000

Boys and girls club of south Puget Sound Gig Harbor $600,000

Toutle river ranch Longview $525,000

Boys and girls club of Bellevue Bellevue $800,000

YMCA of Tacoma-Pierce county Gig Harbor $800,000

Wenatchee valley YMCA Wenatchee $213,000

YMCA of greater Seattle Seattle $250,000

Maple Valley community center Maple Valley $100,000

Boys and girls clubs of King county Seattle $618,000

Filipino community of Seattle Seattle $146,000

Boys and girls clubs of King county Seattle $800,000

Total $7,137,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,137,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,137,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
High Risk Farms and Forests Program (08-4-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $3,000,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for grants to the cascade land conservancy to purchase
or lease development rights or conservation easements from willing
family forest landowners facing pressure to convert their lands and who
desire to keep their land in active forest management. The department
shall award grants to the conservancy only for transfer of development
rights programs approved by the local government participants.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Infrastructure Assistance (08-4-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
relocation of the city of Hamilton. This funding is subject to a
$3,000,000 match in federal funds. If $3,000,000 in federal funds are
not provided, the amount in this subsection shall lapse. The funding
in this subsection is the sole commitment of funds that the state shall
make for this activity.
(2) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for an
infrastructure grant to the city of Tieton for water system
improvements.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Innovation Partnership Zones (08-2-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Pursuant to chapter . . . ([House][Senate]
Bill No. . . . . (Z-0277.1/07)), Laws of 2007 (innovative partnership
zones), the state will designate unique areas of the state, innovative
partnership zones, where globally competitive companies, research
institutions, and advanced training are creating special competitive
advantages for the state. From among the innovative partnership zones,
using a competitive process, five zones or projects will be selected to
receive funding under the pilot program authorized by chapter . . .
([House][Senate] Bill No. . . . . (Z-0277.1/07)), Laws of 2007. The
appropriation in this section is provided solely for supporting
infrastructure within the selected innovative partnership zones. If
chapter . . . ([House][Senate] Bill No. . . . . (Z-0277.1/07)), Laws of
2007 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the funds in this section shall
lapse.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local and Community Projects (08-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects listed in this section must comply with RCW
43.63A.125 and other requirements for community projects administered
by the department.
(2) The appropriation is subject to the matching requirements in
the office of financial management document OFM 2007-09-084001.
(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Amount

Asian counseling and referral services $2,000,000
Korean women's association $1,500,000
El centro de la raza $821,000
Granger community center $500,000
Seattle Chinese garden $500,000
Northwest African American museum $650,000
Innovative services northwest $1,900,000
Fox theater $2,000,000
McCaw hall $3,000,000
Confluence project $500,000
Northwest harvest $3,000,000
Pike Place market $1,070,000
Duwamish education center $2,000,000
The cities of Camas and Washougal $500,000
Goodwill of Tacoma $1,500,000
Nisei veterans committee $250,000
Washington state fairs association $400,000
Bremerton Harborside commons $3,000,000
Emmanuel family life center $500,000
CASA latina $250,000
The northwest maritime center $1,000,000
Jewish federation of greater Seattle $300,000
Tacoma's salishan community $500,000
Aberdeen union gospel mission $562,000
City of Kent Event Center $3,000,000
Children's hospital $3,000,000
Everett Memorial stadium $433,000
Spokane county's Avista stadium $2,000,000
Cheney stadium $2,500,000
Pasco stadium $666,000
Yakima county stadium $433,000
Performing arts center eastside $1,000,000
The city of Puyallup riverwalk trail project $250,000
Hanford Reach national monument heritage and visitor
center $1,000,000
Seattle art museum $1,250,000
YMCA of Spokane and YMCA of the inland northwest $2,200,000
Vancouver national historic reserve $250,000
City of Mount Vernon downtown and waterfront flood
control project $1,000,000

Total $47,185,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,185,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,185,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Remote Jurisdictions Broadband Grants (08-4-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Stampede Pass (08-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1042 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Washington State Horse Park (08-2-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1043 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Agriculture Pilot Projects (08-4-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1044 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Graving Dock Settlement (08-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the
purposes of settling all identified and potential claims from the port
of Port Angeles and the city of Port Angeles related to the
construction of a graving dock facility on the graving dock property.
In conjunction with the settlement agreement in Lower Elwha Klallam
Tribe et al v. State et al, Thurston county superior court, cause no.
05-2-01595-8, the city of Port Angeles, port of Port Angeles, and the
state of Washington entered into an economic development agreement
which settles all claims related to graving dock property and
associated construction and releases the state from all claims related
to the construction of the graving dock facilities. The expenditure of
this appropriation is contingent on the conditions and limitation set
forth in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section.
(2) $7,500,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the city of Port Angeles for
funding capital projects intended to enhance economic development.
(3) $7,500,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the port of Port Angeles for
funding capital projects intended to enhance economic development.
(4) $480,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the city of Port Angeles for
archaeological work as specified in the settlement agreement.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,480,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,480,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1045 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Snohomish, Island, and Skagit County Regional Higher Education
(08-2-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The office of financial management is directed to assess
options and make recommendations on the siting of a higher education
institution in the Snohomish-Island-Skagit county region. The office
of financial management shall develop the operational and management
plans needed to establish the institution, including but not limited
to: A master business plan for design and implementation; governance;
site selection; and programs to be offered to address demographic
pressures and workforce needs. Planning and analysis shall be done in
coordination with the local community and existing higher education
institutions. The office of financial management shall evaluate sites
based on, but not limited to, the following criteria: Meeting the
objectives of the master business plan; meeting the unmet baccalaureate
needs in the region including high demand program needs; compliance
with provisions of the state's growth management act; and accessibility
from existing and planned transportation infrastructure.
(2) The office of financial management shall report its findings to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2007.
(3) The office of financial management may contract with outside
sources to carry out the provisions of this section.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Transportation Building Preservation (02-1-008)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,425,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,180,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,605,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Capitol Public/Historic Facilities: Preservation Minor Works
(06-1-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $524,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $524,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1048 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Engineering and Architectural Services (06-2-012)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $874,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,724,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Highway-License Building Repair and Renewal (06-1-013)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $788,000
Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,598,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,639,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,088,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Natural Resources Building Repairs and Renewal (06-1-014)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $252,000
Appropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $258,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,223,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,481,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,266,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,249,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Statewide Infrastructure: Preservation Minor Works (06-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $311,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,490,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,816,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,816,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Statewide Office Facilities: Preservation Minor Works (06-1-003)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $629,000
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $820,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,449,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,449,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1053 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Statewide Parking Facilities: Preservation Minor Works (06-1-007)

Reappropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $806,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $806,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1054 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Capitol Campus High Voltage System Improvements (08-1-010)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,204,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,204,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1055 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Deferred Maintenance (08-1-018)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1056 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
East Plaza Repairs: Phase 5 (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,285,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,167,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,452,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1057 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Emergency Repairs (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1058 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Engineering and Architectural Services (08-2-013)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $380,000
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,340,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $461,000
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,418,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,815,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,233,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1059 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
General Administration Building Renovation (08-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1060 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building Improvements (08-1-011)

Appropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $676,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,836,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,512,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1061 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-015)

Appropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,715,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,456,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,634,000
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,386,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,191,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,365,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,556,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1062 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-004)

Appropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,899,000
General Administration Service Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,721,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,006,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,727,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1063 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Program (08-2-012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $370,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,720,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,090,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1064 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
O'Brien Building Improvements (08-1-007)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,501,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,501,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1065 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Pritchard Building Rehabilitation (08-2-017)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1066 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
SERVICES
Capitol Campus Data Center (08-3-002)

Appropriation:
Data Processing Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1067 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Omnibus Support to Federal Preservation Projects (04-1-003)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,186,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,243,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,750,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,993,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1068 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Auditorium and Instructor Support Facility (06-2-003)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1069 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Omnibus Support for Federal Minor Works Projects-Statewide
(06-2-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,571,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $429,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1070 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Design and Construct Olympia Area Readiness Center (06-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $173,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,041,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,291,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1071 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Energy Conservation Project (08-2-005)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1072 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-004)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,522,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,801,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,323,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,867,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1073 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works - Program (08-2-003)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,938,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,665,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,603,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,215,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,818,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1074 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Washington Youth Academy Facility (08-2-001)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,128,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,428,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,428,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1075 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Historical Preservation (06-4-009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1076 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Historical Preservation (08-4-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1077 FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Convention and Trade Center Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,990,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,990,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1078 FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
Omnibus Minor Works (2006-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Convention and Trade Center Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $995,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $995,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Mapping of K-8 Schools (08-4-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,236,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,236,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Minor Works - Preservation (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $669,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $669,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Replace Hawthorne Hall Dormitory (08-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,439,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,689,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Echo Glen Children's Center-Housing Units (00-1-041)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,492,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,992,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Developmental Disabilities: Omnibus Programmatic Projects
(06-2-465)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital-Westlake Building: Fire Alarm Upgrades
(06-1-370)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Fircrest School - Health and Safety Improvements (06-1-852)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES

Green Hill School: New IMU, Health Center, and Administration
(06-2-202)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,325,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Juvenile Rehabilitation: Omnibus Programmatic Projects (06-2-265)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Lakeland Village-Nine Cottages: Renovation, Phase 4, 5, and 6
(06-1-402)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,990,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,390,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health Division-CLIP Facilities: Preservation (06-4-353)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,381,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health Division-Eastern Washington: Evaluation and Treatment
(06-4-352)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health: Omnibus Programmatic Projects (06-2-365)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Omnibus Preservation: Facility Preservation (06-1-112)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Omnibus Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements
(06-1-111)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Omnibus Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-113)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Rainier School: Storm and Sanitary Sewer, Phase 3 (06-1-853)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $665,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $765,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide: Emergency and Unanticipated Repair Projects (06-1-101)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $630,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide: Hazards Abatement and Demolition (06-1-119)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Capital Project Management (08-1-110)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,555,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,870,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Echo Glen Children's Center: Housing Units Renovation (08-1-041)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,185,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,585,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Emergency Repairs (08-1-101)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $933,000
State Social and Health Services Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Hazards Abatement and Demolition (08-1-119)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-112)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (08-1-111)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-113)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Program Projects (08-2-365)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,230,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Renovate Eastern State Hospital Administration Building (08-1-303)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $530,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,445,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Replace Eastern State Hospital Boiler Plant Building (08-1-314)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,855,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,555,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Special Commitment Center Medium Management Housing Addition
(08-2-505)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Upgrade Eastern State Hospital Communications Systems (08-1-306)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,280,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Utility Replacements at the Special Commitment Center (08-1-504)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,040,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Western State Hospital Laundry Upgrades (08-1-325)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building
(08-1-319)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is for predesign and
design. Design will not be allotted until the predesign is reviewed and
approved by the office of financial management. The predesign will
assess cook chill alternatives showing staffing and other operating
efficiencies such as providing food for the special commitment center
and other facilities located in Pierce County.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,820,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,470,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: Chiller Plant Upgrade (02-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,266,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,588,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,854,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: Roof Replacement (06-1-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $592,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,033,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,625,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $386,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,531,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,917,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Minor Works - Program (08-2-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,542,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,677,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory Addition (08-2-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,184,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,984,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,168,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning
Systems Upgrades (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,912,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,912,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Shoreline Campus Master Plan (08-2-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $255,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $255,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2042 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (06-4-001)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,674,000
Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,360,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $179,334,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2043 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Building 10 Assisted Living Upgrades (08-2-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,813,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,813,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2044 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-003)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $722,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $633,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,355,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2045 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works - Program (08-2-002)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $344,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $231,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2046 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
State Veterans Cemetery (08-2-004)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,886,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $939,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2047 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Emergency Repairs (08-1-004)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2048 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $596,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $420,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,016,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2049 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,025,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,591,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2050 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Coyote Ridge Corrections Center: Design and Construct Medium
Security Facility (98-2-011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,459,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,449,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $244,608,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2051 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Regional Infrastructure (04-2-008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,221,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,729,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2052 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: North Close Security Compound
(04-2-005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,482,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,276,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,758,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2053 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Install Close Custody Slider Doors
(06-2-070)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $660,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,581,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,331,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2054 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Replace Support Building Roof
(06-1-044)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,119,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,633,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,752,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2055 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Cedar Creek Corrections Center: Add 100 Minimum Security Beds
(06-2-851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,621,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $608,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,229,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2056 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Larch Corrections Center: 80 Bed Expansion (06-2-852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,814,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $258,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,072,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2057 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Complex: Improve C and D Units Security Features
(06-1-046)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,618,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,898,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2058 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
McNeil Island Corrections Center: Replace/Stabilize Housing Unit
Siding (06-1-005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $445,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $349,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,024,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,818,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2059 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Mission Creek: Add 120 Beds (06-2-017)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,711,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $714,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2060 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Omnibus Preservation: Facility Preservation (Minor Works)
(06-1-035)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,268,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,565,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,833,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2061 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Omnibus Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code (Minor Works)
(06-1-027)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,839,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,261,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2062 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Omnibus Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation (Minor Works)
(06-1-025)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,589,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,237,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,826,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2063 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Omnibus Program: Programmatic Projects (Minor Works) (06-2-033)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $515,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,915,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2064 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: Health Care Facility (06-2-043)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $340,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,027,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,727,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2065 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Health Care Facility (06-2-072)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,039,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $161,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,592,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,792,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2066 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Stafford Creek Corrections Center: Correct Security Deficiencies
(06-1-013)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $593,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,593,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2067 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide: Add Minimum Security Beds (06-2-950)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,561,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,882,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,443,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2068 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women Healthcare Center
(06-2-066)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $758,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,858,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $442,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,058,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2069 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women: Replace Steamlines
(06-1-018)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $772,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,179,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $244,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,195,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2070 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Replace Correctional Industry Roof
(06-1-023)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,165,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,086,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,451,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2071 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: South Close Security Complex
(06-2-021)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,470,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,294,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,530,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,193,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $134,487,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2072 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

100 Bed Expansion at Mission Creek Corrections Center for Women
(08-2-020)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,627,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,627,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2073 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Airway Heights Heating and Cooling Loop Replacement (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2074 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Close Sewer Lagoon at Monroe Correctional Complex (08-2-022)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $229,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,736,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,965,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2075 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Emergency Repairs (08-1-035)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2076 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Expand Reception Center at Washington Corrections Center (08-2-016)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $470,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,353,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,823,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2077 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Laundry Improvements at Washington State Penitentiary (08-1-033)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,051,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,051,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2078 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-024)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2079 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (08-1-031)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2080 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-018)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2081 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Barge Slip Pilings at McNeil Island Corrections Center
(08-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2082 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Cell Door and Electronics at Washington State Reformatory
(08-1-010)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,545,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,545,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2083 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Electrical Distribution Building at Special Offenders Unit
(08-1-009)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,222,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,222,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2084 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Fire Alarm System at Washington Corrections Center
(08-1-008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,524,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,524,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2085 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace G Building Roof at Washington Corrections Center (08-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,431,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,431,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2086 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Kitchen Roofs at Monroe Correctional Complex (08-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,062,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,062,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2087 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Roofs at Washington Corrections Center (08-1-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,666,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,666,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2088 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Roofs at Washington State Penitentiary (08-1-007)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,789,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,789,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2089 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Telecommunications Infrastructure at Clallam Bay (08-1-013)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,691,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,541,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2090 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Sex Offender Treatment Program Building at Airway Heights
(08-2-028)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,947,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,947,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2091 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
Employment Resource Center (05-2-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely for services and activities including the purchase and
installation of state of the art equipment for a 40,000 square foot
facility supporting work force development programs using funds
available to the state in section 903(d) of the Social Security Act
(Reed act).

Reappropriation:
Unemployment Compensation Administration
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,690,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,310,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2092 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
Employment Security Headquarters Building Assessment (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
Unemployment Compensation Administration
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2093 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
Walla Walla WorkSource Expansion Project (08-2-001)

Appropriation:
Unemployment Compensation Administration
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $409,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $409,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (74-2-006)

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,756,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,543,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,299,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Fund (86-2-007)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $706,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $323,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,029,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (88-2-008)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $930,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,661,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,591,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (90-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,186,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,706,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (97-2-012)

Reappropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,112,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,733,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,845,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies (01-H-010)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriations are provided solely to provide grants to
conservation districts to assist the agricultural community to
implement water conservation measures and irrigation efficiencies in
the 16 critical basins. A conservation district receiving funds shall
manage each grant to ensure that a portion of the water saved by the
water conservation measure or irrigation efficiency will be placed as
a purchase or a lease in the trust water rights program to enhance
instream flows. The proportion of saved water placed in the trust
water rights program must be equal to the percentage of the public
investment in the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency. The
percentage of the public investment may not exceed 85 percent of the
total cost of the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency. In
awarding grants, a conservation district shall give first priority to
family farms.
(2) Up to $310,000 of the water quality capital account
reappropriation is provided for water leases or projects in the Yakima
river basin for aquifer recharge necessary to allow the use of drought
wells to meet essential irrigation needs. Essential irrigation needs
is defined as eighty percent of the water a farmer would ordinarily
receive from the irrigation district, less the water that is actually
delivered and regardless of crops grown.

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,519,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $310,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,829,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,248,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,077,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Measuring Devices (01-H-009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
water measuring devices and gauges. The department shall prioritize
the distribution of water measuring devices and gauges to locations
participating in the department of fish and wildlife's fish screens and
cooperative compliance programs.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,295,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,849,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,144,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Fund (02-4-007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
conditions and limitations of section 315, chapter 8, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,645,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,954,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,599,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (02-4-002)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,902,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $574,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,476,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,737,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,213,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (02-4-006)

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,147,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,852,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Fund (04-4-007)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $7,547,044 of the water quality capital account--state
reappropriation is provided for the extended grant payment to
metro/King county.
(2) Up to $10,000,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided for the extended grant payment to
Spokane for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.
(3) Up to $2,000,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided solely for water quality facility
grants for communities with a population of less than 5,000. The
department shall give priority consideration to: (a) Communities
subject to a regulatory order from the department of ecology for
noncompliance with water quality rules; (b) projects for which design
work has been completed; and (c) projects with a local match from
reasonable water quality rates and charges.
(4) Up to $760,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided solely for the Klickitat wastewater
treatment project.
(5) Up to $800,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided solely for the comprehensive
irrigation district management program.
(6) Up to $150,000 of the water quality capital account--state
reappropriation is provided solely to contract with a regional salmon
enhancement organization for planning activities related to improving
water quality in the Hood Canal, particularly research, preservation,
and restoration of molluscan ecosystem including bivalves and other
important filtering organisms in Hood Canal.
(7) The remaining reappropriation in this section is provided for
statewide water quality implementation and planning grants and loans.
The department shall give priority consideration to projects located in
basins with critical or depressed salmonid stocks.
(8) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,511,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,461,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,972,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,780,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,752,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (04-4-008)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,140,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,256,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,396,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Site Closure - Nuclear Waste Trench Site Investigation (04-4-010)

Reappropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,126,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,135,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,261,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Twin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (04-2-951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely to
recover the department of ecology's cost in evaluating and issuing
decisions on water applications and restoration of the Twin Lakes in
the Methow Valley.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $685,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $749,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (04-4-002)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,705,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,581,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,286,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,142,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,428,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Rights Purchase/Lease (04-1-005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided for the
purchase or lease of water rights. It is also provided for the purpose
of improving stream and river flows in fish critical basins under the
trust water rights program under chapters 90.42 and 90.38 RCW.

Reappropriation:
State Drought Preparedness--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $815,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $685,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (04-4-006)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Up to $541,951 of the state building construction account
reappropriation and up to $1,733,812 of the state and local
improvements revolving account reappropriation are provided solely for
expenditure under a contract between the department of ecology and the
United States bureau of reclamation for the development of plans,
engineering, and financing reports and other preconstruction activities
associated with the development of water storage projects in the Yakima
river basin, consistent with the Yakima river basin water enhancement
project, P.L. 103-434. It is the intent of the legislature that the
contract include provision for participation of the Yakama nation, on
a government-to-government basis, in the development of plans and other
preconstruction activities concerning salmon recovery and instream
flow. A portion of the reappropriation shall be expended to provide
for the participation of the Yakama nation. The initial water storage
feasibility study shall be for the Black Rock reservoir project. The
department shall seek federal funds to augment the funding provided by
this appropriation.
(b) Up to $2,240,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided for phase 1 of restoration of
anadromous fish habitat in Manastash creek.
(c) The remainder of the state building construction account
reappropriation is provided solely for grants for the development of
plans, engineering and financing reports, acquiring land and
facilities, and other preconstruction activities associated with the
development of water storage and groundwater storage and recovery
projects. Proposed projects must be consistent with the
recommendations of the water storage task force and the governor's
water strategy. Priority for the use of these funds must be given to:
Projects that have been identified for early action through watershed
plans, comprehensive irrigation district management plans, or similar
plans; to projects that are part of an approved habitat conservation
plan or other intergovernmental agreement; or to joint projects with
federal entities such as the bureau of reclamation. The department
shall develop and administer this grants program in conjunction with
the departments of agriculture and fish and wildlife. Decisions
regarding which projects are funded must be by unanimous agreement of
all three departments. The department shall seek local and federal
funds to augment the funding provided by this reappropriation.
(2) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the department shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,537,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,571,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,108,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,518,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,626,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (05-2-852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,061,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $139,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
State Drought Preparedness (05-4-009)

The reappropriation is this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for
response to the statewide drought that was declared pursuant to chapter
43.83B RCW. The department of ecology may provide funding or
compensation for purchase or lease of water rights and to public bodies
as defined in RCW 43.83B.050 in connection with projects and measures
designed to alleviate drought conditions that may affect: Public health
and safety; drinking water supplies; agricultural activities; or fish
and wildlife survival.
(2) Projects or measures for which funding or compensation will be
provided must be connected with a water system, water source, or water
body that is receiving, or has been projected to receive, less than
seventy-five percent of normal water supply, as the result of natural
drought conditions. This reduction in water supply must be such that it
is causing, or will cause, undue hardship for the entities or fish or
wildlife depending on the water supply. General criteria for
guidelines to be established by the department of ecology for
distribution of funds must include: A balanced and equitable
distribution of these funds among the different sectors affected by
drought; a funding process that ensures funds are available for drought
impacts that arise both early and later during the course of the
drought; and preference for projects that leverage other federal and
local funds.
(3) Up to $1,500,000 of the reappropriation in this section is
provided to the Roza irrigation district for the purchase or lease of
water rights.
(4) Up to $150,000 of the reappropriation in this section is
provided solely to support the development and demonstration of water
management measures in the Walla Walla Basin that improve and protect
instream flow and water quality, and which also help sustain
agricultural and economic vitality. The director of the department
shall report to the legislature by December 31, 2007, with any
findings, conclusions, and recommendations regarding such water
management measures.
(5) Up to $50,000 of the reappropriation in this section is
provided solely to Chelan county to assess the feasibility of storing
water in Campbell creek canyon to supplement instream flows in
Peshastin creek, as part of the Peshastin irrigation district.
(6) Up to $100,000 of the reappropriation in this section is
provided solely for a study of groundwater and other issues related to
drought in the Quilcene watershed.

Reappropriation:
State Drought Preparedness--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,145,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,184,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,329,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (05-2-851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,254,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,544,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,066,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,132,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,996,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Conveyance Infrastructure Projects (05-2-850)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $1,500,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided solely for water conveyance
facilities to implement the 1996 memorandum of agreement regarding
utilization of Skagit river basin water resources for in-stream and
out-of-stream purposes.
(2) Up to $300,000 of the state and local improvements revolving
account--state reappropriation is provided solely for the Bertrand
watershed improvement district to address unpermitted water use and
environmental compliance and fund early action planning, feasibility
studies, and construction of early action projects.
(3) Up to $1,600,000 of the state building construction account--
state reappropriation is provided solely for the Middle Fork Nooksack
river water diversion system.
(4) First priority from the remaining reappropriation, up to
$1,475,000 from the state and local improvements revolving account--state appropriation, up to $350,000 from the state building
construction account--state reappropriation, and the water quality
capital account--state reappropriation, shall be the following
projects: Piping in the upper Yakima river; piping for Bull canal;
piping for the Lowden number 2 ditch; diversion reconstruction and
piping in Beaver creek; conjunctive use of surface and groundwater in
the Chewuch river; replacing surface diversions with wells and
consolidation of diversions in the Entiat river; replacing a check dam
with a siphon on Little Naneum creek; consolidate diversions on Simcoe
creek; and groundwater recharge of reclaimed water on Kitsap peninsula.
The purpose of this funding is to develop projects and take other water
management actions that benefit streamflows and enhance water supply to
resolve conflicts among water needs for municipal water supply,
agricultural water supply, and fish restoration. The streamflow or
other public benefits secured from these projects should be
commensurate with the investment of state funds.
(5) Up to $50,000 of the state building construction account--state
reappropriation is provided solely for Ahtanum creek watershed
restoration and Pine Hollow reservoir provided there is agreement among
the Yakama nation, Ahtanum irrigation district, and other
jurisdictional federal, state, and local agencies and entities to
proceed with the environmental impact statement.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,411,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,451,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $313,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $655,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,830,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (06-4-007)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $10,000,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided for the extended grant payment to
Spokane for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.
(2) Up to $5,000,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided solely for water quality grants for
hardship communities with a population of less than 5,000. The
department shall give priority consideration to: (a) Communities
subject to a regulatory order from the department of ecology for
noncompliance with water quality rules; (b) projects for which design
work has been completed; and (c) projects with a local match from
reasonable water quality rates and charges.
(3) Up to $1,000,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided solely to design appropriate
wastewater treatment facilities to serve the Hoodsport to Skokomish
reservation areas of Hood Canal. The exact facilities will be based
upon the recommendations from an analysis of wastewater management
options for the Hoodsport to Skokomish river currently being undertaken
by Mason county.
(4) Up to $750,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided solely for assistance in management
and clean up activities at Long Lake in Kitsap county and $50,000 of
the state building construction account--state reappropriation is
provided solely for assistance in cleaning up Wapato Lake in Pierce
county. The assistance is contingent on the lake communities adopting
a lake management plan that meets the department's requirement.
(5) Up to $320,000 of the water quality capital account--state
reappropriation is provided solely to Mason county to develop a septic
system database and identify failing septic systems in Hood Canal.
(6) Up to $70,000 of the water quality capital account--state
reappropriation is provided solely to Kitsap county for surveys of
septic systems in Hood Canal.
(7) Up to $70,000 of the water quality capital account--state
reappropriation is provided solely to Jefferson county for surveys of
septic systems in Hood Canal.
(8) Up to $1,500,000 of the water quality capital account--state
reappropriation is for grants for on-site sewage replacement. This
reappropriation may be used to: (a) Establish new or expand existing
on-site sewage repair and replacement loan or grant programs by county
governments or tribes; or (b) develop a pilot program to administer an
on-site sewage repair and replacement loan program through a qualified
private or nonprofit lending institution. This appropriation must be
used in conjunction with the water pollution control revolving
account--state appropriation in section 3034 of this act provided for
this purpose. Of this amount, up to $1,000,000 may be used to help
financially distressed homeowners repair and replace failing on-site
sewage systems, and up to $500,000 may be used to help local
governments plan, implement, and administer the local loan fund
assistance programs. The total overall local government and tribal
administration costs may not exceed seven percent of the total
statewide grant and loan on-site program.
(9) Up to $3,500,000 of the state toxics control account--state
reappropriation is provided solely for wastewater treatment upgrades at
Twanoh, Dosewallips, Fort Casey, Fort Ebey, Birch Bay, and Sequim Bay
state parks.
(10) Up to $600,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided solely for the community of Klickitat
to supplement other local, state, and federal funds for wastewater
treatment facility construction. Klickitat will not be required to
accept a state revolving loan as a match to the grant.
(11) Up to $1,250,000 of the state toxics control account--state
reappropriation is provided solely for accelerating toxic cleanup in
the Spokane area.
(12) Up to $1,500,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided solely for the city of Carnation
wastewater treatment system construction.
(13) Up to $1,150,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided solely for activities required to
determine the total daily maximum load (TMDLs) for the Spokane river.
(14) The remaining reappropriation in this section is provided for
statewide water quality implementation and planning grants and loans.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,761,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,343,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,104,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,320,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,424,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Cleanup Toxic Sites - Puget Sound (06-4-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for the clean
up of contaminated sites that lie adjacent to and are within one-half
mile of Puget Sound. Clean ups must include orphaned and abandoned
sites that pose a threat to Puget Sound with the highest priority sites
being cleaned up first.

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,233,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,983,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Program (06-2-950)

Reappropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Appropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Program (06-2-010)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $6,000,000 is provided solely for feasibility studies
related to off-mainstem storage projects and impacts of changing
operations at the Potholes reservoir, and grant funding for the
purchase and installation of water measuring devices.
(2) Of the amount reappropriated in this section, up to $10,000,000
is provided to begin implementation of the Columbia river basin water
supply development program in RCW 90.90.010, 90.90.020, 90.90.030,
90.90.040, and 90.90.050. Within this amount, the department shall
support, to the extent that projects are ready to proceed and to the
extent that resources allow, the following water supply projects,
including, but not limited to: (a) Storage development or storage
enhancement projects; (b) projects that provide surface water supply
for the Odessa subarea within the boundaries of the Columbia Basin
federal reclamation project; (c) projects that enhance water supplies
for the Walla Walla and Yakima rivers through exchanges and other
methods; and (d) investments resulting in water use efficiency.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,720,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,280,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (06-4-008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $4,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
grants to local governments for local projects that implement the state
"never waste" plan. Grant funds will emphasize additional organics
composting and conversion, green building, and moderate risk waste
projects described in the plan. Of this amount, up to $1,600,000 may
be used for one-time funding for auto switch recycling consistent with
the memorandum of agreement being finalized with the auto recyclers
association.
(2) Up to $2,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided for
emission reduction projects for local governments to retrofit public
sector diesel engines with exhaust emission control devices or to make
other modifications or operational changes, including cleaner fuels, to
allow public sector fleets to reduce their emissions.
(3) Up to $3,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
grants to local governments needing assistance in complying with the
new phase II storm water permit requirements. Of this amount, up to
$300,000 is provided solely for Mason county to prepare storm water
management plans for Belfair and Hoodsport consistent with the storm
water program in the Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan.
(4) Up to $70,900,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
remedial action grants. Of this amount, up to $1,000,000 is provided
to the town of Warden to respond to contamination of their existing
water system.
(5) From within this reappropriation, the department shall prepare
an online guide to help small businesses and homeowners learn what to
do if they discover toxic wastes on their property. The guide must
provide information about local resources for clean up and disposal of
toxic wastes.
(6) Up to $8,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
coordinated prevention grants provided to local governments for local
government solid and hazardous waste planning, household and small
business hazardous waste collection and disposal, recycling capital
purchases and program development, and local solid waste enforcement.

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,884,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,016,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Low Impact Development for Storm Water Management (06-2-006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
grants to local governments in Puget Sound to fund innovative, low-impact development storm water management projects to meet critical
storm water management needs and protect or restore water quality.
Projects may include use of bioretention, rainwater harvest, permeable
pavement, vegetated roofs, and other low-impact development techniques.
Projects funded in Puget Sound must meet the design guidelines
contained in the low-impact development technical guidance manual for
Puget Sound, unless the municipality can demonstrate that site
conditions warrant a deviation from the design guidelines and the
deviations in design provides similar performance. All projects must
include performance monitoring.

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Minor Works (06-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Motor Vehicle Mercury Removal Program (06-2-850)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Puget Sound Aquatic Cleanup and Restoration (06-1-005)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,129,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,871,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soil Remediation and Awareness Projects (06-2-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $700,000 of the reappropriation is
provided solely to continue clean up of the Everett Asarco residential
area.

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,059,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,909,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,968,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Waste Tire Piles (06-1-002)

Reappropriation:
Waste Tire Removal Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies (06-2-009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,499,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (06-4-002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall give priority loan funding consideration
to on-site septic system rehabilitation and replacement programs in
Mason, Kitsap, and Jefferson counties for up to $1,000,000 from the
water pollution control revolving account--state in the second year of
the funding cycle.
(2) Up to $5,000,000 of the water pollution control revolving
account--state reappropriation is for loans for on-site sewage
replacement. This reappropriation may be used to: (a) Establish new
or expand existing on-site sewage repair and replacement loan programs
by county governments or tribes; or (b) develop a pilot program to
administer an on-site sewage repair and replacement loan program
through a qualified private or nonprofit lending institution. This
appropriation must be used in conjunction with water quality capital
account--state appropriation in section 3022 of this act provided for
this purpose. The department must work with the department of health,
the Puget Sound water quality action team, local governments, and the
lending industry in developing and piloting this program. The
department shall provide a status report on the loan program to the
governor and the appropriate legislative fiscal committees by June 30,
2008, including any recommendations for improving the program.

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,874,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,664,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $213,538,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,079,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,617,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (06-2-003)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $12,000,000 of the reappropriation
is provided solely for projects and water right acquisitions to support
watershed planning efforts and achieving instream flows subject to the
following project types, conditions, and limitations:
(1) Up to $1,353,172 of the reappropriation is provided to improve
irrigation efficiency and to achieve associated flow improvements in
the Twisp and Methow rivers by providing for cleaning and lining and/or
piping of 30,943 linear feet of the irrigation canal within the lower
(downstream) seven miles of the Methow Valley irrigation district's
west canal. Of this amount, up to $100,000 is provided for a neutral
independent consultant to provide management assistance to the Methow
Valley irrigation district for purposes of identifying structural and
operational improvements to increase overall system water use
efficiency.
(2) Up to $200,000 of the reappropriation is provided for a portion
of the costs of the project level environmental impact statement for
the Ahtanum creek watershed restoration program, including construction
of the Pine Hollow reservoir, provided there is agreement among the
Yakama nation, Ahtanum irrigation district, and other jurisdictional
federal, state, and local agencies and entities to proceed with the
environmental impact statement.
(3) Up to $75,000 of the reappropriation is provided to formalize
the Ahtanum creek watershed restoration program, including
identification of site specific habitat improvement projects and
determination of the most appropriate restoration program alternative
to implement.
(4) Up to $1,500,000 of the reappropriation is provided to reduce
diversions from the Dungeness river through pipeline projects
identified in the Dungeness river comprehensive irrigation district
management plan. For at least one year from the effective date of this
section, while the parties seek resolution of the court action filed in
Thurston county superior court, No. 04-2-00078-2, none of these funds
may be allocated to any projects in the Dungeness river basin that are
within the area that is the zone of contribution for ground and surface
water infiltration to the existing Graysmarsh wetland.
(5) Up to $100,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely to the
city of Normandy Park to implement the basin plan for the Miller/Walker
and Salmon creek basins.
(6) Water storage grants for the development of plans, engineering
and financing reports, acquiring lands and facilities, and other
preconstruction activities associated with the development of water
storage and groundwater storage and recovery projects. Proposed
projects should be consistent with the recommendations of the water
storage task force. The department of ecology would issue grants in
consultation with the departments of agriculture and fish and wildlife.
(7) Infrastructure improvement projects and other water management
actions that benefit stream flows and enhance water supply to resolve
conflicts among water needs for municipal water supply, agriculture
water supply, and fish restoration. The stream flow improvements and
other public benefits secured from these projects should be
commensurate with the investment of state funds.
(8) Projects for planning, acquisition, construction, and
improvement of agriculture water supply facilities and achieving water
conservation and water use efficiency improvements.
(9) Financial assistance to purchase and install water measuring
devices at points of diversion and withdrawal. Preference would be
given to fish-critical basins, to areas participating in the department
of fish and wildlife fish screening and cooperative compliance
programs, and to basins where watershed planning has determined
additional water diversion and withdrawal information is needed.
(10) Funding for acquisition of either water or water rights, or
both, for instream flow achievement and establishment of water
accounts. The reappropriation is provided for either the purchase or
lease, or both, of water rights. It is also provided for the purpose
of improving stream and river flows in fish critical basins under the
trust water rights program under chapters 90.42 and 90.38 RCW.
(11) The department shall provide small grants to watershed
councils that have completed watershed plans. The grants are intended
to support periodic meetings and other monitoring activities of the
councils so that they can monitor the implementation of watershed
plans.
(12) Up to $250,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided solely to the department of ecology
to work with interested parties to study instream flows in the Hanford
Reach and their impact on the ecological condition of the Hanford Reach
especially as it relates to the needs of salmon and steelhead in the
Hanford Reach. The department shall submit to the office of the
governor and to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature a report of its findings by July 1, 2008.
(13) Up to $400,000 of the water quality capital account--state
reappropriation is provided solely to support the Skagit comprehensive
irrigation district management plan.
(14) Up to $400,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided solely for grants for watershed
planning, including up to $250,000 for King county, up to $75,000 for
planning for the Little Spokane river, and up to $75,000 in enhanced
funding for the Chehalis watershed council.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,540,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,940,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $858,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,798,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (08-4-010)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $10,000,000 of the state building construction account--state appropriation is provided for the extended grant payment to
Spokane for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.
(2) $5,000,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for water quality grants for hardship
communities with a population of less than 5,000. The department shall
give priority consideration to: (a) Communities subject to a
regulatory order from the department of ecology for noncompliance with
water quality rules; (b) projects for which design work has been
completed; and (c) projects with a local match from reasonable water
quality rates and charges.
(3) $2,100,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is
provided solely for wastewater and clean water improvement projects at
the following locations:
Project Amount
Illahee state park wastewater system upgrade $900,000
Fort Flagler state park wastewater system upgrade $750,000
Larrabee state park wastewater system upgrade $450,000
Total $2,100,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,800,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,700,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $223,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Cleanup Toxic Sites in Puget Sound (08-4-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for the clean
up of contaminated sites that lie adjacent to and are within one-half
mile of Puget Sound. Clean ups shall include orphan and abandoned
sites that pose a threat to Puget Sound with the highest priority sites
being cleaned up first. The department shall report on the use of
these funds to the Puget Sound partnership as part of its activities
under the 2007-2009 Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan.

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,705,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,820,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Coordinated Prevention Grants (08-4-015)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants
to local governments for local waste and pollution prevention projects.
Grants shall fund new organics composting and conversion, green
building, and moderate risk waste initiatives described in the state
"beyond waste" plan.
(2) Up to $2,000,000 of the appropriation may be used for grants to
local governments to provide alternatives to backyard burning of
organic materials. Priority for these grants shall be given to: (a)
Urban growth areas of less than 5,000 people affected by the January 1,
2007, ban on outdoor burning; (b) projects that develop infrastructure
for an on-going program; and (c) projects that coordinate regionally.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $139,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
On-Site Septic Replacement Program (08-4-012)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $3,000,000 of the water quality
capital account--state appropriation is provided in grant funding to
the Hood Canal coordinating council for use in capitalizing a Hood
Canal regional on-site sewage repair and replacement pilot program. A
qualified private or nonprofit lending institution shall provide
financial assistance for the repair, replacement, or upgrade of on-site
sewage systems.

Appropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Puget Sound Aquatic Cleanup and Restoration (08-4-004)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,905,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,620,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Puget Sound Storm Water Projects (08-2-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
grants to local governments within Puget Sound for municipal storm
water projects, including but not limited to, retrofit of existing
storm water projects in urban areas where storm water is a significant
source of contamination, identification and removal of nonstorm water
discharges into municipal storm sewer systems, and local innovative
storm water projects that implement low-impact development.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,170,000
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,680,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm Water Projects (08-2-003)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Rebuild East Wall of Ecology Headquarters (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reclaimed Water (08-4-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for grants to local governments in Puget Sound to
complete reclaimed water projects. Priority shall be given to projects
in water short areas where reclaimed water can be used to replace other
water sources and where reclaimed water can be used to restore
important ecosystem functions in Puget Sound.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,830,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,080,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,320,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reduce Health Risks from Toxic Diesel Pollution (08-4-024)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,840,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for school
bus diesel retrofits for local school districts.
(2) $2,330,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for emission
reduction projects for local governments to retrofit public sector
diesel engines to allow public sector fleets to reduce their emissions.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grants (08-4-008)

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $264,475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Repair Exterior Surfaces and Expand Emergency Power Supply
(08-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $475,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $475,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soils Remediation Grants (08-4-009)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reduce Public Health Risks from Wood Stove Pollution (08-4-019)

Appropriation:
Wood Stove Education Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Skykomish Cleanup (08-4-020)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Waste Tire Pile Cleanup (08-4-022)

Appropriation:
Waste Tire Removal Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies (08-4-028)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Loan Program (08-4-011)

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,696,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--
Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,719,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,415,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $620,415,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (08-4-029)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
grants for projects that improve water supplies and help achieve
instream flows by implementing watershed plans, as follows:
(1) Surface or ground water storage projects, where such projects
are consistent with the recommendations of the water storage task
force. The department shall consult the departments of agriculture and
fish and wildlife before issuing water storage grants.
(2) Infrastructure or water management projects that resolve
conflicts among water needs for municipal, agricultural, rural, and
fish restoration purposes. The stream flow improvements and other
public benefits secured from these projects must be commensurate with
the investment of state funds.
(3) Agricultural water supply projects that improve water
conservation and water use efficiency.
(4) Purchase and installation of water measuring devices in salmon
critical basins and areas participating in the department of fish and
wildlife fish screening and cooperative compliance program, and basins
where watershed plans call for additional water use measurement.
(5) Acquisition of water to achieve instream flows or to establish
water banks. The department shall give priority to acquisitions in
salmon critical basins. The department shall place acquired water into
the state's trust water rights program (chapters 90.38 and 90.42 RCW).

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Yakima River Basin Water Storage Feasibility Study (08-4-026)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
completion of the United States bureau of reclamation's Yakima Basin
storage feasibility study, including the associated joint national
environmental policy act, the state environmental policy act, and
environmental impact statement. The appropriated funds shall be used
by the bureau of reclamation and the department of ecology to evaluate
potential in-basin storage facilities such as the proposed Black Rock
and Wymer reservoirs and other reasonable alternatives that will
enhance water supply in the Yakima Basin.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Lewis and Clark Bicentennial (00-1-010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $174,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $174,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Spokane Centennial Trail - Unanticipated Receipt (03-2-001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Deception Pass Renovation (04-1-019)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Historic Stewardship (04-1-010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $157,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $157,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Recreation Development (04-2-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $420,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $420,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Beacon Rock - Pierce Trust (06-1-030)

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cama Beach - New Destinations (06-2-011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,515,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Coastal Parks - Renewed Traditions (06-2-012)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $230,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $230,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cowan Barn and House (06-2-851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $301,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $301,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Deception Pass - Renewed Traditions (06-2-013)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $870,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $870,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Facility Preservation - Facilities (06-1-004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $600,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely to
replace the wastewater system at Dosewallips state park.
(2) The amount provided in this section is sufficient to repair or
replace the washed out bridge on the perimeter trail at Dash Point
state park.
(3) Up to $750,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
the city of Bellevue's acquisition of parcels between Meydenbauer Beach
park and the city-owned marina.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,419,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,419,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Federal Authority (06-2-021)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $497,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $497,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fort Worden - Facilities (06-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Historic Stewardship - Stewardship (06-1-002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Hoko River Initial Property Development (06-2-850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Ice Age Floods - Cherished Resources (06-2-014)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $228,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $228,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Natural Resources - Stewardship (06-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $689,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $689,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Park Development (06-1-950)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $715,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $715,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Revenue Creation - Financial Strategy (06-2-010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Rocky Reach - Chelan County Public Utility District (06-1-023)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided to construct and surface the northern mile of Rocky Reach
trail, and partially fund installation of signs, interpretive panels,
and bridges related to the 5.1 mile project.

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--
Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Southeast Washington Parks (06-2-852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $219,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $219,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Statewide Boat Pumpout - Federal Clean Vessel Act (06-4-018)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $736,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $736,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Trails (06-2-017)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $150,000 of the reappropriation is
provided solely for the development of the North Creek trail in the
city of Mill Creek.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $649,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $649,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Deferred Maintenance (06-1-036)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,701,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,701,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Hood Canal Wastewater (06-1-850)

Reappropriation:
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,802,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,802,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Puget Sound Wastewater (06-1-851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,195,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,195,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Sustainable Development and Restoration (06-1-011)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $492,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $492,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Bay View Park Wide Wastewater Treatment System (08-2-041)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,187,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,187,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Beacon Rock-Pierce Trust Grant (08-4-034)

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--
Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Belfair Major Park Upgrade (08-1-018)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3086 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cape Disappointment Major Park Upgrade (08-1-012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,219,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,719,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3087 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Clean Vessel Boating Pumpout Grants (08-4-035)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3088 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Deferred Maintenance (08-1-025)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The state parks and recreation commission shall submit to the
office of financial management an implementation plan detailing how the
state parks and recreation commission shall address the recommendations
presented in the capital budget development, execution, and monitoring
process study dated December 2006. The implementation plan shall
include a process for identifying and scoping proposed capital
projects, management and administration of funded projects, and
implementation of best management practices by September 1, 2007.
(2) Up to $200,000 of the appropriation may be used to provide
project management systems and performance tracking systems based on
office of financial management approval of the implementation plan, and
subject to approval of allotments.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3089 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Eastern Region Visible Park Improvements (08-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,587,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,787,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3090 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Emergency Repairs (08-1-024)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3091 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Federal Grant Authority (08-4-032)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3092 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Historic Preservation (08-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3093 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Ice Age Flood (08-2-037)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3094 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Local Grant Authority (08-4-033)

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3095 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3096 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Northwest Region Visible Park Improvements (08-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3097 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Parkland Acquisition (08-2-031)

Appropriation:
Parkland Acquisition Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3098 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Pearrygin Lake Major Park Upgrade (08-2-016)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,367,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,633,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3099 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Puget Sound Region Visible Park Improvements (08-1-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,568,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,968,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3100 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Road Preservation (08-1-036)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3101 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Southwest Region Visible Park Improvements (08-1-006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3102 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Southwest Region Visible Park Improvements (08-2-006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,202,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,202,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3103 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Storm Water Improvements (08-1-027)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $571,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,571,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3104 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Trail Development (08-1-008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3105 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR
OUTDOOR RECREATION
Boating Facilities Projects (98-2-001)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,597,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,977,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,574,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3106 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Program (98-2-004)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $549,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $574,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3107 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Program (NOVA) (98-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities
Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $249,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,847,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,096,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3108 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (98-2-003)

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,767,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,252,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,019,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,582,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,601,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3109 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (00-2-001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,491,000
Salmon Recovery Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,175,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,666,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,959,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,625,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3110 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Program (02-4-001)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $766,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,167,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,933,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3111 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Infrastructure Grant (02-4-010)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $529,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,471,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3112 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Program (02-0-001)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $357,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3113 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Hatchery Management Program (02-4-009)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,482,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,719,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,201,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3114 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Land and Water Conservation Fund (02-4-005)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3115 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Program (NOVA) (02-4-002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation for the nonhighway and off road vehicle
program under RCW 46.09.170(2)(d)(i) is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: A portion of the reappropriation may be
used for grants to projects to research, develop, publish, and
distribute informational guides and maps of nonhighway and off road
vehicle trails and associated facilities meeting the requirements,
guidelines, spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with
disabilities act.
(2) The reappropriation for the nonhighway and off road vehicle
program under RCW 46.09.170(2)(d)(ii) is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The portion of the reappropriation that
applies to grants for capital facilities may be used for grants to
projects that meet the requirements, guidelines, spirit, and intent of
the federal Americans with disabilities act and do not compromise or
impair sensitive natural resources. The portion of the reappropriation
that applies to grants for management, maintenance, and operation of
existing off road vehicle recreation facilities may be used to bring
the facilities into compliance with the requirements, guidelines,
spirit, and intent of the federal Americans with disabilities act.
(3) The reappropriation for the nonhighway and off road vehicle
program under RCW 46.09.170(2)(d)(iii) is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funds may be expended for nonhighway road
recreation facilities which may include recreational trails that are
accessed by nonhighway roads and are intended solely for nonmotorized
recreational uses.

Reappropriation:
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities
Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,459,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,528,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3116 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (02-4-007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,470,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,786,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,256,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,737,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,993,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3117 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (02-4-003)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Any amount of the reappropriations that is
not obligated to a specific project may be used to fund projects in the
following order: (1) The department of natural resources Cypress
Island project; and (2) alternate projects approved by the legislature
from the same account in biennia succeeding that in which the funds
were originally appropriated.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $299,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,164,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,463,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,537,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3118 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Aquatic Lands Enhancement (04-4-018)

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,395,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,962,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,357,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3119 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Program (04-4-003)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,501,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,006,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,507,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3120 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Infrastructure Grant (04-4-009)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $720,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,280,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3121 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Family Forest Fish Blockages Program (04-4-011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $188,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,812,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3122 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Program (04-4-006)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $169,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $251,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3123 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Hatchery Management Program (04-4-010)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,002,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,997,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3124 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Land and Water Conservation Fund (04-4-007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,133,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,602,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,735,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3125 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
National Recreation Trails Program (04-4-008)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $226,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,034,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,260,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3126 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (NOVA)
(04-4-004)

Reappropriation:
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities
Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,868,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,059,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,927,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3127 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Fund Board Programs (04-4-001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,132,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,845,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,977,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,398,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,375,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3128 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (04-4-002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Any amount of the reappropriations that is
not obligated to a specific project may be used to fund alternate
projects approved by the legislature from the same account in biennia
succeeding that in which the moneys were originally appropriated.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,394,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,267,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,661,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,339,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3129 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Program (06-4-850)

Reappropriation:
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3130 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (06-4-018)

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,010,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,015,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3131 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Program (06-4-003)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,340,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,931,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,271,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3132 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Infrastructure Grant (06-4-009)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3133 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (06-4-011)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided solely for the salmon recovery
funding board in consultation with the small forest landowner office of
the department of natural resources and the department of fish and
wildlife to provide grants to correct fish passage blockages on
nonindustrial forest lands. Selection of projects must be coordinated
with the other salmon recovery grant programs provided in section 3139
of this act.
(2) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the committee shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,502,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,568,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,799,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,367,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3134 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearm and Archery Range Program (06-4-006)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $151,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3135 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Improve Hatchery Management (06-4-010)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3136 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Land and Water Conservation Fund (06-4-007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3137 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
National Recreation Trails Program (06-4-008)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $970,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3138 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Program (NOVA) (06-4-004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $100,000 of the reappropriation is
for the following studies:
(1) The committee shall prepare cost estimates for creating a
database of motorized and nonmotorized off-road trails and facilities
in Washington state. The cost estimate shall consider the possibility
of a database that allows the downloading of maps formatted for the
most widely used GPS devices, including the feasibility and cost to
make GPS maps readily available for all users of Washington
recreational lands and facilities. For this purpose, available GPS
maps shall include GPS maps developed by state agencies, by federal
agencies, and proprietary maps offered by private companies.
(2) The committee shall recommend a program for enhanced education
and enforcement regarding excessive noise from off-road vehicles. The
study shall include a review of relevant existing laws and regulations.
The recommendations shall address the appropriate equipment needed for
enforcement, model ordinances, enhanced educational strategies, and a
proposed grant program to assist local governments to more effectively
reduce the impact of excessive ORV noise in rural residential
neighborhoods and nonresidential areas, including consideration of
grant programs for planning departments, code enforcement departments,
health departments, or other entities of local government.

Reappropriation:
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities
Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,157,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,579,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3139 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Salmon Recovery Fund Board Programs (06-4-001)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are provided solely
for grants for salmon recovery efforts. These grants may include a
grant to any regional recovery board and/or may include grants for
additional restoration projects, monitoring activities, or other salmon
recovery actions.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,739,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,412,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,151,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,849,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3140 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (06-4-002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided for the approved list of
projects in LEAP capital document No. 2005-14 as developed on April 9,
2005.
(2) Funds reappropriated for distribution according to RCW
79A.15.050 shall fulfill the uses and restrictions of each category
whether the funds are distributed according to the statutory allotment,
the unallocated distribution, or a reassignment of reappropriations.
If the cumulative total for acquisition projects is less than the
statutory requirement, the difference may be allocated to the remaining
development projects.
(3) Funds reappropriated for distribution according to the
provisions of RCW 79A.15.040(1)(c) shall be allocated forty percent to
local government projects and sixty percent to state agency projects.
If the cumulative total of local government projects is less than forty
percent of the total distribution to this category, the difference may
be allocated to state agency projects.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,363,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,062,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,425,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,575,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3141 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Youth Athletic Fields (06-2-952)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3142 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (08-4-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The committee shall submit a list of
recommended projects to be funded from the aquatic lands enhancement
account in the 2007-2009 capital budget to the office of financial
management and the appropriate legislative committees. The list shall
result from a competitive grants program developed by the committee
based upon, at a minimum: (a) A uniform criteria for selecting
projects and awarding grants for up to fifty percent of the total
projects cost; (b) local community support for the projects; and (c)
environmental benefits to be derived from projects.

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,100,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3143 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Facilities Program (08-4-001)

Appropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,021,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,688,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,709,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3144 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Boating Improvement Grants (08-4-002)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3145 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Family Forest and Fish Passage Program (08-2-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) This appropriation is provided solely for the salmon recovery
funding board in consultation with the small forest landowner office of
the department of natural resources and the department of fish and
wildlife to provide grants to correct fish passage blockages on
nonindustrial forest lands. Selection of projects must be coordinated
with the other salmon recovery grant programs provided in section 3147
of this act.
(2) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the committee shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3146 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (08-4-003)

Appropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $472,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,007,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,479,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3147 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Habitat Protection and Restoration (08-4-010)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations are provided solely for grants for salmon
recovery efforts. These grants may include grants to any regional
recovery board and/or may include grants for additional restoration
projects, monitoring activities, or other salmon recovery actions.
(2) The administrative funding currently provided by the salmon
recovery funding board for the regional salmon recovery organization in
Puget Sound shall be redirected to the Puget Sound partnership created
in chapter . . . ([House][Senate] Bill No. ....), Laws of 2007 (Z-0369,
Puget Sound partnership).
(3) Prior to awarding project grants for projects in Puget Sound,
the salmon recovery funding board shall submit the list of proposed
projects to the Puget Sound partnership for their review. The Puget
Sound partnership shall provide their comments back to the salmon
recovery funding board within forty-five days of receiving the proposed
list of projects.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3148 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Hatchery Reform Program (08-4-006)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3149 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Land and Water Conservation (08-4-007)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3150 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
National Recreational Trails Program (08-4-009)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3151 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (08-4-008)

Appropriation:
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,036,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,945,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,981,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3152 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Puget Sound Restoration and Acquisition (08-4-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Prior to awarding project grants, the salmon recovery funding
board shall submit the list of proposed projects to the Puget Sound
partnership for their review. The Puget Sound partnership shall
provide their comments back to the salmon recovery funding board within
forty-five days of receiving the proposed list of projects.
(2) All estuary projects shall be submitted for review and
coordination with the executive committee of the Puget Sound nearshore
partnership between the department of fish and wildlife and the United
States army corps of engineers.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $168,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $210,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3153 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (08-4-011)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations are provided for the approved list of
projects to be submitted to the legislature by the governor.
(2) Funds appropriated for distribution according to RCW 79A.15.050
shall fulfill the uses and restrictions of each category whether the
funds are distributed according to the statutory allotment, the
unallocated distribution, or a reassignment of reappropriations. If
the cumulative total for acquisition projects is less than the
statutory requirement, the difference may be allocated to the remaining
development projects.
(3) Funds appropriated for distribution according to the provisions
of RCW 79A.15.040(1)(c) shall be allocated forty percent to local
government projects and sixty percent to state agency projects. If the
cumulative total of local government projects is less than forty
percent of the total distribution to this category, the difference may
be allocated to state agency projects.

Appropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,240,000
Farm Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,820,000
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,700,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,240,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3154 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (06-4-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The total cumulative dollar value of state
conservation reserve enhancement program grant obligations incurred by
the conservation commission and conservation districts shall not exceed
$20,000,000, as provided in the conservation reserve enhancement
program agreement between the United States department of agriculture,
commodity credit corporation, and the state of Washington executed on
October 19, 1998, and subsequent amendments.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,936,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3155 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Livestock Water Quality - Landowner Cost Share (06-4-006)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3156 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Puget Sound District Grants (06-4-003)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,605,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,705,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3157 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Water Quality Grants Program (06-4-007)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,450,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3158 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program Cost Share (08-4-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,170,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,330,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3159 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program Water Quality (08-4-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $709,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,471,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,180,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3160 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Practice Incentive Payment Loan Program (08-4-004)

Appropriation:
Conservation Assistance Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3161 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Deschutes Watershed Center (06-2-008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the design of the Deschutes Watershed center.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $255,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $595,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,695,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3162 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Department of Natural Resources Land Exchange - Shrub Steppe
(06-2-851)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely to appraise the
value of lands for exchange with the department of natural resources.
Forest lands transferred to the department of natural resources under
this section shall be actively managed by the department under a
cooperative agreement with surrounding public and private landowners to
implement landscape scale restoration and other management objectives.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3163 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Facility, Infrastructure, Lands, and Access Condition Improvements
(06-1-002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $5,000 of the reappropriation in
this section is provided solely for bank stabilization of the south
Toledo access road.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,937,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,520,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,457,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3164 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fish and Wildlife Opportunity Improvements (06-2-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3165 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Hatchery Reform, Retrofits, and Condition Improvements (06-1-001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $380,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided solely to implement a pollution
abatement pond and fish passage corrections or improvements at the
Hoodsport hatchery.
(2) Up to $700,000 of the state building construction account--state reappropriation is provided solely for improvements at the
Columbia Springs environmental education center in Vancouver,
Washington.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,195,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,076,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,271,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3166 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
2006 Flood Damage (08-1-006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $630,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3167 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (08-2-017)

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3168 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Chambers Creek Adult Trap - Phase 2 (08-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,202,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,202,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3169 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Dole Bee Be Property (06-1-950)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $950,000 is provided solely for the department to develop
an interpretive nature trail, kiosk, and associated projects at the Bee
Be Springs property.
(2) Up to $550,000 is provided solely to the department for
expenses related to cost sharing with the Chelan PUD for the
development of an acclimation pond near the Chelan river.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $380,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $570,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3170 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Emergency Projects (08-1-019)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3171 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Grazing Monitoring on Fish and Wildlife Lands (08-2-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
fencing costs necessary for grazing monitoring activities on the
department of fish and wildlife lands.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3172 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Methow Culverts Replacement (08-1-027)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $754,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $994,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,748,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3173 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-013)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,025,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3174 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Health Safety and Code Requirements (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,550,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3175 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-014)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,737,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,850,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,587,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3176 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (08-2-048)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,800,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $625,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $134,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3177 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Puget Sound Initiative - Nearshore Salmon Restoration (06-2-001)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations are provided solely for efforts to restore
nearshore habitat and estuaries in Puget Sound. The department shall
focus on restoring the natural marine shoreline process, including
protection and restoration of beach sediments and removal of existing
bulkheads.
(2) Project selection and funding decisions shall be submitted for
approval to the executive committee of the Puget Sound nearshore
partnership between the department and the United States army corps of
engineers.
(3) Funded projects require a nonstate match or in-kind
contributions. The match requirements must be approved by the
executive committee identified in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Project selection and funding decisions shall be coordinated
with the salmon recovery funding board to ensure that project funding
and matching requirements are maximized to the greatest extent
possible.
(5) The department shall not utilize any amount of this
appropriation to support administration or overhead. Funding to
support the administration of the funds and the implementation of
selected projects shall be obtained from the department's operating
budget.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3178 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Ranch Lands Irrigation Efficiencies (06-2-952)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
irrigation efficiency projects on ranch lands owned by the department.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3179 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Skookumchuck Hatchery Renovation - Phase 2 (08-2-015)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $528,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,389,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,917,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3180 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Spokane Region One Office - Phase 2 (08-2-008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,230,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3181 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Statewide Fencing Renovation and Replacement (08-1-009)

The appropriation is this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,000,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for the replacement of elk fencing lost in the 2005
school fire in the Wooten wildlife area. The department shall contract
with another state agency to construct the fence.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3182 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Sustainability and Energy Savings (06-1-009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3183 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Tokul Creek Hatchery (08-1-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $435,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,857,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,292,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3184 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Voights Creek Hatchery - Phase 1 (08-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $505,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,402,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,907,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3185 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Wiley Slough Restoration (08-1-028)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,795,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,795,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3186 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Community and Technical College Trust Land Acquisitions (08-2-004)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Forest Reserve
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3187 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Creosote Removal in Puget Sound (08-2-017)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3188 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Legacy (04-2-015)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,980,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,726,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,206,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3189 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Riparian Easement Program (08-2-022)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3190 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Land Acquisition Grants (05-2-021)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,238,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,280,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $113,363,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $185,881,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3191 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Land Bank (08-2-011)

Appropriation:
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3192 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Marine Station Public Access (04-2-019)

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $233,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,145,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,453,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3193 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Minor Works - Preservation (08-1-007)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $430,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $607,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,154,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,604,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3194 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Minor Works - Programmatic (08-2-016)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $989,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,030,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $541,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,560,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,515,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,075,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3195 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (08-1-014)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $442,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,958,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3196 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Resources Real Property Replacement (08-2-010)

Appropriation:
Natural Resources Real Property Replacement
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $194,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3197 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Recreation Capital Renovations (08-2-006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $200,000 of the appropriation shall be
used for trail system signage.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,065,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,278,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,343,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3198 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Right-of-Way Acquisition (08-2-020)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3199 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Riparian Open Space Program (08-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3200 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Road Maintenance and Abandonment Projects (06-2-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,987,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3201 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
State Lands Maintenance (08-1-019)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,350,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3202 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Statewide Aquatic Restoration Projects (06-2-008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3203 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Trust Land Transfer (08-2-005)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The total appropriation is provided to the department solely to
transfer from trust status or enter into thirty-year timber harvest
restrictive easements/leases for certain trust lands of statewide
significance deemed appropriate for state park, fish and wildlife
habitat, natural area preserve, natural resources conservation area,
open space, or recreation purposes.
(2) Property transferred under this section shall be appraised and
transferred at fair market value. The value of the timber transferred
shall be deposited by the department to the common school construction
account in the same manner as timber revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction shall be made for the resource management
cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The value of the land transferred
shall be deposited in the natural resources real property replacement
account. These funds shall be expended by the department for the
exclusive purpose of acquiring nonagricultural real property of equal
value to be managed as common school trust land.
(3) Property subject to easement/lease agreements under this
section shall be appraised at fair market value both with and without
the imposition of the easement/lease. The entire difference in
appraised value shall be deposited by the department to the common
school construction fund in the same manner as lease revenues from
other common school trust lands. No deduction shall be made for the
resource management cost account under RCW 79.64.040.
(4) All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement
this section are authorized to be paid out of the appropriations.
Authorized costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time,
environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar costs.
(5) Intergrant exchanges between common school and other trust
lands of equal value may occur if the exchange is in the interest of
each trust, as determined by the board of natural resources.
(6) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the
department, with full cooperation of the receiving agencies, shall
execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the
transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of
this section for a minimum period of thirty years. The department, in
consultation with the receiving state agencies, shall develop policy to
address requests to replace transferred properties subject to the
recorded property instrument that are no longer deemed appropriate for
the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this section.
(7) The department and receiving agencies shall work in good faith
to carry out the intent of this section. However, the department or
receiving agencies may remove a property from the transfer list based
on new, substantive information, if it is determined that transfer of
the property is not in the statewide interest of either the common
school trust or the receiving agency.
(8) The department shall execute trust land transfers and
easements/leases such that, after the deduction of reasonable costs as
provided in subsection (4) of this section, eighty percent of the
appropriation in this section is deposited in the common school
construction fund. To achieve the 80:20 ratio, the department may
offset transfers of property with low timber-to-land ratios with
easements/leases on other properties.
(9) On June 30, 2009, the state treasurer shall transfer all
remaining uncommitted funds from this appropriation to the common
school construction fund and the appropriations in this section shall
be reduced by an equivalent amount.

Appropriation:
Natural Resources Real Property Replacement
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $287,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $359,000,000

(End of part)

PART 4
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Fire Training Academy Sanitary System (08-2-002)

Appropriation:
Fire Service Training Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Minor Works - Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $480,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,480,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4003 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Replace Existing Dormitory (08-2-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,720,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,720,000

(End of part)

PART 5
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2001-2003 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (02-4-001)

Reappropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,155,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,845,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2003-2005 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (04-4-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,940,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,168,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,108,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $137,103,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $194,211,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2005-2007 Apple Achievement Awards (06-4-850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 196, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2005-2007 High Performance School Building Grants (06-4-852)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Additional funding will be provided to
school districts constructing public schools to recognized standards
for high performance public buildings for a transition period of three
years. The districts building high performance public schools will be
granted funding per school project for capital-related costs associated
with the design and construction of public K-12 schools that meet or
exceed comprehensive design, construction, and operating standards for
high performance and sustainable school buildings. No more than
$250,000 will be allotted for each elementary school built to high
performance standards, no more than $350,000 will be allotted for each
middle school built to high performance standards, and no more than
$500,000 will be allotted to each high school built to high performance
standards. These levels may be modified, in a limited manner, if
specific project conditions warrant and as determined by the office of
the superintendent of public instruction.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2005-2007 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (06-4-100)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,200,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,458,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,658,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,256,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,914,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Capital Project Administration (08-4-100)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,528,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,049,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,577,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Grants for School Portables (08-4-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
grants to school districts for purchase of portable classrooms for
schools participating in K-3 demonstration projects or state-funded
all-day kindergarten programs. Grant awards shall be prioritized based
on demonstrated need for additional classroom space in these elementary
schools and demonstrated financial need for assistance to purchase
portable classrooms to address classroom space issues.

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
School Construction Assistance Grants (08-4-200)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For state assistance grants for purposes
of calculating square foot eligibility, kindergarten student headcount
shall not be reduced by fifty percent.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $154,200,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $565,761,000
Common School Reimbursable Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $720,141,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,248,844,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,968,985,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Small Repair Grants (08-4-402)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Vocational Skills Centers (08-4-300)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $9,362,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for
minor capital projects at all of the state's skills centers ranked with
a "severity score" of 40 points or more.
(2) $23,300,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
design and construction of the Skagit Valley vocational skills center.
(3) $16,366,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
design and construction of the Yakima Valley technical skills center.
(4) $23,161,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
design and construction of the Sno-Isle skills center.
(5) $1,118,000 from this appropriation is provided solely for the
design and construction of the Clark county skills center.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,307,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,307,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Campus Preservation (06-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $770,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
New Physical Education Center (08-2-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,325,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,325,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF

Vocational Education, Cafeteria, and Maintenance Support Building
(08-2-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Bothell/Cascadia Community College - State Route 522 Off Ramp
(02-2-014)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $195,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,555,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Campus Phase 2B (02-2-027)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $136,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,199,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,335,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Land Acquisition/Soils Remediation (01-2-029)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,887,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Facility Preservation Backlog Reduction (04-1-951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,214,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,314,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Emergency Power Expansion - Phase II (04-1-024)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,148,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,648,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Classroom Improvements (05-1-850)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Guthrie Hall Psychology Facilities Renovation (05-2-851)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Allotment for this reappropriation is
contingent on the commitment of at least three million dollars in
matching federal funds for this facility.

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Infectious Disease Laboratory Facilities (05-2-850)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Playhouse Theater (05-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,578,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,578,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Architecture Hall Renovation (06-1-008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,324,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,324,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Clark Hall Renovation (06-1-007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,554,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,054,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Cleanup More Hall and Other Toxics (06-1-950)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Guggenheim Hall Renovation (06-1-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,312,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,312,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Health Sciences - H Wing (06-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-002)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5031 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (06-1-003)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-004)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Program (06-2-009)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Savery Hall Renovation (06-1-005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,910,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,510,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma - Assembly Hall (06-2-007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Land Acquisition (06-2-852)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Balmer Hall Reconstruction (08-1-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of the reconstruction/replacement of Balmer hall.
The office of financial management shall not allot funding for the
design until after sine die adjournment of the 2008 regular legislative
session and only if the predesign has been submitted to the legislative
fiscal committees and to the office of financial management for review
and approval under RCW 43.88.110(6) prior to the start of the 2008
regular legislative session.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5038 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Denny Hall Renovation (08-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of the renovation of Denny hall. The office of
financial management shall not allot funding for the design until after
sine die adjournment of the 2008 regular legislative session and only
if the predesign has been submitted to the legislative fiscal
committees and to the office of financial management for review and
approval under RCW 43.88.110(6) prior to the start of the 2008 regular
legislative session.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,915,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,915,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Interdisciplinary Academic Building (08-2-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of the interdisciplinary academic building. The
office of financial management shall not allot funding for the design
until after sine die adjournment of the 2008 regular legislative
session and only if the predesign has been submitted to the legislative
fiscal committees and to the office of financial management for review
and approval under RCW 43.88.110(6) prior to the start of the 2008
regular legislative session.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5040 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Intermediate Student Service and Classroom Improvements (08-1-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,431,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,431,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5041 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Lewis Hall Renovation (08-1-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of the renovation of Lewis hall. The office of
financial management shall not allot funding for the design until after
sine die adjournment of the 2008 regular legislative session and only
if the predesign has been submitted to the legislative fiscal
committees and to the office of financial management for review and
approval under RCW 43.88.110(6) prior to the start of the 2008 regular
legislative session.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,501,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,501,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5042 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $163,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5043 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Program (08-2-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5044 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Infrastructure Savings (08-1-151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6003 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5045 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(08-1-150)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds must be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the performance goal stated in
this subsection (2), with particular attention given to buildings
currently rated in superior to adequate condition so as to maximize
useful life given both the passage of time and intensity with which the
space is used.
(3) Section 6003 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5046 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Bothell Phase 3 (08-2-006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of the UW Bothell phase 3. The office of
financial management shall not allot funding for the design until after
sine die adjournment of the 2008 regular legislative session and only
if the predesign has been submitted to the legislative fiscal
committees and to the office of financial management for review and
approval under RCW 43.88.110(6) prior to the start of the 2008 regular
legislative session.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5047 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Phase 3 (08-2-005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
predesign and design of UW Tacoma phase 3. The office of financial
management shall not allot funding for the design until after sine die
adjournment of the 2008 regular legislative session and only if the
predesign has been submitted to the legislative fiscal committees and
to the office of financial management for review and approval under RCW
43.88.110(6) prior to the start of the 2008 regular legislative
session.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5048 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Computing and Communications Upgrades and Data Center (08-2-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Spokane Riverpoint - Academic Center Building (00-2-906)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver - Student Services Center (00-2-905)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,126,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,626,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5051 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Biotechnology/Life Sciences 2 (04-2-085)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,022,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,978,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,050,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5052 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Spokane - Nursing Building at Riverpoint (04-2-941)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Upon completion of construction of this
facility at the Riverpoint campus in Spokane, the existing land and
facilities housing the intercollegiate nursing center adjacent to
Spokane Falls Community College shall be transferred to the state board
for community and technical colleges for the use of community college
district 17, community colleges of Spokane.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5053 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Tri-Cities - Bioproducts Facility (04-2-940)

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5054 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Campus Infrastructure (06-1-073)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5055 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Capital Improvements (06-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5056 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5057 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (06-1-002)

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5058 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver - Undergraduate Classroom Building (06-2-951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,450,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5059 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Intermediate Preservation Projects (08-1-702)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,119,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,240,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,359,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5060 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Library Road Infrastructure (08-1-703)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5061 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,900,000
Washington State University Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $167,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $206,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5062 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (08-1-151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6003 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5063 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (08-2-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5064 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(08-1-150)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds must be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the performance goal stated in
this subsection (2), with particular attention given to buildings
currently rated in superior to adequate condition so as to maximize
useful life given both the passage of time and intensity with which the
space is used.
(3) Section 6003 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5065 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
University Wide Infrastructure (08-1-701)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5066 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Utilities Extension (08-1-100)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,536,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,536,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5067 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
EWU Senior Hall Renovation (00-1-003)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,631,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,431,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5068 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Patterson Hall Remodel (06-2-002)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5069 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (06-1-751)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,117,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,117,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5070 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Hargreaves Hall Renovation (06-1-701)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,821,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $914,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,235,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5071 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Martin Williamson Hall Renovation (06-1-706)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5072 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-710)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5073 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works Program (06-2-006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5074 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5075 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (08-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5076 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5077 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (08-2-001)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5078 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (08-1-151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6003 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5079 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(08-1-150)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds must be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the performance goal stated in
this subsection (2), with particular attention given to buildings
currently rated in superior to adequate condition so as to maximize
useful life given both the passage of time and intensity with which the
space is used.
(3) Section 6003 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,217,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5080 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Robert Reid Laboratory School Restoration (08-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5081 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Dean Hall Renovation (06-1-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $924,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,276,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5082 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-003)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,025,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,058,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5083 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-002)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,073,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5084 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works Program (06-2-005)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $669,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,721,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,390,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5085 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Nicholson Pavilion Indoor Air/Asbestos (06-1-008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,725,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5086 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Combined Utilities (08-1-011)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5087 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Hogue Hall Renovation and Addition (08-2-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5088 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5089 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (08-1-009)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $660,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,675,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,335,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,340,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,675,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5090 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-010)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,165,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,125,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,290,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,160,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5091 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (08-2-002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,800,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5092 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (08-1-151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6003 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5093 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(08-1-150)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds must be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the performance goal stated in
this subsection (2), with particular attention given to buildings
currently rated in superior to adequate condition so as to maximize
useful life given both the passage of time and intensity with which the
space is used.
(3) Section 6003 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5094 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Seminar Building Phase II - Construction (02-2-004)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5095 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Daniel J. Evans Building - Modernization (04-2-006)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5096 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (06-1-002)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5097 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-004)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5098 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Lab I First Floor Class/Laboratory Renovation (06-2-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5099 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-003)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5100 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works Program (06-2-005)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $425,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5101 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
College Activities Building Renovation (08-2-009)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5102 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Longhouse Expansion (08-2-007)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5103 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5104 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (08-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5105 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Preservation (08-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5106 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Infrastructure Savings (08-1-151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6003 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5107 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Program (08-2-003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $930,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5108 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(08-1-150)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds must be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the performance goal stated in
this subsection (2), with particular attention given to buildings
currently rated in superior to adequate condition so as to maximize
useful life given both the passage of time and intensity with which the
space is used.
(3) Section 6003 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5109 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Academic Instructional Center (02-2-026)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,438,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,733,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,171,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5110 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Miller Hall Renovation (04-1-953)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,523,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,227,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5111 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (06-1-083)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,440,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,290,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5112 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (06-1-082)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,330,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5113 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (06-1-084)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,530,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5114 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (06-2-085)

Reappropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5115 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Academic Facilities Modernization Projects (08-2-099)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5116 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Carver Academic Renovation (08-1-060)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,587,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,987,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5117 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-091)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,051,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,051,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5118 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (08-1-090)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,933,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,933,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5119 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-092)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,016,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,016,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5120 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (08-1-151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6003 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5121 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (08-2-093)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5122 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(08-1-150)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds must be
allocated at local discretion to achieve the performance goal stated in
this subsection (2), with particular attention given to buildings
currently rated in superior to adequate condition so as to maximize
useful life given both the passage of time and intensity with which the
space is used.
(3) Section 6003 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,614,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,614,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5123 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Pacific - Lewis and Clark Station Camp Park Project (02-S-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $666,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,885,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,551,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5124 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Lewis and Clark Trail Interpretive Infrastructure Grant (02-4-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,135,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $592,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,727,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5125 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Projects (04-4-004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,055,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,945,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5126 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Olympia - State Capital Museum: Building Preservation (06-1-003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $331,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5127 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Statewide - Washington Heritage Project Grants (06-4-004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
project list in section 733, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $664,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,664,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5128 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Tacoma- State History Museum: Building Preservation (06-1-001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $381,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $481,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5129 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Tacoma Research Center Building Preservation (07-1-002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $537,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $737,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5130 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Tacoma State History Museum Building Preservation (07-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5131 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Grants (07-4-004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:

(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
27.34.330.

(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Recommended

Cascade land conservancy $202,000
Suquamish museum and arts center $1,000,000
Moses Lake museum and arts center $1,000,000
White River Valley museum $245,000
The Tulalip tribe $1,000,000
City of Mukilteo $490,000
Lewis county historical museum $43,000
Pacific county historical society $186,000
City of Gig Harbor $1,000,000
Bainbridge Island metro parks and recreation $70,000
Polson museum $171,000
Washington trust for historic preservation $83,000
Historic Seattle PDA $500,000
City of Tacoma $77,000
City of Des Moines $1,000,000
Fort Walla Walla museum $859,000
Foss waterway seaport $300,000
LaConner quilt museum $125,000
Cowlitz River Valley historical society $158,000
Western forest industries museum $158,000
San Juan historical society $25,000
Central Washington fair association $48,000
Urban league of metro Seattle $650,000
The center for wooden boats $235,000
Jefferson county historical society $200,000
Mansfield museum $10,000
Martin Luther King Ballet $50,000
The northwest railway museum $75,000
Northpoint cooperative preschool $40,000

Total $10,000,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5132 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Women's History Preservation Grants (07-4-950)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the preservation of documents that are important in revealing the role
of women in the history of the region and the role Washington women
played in the nation's history.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5133 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Building Management System (08-1-003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5134 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Campbell House Long-Term Preservation (08-1-002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to
repair the foundation, sandstone, mortar, brick, chimney, and roof of
state-owned National Register property "Campbell house" and its
carriage house.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $402,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $695,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5135 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Computer Catalog System (08-2-010)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5136 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Museum Preservation (08-1-001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,154,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,304,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5137 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Security System and Technology Infrastructure (08-1-005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $408,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $408,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5138 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Storage and Exhibit Equipment for Collections (08-2-012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $156,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5139 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Clark Center at WSU Vancouver (00-2-680)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $420,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,354,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,774,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5140 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Puyallup: Phase III Expansion (00-2-676)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,858,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,335,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5141 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Science Building (01-2-688)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,662,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,697,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,107,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,804,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5142 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Science Building (01-2-687)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,253,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,743,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,996,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5143 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bates Technical College: Learning Resource Center/Vocational
(02-2-684)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,581,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,479,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,060,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5144 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Cascadia Community College/UW Bothell: Phase 2B Off Ramp
(02-2-999)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $455,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,295,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5145 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Instructional Lab Building -
Construction (02-2-685)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,485,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,003,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,488,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5146 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Information Technology Vocational Center
(02-2-683)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $544,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,186,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,730,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5147 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Basic Skills/Computer Lab
(02-2-686)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,507,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $671,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,178,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5148 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: "D" Building Renovation (04-1-308)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,279,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $433,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,712,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,401,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,113,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5149 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: NWCET Expansion (04-2-402)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $389,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5150 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: Science and Technology (04-2-690)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,278,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,332,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,188,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,798,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5151 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College: Welding/Auto Collision Replacement
(04-1-213)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $741,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,350,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,091,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,747,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,838,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5152 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Cascadia Community College: Center for Arts, Technology, and
Communications (04-2-693)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,586,000
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,636,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $605,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,827,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5153 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Centralia Community College: Science Building (04-2-850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,876,000
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,716,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,521,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,113,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5154 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Renovation - Applied Arts 5 (04-1-303)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $174,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,698,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,872,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5155 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: East County Satellite (04-1-689)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,338,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,389,000

Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,184,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $304,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5156 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Renovation - Mountlake Terrace Hall
(04-1-311)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $423,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,403,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,826,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5157 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Pilchuck/Glacier (04-1-205)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,785,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,160,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,945,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5158 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Replacement - Monte Cristo Hall
(04-1-305)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $999,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,353,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,352,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5159 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: University Center - North Puget Sound
(04-2-692)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,294,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,844,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,138,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,604,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,196,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,938,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5160 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Preservation Backlog Reduction (04-1-951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the reappropriation is provided solely
to accomplish preservation work that improves existing state facilities
in the worst relative condition for housed programs and current
building occupants.
(2) With this reappropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preservation backlog reduction project funds shall be
prioritized at local discretion to achieve the above stated goal, with
particular attention given to buildings currently rated in adequate to
marginal condition.
(3) This section is subject to the same allotment procedures as a
minor works category.
(4) Section 6003 of this act does not apply to this
reappropriation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,945,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,353,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,298,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5161 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Replacement - Instructional Building
(04-1-204)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,476,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,258,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,734,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5162 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Computer Technology Center
(04-2-682)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $669,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,330,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5163 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Redmond Land Acquisition
(04-2-403)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The purpose of the reappropriation is to purchase property for
expansion, storm water retention, and parking requirements.
(2) State funds must be matched with nonstate resources of at least
$500,000.
(3) Allotment of funds shall be in accordance with RCW 43.88.150.

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5164 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Renovation - East/West
Buildings (04-1-312)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $403,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,018,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,421,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5165 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College: Instructional Fine Arts Building
(04-1-214)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $552,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,483,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,035,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,626,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,661,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5166 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (Minor Improvements) (04-2-130)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $864,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,920,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,784,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,196,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,980,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5167 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: Science and Technology Building Replacement
(04-1-202)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,998,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,998,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5168 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Replacement Science and Technology Building
(04-1-208)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,429,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,211,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5169 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College - Fort Steilacoom: Science and Technology
(04-2-694)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $963,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,407,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,214,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,584,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5170 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom: Childcare Center (04-2-401)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $268,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $232,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5171 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Puyallup: Communication Arts/Health Building
(04-2-691)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,248,000
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,303,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $848,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,399,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5172 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Renton Technical College: Portable Replacement (04-1-215)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,065,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,331,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,396,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5173 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs "A" (04-1-010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,093,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,173,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,266,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5174 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (04-1-090)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $537,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,769,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,306,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5175 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College: Science Building Replacement (04-1-209)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,955,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,280,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,068,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $762,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5176 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Science Complex (04-2-695)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,691,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,867,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $562,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,120,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5177 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Instructional Technology Center
(04-2-681)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $362,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,499,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,861,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5178 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College: Science Building Replacement (04-1-212)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,608,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,113,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,721,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5179 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Replacement - Portable Buildings
(04-1-206)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,928,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $694,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,622,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5180 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Renovation - Building 7 (04-1-313)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,347,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,641,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,988,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5181 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Health Science Facility (04-1-211)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,632,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,630,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,262,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5182 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM

Yakima Valley Community College: Glenn/Anthon Hall - Replacement
(04-1-207)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,927,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,718,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,645,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5183 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Health Sciences Center (05-2-851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $876,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,124,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5184 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Training Facility (05-1-854)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,212,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $540,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,752,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5185 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls: Business and Social Science Building (05-1-853)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,864,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,448,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,312,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5186 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Wenatchee Valley College: Anderson Hall and Portable Replacement
(05-1-852)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,612,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,048,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5187 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Big Bend Community College: Performing Arts and Fine Arts
(06-1-309)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,553,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,698,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5188 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Gaiser Hall Renovation (06-1-302)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,511,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,863,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,374,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5189 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: O'Connell Sports Center Improvements (06-2-403)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $623,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5190 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clover Park Technical College: Allied Health Care Facility
(06-2-699)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,285,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,315,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5191 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clover Park Technical College: Personal Care Services Facility
(06-1-310)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,282,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $217,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,499,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5192 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Brier Hall Renovation (06-1-307)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $847,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,286,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,133,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5193 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Center for Fine Arts and Performing
Arts (06-2-950)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5194 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Paine Field Technical Center (06-2-408)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $995,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5195 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Repairs (06-1-050)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,615,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,712,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,327,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5196 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Vocational Education Renovation (06-1-303)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,205,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $166,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,371,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5197 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Humanities and Classroom Building
(06-1-205)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,744,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,427,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,308,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5198 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Physical Education Renovation
(06-1-313)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $477,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,818,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,295,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5199 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Water System Replacement (06-1-501)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,951,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,951,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5200 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Skills Support Center Addition
(06-2-405)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $788,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5201 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Highline Community College: Primary Power Branch Replacement
(06-1-503)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,470,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $247,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,717,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5202 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Highline Community College: Marine Science and Technology
(06-2-406)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5203 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Infrastructure Savings (06-1-751)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,716,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,716,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5204 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Allied Health Building
(06-2-697)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,732,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,085,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,014,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5205 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Science Lab Renovation
(06-1-308)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $157,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,759,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5206 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works Preservation (RMI) (06-1-001)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,826,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,174,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5207 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works: Program (06-2-130)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,865,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,398,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,263,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5208 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College: Employment Resource Center
(06-2-851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $382,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $520,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5209 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College: Wellness Center Repairs
(06-1-330)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,721,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,279,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5210 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: Humanities and Student Services (06-1-204)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,066,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,889,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $433,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,388,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5211 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: Bremer Student Center (06-2-411)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5212 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Library Renovation (06-1-305)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,317,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $683,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5213 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Phase II Cultural and Arts Center (06-2-412)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5214 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom: Cascade Core Phase I (06-1-326)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,551,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,602,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,799,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,952,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5215 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs (06-1-010)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,623,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,840,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5216 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Maritime Academy Repairs
(06-1-502)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $268,000
Appropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,688,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,956,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5217 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Greenhouse/Educational Center
(06-2-410)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5218 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Information Technology and
Visual Communications (06-1-304)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,954,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $142,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,096,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5219 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Shoreline Community College: Annex Renovation (06-1-312)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $660,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,079,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,739,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5220 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Shoreline Community College: Automotive Building (Phase I)
(06-2-951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5221 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs (06-1-090)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,862,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,975,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,837,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5222 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College: Campus Fire Loop Replacement (06-1-504)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,572,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,634,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5223 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Learning Resource Center
(06-2-698)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,268,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $187,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,382,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,847,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5224 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Automotive Collision Technology
(06-1-306)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,911,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,972,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5225 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Horticulture/SCGS Classrooms
(06-2-404)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $543,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $557,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5226 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Campus Classrooms (06-2-696)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,802,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,686,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,570,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5227 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Center for Water and Environmental
Studies (06-2-853)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,839,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $161,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5228 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM

Walla Walla Community College: Clarkston Health Science Facility
(06-2-402)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $688,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $312,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5229 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Wenatchee Valley College: Brown Library Renovation (06-1-311)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,260,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,404,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5230 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Center for Workforce Education
(06-2-407)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $866,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $134,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5231 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Raymond Hall Renovation
(06-1-325)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,117,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,169,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5232 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bates Technical College: Mohler Communications Technology Center
(08-2-703)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $173,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,567,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5233 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: Health Science Building (08-2-702)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,893,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,037,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5234 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College: Instructional Resource Center
(08-1-223)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,824,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,065,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,889,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5235 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Centralia College: Health and Wellness Education Center (08-2-414)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5236 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Child and Family Studies Center (08-2-417)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5237 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Health and Advanced Technologies Building
(08-2-705)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,982,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,232,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5238 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Business Education Building (08-1-315)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,020,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,020,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5239 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Social Science Center (08-2-704)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,299,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,410,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5240 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Vocational Building (08-1-217)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,802,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,498,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5241 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Primary Electrical Replacement
(08-1-508)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,466,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,466,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5242 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Meadowdale Hall Renovation (08-1-318)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,256,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,256,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5243 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Index Hall Replacement (08-1-221)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,005,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,805,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5244 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Child Care Facility (08-2-416)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5245 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Science and Math Building (08-1-226)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,026,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,302,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5246 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Primary Electrical Replacement
(08-1-506)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,870,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,870,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5247 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Trades and Industry Building
(08-1-222)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,833,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,971,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5248 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College: Health and Science Building (08-1-225)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,915,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,415,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5249 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (08-1-050)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,243,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,243,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5250 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Facility Preservation - Roof Repairs (08-1-010)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,676,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,676,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5251 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (08-1-090)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,082,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,082,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5252 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Preservation - Repairs and Minor Improvements
(08-1-001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5253 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (08-2-130)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: There is no intent to reappropriate
amounts not expended by June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5254 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Business and Humanities Center (08-1-218)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,938,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,238,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5255 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom: Cascade Core Phase II (08-1-321)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,242,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,353,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,595,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5256 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Infrastructure Savings (08-1-151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6003 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5257 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(08-1-150)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to definitions and provisions in section 925, chapter
26, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess., the appropriation is provided solely to
maintain facilities housing educational and general programs and to
maintain its major building systems and campus infrastructure.
Building maintenance, mechanical adjustments, repairs, and minor works
for the facility or its major building systems and campus
infrastructure must extend the remaining useful life of the facility or
keep it safe and functioning normally.
(2) With this appropriation, the intent is to improve the average
condition of state facilities as compared to the baseline conditions
documented in report 03-1 of the joint legislative audit and review
committee. Preventive facility maintenance project funds must be
allocated at the state board's discretion to achieve the performance
goal stated in this subsection (2), with particular attention given to
buildings currently rated in superior to adequate condition so as to
maximize useful life given both the passage of time and intensity with
which the space is used.
(3) Section 6003 of this act does not apply to this appropriation.
(4) There is no intent to reappropriate amounts not expended by
June 30, 2009.

Appropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,802,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,802,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5258 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Edison North Renovation
(08-1-314)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,284,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5259 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Wood Construction Center
(08-1-216)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,549,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,734,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,283,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5260 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Shoreline Community College: Automotive Training Center (08-2-413)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5261 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College: Academic and Student Services Building
(08-1-224)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $136,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,763,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,899,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5262 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Building 22 Renovation
(08-1-316)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,359,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,001,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,360,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5263 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College: Building 7 Renovation (08-1-319)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,009,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,331,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,340,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5264 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College: Technical Education Building (08-1-220)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,393,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,391,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,784,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5265 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM

Spokane Falls Community College: Chemistry and Life Science
Building (08-1-219)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,044,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,564,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5266 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Magnuson Building Remodel
(08-2-415)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $941,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $941,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5267 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Music Building 15 Renovation
(08-1-320)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,142,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,094,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,236,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5268 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Early Childhood Education/Childcare
Center (08-2-418)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5269 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Health Careers Center (08-2-701)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $255,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,514,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,769,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5270 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College: Culinary Arts/Student Development
Center (08-2-419)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5271 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Brown Dental Hygiene Building
(08-1-317)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,675,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,675,000

(End of part)

PART 6
MISCELLANEOUS AND SUPPLEMENTAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 6001 To ensure that major construction
projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive
intent, appropriations in this act in excess of $5,000,000 shall not be
expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has
reviewed and approved the agency's predesign. The predesign document
shall include but not be limited to program, site, and cost analysis in
accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial
management. To improve monitoring of major construction projects,
progress reports shall be submitted by the agency administering the
project to the office of financial management and to the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and senate. Reports will be
submitted on July 1st and December 31st each year in a format to be
developed by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6002 (1)(a) Minor works projects are single
line appropriations that shall include multiple projects valued between
$25,000 and $1,000,000 each that are of a similar nature and can
generally be completed by June 30, 2009. These projects cannot be
combined with or be a part of an overall project, that if combined over
a continuous period of time, would exceed $1,000,000. Improvements for
accessibility in compliance with the Americans with disabilities act
may be included in minor works projects.
(b) Minor works appropriations shall not be used for, among other
things: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or
designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor
works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works
list; moveable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment
not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office
of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a
specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; or
to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless
expressly authorized elsewhere in this act. The office of financial
management may make an exception to the limitations described in this
subsection (2)(b) for exigent circumstances after notifying the
legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the
legislature regarding the proposed exception.
(2) The agency shall provide copies of minor works project lists
and revised lists to the office of financial management, the house of
representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means
committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6003 (1) The office of financial management
may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a
capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the
completion of such project to another capital project for which the
appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand
the capacity of any facility beyond that intended by the legislature in
making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between
capital appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or
institution of higher education and only between capital projects that
are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur
between projects to local government agencies except where the grants
are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such
transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that
govern the grants.
(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is
in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only
if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is
substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have
been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that
the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be
completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in
this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each
project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's
budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history
that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a
different way.
(4) Transfers of funds to an agency's infrastructure savings
appropriation are subject to review and approval by the office of
financial management. Expenditures from an infrastructure savings
appropriation are limited to projects that have a primary purpose to
correct infrastructure deficiencies or conditions that: (a) Adversely
affect the ability to utilize the infrastructure for its current
programmatic use; (b) reduce the life expectancy of the infrastructure;
or (c) increase the operating costs of the infrastructure for its
current programmatic use. Eligible infrastructure projects may include
structures and surface improvements, site amenities, utility systems
outside building footprints and natural environmental changes or
requirements as part of an environmental regulation, a declaration of
emergency for an infrastructure issue in conformance with RCW
43.88.250, or infrastructure planning as part of a facility master
plan.
(5) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except
emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with
the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty
days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial
management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within
thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6004 The higher education coordinating board
and the public four-year institutions, in developing and submitting the
single prioritized project list of capital project requests under RCW
28B.76.220, shall use the following additional guidelines:
(1) Representatives of the board shall participate in the process
of scoring projects using the criteria in the board's biennial budget
guidelines. Representatives of the board shall also review the
preliminary project list to verify the scoring and ranking of projects.
As required under RCW 28B.76.210, institutions must submit the
preliminary project list to the board by August 1st of each even-numbered year to enable this review. Any disagreements over project
scorings or rankings shall be resolved as provided under RCW
28B.76.220(4).
(2) The board's biennial budget guidelines and the prioritization
process shall place a greater emphasis on early critical review of
project proposals at the pre-design phase, rather than deferring
critical review and prioritization to the design or construction phases
of a project.
(3) When projects are aggregated into single line-item requests,
each project must meet the definition of minor works according to the
capital budget instructions issued by the office of financial
management. All major projects must be listed and ranked as individual
line-item requests.
(4) The scoring and ranking of projects shall not be based on
assigning an equal number of overall points to each public four-year
institution, but shall reflect an assignment of points to individual
projects based on the priorities and criteria in this section and in
the board's biennial budget guidelines.
(5) Projects shall not be ranked on the basis of a project funding
source.
(6) In consultation with the appropriate fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature, the board shall identify statewide
priorities for higher education capital investments and incorporate
those priorities into its biennial budget guidelines. The statewide
priorities shall address the need for higher education capital projects
to:
(a) Implement a specific legislatively authorized program or
planning priority;
(b) Reduce the backlog of deferred building or system preservation,
renewal, or replacement;
(c) Provide additional capacity or adaptation of space for high
demand instructional or research programs;
(d) Provide additional instructional program capacity for under-served geographic regions or populations; and
(e) Reflect institutional planning priorities and areas of
emphasis.
(7) The board's biennial budget guidelines shall include a
quantitative method for scoring projects on the identified priorities.
The quantitative method shall include use of the facility condition
index developed by the joint legislative audit and review committee for
assessing building or system condition, and use of the board's space
utilization and allocation standards for assessing the need for
additional capacity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6005 Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological
and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005.
Agencies and higher education institutions shall comply with the
requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6006 ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES
THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter into
financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or
nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the
principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under
this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract
option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase
agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or
financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures
made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue
date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of
participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of
the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to
the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the
state finance committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions
authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not
eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional
space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic
transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible
for state funded maintenance and operations.
(1) Office of the secretary of state: Enter into a financing
contract for up to $110,820,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct the heritage
center. The authorization for financing under this subsection (1)
shall lapse unless chapter ... ([House] [Senate] Bill No. ....
(Z-0290/07, providing funding for the heritage building project)), Laws
of 2007 is enacted by June 30, 2007.
(2) Department of general administration:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $8,975,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct the fifth phase of the east plaza garage repairs.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $685,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the preservation of the transportation building.
(3) Department of corrections: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $17,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to provide additional work release beds.
(4) Parks and recreation commission:
(a) Enter into a financing contract in an amount not to exceed
$2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to develop Cama Beach state park.
(b) The projects in (a) of this subsection are reauthorizations of
projects originally authorized in the 2003-2005 biennium. If the parks
and recreation commission enters into a financing contract before the
effective date of this section, then the reauthorization contained in
this section is null and void.
(5) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River
Community College for up to $20,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase Kent
Station phase 2.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Tacoma Community
College for up to $3,600,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an early childhood
education and learning center.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of North Seattle
Community College for up to $22,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an
employment resource center.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase up to 40
acres of land.
(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin
College for up to $300,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop an academic support
and achievement center.
(6) Evergreen State College: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $16,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the college activities building
renovation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6007 FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION--ART WORK
ALLOWANCE POOLING. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated
in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is
provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210. The Washington
state arts commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects
in order to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and
representatives of school district boards.
(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding
two hundred thousand dollars by colleges or universities is provided
solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027. The Washington state arts
commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order
to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with
the board of regents or trustees.
(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction of any public building by a state agency as
defined in RCW 43.17.020 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW
43.17.200. The Washington state arts commission may combine the
proceeds from individual projects in order to fund larger works of art
or mobile art displays in consultation with the state agency.
(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the
Washington state arts commission during the 2007-2009 biennium for the
purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended
solely for direct acquisition of works of art. The commission may use
up to $100,000 of this amount to contract for service to conserve or
maintain existing pieces in the state art collection pursuant to
chapter 36, Laws of 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6008 The amounts shown under the headings
"Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for
informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval
of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate
prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia
in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an
estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the
2009-2011 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero
does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide
funding for the project or program in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6009 (1) "Reappropriations" in this act are
appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are
subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to
appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended
balances remaining on June 30, 2007, from the 2005-2007 biennial
appropriations for each project.
(2) "Reappropriations" from the water quality capital account in
this act shall be limited to the unexpended balance remaining as of the
end of fiscal year 2007 from the water quality account in the 2005-2007
biennial appropriations for each project in this act.
(3) "Reappropriations" in sections 5001, 5002, 5003, and 5005 of
this act shall be reduced in this act to the unexpended balances
remaining as of the end of fiscal year 2007 for the 2005-2007 biennial
appropriation in sections 602, 604, and 607, chapter 488, Laws of 2005,
and section 194, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6010 The water quality capital account is
created in the state treasury pursuant to chapter . . .
([House][Senate] Bill No. . . . . (Z-0356.3/07)), Laws of 2007 (water
quality capital account). In this act, appropriations from the water
quality capital account are defined as appropriations from that
account. If chapter . . . ([House][Senate] Bill No. . . . . (Z-0356.3/07)), Laws of 2007 (water quality capital account) is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, appropriations in this act either from that
account or into that account shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6011 To carry out the provisions of this act,
the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design,
construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6012 If any federal moneys appropriated by
this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the
department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace
the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources.
No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval
of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate
ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital
budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6013 (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all
appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or
in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW
43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so
that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended
state share of total project costs.
(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not
required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for
phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds
is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6014 Any capital improvements or capital
projects involving construction or major expansion of a state office
facility, including, but not limited to, district headquarters,
detachment offices, and off-campus faculty offices, must be reviewed by
the department of general administration for possible consolidation,
colocation, and compliance with state office standards before allotment
of funds. The intent of the requirement imposed by this section is to
eliminate duplication and reduce total office space requirements where
feasible, while ensuring proper service to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6015 NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS.
Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the
state building construction account, or any other account receiving
bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building
construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee
to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and
regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. The
state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of
financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation
authority from the state building construction account, or any other
account receiving bond proceeds, to the state taxable building
construction account is necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6016 The department of fish and wildlife shall
submit to the office of financial management an implementation plan
detailing how the department shall address the recommendations
presented in the capital budget development, execution, and monitoring
process study dated December 2006. The implementation plan shall
include a process for identifying and scoping proposed capital
projects, management and administration of funded projects, and
implementation of best management practices by September 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6017 The Washington state historical society
shall review its competitive process to solicit proposals for heritage
capital projects for potential funding in the state capital budget.
The Washington state historical society shall submit a report to the
office of financial management with recommendations on how to reduce
its reappropriations by June 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6018 The interagency committee for outdoor
recreation shall review its competitive process to solicit proposals
for the wildlife and recreation grant program for potential funding in
the state capital budget. The interagency committee for outdoor
recreation shall submit a report to the office of financial management
with recommendations on how to reduce its reappropriations by June 30,
2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6019 The office of financial management may
authorize a value engineering study of a project's predesign report
prior to beginning the design phase for the project. The allotment of
the design phase may be delayed to accommodate the study.

Sec. 6020 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2005 c 488 s 926 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship; and
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the top two hazardous waste
management priorities of RCW 70.105.150.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority: (i) Remedial
actions; (ii) hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105
RCW; (iii) solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW; (iv) funds for a program to assist in the
assessment and cleanup of sites of methamphetamine production, but not
to be used for the initial containment of such sites, consistent with
the responsibilities and intent of RCW 69.50.511; and (v) cleanup and
disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or derelict vessels
that pose a threat to human health or the environment. For purposes of
this subsection (3)(a)(v), "abandoned or derelict vessels" means
vessels that have little or no value and either have no identified
owner or have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean
up and dispose of the vessel. Funds for plans and programs shall be
allocated consistent with the priorities and matching requirements
established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW. During
the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be used
for the following activities: Conducting a study of whether dioxins
occur in fertilizers, soil amendments, and soils; reviewing
applications for registration of fertilizers; and conducting a study of
plant uptake of metals. During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the local toxics control account to the
state toxics control account such amounts as specified in the omnibus
capital budget bill. During the ((2005-2007)) 2007-2009 fiscal
biennium, moneys in the account may also be used for grants to local
governments to retrofit public sector diesel equipment and for storm
water planning and implementation activities.
(b) Funds may also be appropriated to the department of health to
implement programs to reduce testing requirements under the federal
safe drinking water act for public water systems. The department of
health shall reimburse the account from fees assessed under RCW
70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) One percent of the moneys deposited into the state and local
toxics control accounts shall be allocated only for public
participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations
in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases
of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and
hazardous waste management priorities. However, during the 1999-2001
fiscal biennium, funding may not be granted to entities engaged in
lobbying activities, and applicants may not be awarded grants if their
cumulative grant awards under this section exceed two hundred thousand
dollars. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be
renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from
either account which are not expended at the close of any biennium
shall revert to the state toxics control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(8) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state toxics control account to the water quality
account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 6021 RCW 43.43.944 and 2005 c 518 s 929 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The fire service training account is hereby established in the
state treasury. The fund shall consist of:
(a) All fees received by the Washington state patrol for fire
service training;
(b) All grants and bequests accepted by the Washington state patrol
under RCW 43.43.940; and
(c) Twenty percent of all moneys received by the state on fire
insurance premiums.
(2) Moneys in the account may be appropriated only for fire service
training. During the ((2005-2007)) 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may appropriate funds from this account for ((school fire
prevention activities within the Washington state patrol)) additional
sanitary wastewater treatment capacity at the state fire service
training center.

Sec. 6022 RCW 43.135.045 and 2005 c 518 s 931, 2005 c 314 s 401,
and 2005 c 72 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The emergency reserve fund is established in the state
treasury. During each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall transfer
an amount from the state general fund to the emergency reserve fund.
The amount transferred shall equal the amount by which total state
revenue for the general fund and related funds exceeds the state
expenditure limit, multiplied by the percentage that general fund
expenditures are of total expenditures from the general fund and
related funds. Transfers shall be made at the end of each fiscal
quarter based on projections of state revenues, expenditures, and the
state expenditure limit. The treasurer shall make transfers between
these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues and the
expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and thereafter.
(2) The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency
reserve fund only with approval of at least two-thirds of the members
of each house of the legislature, and then only if the appropriation
does not cause total expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit
under this chapter.
(3) The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five
percent of annual general fund -- state revenues as projected by the
official state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent
shall be transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer as
follows: Seventy-five percent to the student achievement fund hereby
created in the state treasury and twenty-five percent to the general
fund balance. The treasurer shall make transfers between these
accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual revenues for fiscal
year 2000 and thereafter. When per-student state funding for the
maintenance and operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less
than ninety percent of the national average of total funding from all
sources per student as determined by the most recent published data
from the national center for education statistics of the United States
department of education, as calculated by the office of financial
management, further deposits to the student achievement fund shall be
required only to the extent necessary to maintain the ninety-percent
level. Remaining funds are part of the general fund balance and these
funds are subject to the expenditure limits of this chapter.
(4) The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, funds may also be
used for higher education facilities preservation and maintenance.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(5) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be appropriated
to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for distribution
to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the student
achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per full-time
equivalent student basis to each school district.

Sec. 6023 RCW 43.155.050 and 2005 c 488 s 925 and 2005 c 425 s 4
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the
public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for
preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility
planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent
of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for
emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital
budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning
loans. For the ((2005-2007)) 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the account
may be used for grants for projects identified in section 138, chapter
488, Laws of 2005.
(2) The job development fund is hereby established in the state
treasury. Up to fifty million dollars each biennium from the public
works assistance account may be transferred into the job development
fund. Money in the job development fund may be used solely for job
development fund program grants, administrative expenses related to the
administration of the job development fund program created in RCW
43.160.230, and for the report prepared by the joint legislative audit
and review committee pursuant to RCW 44.28.801(2). Moneys in the job
development fund may be spent only after appropriation. The board
shall prepare a prioritized list of proposed projects of up to fifty
million dollars as part of the department's 2007-09 biennial budget
request. The board may provide an additional alternate job development
fund project list of up to ten million dollars. The legislature may
remove projects from the list recommended by the board. The
legislature may not change the prioritization of projects recommended
for funding by the board, but may add projects from the alternate list
in order of priority, as long as the total funding does not exceed
fifty million dollars.

Sec. 6024 RCW 43.155.050 and 2005 c 488 s 925 are each amended to
read as follows:
The public works assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the
public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for
preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility
planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent
of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for
emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital
budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning
loans. For the ((2005-2007)) 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the account
may be used for grants for projects identified in section 138, chapter
488, Laws of 2005 and section 1031 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6025 For appropriations under this act that
contribute to Puget Sound protection and recovery, the department of
ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of natural
resources, the state conservation commission, the state parks and
recreation commission, the department of health, and the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation shall sign performance agreements with
the Puget Sound partnership as described in chapter . . ., ([House]
[Senate] Bill No. . . .) Laws of 2007 (Z-0369 Puget Sound partnership).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6026 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS
Education Construction Account: For transfer to
the Common School Construction, an amount
not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $124,200,000

Education Savings Account: For transfer to the
Common School Construction Account, an
amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6027 Section 6023 of this act expires June 30,
2011.

Sec. 6028 2005 c 488 s 955 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
((Sections)) (1) Section 920 ((and 921)) of this act expires June
30, 2007.
(2) Section 921 of this act expires June 30, 2009.

Sec. 6029 2005 c 488 s 165 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Construct Spokane Readiness Center (04-2-003)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,800,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,300,000))
$2,250,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,100,000))
$10,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,468,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,568,000))
$12,518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Sinlahekin Creek Dams - Floods Damage Repair (2007-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Region 1 Office - Complete Phase 1 (2007-2-009)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $588,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $588,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Loomis Natural Resources Conservation Area Restoration (2007-1-004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $271,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $271,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6033 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Modular Building Reutilization (2008-2001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6034 Part headings in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6035 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6036 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for section 6022 of this act which takes effect
July 1, 2007, and section 6024 of this act which takes effect June 30,
2011.

(End of Part)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 166
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 185
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 124, 242
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 132, 243
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 183
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 161
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 105
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 34, 243
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 242
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 26, 27
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 123
STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER . . . . . . . . . . . . 36, 37
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 92
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 144
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 144
STATE TREASURER
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 241
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 140
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 145
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 179
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 139
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 155
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
--- END ---