BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.50.050 and 1995 c 239 s 317 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall:
(1) Have the authority to organize the department into ((not more
than four)) divisions, each headed by an assistant director;
(2) Have free access to all files and records of various funds
assigned to the department and inspect and audit the files and records
as deemed necessary;
(3) Employ personnel to carry out the general administration of the
department;
(4) Submit an annual written report of the activities of the
department to the governor and the chairs of the appropriate
legislative committees with one copy to the staff of each of the
committees, including recommendations for statutory changes the
director believes to be desirable;
(5) Adopt such rules ((and regulations)) as are necessary to carry
out the powers, duties, and functions of the department pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.50.070 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 9 are each
amended to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the
assistant directors((, not to exceed two,)) and an internal auditor
shall also be exempt from the application of the state civil service
law, chapter 41.06 RCW.
The officers and exempt personnel appointed by the director
pursuant to this section shall be paid salaries fixed by the governor
in accordance with the procedure established by law for fixing salaries
for officers exempt from the operation of the state civil service law.
All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW and engaged in
duties pertaining to the functions transferred by this chapter shall be
assigned to the department to perform their usual duties upon the same
terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action
that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and
rules governing the state merit system.

--- END ---