BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Director" means the director of agriculture or any qualified
person or persons designated by the director of agriculture to act for
the director concerning some matter under this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of agriculture.
(3) "Marketing order" means an order issued by the director under
this chapter.
(4) "Organic food" has the definition in RCW 15.86.020.
(5) "Producer" means any person engaged in the business of
producing or causing to be produced for market in commercial quantities
any organic food. "Producer" includes bailees who contract to produce
or grow any organic food on behalf of a bailor who retains title to the
seed and its resulting organic food or the organic food delivered for
further production or increase.
(6) "Affected producer" means any producer of organic food.
(7) "Unfair trade practice" means any practice that is unlawful or
prohibited under the laws of the state of Washington including but not
limited to Titles 15, 16, and 69 RCW and chapters 9.16, 19.77, 19.80,
19.84, and 19.83 RCW, or any practice, whether concerning interstate or
intrastate commerce that is unlawful under the provisions of the act of
Congress of the United States, September 26, 1914, chapter 311, section
5, 38 U.S. Statutes at Large 719 as amended, known as the "Federal
Trade Commission Act of 1914," or the violation of or failure
accurately to label as to grades and standards in accordance with any
lawfully established grades or standards or labels.
(8) "Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation, trust,
association, partnership, society, or any other organization of
individuals.
(9) "Cooperative association" means any incorporated or
unincorporated association of producers that conforms to the
qualifications set out in the act of Congress of the United States,
Feb. 18, 1922, chapter 57, sections 1 and 2, 42 U.S. Statutes at Large
388 as amended, known as the "Capper-Volstead Act" and which is engaged
in making collective sales or in marketing any organic food or product
thereof or in rendering service for or advancing the interests of the
producers of such organic food on a nonprofit cooperative basis.
(10) "Member of a cooperative association" or "member" means any
producer of organic food who markets his or her product through such
cooperative association and who is a voting stockholder of or has a
vote in the control of or is under a marketing agreement with such
cooperative association with respect to such product.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The marketing of organic foods within this
state is affected with a public interest. It is declared to be the
policy and purpose of this chapter to promote the general welfare of
the state by enabling producers of organic foods to help themselves in
establishing orderly, fair, sound, efficient, and unhampered marketing,
grading, and standardizing of the organic foods they produce, and in
promoting and increasing the sale of such commodities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Marketing orders may be made for any one or
more of the following purposes:
(1) To establish plans and conduct programs for advertising and
sales promotion, to maintain present markets, or to create new or
larger markets for any organic food grown in the state of Washington;
(2) To provide for carrying on research studies to find more
efficient methods of production, processing, handling, and marketing of
any organic food;
(3) To provide for improving standards and grades by defining,
establishing, and providing labeling requirements consistent with
chapter 15.86 RCW with respect to the same;
(4) To investigate and take necessary action to prevent unfair
trade practices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Marketing orders and orders modifying or
terminating existing marketing orders shall be adopted by the director
only after the director has done the following:
(1) Received a petition as provided for in section 5 of this act;
(2) Given notice of hearing as provided for in section 6 of this
act;
(3) Conducted a hearing as provided for in section 7 of this act;
(4) Made findings and a decision as provided for in section 8 of
this act;
(5) Determined assent of affected producers as provided for in
section 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Petitions for issuance, amendment, or
termination of a marketing order for organic food shall be signed by
not less than ten percent or fifty of the producers alleged to be
affected, whichever is less, and shall be filed with the director.
Such petition shall be accompanied by a filing fee of one hundred
dollars payable to the state treasurer; and shall designate some person
as attorney-in-fact for the purpose of this section. Upon receipt of
such a petition, the director shall prepare a budget estimate for
handling such petition that includes the cost of the preparation of the
estimate, the cost of the hearings, and the cost of the proposed
referendum. The petitioners, within thirty days after receipt of the
budget estimate by their attorney-in-fact, shall remit to the director
the difference between the filing fee of one hundred dollars already
paid and the total budget estimate. If the petitioners fail to remit
the difference, or if for any other reason the proceedings for the
issuance, amendment, or termination of the marketing order are
discontinued, the filing fee, including any additional amount paid in
accordance with such budget estimates, shall not be refunded. If the
petition results, after proper proceedings, in the issuance, amendment,
or termination of a marketing order, the petitioners shall be
reimbursed for the amount paid for the total filing fee out of funds of
the organic food commission as they become available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Upon receipt of a petition for the issuance,
amendment, or termination of a marketing order, the director shall
establish a list of producers of organic food who are certified under
chapter 15.86 RCW. In establishing or making current such a list of
producers and their individual production, the director shall use the
producer's name, mailing address, and the yearly average fees paid
under RCW 15.86.070 by the producer in the three preceding years or in
such lesser time as the producer has produced the organic food in
question. Information on each producer shall be mailed to the affected
producer on record with the director for verification. All corrections
shall be filed with the director within twenty days from the date of
mailing. The director shall keep lists as current as possible and may
require updated information from affected producers at various times in
accordance with rules prescribed by the director.
The producer list shall be final and conclusive in making
determinations relative to the assent by producers upon the issuance,
amendment, or termination of a marketing order and in elections under
this chapter.
The director shall notify affected producers, so listed, by mail
that the public hearing affording opportunity for them to be heard upon
the proposed issuance, amendment, or termination of the marketing order
will be heard at the time and place stated in the notice. The notice
of the hearing shall be given not less than ten days nor more than
sixty days before the hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 At the public hearing the director shall
receive evidence and testimony offered in support of, or opposition to,
the proposed issuance of, amendment to, or termination of a marketing
order and concerning the terms, conditions, scope, and area thereof.
Such hearing shall be public and all testimony shall be received under
oath. A full and complete record of all proceedings at such hearings
shall be made and maintained on file in the office of the director,
which file shall be open to public inspection. The director shall base
his or her findings upon the testimony and evidence received at the
hearing, together with any other relevant facts available to the
director from official publications of institutions of recognized
standing. The director shall describe in the findings such official
publications upon which any finding is based.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The director shall make and publish
findings upon every material point controverted at the hearing and
required by this chapter and upon such other matters and things as he
or she may deem fitting and proper. The director shall also issue a
recommended decision based upon the director's findings and shall cause
copies of the findings and recommended decision to be delivered or
mailed to all parties of record appearing at the hearing, or their
attorneys of record. The recommended decision shall contain the text
in full of any order, or amendment or termination of existing order,
and may deny or approve the proposal in its entirety, or it may
recommend a marketing order containing other or different terms or
conditions from those contained in the proposal: PROVIDED, That the
same shall be of a kind or type substantially within the purview of the
notice of hearing and shall be supported by evidence taken at the
hearing or by documents of which the director is authorized to take
official notice. The director shall not approve the issuance,
amendment, or termination of any marketing order unless he or she finds
with respect thereto:
(a) That the proposed issuance, amendment, or termination thereof
is reasonably calculated to attain the objective sought in such
marketing order;
(b) That the proposed issuance, amendment, or termination is in
conformity with this chapter and within the applicable limitations, and
restrictions in the issuance, amendment, or termination will tend to
effectuate the declared purposes and policies of this chapter;
(c) That the interests of consumers of the organic food are
protected in that the powers of this chapter are being exercised only
to the extent necessary to attain such objectives.
(2) After the issuance of a recommended decision, all interested
parties shall have a period of not less than ten days to file
objections with the director. The director shall consider the
objections and shall issue a final decision which may be the same as
the recommended decision or may be revised in light of the objections.
The final decision shall set out in full the text of the order. The
director shall deliver or mail copies of the final decision to the same
parties to whom copies of the findings and recommended decision are
required to be sent. If the final decision denies the proposal in its
entirety, no further action may be taken by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 After the issuance by the director of the
final decision approving the issuance, amendment, or termination of a
marketing order, the director shall determine by a referendum whether
the affected producers assent to the proposed action or not. The
director shall conduct the referendum among the affected producers
based on the list as provided for in section 6 of this act, and the
affected producers shall be deemed to have assented to the proposed
issuance, amendment, or termination order if sixty percent or more by
number and sixty percent or more by amount of assessment paid of those
replying assent to the proposed order. The determination by volume
shall be made on the basis of volume as determined in the list of
affected producers created under section 6 of this act, subject to
rules of the director for such determination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A marketing order shall define the area of
the state to be covered by the order, which may be all or any portion
of the state, shall contain provisions for establishment of the organic
foods commission and administration and operation and powers and duties
of the commission, shall provide for assessments as provided for in
this chapter, and shall contain one or more of the provisions in
section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The marketing order shall establish an
organic foods commission composed of not less than five nor more than
thirteen members. In addition, the director shall be an ex officio
member of the organic foods commission. Commission members shall be
citizens and residents of this state, over the age of twenty-five
years. The term of office of commission members shall be three years
with the terms rotating so than one-third of the terms will commence as
nearly as practicable each year. However, the first commission shall
be selected, one-third for a term of one year, one-third for a term of
two years, and one-third for a term of three years, as nearly as
practicable. Two-thirds of the commission members shall be elected by
the affected producers and such elected members shall all be affected
producers. The remaining one-third shall be appointed by the
commission and shall be either affected producers, others active in
matters relating to the organic foods or persons not so related.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Not less than ninety days nor more than one
hundred five days before the beginning of each term of each elected
commission member, the director shall give notice by mail to all
affected producers of the vacancy and call for nominations in
accordance with this section and with the provisions of the marketing
order and shall give notice of the final date for filing nominations,
which shall not be less than eighty days nor more than eighty-five days
before the beginning of such term. Such notice shall also advise that
nominating petitions shall be signed by five persons qualified to vote
for such candidates or, if the number of nominating signers is provided
for in the marketing order, such number as such order provides.
Not less than sixty days nor more than seventy-five days before the
commencement of such commission member term, the director shall submit
by mail ballots to all affected producers, which ballots shall be
required to be returned to the director not less than thirty days
before the commencement of such term. Such mail ballot shall be
conducted in a manner so that it shall be a secret ballot. With
respect to the first organic foods commission, the director may call
for nominations in the notice of decision following the hearing and the
ballot may be submitted at the time the director's proposed order is
submitted to the affected producers for their assent.
The elected members may be elected from various districts within
the area covered by the marketing order if the order so provides, with
the number of members from each district to be in accordance with the
provisions of the marketing order.
The members of the commission not elected by the affected producers
shall be elected by a majority of the commission at a meeting of the
commission within ninety days before expiration of the term but to fill
nonelective vacancies caused by other reasons than the expiration of a
term, the new member shall be elected by the commission at its first
meeting after the occurrence of the vacancy.
When only one nominee is nominated for any position on the
commission, the director shall deem that the nominee satisfies the
requirements of the position and then it shall be deemed that the
nominee has been duly elected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The organic foods commission shall hold
such regular meetings as the marketing order may prescribe or that the
commission by resolution may prescribe, together with such special
meetings that may be called in accordance with provisions of its
resolutions upon reasonable notice to all members thereof. A majority
of the members constitutes a quorum for the transaction of all business
of the commission. In the event of a vacancy in an elected or
appointed position on the commission, the remaining elected members of
the commission shall select a qualified person to fill the unexpired
term.
Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.230 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The organic foods commission shall have
such powers and duties in accordance with this chapter as may be
provided in the marketing order and shall have the following powers and
duties:
(1) To elect a chair and such other officers as determined
advisable;
(2) To adopt, rescind, and amend rules reasonably necessary for the
administration and operation of the organic foods commission and the
enforcement of its duties under the marketing order;
(3) To administer, enforce, direct, and control the provisions of
the marketing order and of this chapter relating thereto;
(4) To employ and discharge at its discretion such administrators
and additional personnel, attorneys, advertising and research agencies,
and other persons and firms that it may deem appropriate and pay
compensation to the same;
(5) To acquire personal property and lease office space and other
necessary real property and transfer and convey the same;
(6) To institute and maintain in its own name any and all legal
actions, including actions by injunction, mandatory injunction, or
civil recovery, or proceedings before administrative tribunals or other
governmental authorities necessary to carry out the provisions of this
chapter and of the marketing order;
(7) To keep accurate records of all its receipts and disbursements,
which records shall be open to inspection and audit by the state
auditor at least every five years;
(8) To borrow money and incur indebtedness;
(9) To make necessary disbursements for routine operating expenses;
(10) To expend funds for organic foods-related education, training,
and leadership programs as the organic foods commission deems
expedient;
(11) Such other powers and duties that are necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Any member of the organic foods commission
may also be a member or officer of an association which has the same
objectives for which the organic foods commission was formed. The
organic foods commission may also contract with such association for
services necessary to carry out any purposes authorized under this
chapter, if an appropriate contract has been entered into.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) There is hereby levied, and there shall
be collected by the organic foods commission, upon each and every
dollar unit of any organic food product specified in any marketing
order an annual assessment that shall be paid by the producer thereof
upon each and every such dollar unit sold, processed, stored, or
delivered for sale, processing, or storage by the producer. Such
assessments shall be expressed as a stated percentage of the net unit
price at the time of sale. The total amount of such annual assessment
to be paid by all affected producers shall not exceed one percent of
the total market value of all affected units sold, processed, stored,
or delivered for sale, processing, or storage by all affected producers
of such units during the year to which the assessment applies.
(2) The marketing order shall prescribe the percentage rate of such
assessment. Such rate may be at the full amount of, or at any lesser
amount than, the amount in this section and may be altered from time to
time by amendment of such order.
(3) To collect such assessment, each order may require:
(a) Stamps to be purchased from the organic foods commission or
other authority stated in such order and attached to the containers,
invoices, shipping documents, inspection certificates, releases, or
receiving receipts or tickets, the stamps to be canceled immediately
upon being attached and the date of cancellation placed thereon;
(b) Payment of producer assessments before the affected units are
shipped off the farm or payment of assessments at different or later
times, and in such event the order may require any person subject to
the assessment to give adequate assurance or security for its payment;
(c) Handlers receiving the organic foods from the producer,
including warehousemen and processors, to collect producer assessments
from producers whose production they handle and remit the same to the
organic foods commission. The lending agency for a commodity credit
corporation loan to producers shall be deemed a handler for the purpose
of this subsection (3)(c). No affected units may be transported,
carried, shipped, sold, stored, or otherwise handled or disposed of
until every due and payable assessment required under this section has
been paid and the receipt issued, but there is no liability under this
section for common carriers in the regular course of their business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Moneys collected by the organic foods
commission under a marketing order from any assessment for marketing
purposes shall be used by the organic foods commission only for the
purpose of paying for the costs or expenses arising in connection with
carrying out the purposes and provisions of such agreement or order.
Upon the termination of any marketing order any and all moneys
remaining with the organic foods commission operating under that
marketing order and not required to defray expenses or repay
obligations incurred by the organic foods commission shall be returned
to the affected producers in proportion to the assessments paid by each
in the two-year period preceding the date of the termination order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Any due and payable assessment levied under
this chapter, and every sum due under the marketing order in a
specified amount, constitutes a personal debt of every person so
assessed or who otherwise owes the same, and the same shall be due and
payable to the organic foods commission when payment is called for by
the organic foods commission. In the event any person fails to pay the
full amount of such assessment or such other sum on or before the date
due, the organic foods commission may add to such unpaid assessment or
sum an amount not exceeding ten percent of the same to defray the cost
of enforcing the collecting of the same. In the event of failure of
such person or persons to pay any such due and payable assessment or
other such sum, the organic foods commission may bring a civil action
against such person or persons in a state court of competent
jurisdiction for the collection thereof, together with ten percent
provided for in this section, and such action shall be tried and
judgment rendered as in any other cause of action for debt due and
payable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 All moneys that are collected or otherwise
received under a marketing order created under this chapter shall be
used solely by and for the organic foods commission and shall not be
used for any other commission or the department. Such moneys shall be
deposited in a separate account or accounts in the name of the organic
foods commission in any bank that is a state depositary. All expenses
and disbursements incurred and made pursuant to the provisions of any
marketing order shall be paid from moneys collected and received
pursuant to such order without the necessity of a specific legislative
appropriation and all moneys deposited for the account of any order
shall be paid from the account by check or voucher in such form and in
such manner and upon the signature of such person as may be prescribed
by the organic foods commission. None of the provisions of RCW
43.01.050 are applicable to any such account or any moneys so received,
collected, or expended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Any funds of the organic foods commission
may be invested in savings or time deposits in banks, trust companies,
and mutual savings banks that are doing business in this state, up to
the amount of insurance afforded such accounts by the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation. This section applies to all funds that may be
lawfully so invested that in the judgment of the organic foods
commission are not required for immediate expenditure. The authority
granted by this section is not exclusive and shall be construed to be
cumulative and in addition to other authority provided by law for the
investment of such funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Every administrator, employee, or other
person occupying a position of trust under any marketing order and
every member actually handling or drawing upon funds shall give a bond
in such penal amount as may be required by the organic foods commission
or by the order, the premium for which bond or bonds shall be paid by
the organic foods commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 An affected producer subject to a marketing
order may file a written petition with the director stating that the
order, agreement, or program or any part thereof is not in accordance
with the law, and requesting a modification thereof or exemption
therefrom. The producer shall thereupon be given a hearing, which
hearing shall be conducted in the manner provided in section 7 of this
act, and thereafter the director shall make a ruling which shall be
final.
Appeal from any ruling of the director may be taken to the superior
court of the county in which the petitioner resides or has his or her
principal place of business, by serving upon the director a copy of the
notice of appeal and complaint within twenty days from the date of
entry of the ruling. Upon such application, the court may proceed in
accordance with RCW 7.16.010 through 7.16.140. If the court determines
that the ruling is not in accordance with law, it shall remand the
proceedings to the director with directions to make a ruling as the
court determines to be in accordance with law or to take such further
proceedings as in its opinion are required by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 It is a misdemeanor for:
(1) Any person willfully to violate any provision of this chapter
or any provision of any marketing order duly issued by the director
under this chapter;
(2) Any person willfully to render or furnish a false or fraudulent
report, statement of record required by the director or the organic
foods commission under this chapter, or any provision of any marketing
order duly issued by the director under this chapter or willfully to
fail or refuse to furnish or render any such report, statement, or
record so required.
In the event of violation or threatened violation of any provision
of this chapter or of any marketing order duly issued or entered into
under this chapter, the director, the organic foods commission, or any
affected producer on joining the organic foods commission shall be
entitled to an injunction to prevent further violation and to a decree
of specific performance of such order, and to a temporary restraining
order and injunction pending litigation upon filing a verified
complaint and sufficient bond.
All persons subject to any order shall severally from time to time,
upon the request of the director, furnish the director with such
information as the director finds to be necessary to enable him or her
to effectuate the policies of this chapter and the purposes of such
order or to ascertain and determine the extent to which such order has
been carried out or has effectuated such policies and purposes, or to
determine whether or not there has been any abuse of the privilege of
exemptions from laws relating to trusts, monopolies, and restraints of
trade. Such information shall be furnished in accordance with forms
and reports to be prescribed by the director. For the purpose of
ascertaining the correctness of any report made to the director under
this section or for the purpose of obtaining the information required
in any such report where it has been requested and has not been
furnished, the director may examine such books, papers, records, copies
of tax reports, accounts, correspondence, contracts, documents, or
memoranda as the director deems relevant and that are within the
control of any such person from whom such report was requested, or of
any person having, either directly or indirectly, actual or legal
control of or over such person or such records, or of any subsidiary of
any such person. To carry out the purposes of this section the
director, upon giving due notice, may hold hearings, take testimony,
administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, and issue subpoenas for the
production of books, records, documents, or other writings of any kind,
and section 7 of this act applies with respect to any such hearing,
together with such other rules consistent therewith as the director may
from time to time prescribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 In any civil or criminal action or
proceeding for violation of any rule of statutory or common law against
monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade, proof that the act
complained of was done in compliance with this chapter or a marketing
order issued under this chapter, and in furtherance of the purposes and
provisions of this chapter, shall be a complete defense to such action
or proceeding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Obligations incurred by the organic foods
commission and any other liabilities or claims against the organic
foods commission shall be enforced only against the assets of the
organic foods commission in the same manner as if it were a corporation
and no liability for the debts or actions of the organic foods
commission shall exist against either the state of Washington or any
subdivision or instrumentality thereof, or against any member officer,
employee, or agent of the organic foods commission in his or her
individual capacity. The members of any such commission, including
employees of such board, shall not be held responsible individually in
any way whatsoever to any person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or
other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent,
person, or employee, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty
or crime. No such person or employee may be held responsible
individually for any act or omission of any other member of the organic
foods commission. The liability of the members of the organic foods
commission shall be several and not joint and no member shall be liable
for the default of any other member.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 Nothing in this chapter permits fixing of
prices not otherwise permitted by law or any limitation on production
and no marketing order or agreement or any rule adopted under it may
contain any such provisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 All general administrative expenses of the
director in carrying out the provisions of this chapter shall be borne
by the state: PROVIDED, That the department shall be reimbursed for
actual costs incurred in conducting nominations and elections for
members of the organic foods commission established under this chapter.
Such reimbursement shall be made from the funds of the organic foods
commission for which the nominations and elections were conducted by
the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 The restrictive provisions of chapter 43.78
RCW do not apply to promotional printing and literature for the organic
foods commission formed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 This chapter may be known and cited as the
Washington organic foods commission act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 Subsequent to the formation of an organic
food commission following a referendum vote of affected producers in
accordance with section 9 of this act and the establishment of an
assessment on organic foods in accordance with section 16 of this act,
organic food subject to an assessment by the organic food commission is
exempt from assessments by any other commodity commissions formed under
chapters 15.24, 15.26, 15.28, 15.44, 15.62, 15.65, 15.66, and 16.67
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 A new section is added to chapter 15.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Organic foods subject to an assessment by the organic food
commission established in accordance with section 9 of this act and
levied in accordance with section 16 of this act are exempt from an
assessment levied by a commission established under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 A new section is added to chapter 15.26 RCW
to read as follows:
Organic foods subject to an assessment by the organic food
commission established in accordance with section 9 of this act and
levied in accordance with section 16 of this act are exempt from an
assessment levied by a commission established under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 A new section is added to chapter 15.28 RCW
to read as follows:
Organic foods subject to an assessment by the organic food
commission established in accordance with section 9 of this act and
levied in accordance with section 16 of this act are exempt from an
assessment levied by a commission established under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 A new section is added to chapter 15.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Organic foods subject to an assessment by the organic food
commission established in accordance with section 9 of this act and
levied in accordance with section 16 of this act are exempt from an
assessment levied by a commission established under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 A new section is added to chapter 15.62 RCW
to read as follows:
Organic foods subject to an assessment by the organic food
commission established in accordance with section 9 of this act and
levied in accordance with section 16 of this act are exempt from an
assessment levied by a commission established under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 A new section is added to chapter 15.65 RCW
to read as follows:
Organic foods subject to an assessment by the organic food
commission established in accordance with section 9 of this act and
levied in accordance with section 16 of this act are exempt from an
assessment levied by a commission established under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 A new section is added to chapter 15.66 RCW
to read as follows:
Organic foods subject to an assessment by the organic food
commission established in accordance with section 9 of this act and
levied in accordance with section 16 of this act are exempt from an
assessment levied by a commission established under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 A new section is added to chapter 16.67 RCW
to read as follows:
Organic foods subject to an assessment by the organic food
commission established in accordance with section 9 of this act and
levied in accordance with section 16 of this act are exempt from an
assessment levied by a commission established under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 A new section is added to chapter 43.78 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to promotional printing and literature
for the organic foods commission formed under chapter 15.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 30 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 Sections 1 through 30 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

--- END ---