BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 15.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All food and food products sold in Washington state that are
derived from cloned animals shall be labeled indicating that they are
or contain products derived from cloned animals.
(2) As used in this section, "cloned animal" means an animal
produced by replacing all the genetic material in an egg with a mature
cell containing the complete genetic code from the donor.

--- END ---