BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that commuting
accounts for more trips and miles traveled than any other single
purpose. The legislature also recognizes that telework has been found
to reduce commute trips and provide flexibility for work-related
travel. Additionally, telework enables employers to allow employees to
work outside of urban areas, which reduces urban commute trips while
strengthening rural economies. The legislature further recognizes that
telework is a key component in a comprehensive transportation demand
management package. Therefore, it is the legislature's intent to
decrease traffic congestion with the creation of the telework
enhancement funding board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 As used in this chapter, "telework" means a
work arrangement whereby employees are regularly scheduled to perform
the normal duties and responsibilities of their positions at locations
other than the traditional workplace, through the use of computers or
telecommunications. The term includes persons who are self-employed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The telework enhancement funding board
is created consisting of eight members.
(2) Five members of the board are voting members appointed by the
governor, subject to confirmation by the senate. One of these voting
members must be a cabinet-level appointment as the governor's
representative to the board. The governor shall appoint one of the
general public members of the board as the chair. The voting members
of the board will be appointed for terms of four years, except that two
members initially will be appointed for terms of two years, and three
members will initially be appointed for terms of three years. In
making the appointments, the governor shall seek a board membership
that collectively provide the expertise necessary to provide strong
fiscal oversight of telework enhancement projects. The governor shall
appoint at least three of the voting members of the board no later than
ninety days after the effective date of this act. Vacant positions on
the board will be filled in the same manner as original appointments.
The governor may remove members of the board for good cause.
In addition to the five voting members of the board, the following
three state officials shall serve as ex officio nonvoting members of
the board: The secretary of the department of transportation, the
secretary of the utilities and transportation commission, and the
director of the department of community, trade, and economic
development. The state officials serving in an ex officio capacity may
designate a representative of their respective agencies to serve on the
board in their behalf. The designations must be made in writing and in
a manner as specified by the board.
(3) The department of transportation shall provide staff support to
the board. For administrative purposes, the board is located with the
department of transportation.
(4) Members of the board who do not represent state agencies will
be compensated as provided by RCW 43.03.250. Members of the board will
be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided by RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The board is responsible for making
grants and loans for telework enhancement projects and telework
activities from the amounts appropriated to the board for this purpose.
To accomplish this purpose the board may:
(a) Provide assistance to grant and loan applicants regarding the
procedures and criteria for grant and loan awards;
(b) Make and execute all manner of contracts and agreements with
public and private parties as the board deems necessary, consistent
with the purposes of this chapter;
(c) Accept gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or financial
or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms that are
not in conflict with this chapter;
(d) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter; and
(e) Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the
powers expressly granted or implied under this chapter.
(2) The department of transportation shall provide all necessary
grants and loans administration assistance to the board, and shall
distribute funds as provided by the board in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The board shall develop procedures and
criteria for allocation of funds for telework enhancement projects and
telework activities on a statewide basis to address the highest
priorities for enhancing telework. To the extent practicable the board
shall adopt an annual allocation of funding. The allocation should
address the acceleration of telework in Washington. The board may
annually establish a maximum amount of funding available for any
individual project, subject to available funding.
(2)(a) In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and
activities the board shall give preference to projects that:
(i) Provide incentives to employers to provide telework
opportunities for employees;
(ii) Provide incentives and assistance to employers to locate jobs
outside the congested Puget Sound urban areas; or
(iii) Assist in developing telecommunications infrastructure in
rural and underserved communities.
(b) In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and
activities the board shall also give consideration to projects that:
(i) Are the most cost-effective;
(ii) Have the greatest matched or in-kind funding; and
(iii) Will be implemented by a sponsor with a successful record of
project implementation.
(3) The board may waive or modify portions of the allocation
procedures and standards adopted under this section in the award of
grants or loans to conform to legislative appropriations directing an
alternative award procedure or when the funds to be awarded are from
federal or other sources requiring other allocation procedures or
standards as a condition of the board's receipt of the funds. The
board shall develop an integrated process to manage the allocation of
funding from federal and state sources to minimize delays in the award
of funding while recognizing the difference in state and legislative
appropriation timing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Telework projects must be submitted to
the telework enhancement funding board for funding by January 1st and
July 1st of each year beginning in 2007. Beginning in 2008, the board
shall provide the legislature with a list of the proposed projects and
a list of the projects funded by October 1st of each year for
informational purposes.
(2) The department of transportation shall track all funds
allocated for telework enhancement projects and telework activities on
behalf of the board, including both funds allocated by the board and
funds allocated by other state or federal agencies for telework
enhancement.
(3) Beginning in December 2008, the board shall provide a biennial
report to the governor and the legislature on telework enhancement
expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The telework enhancement account is created
in the state treasury. Such funds as the legislature directs or
appropriates to the account will be deposited to the account. Moneys
in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures
from the account may be used for telework enhancement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department of transportation shall
provide necessary grants and loan administration support to the
telework enhancement funding board. The department shall also track
telework enhancement expenditures. The department shall provide all
necessary administrative support to the board, and the board will be
located with the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

--- END ---