BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Washington state's legislative building is
the most vital and preeminent public building in this state and serves
as both a working governmental center and a symbol of Washington's free
and democratic government. It is the centerpiece of the five historic
capitol buildings and grounds designed by New York architects Walter
Wilder and Harry White. This building and its contents reflect the
dreams and achievements of many individuals and organizations across
the history of Washington. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature to recognize the capitol campus and grounds as a uniquely
valuable cultural and historical resource that should be preserved and
promoted as an outstanding example of Washington state heritage. To
that end, the legislature intends to establish a task force to make
recommendations to improve tourist access to the capitol campus grounds
and buildings and provide an enhanced learning and recreational
experience for the visitors of the capitol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The director of the department of
general administration and the state parks department shall jointly
host a task force to study and develop recommendations as follows:
(a) Proposals concerning the best management structure for the
capitol campus and all of the historical structures, office buildings,
monuments, and parks that make up the campus. In determining the best
management structure for the capitol campus, the task force must seek
to provide the proper balance between managing for the best visitor
services and maximum public enjoyment of the capitol campus against the
need for maintaining the functionality of the working seat of state
government and preservation of the historical structures and monuments
on campus;
(b) Proposals to promote tourism at the Washington state capitol
campus, including but not limited to: Concessionaire enhancements,
audio-visual self-guided tour options, a central visitor center with
souvenir/retail opportunities, transportation to and from capitol
campus and parking enhancements, and clear and understandable way-finding guides;
(c) Proposals to enrich the educational experience including but
not limited to both the present utilization and historical activities
of the capitol campus as the seat of state government;
(d) Proposals to promote the unique architectural features,
horticultural examples, and art collections of the capitol campus;
(e) Proposals to increase coordination and cooperation between
agencies and entities involved in the management and care of the
capitol campus and the local governments that are responsible for the
buildings and areas near the campus; and
(f) Proposals to increase volunteer opportunities at the campus.
(2) The task force must include the following representatives:
(a) The governor or the governor's designee;
(b) The lieutenant governor or the lieutenant governor's designee;
(c) Four legislative members to be appointed as follows: One
member from each major caucus of the senate, appointed by the president
of the senate; and one member from each major caucus of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(d) A representative of the supreme court;
(e) The superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee;
(f) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development, or the director's designee;
(g) An elected official from the city of Olympia chosen by the
legislative body of the city; and
(h) Two citizens of the state of Washington. One citizen must be
appointed by the president of the senate and one citizen must be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. The citizens
should have knowledge of the capitol campus, visitor services, and the
historical heritage of the capitol.
(3) The task force shall submit the proposals to the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1, 2007.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2008.

--- END ---