BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2005 c 257 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
The legislature finds that many Washington citizens are veterans of
armed forces conflicts that have important skills that may be employed
in projects that help to protect and restore Washington's rivers,
streams, lakes, marine waters, and open lands, and help to maintain
urban and suburban wastewater and storm water management systems. The
legislature further finds that such work has demonstrated benefits for
many veterans who are coping with posttraumatic stress disorder or have
other mental health or substance abuse disorders related to their
service in the armed forces. The legislature further finds that these
projects provide an opportunity for veterans to obtain on-the-job
training, leading to certification in specific skill sets and to living
wage employment in environmental restoration and stewardship.
Therefore, it is the purpose of this chapter to create ((a)) the
veterans conservation corps program ((that provides)) to assist
veterans in obtaining training, certification, and employment in the
field of environmental restoration and management, and to provide state
funding assistance for projects that restore Washington's waters,
forests, and habitat through the ((primary)) participation of ((such))
veterans.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.60A.150 and 2005 c 257 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington veterans conservation corps is created. The
department shall establish enrollment procedures for the program.
Enrollees may choose to participate in either or both the volunteer
projects list authorized in subsection (2) of this section, and the
training, certification, and placement program authorized in section 3
of this act.
(2) The department shall create a list of veterans ((with
posttraumatic stress disorder and related conditions)) who are
interested in working on projects that restore Washington's natural
habitat. ((The list shall be referred to as the veterans conservation
corps.)) The department shall promote the opportunity to volunteer for
the veterans conservation corps through its local counselors and
representatives. Only veterans who grant their approval may be
included on the list. The department shall consult with the salmon
recovery board, the interagency committee for outdoor recreation, the
department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife,
and the state parks and recreation commission to determine the most
effective ways to market the veterans conservation corps to agencies
and local sponsors of habitat restoration projects.
((The department shall submit a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2009, on the use of
veterans conservation corps members by state agencies and local
sponsors of habitat restoration projects.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall assist veterans enrolled in the veterans
conservation corps with obtaining employment in conservation programs
and projects that restore Washington's natural habitat, maintain and
steward local, state, and federal forest lands and other outdoor lands,
maintain and improve urban and suburban storm water management
facilities and other water management facilities, and other
environmental maintenance, stewardship, and restoration projects. The
department shall consult with the workforce training and education
coordinating board, the state board for community and technical
colleges, the higher education coordinating board, the employment
security department, and other state agencies administering
conservation corps programs, to incorporate training, education, and
certification in environmental restoration and management fields into
the program. The department may enter into agreements with community
colleges, private schools, state or local agencies, or other entities
to provide training and educational courses as part of the enrollee
benefits from the program.
(2) The department may receive gifts, grants, federal funds, or
other moneys from public or private sources, for the use and benefit of
the veterans conservation corps program. The funds shall be deposited
to the veterans conservation corps account created in section 6 of this
act.
(3) The department shall submit a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008, on the status of the
veterans conservation corps program, including the number of enrollees
employed in projects, training provided, certifications earned,
employment placements achieved, program funding provided from all
sources, and the results of the pilot project authorized in section 4
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of veterans affairs may enter
into an agreement with a local government, community college, or other
entity for use of veterans conservation corps enrollees in a project or
projects, where the enrollees' training and work on the project or
projects will be commenced before June 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall collaborate with the state agencies
implementing the Washington conservation corps, created in chapter
43.220 RCW, to maximize the utilization of both conservation corps
programs. These agencies shall work together to identify stewardship
and maintenance projects on agency-managed lands that are suitable for
work by veterans conservation corps enrollees. The department may
expend funds appropriated to the veterans conservation corps program to
defray the costs of education, training, and certification associated
with the enrollees participating in such projects.
(2) By September 30, 2007, the department, in conjunction with the
state agencies identified in subsection (1) of this section, shall
provide to the office of financial management and to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives a report that:
(a) Identifies projects on state agency-managed lands that are
currently planned for veterans conservation corps enrollee
participation;
(b) Identifies additional projects on state agency-managed lands
that are suitable for veterans conservation corps enrollee
participation and for which funding is currently in place for such
participation; and
(c) Identifies additional projects on state agency-managed lands
for which project implementation has been funded or is included in the
agency's multibiennial stewardship plans, and that are suitable for
veterans conservation corps enrollee participation in the event that
additional funding is provided to the department for associated
training, education, and certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
The veterans conservation corps account is created in the state
treasury. All moneys appropriated to the account or directed to the
account from other sources must be deposited in the account. Moneys in
the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for purposes of the veterans conservation
corps program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall seek to enter agreements with the national
park service, the United States forest service, the United States fish
and wildlife service, and other federal agencies managing lands in
Washington, for the employment of veterans conservation corps enrollees
in maintenance, restoration, and stewardship projects. Up to twenty
percent of the costs of the veterans conservation corps enrollees
participation in a federal project may be provided by the department,
including the costs of training provided on the project.
(2) By September 30, 2008, the department shall provide a report to
the governor and appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives regarding agreements entered with federal agencies to
employ veteran conservation corps enrollees on federal land projects,
and any revisions to the program needed to increase the number of these
agreements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.60A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) During calendar years 2007 and 2008 the salmon recovery funding
board shall cooperate with the department of veterans affairs to inform
salmon habitat project sponsors of the availability of veterans
conservation corps enrollees to perform project work. From
applications submitted, the board and the department shall identify
projects that propose work suitable for corps enrollees and located
near where enrollees are based or may be created. The department may
provide the project applicants with information regarding the benefits
of employing a veterans conservation corps enrollee in the project,
including funding that the department may make available to assist with
the project. Such funding shall be considered by the salmon recovery
funding board as matched funding in evaluating the project for salmon
recovery funding board funding.
(2) As an element of the report required under section 3(3) of this
act, the salmon recovery funding board and the department shall jointly
report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the senate and
house of representatives regarding projects funded during the 2007 and
2008 grant cycles that employ veterans conservation corps enrollees.
The report shall include recommendations for increasing the use of
veterans conservation corps enrollees in salmon habitat projects that
receive funding from the salmon recovery funding board.

--- END ---