BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28C.18.010 and 1996 c 99 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this title unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the work force training and education
coordinating board.
(2) "Director" means the director of the work force training and
education coordinating board.
(3) "Training system" means programs and courses of secondary
vocational education, technical college programs and courses, community
college vocational programs and courses, private career school and
college programs and courses, employer-sponsored training, customized
training programs, adult basic education programs and courses, programs
and courses funded by the job training partnership act, programs and
courses funded by the federal vocational act, programs and courses
funded under the federal adult education act, publicly funded programs
and courses for adult literacy education, and apprenticeships, and
programs and courses offered by private and public nonprofit
organizations that are representative of communities or significant
segments of communities and provide job training or adult literacy
services.
(4) "Work force skills" means skills developed through applied
learning that strengthen and reinforce an individual's academic
knowledge, critical thinking, problem solving, and work ethic and,
thereby, develop the employability, occupational skills, and management
of home and work responsibilities necessary for economic independence.
(5) "Vocational education" means organized educational programs
offering a sequence of courses which are directly related to the
preparation or retraining of individuals in paid or unpaid employment
in current or emerging occupations requiring other than a baccalaureate
or advanced degree. Such programs shall include competency-based
applied learning which contributes to an individual's academic
knowledge, higher-order reasoning, and problem-solving skills, work
attitudes, general employability skills, and the occupational-specific
skills necessary for economic independence as a productive and
contributing member of society. Such term also includes applied
technology education.
(6) "Adult basic education" means instruction designed to achieve
mastery of skills in reading, writing, oral communication, and
computation at a level sufficient to allow the individual to function
effectively as a parent, worker, and citizen in the United States,
commensurate with that individual's actual ability level, and includes
English as a second language and preparation and testing service for
the general education development exam.

--- END ---