BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
Resident taxpayers are eligible for a refund of sales tax collected
under RCW 82.08.020 on a quarterly basis if they: (1) Have qualified
for the state need grant for higher education; or (2) are eligible for
the federal food stamp program or state-funded basic food benefits; and
(3) are enrolled in an institution eligible to serve students receiving
financial aid under the federal higher education act. To receive the
refund, taxpayers must return a completed quarterly refund form to the
department. The quarterly refund is equal to three hundred dollars or
.00625 times the state's median income as determined by the employment
security department, whichever is higher.

--- END ---