BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Washington is one of the most trade-dependent states in the
nation;
(b) Washington benefits from the exchange of economic, educational,
and cultural information and ideas among government leaders and other
citizens of foreign countries and members of the Washington legislature
and other citizens of our state;
(c) The participation of Washington state legislators in inbound
and outbound trade missions enables the legislature to craft
legislation that better addresses trade issues and fosters better
understanding between the people of Washington and the people of other
nations;
(d) Economic and business missions to foreign countries often have
the effect of bringing investment and jobs to Washington through
person-to-person contact and networking; and
(e) Washington benefits from hosting visitors from other nations to
foster business and cultural relationships.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that the state increase its
support for trade, cultural, and economic exchanges that contribute to
the economic development of our state. It is further the intent of the
legislature that the state facilitate and encourage these exchanges
through the evaluation, organization, and execution of missions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Foundation" means the Washington international relations
foundation.
(2) "Government leader" means an elected official of the government
of a foreign nation, including officials of national, state, or
provincial governments.
(3) "Inbound mission" means a trip on which government leaders are
invited to travel to the state of Washington by the Washington state
legislature in order to learn about the culture, economy, or
governmental structure of the state of Washington.
(4) "Mission" means either an inbound or an outbound mission.
(5) "Outbound mission" means a trip on which members of the
Washington state legislature are invited to travel to a particular
nation by a national, provincial, or state government in order to learn
about the culture, economy, or governmental structure of the nation,
province, or state that extended the invitation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Washington international relations
foundation is organized as a private, nonprofit corporation in
accordance with chapter 24.03 RCW and this section. The purpose of the
foundation is to provide assistance to the Washington state legislature
in furthering the exchange of economic, educational, and cultural
information between government leaders and other citizens of foreign
countries and members of the Washington state legislature and other
citizens of Washington.
(2) The foundation is authorized to plan, organize, and implement
inbound and outbound missions that exchange information relating to
government, trade and commerce, agriculture, tourism, sports,
education, technology, environment, and the arts.
(3)(a) The foundation shall coordinate with appropriate agencies of
the executive branch to ensure that legislators on any missions it
organizes or assists with will present the state's trade goals in a
manner consistent with executive branch policies.
(b) The foundation shall coordinate with the governor's protocol
officer, the department of agriculture, and the department of
community, trade, and economic development in the preparation of
legislators for meeting with government leaders and other citizens of
foreign countries. Such preparation shall include the provision of
information on the cultures of other countries and accepted
international hospitality practices.
(c) When the governor's office, the office of the secretary of
state, the office of the lieutenant governor, the department of
agriculture, or the department of community, trade, and economic
development are preparing for a mission and invite the participation of
legislators, the foundation shall assist in logistics and planning.
(4)(a) The foundation may sponsor outbound missions allowing
citizens of Washington to travel overseas. Participants on such
missions will be selected by the foundation based on the following
considerations:
(i) The applicants' showing of how their skills and expertise would
be germane to the mission;
(ii) The applicants' showing of how their participation will
benefit them and their business, employer, or school;
(iii) The applicants' showing of how they will benefit the state as
a result of their participation. This may include, but is not limited
to, the publication of reports, delivery of lectures, or writing of
newspaper or magazine articles; and
(iv) The amount of matching funds the applicant will provide.
(b) In selecting participants for such mission, the foundation will
give preference to those applicants who have not traveled overseas
before.
(5) The foundation may solicit charitable donations, gifts, or
grants from private or public sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The articles of incorporation of the
Washington international relations foundation must be drawn up by a
committee consisting of the following members:
(a) Two senators from each of the two major political parties in
the Washington state senate, appointed by the president of the senate;
(b) Two representatives from each of the two major political
parties in the Washington state house of representatives, appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives; and
(c) Three private citizens, representing organizations concerned
with international trade.
(2) The speaker of the house of representatives and the president
of the senate must jointly appoint the chair of the committee.
(3) The committee shall write the articles of incorporation for the
Washington international relations foundation within ninety days after
the effective date of this section.
(4) The committee shall appoint the initial directors of the
Washington international relations foundation as well as the initial
officers of the foundation within thirty days after the articles of
incorporation are completed.
(5) The committee must disband within thirty days of completing the
tasks assigned to it in this section.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Upon receiving an official invitation or
proposal to develop an inbound or outbound mission, the Washington
international relations foundation shall contact the governmental
entity issuing the invitation or proposal and determine the following:
(a) The length of the proposed mission;
(b) The number of legislators or government leaders invited to
participate;
(c) The benefit to the state of Washington;
(d) The number and type of businesses invited to participate, if
any;
(e) Whether a reciprocal mission is expected; and
(f) Other facts pertinent to the planning and organization of the
mission.
(2) Senators participating in a mission shall be appointed by the
president of the senate, with the advice of the majority and minority
caucus leaders. Members of the house of representatives participating
in a mission shall be appointed by the speaker of the house, with the
advice of the majority and minority caucus leaders.
(3) Prior to the departure of each mission, the foundation must
create and release to the public a goals statement for the mission.
The statement must include, but is not limited to:
(a) A statement of the mission's objectives, dates, and expected
itinerary; and
(b) A description of the type of knowledge, background, and
experience held by a delegation member that might provide assistance to
the mission.
(4) At the conclusion of each mission the foundation shall solicit
feedback about the mission and its results from each participating
legislator or government leader.
(5) Following completion of the mission the foundation must prepare
a report, and make it available to the public that includes, but is not
limited to, the following:
(a) How the mission achieved or made progress towards achieving the
goals stated before the mission;
(b) The names and titles of all participants of the mission;
(c) The names and titles of officials visited during the mission;
(d) A detailed itinerary of the mission;
(e) The cost of the mission borne by the foundation; and
(f) The approximate costs of the mission borne by individuals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The Washington international relations
foundation may expend funds necessary for meetings, activities, or
events associated with missions.
(2) The foundation may not use funds to pay an honorarium to any
director, officer, or employee of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The Washington international relations
foundation may not carry on propaganda, attempt to influence state or
federal legislation, or participate or intervene in any political
campaign, including the distribution of statements, on behalf of any
candidate for public office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The Washington international relations
foundation account is created in the state treasury. The account shall
consist of all moneys appropriated to the account by the legislature.
Moneys deposited into the account shall be used by the Washington
international relations foundation, after appropriation, to perform the
purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 3 and 5 through 8 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 44 RCW.

--- END ---