BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.40.197 and 2005 c 327 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 1995, and annually thereafter, the retirement
allowance of a person meeting the requirements of this section shall be
increased by the annual increase amount.
(2) The following persons shall be eligible for the benefit
provided in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) A beneficiary who has received a retirement allowance for at
least one year by July 1st in the calendar year in which the annual
increase is given and has attained at least age sixty-six by ((July
1st)) December 31st in the calendar year in which the annual increase
is given; or
(b) A beneficiary whose retirement allowance is lower than the
minimum benefit provided under RCW 41.40.1984.
(3) If otherwise eligible, those receiving an annual adjustment
under RCW 41.40.188(1)(c) shall be eligible for the annual increase
adjustment in addition to the benefit that would have been received
absent this section.
(4) Those receiving a benefit under RCW 41.40.220(1), or a survivor
of a disabled member under RCW 41.44.170(5) shall be eligible for the
benefit provided by this section.
(5) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to receive this postretirement adjustment not granted prior to
that time.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.32.489 and 1995 c 345 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 1995, and annually thereafter, the retirement
allowance of a person meeting the requirements of this section shall be
increased by the annual increase amount.
(2) The following persons shall be eligible for the benefit
provided in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) A beneficiary who has received a retirement allowance for at
least one year by July 1st in the calendar year in which the annual
increase is given and has attained at least age sixty-six by ((July
1st)) December 31st in the calendar year in which the annual increase
is given; or
(b) A beneficiary whose retirement allowance is lower than the
minimum benefit provided under RCW 41.32.4851.
(3) The following persons shall also be eligible for the benefit
provided in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) A beneficiary receiving the minimum benefit on June 30, 1995,
under RCW 41.32.485; or
(b) A recipient of a survivor benefit on June 30, 1995, which has
been increased by RCW 41.32.575.
(4) If otherwise eligible, those receiving an annual adjustment
under RCW 41.32.530(1)(d) shall be eligible for the annual increase
adjustment in addition to the benefit that would have been received
absent this section.
(5) Those receiving a temporary disability benefit under RCW
41.32.540 shall not be eligible for the benefit provided by this
section.
(6) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to receive this postretirement adjustment not granted prior to
that time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---