BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.54.010 and 2004 c 242 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Base salary" means salaries or wages earned by a member of a
system during a payroll period for personal services and includes wages
and salaries deferred under provisions of the United States internal
revenue code, but shall exclude overtime payments, nonmoney maintenance
compensation, and lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave,
unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, any form
of severance pay, any bonus for voluntary retirement, any other form of
leave, or any similar lump sum payment; except that forms of payment
which are excluded under this subsection shall be included in base
salary when reportable to the department in all of a dual member's
retirement systems, and when none of the dual member's retirement
systems are the Washington state patrol retirement system.
(2) "Department" means the department of retirement systems.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of retirement
systems.
(4) "Dual member" means a person who (a) is or becomes a member of
a system on or after July 1, 1988, (b) has been a member of one or more
other systems, and (c) has never been retired for service from a
retirement system and is not receiving a disability retirement or
disability leave benefit from any retirement system listed in RCW
41.50.030 or subsection (6) of this section.
(5) "Service" means the same as it may be defined in each
respective system. For the purposes of RCW 41.54.030, military service
granted under RCW 41.40.170(3) or 43.43.260 may only be based on
service accrued under chapter 41.40 or 43.43 RCW, respectively.
(6) "System" means the retirement systems established under
chapters 41.32, 41.40, 41.44, 41.35, 41.37, and 43.43 RCW; plan 2 of
the system established under chapter 41.26 RCW; and the city employee
retirement systems for Seattle, Tacoma, and Spokane.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.54.030 and 2003 c 294 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A dual member may combine service in all systems for the
purpose of:
(a) Determining the member's eligibility to receive a service
retirement allowance; and
(b) Qualifying for a benefit under RCW 41.26.530(2), 41.32.840(2),
41.35.620, or 41.40.790.
(2) A dual member who is eligible to retire under any system may
elect to retire from all the member's systems and to receive service
retirement allowances calculated as provided in this section. Each
system shall calculate the allowance using its own criteria except that
the member shall be allowed to substitute the member's base salary from
any system as the compensation used in calculating the allowance.
(3) The service retirement allowances from a system which, but for
this section, would not be allowed to be paid at this date based on the
dual member's age may be received immediately or deferred to a later
date. The allowances shall be actuarially adjusted from the earliest
age upon which the combined service would have made such dual member
eligible in that system.
(4) The service retirement eligibility requirements of RCW
41.40.180 shall apply to any dual member whose prior system is plan 1
of the public employees' retirement system established under chapter
41.40 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.54.070 and 1996 c 55 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The benefit granted by this chapter shall not result in a total
benefit less than would have been received absent such benefit.
(2) The total sum of the retirement allowances received under this
chapter shall not exceed the largest amount the dual member would
receive if all the service had been rendered in any one system. When
calculating the maximum benefit a dual member would receive: (((1)))
(a) Military service granted under RCW 41.40.170(3) or 43.43.260 shall
be based only on service accrued under chapter 41.40 or 43.43 RCW,
respectively; and (((2))) (b) the calculation shall be made assuming
that the dual member did not defer any allowances pursuant to RCW
41.54.030(3). When a dual member's combined retirement allowances
would exceed the limitation imposed by this ((section)) subsection, the
allowances shall be reduced by the systems on a proportional basis,
according to service. The limitation imposed by this subsection shall
not apply to a dual member with:
(i) Less than fifteen years of service credit in a plan with a
retirement benefit cap as defined by the department; and
(ii) Service credit in a plan with no retirement benefit cap.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---