BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.40.124 and 2006 c 189 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 1 or plan 2 employed as a supreme court justice, court of appeals
judge, or superior court judge may make a one-time irrevocable
election, filed in writing with the member's employer, the department,
and the administrative office of the courts, to accrue an additional
benefit equal to one and one-half percent of average final compensation
for each year of future service credit from the date of the election in
lieu of future employee and employer contributions to the judicial
retirement account plan under chapter 2.14 RCW.
(2)(a) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection
(1) of this section may apply to the department to increase the
member's benefit multiplier by an additional one and one-half percent
per year of service for the period in which the member served as a
justice or judge prior to the election. The member may purchase the
higher benefit multiplier for all or part of the member's prior
judicial service beginning with the most recent judicial service. The
member shall pay((, for the applicable period of service,)) five
percent of the salary earned for each month of service for which the
higher benefit multiplier is being purchased, plus interest as
determined by the director. The purchase price shall not exceed the
actuarially equivalent value of the increase in the member's benefit
resulting from the increase in the benefit multiplier ((as determined
by the director)). This payment must be made prior to retirement.
(b) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.40.127 and 2006 c 189 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 1 or plan 2 employed as a district court judge or municipal court
judge may make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in writing with
the member's employer and the department, to accrue an additional
benefit equal to one and one-half percent of average final compensation
for each year of future service credit from the date of the election.
(2)(a) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection
(1) of this section may apply to the department to increase the
member's benefit multiplier by one and one-half percent per year of
service for the period in which the member served as a judge prior to
the election. The member may purchase the higher benefit multiplier
for all or part of the member's prior judicial service beginning with
the most recent judicial service. The member shall pay((, for the
applicable period of service,)) five percent of the salary earned for
each month of service for which the higher benefit multiplier is being
purchased, plus interest as determined by the director. The purchase
price shall not exceed the actuarially equivalent value of the increase
in the member's benefit resulting from the increase in the benefit
multiplier ((as determined by the director)). This payment must be
made prior to retirement.
(b) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.40.870 and 2006 c 189 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 3 employed as a supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or
superior court judge may make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in
writing with the member's employer, the department, and the
administrative office of the courts, to accrue an additional plan 3
defined benefit equal to six-tenths percent of average final
compensation for each year of future service credit from the date of
the election in lieu of future employer contributions to the judicial
retirement account plan under chapter 2.14 RCW.
(2)(a) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection
(1) of this section may apply to the department to increase the
member's benefit multiplier by six-tenths percent per year of service
for the period in which the member served as a justice or judge prior
to the election. The member may purchase the higher benefit multiplier
for all or part of the member's prior judicial service beginning with
the most recent judicial service. The member shall pay((, for the
applicable period of service,)) two and one-half percent of the salary
earned for each month of service for which the higher benefit
multiplier is being purchased, plus interest as determined by the
director. The purchase price shall not exceed the actuarially
equivalent value of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from
the increase in the benefit multiplier ((as determined by the
director)). This payment must be made prior to retirement.
(b) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.
(3) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection (1)
of this section shall contribute a minimum of seven and one-half
percent of pay to the member's defined contribution account.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.40.873 and 2006 c 189 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 3 employed as a district court judge or municipal court judge may
make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in writing with the
member's employer and the department, to accrue an additional plan 3
defined benefit equal to six-tenths percent of average final
compensation for each year of future service credit from the date of
the election.
(2)(a) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection
(1) of this section may apply to the department to increase the
member's benefit multiplier by six-tenths percent per year of service
for the period in which the member served as a judge prior to the
election. The member may purchase the higher benefit multiplier for
all or part of the member's prior judicial service beginning with the
most recent judicial service. The member shall pay((, for the
applicable period of service,)) two and one-half percent of the salary
earned for each month of service for which the higher benefit
multiplier is being purchased, plus interest as determined by the
director. The purchase price shall not exceed the actuarially
equivalent value of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from
the increase in the benefit multiplier ((as determined by the
director)). This payment must be made prior to retirement.
(b) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.
(3) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection (1)
of this section shall contribute a minimum of seven and one-half
percent of pay to the member's defined contribution account.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.32.584 and 2006 c 189 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Between January 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, a member of
plan 1 employed as a supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or
superior court judge may make a one-time irrevocable election, filed in
writing with the member's employer, the department, and the
administrative office of the courts, to accrue an additional benefit
equal to one and one-half percent of average final compensation for
each year of future service credit from the date of the election.
(2)(a) A member who chooses to make the election under subsection
(1) of this section may apply to the department to increase the
member's benefit multiplier by one and one-half percent per year of
service for the period in which the member served as a justice or judge
prior to the election. The member may purchase the higher benefit
multiplier for all or part of the member's prior judicial service
beginning with the most recent judicial service. The member shall
pay((, for the applicable period of service,)) five percent of the
salary earned for each month of service for which the higher benefit
multiplier is being purchased, plus interest as determined by the
director. The purchase price shall not exceed the actuarially
equivalent value of the increase in the member's benefit resulting from
the increase in the benefit multiplier ((as determined by the
director)). This payment must be made prior to retirement.
(b) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member applying
to increase the member's benefit multiplier under this section may pay
all or part of the cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover,
direct rollover, or trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible
retirement plan. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that all
lump sum payments, rollovers, and transfers comply with the
requirements of the internal revenue code and regulations adopted by
the internal revenue service. The rules adopted by the department may
condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another plan on
the receipt of information necessary to enable the department to
determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free
rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable to plan 1, plan 2,
and plan 3" to read as follows:
A member who purchased the higher benefit multiplier for prior
judicial service prior to the effective date of this act may, between
July 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, apply to the department to have
the higher benefit multiplier cost recalculated under RCW 41.40.124 and
41.40.127. Any difference in the cost in favor of the member shall be
remitted to the member.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as follows:
A member who purchased the higher benefit multiplier for prior
judicial service prior to the effective date of this act may, between
July 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, apply to the department to have
the higher benefit multiplier cost recalculated under RCW 41.40.870 and
41.40.873. Any difference in the cost in favor of the member shall be
remitted to the member.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 1" to read as follows:
A member who purchased the higher benefit multiplier for prior
judicial service prior to the effective date of this act may, between
July 1, 2007, and December 31, 2007, apply to the department to have
the higher benefit multiplier cost recalculated under RCW 41.32.584.
Any difference in the cost in favor of the member shall be remitted to
the member.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---