BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.10.020 and 2005 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this chapter, ((no)) a person ((shall
own, transport, or)) may not operate any snowmobile within this state
unless such snowmobile has been registered in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter. ((However, a vintage snowmobile only
requires registration if operated within this state.))
(2) A registration number shall be assigned, without payment of a
fee, to snowmobiles owned by the state of Washington or its political
subdivisions, and the assigned registration number shall be displayed
upon each snowmobile in such manner as provided by rules adopted by the
department.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.10.040 and 2005 c 235 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for registration shall be made to the department in
the manner and upon forms the department prescribes, and shall state
the name and address of each owner of the snowmobile to be registered,
and shall be signed by at least one such owner, and shall be
accompanied by an annual registration fee ((to be established by the
commission, after consultation with the committee and any statewide
snowmobile user groups)) as described in (a) of this subsection.
(a) The annual registration fee for snowmobiles ((newer))
manufactured less than thirty years is thirty dollars. The annual
registration fee for vintage snowmobiles is twelve dollars. The
department shall design, in cooperation with the commission, a distinct
registration decal which shall be issued to vintage snowmobiles upon
payment of the annual registration fee.
(b) Upon receipt of the application and the application fee, the
snowmobile shall be registered and a registration number assigned,
which shall be affixed to the snowmobile in a manner provided in RCW
46.10.070.
(2) The registration provided in this section shall be valid for a
period of one year. At the end of the period of registration, every
owner of a snowmobile in this state shall renew his or her registration
in the manner the department prescribes, for an additional period of
one year, upon payment of the annual registration fee ((as determined
by the commission)).
(3) Any person acquiring a snowmobile already validly registered
under the provisions of this chapter must, within ten days of the
acquisition or purchase of the snowmobile, make application to the
department for transfer of the registration, and the application shall
be accompanied by a transfer fee of five dollars.
(4) A snowmobile owned by a resident of another state or Canadian
province where registration is not required by law may be issued a
nonresident registration permit valid for not more than sixty days.
Application for the permit shall state the name and address of each
owner of the snowmobile to be registered and shall be signed by at
least one owner and shall be accompanied by a registration fee of five
dollars. The registration permit shall be carried on the vehicle at
all times during its operation in this state.
(5) The registration fees provided in this section shall be in lieu
of any personal property or excise tax heretofore imposed on
snowmobiles by this state or any political subdivision thereof, and no
city, county, or other municipality, and no state agency shall
hereafter impose any other registration or license fee on any
snowmobile in this state.
(6) The department shall make available a pair of uniform decals
consistent with the provisions of RCW 46.10.070. In addition to the
registration fee provided in this section the department shall charge
each applicant for registration the actual cost of the decal. The
department shall make available replacement decals for a fee equivalent
to the actual cost of the decals.

--- END ---