BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of health shall conduct
a study of the tattooing and body piercing professions and make
recommendations to the legislature as to whether the professions should
be regulated, and to what extent, for the purpose of protecting the
public interest under the criteria set forth in RCW 18.120.030.
(2) The department shall submit a report detailing its finding and
recommendations under this section to the appropriate legislative
committees by January 1, 2009.

--- END ---