BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.72 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person circulating initiative or referendum petitions in
order to get signatures on the petitions must wear an identification
tag that prominently displays the following information:
(a) If the person is paid for circulating the petitions, the person
must identify that he or she is a paid signature gatherer and identify
who is paying the person for work as a signature gatherer; or
(b) If the person is not paid for circulating the petitions, the
person must identify that he or she is a volunteer signature gatherer.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a person is considered a paid
signature gatherer if he or she receives a salary or other
remuneration, including an honorarium or gift, for work circulating
initiative or referendum petitions for signatures.

--- END ---