BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In a county with a population under three hundred thousand, the
governing body of a public facilities district created before August 1,
2001, under chapter 35.57 RCW or before January 1, 2000, under chapter
36.100 RCW in which the total population in the public facilities
district is greater than ninety thousand and less than one hundred
thousand that commences improvement or rehabilitation of an existing
regional center, to be used for community events, and artistic,
musical, theatrical, or other cultural exhibitions, presentations, or
performances and having two thousand or fewer permanent seats, before
January 1, 2009, may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the
terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes
authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the public facilities district.
The rate of tax may not exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in
the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a
use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The
department shall perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the
county at no cost to the public facilities district.
(3) The tax imposed in this section shall expire when the bonds
issued for the construction of the regional center and related parking
facilities are retired, but not more than twenty-five years after the
tax is first collected.
(4) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the
purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount
from other public or private sources equal to thirty-three percent of
the amount collected under this section, provided that amounts
generated from nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 35.57
RCW may not constitute a public or private source. For the purpose of
this section, public or private sources include, but are not limited to
cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development or
improvement of the regional center, land that is donated and used for
the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind contributions from
public or private foundations, or amounts attributed to private sector
partners as part of a public and private partnership agreement
negotiated by the public facilities district.

--- END ---