BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.09.130 and 2004 c 105 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may operate a nonhighway vehicle in such a way as to
endanger human life.
(2) No person shall operate a nonhighway vehicle in such a way as
to run down or harass any wildlife or animal, nor carry, transport, or
convey any loaded weapon in or upon, nor hunt from, any nonhighway
vehicle except: (a) By permit issued by the director of fish and
wildlife under RCW 77.32.237((: PROVIDED, That)); or (b) when
authorized by the legislative authority of a county. It shall not be
unlawful to carry, transport, or convey a loaded pistol in or upon a
nonhighway vehicle if the person complies with the terms and conditions
of chapter 9.41 RCW.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "hunt" means any effort to
kill, injure, capture, or purposely disturb a wild animal or bird.
(4) Violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.10.130 and 2003 c 53 s 234 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person shall operate a snowmobile in such a way as to
endanger human life.
(2) No person shall operate a snowmobile in such a way as to run
down or harass deer, elk, or any wildlife, or any domestic animal, nor
shall any person carry any loaded weapon upon, nor hunt from, any
snowmobile except: (a) By permit issued by the director of fish and
wildlife under RCW 77.32.237; or (b) when authorized by the legislative
authority of a county.
(3) Any person violating this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

--- END ---