BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95.020 and 2005 c 394 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purpose of this chapter is to establish a comprehensive
statewide program for solid waste handling, ((and solid waste))
recovery ((and/or)), and recycling which will prevent land, air, and
water pollution and conserve the natural, economic, and energy
resources of this state. To this end it is the purpose of this
chapter:
(1) To assign primary responsibility for adequate solid waste
handling to local government, reserving to the state, however, those
functions necessary to assure effective programs throughout the state;
(2) To provide for adequate planning for solid waste handling by
local government;
(3) To provide for the adoption and enforcement of basic minimum
performance standards for solid waste handling, including that all
sites where recyclable materials are generated and transported from
shall provide a separate container for solid waste;
(4) To encourage the development and operation of waste recycling
facilities needed to accomplish the management priority of waste
recycling, to promote consistency in the requirements for such
facilities throughout the state, and to ensure that recyclable
materials diverted from the waste stream for recycling are routed to
facilities in which recycling occurs;
(5) To provide technical and financial assistance to local
governments in the planning, development, and conduct of solid waste
handling programs;
(6) To encourage storage, proper disposal, ((and)) recycling, and
beneficial use of discarded vehicle tires ((and));
(7) To stimulate private recycling programs throughout the state;
and
(((7))) (8) To encourage the development and operation of waste
recycling facilities and activities needed to accomplish the management
priority of waste recycling and to promote consistency in the
permitting requirements for such facilities and activities throughout
the state.
It is the intent of the legislature that local governments be
encouraged to use the expertise of private industry and to contract
with private industry to the fullest extent possible to carry out solid
waste recovery ((and/or)) and recycling programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.95.030 and 2004 c 101 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates
otherwise:)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Beneficial use of discarded vehicle tires" means use that is
not storage, disposal, or recycling but serves as a replacement for
another product or material for specific purposes, and includes use of
chipped tires as low-density, light-weight aggregate fill.
(2) "City" means every incorporated city and town.
(((2))) (3) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation
commission.
(((3))) (4) "Committee" means the state solid waste advisory
committee.
(((4))) (5) "Composted material" means organic solid waste that has
been subjected to controlled aerobic degradation at a solid waste
facility in compliance with the requirements of this chapter. Natural
decay of organic solid waste under uncontrolled conditions does not
result in composted material.
(((5))) (6) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(((6))) (7) "Director" means the director of the department of
ecology.
(((7))) (8) "Disposal site" means the location where any final
treatment, utilization, processing, or deposit of solid waste occurs.
(((8))) (9) "Energy recovery" means a process operating under
federal and state environmental laws and regulations for converting
solid waste into usable energy and for reducing the volume of solid
waste.
(((9))) (10) "Functional standards" means criteria for solid waste
handling expressed in terms of expected performance or solid waste
handling functions.
(((10))) (11) "Incineration" means a process of reducing the volume
of solid waste operating under federal and state environmental laws and
regulations by use of an enclosed device using controlled flame
combustion.
(((11))) (12) "Inert waste landfill" means a landfill that receives
only inert waste, as determined under RCW 70.95.065, and includes
facilities that use inert wastes as a component of fill.
(((12))) (13) "Jurisdictional health department" means city,
county, city-county, or district public health department.
(((13))) (14) "Landfill" means a disposal facility or part of a
facility at which solid waste is placed in or on land and which is not
a land treatment facility.
(((14))) (15) "Local government" means a city, town, or county.
(((15))) (16) "Modify" means to substantially change the design or
operational plans including, but not limited to, removal of a design
element previously set forth in a permit application or the addition of
a disposal or processing activity that is not approved in the permit.
(((16))) (17) "Multiple family residence" means any structure
housing two or more dwelling units.
(((17))) (18) "Person" means individual, firm, association,
copartnership, political subdivision, government agency, municipality,
industry, public or private corporation, or any other entity
whatsoever.
(((18))) (19) "Recyclable materials" means those solid wastes that
are separated for recycling or reuse, such as papers, metals, and
glass, that are identified as recyclable material pursuant to a local
comprehensive solid waste plan. Prior to the adoption of the local
comprehensive solid waste plan, adopted pursuant to RCW 70.95.110(2),
local governments may identify recyclable materials by ordinance from
July 23, 1989.
(((19))) (20) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing
waste materials into usable or marketable materials for use other than
landfill disposal or incineration.
(((20))) (21) "Residence" means the regular dwelling place of an
individual or individuals.
(((21))) (22) "Sewage sludge" means a semisolid substance
consisting of settled sewage solids combined with varying amounts of
water and dissolved materials, generated from a wastewater treatment
system, that does not meet the requirements of chapter 70.95J RCW.
(((22))) (23) "Soil amendment" means any substance that is intended
to improve the physical characteristics of the soil, except composted
material, commercial fertilizers, agricultural liming agents,
unmanipulated animal manures, unmanipulated vegetable manures, food
wastes, food processing wastes, and materials exempted by rule of the
department, such as biosolids as defined in chapter 70.95J RCW and
wastewater as regulated in chapter 90.48 RCW.
(((23))) (24) "Solid waste" or "wastes" means all putrescible and
nonputrescible solid and semisolid wastes including, but not limited
to, garbage, rubbish, ashes, industrial wastes, swill, sewage sludge,
demolition and construction wastes, abandoned vehicles or parts
thereof, and recyclable materials.
(((24))) (25) "Solid waste handling" means the management, storage,
collection, transportation, treatment, utilization, processing, and
final disposal of solid wastes, including the recovery and recycling of
materials from solid wastes, the recovery of energy resources from
solid wastes or the conversion of the energy in solid wastes to more
useful forms or combinations thereof.
(((25))) (26) "Source separation" means the separation of different
kinds of solid waste at the place where the waste originates.
(((26))) (27) "Vehicle" includes every device physically capable of
being moved upon a public or private highway, road, street, or
watercourse and in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may
be transported or drawn upon a public or private highway, road, street,
or watercourse, except devices moved by human or animal power or used
exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.
(((27))) (28) "Waste-derived soil amendment" means any soil
amendment as defined in this chapter that is derived from solid waste
as defined in RCW 70.95.030, but does not include biosolids or
biosolids products regulated under chapter 70.95J RCW or wastewaters
regulated under chapter 90.48 RCW.
(((28))) (29) "Waste reduction" means reducing the amount or
toxicity of waste generated or reusing materials.
(((29))) (30) "Yard debris" means plant material commonly created
in the course of maintaining yards and gardens, and through
horticulture, gardening, landscaping, or similar activities. Yard
debris includes but is not limited to grass clippings, leaves,
branches, brush, weeds, flowers, roots, windfall fruit, vegetable
garden debris, holiday trees, and tree prunings four inches or less in
diameter.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.95.260 and 1995 c 399 s 189 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall in addition to its other powers and duties:
(1) Cooperate with the appropriate federal, state, interstate and
local units of government and with appropriate private organizations in
carrying out the provisions of this chapter.
(2) Coordinate the development of a solid waste management plan for
all areas of the state in cooperation with local government, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, and other
appropriate state and regional agencies. The plan shall relate to
solid waste management for twenty years in the future and shall be
reviewed biennially, revised as necessary, and extended so that
perpetually the plan shall look to the future for twenty years as a
guide in carrying out a state coordinated solid waste management
program. The plan shall be developed into a single integrated document
and shall be ((adopted no later than October 1990. The plan shall be))
revised regularly after its initial completion so that local
governments revising local comprehensive solid waste management plans
can take advantage of the data and analysis in the state plan.
(3) Provide technical assistance to any person as well as to
cities, counties, and industries.
(4) Initiate, conduct, and support research, demonstration
projects, and investigations, and coordinate research programs
pertaining to solid waste management systems, including beneficial use
of discarded vehicle tires.
(5) Develop statewide programs to increase public awareness of and
participation in tire recycling, and to stimulate and encourage local
private tire recycling centers and public participation in tire
recycling.
(6) ((May, under the provisions of the Administrative Procedure
Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, from time to time
promulgate such)) Adopt those rules ((and regulations)) as are
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.95.300 and 1998 c 156 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 8 of this act, the department may
by rule exempt a solid waste from the permitting requirements of this
chapter for one or more beneficial uses. In adopting such rules, the
department shall specify both the solid waste that is exempted from the
permitting requirements and the beneficial use or uses for which the
solid waste is so exempted. The department shall consider: (a)
Whether the material will be beneficially used or reused; and (b)
whether the beneficial use or reuse of the material will present
threats to human health or the environment.
(2) The department may also exempt a solid waste from the
permitting requirements of this chapter for one or more beneficial uses
by approving an application for such an exemption. The department
shall establish by rule procedures under which a person may apply to
the department for such an exemption. The rules shall establish
criteria for providing such an exemption, which shall include, but not
be limited to: (a) The material will be beneficially used or reused;
and (b) the beneficial use or reuse of the material will not present
threats to human health or the environment. Rules adopted under this
subsection shall identify the information that an application shall
contain. Persons seeking such an exemption shall apply to the
department under the procedures established by the rules adopted under
this subsection.
(3) After receipt of an application filed under rules adopted under
subsection (2) of this section, the department shall review the
application to determine whether it is complete, and forward a copy of
the completed application to all jurisdictional health departments for
review and comment. Within forty-five days, the jurisdictional health
departments shall forward to the department their comments and any
other information they deem relevant to the department's decision to
approve or disapprove the application. Every complete application
shall be approved or disapproved by the department within ninety days
of receipt. If the application is approved by the department, the
solid waste is exempt from the permitting requirements of this chapter
when used anywhere in the state in the manner approved by the
department. If the composition, use, or reuse of the solid waste is
not consistent with the terms and conditions of the department's
approval of the application, the use of the solid waste remains subject
to the permitting requirements of this chapter.
(4) The department shall establish procedures by rule for providing
to the public and the solid waste industry notice of and an opportunity
to comment on each application for an exemption under subsection (2) of
this section.
(5) Any jurisdictional health department or applicant may appeal
the decision of the department to approve or disapprove an application
under subsection (3) of this section. The appeal shall be made to the
pollution control hearings board by filing with the hearings board a
notice of appeal within thirty days of the decision of the department.
The hearings board's review of the decision shall be made in accordance
with chapter 43.21B RCW and any subsequent appeal of a decision of the
board shall be made in accordance with RCW 43.21B.180.
(6) This section shall not be deemed to invalidate the exemptions
or determinations of nonapplicability in the department's solid waste
rules as they exist on June 11, 1998, which exemptions and
determinations are recognized and confirmed subject to the department's
continuing authority to modify or revoke those exemptions or
determinations by rule.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.95.500 and 1985 c 345 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may drop, deposit, discard, or otherwise dispose of
vehicle tires on any public property or private property in this state
or in the waters of this state whether from a vehicle or otherwise,
including, but not limited to, any public highway, public park, beach,
campground, forest land, recreational area, trailer park, highway,
road, street, or alley unless:
(a) The property is designated by the state, or by any of its
agencies or political subdivisions, for the disposal of discarded
vehicle tires; and
(b) The person is authorized to use the property for such purpose.
(2) A violation of this section is punishable by a civil penalty,
which shall not be less than two hundred dollars nor more than two
thousand dollars for each offense.
(3) This section does not apply to:
(a) The storage or deposit of vehicle tires in quantities deemed
exempt under rules adopted by the department ((of ecology)) under its
functional standards for solid waste; or
(b) Beneficial use of discarded vehicle tires pursuant to rules
adopted by the department under section 8 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.95.530 and 2005 c 354 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Moneys in the waste tire removal account may be appropriated to
the department of ecology:
(a) To provide for funding to state and local governments for the
removal of discarded vehicle tires from unauthorized tire dump sites;
(b) To accomplish the other purposes of RCW 70.95.020 as they
relate to waste tire cleanup under this chapter; and
(c) To ((conduct a study of existing tire cleanup sites. The
office of financial management shall oversee the study process and
approve the completed study. The completed study shall be delivered to
the house of representatives and senate transportation committees by
November 15, 2005. In conducting the study, the department shall
consult on a regular basis with interested parties. The following
identified elements at a minimum shall be included in the completed
study:
(i) Identification of existing tire cleanup sites in the state of
Washington;
(ii) The estimated number of tires in each tire cleanup site;
(iii) A map identifying the location of each one of the tire
cleanup sites;
(iv) A photograph of each one of the tire cleanup sites;
(v) The estimated cost for cleanup of each tire [cleanup] site by
cost component;
(vi) The estimated reimbursement of costs to be recovered from
persons or entities that created or have responsibility for the tire
cleanup site;
(vii) Identification of the type of reimbursements for recovery by
each of the tire cleanup sites;
(viii) The estimated time frame to begin the cleanup project and
the estimated completion date for each tire cleanup site;
(ix) An assessment of local government functions relating to
unauthorized tire piles, including cleanup, enforcement, and public
health;
(x) Identification of needs in the areas in (c)(ix) of this
subsection for each one of the counties; and
(xi) A statewide cleanup plan based on multiple funding options
between twenty cents and sixty cents for each new tire sold at retail
in the state starting on July 1, 2005. The plan shall include the
estimated time frame to begin each of the tire cleanup sites and the
estimated completion date for each one of the sites. In addition, the
plan must include a process to be followed in selecting entities to
perform the tire site cleanups. The 2006 legislature shall determine
the final distribution of the tire cleanup fee and the appropriations
for this statewide tire cleanup plan)) facilitate the beneficial use of
discarded vehicle tires.
(2) In spending funds in the account under this section, the
department of ecology shall identify communities with the most severe
problems with waste tires and provide funds first to those communities
to remove accumulations of waste tires.
(3) Immediately after July 1, 2005, the department of ecology shall
initiate a pilot project in a city with a population between three and
four thousand within a county with a population less than twenty
thousand to contract to clean up a formerly licensed tire pile in
existence for ten or more years. To begin the project, the department
shall seek to use financial assurance funds set aside for clean up of
the tire pile. For purposes of this subsection, population figures are
the official 2004 population as estimated by the office of financial
management for purposes of state revenue allocation.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.95.535 and 1989 c 431 s 93 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in making retail sales of new replacement
vehicle tires in this state shall retain ten percent of the collected
one dollar fee. The moneys retained may be used for costs associated
with the proper management of the waste vehicle tires by the retailer.
(2) The department of ecology will administer the funds for the
purposes specified in RCW 70.95.020(((5))) (6) and (7) including, but
not limited to:
(a) Making grants to local governments for pilot demonstration
projects for on-site shredding and recycling of tires from unauthorized
dump sites;
(b) Grants to local government for enforcement programs;
(c) Implementation of a public information and education program to
include posters, signs, and informational materials to be distributed
to retail tire sales and tire service outlets; and
(d) Product marketing studies for recycled tires and alternatives
to land disposal, including beneficial use of discarded vehicle tires.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 70.95 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall by rule exempt from the permitting
requirements of this chapter the beneficial use of discarded vehicle
tires. The department may impose those conditions as may be necessary
to protect human health and the environment.

--- END ---