BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The paramount duty of the department of fish
and wildlife is to preserve, protect, and perpetuate all wildlife
species. The wildlife of Washington belongs to the citizens of this
state and is a valuable resource that must be protected and cared for
in order to preserve this resource for Washington's future. As
Washington's population continues to expand and more land that was once
wildlife habitat is developed for homes and businesses, injury to and
human interactions with wildlife is on the rise. Licensed wildlife
rehabilitators often work closely with local law enforcement, animal
control officers, wildlife enforcement officers, and wildlife
biologists at the state and federal levels to aid in the safe capture,
testing for disease, medical treatment, rehabilitation, and release of
wildlife. The state recognizes the critical role licensed wildlife
rehabilitators play in capturing and caring for the sick, injured, and
orphaned wildlife of Washington state.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.606 and 1991 sp.s. c 7 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the fees imposed in RCW 46.16.585 for application
and renewal of personalized license plates an additional fee of ((ten))
twelve dollars shall be charged. ((The revenue)) Ten dollars from the
additional fee shall be deposited in the state wildlife ((fund))
account and used for the management of resources associated with the
nonconsumptive use of wildlife. Two dollars from the additional fee
shall be deposited into the wildlife rehabilitation account created
under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The wildlife rehabilitation account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from moneys directed to the account from RCW
46.16.606 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for the support of the wildlife rehabilitation program
created under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall establish a wildlife rehabilitation program
to help support the critical role licensed wildlife rehabilitators play
in protecting the public by capturing, testing for disease, and caring
for sick, injured, and orphaned wildlife in Washington state. The
director shall contract for wildlife rehabilitation services with up to
four people in each of the department's six administrative regions.
Applicants may submit only one request every two years and must reside
in the administrative region for which they have applied. The
contracts must be for a term of two years.
(2) In order to receive funding, the wildlife rehabilitator must:
(a) Be properly licensed in wildlife rehabilitation under state and
federal law; and (b) furnish information concerning his or her
identity, including fingerprints for submission to the Washington state
patrol to include a national criminal background check. The applicant
must pay for the cost of the criminal background check. If the
background check reveals that the applicant has been convicted of a
felony or gross misdemeanor, the applicant is ineligible to receive
funding.
(3) The department must require that contractors submit detailed
reports accounting for all expenditures of state funds. The reports
must be submitted to the department on a quarterly basis. The
department may require the contractor to submit to an inspection of the
rehabilitation facility to ensure compliance with department rules
governing wildlife rehabilitation. Expenditures that are permitted
under this program as they specifically relate to wildlife
rehabilitation include: (a) Reimbursement for diagnostic and lab
support services; (b) purchase and maintenance of proper restraints and
equipment used in the capture, transportation, temporary housing, and
release of wildlife; (c) reimbursement of contracted veterinary
services; (d) reimbursement of the cost of food, medication, and other
consumables; and (e) reimbursement of the cost of continuing education.
The department shall give priority to applications submitted that
provide for the rehabilitation of endangered or threatened species.
Funds may not be used to rehabilitate either nonnative species or
nuisance animals, or both, including, but not limited to the following:
Eastern gray squirrels (Sciurus carolinensis); opossum (Didelphis
virginiana); raccoons (Procyon lotor); striped skunk (Mephitis
mephitis); spotted skunk (Spilogale putorius); Eastern cottontail
rabbit (Sylvilagus floridanus); domestic rabbit (Oryctolagus
cuniculus); European starling (Sturnus vulgaris); and house sparrow
(Passer domesticus).
(4) The department may adopt any rules as are necessary to carry
out this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must develop a process for renewing wildlife
rehabilitation licenses. All wildlife rehabilitation licenses issued
by the department prior to January 1, 2006, must be renewed by January
1, 2010. The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 2 of this act is effective for
registrations due or to become due on or after January 1, 2008.

--- END ---