BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.21A.525 and 2002 c 198 s 606 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A nonregistering party seeking to contest the validity or
enforcement of a registered order in this state shall request a hearing
within twenty days after notice of the registration. The
nonregistering party may seek to vacate the registration, to assert any
defense to an allegation of noncompliance with the registered order, or
to contest the remedies being sought or the amount of any alleged
arrearages pursuant to RCW 26.21A.530.
(2) If the nonregistering party fails to contest the validity or
enforcement of the registered order in a timely manner, the order is
confirmed by operation of law.
(3) If a nonregistering party ((requests a hearing to)) wishes to
contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order, the
((registering tribunal)) party shall schedule the matter for hearing
and give notice to the other parties of the date, time, and place of
the hearing.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.21A.520 and 2002 c 198 s 605 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When a support order or income-withholding order issued in
another state is registered, the registering ((tribunal)) party shall
notify the nonregistering party. The notice must be accompanied by a
copy of the registered order and the documents and relevant information
accompanying the order.
(2) A notice must inform the nonregistering party:
(a) That a registered order is enforceable as of the date of
registration in the same manner as an order issued by a tribunal of
this state;
(b) That a hearing to contest the validity or enforcement of the
registered order must be requested within twenty days after notice;
(c) That failure to contest the validity or enforcement of the
registered order in a timely manner will result in confirmation of the
order and enforcement of the order and the alleged arrearages; and
(d) Of the amount of any alleged arrearages.
(3) If the registering party asserts that two or more orders are in
effect, a notice must also:
(a) Identify the two or more orders and the order alleged by the
registering person to be the controlling order and the consolidated
arrears, if any;
(b) Notify the nonregistering party of the right to a determination
of which is the controlling order;
(c) State that the procedures provided in subsection (2) of this
section apply to the determination of which is the controlling order;
and
(d) State that failure to contest the validity or enforcement of
the order alleged to be the controlling order in a timely manner may
result in confirmation that the order is the controlling order.
(4) Upon registration of an income-withholding order for
enforcement, the registering ((tribunal)) party shall notify the
obligor's employer pursuant to the income-withholding law of this
state.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.27.441 and 2001 c 65 s 305 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A child custody determination issued by a court of another
state may be registered in this state, with or without a simultaneous
request for enforcement, by sending to the appropriate court in this
state:
(a) A letter or other document requesting registration;
(b) Two copies, including one certified copy, of the determination
sought to be registered, and a statement under penalty of perjury that
to the best of the knowledge and belief of the person seeking
registration, the determination has not been modified; and
(c) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 26.27.281, the name and
address of the person seeking registration and any parent or person
acting as a parent who has been awarded custody or visitation in the
child custody determination sought to be registered.
(2) On receipt of the documents required by subsection (1) of this
section((, the registering court shall)):
(a) The registering court shall cause the determination to be filed
as a foreign judgment, together with one copy of any accompanying
documents and information, regardless of their form((; and)).
(b) The registering party shall serve notice upon the persons named
pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section and provide them with an
opportunity to contest the registration in accordance with this
section.
(3) The notice required by subsection (2)(b) of this section must
state that:
(a) A registered determination is enforceable as of the date of the
registration in the same manner as a determination issued by a court of
this state;
(b) A hearing to contest the validity of the registered
determination must be requested within twenty days after service of
notice; and
(c) Failure to contest the registration will result in confirmation
of the child custody determination and preclude further contest of that
determination with respect to any matter that could have been asserted.
(4) A person seeking to contest the validity of a registered
determination must request a hearing within twenty days after service
of the notice. At that hearing, the court shall confirm the registered
determination unless the person contesting registration establishes
that:
(a) The issuing court did not have jurisdiction under Article 2;
(b) The child custody determination sought to be registered has
been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do
so under Article 2; or
(c) The person contesting registration was entitled to notice, but
notice was not given in accordance with the standards of RCW 26.27.081,
in the proceedings before the court that issued the determination for
which registration is sought.
(5) If a timely request for a hearing to contest the validity of
the registration is not made, the registration is confirmed as a matter
of law and the person requesting registration ((and all persons served
must be notified)) shall serve notice to all other persons served of
the confirmation.
(6) Confirmation of a registered determination, whether by
operation of law or after notice and hearing, precludes further contest
of the determination with respect to any matter that could have been
asserted at the time of registration.

Sec. 4 RCW 53.48.030 and 1941 c 87 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the filing of such petition for an order of dissolution, the
superior court shall enter an order setting the same for hearing at a
date not less than thirty days from the date of filing, and the ((clerk
of the court of said county)) petitioner shall give notice of such
hearing by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county in which the district is located once a week for three
successive weeks, and by posting in three public places in the county
in which the district is located at least twenty-one days before said
hearing. At least one notice shall be posted in the district. The
notices shall set forth the filing of the petition, its purpose and the
date and place of the hearing thereon.

Sec. 5 RCW 13.34.080 and 2000 c 122 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court shall direct the ((clerk)) department of social and
health services to publish notice in a legal newspaper printed in the
county, qualified to publish summons, once a week for three consecutive
weeks, with the first publication of the notice to be at least twenty-five days prior to the date fixed for the hearing when it appears by
the petition or verified statement that:
(a)(i) The parent or guardian is a nonresident of this state; or
(ii) The name or place of residence or whereabouts of the parent or
guardian is unknown; and
(b) After due diligence, the person attempting service of the
summons or notice provided for in RCW 13.34.070 has been unable to make
service, and a copy of the notice has been deposited in the post
office, postage prepaid, directed to such person at his or her last
known place of residence. If the parent, guardian, or legal custodian
is believed to be a resident of another state or a county other than
the county in which the petition has been filed, notice also shall be
published in the county in which the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian is believed to reside.
(2) Publication may proceed simultaneously with efforts to provide
service in person or by mail, when the court determines there is reason
to believe that service in person or by mail will not be successful.
Notice shall be directed to the parent, parents, or other person
claiming the right to the custody of the child, if their names are
known. If their names are unknown, the phrase "To whom it may concern"
shall be used, apply to, and be binding upon, those persons whose names
are unknown. The name of the court, the name of the child (or children
if of one family), the date of the filing of the petition, the date of
hearing, and the object of the proceeding in general terms shall be set
forth. There shall be filed with the clerk an affidavit showing due
publication of the notice. The cost of publication shall be paid by
the county at a rate not greater than the rate paid for other legal
notices. The publication of notice shall be deemed equivalent to
personal service upon all persons, known or unknown, who have been
designated as provided in this section.

--- END ---