BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.09.480 and 2003 c 271 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply to this section.
(a) "Cost of incarceration" means the cost of providing an inmate
with shelter, food, clothing, transportation, supervision, and other
services and supplies as may be necessary for the maintenance and
support of the inmate while in the custody of the department, based on
the average per inmate costs established by the department and the
office of financial management.
(b) "Minimum term of confinement" means the minimum amount of time
an inmate will be confined in the custody of the department,
considering the sentence imposed and adjusted for the total potential
earned early release time available to the inmate.
(c) "Program" means any series of courses or classes necessary to
achieve a proficiency standard, certificate, or postsecondary degree.
(2) When an inmate, except as provided in subsection (7) of this
section, receives any funds in addition to his or her wages or
gratuities, except settlements or awards resulting from legal action,
the additional funds shall be subject to the following deductions and
the priorities established in chapter 72.11 RCW:
(a) Five percent to the public safety and education account for the
purpose of crime victims' compensation;
(b) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(c) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration;
(d) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court; and
(e) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support
order.
(3) When an inmate, except as provided in subsection (7) of this
section, receives any funds from a settlement or award resulting from
a legal action, the additional funds shall be subject to the deductions
in RCW 72.09.111(1)(a) and the priorities established in chapter 72.11
RCW.
(4) The amount deducted from an inmate's funds under subsection (2)
of this section shall not exceed the department's total cost of
incarceration for the inmate incurred during the inmate's minimum or
actual term of confinement, whichever is longer.
(5) The deductions required under subsection (2) of this section
shall not apply to funds received by the department on behalf of an
offender for payment of one fee-based education or vocational program
that is associated with an inmate's work program or a placement
decision made by the department under RCW 72.09.460 to prepare an
inmate for work upon release.
An inmate may, prior to the completion of the fee-based education
or vocational program authorized under this subsection, apply to a
person designated by the secretary for permission to make a change in
his or her program. The secretary, or his or her designee, may approve
the application based solely on the following criteria: (a) The inmate
has been transferred to another institution by the department for
reasons unrelated to education or a change to a higher security
classification and the offender's current program is unavailable in the
offender's new placement; (b) the inmate entered an academic program as
an undeclared major and wishes to declare a major. No inmate may apply
for more than one change to his or her major and receive the exemption
from deductions specified in this subsection; (c) the educational or
vocational institution is terminating the inmate's current program; or
(d) the offender's training or education has demonstrated that the
current program is not the appropriate program to assist the offender
to achieve a placement decision made by the department under RCW
72.09.460 to prepare the inmate for work upon release.
(6) The deductions required under subsection (2) of this section
shall not apply to any money received by the department, on behalf of
an inmate, from family or other outside sources for the payment of
postage expenses. Money received under this subsection may only be
used for the payment of postage expenses and may not be transferred to
any other account or purpose. Money that remains unused in the
inmate's postage fund at the time of release shall be subject to the
deductions outlined in subsection (2) of this section.
(7) When an inmate sentenced to life imprisonment without
possibility of release or ((parole, or to death under chapter 10.95
RCW, receives any funds in addition to his or her gratuities, except
settlements or awards resulting from legal action, the additional funds
shall be subject to: Deductions of five percent to the public safety
and education account for the purpose of crime victims' compensation,
twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration, and fifteen percent to child support payments.
(8) When an inmate sentenced to life imprisonment without
possibility of release or parole, or to death under chapter 10.95 RCW,
receives any funds from a settlement or award resulting from a legal
action in addition to his or her gratuities, the additional funds shall
be subject to: Deductions of five percent to the public safety and
education account for the purpose of crime victims' compensation and
twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration)) sentenced to death under chapter 10.95 RCW receives
funds, deductions are required under subsection (2) of this section,
with the exception of a personal inmate savings account under
subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(((9))) (8) The secretary of the department of corrections, or his
or her designee, may exempt an inmate from a personal inmate savings
account under subsection (2)(b) of this section if the inmate's
earliest release date is beyond the inmate's life expectancy.
(9) The interest earned on an inmate savings account created as a
result of the plan in section 4, chapter 325, Laws of 1999 shall be
exempt from the mandatory deductions under this section and RCW
72.09.111.
(10) Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the
department of social and health services division of child support, the
county clerk, or a restitution recipient from taking collection action
against an inmate's moneys, assets, or property pursuant to chapter
9.94A, 26.23, 74.20, or 74.20A RCW including, but not limited to, the
collection of moneys received by the inmate from settlements or awards
resulting from legal action.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.58.107 and 2003 c 272 s 1 and 2003 c 241 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The department of health shall charge a fee of seventeen dollars
for certified copies of records and for copies or information provided
for research, statistical, or administrative purposes, and eight
dollars for a search of the files or records when no copy is made. The
department shall prescribe by regulation fees to be paid for preparing
sealed files and for opening sealed files.
No fee may be demanded or required for furnishing certified copies
of a birth, death, fetal death, marriage, divorce, annulment, or legal
separation record for use in connection with a claim for compensation
or pension pending before the veterans administration. No fee may be
demanded or required for furnishing certified copies of a death
certificate of a sex offender for use by a law enforcement agency in
maintaining a registered sex offender data base, or that of any
offender requested by a county clerk or court in the state of
Washington for purposes of extinguishing the offender's legal financial
obligation.
The department shall keep a true and correct account of all fees
received and transmit the fees to the state treasurer on a weekly
basis.
Local registrars shall charge the same fees as the state as
hereinabove provided and as prescribed by department regulation except
in cases where payment is made by credit card, charge card, debit card,
smart card, stored value card, federal wire, automatic clearinghouse
system, or other electronic communication. Payment by these electronic
methods may be subject to an additional fee consistent with the
requirements established by RCW 36.29.190. All such fees collected,
except for seven dollars of each fee collected for the issuance of
birth certificates and first copies of death certificates and fourteen
dollars of each fee collected for additional copies of the same death
certificate ordered at the same time as the first copy, shall be paid
to the jurisdictional health department.
All local registrars in cities and counties shall keep a true and
correct account of all fees received under this section for the
issuance of certified copies and shall transmit seven dollars of the
fees collected for birth certificates and first copies of death
certificates and fourteen dollars of the fee collected for additional
copies of death certificates to the state treasurer on or before the
first day of January, April, July, and October. All but five dollars
of the fees turned over to the state treasurer by local registrars
shall be paid to the department of health for the purpose of developing
and maintaining the state vital records systems, including a web-based
electronic death registration system.
Five dollars of each fee imposed for the issuance of certified
copies, except for copies suitable for display issued under RCW
70.58.085, at both the state and local levels shall be held by the
state treasurer in the death investigations' account established by RCW
43.79.445.

--- END ---