BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.36.171 and 2004 c 271 s 170 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) Except as provided in RCW 29A.36.180 ((and in subsection
(2) of this section)), on the ballot at the general election for a
nonpartisan office for which a primary was held, only the names of the
candidate who received the greatest number of votes and the candidate
who received the next greatest number of votes for that office shall
appear under the title of that office, and the names shall appear in
that order. If a primary was conducted, no candidate's name may be
printed on the subsequent general election ballot unless he or she
receives at least one percent of the total votes cast for that office
at the preceding primary. On the ballot at the general election for
any other nonpartisan office for which no primary was held, the names
of the candidates shall be listed in the order determined under RCW
29A.36.131.
(((2) On the ballot at the general election for the office of
justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of
the superior court, judge of the district court, or state
superintendent of public instruction, if a candidate in a contested
primary receives a majority of all the votes cast for that office or
position, only the name of that candidate may be printed under the
title of the office for that position.))

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.52.220 and 2005 c 153 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No primary may be held for any single position in any city,
town, district, or district court, as required by RCW 29A.52.210, if,
after the last day allowed for candidates to withdraw, there are no
more than two candidates filed for the position. The county auditor
shall, as soon as possible, notify all the candidates so affected that
the office for which they filed will not appear on the primary ballot.
(2) No primary may be held for nonpartisan offices in any first
class city if the city:
(a) Is a qualifying city that has been certified to participate in
the pilot project authorized by RCW 29A.53.020; and
(b) Is conducting an election using the instant runoff voting
method for the pilot project authorized by RCW 29A.53.020.
(c) This subsection (2) expires July 1, 2013.
(3) No primary may be held for the office of commissioner of a park
and recreation district or for the office of cemetery district
commissioner.
(4) No primary may be held for a single position for a nonpartisan
office specified in RCW 29A.52.231 if, after the last day allowed for
candidates to withdraw, there are no more than two candidates filed for
the position. The secretary of state or county auditor shall, as soon
as possible, notify all candidates so affected that the office for
which they filed will not appear on the primary ballot.
(5) Names of candidates for offices that do not appear on the
primary ballot shall be printed upon the general election ballot in the
manner specified by RCW 29A.36.131.

--- END ---