BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.250 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 424 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every person who:
(((1))) (a) Manufactures, sells, or disposes of or possesses any
instrument or weapon of the kind usually known as slung shot, sand
club, or metal knuckles, or spring blade knife, or any knife the blade
of which is automatically released by a spring mechanism or other
mechanical device, or any knife having a blade which opens, or falls,
or is ejected into position by the force of gravity, or by an outward,
downward, or centrifugal thrust or movement;
(((2))) (b) Furtively carries with intent to conceal any dagger,
dirk, pistol, or other dangerous weapon; or
(((3))) (c) Uses any contrivance or device for suppressing the
noise of any firearm,
is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any law
enforcement officer who, in the discharge of official duty, carries a
spring blade knife. Law enforcement officers may not be prosecuted for
possession of a spring blade knife when the officer is merely
transporting the knife to and from the location where it is stored when
the officer is not on official duty.

--- END ---