BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) A large percentage of Washington residents use medical doctors
who practice holistic medicine.
(2) Holistic medicine is the art and science that addresses the
whole person, body, mind, and spirit, and the practice of holistic
medicine integrates conventional and complementary therapies to prevent
and treat disease, but most importantly to promote optimal health.
(3) The centers for disease control found from the national health
interview survey done in 2002 that thirty-six percent of all adults in
the United States over the age of eighteen years of age use some form
of complementary and alternative medicine.
(4) It is in the public interest that at least one physician who
practices holistic medicine be on the medical quality assurance
commission because in some respects the skill sets and treatment
modalities offered materially differ between holistic and allopathic
practitioners. Although physicians trained in holistic medicine are
not universally better than allopathic providers, their training is
based on different paradigms. Availability of both is essential for
public health, and the commission can only be reasonably expected to
hold a balanced view on the complete spectrum of treatment modalities
if the holistic segment of the profession is included.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.71.015 and 2006 c 8 s 103 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state medical quality assurance commission is
established, consisting of: Thirteen individuals licensed to practice
medicine in the state of Washington under this chapter, at least one of
the physicians must practice holistic medicine and be certified by the
American board of holistic medicine; two individuals who are licensed
as physician assistants under chapter 18.71A RCW((,)); and six
individuals who are members of the public. At least two of the public
members shall not be from the health care industry. Each congressional
district now existing or hereafter created in the state must be
represented by at least one physician member of the commission. The
terms of office of members of the commission are not affected by
changes in congressional district boundaries. Public members of the
commission may not be a member of any other health care licensing board
or commission, or have a fiduciary obligation to a facility rendering
health services regulated by the commission, or have a material or
financial interest in the rendering of health services regulated by the
commission.
The members of the commission shall be appointed by the governor.
Members of the initial commission may be appointed to staggered terms
of one to four years, and thereafter all terms of appointment shall be
for four years. The governor shall consider such physician and
physician assistant members who are recommended for appointment by the
appropriate professional associations in the state. In appointing the
initial members of the commission, it is the intent of the legislature
that, to the extent possible, the existing members of the board of
medical examiners and medical disciplinary board repealed under section
336, chapter 9, Laws of 1994 sp. sess. be appointed to the commission.
No member may serve more than two consecutive full terms. Each member
shall hold office until a successor is appointed.
Each member of the commission must be a citizen of the United
States, must be an actual resident of this state, and, if a physician,
must have been licensed to practice medicine in this state for at least
five years.
The commission shall meet as soon as practicable after appointment
and elect officers each year. Meetings shall be held at least four
times a year and at such place as the commission determines and at such
other times and places as the commission deems necessary. A majority
of the commission members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum
for the transaction of commission business.
The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the commission is
required to carry any motion or resolution, to adopt any rule, or to
pass any measure. The commission may appoint panels consisting of at
least three members. When a panel is reviewing a case involving a
physician who practices holistic medicine, at least one member of the
panel shall be a practitioner of holistic medicine. A quorum for the
transaction of any business by a panel is a minimum of three members.
A majority vote of a quorum of the panel is required to transact
business delegated to it by the commission.
Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.265 and in addition thereto shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the commission
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Any such expenses
shall be paid from funds appropriated to the department of health.
Whenever the governor is satisfied that a member of a commission
has been guilty of neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or
misfeasance in office, the governor shall file with the secretary of
state a statement of the causes for and the order of removal from
office, and the secretary shall forthwith send a certified copy of the
statement of causes and order of removal to the last known post office
address of the member.
Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled for
the unexpired term by appointment by the governor.
The members of the commission are immune from suit in an action,
civil or criminal, based on its disciplinary proceedings or other
official acts performed in good faith as members of the commission.
Whenever the workload of the commission requires, the commission
may request that the secretary appoint pro tempore members of the
commission. When serving, pro tempore members of the commission have
all of the powers, duties, and immunities, and are entitled to all of
the emoluments, including travel expenses, of regularly appointed
members of the commission.

--- END ---