BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 16.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The director may establish points of inspection for vehicles
transporting animals on the public roads of this state to determine if
the animals being transported are accompanied by valid health
certificates, permits, or other documents as required by this chapter
or its rules. Vehicles transporting animals on the public roads of
this state are subject to inspection and must stop at any posted
inspection point established by the director, with emphasis on
livestock being brought in from outside the state. The director or
appointed officers are authorized to stop a vehicle transporting
animals upon the public roads of this state at a place other than an
inspection point if there is reasonable cause to believe the animals
are being transported in violation of this chapter or its rules.

Sec. 2 RCW 16.36.050 and 1998 c 8 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
It is unlawful for any person to:
(1) Bring into this state for any purpose any animals without first
having secured an official health certificate or certificate of
veterinary inspection, reviewed by the state veterinarian of the state
of origin that the animals meet the health requirements of the state of
Washington. This subsection does not apply to livestock ((imported
into this state for immediate slaughter)) destined for immediate
slaughter at a federally inspected slaughter facility where federal
disease control standards are applied, or other animals exempted by
rule;
(2)(a) Divert en route to other than an approved, inspected feedlot
for subsequent slaughter or ((to)) (b) sell for other than immediate
slaughter or ((to)) (c) fail to slaughter or deliver to a slaughter
establishment within ((seven)) three calendar days after ((arrival))
entry, any animal imported into this state for immediate slaughter;
(3) Intentionally falsely make, complete, alter, use, or sign an
animal health certificate, certificate of veterinary inspection, or
official written animal health document of the department;
(4) Intentionally falsely apply, alter, or remove an official
animal health or official animal identification tag, permanent mark, or
other device;
(5) Willfully hinder, obstruct, or resist the director, or any
peace officer or deputized state veterinarian acting under him or her,
when engaged in the performance of their duties; or
(((5))) (6) Willfully fail to comply with or to violate any rule or
order adopted by the director under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 16.36 RCW
to read as follows:
Any person found transporting animals on the public roads of this
state that are not accompanied by valid health certificates, permits,
or other documents as required by this chapter or its rules has
committed a class 1 civil infraction. The director is authorized to
issue notices of and enforce civil infractions in the manner prescribed
under chapter 7.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 16.36 RCW
to read as follows:
Any person in violation of this chapter or its rules may be subject
to a civil penalty in an amount of not more than one thousand dollars
for each violation. Each violation is a separate and distinct offense.
Every person who, through an act of commission or omission, procures,
aids, or abets in the violation is in violation of this chapter or its
rules and may be subject to the civil penalty provided in this section.
Moneys collected under this section must be deposited in the state
general fund.

Sec. 5 RCW 16.36.010 and 2004 c 251 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall supervise the prevention of the spread and
the suppression of infectious, contagious, communicable, and dangerous
diseases affecting animals within, in transit through, and imported
into the state.
(2) The director may issue a quarantine order and enforce the
quarantine of any animal or its reproductive products when any animal
or its reproductive products are affected with or have been exposed to
disease or when there is reasonable cause to investigate whether any
animal or its reproductive products are affected with or have been
exposed to disease, either within or outside the state. Overt disease
or exposure to disease in any animal or its reproductive products need
not be immediately obvious for a quarantine order to be issued or
enforced. The quarantine shall remain in effect as long as the
director deems necessary.
(3) The director may issue a hold order when:
(a) Overt disease or exposure to disease in an animal is not
immediately obvious but there is reasonable cause to investigate
whether an animal is diseased or has been exposed to disease;
(b) Import health papers, permits, or other transportation
documents required by law or rule are not complete or are suspected to
be fraudulent; or
(c) Further transport of an animal would jeopardize the well-being
of the animal or other animals in Washington state.
A hold order is in effect for ((seven)) fourteen days and expires
((at)) when released by the director or no later than midnight on the
((seventh)) fourteenth day from the date of the hold order. A hold
order may be replaced with a quarantine order for the purpose of animal
disease control.
(4) Any animal or animal reproductive product placed under a
quarantine or hold order shall be kept separate and apart from other
animals designated in the instructions of the quarantine or hold order,
and shall not be allowed to have anything in common with other animals.
(5) The expenses of handling and caring for any animal or animal
reproductive product placed under a quarantine or hold order are the
responsibility of the owner.
(6) The director has authority over the quarantine or hold area
until the quarantine or hold order is released or the hold order
expires.
(7) Any animal or animal reproductive product placed under a
quarantine or hold order may not be moved, transported, or sold without
written approval from the director or until the quarantine or hold
order is released, or the hold order expires.
(8) The director may administer oaths and examine witnesses and
records in the performance of his or her duties to control diseases
affecting animals.

Sec. 6 RCW 20.01.610 and 2003 c 395 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director may establish points of inspection for vehicles
transporting agricultural products on the public roads of this state.
Vehicles transporting agricultural products on the public roads of this
state are subject to inspection and must stop at any posted inspection
point established by the director. The director or appointed officers
may stop a vehicle transporting agricultural products upon the public
roads of this state at a place other than an inspection point if there
is reasonable cause to believe the carrier, seller, or buyer may be in
violation of this chapter. Any operator of a vehicle failing or
refusing to stop when directed to do so has committed a civil
infraction.
The director and appointed officers shall work to ensure that
vehicles carrying perishable agricultural products are detained no
longer than is absolutely necessary for a prompt assessment of
compliance with this chapter. If a vehicle carrying perishable
agricultural products is found to be in violation of this chapter, the
director or appointed officers shall promptly issue necessary notices
of civil infraction, as provided in RCW 20.01.482 and 20.01.484, and
shall allow the vehicle to continue toward its destination without
further delay.

Sec. 7 RCW 20.01.380 and 1991 c 109 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every dealer or cash buyer purchasing any agricultural products
from the consignor thereof shall promptly make and keep for three years
a correct record showing in detail the following:
(1) The name and address of the consignor.
(2) The date received.
(3) The terms of the sale.
(4) The quality and quantity delivered by the consignor, and where
applicable the dockage, tare, grade, size, net weight, or quantity.
(5) An itemized statement of any charges paid by the dealer or cash
buyer for the account of the consignor.
(6) The name and address of the purchaser: PROVIDED, That the name
and address of the purchaser may be deleted from the record furnished
to the consignor.
A copy of such record containing the above matters shall be
forwarded to the consignor forthwith.
Livestock dealers must also maintain individual animal
identification and disposition records as may be required by law, or
((regulation)) rule adopted by the director.
Livestock dealers must carry animal identification and animal
health documents as required by chapters 16.36 and 16.57 RCW and rules
adopted by the director under those chapters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 16.36.092 is recodified as a new section
in chapter 16.36 RCW to be codified between RCW 16.36.100 and
16.36.105.

--- END ---