BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that
those significant historic archaeological resources on state park lands
that are of importance to the history of our state, or its communities,
be protected for the people of the state. At the same time, the
legislature also recognizes that the recreational use of metal
detectors in state parks is a legitimate form of recreation that can be
compatible with the protection of significant historic archaeological
resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2008, the commission shall open all developed
and disturbed areas of state parks for the recreational use of metal
detectors. Developed and disturbed areas are further defined as
campgrounds, parking areas, boat launches, and similar areas that have
been subject to capital development or future capital development by
state parks, that would not retain any archaeological information, and
that have been verified by the department of archaeology and historic
preservation.
(2) The legislature directs that on state park lands, historic
archaeological resources, as defined in RCW 27.53.030, be managed in
such a way that the integrity of those properties not be diminished.
Metal detectors may be used on state park lands that do not meet the
definition of historic archaeological resources.
(3) All federal lands leased to state parks are exempt from metal
detecting.
(4) Any items discovered of historic archaeological significance
must be turned in to the state through the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If the commission determines that all developed or disturbed
areas of a park must be exempted from metal detecting because of its
historic archaeological resources, the commission must, by December 1,
2008, submit a brief report to the appropriate standing committees of
the legislature as to how they and a professional archaeologist made
this determination.
(2) It is the intent of this section to not allow blanket
exemptions but to ensure the preservation for the public of proven
historic archaeological resources.

--- END ---