BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.420 and 1999 c 208 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful to operate a vehicle upon the public highways of
this state unless it is completely equipped with pneumatic rubber tires
except vehicles equipped with temporary-use spare tires that meet
federal standards that are installed and used in accordance with the
manufacturer's instructions.
(2) ((No tire on a vehicle moved on a highway may have on its
periphery any block, flange, cleat, or spike or any other protuberance
of any material other than rubber which projects beyond the tread of
the traction surface of the tire, except that it is permissible to use
farm machinery equipped with pneumatic tires or solid rubber tracks
having protuberances that will not injure the highway, and except also
that it is permissible to use tire chains or metal studs imbedded
within the tire of reasonable proportions and of a type conforming to
rules adopted by the state patrol, upon any vehicle when required for
safety because of snow, ice, or other conditions tending to cause a
vehicle to skid. It is unlawful to use metal studs imbedded within the
tire between April 1st and November 1st.)) According to the powers and
duties specified in RCW 46.37.005, the Washington state patrol shall
adopt, apply, and enforce reasonable rules regarding the type of tire
chains and tires, including studded tires, that may be equipped on
vehicles that move on Washington state highways. The rules adopted by
the Washington state patrol may define the technology or the weight and
type of materials that may be used. In developing rules regarding
studded tires, the Washington state patrol shall consult with the
department of transportation regarding the impact of various types of
studded tires on the state's roadways, and shall prohibit the use of
tires or equipment that unreasonably damage roadways.
(3) The state department of transportation ((may, from time to
time, determine additional periods in which the use of)) shall adopt
reasonable rules regarding any times or conditions when the use of tire
chains or tires with metal studs imbedded therein is lawful. In
adopting rules to regulate the use of tire chains and studded tires,
the department shall consider motorist safety and roadway maintenance
costs.
(((3))) (4) The state department of transportation and local
authorities in their respective jurisdictions may issue special permits
authorizing the operation upon a highway of traction engines or
tractors having movable tracks with transverse corrugations upon the
periphery of the movable tracks or farm tractors or other farm
machinery, the operation of which upon a highway would otherwise be
prohibited under this section.
(((4))) (5) Tires with metal studs imbedded therein may be used
between November 1st and April 1st upon school buses and fire
department vehicles, any law or regulation to the contrary
notwithstanding.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.37.4215 and 1999 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning January 1, ((2000)) 2008, a person offering to sell to a
tire dealer conducting business in the state of Washington, a metal
flange or cleat intended for installation as a stud in a vehicle tire
shall certify that the studs ((are lightweight studs as defined in RCW
46.04.272)) comply with rules established by the Washington state
patrol in RCW 46.37.420(2). Certification must be accomplished by
clearly marking the boxes or containers used to ship and store studs
with the designation (("lightweight.")) that the Washington state
patrol specifies by rule. This section does not apply to tires or
studs in a wholesaler's existing inventory as of January 1, ((2000))
2008.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.37.4216 and 1999 c 219 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning July 1, ((2001)) 2008, a person may not sell a studded
tire or sell a stud for installation in a tire unless the stud
((qualifies as a lightweight stud under RCW 46.04.272)) complies with
rules established by the Washington state patrol in RCW 46.37.420(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 46.04.272 (Lightweight stud) and 1999 c
219 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1,
2008.

--- END ---