BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares there is
a need to mitigate the enormous burden imposed on the state
transportation system by the overland movement of cargo shipped to and
from Washington state ports. Accordingly, it is the intent of the
legislature to alleviate this burden by studying the imposition of a
fee on the processing of shipping containers through those ports. The
study shall also examine other similar mechanisms for imposing and
collecting port-related user fees, as well as other funding mechanisms.
Enactment by the legislature of any funding mechanism identified by the
study must require the use of the funds derived therefrom to provide
congestion relief through the improvement of freight rail systems and
state highways that function as freight corridors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Subject to availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose, the joint transportation
committee shall administer a consultant study to evaluate the
imposition of a fee on the processing of shipping containers, port-related user fees, and other funding mechanisms to improve freight
corridors for deposit in the freight congestion relief account created
under chapter 46.68 RCW.
(1) At a minimum, the study must: (a) Assess the imposition of a
shipping container based fee, port-related user fees, and other funding
mechanisms on the demand elasticity of the movement of freight goods
through Washington's container ports at various rates as well as
forecast diversion of marine cargo at various price points; (b) measure
the return on investment in freight rail and highway-based
infrastructure supported by the user fee and its impact on forecast
growth in shipping container traffic and the movement of freight goods;
(c) recommend the structure of a future project recommendation body
including its membership, process, and selection criteria; (d) examine
existing data on the health and environmental cost impacts of maritime
shipping and the movement of freight goods on air quality near
Washington's container ports. The scope of work for the study may be
expanded to include analysis of other issues relevant to the imposition
of container port-related user fees.
(2) The findings and recommendations of the report must be
submitted to the transportation committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2007.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The freight congestion relief account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may only be used to provide congestion
relief through the improvement of freight rail systems and state
highways that function as freight corridors. Expenditures from the
account must, at a minimum, include funding for the following projects:
State route 519 and associated access to port of Seattle; state route
509 connection to I-5 bypassing SeaTac airport; state route 167 port of
Tacoma access to I-5 and state route 167 new alignment in Pierce
county; I-90 Snoqualmie Pass; grade separations in the East Spokane
Valley; increased capacity of Stampede Pass rail corridor; rail
bottlenecks and choke points along mainline routes, including but not
limited to the Vancouver by-pass project; Kelso-Martin's bluff;
Vancouver rail loop; Blakeslee junction and other mainline
constrictions; and rail spur lines that support container freight
traffic and facilities for container transloading.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.84.092 and 2006 c 337 s 11, 2006 c 311 s 23, 2006
c 171 s 10, 2006 c 56 s 10, and 2006 c 6 s 8 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the Columbia river basin water supply development
account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization
account, the data processing building construction account, the
deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation
principal account, the department of retirement systems expense
account, the developmental disabilities community trust account, the
drinking water assistance account, the drinking water assistance
administrative account, the drinking water assistance repayment
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account,
the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account,
the election account, the emergency reserve fund, the energy freedom
account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the
federal forest revolving account, the freight congestion relief
account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility
multimodal account, the health services account, the public health
services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the state higher education construction
account, the higher education construction account, the highway
infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll lanes operations
account, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges'
retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the
judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax
account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and
use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal
criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster
reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the regional mobility grant program account, the
resource management cost account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the
state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll
bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---