BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.305 and 1984 c 82 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature declares that it is the continuing policy of the
state of Washington to set aside and manage certain lands within the
state for public park purposes. To comply with public park purposes,
these lands shall be acquired and managed to:
(1) Maintain and enhance ecological, aesthetic, and recreational
purposes;
(2) Preserve and maintain mature and old-growth forests containing
trees of over ninety years and other unusual ecosystems as natural
forests or natural areas, which may also be used for interpretive
purposes;
(3) Protect cultural and historical resources, locations, and
artifacts, which may also be used for interpretive purposes. In order
to ensure the protection of historic resources, locations, and
artifacts, the commission shall: (a) Hold the duty to manage lands for
the preservation of such resources as coequal with other public park
purposes; (b) maintain an inventory of such resources managed by the
commission; (c) provide historic preservation training to employees
involved in the management, care, or administration of such resource;
and (d) when making its biennial budget request, give due consideration
to any funding necessary to ensure the protection of such resources;
(4) Provide a variety of recreational opportunities to the public,
including but not limited to use of developed recreation areas, trails,
and natural areas;
(5) Preserve and maintain habitat which will protect and promote
endangered, threatened, and sensitive plants, and endangered,
threatened, and sensitive animal species; and
(6) Encourage public participation in the formulation and
implementation of park policies and programs.

--- END ---