BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.405.300 and 1990 c 33 s 395 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the event it is determined that there is probable cause or
causes for a teacher, principal, supervisor, superintendent, or other
certificated employee, holding a position as such with the school
district, hereinafter referred to as "employee", to be discharged or
otherwise adversely affected in his or her contract status, such
employee shall be notified in writing of that decision, which
notification shall specify the probable cause or causes for such
action. Such determinations of probable cause for certificated
employees, other than the superintendent, shall be made by the
superintendent. Such notices shall be served upon that employee
personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of
the notice at the house of his or her usual abode with some person of
suitable age and discretion then resident therein. Every such employee
so notified, at his or her request made in writing and filed with the
president, chair of the board or secretary of the board of directors of
the district within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be
granted opportunity for a hearing pursuant to RCW 28A.405.310 to
determine whether or not there is sufficient cause or causes for his or
her discharge or other adverse action against his or her contract
status.
In the event the employee demands a hearing, the employee shall
continue to be paid his or her regular salary during the hearing
process and until entry of the final decision pursuant to RCW
28A.405.310, if and during such time as the employee furnishes to the
school district a suitable bond, or other security acceptable to the
school district, as a guarantee that the employee will repay to the
school district the amount of salary paid to him or her during the
hearing process in case the final decision is that the employee shall
be discharged. If it is determined that the employee may not be
discharged, the school district shall reimburse the employee for the
cost of the bond or security.
In the event any such notice or opportunity for hearing is not
timely given, or in the event cause for discharge or other adverse
action is not established by a preponderance of the evidence at the
hearing, such employee shall not be discharged or otherwise adversely
affected in his or her contract status for the causes stated in the
original notice for the duration of his or her contract.
If such employee does not request a hearing as provided herein,
such employee may be discharged or otherwise adversely affected as
provided in the notice served upon the employee.
Transfer to a subordinate certificated position as that procedure
is set forth in RCW 28A.405.230 shall not be construed as a discharge
or other adverse action against contract status for the purposes of
this section.

--- END ---