BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington's
ocean resources are among the most important of its natural resources
and that the state holds these ocean resources in trust for the people
of Washington. Washington's character is largely defined by its
relationship with its ocean waters. Ocean-based activities, such as
fishing, tourism, recreation, and marine transportation have
historically played a vital role in Washington's economy and culture.
Additionally, new uses for ocean waters are being proposed in such
areas as renewable energy, marine aquaculture, and ocean observation.
Washington's coastal areas and ocean waters also face significant
challenges, including the preservation of water quality, fish
populations, and fish and wildlife habitat, and the utilization of
opportunities offered by new sustainable use activities. The movement
of ocean currents, atmospheric winds, and marine fish and wildlife
across state and national borders and the multijurisdictional reach of
many users of the coast and sea complicate policymaking and actions to
address these challenges. Over a number of years, in an attempt to
preserve our ocean resources and address these challenges, Washington
has adopted a myriad of laws that require implementation by both local
and state levels of government.
A healthy ocean is an integral part of the high quality of life
enjoyed in this state. The people of Washington have an obligation to
be good stewards of the ocean so that coastal and ocean resources are
preserved for future generations. In an effort to address this
obligation and the challenges posed by the implementation of laws that
cross local, state, and international boundaries, the legislature
intends to promote coordinated, interagency action on issues such as
marine resources stewardship, coastal hazards, coastal pollution, and
ocean research, observation, and education.
The legislature further finds that the goals developed by the ocean
policy work group which was created by the legislature and tasked with
summarizing the condition of the state's ocean resources and
recommending improvements in coordination among state agencies and
other jurisdictions are laudable goals that should serve as a guide for
any further state action developing ocean policy and managing
Washington's coastal areas. The goals, as follows, are to: (1) Manage
the state's ocean and coastal areas to protect valuable marine
resources and maintain ecosystem health while ensuring the vitality of
coastal communities; (2) protect the coastal environment and its
communities from the threats of marine hazards; (3) enhance the
sustainability and resiliency of outer coast communities; (4) increase
state attention on ocean-related scientific research and observation
practices; (5) inform all state citizens of the vital importance of the
state's ocean resources; and (6) coordinate state policy and consult
and collaborate with tribes, local government, ports, and interested
citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The ocean policy advisory council is
established in the executive office of the governor. The council is
composed of the following voting members:
(a) The governor or governor's designee;
(b) The director or commissioner, or the director's or
commissioner's designee, of the following agencies:
(i) The department of ecology;
(ii) The department of natural resources;
(iii) The department of fish and wildlife;
(iv) The state parks and recreation commission; and
(v) The department of community, trade, and economic development;
(c) A member of each of the governing bodies of the coastal
counties, to be appointed by a majority of the members of the governing
body of the respective county;
(d) An elected city official from a city located near the coastal
waters to be appointed by the governor;
(e) A tribal representative from each of the tribes located on the
coast bordering the coastal waters, if the tribe chooses to
participate;
(f) An elected official from a port district located near the
coastal waters to be appointed by the governor;
(g) A representative from a conservation or environmental
organization;
(h) A representative from each outer coast marine resources
committee, to be appointed by the marine resources committee;
(i) A representative from a commercial fishing association, to be
appointed by the governor; and
(j) When the issue before the council directly affects either
Wahkiakum or San Juan county as determined by a majority vote of the
council, the council will also include either a member of the governing
body of Wahkiakum or San Juan county, or both, to be appointed by the
majority of the members of the governing bodies of the respective
county.
(2) The council shall also include a representative scholar from a
university in Washington who demonstrates exceptional knowledge of, and
interest in, the issues facing Washington state's coastal and ocean
resources. The representative shall be selected by the council and
shall serve an advisory role as a nonvoting member.
(3) The council may invite federal agencies with responsibility for
the study and management of ocean resources or regulation of ocean
activities to designate a liaison to the council to attend council
meetings, respond to council requests for technical and policy
information, and review any draft materials prepared by the council.
The council may also invite representatives from other coastal states
or Canadian provinces to participate when appropriate.
(4) An agency representative shall serve as the chair of the
council. The term of the chair is one year. The first chair of the
council is the representative from the department of ecology, whose
term begins on the effective date of this section. At the expiration
of each chair's term, the chair shall rotate to the next agency listed
under subsection (1)(b) of this section. The chair shall schedule
meetings and set meeting agendas for the council.
(5) The council shall meet at least twice each year.
(6) The term of office of each member appointed by the governor, or
the governing body of a county is four years. Members are eligible for
reappointment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The council shall adopt the final report of
the Washington state ocean policy work group entitled "Washington's
Ocean Action Plan: Enhancing Management of Washington State's Ocean
and Outer Coasts" and shall work with state and local governments to
implement the priority recommendations appropriate for immediate
action. For those priority recommendations that are not ready for
immediate action, the council shall develop an implementation plan that
includes the council's strategy for implementation by July 1, 2009.
The council shall identify, where necessary, additional resources or
legislation necessary for implementation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The council's duties are to:
(1) Serve as a forum for communication in order to seek consistency
of state, local, and tribal policies concerning ocean issues, including
issues relating to resource management, marine and coastal hazards,
ocean energy, and ocean research and education issues;
(2) Serve as a point of contact for, and collaborate with, the
federal government, regional entities, and other state governments,
regarding ocean issues;
(3) Provide a forum to discuss ocean resource policy, planning, and
management issues, and when appropriate, mediate disagreements;
(4) Serve as an interagency resource to respond to issues facing
coastal communities and ocean resources in a collaborative manner;
(5) Identify and pursue public and private funding opportunities
for the programs and activities of the council, and for relevant
programs and activities of member entities; and
(6) Provide policy recommendations to the governor, the
legislature, and state and local agencies on specific ocean resource
management issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The council shall review the funding of
state programs relating to ocean management, policy coordination,
research, and public education. The review must identify current
funding levels and projected funding needs to implement recommendations
of the 2006 ocean policy work group report. The review must also
include a review of existing and potential funding sources, from state,
federal, and local sources, for implementing ocean programs.
(2) The council and the Puget Sound partnership's leadership
council, created in chapter 90.71 RCW shall seek, to the maximum extent
possible, to integrate the review of funding needs for ocean programs
and Puget Sound programs. The review and recommendations may be
consolidated into a single report. The council shall provide a report
of its review and make initial recommendations regarding funding levels
and funding sources for ocean programs by September 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Each biennium, the council may select two
ocean policy fellows to assist the council, and its staff, in
fulfilling the council's responsibilities under this chapter. When
selecting fellows, the council shall select individuals who demonstrate
exceptional knowledge of, and interest in, the issues facing Washington
state's coastal and ocean resources and who, within two years of
beginning the fellowship, have received an advanced degree from a
public or private college or university.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1)(a) The legislature finds that Washington
state's coastal zone management program does not contain many existing
state and local government policies and programs that, if included,
would be the basis for exerting far greater influence upon the
permitting activities and direct undertakings of federal agencies in
areas within or affecting the state's expansive coastal zone.
(b) Therefore, it is the intent of this section to direct a review
of the state's existing program and the submission of additional state
and local government policies to the national oceanic and atmospheric
administration for inclusion in such a program, and to direct that
maximum state efforts be directed toward implementing the state's role
in federal consistency determinations to ensure that state and local
policies influence federal agency actions affecting the state's coastal
zone.
(2) The council shall review the state and local policies included
in the state's approved coastal zone program, and other state and local
policies not included in the program, which if included would further
the purposes of protecting the state's coastal zone and influencing
federal actions affecting the state's coastal zone as expressed in
section 1 of this act. This review must be conducted collaboratively
with the department of ecology, which is the principal state agency for
administering provisions of the federal coastal zone management act by
states as designated in section 8 of this act. The council and the
department of ecology shall conduct this review with the participation
of other state agencies and local governments administering the
policies and programs under review, and, at a minimum, must include the
departments of natural resources, fish and wildlife, and community,
trade, and economic development, the Puget Sound partnership's
leadership council created in chapter 90.71 RCW, and the governing
bodies of the counties included within the state's coastal zone.
(3) The council and the department of ecology shall conclude their
review of the state and local policies included in the state's approved
coastal zone management program by July 1, 2010, and the policies not
included in the program, which if included would further the purposes
of protecting the state's coastal zone and influencing federal actions
affecting the state's coastal zone by July 1, 2012. If the council and
department of ecology conclude that the addition of an enforceable
policy or policies would strengthen the state's coastal zone management
program, the department of ecology shall submit to the appropriate
committees of the legislature a report identifying the policies that
should be included in an amendment to the state's federally approved
coastal zone management program. The department shall not submit such
an amendment to the appropriate federal agency until it has provided an
entire regular session for legislative review of the proposed
amendment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department of ecology is designated as
the principal state agency for administering the provisions of the
federal coastal zone management act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1451 et seq.), as
it exists on January 1, 2008, and is authorized to receive and
administer federal grants to implement the act. The department of
ecology, in the implementation of the network of state and local
policies and programs comprising the state coastal zone management
program, shall enter into agreements of administration with other state
agencies and local governments as appropriate to fully and effectively
implement all elements of the state's federally approved coastal zone
management program.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.143.020 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 2 s 10 are each
amended to read as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter((:)) unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Coastal counties" means Clallam, Jefferson, Grays Harbor, and
Pacific counties.
(2) "Coastal waters" means the waters of the Pacific Ocean seaward
from Cape Flattery south to Cape Disappointment, from mean high tide
seaward two hundred miles.
(3) "Council" means the ocean policy advisory council created in
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 2 through 8 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.143 RCW.

--- END ---