BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that more than half of
the state's forty-two and one-half million acres are forest lands and
that the majority of these lands are available for harvest. However,
many of the state's forest lands are threatened by conversion to
nonforest uses, mostly from commercial and residential development. In
addition, worldwide fiber commodity prices, increased environmental
regulations, forest health issues, and changing patterns in corporate
and individual ownership of forest lands are also contributing to the
declines in forest lands in the state. Therefore, it is the intent of
this chapter and this act to provide greater state financial assistance
to maintain Washington's working forest land base through the creation
of a funding board to make grants and loans on a competitive basis that
support protection of working forest land and that assist in developing
innovative strategies for supporting economically and environmentally
healthy forests and forest-dependent communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the working forest land board created in section
3 of this act.
(2) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(3) "Local government" means any county, city, town, port district,
or special purpose district.
(4) "Priority needs areas" means the geographic areas identified by
the department for priority lands to be addressed under the forest
legacy program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The working forest land board is
created. The board is composed of five members, of whom two members
must be appointed by the governor. The commissioner of public lands,
or the commissioner's designee, shall serve ex officio as a voting
member of the board. The deans of the University of Washington college
of forest resources and the Washington State University college of
agriculture, human and natural resource sciences, or their designees,
shall serve as members of the board. In making appointments to the
board, the governor shall ensure that one member each representing the
interests of forest landowners and conservation interests are board
members at all times. The governor shall solicit and give substantial
consideration to nominations provided by organizations representing
these interests. Appointments to the board by the governor are subject
to senate confirmation.
(2) The board shall select a chair from among the members of the
board.
(3) Board members serve four-year terms, except that the governor
shall designate one of the initial appointments to serve for a term of
two years. The terms commence January 1, 2008.
(4) Staff support to the board must be provided by the department.
For administrative purposes, the board shall be located within the
department.
(5) Members of the board shall be compensated as provided by RCW
43.03.250, and reimbursed for travel expenses as provided by RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The board is responsible for making
grants and loans for the protection of working forest lands consistent
with the procedures and criteria of section 5 of this act. Only local
governments are eligible for low-interest loans awarded by the board.
To accomplish this purpose, the board may:
(a) Provide assistance to grant applicants regarding the procedures
and criteria for grant and loan awards;
(b) Make and execute all manner of contracts and agreements with
grant recipients, and with other public and private parties as the
board deems necessary, consistent with the purposes of this chapter;
(c) Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or
financial or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms
that are not in conflict with this chapter;
(d) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter; and
(e) Do all acts necessary or convenient to carry out the powers
expressly granted or implied under this chapter.
(2) The department shall provide all necessary grant and loan
administration assistance to the board, and shall distribute and
account for funds appropriated or provided to the board for the
purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) During each fiscal biennium, the board's
total grants and loans are subject to the following limitations:
(a) Not less than thirty percent and not more than forty percent of
the total must be awarded for projects and activities that sustain the
working forest land base and strengthen the connection between economic
health and conservation of forests in Washington. These activities may
include but are not limited to:
(i) Programs or projects to support small timber landowners
including such strategies as group timber certification, group habitat
conservation plans, group cash flow pools, stewardship collaboration,
and technical support;
(ii) Programs or projects that test methods for recreation access
and cost-share programs;
(iii) Programs or projects that test methods to assist forest
landowners in providing carbon sequestration, water recharge, and other
natural resource services; and
(iv) Programs or projects that test methods to support forest
landowners' efforts at cost control, such as law enforcement, road
gates, and cleanup of illegal dumping.
(b) Not less than thirty percent and not more than forty percent of
the total must be awarded for projects and activities that preserve
forest lands over the long term for working forestry. These activities
may include but are not limited to:
(i) The acquisition of interests in forest lands for the purpose of
protecting the lands for working forestry;
(ii) Developing and implementing cooperative agreements with forest
landowners for maintaining working forestry; and
(iii) Other activities using conservation techniques such as
clustering development rights, transfer of development rights, and land
exchanges.
(c) Not less than thirty percent and not more than forty percent of
the total must be awarded for planning, research, and policy
development related to maintaining working forests in the state.
(2) The board shall adopt guidelines for the amount of nonstate
resources that must be committed for grants from the categories
established by the board. The amount may not be less than ten percent
of the amount of the grant or loan from the board.
(3) The board shall also adopt guidelines that limit the amount of
a grant or loan that may be allocated to those administrative or other
expenses of a grant or loan recipient not directly applied to
maintaining Washington's working forest land base.
(4) The board shall accord additional weight to applications that
address forest lands within priority needs areas.
(5) During each fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007, and ending June
30, 2015, the board shall establish a goal of disbursing a minimum of
twenty-five percent of the total funds awarded by the board in the form
of low-interest loans. However, if the board determines that there are
not sufficient applications for eligible projects to meet this goal,
the board may award a lesser amount as loans, or may hold funds until
the next funding cycle to encourage a greater number of loan
applications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The working forest land account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. Any funds appropriated by the
legislature for distribution by the working forest land board,
repayments of principal and interest on loans extended by the board, or
other public or private funds provided for distribution by the board
must be placed in the account. Only the board may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures. Moneys in the account may only be used by
the board to make grants and loans under sections 4 and 5 of this act,
and may not be used for the administrative expenses of the board.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2006 c 311 s 21 and 2006 c 120 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers
conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the
grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing commission
class C purse fund account, the individual development account program
account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account
(earnings from the Washington horse racing commission operating account
must be credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account), the life sciences discovery fund, ((and)) the
reading achievement account, and the working forest land account.
However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The sum of ten million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the working forest land account
for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 76 RCW.

--- END ---