BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.34.230 and 2005 c 449 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Conservation futures are a useful tool for counties to preserve
lands of public interest for future generations. Counties are
encouraged to use some conservation futures as one tool for salmon
preservation purposes.
(2) For the purpose of acquiring conservation futures and other
rights and interests in real property pursuant to RCW 84.34.210 and
84.34.220, and for maintaining and operating any property acquired with
these funds, a county may levy an amount not to exceed ((six and one-quarter)) twelve and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation against the assessed valuation of all taxable property within
the county. The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 shall not apply to the
tax levy authorized in this section. Any rights or interests in real
property acquired under this section after July 24, 2005, must be
located within the assessing county. Further, the county must
determine if the rights or interests in real property acquired with
these funds would reduce the capacity of land suitable for development
necessary to accommodate the allocated housing and employment growth,
as adopted in the countywide planning policies. When actions are taken
that reduce capacity to accommodate planned growth, the jurisdiction
shall adopt reasonable measures to increase the capacity lost by such
actions.
(3) The limitation set forth in RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to a
levy under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.34.240 and 2005 c 449 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Conservation futures are a useful tool for counties to preserve
lands of public interest for future generations. Counties are
encouraged to use some conservation futures as one tool for salmon
preservation purposes.
(1) Any board of county commissioners may establish by resolution
a special fund which may be termed a conservation futures fund to which
it may credit all taxes levied pursuant to RCW 84.34.230. Amounts
placed in this fund may be used for the purpose of acquiring rights and
interests in real property pursuant to the terms of RCW 84.34.210 and
84.34.220, and for the maintenance and operation of any property
acquired with these funds. The amount of revenue used for maintenance
and operations of parks and recreational land may not exceed
((fifteen)) twenty-five percent of the total amount collected from the
tax levied under RCW 84.34.230 in the preceding calendar year.
Revenues from this tax may not be used to supplant existing maintenance
and operation funding. Any rights or interests in real property
acquired under this section must be located within the assessing
county. Further, the county must determine if the rights or interests
in real property acquired with these funds would reduce the capacity of
land suitable for development necessary to accommodate the allocated
housing and employment growth, as adopted in the countywide planning
policies. When actions are taken that reduce capacity to accommodate
planned growth, the jurisdiction shall adopt reasonable measures to
increase the capacity lost by such actions.
(2) In counties greater than one hundred thousand in population,
the board of county commissioners or county legislative authority shall
develop a process to help ensure distribution of the tax levied under
RCW 84.34.230, over time, throughout the county.
(3)(a) Between July 24, 2005, and July 1, 2008, the county
legislative authority of a county with a population density of fewer
than four persons per square mile may enact an ordinance offering a
ballot proposal to the people of the county to determine whether or not
the county legislative authority may make a one-time emergency
reallocation of unspent conservation futures funds to pay for other
county government purposes, where such conservation futures funds were
originally levied under RCW 84.34.230 but never spent to acquire rights
and interests in real property.
(b) Upon adoption by the county legislative authority of a ballot
proposal ordinance under (a) of this subsection the county auditor
shall: (i) Confer with the county legislative authority and review any
proposal to the people as to form and style; (ii) give the ballot
proposal a number, which thereafter shall be the identifying number for
the proposal; (iii) transmit a copy of the proposal to the prosecuting
attorney; and (iv) submit the proposal to the people at the next
general or special election that is not less than ninety days after the
adoption of the ordinance by the county legislative authority.
(c) The county prosecuting attorney shall within fifteen working
days of receipt of the proposal compose a concise statement, posed as
a positive question, not to exceed twenty-five words, which shall
express and give a true and impartial statement of the proposal. Such
concise statement shall be the ballot title.
(d) If the measure is affirmed by a majority voting on the issue it
shall become effective ten days after the results of the election are
certified.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting in any
manner methods and funds otherwise available to a county for financing
the acquisition of such rights and interests in real property.

--- END ---