BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.105.150 and 2005 c 518 s 946 and 2005 c 155 s 121
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) After deduction for management costs as provided in RCW
79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW 79.115.150(2), all moneys
received by the state from the sale or lease of state-owned aquatic
lands and from the sale of valuable material from state-owned aquatic
lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement account which
is hereby created in the state treasury. Except as provided in
subsection (4) of this section, and after appropriation, these funds
shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for the
purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public
purposes; for providing and improving access to the lands; and for
volunteer cooperative fish and game projects.
(2) In providing grants for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the
department shall require grant recipients to incorporate the
environmental benefits of the project into their grant applications,
and the department shall utilize the statement of environmental
benefits in its prioritization and selection process. The department
shall also develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to
be used both for management and performance assessment of the grants.
To the extent possible, the department should coordinate its
performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies
as defined in RCW 43.41.270. The department shall consult with
affected interest groups in implementing this section.
(3) During the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2007, the funds may
be appropriated for boating safety, settlement costs for aquatic lands
cleanup, and shellfish management, enforcement, and enhancement and
assistance to local governments for septic system surveys and data
bases.
(4) The department must identify moneys deposited to the account
that are derived from sales of logs or other wood material from the
state-owned aquatic lands of Lake Washington, in King county, in which
the sales were conducted for the principal purpose of deriving revenue.
The treasurer must, not less than biennially, transfer moneys in the
account identified under this subsection to the board of regents of the
University of Washington, to be used exclusively for the operation of
the Thomas Burke Memorial Museum.

--- END ---