BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Northwest
weather and avalanche center (NWAC) provides valuable forecasting and
education services, provides valuable information to the public, and
reduces the impacts of adverse mountain weather and avalanches on
recreation, industry, and transportation in Washington state. To
conduct its forecasts, the NWAC receives information from the forty-two
weather stations it maintains or helps to maintain, consults sources of
on-the-ground weather observations, and utilizes information from the
national weather service. The NWAC provides mountain weather and
avalanche information through a public hotline recording and over the
internet.
The NWAC program, which was initiated in 1975, has been
administered by the United States forest service since 1976.
Throughout its history, the NWAC has been an interagency funded
program, receiving significant funds from state, federal, and private
sources. However, the NWAC faces funding shortfalls beginning in 2007
and for the foreseeable future, creating the possibility that the NWAC
will have to reduce its services or close. It is the intent of the
legislature to ensure, in continued cooperation with federal and
private sources, that the NWAC receives the resources necessary to
continue providing weather and avalanche forecasts for the benefit of
Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The state parks and recreation
commission shall invite the United States forest service, the national
weather service, and the national park service to cooperatively develop
an intergovernmental plan and recommendations that seek to ensure that
the Northwest weather and avalanche center program has the resources to
continue operating at its current level of service into the future.
(2) In developing the plan and recommendations, the state parks and
recreation commission shall seek to address issues to include:
Administrative control over the Northwest weather and avalanche center
program; the physical location of the Northwest weather and avalanche
center program; administrative control over the employees, equipment,
and facilities of the Northwest weather and avalanche center; and
ensuring continued cooperative funding, with equitable contributions
from federal, state, local, and private sources, to meet the long-term
needs of the Northwest weather and avalanche center.
(3) In addition to the government agencies listed in subsection (1)
of this section, the state parks and recreation commission and
participating agencies may invite the department of transportation, the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation, the United States
department of transportation, other relevant state and federal
entities, and relevant local governments, including counties along the
Cascade mountain range, and private organizations to participate in the
development of the plan and recommendations.
(4) The state parks and recreation commission shall, by December 1,
2007, provide an update on the development of the plan and
recommendations to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives. The state parks and recreation
commission shall, by December 1, 2008, provide the final plan and
recommendations to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives. The state parks and recreation
commission shall also provide a copy of the final plan and
recommendations to participating public and private entities.
(5) The state parks and recreation commission, or any other state
agency, may not assume administrative control over the Northwest
weather and avalanche center program, its employees, its equipment, or
its facilities without specific legislative authorization.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2009.

--- END ---