BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that nature-based
tourism is the fastest growing outdoor activity and the fastest growing
segment of the tourism industry. Tourism activities relating to
watchable wildlife contribute more than one billion dollars to the
state's economy per year, and it is primarily the rural areas of the
state in which these activities occur.
The legislature further finds that there is general agreement among
the hospitality industry, tourism interests, local governments, and
watchable wildlife organizations that owners of working farms,
woodlands, and rural open space lands provide a significant portion of
the key areas for the wildlife which in turn attract the nature-based
tourists. While tourism promotion interests seek to provide incentives
to these landowners to maintain these key areas in a manner that
benefits wildlife, and to assist them in managing the tourists that
seek to appreciate this wildlife, there is a need to create options for
local governments seeking to provide monetary incentives to these
landowners.
Therefore, it is the purpose of this act to provide local
governments, at their option, an additional source of lodging tax
revenue that may be used to provide monetary incentives to landowners
who agree to undertake activities that promote nature-based tourism.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 67.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any municipality may impose an excise
tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is
subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW. The rate of tax shall not
exceed one-half of one percent.
(2) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted under this section
must contain a provision allowing a credit against the county tax for
the full amount of any city or town tax imposed under this section upon
the same taxable event.
(3) All revenue from taxes imposed under this section shall be
credited to a special fund in the treasury of the municipality imposing
such tax and used solely for the purposes of funding all or any part of
agreements with the owners of forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW or
open space land, farm and agricultural land, or timber land under
chapter 84.34 RCW, to provide public access to private lands and to
manage wildlife habitat for the promotion of tourism.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.28.1815 and 1997 c 452 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
All revenue from taxes imposed under this chapter, except revenue
from taxes imposed under section 2 of this act, shall be credited to a
special fund in the treasury of the municipality imposing such tax and
used solely for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of
tourism promotion, acquisition of tourism-related facilities, or
operation of tourism-related facilities. Municipalities may, under
chapter 39.34 RCW, agree to the utilization of revenue from taxes
imposed under this chapter for the purposes of funding a
multijurisdictional tourism-related facility.

Sec. 4 RCW 67.28.181 and 2004 c 79 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any municipality may impose an excise
tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is
subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW. The rate of tax shall not
exceed the lesser of two percent or a rate that, when combined with all
other taxes imposed upon sales of lodging within the municipality under
this chapter except taxes imposed under section 2 of this act, and
under chapters 36.100, 67.40, 82.08, and 82.14 RCW, equals twelve
percent. A tax under this chapter shall not be imposed in increments
smaller than tenths of a percent.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section:
(a) If a municipality was authorized to impose taxes under this
chapter or RCW 67.40.100 or both with a total rate exceeding four
percent before July 27, 1997, such total authorization shall continue
through January 31, 1999, and thereafter the municipality may impose a
tax under this section at a rate not exceeding the rate actually
imposed by the municipality on January 31, 1999.
(b) If a city or town, other than a municipality imposing a tax
under (a) of this subsection, is located in a county that imposed taxes
under this chapter with a total rate of four percent or more on January
1, 1997, the city or town may not impose a tax under this section.
(c) If a city has a population of four hundred thousand or more and
is located in a county with a population of one million or more, the
rate of tax imposed under this chapter by the city shall not exceed the
lesser of four percent or a rate that, when combined with all other
taxes imposed upon sales of lodging in the municipality under this
chapter and chapters 36.100, 67.40, 82.08, and 82.14 RCW, equals
fifteen and two-tenths percent.
(d) If a municipality was authorized to impose taxes under this
chapter or RCW 67.40.100, or both, at a rate equal to six percent
before January 1, 1998, the municipality may impose a tax under this
section at a rate not exceeding the rate actually imposed by the
municipality on January 1, 1998.
(3) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted under this section
shall contain a provision allowing a credit against the county tax for
the full amount of any city or town tax imposed under this section upon
the same taxable event.

--- END ---