BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.20.420 and 1985 c 264 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any disability insurance contract providing health care services,
delivered or issued for delivery in this state more than one hundred
twenty days after August 11, 1969, ((which)) that provides that
coverage of a dependent child shall terminate upon attainment of the
limiting age for dependent children ((specified in the contract)),
shall also provide in substance that attainment of such limiting age
shall not operate to terminate the coverage of such child while the
child is and continues to be both (1) incapable of self-sustaining
employment by reason of developmental disability or physical handicap
and (2) chiefly dependent upon the subscriber for support and
maintenance, provided proof of such incapacity and dependency is
furnished to the insurer by the subscriber within thirty-one days of
the child's attainment of the limiting age and subsequently as may be
required by the insurer but not more frequently than annually after the
two year period following the child's attainment of the limiting age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Any disability insurance contract that provides coverage for a
dependent child must allow the subscriber to extend enrollment up to
the age of twenty-five for any otherwise eligible unmarried dependent
child who is chiefly dependent on the subscriber for support and
maintenance.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.21.150 and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 32 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any group disability insurance contract or blanket disability
insurance contract, providing health care services, delivered or issued
for delivery in this state more than one hundred twenty days after
August 11, 1969, ((which)) that provides that coverage of a dependent
child of an employee or other member of the covered group shall
terminate upon attainment of the limiting age for dependent children
((specified in the contract)) shall also provide in substance that
attainment of such limiting age shall not operate to terminate the
coverage of such child while the child is and continues to be both (1)
incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of developmental
disability or physical handicap and (2) chiefly dependent upon the
employee or member for support and maintenance, provided proof of such
incapacity and dependency is furnished to the insurer by the employee
or member within thirty-one days of the child's attainment of the
limiting age and subsequently as may be required by the insurer, but
not more frequently than annually after the two year period following
the child's attainment of the limiting age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Any group disability insurance contract or blanket disability
insurance contract that provides coverage for a dependent child must
allow the subscriber to extend enrollment up to the age of twenty-five
for any otherwise eligible unmarried dependent child who is chiefly
dependent on the subscriber for support and maintenance.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.44.200 and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 33 are each amended to
read as follows:
An individual health care service plan contract, delivered or
issued for delivery in this state more than one hundred twenty days
after August 11, 1969, ((which)) that provides that coverage of a
dependent child shall terminate upon attainment of the limiting age for
dependent children ((specified in the contract)) shall also provide in
substance that attainment of such limiting age shall not operate to
terminate the coverage of such child while the child is and continues
to be both (1) incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of
developmental disability or physical handicap and (2) chiefly dependent
upon the subscriber for support and maintenance, provided proof of such
incapacity and dependency is furnished to the health care service plan
corporation by the subscriber within thirty-one days of the child's
attainment of the limiting age and subsequently as may be required by
the corporation but not more frequently than annually after the two
year period following the child's attainment of the limiting age.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.44.210 and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
A group health care service plan contract, delivered or issued for
delivery in this state more than one hundred twenty days after August
11, 1969, ((which)) that provides that coverage of a dependent child of
an employee or other member of the covered group shall terminate upon
attainment of the limiting age for dependent children ((specified in
the contract)) shall also provide in substance that attainment of such
limiting age shall not operate to terminate the coverage of such child
while the child is and continues to be both (1) incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of developmental disability or physical
handicap and (2) chiefly dependent upon the employee or member for
support and maintenance, provided proof of such incapacity and
dependency is furnished to the health care service plan corporation by
the employee or member within thirty-one days of the child's attainment
of the limiting age and subsequently as may be required by the
corporation, but not more frequently than annually after the two year
period following the child's attainment of the limiting age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Any individual health care service plan contract or group health
care service plan contract that provides coverage for a dependent child
must cover any unmarried child of the subscriber or the subscriber's
spouse if the child is under the limiting age of twenty-five.

Sec. 8 RCW 48.46.320 and 1985 c 320 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any health maintenance agreement ((which)) that provides that
coverage of a dependent child shall terminate upon attainment of the
limiting age for dependent children ((specified in the agreement))
shall also provide in substance that attainment of such limiting age
shall not operate to terminate the coverage of such child while the
child is and continues to be both: (1) Incapable of self-sustaining
employment by reason of developmental disability or physical handicap;
and (2) chiefly dependent upon the subscriber for support and
maintenance, if proof of such incapacity and dependency is furnished to
the health maintenance organization by the enrolled participant within
thirty-one days of the child's attainment of the limiting age and
subsequently as required by the health maintenance organization but not
more frequently than annually after the two-year period following the
child's attainment of the limiting age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
Any health maintenance agreement that provides coverage for a
dependent child must allow the subscriber to extend enrollment up to
the age of twenty-five for any otherwise eligible unmarried dependent
child who is chiefly dependent on the subscriber for support and
maintenance.

--- END ---