BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.85.010 and 2005 c 309 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adaptive management" means reliance on scientific methods to
test the results of actions taken so that the management and related
policy can be changed promptly and appropriately.
(2) "Critical pathways methodology" means a project scheduling and
management process for examining interactions between habitat projects
and salmonid species, prioritizing habitat projects, and assuring
positive benefits from habitat projects.
(3) "Habitat project list" is the list of projects resulting from
the critical pathways methodology under RCW 77.85.060(2). Each project
on the list must have a written agreement from the landowner on whose
land the project will be implemented. Projects include habitat
restoration projects, habitat protection projects, habitat projects
that improve water quality, habitat projects that protect water
quality, habitat-related mitigation projects, and habitat project
maintenance and monitoring activities.
(4) "Habitat work schedule" means those projects from the habitat
project list that will be implemented during the current funding cycle.
The schedule shall also include a list of the entities and individuals
implementing projects, the start date, duration, estimated date of
completion, estimated cost, and funding sources for the projects.
(5) "Limiting factors" means conditions that limit the ability of
habitat to fully sustain populations of salmon. These factors are
primarily fish passage barriers and degraded estuarine areas, riparian
corridors, stream channels, and wetlands.
(6) "Project sponsor" is a county, city, special district, tribal
government, state agency, a combination of such governments through
interlocal or interagency agreements, a nonprofit organization,
regional fisheries enhancement group, or one or more private citizens.
A project sponsored by a state agency may be funded by the board only
if it is included on the habitat project list submitted by the lead
entity for that area and the state agency has a local partner that
would otherwise qualify as a project sponsor.
(7) "Regional recovery organization" or "regional salmon recovery
organization" means an entity formed under RCW 77.85.090 for the
purpose of recovering salmon, which is recognized in statute or by the
governor's salmon recovery office.
(8) "Salmon" includes all species of the family Salmonidae which
are capable of self-sustaining, natural production.
(9) "Salmon recovery plan" means a state or regional plan developed
in response to a proposed or actual listing under the federal
endangered species act that addresses limiting factors including, but
not limited to harvest, hatchery, hydropower, habitat, and other
factors of decline.
(10) "Salmon recovery region" means geographic areas of the state
identified or formed under RCW 77.85.090 that encompass groups of
watersheds in the state with common stocks of salmon identified for
recovery activities, and that generally are consistent with the
geographic areas within the state identified by the national oceanic
and atmospheric administration or the United States fish and wildlife
service for activities under the federal endangered species act.
(11) "Salmon recovery strategy" means the strategy adopted under
RCW 77.85.150 and includes the compilation of all subbasin and regional
salmon recovery plans developed in response to a proposed or actual
listing under the federal endangered species act with state hatchery,
harvest, and hydropower plans compiled in accordance with RCW
77.85.150.
(12) "Tribe" or "tribes" means federally recognized Indian tribes.
(13) "WRIA" means a water resource inventory area established in
chapter 173-500 WAC as it existed on January 1, 1997.
(14) "Owner" means the person holding title to the land or the
person under contract with the owner to lease or manage the legal
owner's property.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.85.020 and 2005 c 309 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((By December 1, 2006)) No later than January 31, 2009, and
every odd-numbered year thereafter, the governor's salmon recovery
office shall submit a biennial state of the salmon report to the
legislature and the governor regarding the implementation of the
state's salmon recovery strategy. The report ((may)) must include the
following:
(a) ((A description of the amount of in-kind and financial
contributions, including volunteer, private, and state, federal, tribal
as available, and local government money directly spent on salmon
recovery in response to actual, proposed, or expected endangered
species act listings;
(b))) A summary of habitat projects including but not limited to:
(i) A summary of accomplishments in removing barriers to salmon
passage and an identification of existing barriers;
(ii) A summary of salmon restoration efforts undertaken in the past
two years;
(iii) A summary of the role which private volunteer initiatives
contribute in salmon habitat restoration efforts; and
(iv) A summary of efforts taken to protect salmon habitat;
(((c) A summary of collaborative efforts undertaken with adjoining
states or Canada;
(d))) (b) A summary of harvest and hatchery management activities
affecting salmon recovery;
(((e) A summary of information regarding impediments to successful
salmon recovery efforts;
(f))) (c) A summary of the number and types of violations of
existing laws pertaining to((: (i) Water quality; and (ii))) salmon.
The summary ((shall)) may include information about the types of
sanctions imposed for these violations((;
(g) Information on the estimated carrying capacity of new habitat
created pursuant to chapter 246, Laws of 1998; and
(h) Recommendations to the legislature that would further the
success of salmon recovery. The recommendations may include:
(i) The need to expand or improve nonregulatory programs and
activities;
(ii) The need to expand or improve state and local laws and
regulations; and
(iii) Recommendations for state funding assistance to recovery
activities and projects)).
(2) The report may include the following:
(a) A description of the amount of in-kind financial contributions,
including volunteer, private, state, federal, tribal, as available, and
local government funds directly spent on salmon recovery in response to
endangered species act listings; and
(b) Information on the estimated carrying capacity of new habitat
created pursuant to chapter 246, Laws of 1998.
(3) The report shall summarize the monitoring data coordinated by
the ((monitoring)) forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed
health. The summary ((must)) may include but is not limited to data
and analysis related to:
(a) Measures of progress in fish recovery;
(b) Measures of factors limiting recovery as well as trends in such
factors; and
(c) The status of implementation of projects and activities.
(4) The department, the department of ecology, the department of
natural resources, the state conservation commission, and the forum on
monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health shall provide to the
governor's salmon recovery office information requested by the office
necessary to prepare the state of the salmon report and other reports
produced by the office.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.85.030 and 2005 c 309 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governor's salmon recovery office is created within the
office of the governor to coordinate state strategy to allow for salmon
recovery to healthy sustainable population levels with productive
commercial and recreational fisheries. The primary purpose of the
office is to coordinate and assist in the development, implementation,
and revision of regional salmon recovery plans as an integral part of
a statewide strategy developed consistent with the guiding principles
and procedures under RCW 77.85.150.
(2) The governor's salmon recovery office is responsible for
maintaining the statewide salmon recovery strategy to reflect
applicable provisions of regional recovery plans, habitat protection
and restoration plans, water quality plans, and other private, local,
regional, state agency and federal plans, projects, and activities that
contribute to salmon recovery.
(3) The governor's salmon recovery office shall also gather
regional recovery plans from regional recovery organizations and submit
the plans to the federal fish services for adoption as federal recovery
plans. The governor's salmon recovery office shall also work with
regional salmon recovery organizations on salmon recovery issues in
order to ensure a coordinated and consistent statewide approach to
salmon recovery. The governor's salmon recovery office shall work with
federal agencies to accomplish implementation of federal commitments in
the recovery plans.
(4) The governor's salmon recovery office may also:
(a) Assist state agencies, local governments, landowners, and other
interested parties in obtaining federal assurances that plans,
programs, or activities are consistent with fish recovery under the
federal endangered species act;
(b) Act as liaison to local governments, the state congressional
delegation, the United States congress, federally recognized tribes,
and the federal executive branch agencies for issues related to the
state's salmon recovery plans; ((and))
(c) Provide periodic reports pursuant to RCW 77.85.020;
(d) Provide, as appropriate, technical and administrative support
to the independent science panel or other science-related panels on
issues pertaining to salmon recovery;
(e) In cooperation with the regional recovery organizations,
prepare a timeline and implementation plan that, together with a
schedule and recommended budget, identifies specific actions in
regional recovery plans for state agency actions and assistance
necessary to implement local and regional recovery plans; and
(f) As necessary, provide recommendations to the legislature that
would further the success of salmon recovery, including recommendations
for state agency actions in the succeeding biennium and state financial
and technical assistance for projects and activities to be undertaken
in local and regional salmon recovery plans. The recommendations may
include:
(i) The need to expand or improve nonregulatory programs and
activities; and
(ii) The need for state funding assistance to recovery activities
and projects.
(((2) This section expires June 30, 2007.))

Sec. 4 RCW 77.85.040 and 2005 c 309 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governor ((shall)) may request the ((national)) Washington
academy of sciences, ((the American fisheries society, or a comparable
institution to screen candidates to serve as members on the)) when
organized pursuant to chapter 305, Laws of 2005, to impanel an
independent science panel on salmon recovery to respond to requests for
review pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. ((The institution
that conducts the screening of the candidates shall submit a list of
the nine most qualified candidates to the governor, the speaker of the
house of representatives, and the majority leader of the senate.)) The
((candidates)) panel shall reflect expertise in habitat requirements of
salmon, protection and restoration of salmon populations, artificial
propagation of salmon, hydrology, or geomorphology.
(((2) The speaker of the house of representatives and the majority
leader in the senate may each remove one name from the nomination list.
The governor shall consult with tribal representatives and the governor
shall appoint five scientists from the remaining names on the
nomination list.
(3) The members of the independent science panel shall serve four-year terms. Vacant positions on the panel shall be filled in the same
manner as the original appointments. Members shall serve no more than
two full terms. The independent science panel members shall elect the
chair of the panel among themselves every two years.)) Based upon
available funding, the governor's salmon recovery office may contract
for services ((with members)) of the independent science panel for
compensation under chapter 39.29 RCW.
(((4))) (2) The independent science panel shall be governed by
((generally accepted)) guidelines and practices governing the
activities of ((independent science boards such as)) the ((national))
Washington academy of sciences. The purpose of the independent science
panel is to help ensure that sound science is used in salmon recovery
efforts. The governor's salmon recovery office may request ((review of
regional salmon recovery plans by the science review panel)) that the
panel review, investigate, and provide its findings on scientific
questions relating to the state's salmon recovery efforts. The science
panel does not have the authority to review individual projects or
habitat project lists developed under RCW 77.85.050 or 77.85.060 or to
make policy decisions. The panel shall ((periodically)) submit its
findings and recommendations under this subsection to the legislature
and the governor.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.85.090 and 2005 c 309 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The southwest Washington salmon recovery region, whose
boundaries are provided in chapter 60, Laws of 1998, is created.
(2) Lead entities within a salmon recovery region that agree to
form a regional salmon recovery organization may be recognized by the
governor's salmon recovery office as a regional recovery organization.
The regional recovery organization may plan, coordinate, and monitor
the implementation of a regional recovery plan in accordance with RCW
77.85.150. Regional recovery organizations existing as of July 24,
2005, that have developed draft recovery plans approved by the
governor's salmon recovery office by July 1, 2005, may continue to
plan, coordinate, and monitor the implementation of regional recovery
plans.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.85.150 and 2005 c 309 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governor, with the assistance of the governor's salmon
recovery office((,)) shall maintain and revise, as appropriate, a
statewide salmon recovery strategy.
(2) The governor and the salmon recovery office shall be guided by
the following considerations in maintaining and revising the strategy:
(a) The strategy should identify statewide initiatives and
responsibilities with regional recovery plans and local watershed
initiatives as the principal means for implementing the strategy;
(b) The strategy should emphasize collaborative, incentive-based
approaches;
(c) The strategy should address all factors limiting the recovery
of Washington's listed salmon stocks, including habitat and water
quality degradation, harvest and hatchery management, inadequate
streamflows, and other barriers to fish passage. Where other limiting
factors are beyond the state's jurisdictional authorities to respond
to, such as some natural predators and high seas fishing, the strategy
shall include the state's requests for federal action to effectively
address these factors;
(d) The strategy should identify immediate actions necessary to
prevent extinction of a listed salmon stock, establish performance
measures to determine if restoration efforts are working, recommend
effective monitoring and data management, and recommend to the
legislature clear and certain measures to be implemented if performance
goals are not met;
(e) The strategy shall rely on the best scientific information
available and provide for incorporation of new information as it is
obtained;
(f) The strategy should seek a fair allocation of the burdens and
costs upon economic and social sectors of the state whose activities
may contribute to limiting the recovery of salmon; and
(g) The strategy should seek clear measures and procedures from the
appropriate federal agencies for removing Washington's salmon stocks
from listing under the federal act.
(3) ((Beginning on September 1, 2000,)) If the strategy ((shall
be)) is updated ((through)), an active and thorough public involvement
process, including early and meaningful opportunity for public comment,
must be utilized. In obtaining public comment, the governor's salmon
recovery office shall ((hold public meetings)) work with regional
salmon recovery organizations throughout the state and shall encourage
regional and local recovery planning efforts to ((similarly)) ensure an
active public involvement process.
(4) This section shall apply prospectively only and not
retroactively. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
invalidate actions taken in recovery planning at the local, regional,
or state level prior to July 1, 1999.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.41.270 and 2001 c 227 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office of financial management shall assist natural
resource-related agencies in developing outcome-focused performance
measures for administering natural resource-related and environmentally
based grant and loan programs. These performance measures are to be
used in determining grant eligibility, for program management and
performance assessment.
(2) The office of financial management and the governor's salmon
recovery office shall assist natural resource-related agencies in
developing recommendations for a monitoring program to measure outcome-focused performance measures required by this section. The
recommendations must be consistent with the framework and coordinated
monitoring strategy developed by the monitoring oversight committee
established in RCW 77.85.210.
(3) Natural resource agencies shall consult with grant or loan
recipients including local governments, tribes, nongovernmental
organizations, and other interested parties, and report to the office
of financial management on the implementation of this section. The
office of financial management shall report to the appropriate
legislative committees of the legislature on the agencies'
implementation of this section, including any necessary changes in
current law, and funding requirements by July 31, 2002. Natural
resource agencies shall assist the office of financial management in
preparing the report, including complying with time frames for
submitting information established by the office of financial
management.
(4) For purposes of this section, "natural resource-related
agencies" include the department of ecology, the department of natural
resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the state conservation
commission, the interagency committee for outdoor recreation, the
salmon recovery funding board, and the public works board within the
department of community, trade, and economic development.
(5) For purposes of this section, "natural resource-related
environmentally based grant and loan programs" includes the
conservation reserve enhancement program; dairy nutrient management
grants under chapter 90.64 RCW; state conservation commission water
quality grants under chapter 89.08 RCW; coordinated prevention grants,
public participation grants, and remedial action grants under RCW
70.105D.070; water pollution control facilities financing under chapter
70.146 RCW; aquatic lands enhancement grants under RCW ((79.24.580))
79.105.150; habitat grants under the Washington wildlife and recreation
program under RCW 79A.15.040; salmon recovery grants under chapter
77.85 RCW; and the public ((work[s])) works trust fund program under
chapter 43.155 RCW. The term also includes programs administered by
the department of fish and wildlife related to protection or recovery
of fish stocks which are funded with moneys from the capital budget.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 77.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that pursuant to chapter 298, Laws of
2001, and acting upon recommendations of the state's independent
science panel, the monitoring oversight committee developed
recommendations for a comprehensive statewide strategy for monitoring
watershed health, with a focus upon salmon recovery, entitled The
Washington Comprehensive Monitoring Strategy and Action Plan for
Watershed Health and Salmon Recovery. The legislature further finds
that funding to begin implementing the strategy and action plan was
provided in the 2003-2005 biennial budget, and that executive order 04-03 was issued to coordinate state agency implementation activities. It
is therefore the purpose of this section to adopt the strategy and
action plan and to provide guidance to ensure that the coordination
activities directed by executive order 04-03 are effectively carried
out.
(2) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health is
created. The governor shall appoint a person with experience and
expertise in natural resources and environmental quality monitoring to
chair the forum. The chair shall serve four-year terms and may serve
successive terms. The forum shall include representatives of the
following state agencies and regional entities that have
responsibilities related to monitoring of salmon recovery and watershed
health:
(a) Department of ecology;
(b) Salmon recovery funding board;
(c) Salmon recovery office;
(d) Department of fish and wildlife;
(e) Department of natural resources;
(f) Puget Sound action team, or a successor state agency;
(g) Conservation commission;
(h) Department of agriculture;
(i) Department of transportation; and
(j) Each of the regional salmon recovery organizations.
(3) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health
shall provide a multiagency venue for coordinating technical and policy
issues and actions related to monitoring salmon recovery and watershed
health.
(4) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health
shall recommend a set of measures for use by the governor's salmon
recovery office in the state of the salmon report to convey results and
progress on salmon recovery and watershed health in ways that are
easily understood by the general public.
(5) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health
shall invite the participation of federal, tribal, regional, and local
agencies and entities that carry out salmon recovery and watershed
health monitoring, and work toward coordination and standardization of
measures used.
(6) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health
shall periodically report to the governor and the appropriate standing
committees of the senate and house of representatives on the forum's
activities and recommendations for improving monitoring programs by
state agencies, coordinating with the governor's salmon recovery office
biennial report as required by RCW 77.85.020.
(7) The forum shall review pilot monitoring programs including
those that integrate (a) data collection, management, and access; and
(b) information regarding habitat projects and project management.
(8) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health
shall review and make recommendations to the office of financial
management and the appropriate legislative committees on agency budget
requests related to monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health.
These recommendations must be made no later than September 15th of each
year. The goal of this review is to prioritize and integrate budget
requests across agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 3 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect June 30, 2007.

--- END ---