BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.20.190 and 2006 c 13 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An individual who is paid any amount as benefits under this
title to which he or she is not entitled shall, unless otherwise
relieved pursuant to this section, be liable for repayment of the
amount overpaid. The department shall issue an overpayment assessment
setting forth the reasons for and the amount of the overpayment. The
amount assessed, to the extent not collected, may be deducted from any
future benefits payable to the individual: PROVIDED, That in the
absence of a back pay award, a settlement affecting the allowance of
benefits, fraud, misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure, every
determination of liability shall be mailed or personally served not
later than two years after the close of or final payment made on the
individual's applicable benefit year for which the purported
overpayment was made, whichever is later, unless the merits of the
claim are subjected to administrative or judicial review in which event
the period for serving the determination of liability shall be extended
to allow service of the determination of liability during the six-month
period following the final decision affecting the claim.
(2) The commissioner may waive an overpayment if the commissioner
finds that the overpayment was not the result of fraud,
misrepresentation, willful nondisclosure, or fault attributable to the
individual and that the recovery thereof would be against equity and
good conscience: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the overpayment so waived
shall be charged against the individual's applicable entitlement for
the eligibility period containing the weeks to which the overpayment
was attributed as though such benefits had been properly paid.
(3) Any assessment herein provided shall constitute a determination
of liability from which an appeal may be had in the same manner and to
the same extent as provided for appeals relating to determinations in
respect to claims for benefits: PROVIDED, That an appeal from any
determination covering overpayment only shall be deemed to be an appeal
from the determination which was the basis for establishing the
overpayment unless the merits involved in the issue set forth in such
determination have already been heard and passed upon by the appeal
tribunal. If no such appeal is taken to the appeal tribunal by the
individual within thirty days of the delivery of the notice of
determination of liability, or within thirty days of the mailing of the
notice of determination, whichever is the earlier, the determination of
liability shall be deemed conclusive and final. Whenever any such
notice of determination of liability becomes conclusive and final, the
commissioner, upon giving at least twenty days notice by certified mail
return receipt requested to the individual's last known address of the
intended action, may file with the superior court clerk of any county
within the state a warrant in the amount of the notice of determination
of liability plus a filing fee under RCW 36.18.012(10). The clerk of
the county where the warrant is filed shall immediately designate a
superior court cause number for the warrant, and the clerk shall cause
to be entered in the judgment docket under the superior court cause
number assigned to the warrant, the name of the person(s) mentioned in
the warrant, the amount of the notice of determination of liability,
and the date when the warrant was filed. The amount of the warrant as
docketed shall become a lien upon the title to, and any interest in,
all real and personal property of the person(s) against whom the
warrant is issued, the same as a judgment in a civil case duly docketed
in the office of such clerk. A warrant so docketed shall be sufficient
to support the issuance of writs of execution and writs of garnishment
in favor of the state in the manner provided by law for a civil
judgment. A copy of the warrant shall be mailed to the person(s)
mentioned in the warrant by certified mail to the person's last known
address within five days of its filing with the clerk.
(4) On request of any agency which administers an employment
security law of another state, the United States, or a foreign
government and which has found in accordance with the provisions of
such law that a claimant is liable to repay benefits received under
such law, the commissioner may collect the amount of such benefits from
the claimant to be refunded to the agency. In any case in which under
this section a claimant is liable to repay any amount to the agency of
another state, the United States, or a foreign government, such amounts
may be collected without interest by civil action in the name of the
commissioner acting as agent for such agency if the other state, the
United States, or the foreign government extends such collection rights
to the employment security department of the state of Washington, and
provided that the court costs be paid by the governmental agency
benefiting from such collection.
(5) Any employer who is a party to a back pay award or settlement
due to loss of wages shall, within thirty days of the award or
settlement, report to the department the amount of the award or
settlement, the name and social security number of the recipient of the
award or settlement, and the period for which it is awarded. When an
individual has been awarded or receives back pay, for benefit purposes
the amount of the back pay shall constitute wages paid in the period
for which it was awarded. For contribution purposes, the back pay
award or settlement shall constitute wages paid in the period in which
it was actually paid. The following requirements shall also apply:
(a) The employer shall reduce the amount of the back pay award or
settlement by an amount determined by the department based upon the
amount of unemployment benefits received by the recipient of the award
or settlement during the period for which the back pay award or
settlement was awarded;
(b) The employer shall pay to the unemployment compensation fund,
in a manner specified by the commissioner, an amount equal to the
amount of such reduction;
(c) The employer shall also pay to the department any taxes due for
unemployment insurance purposes on the entire amount of the back pay
award or settlement notwithstanding any reduction made pursuant to (a)
of this subsection;
(d) If the employer fails to reduce the amount of the back pay
award or settlement as required in (a) of this subsection, the
department shall issue an overpayment assessment against the recipient
of the award or settlement in the amount that the back pay award or
settlement should have been reduced; and
(e) If the employer fails to pay to the department an amount equal
to the reduction as required in (b) of this subsection, the department
shall issue an assessment of liability against the employer which shall
be collected pursuant to the procedures for collection of assessments
provided herein and in RCW 50.24.110.
(6) When an individual fails to repay an overpayment assessment
that is due and fails to arrange for satisfactory repayment terms, the
commissioner shall impose an interest penalty of one percent per month
of the outstanding balance. Interest shall accrue immediately on
overpayments assessed pursuant to RCW 50.20.070 and shall be imposed
when the assessment becomes final. For any other overpayment, interest
shall accrue when the individual has missed two or more of the
individual's monthly payments either partially or in full. ((The
interest penalty shall be used, first, to fully fund either social
security number cross-match audits or other more effective activities
that ensure that individuals are entitled to all amounts of benefits
that they are paid, second, to fund other detection and recovery of
overpayment and collection activities, and third, during the 2005-07
fiscal biennium, the cost of the job skills program at community and
technical colleges as appropriated by the legislature.))
(7) The department shall: (a) Conduct social security number
cross-match audits or engage in other more effective activities that
ensure that individuals are entitled to all amounts of benefits that
they are paid; and (b) engage in other detection and recovery of
overpayment and collection activities.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.24.014 and 2006 c 13 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A separate and identifiable account to provide for the
financing of special programs to assist the unemployed is established
in the administrative contingency fund. All money in this account
shall be expended solely for the purposes of this title and for no
other purposes whatsoever. Contributions to this account shall accrue
and become payable by each employer, except employers as described in
RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly elected to make payments
in lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers as
described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to
make payments in lieu of contributions, at a basic rate of two one-hundredths of one percent. The amount of wages subject to tax shall be
determined under RCW 50.24.010.
(b) A separate and identifiable account is established in the
administrative contingency fund for financing the employment security
department's administrative cost under RCW 50.22.150 and the costs
under RCW 50.22.150(((9))) (10). All money in this account shall be
expended solely for the purposes of this title and for no other
purposes whatsoever. Contributions to this account shall accrue and
become payable by each employer, except employers as described in RCW
50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly elected to make payments in
lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers as described
in RCW 50.44.035, those employers who are required to make payments in
lieu of contributions, those employers described under RCW
50.29.025(1)(f)(ii), and those qualified employers assigned rate class
20 or rate class 40, as applicable, under RCW 50.29.025, at a basic
rate of one one-hundredth of one percent. The amount of wages subject
to tax shall be determined under RCW 50.24.010. Any amount of
contributions payable under this subsection (1)(b) that exceeds the
amount that would have been collected at a rate of four one-thousandths
of one percent must be deposited in the ((unemployment compensation
trust fund.
(c) For the first calendar quarter of 1994 only, the basic two one-hundredths of one percent contribution payable under (a) of this
subsection shall be increased by one-hundredth of one percent to a
total rate of three one-hundredths of one percent. The proceeds of
this incremental one-hundredth of one percent shall be used solely for
the purposes described in section 22, chapter 483, Laws of 1993, and
for the purposes of conducting an evaluation of the call center
approach to unemployment insurance under section 5, chapter 161, Laws
of 1998. During the 1997-1999 fiscal biennium, any surplus from
contributions payable under this subsection (c) may be deposited in the
unemployment compensation trust fund, used to support tax and wage
automated systems projects that simplify and streamline employer
reporting, or both)) account created in (a) of this subsection.
(2)(a) Contributions under this section shall become due and be
paid by each employer under rules as the commissioner may prescribe,
and shall not be deducted, in whole or in part, from the remuneration
of individuals in the employ of the employer. Any deduction in
violation of this section is unlawful.
(b) In the payment of any contributions under this section, a
fractional part of a cent shall be disregarded unless it amounts to
one-half cent or more, in which case it shall be increased to one cent.
(3) If the commissioner determines that federal funding has been
increased to provide financing for the services specified in chapter
50.62 RCW, the commissioner shall direct that collection of
contributions under this section be terminated on the following January
1st.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.29.063 and 2006 c 47 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If it is found that a significant purpose of the transfer of a
business was to obtain a reduced array calculation factor rate, then
the following applies:
(a) If the successor was an employer at the time of the transfer,
then the experience rating accounts of the employers involved shall be
combined into a single account and the employers assigned the higher of
the predecessor or successor array calculation factor rate to take
effect as of the date of the transfer.
(b) If the successor was not an employer at the time of the
transfer, then the experience rating account of the acquired business
must not be transferred and, instead, the sum of the rate determined by
the commissioner under RCW 50.29.025(2) (c)(ii) and (d)(ii), and
50.29.041 if applicable, shall be assigned.
(2) If any part of a delinquency for which an assessment is made
under this title is due to an intent to knowingly evade the
successorship provisions of RCW 50.29.062 and this section, then with
respect to the employer, and to any business found to be knowingly
promoting the evasion of such provisions:
(a) The commissioner shall, for the rate year in which the
commissioner makes the determination under this subsection and for each
of the three consecutive rate years following that rate year, assign to
the employer or business the total rate, which is the sum of the
recalculated array calculation factor rate and a civil penalty
assessment rate, calculated as follows:
(i) Recalculate the array calculation factor rate as the array
calculation factor rate that should have applied to the employer or
business under RCW 50.29.025 and 50.29.062; and
(ii) Calculate a civil penalty assessment rate in an amount that,
when added to the array calculation factor rate determined under (a)(i)
of this subsection for the applicable rate year, results in a total
rate equal to the maximum array calculation factor rate under RCW
50.29.025 plus two percent, which total rate is not limited by any
maximum array calculation factor rate established in RCW
50.29.025(2)(b)(ii);
(b) The employer or business may be prosecuted under the penalties
prescribed in RCW 50.36.020; and
(c) The employer or business must pay for the employment security
department's reasonable expenses of auditing the employer's or
business's books and collecting the civil penalty assessment.
(3) If the person knowingly evading the successorship provisions,
or knowingly attempting to evade these provisions, or knowingly
promoting the evasion of these provisions, is not an employer, the
person is subject to a civil penalty assessment of five thousand
dollars per occurrence. In addition, the person is subject to the
penalties prescribed in RCW 50.36.020 as if the person were an
employer. The person must also pay for the employment security
department's reasonable expenses of auditing his or her books and
collecting the civil penalty assessment.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Knowingly" means having actual knowledge of or acting with
deliberate ignorance or reckless disregard for the prohibition involved
and includes, but is not limited to, intent to evade,
misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure.
(b) "Person" means and includes an individual, a trust, estate,
partnership, association, company, or corporation.
(c) "Transfer of a business" includes the transfer or acquisition
of substantially all or a portion of the operating assets, which may
include the employer's work force.
(5) Any decision to assess a penalty under this section shall be
made by the chief administrative officer of the tax branch or his or
her designee.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny an employer
the right to appeal the assessment of a penalty in the manner provided
in RCW 50.32.030.
(7) ((All penalties and interest collected under this section shall
be expended solely for prevention, detection, and collection activities
related to evasion of the successorship provisions of RCW 50.29.062 and
this section, and for no other purposes.
(8))) The commissioner shall engage in prevention, detection, and
collection activities related to evasion of the successorship
provisions of RCW 50.29.062 and this section, and establish procedures
to enforce this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 50.16.010 and 2006 c 13 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be maintained as special funds, separate and apart
from all public moneys or funds of this state an unemployment
compensation fund, an administrative contingency fund, and a federal
interest payment fund, which shall be administered by the commissioner
exclusively for the purposes of this title, and to which RCW 43.01.050
shall not be applicable.
(2)(a) The unemployment compensation fund shall consist of:
(i) All contributions collected under RCW 50.24.010 and payments in
lieu of contributions collected pursuant to the provisions of this
title;
(ii) Any property or securities acquired through the use of moneys
belonging to the fund;
(iii) All earnings of such property or securities;
(iv) Any moneys received from the federal unemployment account in
the unemployment trust fund in accordance with Title XII of the social
security act, as amended;
(v) All money recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund;
(vi) All money credited to this state's account in the unemployment
trust fund pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as
amended;
(vii) All money received from the federal government as
reimbursement pursuant to section 204 of the federal-state extended
compensation act of 1970 (84 Stat. 708-712; 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3304); and
(viii) All moneys received for the fund from any other source.
(b) All moneys in the unemployment compensation fund shall be
commingled and undivided.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the
administrative contingency fund shall consist of:
(i) All interest on delinquent contributions collected pursuant to
this title;
(ii) All fines and penalties collected pursuant to the provisions
of this title;
(iii) All sums recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund; and
(iv) Revenue received under RCW 50.24.014.
(b) All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or
assessed by a district court because of the violation of this title or
rules adopted under this title shall be remitted as provided in chapter
3.62 RCW.
(c) Moneys available in the administrative contingency fund, other
than money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a),
shall be expended upon the direction of the commissioner, with the
approval of the governor, whenever it appears to him or her that such
expenditure is necessary solely for:
(i) The proper administration of this title and ((no)) that
insufficient federal funds are available for the specific purpose to
which such expenditure is to be made, provided, the moneys are not
substituted for appropriations from federal funds which, in the absence
of such moneys, would be made available.
(ii) The proper administration of this title for which purpose
appropriations from federal funds have been requested but not yet
received, provided, the administrative contingency fund will be
reimbursed upon receipt of the requested federal appropriation.
(iii) The proper administration of this title for which compliance
and audit issues have been identified that establish federal claims
requiring the expenditure of state resources in resolution. Claims
must be resolved in the following priority: First priority is to
provide services to eligible participants within the state; second
priority is to provide substitute services or program support; and last
priority is the direct payment of funds to the federal government.
(((d) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the cost of the job
skills program at community and technical colleges as appropriated by
the legislature.))
Money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a) may
only be expended, after appropriation, for the purposes specified in
this section and RCW 50.62.010, 50.62.020, 50.62.030, 50.24.014,
50.44.053, and 50.22.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---