BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state as a mortgage broker
licensed under chapter 19.146 RCW; as to such persons, the amount of
the tax with respect to such licensed activities shall be equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
The measure of the tax on loan origination fees earned by the
mortgage broker shall be the gross loan origination fee earned by the
particular mortgage broker office including that portion of the loan
origination fee paid to a loan originator in the same office on a
particular transaction. However, when a brokerage office has paid the
tax as provided in this section, loan originators within the same
brokerage office shall not be required to pay a similar tax upon the
same transaction. The definitions in RCW 19.146.010 apply to this
section.

--- END ---