BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79A.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The habitat and recreation lands coordinating group is
established. The habitat and recreation lands coordinating group must
include representatives from the committee, the state parks and
recreation commission, the department of natural resources, and the
Washington state department of fish and wildlife. The members of the
habitat and recreation lands coordinating group must have subject
matter expertise with the issues presented in this section.
Representatives from appropriate stakeholder organizations and local
government must also be considered for participation on the habitat and
recreation lands coordinating group.
(2) To ensure timely completion of the duties assigned to the
habitat and recreation lands coordinating group, the director shall
submit yearly progress reports to the office of financial management.
(3) The habitat and recreation lands coordinating group must:
(a) Review agency land acquisition and disposal plans and policies
to help ensure statewide coordination of habitat and recreation land
acquisitions and disposals;
(b) Produce an interagency, statewide biennial forecast of habitat
and recreation land acquisitions and disposal plans;
(c) Establish procedures for publishing the biennial forecast of
acquisition and disposal plans on web sites or other centralized,
easily accessible formats;
(d) Develop and convene an annual forum for agencies to coordinate
their near-term acquisition and disposal plans;
(e) Develop a recommended method for interagency geographic
information system-based documentation of habitat and recreation lands
in cooperation with other state agencies using geographic information
systems;
(f) Develop recommendations for standardization of acquisition and
disposal recordkeeping, including identifying a preferred process for
centralizing acquisition data;
(g) Develop an approach for monitoring the success of acquisitions;
(h) Identify and commence a dialogue with key state and federal
partners to develop an inventory of potential public lands for transfer
into habitat and recreation land management status;
(i) Review existing and proposed habitat conservation plans on a
regular basis to foster statewide coordination and save costs.
(4) The group shall revisit the committee's and Washington wildlife
and recreation program's planning requirements to determine whether
coordination of state agency habitat and recreation land acquisition
and disposal could be improved by modifying those requirements.
(5) The group must develop options for centralizing coordination of
habitat and recreation land acquisition made with funds from federal
grants. The advantages and drawbacks of the following options, at a
minimum, must be developed:
(a) Requiring that agencies provide early communication on the
status of federal grant applications to the committee, the office of
financial management, or directly to the legislature;
(b) Establishing a centralized pass-through agency for federal
funds, where individual agencies would be the primary applicants.

--- END ---