BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that methane (CH4) is
a potent greenhouse gas that is twenty times more effective than carbon
dioxide in trapping heat in the atmosphere. Reducing methane
emissions, therefore, is an effective means to reduce climate warming.
The legislature also finds that about sixty percent of global methane
emissions are human-influenced sources, such as dairy farms. While the
legislature cannot control all sources of human-influenced methane, it
can encourage the use of innovative mechanisms to control methane from
dairy farms located in the state.
The legislature declares that the state should be authorized to
purchase eligible carbon credits from dairy farmers in the state as an
incentive for them to pursue appropriate measures to control dairy
nutrients and their concomitant methane emissions from the environment.
Eligible carbon credits are related to the removal of methane from the
atmosphere, and are not related to the carbon benefits that come from
displacing other potential fossil fuel resources through electricity
generation, which are included in renewable energy credits. By
offering this financial incentive, the state may enable dairy farmers
to finance the development of anaerobic digesters and to produce
electricity at a price that may meet the avoided cost of local
utilities, thus benefiting dairy operations, the environment, and the
need for cost-effective electricity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department of general administration shall
purchase at a negotiated price eligible carbon credits from a person,
firm, or corporation that removes methane from the environment by the
generation of electricity from biogas.
(2) The department shall retire and not resell the credits.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Biogas" means the gas primarily composed of methane that is
produced in the state from the anaerobic decomposition of organic
matter derived from dairy cows in the state.
(b) "Eligible carbon credit" means a credit for the verified
reduction in the carbon dioxide equivalent of methane, and that is
registered with a state, national, or international trading authority
or exchange selected by the department of community, trade, and
economic development or the Washington climate and rural energy
development center. Eligible carbon credits are only related to the
removal of methane from the atmosphere, and are not related to the
carbon benefits that come from displacing other potential fossil fuel
resources through electricity generation, which are included in a
renewable energy credit as defined in RCW 19.285.030.
(c) "Carbon dioxide equivalent" has the same meaning as in RCW
80.70.010.

--- END ---