BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that methane (CH4) is
a potent greenhouse gas that is twenty times more effective than carbon
dioxide in trapping heat in the atmosphere. Reducing methane
emissions, therefore, is an effective means to reduce climate warming.
The legislature also finds that nearly sixty percent of global methane
emissions are from human-influenced sources, such as dairy farms.
While the legislature cannot control all sources of human-influenced
methane, it can begin by encouraging the use of innovative mechanisms
to control methane from dairy farms located in the state.
The legislature declares that the state should encourage utilities
to purchase renewable energy credits from dairy farmers in the state as
an incentive for farmers to pursue appropriate measures to control
dairy nutrients and limit the level of their concomitant methane
emissions from being released into the environment. Renewable energy
credits include the carbon benefits that come from displacing other
potential fossil fuel resources through electricity generation but do
not include the carbon benefits related to the removal of methane from
the atmosphere. By offering this financial incentive, the state may
enable dairy farmers to finance the development of anaerobic digesters
and to produce electricity at a price that may meet the avoided cost of
local utilities, thus benefiting dairy operations, the environment, and
the need for cost-effective electricity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in this section, an eligible light
and power business may claim a credit against the tax imposed under
this chapter.
(2) The amount of credit is equal to the amount of renewable energy
credit purchases made at market price and retired in any fiscal year by
an eligible light and power business, where the purchases are from a
facility that generates electricity from methane gas derived from the
anaerobic decomposition of organic matter obtained from dairy cows in
the state.
(3) The credit under this section may not exceed eighty thousand
dollars per fiscal year per eligible light and power business.
(4) The credit under this section must be claimed against taxes due
for the same fiscal year in which purchases and retiring of renewable
energy credits are made by the eligible light and power business. The
credit claimed for each reporting period may not exceed the amount of
tax otherwise due under this chapter for the reporting period. Credit
earned in any fiscal year may not be carried forward or backward and
claimed against taxes due for prior or subsequent fiscal years.
Refunds may not be granted in the place of a credit. Any unused credit
expires.
(5) "Eligible light and power business" means a light and power
business that purchases and retires renewable energy credits from a
facility described in subsection (2) of this section.
(6) "Renewable energy credit" has the same meaning as found in RCW
19.285.030(17). A renewable energy credit includes the carbon benefits
that come from displacing other potential fossil fuel resources through
electricity generation but does not include the carbon benefits related
to the removal of methane from the atmosphere.

--- END ---