BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2006 c 115 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which
the student was not successful, and if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for
each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the Washington
assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045, acquisition of the certificate is required for graduation
from a public high school but is not the only requirement for
graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a
student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more
content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement,
then the student may retake the assessment in the content area up to
four times at no cost to the student. If the student successfully
meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the
student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Except as
provided in RCW 28A.655.065, once objective alternative assessments are
authorized pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, a student may
use the objective alternative assessments to demonstrate that the
student successfully meets the state standards for that content area if
the student has retaken the Washington assessment of student learning
at least once. If the student successfully meets the state standards
on the objective alternative assessments then the student shall earn a
certificate of academic achievement.
(4) Beginning with the graduating class of 2010, a student must
meet the state standards in science in addition to the other content
areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the Washington
assessment of student learning or the objective alternative assessments
in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) Beginning in 2006, school districts must make available to
students the following options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) Subject to available funding, the superintendent shall pilot
opportunities for retaking the high school assessment beginning in the
2004-05 school year. Beginning no later than September 2006,
opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year shall be
available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process, for students to
demonstrate achievement of the state academic standards. The objective
alternative assessments shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the Washington
assessment of student learning and be objective in its determination of
student achievement of the state standards. Before any objective
alternative assessments in addition to those authorized in RCW
28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a student to
demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in a content
area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall formally
approve the use of any objective alternative assessments through the
omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution.
(b) A student's score on the mathematics portion of the preliminary
scholastic assessment test (PSAT), the scholastic assessment test
(SAT), or the American college test (ACT) may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the mathematics standards for the
certificate of academic achievement. The state board of education
shall identify the scores students must achieve on the mathematics
portion of the PSAT, SAT, or ACT to meet or exceed the state standard
for mathematics. The state board of education shall identify the first
scores by December 1, 2006, and thereafter may increase but not
decrease the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state
standard for mathematics.
(11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(12) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for students as provided in this subsection (12).
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content
areas of the Washington assessment for student learning during the
previous school year. The plan shall include the courses,
competencies, and other steps needed to be taken by the student to meet
state academic standards and stay on track for graduation. This
requirement shall be phased in as follows:
(i) Beginning no later than the 2004-05 school year ninth grade
students as described in this subsection (12)(a) shall have a plan.
(ii) Beginning no later than the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter eighth grade students as described in this subsection
(12)(a) shall have a plan.
(iii) The parent or guardian shall be notified, preferably through
a parent conference, of the student's results on the Washington
assessment of student learning, actions the school intends to take to
improve the student's skills in any content area in which the student
was unsuccessful, strategies to help them improve their student's
skills, and the content of the student's plan.
(iv) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.
(b) Beginning with the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter, all fifth grade students who were not successful in one or
more of the content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment of
student learning shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of a student described in this
subsection (12)(b) shall be notified, preferably through a parent
conference, of the student's results on the Washington assessment of
student learning, actions the school intends to take to improve the
student's skills in any content area in which the student was
unsuccessful, and provide strategies to help them improve their
student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.065 and 2006 c 115 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature has made a commitment to rigorous academic
standards for receipt of a high school diploma. The primary way that
students will demonstrate that they meet the standards in reading,
writing, mathematics, and science is through the Washington assessment
of student learning. Only objective assessments that are comparable in
rigor to the state assessment are authorized as an alternative
assessment. Before seeking an alternative assessment, the legislature
expects students to make a genuine effort to meet state standards,
through retaking the Washington assessment of student learning except
as provided in subsection (7) of this section; regular and consistent
attendance at school; and participation in extended learning and other
assistance programs.
(2) Under RCW 28A.655.061, beginning in the 2006-07 school year,
the superintendent of public instruction shall implement objective
alternative assessment methods as provided in this section for students
to demonstrate achievement of the state standards in content areas in
which the student has not yet met the standard on the high school
Washington assessment of student learning. A student may access an
alternative if the student meets applicable eligibility criteria in RCW
28A.655.061 and other eligibility criteria established by the
superintendent of public instruction, including but not limited to
attendance criteria and participation in the remediation or
supplemental instruction contained in the student learning plan
developed under RCW 28A.655.061. A school district may waive
attendance and/or remediation criteria for special, unavoidable
circumstances.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "applicant" means a student
seeking to use one of the alternative assessment methods in this
section.
(4) One alternative assessment method shall be a combination of the
applicant's grades in applicable courses and the applicant's highest
score on the high school Washington assessment of student learning, as
provided in this subsection. The superintendent of public instruction
shall determine which high school courses are applicable to the
alternative assessment method and shall issue guidelines to school
districts.
(a) Using guidelines prepared by the superintendent of public
instruction, a school district shall identify the group of students in
the same school as the applicant who took the same high school courses
as the applicant in the applicable content area. From the group of
students identified in this manner, the district shall select the
comparison cohort that shall be those students who met or slightly
exceeded the state standard on the Washington assessment of student
learning.
(b) The district shall compare the applicant's grades in high
school courses in the applicable content area to the grades of students
in the comparison cohort for the same high school courses. If the
applicant's grades are equal to or above the mean grades of the
comparison cohort, the applicant shall be deemed to have met the state
standard on the alternative assessment.
(c) An applicant may not use the alternative assessment under this
subsection (4) if there are fewer than six students in the comparison
cohort.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop an
alternative assessment method that shall be an evaluation of a
collection of work samples prepared and submitted by the applicant, as
provided in this subsection and, for career and technical applicants,
the additional requirements of subsection (6) of this section.
(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
guidelines for the types and number of work samples in each content
area that may be submitted as a collection of evidence that the
applicant has met the state standard in that content area. Work
samples may be collected from academic, career and technical, or
remedial courses and may include performance tasks as well as written
products. The superintendent shall submit the guidelines for approval
by the state board of education.
(b) The superintendent shall develop protocols for submission of
the collection of work samples that include affidavits from the
applicant's teachers and school district that the samples are the work
of the applicant and a requirement that a portion of the samples be
prepared under the direct supervision of a classroom teacher. The
superintendent shall submit the protocols for approval by the state
board of education.
(c) The superintendent shall develop uniform scoring criteria for
evaluating the collection of work samples and submit the scoring
criteria for approval by the state board of education. Collections
shall be scored at the state level or regionally by a panel of
educators selected and trained by the superintendent to ensure
objectivity, reliability, and rigor in the evaluation. An educator may
not score work samples submitted by applicants from the educator's
school district. If the panel awards an applicant's collection of work
samples the minimum required score, the applicant shall be deemed to
have met the state standard on the alternative assessment.
(d) Using an open and public process that includes consultation
with district superintendents, school principals, and other educators,
the state board of education shall consider the guidelines, protocols,
scoring criteria, and other information regarding the collection of
work samples submitted by the superintendent of public instruction.
The collection of work samples may be implemented as an alternative
assessment after the state board of education has approved the
guidelines, protocols, and scoring criteria and determined that the
collection of work samples: (i) Will meet professionally accepted
standards for a valid and reliable measure of the grade level
expectations and the essential academic learning requirements; and (ii)
is comparable to or exceeds the rigor of the skills and knowledge that
a student must demonstrate on the Washington assessment of student
learning in the applicable content area. The state board shall make an
approval decision and determination no later than December 1, 2006, and
thereafter may increase the required rigor of the collection of work
samples.
(e) By September of 2006, the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop informational materials for parents, teachers, and
students regarding the collection of work samples and the status of its
development as an alternative assessment method. The materials shall
provide specific guidance regarding the type and number of work samples
likely to be required, include examples of work that meets the state
learning standards, and describe the scoring criteria and process for
the collection. The materials shall also encourage students in the
graduating class of 2008 to begin creating a collection if they believe
they may seek to use the collection once it is implemented as an
alternative assessment.
(6)(a) For students enrolled in a career and technical education
program approved under RCW 28C.04.110, the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop additional guidelines for a collection of
work samples that evidences that the collection:
(i) Is relevant to the student's particular career and technical
program;
(ii) Focuses on the application of academic knowledge and skills
within the program;
(iii) Includes completed activities or projects where demonstration
of academic knowledge is inferred; and
(iv) Is related to the essential academic learning requirements and
state standards that students must meet to earn a certificate of
academic achievement or certificate of individual achievement, but also
represents the knowledge and skills that successful individuals in the
career and technical field of the approved program are expected to
possess.
(b) To meet the state standard on the alternative assessment under
this subsection (6), an applicant must also attain the state or
nationally recognized certificate or credential associated with the
approved career and technical program.
(c) The superintendent shall consult with community and technical
colleges, employers, the work force training and education coordinating
board, apprenticeship programs, and other regional and national experts
in career and technical education to create an appropriate collection
of work samples and other evidence of a career and technical student's
knowledge and skills on the state academic standards.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall implement an
alternative assessment option for mathematics that: Presents the
mathematics essential academic learnings in segments for assessment; is
comparable in content and rigor to the tenth grade mathematics
assessment when all segments are considered together; is reliable and
valid; and can be used to determine a student's academic performance
level. Students may access this segmented math assessment without
retaking the Washington assessment of student learning. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall create a cadre of
teachers who are trained to score the segmented math alternative
assessments or use electronic means to enable the school to receive the
scores within three weeks.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction shall study the
feasibility of using existing mathematics assessments in languages
other than English as an additional alternative assessment option. The
study shall include an estimation of the cost of translating the tenth
grade mathematics assessment into other languages and scoring the
assessments should they be implemented.
(((8))) (9) The superintendent of public instruction shall
implement:
(a) By June 1, 2006, a process for students to appeal the score
they received on the high school assessments; and
(b) By January 1, 2007, guidelines and appeal processes for waiving
specific requirements in RCW 28A.655.061 pertaining to the certificate
of academic achievement and to the certificate of individual
achievement for students who: (i) Transfer to a Washington public
school in their junior or senior year with the intent of obtaining a
public high school diploma, or (ii) have special, unavoidable
circumstances.
(((9))) (10) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt
rules to implement this section.

--- END ---