BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.04.010 and 1999 c 306 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Port districts are hereby authorized to be established in the
various counties of the state for the purposes of acquisition,
construction, maintenance, operation, development and regulation within
the district, or outside the district pursuant to an interlocal
cooperation agreement with another public agency as defined in chapter
39.34 RCW or as otherwise allowed under this title, of harbor
improvements, rail or motor vehicle transfer and terminal facilities,
water transfer and terminal facilities, air transfer and terminal
facilities, or any combination of such transfer and terminal
facilities, and other commercial transportation, transfer, handling,
storage and terminal facilities, and industrial improvements.
(2) Powers of a port district that is located in a county that has
a contiguous border with another state, and a population between fifty
and seventy thousand, shall be exercised within the district, except as
otherwise provided by statute or pursuant to an interlocal cooperation
agreement with another public agency as defined in chapter 39.34 RCW.
In addition to other requirements of chapter 39.34 RCW, such an
interlocal cooperation agreement may involve the exercise of a port
district's powers for a port district that is located in a county that
has contiguous borders with another state, and a population between
fifty and seventy thousand, outside the boundaries of the state of
Washington in whole or in part only if found, by resolution of the port
district commission exercising such authority, to be reasonably
necessary for the effective exercise of the port district's statutory
powers and for the benefit of the inhabitants of the district and the
state of Washington. The resolution may be adopted only after a public
hearing of which notice has been published in a newspaper of general
circulation within the district at least ten days in advance.

Sec. 2 RCW 53.04.150 and 2000 c 200 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A port district that is less than county-wide, and that is located
in a county with a population of less than ninety thousand and located
in either the Interstate 5 or Interstate 90 corridor, may petition for
annexation of ((an)) any area ((that is contiguous to its boundaries,))
within the county that is not located within the boundaries of any
other port district((,)) and contains no registered voters. The
petition must be in writing, addressed to and filed with the port
commission, and signed by the owners of not less than seventy-five
percent of the property value in the area to be annexed, according to
the assessed value for general taxation. The petition must contain a
legal description of the property according to government legal
subdivisions or legal plats, or a sufficient metes and bounds
description, and must be accompanied by a plat outlining the boundaries
of the property to be annexed.

Sec. 3 RCW 53.04.180 and 2000 c 200 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By a majority vote of the commission, and with the written
consent of ((all)) seventy-five percent of the owners of the property
to be annexed, a port commission of a district that is less than
county-wide, and that is located in a county with a population of less
than ninety thousand and located in either the Interstate 5 or
Interstate 90 corridor, may annex, for industrial development or other
port district purposes, any property ((contiguous to the district's
boundaries and)) within the county that is not located within the
boundaries of any other port district.
(2) The written consent required by subsection (1) of this section
must contain a full and correct legal description of the property to be
annexed, must include the signature of all owners of the property to be
annexed, and must be addressed to and filed with the commission.
(3) If the commission approves annexation under this section, it
shall do so by resolution and shall file a certified copy of the
resolution with the board of county commissioners of the county in
which the annexed property is located. Upon the date fixed in the
resolution, the area annexed becomes part of the district.

Sec. 4 RCW 53.08.290 and 1981 c 47 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the other powers under this chapter, a port
district, in connection with the operation of facilities and
improvements of the district, may perform all necessary activities
related to the ((intermodal)) movement of interstate and foreign cargo:
PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein shall authorize a port district
to engage in the transportation of commodities by motor vehicle for
compensation outside the boundaries of the port district. A port
district may, by itself or in conjunction with public or private
entities, acquire, construct, purchase, lease, contract for, provide,
and operate rail services, equipment, and facilities inside or outside
the port district: PROVIDED, That such authority may only be exercised
outside the boundaries of the port district if such extraterritorial
rail services, equipment, or facilities are found, by resolution of the
commission of the port district exercising such authority, to be
reasonably necessary to link the rail services, equipment, and
facilities within the port district to an interstate railroad system;
however, if such extraterritorial rail services, equipment, or
facilities are in or are to be located in one or more other port
districts, the commission of such other port district or districts must
consent by resolution to the proposed plan of the originating port
district which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That no port district shall engage in the manufacture of rail
cars for use off port property.

--- END ---