BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department shall establish an internship program
for returning wounded combat veterans. The purpose of the program is
to assist returning wounded combat veterans by matching them with jobs
within the department that require their military skill sets and would
be of benefit to the department, or that would teach them new skills.
The jobs may include, but are not limited to, the following
classifications: Engineering; construction trades; logistics; and
project planning. The emphasis of the program should be to assist
veterans who served in southern or central Asia, Operation Enduring
Freedom; and the Persian Gulf, Operation Iraqi Freedom. This program
may assist with the placement of wounded combat veterans as apprentices
under RCW 39.04.320. The department may adopt rules under chapter
34.05 RCW to implement the requirements of this section. For the
purposes of this section, "veteran" has the same meaning as in RCW
41.04.005.

--- END ---