BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.18.170 and 2000 c 86 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever ((an obligor)) a parent who has been ordered to
provide health insurance coverage for a dependent child fails to
provide such coverage or lets it lapse, the department or ((the
obligee)) a parent may seek enforcement of the coverage order as
provided under this section.
(2)(a) If the ((obligor)) parent's order to provide health
insurance coverage contains language notifying the ((obligor)) parent
that failure to provide such coverage or proof that such coverage is
unavailable may result in direct enforcement of the order and orders
payments through, or has been submitted to, the Washington state
support registry for enforcement, then the department may, without
further notice to the ((obligor)) parent, send a ((notice of
enrollment)) national medical support notice pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec.
666(a)(19), and sections 401 (e) and (f) of the federal child support
and performance incentive act of 1998 to the ((obligor's)) parent's
employer or union. The notice shall be served:
(i) By regular mail;
(ii) In the manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a
civil action;
(iii) By certified mail, return receipt requested; or
(iv) By electronic means if there is an agreement between the
secretary of the department and the person, firm, corporation,
association, political subdivision, department of the state, or agency,
subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States to accept service
by electronic means.
(b) The notice shall require the employer or union to enroll the
child in the health insurance plan as provided in subsection (3) of
this section.
(c) The returned ((answer)) part A of the national medical support
notice to the division of child support by the employer constitutes
proof of service of the notice ((of enrollment)) in the case where the
notice was served by regular mail.
(d) ((The division of child support may use uniform interstate
forms adopted by the United States department of health and human
services to take insurance enrollment actions under this section.
(e))) If the ((obligor)) parent's order to provide health insurance
coverage does not order payments through, and has not been submitted
to, the Washington state support registry for enforcement:
(i) The ((obligee)) parent seeking enforcement may, without further
notice to the ((obligor)) other parent, send a certified copy of the
order requiring health insurance coverage to the obligor's employer or
union by certified mail, return receipt requested; and
(ii) The ((obligee)) parent seeking enforcement shall attach a
notarized statement to the order declaring that the order is the latest
order addressing coverage entered by the court and require the employer
or union to enroll the child in the health insurance plan as provided
in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Upon receipt of an order that provides for health insurance
coverage((, or a notice of enrollment)):
(a) The ((obligor's)) parent's employer or union shall answer the
party who sent the order ((or notice)) within twenty days and confirm
that the child:
(i) Has been enrolled in the health insurance plan;
(ii) Will be enrolled; or
(iii) Cannot be covered, stating the reasons why such coverage
cannot be provided;
(b) The employer or union shall withhold any required premium from
the ((obligor's)) parent's income or wages;
(c) If more than one plan is offered by the employer or union, and
each plan may be extended to cover the child, then the child shall be
enrolled in the ((obligor's)) parent's plan. If the ((obligor's))
parent's plan does not provide coverage which is accessible to the
child, the child shall be enrolled in the least expensive plan
otherwise available to the ((obligor)) parent;
(d) The employer or union shall provide information about the name
of the health insurance coverage provider or issuer and the extent of
coverage available to the ((obligee or the department)) parent and
shall make available any necessary claim forms or enrollment membership
cards.
(4) Upon receipt of a national medical support notice from a child
support agency operating under Title IV-D of the federal social
security act:
(a) The parent's employer or union shall comply with the provisions
of the notice, including meeting response time frames and withholding
requirements required under part A of the notice;
(b) The parent's employer or union shall also be responsible for
complying with forwarding part B of the notice to the child's plan
administrator, if required by the notice;
(c) The plan administrator shall be responsible for complying with
the provisions of the notice.
(5) If the order for coverage contains no language notifying ((the
obligor)) either or both parents that failure to provide health
insurance coverage or proof that such coverage is unavailable may
result in direct enforcement of the order, the department or the
((obligee)) parent seeking enforcement may serve a written notice of
intent to enforce the order on the ((obligor)) other parent by
certified mail, return receipt requested, or by personal service. If
the ((obligor)) parent required to provide medical support fails to
provide written proof that such coverage has been obtained or applied
for or fails to provide proof that such coverage is unavailable within
twenty days of service of the notice, the department or the ((obligee))
parent seeking enforcement may proceed to enforce the order directly as
provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(((5))) (6) If the ((obligor)) parent ordered to provide health
insurance coverage elects to provide coverage that will not be
accessible to the child because of geographic or other limitations when
accessible coverage is otherwise available, the department or the
((obligee)) parent seeking enforcement may serve a written notice of
intent to purchase health insurance coverage on the ((obligor)) parent
required to provide medical support by certified mail, return receipt
requested. The notice shall also specify the type and cost of
coverage.
(((6))) (7) If the department serves a notice under subsection
(((5))) (6) of this section the ((obligor)) parent required to provide
medical support shall, within twenty days of the date of service:
(a) File an application for an adjudicative proceeding; or
(b) Provide written proof to the department that the ((obligor))
parent has either applied for, or obtained, coverage accessible to the
child.
(((7))) (8) If the ((obligee)) parent seeking enforcement serves a
notice under subsection (((5))) (6) of this section, within twenty days
of the date of service the ((obligor)) parent required to provide
medical support shall provide written proof to the ((obligee)) parent
seeking enforcement that the ((obligor)) parent required to provide
medical support has either applied for, or obtained, coverage
accessible to the child.
(((8))) (9) If the ((obligor)) parent required to provide medical
support fails to respond to a notice served under subsection (((5)))
(6) of this section to the party who served the notice, the party who
served the notice may purchase the health insurance coverage specified
in the notice directly. The amount of the monthly premium shall be
added to the support debt and be collectible without further notice.
The amount of the monthly premium may be collected or accrued until the
((obligor)) parent required to provide medical support provides proof
of the required coverage.
(((9))) (10) The signature of the ((obligee)) parent seeking
enforcement or of a department employee shall be a valid authorization
to the coverage provider or issuer for purposes of processing a payment
to the child's health services provider. An order for health insurance
coverage shall operate as an assignment of all benefit rights to the
((obligee)) parent seeking enforcement or to the child's health
services provider, and in any claim against the coverage provider or
issuer, the ((obligee)) parent seeking enforcement or ((the obligee's))
his or her assignee shall be subrogated to the rights of the
((obligor)) parent obligated to provide medical support for the child.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this section regarding assignment of
benefits, this section shall not require a health care service
contractor authorized under chapter 48.44 RCW or a health maintenance
organization authorized under chapter 48.46 RCW to deviate from their
contractual provisions and restrictions regarding reimbursement for
covered services. If the coverage is terminated, the employer shall
mail a notice of termination to the department or the ((obligee))
parent seeking enforcement at ((the obligee's)) that parent's last
known address within thirty days of the termination date.
(((10))) (11) This section shall not be construed to limit the
right of the ((obligor or the obligee)) parents or parties to the
support order to bring an action in superior court at any time to
enforce, modify, or clarify the original support order.
(((11))) (12) Where a child does not reside in the issuer's service
area, an issuer shall cover no less than urgent and emergent care.
Where the issuer offers broader coverage, whether by policy or
reciprocal agreement, the issuer shall provide such coverage to any
child otherwise covered that does not reside in the issuer's service
area.
(((12))) (13) If ((an obligor)) a parent required to provide
medical support fails to pay his or her portion, determined under RCW
26.19.080, of any deductible ((required under the health insurance
coverage or fails to pay his or her portion of medical expenses
incurred in excess of the coverage provided under the plan)), copay, or
uninsured medical expense incurred on behalf of the child, pursuant to
a child support order, the department or the obligee parent may enforce
collection of ((the obligor's)) that parent's portion of the deductible
((or the additional medical expenses through a wage assignment order)),
copay, or uninsured medical expense incurred on behalf of the child.
((The amount of)) If the department is enforcing the order, the parent
required to provide medical support shall have his or her portion of
the deductible ((or additional)), copay, or uninsured medical expenses
((shall be)) incurred on behalf of the child added to the support debt
and be collectible without further notice ((if the obligor's share of
the amount of the deductible or additional expenses is reduced to a sum
certain in a court order)), following the reduction of the expenses to
a sum certain either in a court order or by the department, pursuant to
RCW 26.23.110.
(14) The department has rule-making authority to enact rules
consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19) as
amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of 2005.
Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to implement
regulations required under parts 45 C.F.R. 302, 303, 304, 305, and 308.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.23.035 and 1997 c 58 s 933 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall adopt rules
for the distribution of support money collected by the division of
child support. These rules shall:
(a) Comply with Title IV-D of the federal social security act as
amended by the personal responsibility and work opportunity
reconciliation act of 1996 and the federal deficit reduction act of
2005;
(b) Direct the division of child support to distribute support
money within eight days of receipt, unless one of the following
circumstances, or similar circumstances specified in the rules,
prevents prompt distribution:
(i) The location of the custodial parent is unknown;
(ii) The support debt is in litigation;
(iii) The division of child support cannot identify the responsible
parent or the custodian;
(c) Provide for proportionate distribution of support payments if
the responsible parent owes a support obligation or a support debt for
two or more Title IV-D cases; and
(d) Authorize the distribution of support money, except money
collected under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 664, to satisfy a support debt owed to
the IV-D custodian before the debt owed to the state when the custodian
stops receiving a public assistance grant.
(2) The division of child support may distribute support payments
to the payee under the support order or to another person who has
lawful physical custody of the child or custody with the payee's
consent. The payee may file an application for an adjudicative
proceeding to challenge distribution to such other person. Prior to
distributing support payments to any person other than the payee, the
registry shall:
(a) Obtain a written statement from the child's physical custodian,
under penalty of perjury, that the custodian has lawful custody of the
child or custody with the payee's consent;
(b) Mail to the responsible parent and to the payee at the payee's
last known address a copy of the physical custodian's statement and a
notice which states that support payments will be sent to the physical
custodian; and
(c) File a copy of the notice with the clerk of the court that
entered the original support order.
(3) If the Washington state support registry distributes a support
payment to a person in error, the registry may obtain restitution by
means of a set-off against future payments received on behalf of the
person receiving the erroneous payment, or may act according to RCW
74.20A.270 as deemed appropriate. Any set-off against future support
payments shall be limited to amounts collected on the support debt and
ten percent of amounts collected as current support.
(4) The division of child support shall ensure that the fifty
dollar pass through payment, as required by 42 U.S.C. Sec. 657 before
the adoption of P.L. 104-193, is terminated immediately upon July 27,
1997, and all rules to the contrary adopted before July 27, 1997, are
without force and effect.
(5) Effective October 1, 2008, consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec.
657(a) as amended by section 7301(b)(7)(B) of the federal deficit
reduction act of 2005, the department shall pass through child support
that does not exceed one hundred dollars per month collected on behalf
of a family, or in the case of a family that includes two or more
children, an amount that is not more than two hundred dollars per
month. The department has rule-making authority to implement this
subsection.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.23.050 and 2001 c 42 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the division of child support is providing support
enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, or if a party is applying for
support enforcement services by signing the application form on the
bottom of the support order, the superior court shall include in all
court orders that establish or modify a support obligation:
(a) A provision that orders and directs the responsible parent to
make all support payments to the Washington state support registry;
(b) A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages,
earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and
personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other
state, without further notice to the responsible parent at any time
after entry of the court order, unless:
(i) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that
there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding and
that withholding should be delayed until a payment is past due; or
(ii) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the
court that provides for an alternate arrangement;
(c) A statement that the receiving parent might be required to
submit an accounting of how the support is being spent to benefit the
child; and
(d) A statement that the responsible parent's privileges to obtain
and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be
renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a
support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320.
As used in this subsection and subsection (3) of this section,
"good cause not to require immediate income withholding" means a
written determination of why implementing immediate wage withholding
would not be in the child's best interests and, in modification cases,
proof of timely payment of previously ordered support.
(2) In all other cases not under subsection (1) of this section,
the court may order the responsible parent to make payments directly to
the person entitled to receive the payments, to the Washington state
support registry, or may order that payments be made in accordance with
an alternate arrangement agreed upon by the parties.
(a) The superior court shall include in all orders under this
subsection that establish or modify a support obligation:
(i) A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages,
earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and
personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other
state, without further notice to the responsible parent at any time
after entry of the court order, unless:
(A) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that
there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding and
that withholding should be delayed until a payment is past due; or
(B) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the
court that provides for an alternate arrangement; and
(ii) A statement that the receiving parent may be required to
submit an accounting of how the support is being spent to benefit the
child.
As used in this subsection, "good cause not to require immediate
income withholding" is any reason that the court finds appropriate.
(b) The superior court may order immediate or delayed income
withholding as follows:
(i) Immediate income withholding may be ordered if the responsible
parent has earnings. If immediate income withholding is ordered under
this subsection, all support payments shall be paid to the Washington
state support registry. The superior court shall issue a mandatory
wage assignment order as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW when the
support order is signed by the court. The parent entitled to receive
the transfer payment is responsible for serving the employer with the
order and for its enforcement as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW.
(ii) If immediate income withholding is not ordered, the court
shall require that income withholding be delayed until a payment is
past due. The support order shall contain a statement that withholding
action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and
liens enforced against real and personal property under the child
support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to
the responsible parent, after a payment is past due.
(c) If a mandatory wage withholding order under chapter 26.18 RCW
is issued under this subsection and the division of child support
provides support enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, the existing
wage withholding assignment is prospectively superseded upon the
division of child support's subsequent service of an income withholding
notice.
(3) The office of administrative hearings and the department of
social and health services shall require that all support obligations
established as administrative orders include a provision which orders
and directs that the responsible parent shall make all support payments
to the Washington state support registry. All administrative orders
shall also state that the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and
maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed,
or may be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support
order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320. All administrative orders shall
also state that withholding action may be taken against wages,
earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and
personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other
state without further notice to the responsible parent at any time
after entry of the order, unless:
(a) One of the parties demonstrates, and the presiding officer
finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income
withholding; or
(b) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the
presiding officer that provides for an alternate agreement.
(4) If the support order does not include the provision ordering
and directing that all payments be made to the Washington state support
registry and a statement that withholding action may be taken against
wages, earnings, assets, or benefits if a support payment is past due
or at any time after the entry of the order, or that a parent's
licensing privileges may not be renewed, or may be suspended, the
division of child support may serve a notice on the responsible parent
stating such requirements and authorizations. Service may be by
personal service or any form of mail requiring a return receipt.
(5) Every support order shall state:
(a) The address where the support payment is to be sent;
(b) That withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings,
assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal
property under the child support statutes of this or any other state,
without further notice to the responsible parent at any time after
entry of a support order, unless:
(i) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that
there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding; or
(ii) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the
court that provides for an alternate arrangement;
(c) The income of the parties, if known, or that their income is
unknown and the income upon which the support award is based;
(d) The support award as a sum certain amount;
(e) The specific day or date on which the support payment is due;
(f) The names and ages of the dependent children;
(g) A provision requiring both the responsible parent and the
custodial parent to keep the Washington state support registry informed
of whether he or she has access to health insurance coverage at
reasonable cost and, if so, the health insurance policy information;
(h) That ((any parent owing a duty of child support)) either or
both the responsible parent and the custodial parent shall be obligated
to provide health insurance coverage for his or her child if coverage
that can be extended to cover the child is or becomes available to
((that)) the parent through employment or is union-related as provided
under RCW 26.09.105;
(i) That if proof of health insurance coverage or proof that the
coverage is unavailable is not provided within twenty days, the
((obligee)) parent seeking enforcement or the department may seek
direct enforcement of the coverage through the ((obligor's)) employer
or union of the parent required to provide medical support without
further notice to the ((obligor)) parent as provided under chapter
26.18 RCW;
(j) The reasons for not ordering health insurance coverage if the
order fails to require such coverage;
(k) That the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and maintain
a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be
suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support order as
provided in RCW 74.20A.320;
(l) That each parent must:
(i) Promptly file with the court and update as necessary the
confidential information form required by subsection (7) of this
section; and
(ii) Provide the state case registry and update as necessary the
information required by subsection (7) of this section; and
(m) That parties to administrative support orders shall provide to
the state case registry and update as necessary their residential
addresses and the address of the responsible parent's employer. The
division of child support may adopt rules that govern the collection of
parties' current residence and mailing addresses, telephone numbers,
dates of birth, social security numbers, the names of the children,
social security numbers of the children, dates of birth of the
children, driver's license numbers, and the names, addresses, and
telephone numbers of the parties' employers to enforce an
administrative support order. The division of child support shall not
release this information if the division of child support determines
that there is reason to believe that release of the information may
result in physical or emotional harm to the party or to the child, or
a restraining order or protective order is in effect to protect one
party from the other party.
(6) After the responsible parent has been ordered or notified to
make payments to the Washington state support registry under this
section, the responsible parent shall be fully responsible for making
all payments to the Washington state support registry and shall be
subject to payroll deduction or other income-withholding action. The
responsible parent shall not be entitled to credit against a support
obligation for any payments made to a person or agency other than to
the Washington state support registry except as provided under RCW
74.20.101. A civil action may be brought by the payor to recover
payments made to persons or agencies who have received and retained
support moneys paid contrary to the provisions of this section.
(7) All petitioners and parties to all court actions under chapters
26.09, 26.10, 26.12, 26.18, ((26.21)) 26.21A, 26.23, 26.26, and 26.27
RCW shall complete to the best of their knowledge a verified and signed
confidential information form or equivalent that provides the parties'
current residence and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, dates of
birth, social security numbers, driver's license numbers, and the
names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the parties' employers. The
clerk of the court shall not accept petitions, except in parentage
actions initiated by the state, orders of child support, decrees of
dissolution, or paternity orders for filing in such actions unless
accompanied by the confidential information form or equivalent, or
unless the confidential information form or equivalent is already on
file with the court clerk. In lieu of or in addition to requiring the
parties to complete a separate confidential information form, the clerk
may collect the information in electronic form. The clerk of the court
shall transmit the confidential information form or its data to the
division of child support with a copy of the order of child support or
paternity order, and may provide copies of the confidential information
form or its data and any related findings, decrees, parenting plans,
orders, or other documents to the state administrative agency that
administers Title IV-A, IV-D, ((or)) IV-E, or XIX of the federal social
security act. In state initiated paternity actions, the parties
adjudicated the parents of the child or children shall complete the
confidential information form or equivalent or the state's attorney of
record may complete that form to the best of the attorney's knowledge.
(8) The department has rule-making authority to enact rules
consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19) as
amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of 2005.
Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to implement
regulations required under parts 45 C.F.R. 302, 303, 304, 305, and 308.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.23.110 and 1993 c 12 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may serve a notice of support owed on a
responsible parent when a support order:
(a) Does not state the current and future support obligation as a
fixed dollar amount; ((or))
(b) Contains an escalation clause or adjustment provision for which
additional information not contained in the support order is needed to
determine the fixed dollar amount of the support debt or the fixed
dollar amount of the current and future support obligation, or both; or
(c) Provides that the responsible parent is responsible for paying
for a portion of uninsured medical costs, copayments, and/or
deductibles incurred on behalf of the child, but does not reduce the
costs to a fixed dollar amount.
(2) The department may serve a notice of support owed on a parent
who has been designated to pay per a support order a portion of
uninsured medical costs, copayments, or deductibles incurred on behalf
of the child, but only when the support order does not reduce the costs
to a fixed dollar amount.
(3) The notice of support owed shall facilitate enforcement of the
support order and implement and effectuate the terms of the support
order, rather than modify those terms. When the office of support
enforcement issues a notice of support owed, the office shall inform
the payee under the support order.
(((3))) (4) The notice of support owed shall be served on a
responsible parent by personal service or any form of mailing requiring
a return receipt. The notice shall be served on the applicant or
recipient of services by first class mail to the last known address.
The notice of support owed shall contain an initial finding of the
fixed dollar amount of current and future support obligation that
should be paid or the fixed dollar amount of the support debt owed
under the support order, or both.
(((4))) (5) A ((responsible)) parent who objects to the fixed
dollar amounts stated in the notice of support owed has twenty days
from the date of the service of the notice of support owed to file an
application for an adjudicative proceeding or initiate an action in
superior court.
(((5))) (6) The notice of support owed shall state that the
((responsible)) parent may:
(a) File an application for an adjudicative proceeding governed by
chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act, in which the
((responsible)) parent will be required to appear and show cause why
the fixed dollar amount of support debt or current and future support
obligation, or both, stated in the notice of support owed is incorrect
and should not be ordered; or
(b) Initiate an action in superior court.
(((6))) (7) If ((the responsible)) either parent does not file an
application for an adjudicative proceeding or initiate an action in
superior court, the fixed dollar amount of current and future support
obligation or support debt, or both, stated in the notice of support
owed shall become final and subject to collection action.
(((7))) (8) If an adjudicative proceeding is requested, the
department shall mail a copy of the notice of adjudicative proceeding
to the ((payee under the support order at the payee's last known
address. A payee who appears for the adjudicative proceeding is
entitled to participate. Participation includes, but is not limited
to, giving testimony, presenting evidence, being present for or
listening to other testimony offered in the adjudicative proceeding,
and offering rebuttal to other testimony. Nothing in this section
shall preclude the administrative law judge from limiting participation
to preserve the confidentiality of information protected by law))
parties.
(((8))) (9) If ((the responsible)) either parent does not initiate
an action in superior court, and serve notice of the action on the
department and the other party to the support order within the twenty-day period, the ((responsible)) parent shall be deemed to have made an
election of remedies and shall be required to exhaust administrative
remedies under this chapter with judicial review available as provided
for in RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.
(((9))) (10) An adjudicative order entered in accordance with this
section shall state the basis, rationale, or formula upon which the
fixed dollar amounts established in the adjudicative order were based.
The fixed dollar amount of current and future support obligation or the
amount of the support debt, or both, determined under this section
shall be subject to collection under this chapter and other applicable
state statutes.
(((10))) (11) The department shall also provide for:
(a) An annual review of the support order if either the office of
support enforcement or the ((responsible)) parent requests such a
review; and
(b) A late adjudicative proceeding if the ((responsible)) parent
fails to file an application for an adjudicative proceeding in a timely
manner under this section.
(((11))) (12) If an annual review or late adjudicative proceeding
is requested under subsection (((10))) (11) of this section, the
department shall mail a copy of the notice of adjudicative proceeding
to the ((payee at the payee's)) parties' last known address. ((A payee
who appears for the adjudicative proceeding is entitled to participate.
Participation includes, but is not limited to, giving testimony,
presenting evidence, being present for or listening to other testimony
offered in the adjudicative proceeding, and offering rebuttal to other
testimony. The administrative law judge may limit participation to
preserve the confidentiality of information protected by law.))
(13) The department has rule-making authority to enact rules
consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19) as
amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of 2005.
Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to implement
regulations required under parts 45 C.F.R. 302, 303, 304, 305, and 308.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.20.040 and 1997 c 58 s 891 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the department receives an application for public
assistance on behalf of a child, the department shall take appropriate
action under the provisions of this chapter, chapter 74.20A RCW, or
other appropriate statutes of this state to establish or enforce
support obligations against the parent or other persons owing a duty to
pay support moneys.
(2) The secretary may accept a request for support enforcement
services on behalf of persons who are not recipients of public
assistance and may take appropriate action to establish or enforce
support obligations against the parent or other persons owing a duty to
pay moneys. Requests accepted under this subsection may be conditioned
upon the payment of a fee as required by subsection (6) of this section
or through regulation issued by the secretary. The secretary may
establish by regulation, reasonable standards and qualifications for
support enforcement services under this subsection.
(3) The secretary may accept requests for support enforcement
services from child support enforcement agencies in other states
operating child support programs under Title IV-D of the social
security act or from foreign countries, and may take appropriate action
to establish and enforce support obligations, or to enforce subpoenas,
information requests, orders for genetic testing, and collection
actions issued by the other agency against the parent or other person
owing a duty to pay support moneys, the parent or other person's
employer, or any other person or entity properly subject to child
support collection or information-gathering processes. The request
shall contain and be accompanied by such information and documentation
as the secretary may by rule require, and be signed by an authorized
representative of the agency. The secretary may adopt rules setting
forth the duration and nature of services provided under this
subsection.
(4) The department may take action to establish, enforce, and
collect a support obligation, including performing related services,
under this chapter and chapter 74.20A RCW, or through the attorney
general or prosecuting attorney for action under chapter 26.09, 26.18,
26.20, ((26.21)) 26.21A, or 26.26 RCW or other appropriate statutes or
the common law of this state.
(5) Whenever a support order is filed with the Washington state
support registry under chapter 26.23 RCW, the department may take
appropriate action under the provisions of this chapter, chapter 26.23
or 74.20A RCW, or other appropriate law of this state to establish or
enforce the support obligations contained in that order against the
responsible parent or other persons owing a duty to pay support moneys.
(6) The secretary ((may charge and collect a fee from the person
obligated to pay support to compensate the department for services
rendered in establishment of or enforcement of support obligations.
This fee shall be limited to not more than ten percent of any support
money collected as a result of action taken by the secretary. The fee
charged shall be in addition to the support obligation. In no event
may any moneys collected by the department from the person obligated to
pay support be retained as satisfaction of fees charged until all
current support obligations have been satisfied. The secretary shall
by regulation establish reasonable fees for support enforcement
services and said schedule of fees shall be made available to any
person obligated to pay support)), in the case of an individual who has
never received assistance under a state program funded under part A and
for whom the state has collected at least five hundred dollars of
support, shall impose an annual fee of twenty-five dollars for each
case in which services are furnished, which shall be retained by the
state from support collected on behalf of the individual, but not from
the first five hundred dollars of support. The secretary may, on
showing of necessity, waive or defer any such fee or cost.
(7) Fees, due and owing, may be retained from support payments
directly or collected as delinquent support moneys utilizing any of the
remedies in chapter 74.20 RCW, chapter 74.20A RCW, chapter ((26.21))
26.21A RCW, or any other remedy at law or equity available to the
department or any agencies with whom it has a cooperative or
contractual arrangement to establish, enforce, or collect support
moneys or support obligations.
(8) The secretary may waive the fee, or any portion thereof, as a
part of a compromise of disputed claims or may grant partial or total
charge off of said fee if the secretary finds there are no available,
practical, or lawful means by which said fee may be collected or to
facilitate payment of the amount of delinquent support moneys or fees
owed.
(9) The secretary shall adopt rules conforming to federal laws,
including but not limited to complying with section 7310 of the federal
deficit reduction act of 2005, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 654, and rules((,)) and
regulations required to be observed in maintaining the state child
support enforcement program required under Title IV-D of the federal
social security act. The adoption of these rules shall be calculated
to promote the cost-effective use of the agency's resources and not
otherwise cause the agency to divert its resources from its essential
functions.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.20.330 and 2000 c 86 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever public assistance is paid under a state program funded
under Title IV-A of the federal social security act as amended by the
personal responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act of
1996, and the federal deficit reduction act of 2005, each applicant or
recipient is deemed to have made assignment to the department of any
rights to a support obligation from any other person the applicant or
recipient may have in his or her own behalf or in behalf of any other
family member for whom the applicant or recipient is applying for or
receiving public assistance, including any unpaid support obligation or
support debt which has accrued at the time the assignment is made.
(2) Payment of public assistance under a state-funded program, or
a program funded under Title IV-A ((or)), IV-E, or XIX of the federal
social security act as amended by the personal responsibility and work
opportunity reconciliation act of 1996 shall:
(a) Operate as an assignment by operation of law; and
(b) Constitute an authorization to the department to provide the
assistance recipient with support enforcement services.
(3) Effective October 1, 2008, whenever public assistance is paid
under a state program funded under Title IV-A of the federal social
security act as amended by the personal responsibility and work
opportunity reconciliation act of 1996, and the federal deficit
reduction act of 2005, a member of the family is deemed to have made an
assignment to the state any right the family member may have, or on
behalf of the family member receiving such assistance, to support from
any other person, not exceeding the total amount of assistance paid to
the family, which accrues during the period that the family receives
assistance under the program.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.20A.030 and 2004 c 183 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall be subrogated to the right of any
dependent child or children or person having the care, custody, and
control of said child or children, if public assistance money is paid
to or for the benefit of the child, or for the care and maintenance of
a child, including a child with a developmental disability if the child
has been placed into care as a result of an action under chapter 13.34
RCW, under a state-funded program, or a program funded under Title IV-A
or IV-E of the federal social security act as amended by the personal
responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act of 1996, and the
federal deficit reduction act of 2005, to prosecute or maintain any
support action or execute any administrative remedy existing under the
laws of the state of Washington to obtain reimbursement of moneys
expended, based on the support obligation of the responsible parent
established by a child support order. Distribution of any support
moneys shall be made in accordance with RCW 26.23.035.
(2) The department may initiate, continue, maintain, or execute an
action to establish, enforce, and collect a support obligation,
including establishing paternity and performing related services, under
this chapter and chapter 74.20 RCW, or through the attorney general or
prosecuting attorney under chapter 26.09, 26.18, 26.20, ((26.21))
26.21A, 26.23, or 26.26 RCW or other appropriate statutes or the common
law of this state, for so long as and under such conditions as the
department may establish by regulation.
(3) Public assistance moneys shall be exempt from collection action
under this chapter except as provided in RCW 74.20A.270.
(4) No collection action shall be taken against parents of children
eligible for admission to, or children who have been discharged from,
a residential habilitation center as defined by RCW 71A.10.020(8)
unless the child with a developmental disability is placed as a result
of an action under chapter 13.34 RCW. The child support obligation
shall be calculated pursuant to chapter 26.19 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.20A.055 and 2002 c 199 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary may, if there is no order that establishes the
responsible parent's support obligation or specifically relieves the
responsible parent of a support obligation or pursuant to an
establishment of paternity under chapter 26.26 RCW, serve on the
responsible parent or parents and custodial parent a notice and finding
of financial responsibility requiring the parents to appear and show
cause in an adjudicative proceeding why the finding of responsibility
and/or the amount thereof is incorrect, should not be finally ordered,
but should be rescinded or modified. This notice and finding shall
relate to the support debt accrued and/or accruing under this chapter
and/or RCW 26.16.205, including periodic payments to be made in the
future. The hearing shall be held pursuant to this section, chapter
34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act, and the rules of the
department. A custodian who has physical custody of a child has the
same rights that a custodial parent has under this section.
(2) The notice and finding of financial responsibility shall be
served in the same manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a
civil action or may be served on the responsible parent by certified
mail, return receipt requested. The receipt shall be prima facie
evidence of service. The notice shall be served upon the debtor within
sixty days from the date the state assumes responsibility for the
support of the dependent child or children on whose behalf support is
sought. If the notice is not served within sixty days from such date,
the department shall lose the right to reimbursement of payments made
after the sixty-day period and before the date of notification:
PROVIDED, That if the department exercises reasonable efforts to locate
the debtor and is unable to do so the entire sixty-day period is tolled
until such time as the debtor can be located. The notice may be served
upon the custodial parent who is the nonassistance applicant or public
assistance recipient by first class mail to the last known address. If
the custodial parent is not the nonassistance applicant or public
assistance recipient, service shall be in the same manner as for the
responsible parent.
(3) The notice and finding of financial responsibility shall set
forth the amount the department has determined the responsible parent
owes, the support debt accrued and/or accruing, and periodic payments
to be made in the future. The notice and finding shall also include:
(a) A statement of the name of the custodial parent and the name of
the child or children for whom support is sought;
(b) A statement of the amount of periodic future support payments
as to which financial responsibility is alleged;
(c) A statement that the responsible parent or custodial parent may
object to all or any part of the notice and finding, and file an
application for an adjudicative proceeding to show cause why the terms
set forth in the notice should not be ordered;
(d) A statement that, if neither the responsible parent nor the
custodial parent files in a timely fashion an application for an
adjudicative proceeding, the support debt and payments stated in the
notice and finding, including periodic support payments in the future,
shall be assessed and determined and ordered by the department and that
this debt and amounts due under the notice shall be subject to
collection action;
(e) A statement that the property of the debtor, without further
advance notice or hearing, will be subject to lien and foreclosure,
distraint, seizure and sale, order to withhold and deliver, notice of
payroll deduction or other collection action to satisfy the debt and
enforce the support obligation established under the notice;
(f) A statement that either or both parents are responsible for
providing health insurance for his or her child if coverage that can be
extended to cover the child is or becomes available to the parent
through employment or is union-related as provided under RCW 26.09.105.
(4) A responsible parent or custodial parent who objects to the
notice and finding of financial responsibility may file an application
for an adjudicative proceeding within twenty days of the date of
service of the notice or thereafter as provided under this subsection.
(a) If the responsible parent or custodial parent files the
application within twenty days, the office of administrative hearings
shall schedule an adjudicative proceeding to hear the parent's or
parents' objection and determine the support obligation for the entire
period covered by the notice and finding of financial responsibility.
The filing of the application stays collection action pending the entry
of a final administrative order;
(b) If both the responsible parent and the custodial parent fail to
file an application within twenty days, the notice and finding shall
become a final administrative order. The amounts for current and
future support and the support debt stated in the notice are final and
subject to collection, except as provided under (c) and (d) of this
subsection;
(c) If the responsible parent or custodial parent files the
application more than twenty days after, but within one year of the
date of service, the office of administrative hearings shall schedule
an adjudicative proceeding to hear the parent's or parents' objection
and determine the support obligation for the entire period covered by
the notice and finding of financial responsibility. The filing of the
application does not stay further collection action, pending the entry
of a final administrative order, and does not affect any prior
collection action;
(d) If the responsible parent or custodial parent files the
application more than one year after the date of service, the office of
administrative hearings shall schedule an adjudicative proceeding at
which the parent who requested the late hearing must show good cause
for failure to file a timely application. The filing of the
application does not stay future collection action and does not affect
prior collection action:
(i) If the presiding officer finds that good cause exists, the
presiding officer shall proceed to hear the parent's objection to the
notice and determine the support obligation;
(ii) If the presiding officer finds that good cause does not exist,
the presiding officer shall treat the application as a petition for
prospective modification of the amount for current and future support
established under the notice and finding. In the modification
proceeding, the presiding officer shall set current and future support
under chapter 26.19 RCW. The petitioning parent need show neither good
cause nor a substantial change of circumstances to justify modification
of current and future support;
(e) If the responsible parent's support obligation was based upon
imputed median net income, the grant standard, or the family need
standard, the division of child support may file an application for
adjudicative proceeding more than twenty days after the date of service
of the notice. The office of administrative hearings shall schedule an
adjudicative proceeding and provide notice of the hearing to the
responsible parent and the custodial parent. The presiding officer
shall determine the support obligation for the entire period covered by
the notice, based upon credible evidence presented by the division of
child support, the responsible parent, or the custodial parent, or may
determine that the support obligation set forth in the notice is
correct. The division of child support demonstrates good cause by
showing that the responsible parent's support obligation was based upon
imputed median net income, the grant standard, or the family need
standard. The filing of the application by the division of child
support does not stay further collection action, pending the entry of
a final administrative order, and does not affect any prior collection
action.
(f) The department shall retain and/or shall not refund support
money collected more than twenty days after the date of service of the
notice. Money withheld as the result of collection action shall be
delivered to the department. The department shall distribute such
money, as provided in published rules.
(5) If an application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed, the
presiding or reviewing officer shall determine the past liability and
responsibility, if any, of the alleged responsible parent and shall
also determine the amount of periodic payments to be made in the
future, which amount is not limited by the amount of any public
assistance payment made to or for the benefit of the child. If
deviating from the child support schedule in making these
determinations, the presiding or reviewing officer shall apply the
standards contained in the child support schedule and enter written
findings of fact supporting the deviation.
(6) If either the responsible parent or the custodial parent fails
to attend or participate in the hearing or other stage of an
adjudicative proceeding, upon a showing of valid service, the presiding
officer shall enter an order of default against each party who did not
appear and may enter an administrative order declaring the support debt
and payment provisions stated in the notice and finding of financial
responsibility to be assessed and determined and subject to collection
action. The parties who appear may enter an agreed settlement or
consent order, which may be different than the terms of the
department's notice. Any party who appears may choose to proceed to
the hearing, after the conclusion of which the presiding officer or
reviewing officer may enter an order that is different than the terms
stated in the notice, if the obligation is supported by credible
evidence presented by any party at the hearing.
(7) The final administrative order establishing liability and/or
future periodic support payments shall be superseded upon entry of a
superior court order for support to the extent the superior court order
is inconsistent with the administrative order.
(8) Debts determined pursuant to this section, accrued and not
paid, are subject to collection action under this chapter without
further necessity of action by a presiding or reviewing officer.
(9) The department has rule-making authority to enact rules
consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19) as
amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of 2005.
Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to implement
regulations required under parts 45 C.F.R. 302, 303, 304, 305, and 308.

Sec. 9 RCW 74.20A.056 and 2002 c 302 s 707 and 2002 c 199 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) If an alleged father has signed an affidavit acknowledging
paternity which has been filed with the state registrar of vital
statistics before July 1, 1997, the division of child support may serve
a notice and finding of parental responsibility on him and the
custodial parent. Procedures for and responsibility resulting from
acknowledgments filed after July 1, 1997, are in subsections (8) and
(9) of this section. Service of the notice shall be in the same manner
as a summons in a civil action or by certified mail, return receipt
requested, on the alleged father. The custodial parent shall be served
by first class mail to the last known address. If the custodial parent
is not the nonassistance applicant or public assistance recipient,
service shall be in the same manner as for the responsible parent. The
notice shall have attached to it a copy of the affidavit or
certification of birth record information advising of the existence of
a filed affidavit, provided by the state registrar of vital statistics,
and shall state that:
(a) Either or both parents are responsible for providing health
insurance for their child if coverage that can be extended to cover the
child is or becomes available to the parent through employment or is
union-related as provided under RCW 26.09.105;
(b) The alleged father or custodial parent may file an application
for an adjudicative proceeding at which they both will be required to
appear and show cause why the amount stated in the ((finding of
financial responsibility)) notice as to support is incorrect and should
not be ordered;
(((b))) (c) An alleged father or mother, if she is also the
custodial parent, may request that a blood or genetic test be
administered to determine whether such test would exclude him from
being a natural parent and, if not excluded, may subsequently request
that the division of child support initiate an action in superior court
to determine the existence of the parent-child relationship; and
(((c))) (d) If neither the alleged father nor the custodial parent
requests that a blood or genetic test be administered or ((file
[files])) files an application for an adjudicative proceeding, the
amount of support stated in the notice and finding of parental
responsibility shall become final, subject only to a subsequent
determination under RCW 26.26.500 through 26.26.630 that the parent-child relationship does not exist.
(2) An alleged father or custodial parent who objects to the amount
of support requested in the notice may file an application for an
adjudicative proceeding up to twenty days after the date the notice was
served. An application for an adjudicative proceeding may be filed
within one year of service of the notice and finding of parental
responsibility without the necessity for a showing of good cause or
upon a showing of good cause thereafter. An adjudicative proceeding
under this section shall be pursuant to RCW 74.20A.055. The only
issues shall be the amount of the accrued debt, the amount of the
current and future support obligation, and the reimbursement of the
costs of blood or genetic tests if advanced by the department. A
custodian who is not the parent of a child and who has physical custody
of a child has the same notice and hearing rights that a custodial
parent has under this section.
(3) If the application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed
within twenty days of service of the notice, collection action shall be
stayed pending a final decision by the department. If no application
is filed within twenty days:
(a) The amounts in the notice shall become final and the debt
created therein shall be subject to collection action; and
(b) Any amounts so collected shall neither be refunded nor returned
if the alleged father is later found not to be a responsible parent.
(4) An alleged father or the mother, if she is also the custodial
parent, may request that a blood or genetic test be administered at any
time. The request for testing shall be in writing, or as the
department may specify by rule, and served on the division of child
support. If a request for testing is made, the department shall
arrange for the test and, pursuant to rules adopted by the department,
may advance the cost of such testing. The department shall mail a copy
of the test results by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the
alleged father's and mother's, if she is also the custodial parent,
last known address.
(5) If the test excludes the alleged father from being a natural
parent, the division of child support shall file a copy of the results
with the state registrar of vital statistics and shall dismiss any
pending administrative collection proceedings based upon the affidavit
in issue. The state registrar of vital statistics shall remove the
alleged father's name from the birth certificate and change the child's
surname to be the same as the mother's maiden name as stated on the
birth certificate, or any other name which the mother may select.
(6) The alleged father or mother, if she is also the custodial
parent, may, within twenty days after the date of receipt of the test
results, request the division of child support to initiate an action
under RCW 26.26.500 through 26.26.630 to determine the existence of the
parent-child relationship. If the division of child support initiates
a superior court action at the request of the alleged father or mother
and the decision of the court is that the alleged father is a natural
parent, the parent who requested the test shall be liable for court
costs incurred.
(7) If the alleged father or mother, if she is also the custodial
parent, does not request the division of child support to initiate a
superior court action, or fails to appear and cooperate with blood or
genetic testing, the notice of parental responsibility shall become
final for all intents and purposes and may be overturned only by a
subsequent superior court order entered under RCW 26.26.500 through
26.26.630.
(8)(a) Subsections (1) through (7) of this section do not apply to
acknowledgments of paternity filed with the state registrar of vital
statistics after July 1, 1997.
(b) If an acknowledged father has signed an acknowledgment of
paternity that has been filed with the state registrar of vital
statistics after July 1, 1997:
(i) The division of child support may serve a notice and finding of
financial responsibility under RCW 74.20A.055 based on the
acknowledgment. The division of child support shall attach a copy of
the acknowledgment or certification of the birth record information
advising of the existence of a filed acknowledgment of paternity to the
notice;
(ii) The notice shall include a statement that the acknowledged
father or any other signatory may commence a proceeding in court to
rescind or challenge the acknowledgment or denial of paternity under
RCW 26.26.330 and 26.26.335; ((and))
(iii) A statement that either or both parents are responsible for
providing health insurance for his or her child if coverage that can be
extended to cover the child is or becomes available to the parent
through employment or is union-related as provided under RCW 26.09.105;
and
(iv) The party commencing the action to rescind or challenge the
acknowledgment or denial must serve notice on the division of child
support and the office of the prosecuting attorney in the county in
which the proceeding is commenced. Commencement of a proceeding to
rescind or challenge the acknowledgment or denial stays the
establishment of the notice and finding of financial responsibility, if
the notice has not yet become a final order.
(c) If neither the ((alleged)) acknowledged father nor the other
party to the notice files an application for an adjudicative proceeding
or the signatories to the acknowledgment or denial do not commence a
proceeding to rescind or challenge the acknowledgment of paternity, the
amount of support stated in the notice and finding of financial
responsibility becomes final, subject only to a subsequent
determination under RCW 26.26.500 through 26.26.630 that the parent-child relationship does not exist. The division of child support does
not refund nor return any amounts collected under a notice that becomes
final under this section or RCW 74.20A.055, even if a court later
determines that the acknowledgment is void.
(d) An acknowledged father or other party to the notice who objects
to the amount of support requested in the notice may file an
application for an adjudicative proceeding up to twenty days after the
date the notice was served. An application for an adjudicative
proceeding may be filed within one year of service of the notice and
finding of parental responsibility without the necessity for a showing
of good cause or upon a showing of good cause thereafter. An
adjudicative proceeding under this section shall be pursuant to RCW
74.20A.055. The only issues shall be the amount of the accrued debt
and the amount of the current and future support obligation.
(i) If the application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed
within twenty days of service of the notice, collection action shall be
stayed pending a final decision by the department.
(ii) If the application for an adjudicative proceeding is not filed
within twenty days of the service of the notice, any amounts collected
under the notice shall be neither refunded nor returned if the alleged
father is later found not to be a responsible parent.
(e) If neither the ((alleged)) acknowledged father nor the
custodial parent requests an adjudicative proceeding, or if no timely
action is brought to rescind or challenge the acknowledgment or denial
after service of the notice, the notice of financial responsibility
becomes final for all intents and purposes and may be overturned only
by a subsequent superior court order entered under RCW 26.26.500
through 26.26.630.
(9) Acknowledgments of paternity that are filed after July 1, 1997,
are subject to requirements of chapters 26.26, the uniform parentage
act, and 70.58 RCW.
(10) The department and the department of health may adopt rules to
implement the requirements under this section.
(11) The department has rule-making authority to enact rules
consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19) as
amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of 2005.
Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to implement
regulations required under parts 45 C.F.R. 302, 303, 304, 305, and 308.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---