BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW
to read as follows:
The department or a supervising agency shall provide the child's
foster parents, preadoptive parents, or other caregivers with notice of
their right to be heard prior to each proceeding held with respect to
the child in juvenile court under this chapter. The rights to notice
and to be heard apply only to persons with whom a child has been placed
by the supervising agency and who are providing care to the child at
the time of the proceeding. This section shall not be construed to
grant party status to any person solely on the basis of such notice and
right to be heard.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.060 and 2002 c 52 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A child taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.050 or
26.44.050 shall be immediately placed in shelter care. A child taken
by a relative of the child in violation of RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070
shall be placed in shelter care only when permitted under RCW
13.34.055.
(a) Unless there is reasonable cause to believe that the health,
safety, or welfare of the child would be jeopardized or that the
efforts to reunite the parent and child will be hindered, priority
placement for a child in shelter care shall be with any person
described in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a). The person must be willing and
available to care for the child and be able to meet any special needs
of the child. The person must be willing to facilitate the child's
visitation with siblings, if such visitation is part of the supervising
agency's plan or is ordered by the court. If a child is not initially
placed with a relative pursuant to this section, the supervising agency
shall make an effort within available resources to place the child with
a relative on the next business day after the child is taken into
custody. The supervising agency shall document its effort to place the
child with a relative pursuant to this section. Nothing within this
subsection (1)(a) establishes an entitlement to services or a right to
a particular placement.
(b) Whenever a child is taken into custody pursuant to this
section, the supervising agency may authorize evaluations of the
child's physical or emotional condition, routine medical and dental
examination and care, and all necessary emergency care. In no case may
a child who is taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.055, 13.34.050,
or 26.44.050 be detained in a secure detention facility. No child may
be held longer than seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and
holidays, after such child is taken into custody unless a court order
has been entered for continued shelter care. The child and his or her
parent, guardian, or custodian shall be informed that they have a right
to a shelter care hearing. The court shall hold a shelter care hearing
within seventy-two hours after the child is taken into custody,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. If a parent, guardian, or
legal custodian desires to waive the shelter care hearing, the court
shall determine, on the record and with the parties present, whether
such waiver is knowing and voluntary.
(2) Whenever a child is taken into custody by child protective
services pursuant to a court order issued under RCW 13.34.050 or when
child protective services is notified that a child has been taken into
custody pursuant to RCW 26.44.050 or 26.44.056, child protective
services shall make reasonable efforts to inform the parents, guardian,
or legal custodian of the fact that the child has been taken into
custody, the reasons why the child was taken into custody, and their
legal rights under this title as soon as possible and in no event shall
notice be provided more than twenty-four hours after the child has been
taken into custody or twenty-four hours after child protective services
has been notified that the child has been taken into custody. Child
protective services shall also inform the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian that if shelter care status is granted, the department will
obtain the child's medical, dental, mental health, and education
records. The notice of custody and rights may be given by any means
reasonably certain of notifying the parents including, but not limited
to, written, telephone, or in person oral notification. If the initial
notification is provided by a means other than writing, child
protective services shall make reasonable efforts to also provide
written notification.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.34.062 and 2004 c 147 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The written notice of custody and rights required by RCW
13.34.060 shall be in substantially the following form:

"NOTICE

Your child has been placed in temporary custody under the
supervision of Child Protective Services (or other person or agency).
You have important legal rights and you must take steps to protect your
interests.
1. A court hearing will be held before a judge within 72 hours of
the time your child is taken into custody excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
and holidays. You should call the court at (insert appropriate
phone number here) for specific information about the date, time,
and location of the court hearing.
2. You have the right to have a lawyer represent you at the
hearing. Your right to representation continues after the shelter care
hearing. You have the right to records the department intends to rely
upon. You may have the right to a copy of your child's medical,
dental, mental health, and education records. A lawyer can look at the
files in your case, talk to child protective services and other
agencies, tell you about the law, help you understand your rights, and
help you at hearings. If you cannot afford a lawyer, the court will
appoint one to represent you. To get a court-appointed lawyer you must
contact: (explain local procedure) .
3. At the hearing, you have the right to speak on your own behalf,
to introduce evidence, to examine witnesses, and to receive a decision
based solely on the evidence presented to the judge.
4. If your hearing occurs before a court commissioner, you have the
right to have the decision of the court commissioner reviewed by a
superior court judge. To obtain that review, you must, within ten days
after the entry of the decision of the court commissioner, file with
the court a motion for revision of the decision, as provided in RCW
2.24.050.
You should be present at any shelter care hearing. If you do not
come, the judge will not hear what you have to say.
You may call the Child Protective Services' caseworker for more
information about your child. The caseworker's name and telephone
number are: (insert name and telephone number) .
5. You have a right to a case conference to develop a written
service agreement following the shelter care hearing. The service
agreement may not conflict with the court's order of shelter care. You
may request that a multidisciplinary team, family group conference, or
prognostic staffing be convened for your child's case. You may
participate in these processes with your counsel present."

Upon receipt of the written notice, the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian shall acknowledge such notice by signing a receipt prepared
by child protective services. If the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian does not sign the receipt, the reason for lack of a signature
shall be written on the receipt. The receipt shall be made a part of
the court's file in the dependency action.
If after making reasonable efforts to provide notification, child
protective services is unable to determine the whereabouts of the
parents, guardian, or legal custodian, the notice shall be delivered or
sent to the last known address of the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian.
(2) If child protective services is not required to give notice
under RCW 13.34.060(2) and subsection (1) of this section, the juvenile
court counselor assigned to the matter shall make all reasonable
efforts to advise the parents, guardian, or legal custodian of the time
and place of any shelter care hearing, request that they be present,
and inform them of their basic rights as provided in RCW 13.34.090.
(3) Reasonable efforts to advise and to give notice, as required in
RCW 13.34.060(2) and subsections (1) and (2) of this section, shall
include, at a minimum, investigation of the whereabouts of the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian. If such reasonable efforts are not
successful, or the parent, guardian, or legal custodian does not appear
at the shelter care hearing, the petitioner shall testify at the
hearing or state in a declaration:
(a) The efforts made to investigate the whereabouts of, and to
advise, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian; and
(b) Whether actual advice of rights was made, to whom it was made,
and how it was made, including the substance of any oral communication
or copies of written materials used.
(4) The court shall hear evidence regarding notice given to, and
efforts to notify, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian and shall
examine the need for shelter care. The court shall hear evidence
regarding the efforts made to place the child with a relative. The
court shall make an express finding as to whether the notice required
under RCW 13.34.060(2) and subsections (1) and (2) of this section was
given to the parent, guardian, or legal custodian. All parties have
the right to present testimony to the court regarding the need or lack
of need for shelter care. Hearsay evidence before the court regarding
the need or lack of need for shelter care must be supported by sworn
testimony, affidavit, or declaration of the person offering such
evidence.
(5)(a) A shelter care order issued pursuant to RCW 13.34.065 shall
include the requirement for a case conference as provided in RCW
13.34.067. However, if the parent is not present at the shelter care
hearing, or does not agree to the case conference, the court shall not
include the requirement for the case conference in the shelter care
order.
(b) If the court orders a case conference, the shelter care order
shall include notice to all parties and establish the date, time, and
location of the case conference which shall be no later than thirty
days prior to the fact-finding hearing.
(c) The court may order a conference or meeting as an alternative
to the case conference required under RCW 13.34.067 so long as the
conference or meeting ordered by the court meets all requirements under
RCW 13.34.067, including the requirement of a written agreement
specifying the services to be provided to the parent.
(6) A shelter care order issued pursuant to RCW 13.34.065 may be
amended at any time with notice and hearing thereon. The shelter care
decision of placement shall be modified only upon a showing of change
in circumstances. No child may be placed in shelter care for longer
than thirty days without an order, signed by the judge, authorizing
continued shelter care.
(7) Any parent, guardian, or legal custodian who for good cause is
unable to attend the initial shelter care hearing may request that a
subsequent shelter care hearing be scheduled. The request shall be
made to the clerk of the court where the petition is filed prior to the
initial shelter care hearing. Upon the request of the parent, the
court shall schedule the hearing within seventy-two hours of the
request, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. The clerk shall
notify all other parties of the hearing by any reasonable means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW
to read as follows:
If a child is placed in the custody of the department or other
supervising agency immediately following the shelter care hearing, a
separate order and authorization regarding health care and education
records for the child shall be entered. The order shall provide the
department or other supervising agency with the right to inspect and
copy all health, medical, mental health, and education records of the
child and shall authorize and direct any agency, hospital, doctor,
nurse, dentist, orthodontist, or other health care provider, therapist,
drug or alcohol treatment provider, psychologist, psychiatrist, or
mental health clinic, or health or medical records custodian or
document management company, or school or school organization to permit
the supervising agency to inspect and to obtain copies of any records
of the child involved in the case, without the further consent of the
parent or guardian of the child. The order shall further grant the
supervising agency or its designee the authority and responsibility,
where applicable, to:
(1) Notify the child's school that the child is in out-of-home
placement;
(2) Enroll the child in school;
(3) Request the school transfer records;
(4) Request and authorize evaluation of special needs;
(5) Attend parent or teacher conferences;
(6) Excuse absences;
(7) Grant permission for extracurricular activities;
(8) Authorize medications which need to be administered during
school hours and sign for medical needs that arise during school hours;
and
(9) Complete or update school emergency records.

Sec. 5 RCW 13.34.138 and 2005 c 512 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for children whose cases are reviewed by a citizen
review board under chapter 13.70 RCW, the status of all children found
to be dependent shall be reviewed by the court at least every six
months from the beginning date of the placement episode or the date
dependency is established, whichever is first, at a hearing in which it
shall be determined whether court supervision should continue. The
initial review hearing shall be an in-court review and shall be set six
months from the beginning date of the placement episode or no more than
ninety days from the entry of the disposition order, whichever comes
first. The initial review hearing may be a permanency planning hearing
when necessary to meet the time frames set forth in RCW 13.34.145(3) or
13.34.134. The review shall include findings regarding the agency and
parental completion of disposition plan requirements, and if necessary,
revised permanency time limits. This review shall consider both the
agency's and parent's efforts that demonstrate consistent measurable
progress over time in meeting the disposition plan requirements. The
requirements for the initial review hearing, including the in-court
requirement, shall be accomplished within existing resources. ((The
supervising agency shall provide a foster parent, preadoptive parent,
or relative with notice of, and their right to an opportunity to be
heard in, a review hearing pertaining to the child, but only if that
person is currently providing care to that child at the time of the
hearing. This section shall not be construed to grant party status to
any person who has been provided an opportunity to be heard.))
(a) A child shall not be returned home at the review hearing unless
the court finds that a reason for removal as set forth in RCW 13.34.130
no longer exists. The parents, guardian, or legal custodian shall
report to the court the efforts they have made to correct the
conditions which led to removal. If a child is returned, casework
supervision shall continue for a period of six months, at which time
there shall be a hearing on the need for continued intervention.
(b) If the child is not returned home, the court shall establish in
writing:
(i) Whether reasonable services have been provided to or offered to
the parties to facilitate reunion, specifying the services provided or
offered;
(ii) Whether the child has been placed in the least-restrictive
setting appropriate to the child's needs, including whether
consideration and preference has been given to placement with the
child's relatives, and whether both in-state and, where appropriate,
out-of-state placements have been considered;
(iii) Whether there is a continuing need for placement and whether
the placement is appropriate;
(iv) Whether there has been compliance with the case plan by the
child, the child's parents, and the agency supervising the placement;
(v) Whether progress has been made toward correcting the problems
that necessitated the child's placement in out-of-home care;
(vi) Whether the parents have visited the child and any reasons why
visitation has not occurred or has been infrequent;
(vii) Whether additional services, including housing assistance,
are needed to facilitate the return of the child to the child's
parents; if so, the court shall order that reasonable services be
offered specifying such services; and
(viii) The projected date by which the child will be returned home
or other permanent plan of care will be implemented.
(c) The court at the review hearing may order that a petition
seeking termination of the parent and child relationship be filed.
(2)(a) In any case in which the court orders that a dependent child
may be returned to or remain in the child's home, the in-home placement
shall be contingent upon the following:
(i) The compliance of the parents with court orders related to the
care and supervision of the child, including compliance with an agency
case plan; and
(ii) The continued participation of the parents, if applicable, in
available substance abuse or mental health treatment if substance abuse
or mental illness was a contributing factor to the removal of the
child.
(b) The following may be grounds for removal of the child from the
home, subject to review by the court:
(i) Noncompliance by the parents with the agency case plan or court
order;
(ii) The parent's inability, unwillingness, or failure to
participate in available services or treatment for themselves or the
child, including substance abuse treatment if a parent's substance
abuse was a contributing factor to the abuse or neglect; or
(iii) The failure of the parents to successfully and substantially
complete available services or treatment for themselves or the child,
including substance abuse treatment if a parent's substance abuse was
a contributing factor to the abuse or neglect.
(3) The court's ability to order housing assistance under RCW
13.34.130 and this section is: (a) Limited to cases in which
homelessness or the lack of adequate and safe housing is the primary
reason for an out-of-home placement; and (b) subject to the
availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose.
(4) The court shall consider the child's relationship with siblings
in accordance with RCW 13.34.130(3).

Sec. 6 RCW 13.34.145 and 2003 c 227 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A permanency plan shall be developed no later than sixty days
from the time the supervising agency assumes responsibility for
providing services, including placing the child, or at the time of a
hearing under RCW 13.34.130, whichever occurs first. The permanency
planning process continues until a permanency planning goal is achieved
or dependency is dismissed. The planning process shall include
reasonable efforts to return the child to the parent's home.
(a) Whenever a child is placed in out-of-home care pursuant to RCW
13.34.130, the agency that has custody of the child shall provide the
court with a written permanency plan of care directed towards securing
a safe, stable, and permanent home for the child as soon as possible.
The plan shall identify one of the following outcomes as the primary
goal and may also identify additional outcomes as alternative goals:
Return of the child to the home of the child's parent, guardian, or
legal custodian; adoption; guardianship; permanent legal custody; long-term relative or foster care, until the child is age eighteen, with a
written agreement between the parties and the care provider; a
responsible living skills program; and independent living, if
appropriate and if the child is age sixteen or older and the provisions
of subsection (2) of this section are met. The plan shall state
whether both in-state and, where appropriate, out-of-state placement
options have been considered by the agency.
(b) The identified outcomes and goals of the permanency plan may
change over time based upon the circumstances of the particular case.
(c) Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the earliest
possible date, preferably before the child has been in out-of-home care
for fifteen months. In cases where parental rights have been
terminated, the child is legally free for adoption, and adoption has
been identified as the primary permanency planning goal, it shall be a
goal to complete the adoption within six months following entry of the
termination order.
(d) For purposes related to permanency planning:
(i) "Guardianship" means a dependency guardianship, a legal
guardianship pursuant to chapter 11.88 RCW, or equivalent laws of
another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.
(ii) "Permanent custody order" means a custody order entered
pursuant to chapter 26.10 RCW.
(iii) "Permanent legal custody" means legal custody pursuant to
chapter 26.10 RCW or equivalent laws of another state or of a federally
recognized Indian tribe.
(2) Whenever a permanency plan identifies independent living as a
goal, the plan shall also specifically identify the services that will
be provided to assist the child to make a successful transition from
foster care to independent living. Before the court approves
independent living as a permanency plan of care, the court shall make
a finding that the provision of services to assist the child in making
a transition from foster care to independent living will allow the
child to manage his or her financial, personal, social, educational,
and nonfinancial affairs. The department shall not discharge a child
to an independent living situation before the child is eighteen years
of age unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64
RCW.
(3) A permanency planning hearing shall be held in all cases where
the child has remained in out-of-home care for at least nine months and
an adoption decree, guardianship order, or permanent custody order has
not previously been entered. The hearing shall take place no later
than twelve months following commencement of the current placement
episode.
(4) Whenever a child is removed from the home of a dependency
guardian or long-term relative or foster care provider, and the child
is not returned to the home of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian
but is placed in out-of-home care, a permanency planning hearing shall
take place no later than twelve months, as provided in subsection (3)
of this section, following the date of removal unless, prior to the
hearing, the child returns to the home of the dependency guardian or
long-term care provider, the child is placed in the home of the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian, an adoption decree, guardianship order,
or a permanent custody order is entered, or the dependency is
dismissed.
(5) No later than ten working days prior to the permanency planning
hearing, the agency having custody of the child shall submit a written
permanency plan to the court and shall mail a copy of the plan to all
parties and their legal counsel, if any.
(6) At the permanency planning hearing, the court shall enter
findings as required by RCW 13.34.138 and shall review the permanency
plan prepared by the agency. If the child has resided in the home of
a foster parent or relative for more than six months prior to the
permanency planning hearing, the court shall also enter a finding
regarding whether the foster parent or relative was informed of the
hearing as required in RCW 74.13.280 and 13.34.138. If a goal of long-term foster or relative care has been achieved prior to the permanency
planning hearing, the court shall review the child's status to
determine whether the placement and the plan for the child's care
remain appropriate. In cases where the primary permanency planning
goal has not been achieved, the court shall inquire regarding the
reasons why the primary goal has not been achieved and determine what
needs to be done to make it possible to achieve the primary goal. In
all cases, the court shall:
(a)(i) Order the permanency plan prepared by the agency to be
implemented; or
(ii) Modify the permanency plan, and order implementation of the
modified plan; and
(b)(i) Order the child returned home only if the court finds that
a reason for removal as set forth in RCW 13.34.130 no longer exists; or
(ii) Order the child to remain in out-of-home care for a limited
specified time period while efforts are made to implement the
permanency plan.
(7) If the court orders the child returned home, casework
supervision shall continue for at least six months, at which time a
review hearing shall be held pursuant to RCW 13.34.138, and the court
shall determine the need for continued intervention.
(8) The juvenile court may hear a petition for permanent legal
custody when: (a) The court has ordered implementation of a permanency
plan that includes permanent legal custody; and (b) the party pursuing
the permanent legal custody is the party identified in the permanency
plan as the prospective legal custodian. During the pendency of such
proceeding, the court shall conduct review hearings and further
permanency planning hearings as provided in this chapter. At the
conclusion of the legal guardianship or permanent legal custody
proceeding, a juvenile court hearing shall be held for the purpose of
determining whether dependency should be dismissed. If a guardianship
or permanent custody order has been entered, the dependency shall be
dismissed.
(9) Continued juvenile court jurisdiction under this chapter shall
not be a barrier to the entry of an order establishing a legal
guardianship or permanent legal custody when the requirements of
subsection (8) of this section are met.
(10) Following the first permanency planning hearing, the court
shall hold a further permanency planning hearing in accordance with
this section at least once every twelve months until a permanency
planning goal is achieved or the dependency is dismissed, whichever
occurs first.
(11) Except as provided in RCW 13.34.235, the status of all
dependent children shall continue to be reviewed by the court at least
once every six months, in accordance with RCW 13.34.138, until the
dependency is dismissed. Prior to the second permanency planning
hearing, the agency that has custody of the child shall consider
whether to file a petition for termination of parental rights.
(12) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the ability
of the agency that has custody of the child to file a petition for
termination of parental rights or a guardianship petition at any time
following the establishment of dependency. Upon the filing of such a
petition, a fact-finding hearing shall be scheduled and held in
accordance with this chapter unless the agency requests dismissal of
the petition prior to the hearing or unless the parties enter an agreed
order terminating parental rights, establishing guardianship, or
otherwise resolving the matter.
(13) The approval of a permanency plan that does not contemplate
return of the child to the parent does not relieve the supervising
agency of its obligation to provide reasonable services, under this
chapter, intended to effectuate the return of the child to the parent,
including but not limited to, visitation rights. The court shall
consider the child's relationships with siblings in accordance with RCW
13.34.130.
(14) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the
procedural due process rights of any party in a termination or
guardianship proceeding filed under this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.13.280 and 2001 c 318 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 70.24.105, whenever a child is placed
in out-of-home care by the department or a child-placing agency, the
department or agency shall share the most recent information available
about the child and the child's family with the care provider and shall
consult with the care provider regarding the child's case plan. If the
child is dependent pursuant to a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW,
the department or agency shall keep the care provider informed
regarding the dates and location of dependency review and permanency
planning hearings pertaining to the child.
(2) Any person who receives information about a child or a child's
family pursuant to this section shall keep the information confidential
and shall not further disclose or disseminate the information except as
authorized by law. Such individuals shall agree in writing to keep the
information that they receive confidential and shall affirm that the
information will not be further disclosed or disseminated, except as
authorized by law.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the
authority of the department or child-placing agencies to disclose
client information or to maintain client confidentiality as provided by
law.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.13.285 and 2000 c 88 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within available resources, the department shall prepare a
passport containing all known and available information concerning the
mental, physical, health, and educational status of the child for any
child who has been in a foster home for ninety consecutive days or
more. The passport shall contain education records obtained pursuant
to RCW 28A.150.510. The passport shall be provided to a foster parent
at any placement of a child covered by this section. The department
shall update the passport during the regularly scheduled court reviews
required under chapter 13.34 RCW.
New placements after July 1, 1997, shall have first priority in the
preparation of passports. Within available resources, the department
may prepare passports for any child in a foster home on July 1, 1997,
provided that no time spent in a foster home before July 1, 1997, shall
be included in the computation of the ninety days.
(2) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section, the department shall, within available resources, notify a
foster parent before placement of a child of any known health
conditions that pose a serious threat to the child and any known
behavioral history that presents a serious risk of harm to the child or
others.
(3) The department shall hold harmless the provider for any
unauthorized disclosures caused by the department.
(4) Any foster parent who receives information about a child or a
child's family pursuant to this section shall keep the information
confidential and shall not further disclose or disseminate the
information, except as authorized by law. Such individuals shall agree
in writing to keep the information that they receive confidential and
shall affirm that the information will not be further disclosed or
disseminated, except as authorized by law.

--- END ---