BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2005 c 313 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA,
AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,052,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,756,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,279,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,829,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,300,000))
$3,300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,316,000))
$49,316,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In order to qualify for state planning funds available to
regional transportation planning organizations under this section, a
regional transportation planning organization containing any county
with a population in excess of one million shall provide voting
membership on its executive board to any incorporated principal city of
a metropolitan statistical area within the region, as designated by the
United States census bureau, and to any incorporated city within the
region with a population in excess of eighty thousand as of July 1,
2005. Additionally, a regional transportation planning organization
described under this subsection shall conduct a review of its executive
board membership criteria to ensure that the criteria appropriately
reflects a true and comprehensive representation of the organization's
jurisdictions of significance within the region.
(2) $175,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department to support the
processing and analysis of the backlog of city and county collision
reports by January 2006. The amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse if federal funds become available for this purpose.
(3) $150,000 of the multimodal transportation account-- state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1565. If Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1565 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) The department of transportation shall evaluate the number of
spaces available for long-haul truck parking relative to current and
projected future needs. The department of transportation shall also
explore options for augmenting the number of spaces available,
including, but not limited to, expanding state-owned rest areas or
modifying regulations governing the use of these facilities, utilizing
weigh stations and park and ride lots, and encouraging the expansion of
the private sector's role. Finally, the department shall explore the
utility of coordinating with neighboring states on long-haul truck
parking and evaluate methodologies for alleviating any air quality
issues relative to the issue. The department must report to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005, on
the options, strategies, and recommendations for long-haul truck
parking.
(5) $50,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for evaluating high-speed passenger
transportation facilities and services, including rail or magnetic
levitation transportation systems, to connect airports as a means to
more efficiently utilize airport capacity, as well as connect major
population and activity centers. This evaluation shall be coordinated
with the airport capacity and facilities market analysis conducted
pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121 and results of
the evaluation shall be submitted by July 1, 2007. If Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, or if
federal funds are not received by March 1, 2006, for the purpose of
implementing Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $700,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for completing funding for a route development plan of
U.S. route 2.
(7) The department shall conduct a study of the resources allocated
to each of the seven department regions and the corresponding
workloads. Given the magnitude of the investments in the Puget Sound
region, particular emphasis shall be given to reviewing the resources
allocated and corresponding workloads with respect to the urban
corridors region and the northwest region. Based on the results of
this study, the department shall submit recommendations by December 1,
2006, to the legislature and the office of financial management
regarding reallocating resources and revising regional boundaries
within the department, as appropriate, in order to better coincide
allocated resources with designated regional boundaries.
(8) $750,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementing Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2871. If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2871 is
not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse. The regional transportation commission's duties to
develop, complete, and submit a governance proposal to the 2007
legislature are highly time sensitive. As a result, the legislature
finds that competitive bidding is not cost-effective or appropriate for
personal service contracts entered into by the commission, and that the
director of the office of financial management should, by the
director's authority under RCW 39.29.011(5), exempt any such personal
service contract from the competitive bidding requirements of chapter
39.29 RCW.
(9) (($2,300,000)) (a) $3,300,000 of the transportation partnership
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the costs of the
regional transportation investment district (RTID) and department of
transportation project oversight. The department shall provide support
from its urban corridors region to assist in preparing project costs,
expenditure plans, and modeling. The department shall not deduct a
management reserve, nor charge management or overhead fees. These
funds are provided as a loan to the RTID and shall be repaid to the
state motor vehicle account within one year following the certification
of the election results related to the RTID.
(b) If an advisory ballot measure is submitted to the city voters
of the city in which the Alaskan Way viaduct and Seattle Seawall
replacement project is to be constructed, soliciting voter preference
of the alternatives applicable to the project, then the department
shall reimburse the appropriate jurisdiction for the election costs
related to submission of the ballot measure.
(10) $100,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2)
and 46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department solely to conduct
an analysis of expanding the transportation concurrency requirements
prescribed under the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW, to
include development impacts on level of service standards applicable to
state-owned transportation facilities, including state highways and
state ferry routes. The objective of the analysis is to determine how
to ensure that jurisdictional divisions do not defeat growth management
act concurrency goals. The department shall convene a committee to
oversee the analysis, with the committee comprised of, at a minimum,
four members of the transportation committees of the legislature, four
members of the appropriate land use committees of the legislature, and
one member each from the association of Washington cities and the
Washington state association of counties, or a designee thereof. The
completed study, including recommendations, must be submitted to the
appropriate standing committees of the legislature, and to the office
of financial management, by December 1, 2006.
(11) The department of transportation, the Washington state
economic revenue forecast council, and the office of financial
management shall review and adopt a method of forecasting motor vehicle
and special fuel prices, revenue, and the amount of consumption that
has an increased rate of accuracy as compared to the existing method.
The three agencies shall submit a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2006, outlining the
methods researched and the criteria utilized to select and adopt the
new fuel forecasting method.
(12) $150,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a transportation demand management
program, developed by the Whatcom council of governments, to further
reduce drive-alone trips and maximize the use of sustainable
transportation choices. The community based program must focus on all
trips, not only commute trips, by providing education, assistance, and
incentives to four target audiences: (a) Large work sites; (b)
employees of businesses in downtown areas; (c) school children; and (d)
residents of Bellingham.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---