BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 50.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon termination, dissolution, or abandonment of a corporate or
limited liability company business, any officer, member, manager, or
other person having control or supervision of payment of unemployment
tax contributions under RCW 50.24.010 or 50.24.014, or who is
responsible for the filing of reports or the payment of contributions
or payments in lieu of contributions, is personally liable for any
unpaid contributions and interest and penalties on those contributions
if such officer or other person willfully fails to pay or to cause to
be paid any contributions due to the department from the corporation or
limited liability company business under this title. For purposes of
this section, "willfully fails to pay or to cause to be paid" means
that the failure is the result of an intentional, conscious, and
voluntary course of action.
(2) Persons liable under subsection (1) of this section are liable
only for contributions that became due during the period he or she had
the control, supervision, responsibility, or duty to act for the
corporation or limited liability company, plus interest and penalties
on those contributions.
(3) Persons liable under subsection (1) of this section are exempt
from liability if the nonpayment of contributions was beyond their
control as determined by the employment security department by rule.
In making this determination, the department shall consider, but not be
limited to, such factors as the death, illness, or personal financial
situation of the person liable under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Persons liable under subsection (1) of this section are exempt
from liability if all of the assets of the corporation or limited
liability company have been applied to its debts through bankruptcy or
receivership.
(5) Any person having been issued a notice of assessment under this
section is entitled to the appeal procedures under chapter 50.32 RCW.
(6) This section applies only when the employment security
department determines that there is no reasonable means of collecting
the contributions owed directly from the corporation or limited
liability company.
(7) This section does not relieve the corporation or limited
liability company of other tax liabilities under this title or impair
other tax collection remedies afforded by law.
(8) Collection authority and procedures described in this chapter
apply to collections under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.04.080 and 1985 c 41 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Employer" means any individual or type of organization, including
any partnership, association, trust, estate, joint stock company,
insurance company, limited liability company, or corporation, whether
domestic or foreign, or the receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, trustee,
or the legal representative of a deceased person, having any person in
employment or, having become an employer, has not ceased to be an
employer as provided in this title.
For the purposes of collection remedies available under chapter
50.24 RCW, "employer," in the case of a corporation or limited
liability company, includes persons found personally liable for any
unpaid contributions and interest and penalties on those contributions
under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---