BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that a skilled
work force is essential for employers and job seekers to compete in
today's global economy. The engines of economic progress are fueled by
education and training. The legislature further finds that industry
skill panels are a critical and proven form of public-private
partnership that harness the expertise of leaders in business, labor,
and education to identify work force development strategies for
industries that drive Washington's regional economies. Industry skill
panels foster innovation and enable industry leaders and public
partners to be proactive, addressing changing needs for businesses
quickly and strategically. Industry skill panels leverage small state
investments with private sector investments to ensure that public
resources are better aligned with industry needs.
(2) The legislature further finds that industry skill panels
support other valuable initiatives such as the department of community,
trade, and economic development's cluster-based economic development
grants; the community and technical college centers of excellence,
high-demand funds, and the job skills program; and the employment
security department's incumbent worker training funds. Industry skill
panels provide a framework for coordinating these and other investments
in line with economic and work force development strategies identified
by industry leaders. It is the intent of the legislature to support
the development and maintenance of industry skill panels in key sectors
of the economy as an efficient and effective way to support regional
economic development.

Sec. 2 RCW 28C.18.010 and 1996 c 99 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this title.
(1) "Board" means the work force training and education
coordinating board.
(2) "Director" means the director of the work force training and
education coordinating board.
(3) "Training system" means programs and courses of secondary
vocational education, technical college programs and courses, community
college vocational programs and courses, private career school and
college programs and courses, employer-sponsored training, adult basic
education programs and courses, programs and courses funded by the
((job training partnership)) federal workforce investment act, programs
and courses funded by the federal vocational act, programs and courses
funded under the federal adult education act, publicly funded programs
and courses for adult literacy education, and apprenticeships, and
programs and courses offered by private and public nonprofit
organizations that are representative of communities or significant
segments of communities and provide job training or adult literacy
services.
(4) "Work force skills" means skills developed through applied
learning that strengthen and reinforce an individual's academic
knowledge, critical thinking, problem solving, and work ethic and,
thereby, develop the employability, occupational skills, and management
of home and work responsibilities necessary for economic independence.
(5) "Vocational education" means organized educational programs
offering a sequence of courses which are directly related to the
preparation or retraining of individuals in paid or unpaid employment
in current or emerging occupations requiring other than a baccalaureate
or advanced degree. Such programs shall include competency-based
applied learning which contributes to an individual's academic
knowledge, higher-order reasoning, and problem-solving skills, work
attitudes, general employability skills, and the occupational-specific
skills necessary for economic independence as a productive and
contributing member of society. Such term also includes applied
technology education.
(6) "Adult basic education" means instruction designed to achieve
mastery of skills in reading, writing, oral communication, and
computation at a level sufficient to allow the individual to function
effectively as a parent, worker, and citizen in the United States,
commensurate with that individual's actual ability level, and includes
English as a second language and preparation and testing service for
the general education development exam.
(7) "Industry skill panel" means a regional partnership of
business, labor, and education leaders that identifies skill gaps in a
key economic cluster and enables the industry and public partners to
respond to and be proactive in addressing workforce skill needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funding provided for the purposes of this section,
the board, in consultation with the state board for community and
technical colleges, the department of community, trade, and economic
development, and the employment security department, shall allocate
grants on a competitive basis to establish and support industry skill
panels.
(2) Eligible applicants for the grants allocated under this section
include, but are not limited to, work force development councils,
community and technical colleges, economic development councils,
private career schools, chambers of commerce, trade associations, and
apprenticeship councils.
(3) Entities applying for a grant under this section shall provide
an employer match of at least twenty-five percent to be eligible. The
local match may include in-kind services.
(4) It shall be the role of industry skill panels funded under this
chapter to enable businesses in the industry to address work force
skill needs. Industry skill panels shall identify work force
strategies to meet the needs in order to benefit employers and workers
across the industry. Examples of strategies include, but are not
limited to: Developing career guidance materials; producing or
updating skill standards and curricula; designing training programs and
courses; developing technical assessments and certifications; arranging
employer mentoring, tutoring, and internships; identifying private
sector assistance in providing faculty or equipment to training
providers; and organizing industry conferences disseminating best
practices. The products and services of particular skill panels shall
depend upon the needs of the industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall establish industry skill panel standards that
identify the expectations for industry skill panel products and
services. The board shall establish the standards in consultation with
labor, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
employment security department, the institute of workforce development
and economic sustainability, and the department of community, trade,
and economic development. Continued funding of particular industry
skill panels shall be based on meeting the standards established by the
board under this section. Beginning December 1, 2008, the board shall
report annually to the governor and the economic development and higher
education committees of the legislature on the results of the industry
skill panels funded under this chapter in meeting the standards.

--- END ---