BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.230.120 and 2003 c 234 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) School districts shall issue diplomas to students signifying
graduation from high school upon the students' satisfactory completion
of all local and state graduation requirements. Districts shall grant
students the option of receiving a final transcript in addition to the
regular diploma.
(2) School districts or schools of attendance shall establish
policies and procedures to notify senior students of the transcript
option and shall direct students to indicate their decisions in a
timely manner. School districts shall make appropriate provisions to
assure that students who choose to receive a copy of their final
transcript shall receive such transcript after graduation.
(3)(a) A school district may issue a high school diploma to a
person who:
(i) Is an honorably discharged member of the armed forces of the
United States; and
(ii) ((Was scheduled to graduate from high school in the years 1940
through 1955; and
(iii))) Left high school before graduation to serve in ((World War
II or the Korean conflict)) the United States armed forces.
(b) A school district may issue a diploma to or on behalf of a
person otherwise eligible under (a) of this subsection notwithstanding
the fact that the person holds a high school equivalency certification
or is deceased.
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt a form for
a diploma application to be used by a veteran or a person acting on
behalf of a deceased veteran under this subsection (3). The
superintendent of public instruction shall specify what constitutes
acceptable evidence of eligibility for a diploma.

--- END ---