BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.18.110 and 2000 c 79 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall disapprove any such form of policy,
application, rider, or endorsement, or withdraw any previous approval
thereof, only:
(a) If it is in any respect in violation of or does not comply with
this code or any applicable order or regulation of the commissioner
issued pursuant to the code; or
(b) If it does not comply with any controlling filing theretofore
made and approved; or
(c) If it contains or incorporates by reference any inconsistent,
ambiguous or misleading clauses, or exceptions and conditions which
unreasonably or deceptively affect the risk purported to be assumed in
the general coverage of the contract; or
(d) If it has any title, heading, or other indication of its
provisions which is misleading; or
(e) If purchase of insurance thereunder is being solicited by
deceptive advertising.
(2) In addition to the grounds for disapproval of any such form as
provided in subsection (1) of this section, the commissioner may
disapprove any form of disability insurance policy((, except an
individual health benefit plan,)) if the benefits provided therein are
unreasonable in relation to the premium charged. Rates, or any
modification of rates, for individual health benefit plans may not be
used until sixty days after they are filed with the commissioner.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.44.020 and 2000 c 79 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any health care service contractor may enter into contracts
with or for the benefit of persons or groups of persons which require
prepayment for health care services by or for such persons in
consideration of such health care service contractor providing one or
more health care services to such persons and such activity shall not
be subject to the laws relating to insurance if the health care
services are rendered by the health care service contractor or by a
participating provider.
(2) The commissioner may on examination, subject to the right of
the health care service contractor to demand and receive a hearing
under chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW, disapprove any individual or group
contract form for any of the following grounds:
(a) If it contains or incorporates by reference any inconsistent,
ambiguous or misleading clauses, or exceptions and conditions which
unreasonably or deceptively affect the risk purported to be assumed in
the general coverage of the contract; or
(b) If it has any title, heading, or other indication of its
provisions which is misleading; or
(c) If purchase of health care services thereunder is being
solicited by deceptive advertising; or
(d) If it contains unreasonable restrictions on the treatment of
patients; or
(e) If it violates any provision of this chapter; or
(f) If it fails to conform to minimum provisions or standards
required by regulation made by the commissioner pursuant to chapter
34.05 RCW; or
(g) If any contract for health care services with any state agency,
division, subdivision, board, or commission or with any political
subdivision, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation
fails to comply with state law.
(3) In addition to the grounds listed in subsection (2) of this
section, the commissioner may disapprove any group contract if the
benefits provided therein are unreasonable in relation to the amount
charged for the contract. Rates, or any modification of rates, for
individual health benefit plans may not be used until sixty days after
they are filed with the commissioner.
(4)(a) Every contract between a health care service contractor and
a participating provider of health care services shall be in writing
and shall state that in the event the health care service contractor
fails to pay for health care services as provided in the contract, the
enrolled participant shall not be liable to the provider for sums owed
by the health care service contractor. Every such contract shall
provide that this requirement shall survive termination of the
contract.
(b) No participating provider, agent, trustee, or assignee may
maintain any action against an enrolled participant to collect sums
owed by the health care service contractor.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.46.060 and 2000 c 79 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any health maintenance organization may enter into agreements
with or for the benefit of persons or groups of persons, which require
prepayment for health care services by or for such persons in
consideration of the health maintenance organization providing health
care services to such persons. Such activity is not subject to the
laws relating to insurance if the health care services are rendered
directly by the health maintenance organization or by any provider
which has a contract or other arrangement with the health maintenance
organization to render health services to enrolled participants.
(2) All forms of health maintenance agreements issued by the
organization to enrolled participants or other marketing documents
purporting to describe the organization's comprehensive health care
services shall comply with such minimum standards as the commissioner
deems reasonable and necessary in order to carry out the purposes and
provisions of this chapter, and which fully inform enrolled
participants of the health care services to which they are entitled,
including any limitations or exclusions thereof, and such other rights,
responsibilities and duties required of the contracting health
maintenance organization.
(3) Subject to the right of the health maintenance organization to
demand and receive a hearing under chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW, the
commissioner may disapprove an individual or group agreement form for
any of the following grounds:
(a) If it contains or incorporates by reference any inconsistent,
ambiguous, or misleading clauses, or exceptions or conditions which
unreasonably or deceptively affect the risk purported to be assumed in
the general coverage of the agreement;
(b) If it has any title, heading, or other indication which is
misleading;
(c) If purchase of health care services thereunder is being
solicited by deceptive advertising;
(d) If it contains unreasonable restrictions on the treatment of
patients;
(e) If it is in any respect in violation of this chapter or if it
fails to conform to minimum provisions or standards required by the
commissioner by rule under chapter 34.05 RCW; or
(f) If any agreement for health care services with any state
agency, division, subdivision, board, or commission or with any
political subdivision, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal
corporation fails to comply with state law.
(4) In addition to the grounds listed in subsection (2) of this
section, the commissioner may disapprove any ((group)) agreement if the
benefits provided therein are unreasonable in relation to the amount
charged for the agreement. Rates, or any modification of rates, for
individual health benefit plans may not be used until sixty days after
they are filed with the commissioner.
(5) No health maintenance organization authorized under this
chapter shall cancel or fail to renew the enrollment on any basis of an
enrolled participant or refuse to transfer an enrolled participant from
a group to an individual basis for reasons relating solely to age, sex,
race, or health status. Nothing contained herein shall prevent
cancellation of an agreement with enrolled participants (a) who violate
any published policies of the organization which have been approved by
the commissioner, or (b) who are entitled to become eligible for
medicare benefits and fail to enroll for a medicare supplement plan
offered by the health maintenance organization and approved by the
commissioner, or (c) for failure of such enrolled participant to pay
the approved charge, including cost-sharing, required under such
contract, or (d) for a material breach of the health maintenance
agreement.
(6) No agreement form or amendment to an approved agreement form
shall be used unless it is first filed with the commissioner.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.20.025 and 2003 c 248 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Claims" means the cost to the insurer of health care services,
as defined in RCW 48.43.005, provided to a policyholder or paid to or
on behalf of the policyholder in accordance with the terms of a health
benefit plan, as defined in RCW 48.43.005. This includes capitation
payments or other similar payments made to providers for the purpose of
paying for health care services for a policyholder.
(b) "Claims reserves" means: (i) The liability for claims which
have been reported but not paid; (ii) the liability for claims which
have not been reported but which may reasonably be expected; (iii)
active life reserves; and (iv) additional claims reserves whether for
a specific liability purpose or not.
(c) "Declination rate" for an insurer means the percentage of the
total number of applicants for individual health benefit plans received
by that insurer in the aggregate in the applicable year which are not
accepted for enrollment by that insurer based on the results of the
standard health questionnaire administered pursuant to RCW
48.43.018(2)(a).
(d) "Earned premiums" means premiums, as defined in RCW 48.43.005,
plus any rate credits or recoupments less any refunds, for the
applicable period, whether received before, during, or after the
applicable period.
(((d))) (e) "Incurred claims expense" means claims paid during the
applicable period plus any increase, or less any decrease, in the
claims reserves.
(((e))) (f) "Loss ratio" means incurred claims expense as a
percentage of earned premiums.
(((f))) (g) "Reserves" means: (i) Active life reserves; and (ii)
additional reserves whether for a specific liability purpose or not.
(2) ((An insurer shall file, for informational purposes only, a
notice of its schedule of rates for its individual health benefit plans
with the commissioner prior to use.
(3))) An insurer ((shall)) must file ((with the notice required
under subsection (2) of this section)) supporting documentation of its
method of determining the rates charged((. The commissioner may
request only)) for its individual health benefit plans. At a minimum,
the insurer must provide the following supporting documentation:
(a) A description of the insurer's rate-making methodology;
(b) An actuarially determined estimate of incurred claims which
includes the experience data, assumptions, and justifications of the
insurer's projection;
(c) The percentage of premium attributable in aggregate for
nonclaims expenses used to determine the adjusted community rates
charged; and
(d) A certification by a member of the American academy of
actuaries, or other person approved by the commissioner, that the
adjusted community rate charged can be reasonably expected to result in
a loss ratio that meets or exceeds the loss ratio standard
((established in subsection (7) of this section)) of seventy-four
percent, minus the premium tax rate applicable to the insurer's
individual health benefit plans under RCW 48.14.020.
(((4) The commissioner may not disapprove or otherwise impede the
implementation of the filed rates.
(5))) (3) By the last day of May each year any insurer issuing or
renewing individual health benefit plans in this state during the
preceding calendar year shall file for review by the commissioner
supporting documentation of its actual loss ratio and its actual
declination rate for its individual health benefit plans offered or
renewed in the state in aggregate for the preceding calendar year. The
filing shall include aggregate earned premiums, aggregate incurred
claims, and a certification by a member of the American academy of
actuaries, or other person approved by the commissioner, that the
actual loss ratio has been calculated in accordance with accepted
actuarial principles.
(a) At the expiration of a thirty-day period beginning with the
date the filing is received by the commissioner, the filing shall be
deemed approved unless prior thereto the commissioner contests the
calculation of the actual loss ratio.
(b) If the commissioner contests the calculation of the actual loss
ratio, the commissioner shall state in writing the grounds for
contesting the calculation to the insurer.
(c) Any dispute regarding the calculation of the actual loss ratio
shall, upon written demand of either the commissioner or the insurer,
be submitted to hearing under chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW.
(((6))) (4) If the actual loss ratio for the preceding calendar
year is less than the loss ratio established in subsection (((7))) (5)
of this section, a remittance is due and the following shall apply:
(a) The insurer shall calculate a percentage of premium to be
remitted to the Washington state health insurance pool by subtracting
the actual loss ratio for the preceding year from the loss ratio
established in subsection (((7))) (5) of this section.
(b) The remittance to the Washington state health insurance pool is
the percentage calculated in (a) of this subsection, multiplied by the
premium earned from each enrollee in the previous calendar year.
Interest shall be added to the remittance due at a five percent annual
rate calculated from the end of the calendar year for which the
remittance is due to the date the remittance is made.
(c) All remittances shall be aggregated and such amounts shall be
remitted to the Washington state high risk pool to be used as directed
by the pool board of directors.
(d) Any remittance required to be issued under this section shall
be issued within thirty days after the actual loss ratio is deemed
approved under subsection (((5))) (3)(a) of this section or the
determination by an administrative law judge under subsection (((5)))
(3)(c) of this section.
(((7))) (5) The loss ratio applicable to this section shall be
((seventy-four percent)) the percentage set forth in the following
schedule that correlates to the health care service contractor's actual
declination rate in the preceding year, minus the premium tax rate
applicable to the insurer's individual health benefit plans under RCW
48.14.020.

Actual Declination Rate Loss Ratio

Under Six Percent (6%) Seventy-Four Percent (74%)

Six Percent (6%) or more (but less than Seven Percent) Seventy-Five Percent (75%)

Seven Percent (7%) or more (but less than Eight Percent) Seventy-Six Percent (76%)

Eight Percent (8%) or more Seventy-Seven Percent (77%)

Sec. 5 RCW 48.44.017 and 2001 c 196 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Claims" means the cost to the health care service contractor
of health care services, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, provided to a
contract holder or paid to or on behalf of a contract holder in
accordance with the terms of a health benefit plan, as defined in RCW
48.43.005. This includes capitation payments or other similar payments
made to providers for the purpose of paying for health care services
for an enrollee.
(b) "Claims reserves" means: (i) The liability for claims which
have been reported but not paid; (ii) the liability for claims which
have not been reported but which may reasonably be expected; (iii)
active life reserves; and (iv) additional claims reserves whether for
a specific liability purpose or not.
(c) "Declination rate" for an insurer means the percentage of the
total number of applicants for individual health benefit plans received
by that insurer in the aggregate in the applicable year which are not
accepted for enrollment by that insurer based on the results of the
standard health questionnaire administered pursuant to RCW
48.43.018(2)(a).
(d) "Earned premiums" means premiums, as defined in RCW 48.43.005,
plus any rate credits or recoupments less any refunds, for the
applicable period, whether received before, during, or after the
applicable period.
(((d))) (e) "Incurred claims expense" means claims paid during the
applicable period plus any increase, or less any decrease, in the
claims reserves.
(((e))) (f) "Loss ratio" means incurred claims expense as a
percentage of earned premiums.
(((f))) (g) "Reserves" means: (i) Active life reserves; and (ii)
additional reserves whether for a specific liability purpose or not.
(2) ((A health care service contractor shall file, for
informational purposes only, a notice of its schedule of rates for its
individual contracts with the commissioner prior to use.
(3))) A health care service contractor ((shall)) must file ((with
the notice required under subsection (2) of this section)) supporting
documentation of its method of determining the rates charged((. The
commissioner may request only)) for its individual contracts. At a
minimum, the health care service contractor must provide the following
supporting documentation:
(a) A description of the health care service contractor's rate-making methodology;
(b) An actuarially determined estimate of incurred claims which
includes the experience data, assumptions, and justifications of the
health care service contractor's projection;
(c) The percentage of premium attributable in aggregate for
nonclaims expenses used to determine the adjusted community rates
charged; and
(d) A certification by a member of the American academy of
actuaries, or other person approved by the commissioner, that the
adjusted community rate charged can be reasonably expected to result in
a loss ratio that meets or exceeds the loss ratio standard
((established in subsection (7) of this section)) of seventy-four
percent, minus the premium tax rate applicable to the insurer's
individual health benefit plans under RCW 48.14.020.
(((4) The commissioner may not disapprove or otherwise impede the
implementation of the filed rates.
(5))) (3) By the last day of May each year any health care service
contractor issuing or renewing individual health benefit plans in this
state during the preceding calendar year shall file for review by the
commissioner supporting documentation of its actual loss ratio and its
actual declination rate for its individual health benefit plans offered
or renewed in this state in aggregate for the preceding calendar year.
The filing shall include aggregate earned premiums, aggregate incurred
claims, and a certification by a member of the American academy of
actuaries, or other person approved by the commissioner, that the
actual loss ratio has been calculated in accordance with accepted
actuarial principles.
(a) At the expiration of a thirty-day period beginning with the
date the filing is received by the commissioner, the filing shall be
deemed approved unless prior thereto the commissioner contests the
calculation of the actual loss ratio.
(b) If the commissioner contests the calculation of the actual loss
ratio, the commissioner shall state in writing the grounds for
contesting the calculation to the health care service contractor.
(c) Any dispute regarding the calculation of the actual loss ratio
shall upon written demand of either the commissioner or the health care
service contractor be submitted to hearing under chapters 48.04 and
34.05 RCW.
(((6))) (4) If the actual loss ratio for the preceding calendar
year is less than the loss ratio standard established in subsection
(((7))) (5) of this section, a remittance is due and the following
shall apply:
(a) The health care service contractor shall calculate a percentage
of premium to be remitted to the Washington state health insurance pool
by subtracting the actual loss ratio for the preceding year from the
loss ratio established in subsection (((7))) (5) of this section.
(b) The remittance to the Washington state health insurance pool is
the percentage calculated in (a) of this subsection, multiplied by the
premium earned from each enrollee in the previous calendar year.
Interest shall be added to the remittance due at a five percent annual
rate calculated from the end of the calendar year for which the
remittance is due to the date the remittance is made.
(c) All remittances shall be aggregated and such amounts shall be
remitted to the Washington state high risk pool to be used as directed
by the pool board of directors.
(d) Any remittance required to be issued under this section shall
be issued within thirty days after the actual loss ratio is deemed
approved under subsection (((5))) (3)(a) of this section or the
determination by an administrative law judge under subsection (((5)))
(3)(c) of this section.
(((7))) (5) The loss ratio applicable to this section shall be
((seventy-four percent)) the percentage set forth in the following
schedule that correlates to the health care service contractor's actual
declination rate in the preceding year, minus the premium tax rate
applicable to the health care service contractor's individual health
benefit plans under RCW 48.14.0201.

Actual Declination Rate Loss Ratio

Under Six Percent (6%) Seventy-Four Percent (74%)

Six Percent (6%) or more (but less than Seven Percent) Seventy-Five Percent (75%)

Seven Percent (7%) or more (but less than Eight Percent) Seventy-Six Percent (76%)

Eight Percent (8%) or more Seventy-Seven Percent (77%)

Sec. 6 RCW 48.46.062 and 2001 c 196 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Claims" means the cost to the health maintenance organization
of health care services, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, provided to an
enrollee or paid to or on behalf of the enrollee in accordance with the
terms of a health benefit plan, as defined in RCW 48.43.005. This
includes capitation payments or other similar payments made to
providers for the purpose of paying for health care services for an
enrollee.
(b) "Claims reserves" means: (i) The liability for claims which
have been reported but not paid; (ii) the liability for claims which
have not been reported but which may reasonably be expected; (iii)
active life reserves; and (iv) additional claims reserves whether for
a specific liability purpose or not.
(c) "Declination rate" for an insurer means the percentage of the
total number of applicants for individual health benefit plans received
by that insurer in the aggregate in the applicable year which are not
accepted for enrollment by that insurer based on the results of the
standard health questionnaire administered pursuant to RCW
48.43.018(2)(a).
(d) "Earned premiums" means premiums, as defined in RCW 48.43.005,
plus any rate credits or recoupments less any refunds, for the
applicable period, whether received before, during, or after the
applicable period.
(((d))) (e) "Incurred claims expense" means claims paid during the
applicable period plus any increase, or less any decrease, in the
claims reserves.
(((e))) (f) "Loss ratio" means incurred claims expense as a
percentage of earned premiums.
(((f))) (g) "Reserves" means: (i) Active life reserves; and (ii)
additional reserves whether for a specific liability purpose or not.
(2) ((A health maintenance organization shall file, for
informational purposes only, a notice of its schedule of rates for its
individual agreements with the commissioner prior to use.
(3))) A health maintenance organization ((shall)) must file ((with
the notice required under subsection (2) of this section)) supporting
documentation of its method of determining the rates charged((. The
commissioner may request only)) for its individual agreements. At a
minimum, the health maintenance organization must provide the following
supporting documentation:
(a) A description of the health maintenance organization's rate-making methodology;
(b) An actuarially determined estimate of incurred claims which
includes the experience data, assumptions, and justifications of the
health maintenance organization's projection;
(c) The percentage of premium attributable in aggregate for
nonclaims expenses used to determine the adjusted community rates
charged; and
(d) A certification by a member of the American academy of
actuaries, or other person approved by the commissioner, that the
adjusted community rate charged can be reasonably expected to result in
a loss ratio that meets or exceeds the loss ratio standard
((established in subsection (7) of this section)) of seventy-four
percent, minus the premium tax rate applicable to the insurer's
individual health benefit plans under RCW 48.14.020.
(((4) The commissioner may not disapprove or otherwise impede the
implementation of the filed rates.
(5))) (3) By the last day of May each year any health maintenance
organization issuing or renewing individual health benefit plans in
this state during the preceding calendar year shall file for review by
the commissioner supporting documentation of its actual loss ratio and
its actual declination rate for its individual health benefit plans
offered or renewed in the state in aggregate for the preceding calendar
year. The filing shall include aggregate earned premiums, aggregate
incurred claims, and a certification by a member of the American
academy of actuaries, or other person approved by the commissioner,
that the actual loss ratio has been calculated in accordance with
accepted actuarial principles.
(a) At the expiration of a thirty-day period beginning with the
date the filing is received by the commissioner, the filing shall be
deemed approved unless prior thereto the commissioner contests the
calculation of the actual loss ratio.
(b) If the commissioner contests the calculation of the actual loss
ratio, the commissioner shall state in writing the grounds for
contesting the calculation to the health maintenance organization.
(c) Any dispute regarding the calculation of the actual loss ratio
shall, upon written demand of either the commissioner or the health
maintenance organization, be submitted to hearing under chapters 48.04
and 34.05 RCW.
(((6))) (4) If the actual loss ratio for the preceding calendar
year is less than the loss ratio standard established in subsection
(((7))) (5) of this section, a remittance is due and the following
shall apply:
(a) The health maintenance organization shall calculate a
percentage of premium to be remitted to the Washington state health
insurance pool by subtracting the actual loss ratio for the preceding
year from the loss ratio established in subsection (((7))) (5) of this
section.
(b) The remittance to the Washington state health insurance pool is
the percentage calculated in (a) of this subsection, multiplied by the
premium earned from each enrollee in the previous calendar year.
Interest shall be added to the remittance due at a five percent annual
rate calculated from the end of the calendar year for which the
remittance is due to the date the remittance is made.
(c) All remittances shall be aggregated and such amounts shall be
remitted to the Washington state high risk pool to be used as directed
by the pool board of directors.
(d) Any remittance required to be issued under this section shall
be issued within thirty days after the actual loss ratio is deemed
approved under subsection (((5))) (3)(a) of this section or the
determination by an administrative law judge under subsection (((5)))
(3)(c) of this section.
(((7))) (5) The loss ratio applicable to this section shall be
((seventy-four percent)) the percentage set forth in the following
schedule that correlates to the health maintenance organization's
actual declination rate in the preceding year, minus the premium tax
rate applicable to the health maintenance organization's individual
health benefit plans under RCW 48.14.0201.

Actual Declination Rate Loss Ratio

Under Six Percent (6%) Seventy-Four Percent (74%)

Six Percent (6%) or more (but less than Seven Percent) Seventy-Five Percent (75%)

Seven Percent (7%) or more (but less than Eight Percent) Seventy-Six Percent (76%)

Eight Percent (8%) or more Seventy-Seven Percent (77%)

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The insurance commissioner's ability to
review and disapprove rates for individual products, as established in
sections 1 through 6 of this act, expires January 1, 2012.

--- END ---