BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission may name or rename state transportation
facilities including, but not limited to: State highways; state
highway bridges, structures, and facilities; state rest areas; and
state roadside facilities, such as viewpoints. The commission must
consult with the department before taking final action to name or
rename a state transportation facility.
(2)(a) The department, state and local governmental entities,
citizen organizations, and any person may initiate the process to name
or rename a state transportation facility.
(b) For the commission to consider a naming or renaming proposal,
the requesting entity or person must provide sufficient evidence, as
determined by the commission, indicating community support and
acceptance of the proposal. Evidence may include the following:
(i) Letters of support from state and federal legislators
representing the impacted area encompassing the state transportation
facility;
(ii) Resolutions passed by local, publicly elected bodies in the
impacted area encompassing the state transportation facility;
(iii) Department support; or
(iv) Supportive actions by or letters from local organizations
including, but not limited to, local chambers of commerce and service
clubs.
(3) After the commission takes final action in naming or renaming
a state transportation facility, the department shall design and
install the appropriate signs in accordance with state and federal
standards.

--- END ---