BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide a large number of underserved children with quality
opportunities to directly experience the natural world. It is the
legislature's intent to create a program to improve children's overall
academic performance, self-esteem, personal responsibility, community
involvement, personal health, and understanding of nature. Further it
is the intent of the legislature that the program empower local
communities to engage children in outdoor education and recreation
experiences.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The outdoor education and recreation grant program is hereby
created, subject to the availability of funds in the outdoor education
and recreation account. The commission shall establish and implement
the program by rule to provide opportunities for public agencies,
private nonprofit organizations, formal school programs, nonformal
after-school programs, and community-based programs to receive grants
from the account. Programs that provide outdoor education
opportunities to schools shall be fully aligned with the state's
essential academic learning requirements.
(2) The program shall be phased in beginning with the schools and
students with the greatest needs in suburban, rural, and urban areas of
the state. The program shall focus on students who qualify for free
and reduced-price lunch, who are most likely to fail academically, or
who have the greatest potential to drop out of school.
(3) The director shall set priorities and develop criteria for the
awarding of grants to outdoor environmental, ecological, agricultural,
or other natural resource-based education and recreation programs
considering at least the following:
(a) Programs that contribute to the reduction of academic failure
and dropout rates;
(b) Programs that make use of research-based, effective
environmental, ecological, agricultural, or other natural resource-based education curriculum;
(c) Programs that contribute to healthy life styles through outdoor
recreation and sound nutrition;
(d) Various Washington state parks as venues and use of the
commission's personnel as a resource;
(e) Programs that maximize the number of participants that can be
served;
(f) Programs that will commit matching and in-kind resources;
(g) Programs that create partnerships with public and private
entities;
(h) Programs that provide children with opportunities to directly
experience and understand nature and the natural world; and
(i) Programs that include ongoing program evaluation, assessment,
and reporting of their effectiveness.
(4) The director shall create an advisory committee to assist and
advise the commission in the development and administration of the
outdoor education and recreation program. The director should solicit
representation on the committee from the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, the department of fish and wildlife, the
business community, outdoor organizations with an interest in
education, and any others the commission deems sufficient to ensure a
cross section of stakeholders. When the director creates such an
advisory committee, its members shall be reimbursed from the outdoor
education and recreation program account for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) The outdoor education and recreation program account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. Funds deposited in the outdoor
education and recreation program account shall be transferred only to
the commission to be used solely for the commission's outdoor education
and recreation program purposes identified in this section including
the administration of the program. The director may accept gifts,
grants, donations, or moneys from any source for deposit in the outdoor
education and recreation program account. Any public agency in this
state may develop and implement outdoor education and recreation
programs. The director may make grants to public agencies and contract
with any public or private agency or person to develop and implement
outdoor education and recreation programs. The outdoor education and
recreation program account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

--- END ---