BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
recognize that as the world changes, expectations for students evolve
to reflect current workforce and societal demands. To prepare students
to be competitive in the global market, classrooms should meet the new,
heightened expectations of higher education institutions and
businesses. The educational system should reflect our increasingly
diverse society and remain relevant and accessible to all students to
keep them engaged as active participants in their own learning
experience. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to require
an ongoing and regular review of the essential academic learning
requirements in order to refine and revise the standards as necessary
to keep them modern and relevant.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.070 and 2005 c 497 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
essential academic learning requirements that identify the knowledge
and skills all public school students need to know and be able to do
based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, develop student
assessments, and implement the accountability recommendations and
requests regarding assistance, rewards, and recognition of the state
board of education.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) ((Periodically revise the essential academic learning
requirements)) Beginning in 2007, review the essential academic
learning requirements, including a review of their cultural relevancy,
every ten years, in order to ensure that they continue to promote the
goals of the basic education act and reflect the knowledge and skills
needed in the modern world, including the ability to apply and use
emerging technologies, and revise them, as needed, based on the student
learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210. In conducting its review for
cultural relevancy, the superintendent shall gather feedback from, at
a minimum, communities of color stakeholders, the multiethnic think
tank, the special education coalition, the Washington state association
on multicultural education, the Washington state commissions on
African-American affairs, Asian Pacific American affairs, and Hispanic
affairs, and the governor's office of Indian affairs. Goals one and
two shall be considered primary. To the maximum extent possible, the
superintendent shall integrate goal four and the knowledge and skill
areas in the other goals in the essential academic learning
requirements; and
(b) Review and prioritize the essential academic learning
requirements and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the
grade level content expectations to be assessed on the Washington
assessment of student learning and used for state or federal
accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and
identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an
emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content
expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content
expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of
expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing
depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and
reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven
working days, shall post on its web site any grade level content
expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing
the Washington assessment of student learning.
(3) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to
develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the
content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science for use in
the elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if
each student has mastered the essential academic learning requirements
identified in subsection (1) of this section. School districts shall
administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. The academic assessment system
shall include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.
(4) The superintendent shall report the findings of its review of
the essential academic learning requirements as required under
subsection 2(a) of this section to the state board of education, the
governor, and the legislature. The first report is due December 1,
2008. If the superintendent proposes any modification to the essential
academic learning requirements or the statewide assessments, then the
superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for the
education committees of the house of representatives and the senate to
review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential
academic learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.
(5)(a) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results
under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate
instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational
support for students who have not mastered the essential academic
learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.
(b) Assessments measuring the essential academic learning
requirements in the content area of science shall be available for
mandatory use in middle schools and high schools by the 2003-04 school
year and for mandatory use in elementary schools by the 2004-05 school
year unless the legislature takes action to delay or prevent
implementation of the assessment.
(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics
shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to
determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content
areas from one school year to the next.
(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide
educational support to individual students, the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance
information as possible within the constraints of the assessment
system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school
districts:
(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may
provide additional achievement information for individual students; and
(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to
evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall
be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and
easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily
shared with parents and students.
(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(11) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of special education students when developing the
assessments under this section.
(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(13) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site
lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts,
and health and fitness.

--- END ---