BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.505 and 2003 c 41 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person applying for a special endorsement of a driver's
license authorizing such person to drive a two or three-wheeled
motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle shall pay a fee of five dollars,
which is not refundable. In addition, the endorsement fee for the
initial motorcycle endorsement shall not exceed ten dollars, and the
subsequent renewal endorsement fee shall not exceed twenty-five
dollars, unless the endorsement is renewed or extended for a period
other than five years, in which case the subsequent renewal endorsement
fee shall not exceed five dollars for each year that the endorsement is
renewed or extended. ((The initial and renewal endorsement)) Fees
collected under this section shall be deposited in the motorcycle
safety education account of the highway safety fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.81A.020 and 2003 c 41 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall administer and enforce the law pertaining to
the motorcycle skills education program as set forth in this chapter.
(2) The director may adopt and enforce reasonable rules that are
consistent with this chapter.
(3) The director shall revise the Washington motorcycle safety
program to:
(a) Institute separate novice and advanced motorcycle skills
education courses for both two-wheeled and three-wheeled motorcycles
that are each a minimum of eight hours and no more than sixteen hours
at a cost of (i) no more than fifty dollars for Washington state
residents under the age of eighteen, and (ii) no more than one hundred
twenty-five dollars for Washington state residents who are eighteen
years of age or older and military personnel of any age stationed in
Washington state;
(b) Encourage the use of loaned or used motorcycles for use in the
motorcycle skills education course if the instructor approves them;
(c) Require all instructors for two-wheeled motorcycles to conduct
at least three classes in a one-year period, and all instructors for
three-wheeled motorcycles to conduct at least one class in a one-year
period, to maintain their teaching eligibility((;
(d) Encourage the use of radio or intercom equipped helmets when,
in the opinion of the instructor, radio or intercom equipped helmets
improve the quality of instruction)).
(4) The department may enter into agreements to review and certify
that a private motorcycle skills education course meets educational
standards equivalent to those required of courses conducted under the
motorcycle skills education program. An agreement entered into under
this subsection must provide that the department may conduct periodic
audits to ensure that educational standards continue to meet those
required for courses conducted under the motorcycle skills education
program, and that the costs of the review, certification, and audit
process will be borne by the party seeking certification.
(5) The department shall obtain and compile information from
applicants for a motorcycle endorsement regarding whether they have
completed a state approved or certified motorcycle skills education
course.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.82.420 and 2006 c 219 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The advisory committee shall consult with the department in the
development and maintenance of a basic minimum required curriculum and
the department shall furnish to each qualifying applicant for an
instructor's license or a driver training school license a copy of such
curriculum.
(2) In addition to information on the safe, lawful, and responsible
operation of motor vehicles on the state's highways, the basic minimum
required curriculum shall include information on:
(a) Intermediate driver's license issuance, passenger and driving
restrictions and sanctions for violating the restrictions, and the
effect of traffic violations and collisions on the driving privileges;
(b) The effects of alcohol and drug use on motor vehicle operators,
including information on drug and alcohol related traffic injury and
mortality rates in the state of Washington and the current penalties
for driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol; and
(c) Motorcycle awareness, approved by the ((Motorcycle Safety
Foundation)) director, to ensure new operators of motor vehicles have
been instructed in the importance of safely sharing the road with
motorcyclists.
(3) Should the director be presented with acceptable proof that any
licensed instructor or driver training school is not showing proper
diligence in teaching such basic minimum curriculum as required, the
instructor or school shall be required to appear before the advisory
committee and show cause why the license of the instructor or school
should not be revoked for such negligence. If the committee does not
accept such reasons as may be offered, the director may revoke the
license of the instructor or school, or both.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.220.080 and 2004 c 126 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall include information
on motorcycle awareness, approved by the ((Motorcycle Safety
Foundation)) director of licensing, in instructional material used in
traffic safety education courses, to ensure new operators of motor
vehicles have been instructed in the importance of safely sharing the
road with motorcyclists.

--- END ---