BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Federal and state law require the balancing
of the privacy interests of individuals with the government's interest
in the protection of children and vulnerable adults. The legislature
finds that the balancing of these interests may be skewed in favor of
the privacy rights of individuals. Therefore, a work group is created
to research the current laws regarding background checks for
prospective employees of public and private entities which work with
vulnerable adults or children. The legislature finds that a
comprehensive background check which includes both civil and criminal
information is a valuable tool in safeguarding vulnerable adults and
children from preventable risk.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of social and health
services shall convene a work group to review the current federal and
state laws and administrative rules and practices with respect to
sharing confidential information.
(2)(a) The work group shall include but not be limited to the
following members, chosen by the chief executive officer of each
entity:
(i) A representative of the department of social and health
services;
(ii) A representative of the department of early learning;
(iii) A representative of the department of health;
(iv) A representative of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction;
(v) A representative of the department of licensing;
(vi) A representative of the Washington state patrol;
(vii) A representative from the Washington state bar association's
civil rights committee;
(viii) A representative of the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs;
(ix) A representative of the Washington association of criminal
defense attorneys;
(x) Two representatives from the superior court judges association,
including a superior court judge and a court commissioner who is
familiar with adult protective services or child protective services
cases;
(xi) A representative from the administrative office of the courts;
and
(xii) A representative from the department of information services.
(b) The work group shall also include as nonvoting ex officio
members:
(i) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate; and
(ii) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(c) Additional voting members may be invited to participate as
determined by the work group.
(3) Appointments to the work group shall be completed within thirty
days of the effective date of this section.
(4) The work group may form an executive committee, create
subcommittees, designate alternative representatives, and define other
procedures, as needed, for operation of the work group.
(5) Legislative members of the work group shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except
those representing an employee or organization, are entitled to be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(6) The secretary of the department of social and health services
or the secretary's designee shall serve as chair of the work group.
(7) The department of social and health services shall provide
staff support to the work group.
(8) The work group shall:
(a) Provide an interim report to the legislature and the governor
by December 1, 2007; and
(b) Make recommendations to the legislature and the governor by
July 1, 2008, regarding improving current processes for sharing
information, including but not limited to the feasibility of creating
a clearinghouse of information.
(9) This section expires November 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---