BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Protecting the well-being, tranquility, and
privacy of the home is of the highest order in a free and civilized
society; and the efficient conduct of private businesses and government
operations are of significant government interest. The legislature
finds that automatic dialing and announcing devices uniquely intrude
into these interests.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.36.400 and 1986 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((As used in this section:)) The definitions in this subsection
apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) ((An)) "Automatic dialing and announcing device" ((is)) means
a device which automatically dials telephone numbers and plays a
recorded message once a connection is made.
(b) "Commercial solicitation" means the unsolicited initiation of
a telephone conversation for the purpose of encouraging a person to
purchase property, goods, or services.
(c) "Message" means any communication, regardless of its content,
that is not a commercial solicitation as defined in this subsection.
(2) No person may use an automatic dialing and announcing device
for purposes of commercial solicitation. This section applies to all
commercial solicitation intended to be received by telephone customers
within the state.
(3) ((A violation of this section is a violation of chapter 19.86
RCW. It shall be presumed that damages to the recipient of commercial
solicitations made using an automatic dialing and announcing device are
five hundred dollars.
(4))) No person may use an automatic dialing and announcing device
before 9:00 a.m. or after 9:00 p.m.
(4) This section does not apply to the following:
(a) Messages from federal, state, or local government entities or
municipal corporations;
(b) Messages from schools to their students, parents, guardians, or
employees;
(c) Messages from businesses to their employees;
(d) Messages to called parties with whom the caller has a current
business or personal relationship if the message is for purposes other
than commercial solicitation; or
(e) Messages concerning an emergency affecting public safety.
(5) This section applies to all calls intended to be received by
telephone customers within the state.
(6) A recipient of a message from an automatic dialing and
announcing device may bring an action against a person who has violated
this section for the amount of one thousand dollars per violation.
(7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the
Washington utilities and transportation commission from adopting
additional rules regulating automatic dialing and announcing devices.
(8) No person or entity may use an automatic dialing and announcing
device unless:
(a) The called party has given written or electronic consent to
receive the message; or
(b) The recorded message is immediately preceded by a live operator
who obtains the called party's consent before the message is played.
(9) All messages delivered by an automatic dialing and announcing
device must begin with the following information:
(a) The name and contact information of the person or entity for
which the message is being made;
(b) The purpose of the message; and
(c) If applicable, the fact that the message intends to solicit
payment, donation, or commitment of funds.
(10) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this
section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A
violation of this section is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---