BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.128 and 1993 c 2 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
Public funds, whether derived through taxes, fees, penalties, or
any other sources, shall not be used to finance political campaigns for
state ((or local)) or school district office. A county, city, town, or
district that establishes a program to publicly finance local political
campaigns may only use funds derived from local sources to fund the
program. A local government must submit any proposal for public
financing of local political campaigns to voters for their adoption and
approval or rejection.

--- END ---