BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Educational opportunity is a primary concern
of military families. Availability of educational opportunity is a
significant factor in readiness and retention of service personnel. It
is known that service personnel most appreciate public efforts to
assist their families during their service, especially service
overseas. Military spouses may suddenly find themselves primarily
responsible for family income. The citizens of Washington state owe a
debt of gratitude to those who serve in the Washington state national
guard and extend this gratitude to our residents who serve in the
reserves and on active duty in the United States military. It is
intended that the dollars for military scholars program created in
section 2 of this act will be administered by a nonprofit corporation
such as ThanksUSA.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A postsecondary education grant program, known as the dollars
for military scholars program, is created.
(2) To be eligible for a postsecondary education grant under this
section, an applicant must:
(a) Be a:
(i) Veteran who is a resident of Washington who is on active
military or national guard duty, or the spouse or dependent of the
veteran; or
(ii) Veteran who is on active military or national guard duty
stationed in the state, or the spouse or dependent of the veteran;
(b) Be applying for a two or four-year institution of higher
education or a vocational or technical school degree or certification
program in Washington;
(c) Demonstrate a financial need as the grants are need-based; and
(d) Recognize that extra evaluative points will be awarded for
those working toward math, science, engineering, or non-English
language studies.
(3)(a) The grant program shall be administered by a nonprofit
organization organized under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue
code that provides college, technical, and vocational scholarships to
spouses and dependents of veterans and active members of the United
States armed forces.
(b) Need-based, postsecondary scholarship grants in amounts of
between one thousand and five thousand dollars each shall be made
available to persons who meet the eligibility requirements of this
section.
(4) The program administrator shall:
(a) Guarantee that all appropriated funds, excluding ten percent of
the funds allowable each year for operational expenses, shall go to
residents of Washington state or those active duty military personnel
stationed at a Washington state military base;
(b) Partner with scholarship America for scholarship application
processing and support;
(c) Make every reasonable effort to advertise the availability of
this scholarship widely to ensure all allowable applicants are aware of
the availability of this scholarship program; and
(d) Provide annual, audited financial statements to the fiscal
committees of the legislature.
(5) This section may be known and cited as the Washington state
dollars for military scholars act.

--- END ---