BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that traffic
congestion reduces personal and freight mobility and is detrimental to
the economy, air quality, and the quality of life throughout the
central Puget Sound area. Effective transportation solutions are
essential for the future growth and development of the central Puget
Sound area and the welfare of its citizens.
The legislature further finds that investments in both transit and
road improvements are necessary to relieve traffic congestion and to
improve mobility. The transportation improvements proposed by regional
transportation investment districts and regional transit authorities
within the central Puget Sound region form integral parts of, and are
naturally and necessarily related to, a single regional transportation
system. The construction of road and transit projects in a
comprehensive and interrelated manner will help reduce transportation
congestion, increase road capacity, promote safety, facilitate
mobility, and improve the health, welfare, and safety of the citizens
of Washington.
The legislature further finds that under RCW 81.112.030 and
36.120.170 regional transportation investment districts and regional
transit authorities are required to submit to the voters propositions
for their respective transportation plans on the same ballot at the
2007 general election and that the opportunity to propose a single
ballot reflecting a comprehensive, systemic, and interrelated approach
to regional transportation would further the legislative intent and
provide voters with an easier and more efficient method of expressing
their will.
It is therefore the policy and intent of the state of Washington
that transportation plans required to be submitted for voter approval
at the 2007 general election by a regional transportation investment
district and a regional transit authority must be submitted to voters
in single ballot question seeking approval of both plans.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.120.070 and 2006 c 311 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning no sooner than the 2007 general election, two or more
contiguous county legislative authorities, or a single county
legislative authority as provided under RCW 36.120.030(8), upon receipt
of the regional transportation investment plan under RCW 36.120.040,
may submit to the voters of the proposed district a single ballot
((measure)) proposition that approves formation of the district,
approves the regional transportation investment plan, and approves the
revenue sources necessary to finance the plan. For a county to
participate in the plan, the county legislative authority shall, within
ninety days after receiving the plan, adopt an ordinance indicating the
county's participation. The planning committee may draft the ballot
((measure)) proposition on behalf of the county legislative
authorities, and the county legislative authorities may give notice as
required by law for ballot ((measures)) propositions, and perform other
duties as required to submit the ((measure)) proposition to the voters
of the proposed district for their approval or rejection. Counties may
negotiate interlocal agreements necessary to implement the plan. The
electorate will be the voters voting within the boundaries of the
proposed district. A simple majority of the total persons voting on
the single ballot ((measure)) proposition is required for approval.
(2) ((In conjunction with RCW 81.112.030(10), at the 2007 general
election)) The participating counties shall submit a regional
transportation investment plan ((on the same ballot along with a
proposition to support additional implementation phases of the
authority's system and financing plan developed under chapter 81.112
RCW. The plan shall not be considered approved unless voters also
approve the proposition to support additional implementation phases of
the authority's system and financing plan)) at the 2007 general
election as part of a single ballot proposition that includes, in
conjunction with RCW 81.112.030(10), a plan to support an authority's
system and financing plan, or additional implementation phases of the
system and financing plan, developed under chapter 81.112 RCW. The
regional transportation investment plan shall not be considered
approved unless both a majority of the persons voting on the
proposition residing in the proposed district vote in favor of the
proposition and a majority of the persons voting on the proposition
residing within the regional transit authority vote in favor of the
proposition.

Sec. 3 RCW 81.112.030 and 2006 c 311 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
Two or more contiguous counties each having a population of four
hundred thousand persons or more may establish a regional transit
authority to develop and operate a high capacity transportation system
as defined in chapter 81.104 RCW.
The authority shall be formed in the following manner:
(1) The joint regional policy committee created pursuant to RCW
81.104.040 shall adopt a system and financing plan, including the
definition of the service area. This action shall be completed by
September 1, 1992, contingent upon satisfactory completion of the
planning process defined in RCW 81.104.100. The final system plan
shall be adopted no later than June 30, 1993. In addition to the
requirements of RCW 81.104.100, the plan for the proposed system shall
provide explicitly for a minimum portion of new tax revenues to be
allocated to local transit agencies for interim express services. Upon
adoption the joint regional policy committee shall immediately transmit
the plan to the county legislative authorities within the adopted
service area.
(2) The legislative authorities of the counties within the service
area shall decide by resolution whether to participate in the
authority. This action shall be completed within forty-five days
following receipt of the adopted plan or by August 13, 1993, whichever
comes first.
(3) Each county that chooses to participate in the authority shall
appoint its board members as set forth in RCW 81.112.040 and shall
submit its list of members to the secretary of the Washington state
department of transportation. These actions must be completed within
thirty days following each county's decision to participate in the
authority.
(4) The secretary shall call the first meeting of the authority, to
be held within thirty days following receipt of the appointments. At
its first meeting, the authority shall elect officers and provide for
the adoption of rules and other operating procedures.
(5) The authority is formally constituted at its first meeting and
the board shall begin taking steps toward implementation of the system
and financing plan adopted by the joint regional policy committee. If
the joint regional policy committee fails to adopt a plan by June 30,
1993, the authority shall proceed to do so based on the work completed
by that date by the joint regional policy committee. Upon formation of
the authority, the joint regional policy committee shall cease to
exist. The authority may make minor modifications to the plan as
deemed necessary and shall at a minimum review local transit agencies'
plans to ensure feeder service/high capacity transit service
integration, ensure fare integration, and ensure avoidance of parallel
competitive services. The authority shall also conduct a minimum
thirty-day public comment period.
(6) If the authority determines that major modifications to the
plan are necessary before the initial ballot proposition is submitted
to the voters, the authority may make those modifications with a
favorable vote of two-thirds of the entire membership. Any such
modification shall be subject to the review process set forth in RCW
81.104.110. The modified plan shall be transmitted to the legislative
authorities of the participating counties. The legislative authorities
shall have forty-five days following receipt to act by motion or
ordinance to confirm or rescind their continued participation in the
authority.
(7) If any county opts to not participate in the authority, but two
or more contiguous counties do choose to continue to participate, the
authority's board shall be revised accordingly. The authority shall,
within forty-five days, redefine the system and financing plan to
reflect elimination of one or more counties, and submit the redefined
plan to the legislative authorities of the remaining counties for their
decision as to whether to continue to participate. This action shall
be completed within forty-five days following receipt of the redefined
plan.
(8) The authority shall place on the ballot within two years of the
authority's formation, a single ballot proposition to authorize the
imposition of taxes to support the implementation of an appropriate
phase of the plan within its service area. In addition to the system
plan requirements contained in RCW 81.104.100(2)(d), the system plan
approved by the authority's board before the submittal of a proposition
to the voters shall contain an equity element which:
(a) Identifies revenues anticipated to be generated by corridor and
by county within the authority's boundaries;
(b) Identifies the phasing of construction and operation of high
capacity system facilities, services, and benefits in each corridor.
Phasing decisions should give priority to jurisdictions which have
adopted transit-supportive land use plans; and
(c) Identifies the degree to which revenues generated within each
county will benefit the residents of that county, and identifies when
such benefits will accrue.
A simple majority of those voting within the boundaries of the
authority is required for approval. If the vote is affirmative, the
authority shall begin implementation of the projects identified in the
proposition. However, the authority may not submit any authorizing
proposition for voter-approved taxes prior to July 1, 1993; nor may the
authority issue bonds or form any local improvement district prior to
July 1, 1993.
(9) If the vote on a proposition fails, the board may redefine the
proposition, make changes to the authority boundaries, and make
corresponding changes to the composition of the board. If the
composition of the board is changed, the participating counties shall
revise the membership of the board accordingly. The board may then
submit the revised proposition or a different proposition to the
voters. No single proposition may be submitted to the voters more than
twice. Beginning no sooner than the 2007 general election, the
authority may place additional propositions on the ballot to impose
taxes to support additional phases of plan implementation.
(10) ((In conjunction with RCW 36.120.070,)) At the 2007 general
election, the authority shall submit a proposition to support a system
and financing plan or additional implementation phases of the
authority's system and financing plan ((on the same ballot along with
a regional transportation investment plan developed under chapter
36.120 RCW. The proposition shall not be considered approved unless
voters also approve the regional transportation investment plan)) as
part of a single ballot proposition that includes a plan to support a
regional transportation investment plan developed under chapter 36.120
RCW. The authority's plan shall not be considered approved unless both
a majority of the persons voting on the proposition residing within the
authority vote in favor of the proposition and a majority of the
persons voting on the proposition residing within the proposed regional
transportation investment district vote in favor of the proposition.
(11) Additional phases of plan implementation may include a
transportation subarea equity element which (a) identifies the combined
authority and regional transportation investment district revenues
anticipated to be generated by corridor and by county within the
authority's boundaries, and (b) identifies the degree to which the
combined authority and regional transportation investment district
revenues generated within each county will benefit the residents of
that county, and identifies when such benefits will accrue. For
purposes of the transportation subarea equity principle established
under this subsection, the authority may use the five subareas within
the authority's boundaries as identified in the authority's system plan
adopted in May 1996.
(12) If the authority is unable to achieve a positive vote on a
proposition within two years from the date of the first election on a
proposition, the board may, by resolution, reconstitute the authority
as a single-county body. With a two-thirds vote of the entire
membership of the voting members, the board may also dissolve the
authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 29A.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The election on the single ballot proposition described in RCW
36.120.070 and 81.112.030(10) must be conducted by the auditor of each
component county in accordance with the general election laws of the
state, except as provided in this section. Notice of the election must
be published in one or more newspapers of general circulation in each
component county in the manner provided in the general election laws.
The single joint ballot proposition required under RCW 36.120.070 and
81.112.030(10) must be in substantially the following form:

"REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION INVESTMENT DISTRICT (RTID)
AND
REGIONAL TRANSIT AUTHORITY (RTA)
PROPOSITION #1
REGIONAL ROADS AND TRANSIT SYSTEM

To reduce transportation congestion, increase road capacity,
promote safety, facilitate mobility, provide for an integrated
regional transportation system, and improve the health,
welfare, and safety of the citizens of Washington, shall a
regional transit authority (RTA) implement a regional rail and
transit system to link [insert geographic references] as
described in [insert plan name], financed by [insert taxes]
imposed by RTA, all as provided in Resolution No. [insert
number]; and shall a regional transportation investment
district (RTID) be formed and authorized to implement and
invest in improving the regional transportation system by
replacing vulnerable bridges, improving safety, and increasing
capacity on state and local roads to further link major
education, employment, and retail centers described in [insert
plan name] financed by [insert taxes] imposed by RTID, all as
provided in Resolution No. [insert number]; further provided
that the RTA taxes shall be imposed only within the boundaries
of the RTA, and the RTID taxes shall be imposed only within the
boundaries of the RTID?

Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . □"

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Any legal challenges as to the
constitutionality of this act must be filed in superior court along
with any supporting legal and factual authority within twenty calendar
days of the effective date of this act. Notice of a challenge along
with any supporting legal and factual authority must be served upon the
secretary of state, the attorney general, the district, and the
authority. Upon the filing of a challenge, the state, district, and
authority have ten calendar days to file any response to the challenge
along with any supporting legal and factual authority. The court shall
accord priority to hearing the matter and shall, within five calendar
days of the filing of the response to the challenge, render its
decision and file with the secretary of state a copy of its decision.
The decision of the superior court constitutes a final judgment. Any
appeal must be filed in the supreme court within ten calendar days
after the date of the superior court decision. The supreme court shall
issue its ruling on the appeal within thirty days of receipt by the
court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---