BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.112.060 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 32 are each
amended to read as follows:
An authority shall have the following powers:
(1) To establish offices, departments, boards, and commissions that
are necessary to carry out the purposes of the authority, and to
prescribe the functions, powers, and duties thereof.
(2) To appoint or provide for the appointment of, and to remove or
to provide for the removal of, all officers and employees of the
authority.
(3) To fix the salaries, wages, and other compensation of all
officers and employees of the authority.
(4) To employ such engineering, legal, financial, or other
specialized personnel as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes of
the authority.
(5) To determine risks, hazards, and liabilities in order to obtain
insurance consistent with these determinations. This insurance may
include any types of insurance covering, and for the benefit of, one or
more parties with whom the authority contracts for any purpose, and
insurance for the benefit of its board members, authority officers, and
employees to insure against liability for acts or omissions while
performing or in good faith purporting to perform their official
duties. All insurance obtained for construction of authority projects
with a total project cost exceeding one hundred million dollars may be
acquired by bid or by negotiation ((through December 31, 2006)). In
order to allow the authority flexibility to secure appropriate
insurance by negotiation, the authority is exempt from RCW 48.30.270.

--- END ---