BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of RCW 74.04.005(10)(a), an applicant or recipient
is not eligible for long-term care services if the applicant or
recipient's equity interest in the home exceeds an amount established
by the department in rule, which shall not be less than five hundred
thousand dollars. This requirement does not apply if any of the
following persons related to the applicant or recipient are legally
residing in the home:
(a) A spouse; or
(b) A dependent child under age twenty-one; or
(c) A dependent child with a disability; or
(d) A dependent child who is blind; and
(e) The dependent child in (c) and (d) of this subsection meets the
federal supplemental security income program criteria for disabled and
blind.
(2) The dollar amounts specified in this section shall be increased
annually, beginning in 2011, from year to year based on the percentage
increase in the consumer price index for all urban consumers, all
items, United States city average, rounded to the nearest one thousand
dollars.
(3) This section applies to individuals who are determined eligible
for medical assistance with respect to long-term care services based on
an application filed on or after May 1, 2006.

--- END ---