BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.146.020 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 920 are each
amended to read as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Account" means the water quality account in the state
treasury.
(2) "Council" means the Puget Sound partnership's leadership
council created in chapter . . . ([House] [Senate] Bill No. ....), Laws
of 2007.
(3) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(((3))) (4) "Eligible cost" means the cost of that portion of a
water pollution control facility that can be financed under this
chapter excluding any portion of a facility's cost attributable to
capacity that is in excess of that reasonably required to address one
hundred ten percent of the applicant's needs for water pollution
control existing at the time application is submitted for assistance
under this chapter.
(((4))) (5) "Implementation advisory board" means the board
established to advise the Puget Sound partnership's leadership council,
created by chapter . . . ([House] [Senate] Bill No. ....), Laws of
2007.
(6) "Puget Sound agenda" means the plan for the protection and
restoration of Puget Sound required by chapter . . . ([House] [Senate]
Bill No. ....), Laws of 2007.
(7) "Puget Sound applications" means those applications for funding
of water pollution control facilities and activities located within
water resource inventory areas 1 through 19 in WAC 173-500-040 as it
exists on the effective date of this section.
(8) "Water pollution control facility" or "facilities" means any
facilities or systems for the control, collection, storage, treatment,
disposal, or recycling of wastewater, including but not limited to
sanitary sewage, storm water, residential, commercial, industrial, and
agricultural wastes, which are causing water quality degradation due to
concentrations of conventional, nonconventional, or toxic pollutants.
Water pollution control facilities include all equipment, utilities,
structures, real property, and interests in and improvements on real
property necessary for or incidental to such purpose. Water pollution
control facilities also include such facilities, equipment, and
collection systems as are necessary to protect federally designated
sole source aquifers. Water pollution control facility also includes
facilities or systems that treat storm water discharges or delay peak
storm water runoff, such as low-impact development projects.
(((5))) (9) "Water pollution control activities" means actions
taken by a public body for the following purposes: (a) To prevent or
mitigate pollution of underground water; (b) to control nonpoint
sources of water pollution; (c) to restore the water quality of fresh
water lakes; and (d) to maintain or improve water quality through the
use of water pollution control facilities or other means. ((During the
1995-1997 fiscal biennium, "water pollution control activities"
includes activities by state agencies to protect public drinking water
supplies and sources.
(6))) (10) "Public body" means the state of Washington or any
agency, county, city or town, conservation district, other political
subdivision, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, and
those Indian tribes now or hereafter recognized as such by the federal
government.
(((7))) (11) "Water pollution" means such contamination, or other
alteration of the physical, chemical, or biological properties of any
waters of the state, including change in temperature, taste, color,
turbidity, or odor of the waters, or such discharge of any liquid,
gaseous, solid, radioactive, or other substance into any waters of the
state as will or is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters
harmful, detrimental, or injurious to the public health, safety, or
welfare, or to domestic, commercial, industrial, agricultural,
recreational, or other legitimate beneficial uses, or to livestock,
wild animals, birds, fish, or other aquatic life.
(((8))) (12) "Nonpoint source water pollution" means pollution that
enters any waters of the state from any dispersed water-based or land-use activities, including, but not limited to, atmospheric deposition,
surface water runoff from agricultural lands, urban areas, and forest
lands, subsurface or underground sources, and discharges from boats or
other marine vessels.
(((9))) (13) "Sole source aquifer" means the sole or principal
source of public drinking water for an area designated by the
administrator of the environmental protection agency pursuant to Public
Law 93-523, Sec. 1424(b).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.146 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall forward all Puget Sound applications that
meet project and applicant eligibility requirements to the council to
evaluate and rank the applications for their contribution toward
implementing the Puget Sound agenda. The council and the department
shall collaborate in this review, and may request additional
information from applicants to ensure that the water pollution control
benefits of the application are fully evaluated. The council may
request assistance from the implementation advisory board regarding the
evaluation and ranking.
(2) The council shall hold at least one public meeting at which the
public and project applicants may provide their comments on the
applications and the contributions that the proposed projects and
activities have toward implementing the Puget Sound agenda.
(3) The council shall provide its evaluation and ranking of the
applications to the department in a timely manner prior to the
department's award decisions. The council's evaluation must include
recommendations for the level of funding and its assessment of the
contribution that the project or activity may make toward implementing
specific elements of the Puget Sound agenda.
(4) Where the department does not adopt a recommendation of the
council, the department shall provide an explanation to the council
when the award decisions are made.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.146.070 and 1999 c 164 s 603 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When making grants or loans for water pollution control
facilities, the department shall consider the following:
(a) The protection of water quality and public health;
(b) The cost to residential ratepayers if they had to finance water
pollution control facilities without state assistance;
(c) Actions required under federal and state permits and compliance
orders;
(d) The level of local fiscal effort by residential ratepayers
since 1972 in financing water pollution control facilities;
(e) The extent to which the applicant county or city, or if the
applicant is another public body, the extent to which the county or
city in which the applicant public body is located, has established
programs to mitigate nonpoint pollution of the surface or subterranean
water sought to be protected by the water pollution control facility
named in the application for state assistance; and
(f) The recommendations of the ((Puget Sound action team)) council
provided under section 2 of this act and any other board, council,
commission, or group established by the legislature or a state agency
to study water pollution control issues in the state.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 may not receive a grant or loan for water
pollution control facilities unless it has adopted a comprehensive
plan, including a capital facilities plan element, and development
regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not
require any county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to
adopt a comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting
or receiving a grant or loan under this chapter if such request is made
before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040.
A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 which has not
adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations within the
time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited from
receiving a grant or loan under this chapter if the comprehensive plan
and development regulations are adopted as required by RCW 36.70A.040
before submitting a request for a grant or loan.
(3) Whenever the department is considering awarding grants or loans
for public facilities to special districts requesting funding for a
proposed facility located in a county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040, it shall consider whether the county, city, or town
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the
proposed facility is located has adopted a comprehensive plan and
development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.50A.010 and 1988 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Council" means the Puget Sound partnership's leadership
council created in chapter . . . ([House] [Senate] Bill No. ....), Laws
of 2007.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(((2))) (3) "Eligible cost" means the cost of that portion of a
water pollution control facility or activity that can be financed under
this chapter.
(((3))) (4) "Fund" means the water pollution control revolving fund
in the custody of the state treasurer.
(((4))) (5) "Implementation advisory board" means the board
established to advise the Puget Sound partnership's leadership council,
created by chapter . . . ([House] [Senate] Bill No. ....), Laws of
2007.
(6) "Puget Sound agenda" means the plan for the protection and
restoration of Puget Sound required by chapter . . . ([House] [Senate]
Bill No. ....), Laws of 2007.
(7) "Puget Sound applications" means those applications for funding
of water pollution control facilities and activities located within
water resource inventory areas 1 through 19 in WAC 173-500-040 as it
exists on the effective date of this section.
(8) "Water pollution control facility" or "water pollution control
facilities" means any facilities or systems owned or operated by a
public body for the control, collection, storage, treatment, disposal,
or recycling of wastewater, including but not limited to sanitary
sewage, storm water, combined sewer overflows, residential, commercial,
industrial, and agricultural wastes, which are causing water quality
degradation due to concentrations of conventional, nonconventional, or
toxic pollutants. Water pollution control facilities include all
equipment, utilities, structures, real property, and interests in and
improvements on real property necessary for or incidental to such
purpose. Water pollution control facilities also include such
facilities, equipment, and collection systems as are necessary to
protect federally designated sole source aquifers.
(((5))) (9) "Water pollution control activities" means actions
taken by a public body for the following purposes: (a) To control
nonpoint sources of water pollution; (b) to develop and implement a
comprehensive management plan for estuaries; and (c) to maintain or
improve water quality through the use of water pollution control
facilities or other means.
(((6))) (10) "Public body" means the state of Washington or any
agency, county, city or town, other political subdivision, municipal
corporation or quasi-municipal corporation, and those Indian tribes now
or hereafter recognized as such by the federal government.
(((7))) (11) "Water pollution" means such contamination, or other
alteration of the physical, chemical, or biological properties of any
waters of the state, including change in temperature, taste, color,
turbidity, or odor of the waters, or such discharge of any liquid,
gaseous, solid, radioactive, or other substance into any waters of the
state as will or is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters
harmful, detrimental, or injurious to the public health, safety, or
welfare, or to domestic, commercial, industrial, agricultural,
recreational, or other legitimate beneficial uses, or to livestock,
wild animals, birds, fish, or other aquatic life.
(((8))) (12) "Nonpoint source water pollution" means pollution that
enters any waters of the state from any dispersed water-based or land-use activities, including, but not limited to, atmospheric deposition,
surface water runoff from agricultural lands, urban areas, and forest
lands, subsurface or underground sources, and discharges from boats or
other marine vessels.
(((9))) (13) "Federal capitalization grants" means grants from the
federal government provided by the water quality act of 1987 (P.L. 100-4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.50A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall forward all Puget Sound applications that
meet project and applicant eligibility requirements to the council to
evaluate and rank the applications for their contribution toward
implementing the Puget Sound agenda. The council and the department
shall collaborate in this review and may request additional information
from applicants to ensure that the water pollution control benefits of
the application are fully evaluated. The council may request
assistance from the implementation advisory board regarding the
evaluation and ranking.
(2) The council shall hold at least one public meeting at which the
public and project applicants may provide their comments on the
applications and the contributions that the proposed projects and
activities have toward implementing the Puget Sound agenda.
(3) The council shall provide its evaluation and ranking of the
applications to the department in a timely manner prior to the
department's award decisions. The council's evaluation must include
recommendations for the level of funding and its assessment of the
contribution that the project or activity may make toward implementing
specific elements of the Puget Sound agenda.
(4) Where the department does not adopt a recommendation of the
council, the department shall provide an explanation to the council
when the award decisions are made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Puget Sound partnership's leadership council, created in
chapter . . . ([House] [Senate] Bill No. ....), Laws of 2007, shall
review the following state funding programs that provide state funding
for facilities and activities that may contribute to the implementation
of the Puget Sound agenda:
(a) The water quality account, chapter 70.146 RCW;
(b) The water pollution control revolving fund, chapter 90.50A RCW;
(c) The public works assistance account, chapter 43.155 RCW;
(d) The aquatic lands enhancement account, RCW 79.105.150;
(e) The state toxics control account and local toxics control
account and clean-up program, chapter 70.105D RCW;
(f) The acquisition of habitat conservation and outdoor recreation
land, chapter 79A.15 RCW;
(g) The salmon recovery funding board, RCW 77.85.110 through
77.85.150;
(h) Other state financial assistance to water quality-related
projects and activities; and
(i) Water quality financial assistance from federal programs
administered through state programs or provided directly to local
governments in the Puget Sound basin.
(2) The council's review shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Determining the level of funding and types of projects and
activities funded through the programs specified in subsection (1) of
this section that contribute to implementation of the Puget Sound
agenda;
(b) Evaluating the procedures and criteria in each program for
determining which projects and activities to fund, and the relationship
to the goals and priorities of the Puget Sound agenda;
(c) Assessing methods for ensuring that the goals and priorities of
the Puget Sound agenda are given strong consideration when program
funding decisions are made regarding water quality-related projects and
activities in the Puget Sound basin and habitat-related projects and
activities in the Puget Sound basin;
(d) Assessing ways to incorporate a strategic funding approach for
the Puget Sound agenda within the outcome-focused performance measures
required by RCW 43.41.270 in administering natural resource-related and
environmentally based grant and loan programs;
(e) Assessing ways through the funding allocations for Puget Sound
to reflect the geographic areas of Puget Sound for cleanup emphasis
identified in the Puget Sound agenda;
(f) Evaluating the form of the assistance provided, such as low-interest and no-interest loans, grants, and technical assistance, and
which forms of assistance are more appropriate in accomplishing
different types of projects and activities needed for implementing the
Puget Sound agenda;
(g) Whether entities that are private or quasi-public in nature and
not now eligible to receive funding from the programs should be made
eligible to seek funding, and what conditions upon funding would ensure
that the public's interest in fiscal accountability and transparency in
the use of public funds is protected;
(h) Whether additional types of projects or activities should be
made eligible for funding where the projects or activities are
consistent with the primary purposes of the program and will also
contribute to implementation of the Puget Sound agenda;
(i) Whether state policies for the disposal, acquisition, or
development of state lands are compatible or contrary to the goals and
priorities of the Puget Sound agenda; and
(j) The rigor of evaluation of project application in each program
regarding assumptions and estimations of project benefits, including
contributions toward implementation of the Puget Sound agenda.
(3) The state agencies and boards administering the programs
specified in subsection (1) of this section shall cooperate in
providing to the council information as required for the council's
review. The council shall provide its recommendations in draft form to
each of the administering agencies and consider their comments prior to
finalizing the council's review and recommendations.
(4) By November 1, 2008, the council shall provide a preliminary
summary of its review and recommendations to the governor and
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the senate and house of
representatives. By November 1, 2009, the council shall provide final
summary and recommendations, including proposed legislation to
implement the recommendation, to the governor and appropriate fiscal
and policy committees of the senate and house of representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1, 2, 4, and 5 of this act take
effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---