BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The use of renewable energy provides a
number of benefits, including increased energy diversity and security,
reduction in the effects of greenhouse gases, and economic development
opportunities. The legislature declares, therefore, it is in the best
interests of the citizens of the state to encourage the development and
use of renewable energy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each state agency that is a retail electric customer shall use
eligible renewable resources or acquire and retire equivalent renewable
energy credits, or a combination of both, to meet the following
electricity consumption targets:
(a) That the eligible renewable resource percentage of total annual
electric usage is at least twenty-five percent in fiscal year 2011;
(b) That the eligible renewable resource percentage of total annual
electric usage is at least thirty-five percent in fiscal years 2015
through 2016; and
(c) That the eligible renewable resource percentage of total annual
electric usage is at least fifty percent in fiscal year 2019 and each
fiscal year thereafter.
(2) In meeting the targets, state agencies may include any eligible
renewable resource provided by their serving electric utility's load as
documented by the most recent reports submitted to the department of
community, trade, and economic development under chapter 19.29A or
19.285 RCW.
(3) The department of general administration shall survey and
report the efforts of state agencies in meeting the targets. The first
report is due to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature
in December 2011 and every four years thereafter.
(4) Subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department is authorized to negotiate and
purchase on behalf of state agencies renewable energy credits. The
department shall retire any renewable energy credit purchased to
satisfy a target.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Eligible renewable resource" has the same meaning as in RCW
19.285.030.
(b) "Renewable energy credit" has the same meaning as in RCW
19.285.030.
(c) "State agency" means any state board, commission, bureau,
committee, department, institution, division, or tribunal in the
legislative, executive, or judicial branch of state government, and
includes all elective offices, the state legislature, those
institutions of higher education created and supported by state
government, and those courts that are fully supported by state
government. It does not include political subdivisions; units of local
government; superior, district, and municipal courts; school districts;
municipal corporations; quasi-municipal corporations; special purpose
districts; or local service districts.

--- END ---