BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.285 and 2002 c 207 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By August 1, 2003, each school district shall adopt or amend if
necessary a policy, within the scope of its authority, that prohibits
the harassment, intimidation, or bullying of any student. It is the
responsibility of each school district to share this policy with
parents or guardians, students, volunteers, and school employees.
(2) "Harassment, intimidation, or bullying" means any intentional
electronic, written, verbal, or physical act, including but not limited
to one shown to be motivated by any characteristic in RCW 9A.36.080(3),
or other distinguishing characteristics, when the intentional
electronic, written, verbal, or physical act:
(a) Physically harms a student or damages the student's property;
or
(b) Has the effect of substantially interfering with a student's
education; or
(c) Is so severe, persistent, or pervasive that it creates an
intimidating or threatening educational environment; or
(d) Has the effect of substantially disrupting the orderly
operation of the school.
Nothing in this section requires the affected student to actually
possess a characteristic that is a basis for the harassment,
intimidation, or bullying.
(3) The policy should be adopted or amended through a process that
includes representation of parents or guardians, school employees,
volunteers, students, administrators, and community representatives.
It is recommended that each such policy emphasize positive character
traits and values, including the importance of civil and respectful
speech and conduct, and the responsibility of students to comply with
the district's policy prohibiting harassment, intimidation, or
bullying.
(4) By August 1, 2002, the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with representatives of parents, school personnel, and
other interested parties, shall provide to school districts and
educational service districts a model harassment, intimidation, and
bullying prevention policy and training materials on the components
that should be included in any district policy. Training materials
shall be disseminated in a variety of ways, including workshops and
other staff developmental activities, and through the office of the
superintendent of public instruction's web site, with a link to the
safety center web page. On the web site:
(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
post its model policy, recommended training materials, and
instructional materials;
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction has the
authority to update with new technologies access to this information in
the safety center, to the extent resources are made available; and
(c) Individual school districts shall have direct access to the
safety center web site to post a brief summary of their policies,
programs, partnerships, vendors, and instructional and training
materials, and to provide a link to the school district's web site for
further information.
(5) By August 1, 2008, each school district shall amend its
harassment, intimidation, and bullying prevention policy to include a
section addressing acts of bullying, harassment, or intimidation that
are conducted via electronic means by a student while on school grounds
and during the school day. The policy shall include a requirement that
materials meant to educate parents and students about the seriousness
of cyberbullying be disseminated to parents or made available on the
school district's web site. The material shall include information on
responsible and safe internet use as well as what options are available
if a student is being bullied via electronic means, including but not
limited to, reporting threats to local police and when to involve
school officials, the internet service provider, or phone service
provider.
(6) As used in this section, "electronic" or "electronic means"
means any communication where there is the transmission of information
by wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other similar means.

--- END ---