BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish an industrial insurance medical
advisory committee. The industrial insurance medical advisory
committee shall advise the department on matters related to the
provision of safe, effective, and cost-effective treatments for injured
workers, including but not limited to the development of practice
guidelines and coverage criteria, review of coverage decisions and
technology assessments, review of medical programs, and review of rules
pertaining to health care issues. The industrial insurance medical
advisory committee may provide peer review and advise and assist the
department in the resolution of controversies, disputes, and problems
between the department and the providers of medical care. The
committee must consider the best available scientific evidence and
expert opinion of committee members. The department may hire any
expert or service or create an ad hoc committee, group, or subcommittee
it deems necessary to fulfill the purposes of the committee.
(2) The industrial insurance medical advisory committee is composed
of up to twelve members appointed by the director. The director shall
select the members from the nominations provided by statewide clinical
groups, specialties, and associations, including but not limited to the
following: Family or general practice, orthopedics, neurology,
neurosurgery, general surgery, physical medicine and rehabilitation,
psychiatry, internal medicine, osteopathic, pain management, and
occupational medicine. At least two members must be physicians who are
recognized for expertise in evidence-based medicine. The director may
choose up to two additional members, not necessarily from the
nominations submitted, who have expertise in occupational medicine.
(3) The advisory committee shall choose its chair from among its
membership.
(4) The members of the advisory committee, including hired experts
and any ad hoc group or subcommittee: (a) Are immune from civil
liability for any official acts performed in good faith to further the
purposes of the committee; and (b) may be compensated for participation
in the work of the committee in accordance with a personal services
contract to be executed after appointment and before commencement of
activities related to the work of the committee.
(5) The members of the advisory committee shall disclose all
potential financial conflicts of interest including contracts with or
employment by a manufacturer, provider, or vendor of health
technologies, drugs, medical devices, diagnostic tools, or other
medical services during their term or for eighteen months before their
appointment. As a condition of appointment, each person must agree to
the terms and conditions regarding conflicts of interest as determined
by the director.
(6) The advisory committee shall meet at the times and places
designated by the director and hold meetings during the year as
necessary to provide advice to the director. Meetings of the committee
are subject to chapter 42.30 RCW, the open public meetings act.
(7) The advisory committee shall coordinate with the state health
technology assessment program and state prescription drug program as
necessary. As provided by RCW 70.14.100 and 70.14.050, the decisions
of the state health technology assessment program and those of the
state prescription drug program hold greater weight than decisions made
by the department's industrial insurance medical advisory committee
under Title 51 RCW.
(8) Neither the advisory committee nor any group is an agency for
purposes of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(9) The department shall provide administrative support to the
committee and adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this section.
(10) The workers' compensation advisory committee may request that
the industrial insurance medical advisory committee consider specific
medical issues that have arisen multiple times during the work of the
workers' compensation advisory committee. The industrial insurance
medical advisory committee is not required to act on the request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish an industrial insurance
chiropractic advisory committee. The industrial insurance chiropractic
advisory committee shall advise the department on matters related to
the provision of safe, effective, and cost-effective chiropractic
treatments for injured workers. The industrial insurance chiropractic
advisory committee may provide peer review and advise and assist the
department in the resolution of controversies, disputes, and problems
between the department and the providers of chiropractic care.
(2) The industrial insurance chiropractic advisory committee is
composed of up to nine members appointed by the director. The director
must consider nominations from recognized statewide chiropractic groups
such as the Washington state chiropractic association. At least two
members must be chiropractors who are recognized for expertise in
evidence-based practice or occupational health.
(3) The advisory committee shall choose its chair from among its
membership.
(4) The members of the advisory committee and any ad hoc group or
subcommittee: (a) Are immune from civil liability for any official
acts performed in good faith to further the purposes of the committee;
and (b) may be compensated for participation in the work of the
committee in accordance with a personal services contract to be
executed after appointment and before commencement of activities
related to the work of the committee.
(5) The members of the advisory committee shall disclose all
potential financial conflicts of interest including contracts with or
employment by a manufacturer, provider, or vendor of health
technologies, drugs, medical devices, diagnostic tools, or other
medical services during their term or for eighteen months before their
appointment. As a condition of appointment, each person must agree to
the terms and conditions regarding conflicts of interest as determined
by the director.
(6) The advisory committee shall meet at the times and places
designated by the director and hold meetings during the year as
necessary to provide advice to the director. Meetings of the committee
are subject to chapter 42.30 RCW, the open public meetings act.
(7) The advisory committee shall coordinate with the state health
technology assessment program and state prescription drug program as
necessary. As provided by RCW 70.14.100 and 70.14.050, the decisions
of the state health technology assessment program and those of the
state prescription drug program hold greater weight than decisions made
by the department's industrial insurance chiropractic advisory
committee under Title 51 RCW.
(8) Neither the advisory committee nor any group is an agency for
purposes of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(9) The department shall provide administrative support to the
committee and adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The director and the advisory committees
shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the
following:
(1) A summary of the types of issues reviewed by the committee and
its decision in each matter;
(2) Whether the committee became involved in the resolution of any
disputes or controversies and the results of those disputes or
controversies as a result of the committee's involvement;
(3) The extent to which the committee conducted any peer reviews
and the results of those reviews;
(4) The extent of any practice guidelines or coverage criteria
developed by the committee and the success of those developments; and
(5) The extent to which the committee provided advice on coverage
decisions and technology assessments.
The report is due no later than June 30, 2011, and must contain a
recommendation about whether the committee should continue as it was
originally configured or whether any changes are needed.

--- END ---