BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.29.056 and 1997 c 37 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Dental hygienists licensed under this chapter with two years'
practical clinical experience with a licensed dentist within the
preceding five years may be employed or retained by health care
facilities to perform authorized dental hygiene operations and services
without dental supervision, limited to removal of deposits and stains
from the surfaces of the teeth, application of topical preventive or
prophylactic agents, polishing and smoothing restorations, and
performance of root planing and soft-tissue curettage, but shall not
perform injections of anesthetic agents, administration of nitrous
oxide, or diagnosis for dental treatment. The performance of dental
hygiene operations and services in health care facilities shall be
limited to patients, students, and residents of the facilities. For
dental planning and dental treatment, dental hygienists shall refer
patients to licensed dentists.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "health care facilities" are
limited to hospitals; nursing homes; centers where seniors congregate;
home health agencies; group homes serving the elderly, ((handicapped))
individuals with disabilities, and juveniles; state-operated
institutions under the jurisdiction of the department of social and
health services or the department of corrections; and federal, state,
and local public health facilities, state or federally funded community
and migrant health centers, and tribal clinics.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.29.220 and 2001 c 93 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For low-income, rural, and other at-risk populations and in
coordination with local public health jurisdictions and local oral
health coalitions, a dental hygienist licensed in this state as of
April 19, 2001, may assess for and apply sealants and apply fluoride
varnishes in community-based sealant programs carried out in schools
without attending the department's school sealant endorsement program.
(2) For low-income, rural, and other at-risk populations and in
coordination with local public health jurisdictions and local oral
health coalitions, dental hygienists who are school sealant endorsed
under RCW 43.70.650 may assess for and apply sealants and fluoride
varnishes, and may remove deposits and stains from the surfaces of
teeth, in community-based sealant programs carried out in schools.

--- END ---