BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 23B.08.300 and 1989 c 165 s 97 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A director shall discharge the duties of a director, including
duties as member of a committee:
(a) In good faith;
(b) With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position
would exercise under similar circumstances; and
(c) In a manner the director reasonably believes to be in the best
interests of the corporation.
(2) In discharging the duties of a director, a director is entitled
to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including
financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented
by:
(a) One or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the
director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the
matters presented;
(b) Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to
matters the director reasonably believes are within the person's
professional or expert competence; or
(c) A committee of the board of directors of which the director is
not a member if the director reasonably believes the committee merits
confidence.
(3) A director is not acting in good faith if the director has
knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance
otherwise permitted by subsection (2) of this section unwarranted.
(4) A director is not liable for any action taken as a director, or
any failure to take any action, if the director performed the duties of
the director's office in compliance with this section.
(5) In the exercise of their duties, the directors of the
corporation may, in determining what they believe to be in the best
interests of the corporation, give due consideration to the social,
legal, economic, and environmental effects of their decisions and
potential decisions on employees, customers, and suppliers of the
corporation, and on the communities and geographical areas in which the
corporation and its subsidiaries operate, the economy of the state and
nation, and the long-term as well as short-term interests of the
corporation and its shareholders.

--- END ---