BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The creation of the office of corrections
ombudsman is intended to assist in strengthening procedures and
practices which lessen the possibility of actions occurring within the
department of corrections which may adversely impact the health,
safety, welfare, and rehabilitation of offenders, and which will
effectively reduce the exposure of the department to litigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 There is hereby created an office of
corrections ombudsman within the office of the governor for the purpose
of providing information to offenders and their families; promoting
public awareness and understanding of the rights and responsibilities
of offenders; identifying system issues and responses for the governor
and the legislature to act upon; and ensuring compliance with relevant
statutes, rules, and policies pertaining to corrections facilities,
services, and treatment of offenders under the jurisdiction of the
department.
The ombudsman shall report directly to the governor and shall
exercise his or her powers and duties independently of the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(2) "Offender" means an offender as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 who is
under the control of the department or its contracted agencies,
entities, or programs.
(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of
corrections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Subject to confirmation by the senate,
the governor shall appoint an ombudsman who shall be a person of
recognized judgment, independence, objectivity, and integrity, and
shall be qualified by training or experience in corrections law and
policy. Prior to the appointment, the governor shall consult with, and
may receive recommendations from, the appropriate committees of the
legislature regarding the selection of the ombudsman.
(2) The person appointed ombudsman shall hold office for a term of
three years and shall continue to hold office until reappointed or
until his or her successor is appointed. The governor may remove the
ombudsman only for neglect of duty, misconduct, or inability to perform
duties. Any vacancy shall be filled by similar appointment for the
remainder of the unexpired term.
(3) The ombudsman may employ technical experts and other employees
to complete the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The ombudsman shall:
(1) Provide to the public as appropriate information on the rights
and responsibilities of offenders and their family members;
(2) Maintain a statewide toll-free telephone number, a collect
telephone number to be operated during normal business hours, a web
site, and a mailing address for the receipt of complaints and
inquiries;
(3) Provide information to interested members of the public
regarding the state's correctional system;
(4) Monitor the development and implementation of federal, state,
and departmental laws, rules, regulations, and policies with respect to
corrections facilities in Washington state with a view toward the
appropriate health, safety, welfare, and rehabilitation of offenders;
(5) Establish a statewide uniform reporting system to collect and
analyze data relating to complaints regarding the department;
(6) Establish procedures to receive and investigate complaints.
(a) The ombudsman may initiate and attempt to resolve an
investigation upon his or her own initiative, or upon receipt of a
complaint from a legislator, a member of the offender's immediate
family, or an offender under the jurisdiction of the department,
including offenders housed in other states, regarding:
(i) Decisions;
(ii) Administrative actions;
(iii) Inactions or omissions;
(iv) Policies;
(v) Procedures and rules; or
(vi) Alleged violations of law
of the department which may adversely affect the health, safety,
welfare, rehabilitation, and rights of offenders.
(b) A person is not entitled as a right to be heard by the
ombudsman. The ombudsman may decline to investigate any complaint as
provided by rules adopted under this chapter.
(c) If the ombudsman does not investigate a complaint, the
ombudsman shall notify the complainant of the decision not to
investigate and the reasons for the decision.
(d) The ombudsman shall not investigate a complaint from an
employee of the department that relates to the employee's employment
relationship with the department.
(e) The ombudsman may refer complainants and others to appropriate
resources, agencies, or departments.
(f) The ombudsman shall not levy any fees for the submission or
investigation of complaints.
(g) Prior to any person in the custody of the department obtaining
ombudsman services, the person shall have reasonably pursued a
resolution of the complaint through any existing internal grievance,
administrative, or appellate procedures. This subsection (6)(g) shall
not apply to complaints related to threats of bodily harm, including
but not limited to sexual or physical assaults or the denial of
necessary medical treatment.
(h) At the conclusion of an investigation of a complaint, the
ombudsman shall render a decision on the merits of each complaint and
communicate the decision to the complainant and to the department. The
ombudsman shall state the recommendations and reasons if, in the
ombudsman's opinion, the department or any employee thereof should:
(i) Consider the matter further;
(ii) Modify or cancel any action;
(iii) Alter a rule, practice, or ruling;
(iv) Explain in detail the administrative action in question;
(v) Rectify an omission; or
(vi) Take any other action.
(i) If the ombudsman so requests, the department shall, within the
time specified, inform the ombudsman about the action taken on the
recommendations or the reasons for not complying with them.
(j) If the ombudsman believes that any action or omission has or
continues to pose significant prisoner health, safety, welfare, and
rehabilitation issues, the ombudsman shall report the finding to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.
(k) Before announcing a conclusion or recommendation that expressly
or by implication criticizes a person or the department, the ombudsman
shall consult with that person or the department. The ombudsman may
request to be notified by the department, within a specified time, of
any action taken on any recommendation presented.
(l) The ombudsman shall notify the complainant of the actions taken
by the office and by the department;
(7) Submit annually to the governor and the appropriate committees
of the legislature by November 1st of each year a report analyzing the
work of the office including any recommendations; and
(8) Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter and act in
accordance with the policies and procedures established by the office.
This section shall not be construed as requiring offenders to file
a complaint with the ombudsman in order to exhaust available
administrative remedies for purposes of the prison litigation reform
act of 1995, P.L. 104-134.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department shall permit the
ombudsman or the ombudsman's designee to enter and inspect at any
reasonable time any correctional facility for the purpose of carrying
out his or her duties under this chapter.
(2) Upon the ombudsman's request, the department shall grant the
ombudsman or the ombudsman's designee the right to access, inspect, and
copy all relevant information, records, or documents in the possession
or control of the department that the ombudsman considers necessary in
an investigation of a complaint filed under this chapter; and assist
the ombudsman in obtaining the necessary releases of those documents
which are specifically restricted or privileged for use by the
ombudsman.
(3) If the ombudsman or any employee of the office acting as an
ombudsman who has been delegated in writing the authority granted is
denied access to any premises under the control of the secretary, the
secretary or the secretary's designee, within twenty-four hours after
the denial, shall give the ombudsman a written statement of the reason
for the denial of access.
(4) A state or local government agency or entity that has records
that are relevant to a complaint or an investigation conducted by the
ombudsman shall provide the ombudsman with access to the records.
(5) The department shall ensure that correspondence from inmates to
the ombudsman is not reviewed or inspected, except to ensure that such
correspondence does not contain contraband.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The office of corrections ombudsman
shall establish confidentiality rules and procedures for all
information maintained by the office.
(2) Investigative records of the office of corrections ombudsman
are confidential and are exempt from public disclosure under chapter
42.56 RCW during the course of an ongoing investigation. Such records
shall not be considered privileged or exempt from discovery in criminal
proceedings or in civil litigation if otherwise discoverable under the
rules of civil procedure.
(3) Whenever in the course of providing ombudsman services, the
ombudsman or a member of the ombudsman's staff becomes aware of a
criminal act or a threat to the health and safety of any individual or
the security of a correctional facility, the ombudsman shall notify the
secretary and the appropriate facility administrator of such act or
threat and the nature and target thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) An employee of the office of corrections
ombudsman is not liable for good faith performance of responsibilities
under this chapter.
(2) No discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory action may be
taken against an employee of the department, an employee of a
contracting agency of the department, an offender, or a member of an
offender's immediate family for any communication made, or information
given or disclosed, to aid the office of corrections ombudsman in
carrying out its responsibilities, unless the communication or
information is made, given, or disclosed maliciously or without good
faith.
(3) A person or the department shall not hinder the lawful actions
of the ombudsman or employees of the office, or willfully refuse to
comply with lawful demands of the office.
(4) This section is not intended to infringe on the rights of an
employer to supervise, discipline, or terminate an employee for other
reasons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---