BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the quality of
airline seats presents a health and safety risk to employees. The
legislature also finds that many employees travel on airlines as part
of their employment. Further, the legislature finds that employees who
are engaged in job-related travel are entitled to the same healthy and
safe environment that exists in the workplace.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
To ensure the health and well-being of employees, when an employer
pays for an employee's airline flight, the employer shall ensure that
the employee's seat on the flight meets health and safety standards for
airline seats, as established by the department of labor and
industries.

--- END ---