BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a
broadly held ethic among the citizens of the state that includes
appreciation of nature and environmental values, and that citizens are
willing to voluntarily undertake activities to protect and enhance
environmental values at their homes and gardens, on land on which they
live or work, and in their communities. The legislature finds that
voluntary activities can be invaluable toward achieving the overall
goal of protecting and enhancing the environment and that such
activities should be given recognition as highly valued endeavors.
The legislature finds that there are successful programs that can
be used as models, such as the "Shore Stewards Guide for Shoreline
Living" jointly prepared by university extension faculty and local
governments, that provide information on a broad array of actions that
citizens can undertake that fits their unique conditions and interests.
The legislature finds that better enabling citizens to undertake
voluntary activities can in many circumstances be advantageous.
The purpose of this act is to encourage counties and cities to
expand the availability and use of education, incentives, and other
programs to help implement the comprehensive plans and development
regulations required by chapter 36.70A RCW and to encourage and
increase the information and resources available to the public and to
foster voluntary activities by citizens to improve their environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
To aid in carrying out the comprehensive plans and development
regulations required by this chapter, counties and cities shall employ
voluntary measures, incentives, and educational programs, to the
greatest extent possible, where they can be effective.

--- END ---