BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.16.020 and 2002 c 261 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The period prescribed for the commencement of actions shall be as
follows:
(1) Within ten years:
(((1))) (a) For actions for the recovery of real property, or for
the recovery of the possession thereof; and no action shall be
maintained for such recovery unless it appears that the plaintiff, his
or her ancestor, predecessor or grantor was seized or possessed of the
premises in question within ten years before the commencement of the
action.
(((2) For an action upon a judgment or decree of any court of the
United States, or of any state or territory within the United States,
or of any territory or possession of the United States outside the
boundaries thereof, or of any extraterritorial court of the United
States, unless the period is extended under RCW 6.17.020 or a similar
provision in another jurisdiction.
(3))) (b) Of the eighteenth birthday of the youngest child named in
the order for whom support is ordered for an action to collect past due
child support that has accrued under an order entered after July 23,
1989, by any of the above-named courts or that has accrued under an
administrative order as defined in RCW 74.20A.020(6), which is issued
after July 23, 1989.
(2) Within twenty years: For an action upon a judgment or decree
of any court of the United States, or of any state or territory within
the United States, or of any territory or possession of the United
States outside the boundaries thereof, or of any extraterritorial court
of the United States, unless the period is extended under RCW 6.17.020
or a similar provision in another jurisdiction.

Sec. 2 RCW 6.17.020 and 2002 c 261 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this
section, the party in whose favor a judgment of a court has been or may
be filed or rendered, or the assignee or the current holder thereof,
may have an execution, garnishment, or other legal process issued for
the collection or enforcement of the judgment at any time within ten
years from entry of the judgment or the filing of the judgment in this
state.
(2) After July 23, 1989, a party who obtains a judgment or order of
a court or an administrative order entered as defined in RCW
74.20A.020(6) for accrued child support, or the assignee or the current
holder thereof, may have an execution, garnishment, or other legal
process issued upon that judgment or order at any time within ten years
of the eighteenth birthday of the youngest child named in the order for
whom support is ordered.
(3) After ((June 9, 1994)) the effective date of this act, a party
in whose favor a judgment has been filed as a foreign judgment or
rendered pursuant to subsection (1) or (4) of this section, or the
assignee or the current holder thereof, may, within ninety days before
the expiration of the original ((ten-year)) period, apply to the court
that rendered the judgment or to the court where the judgment was filed
as a foreign judgment for an order granting an additional ((ten))
twenty years during which an execution, garnishment, or other legal
process may be issued. If a district court judgment of this state is
transcribed to a superior court of this state, the original district
court judgment shall not be extended and any petition under this
section to extend the judgment that has been transcribed to superior
court shall be filed in the superior court within ninety days before
the expiration of the ((ten-year)) original period ((of)) beginning on
the date the transcript of the district court judgment was filed in the
superior court of this state. The petitioner shall pay to the court a
filing fee equal to the filing fee for filing the first or initial
paper in a civil action in the court, except in the case of district
court judgments transcribed to superior court, where the filing fee
shall be the fee for filing the first or initial paper in a civil
action in the superior court where the judgment was transcribed. The
order granting the application shall contain an updated judgment
summary as provided in RCW 4.64.030. The filing fee required under
this subsection shall be included in the judgment summary and shall be
a recoverable cost. The application shall be granted as a matter of
right, subject to review only for timeliness, factual issues of full or
partial satisfaction, or errors in calculating the judgment summary
amounts.
(4) A party who obtains a judgment or order for restitution, crime
victims' assessment, or other court-ordered legal financial obligations
pursuant to a criminal judgment and sentence, or the assignee or the
current holder thereof, may execute, garnish, and/or have legal process
issued upon the judgment or order any time within ten years subsequent
to the entry of the judgment and sentence or ten years following the
offender's release from total confinement as provided in chapter 9.94A
RCW. The clerk of superior court, or a party designated by the clerk,
may seek extension under subsection (3) of this section for purposes of
collection as allowed under RCW 36.18.190, provided that no filing fee
shall be required.
(5) "Court" as used in this section includes but is not limited to
the United States supreme court, the United States courts of appeals,
the United States district courts, the United States bankruptcy courts,
the Washington state supreme court, the court of appeals of the state
of Washington, superior courts and district courts of the counties of
the state of Washington, and courts of other states and jurisdictions
from which judgment has been filed in this state under chapter 6.36 or
6.40 RCW.
(6) The perfection of any judgment lien and the priority of that
judgment lien on property as established by RCW 6.13.090 and chapter
4.56 RCW is not altered by the extension of the judgment pursuant to
the provisions of this section and the lien remains in full force and
effect and does not have to be rerecorded after it is extended.
Continued perfection of a judgment that has been transcribed to other
counties and perfected in those counties may be accomplished after
extension of the judgment by filing with the clerk of the other
counties where the judgment has been filed either a certified copy of
the order extending the judgment or a certified copy of the docket of
the matter where the judgment was extended.
(7) Except as ordered in RCW 4.16.020 (((2) or (3))) (1)(b),
chapter 9.94A RCW, or chapter 13.40 RCW, no judgment is enforceable for
a period exceeding twenty years from the date of entry in the
originating court. Nothing in this section may be interpreted to
extend the expiration date of a foreign judgment beyond the expiration
date under the laws of the jurisdiction where the judgment originated.
(8) The chapter 261, Laws of 2002 amendments to this section apply
to all judgments currently in effect on June 13, 2002, to all judgments
extended after June 9, 1994, unless the judgment has been satisfied,
vacated, and/or quashed, and to all judgments filed or rendered, or
both, after June 13, 2002.

--- END ---