BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW
to read as follows:
All persons who provide services under this chapter and who will
have unsupervised access to persons with developmental disabilities are
required to submit to a record check through the Washington state
patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.830 through
43.43.834, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050, and through the federal bureau of
investigation. The record check shall include a fingerprint check
using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint
card. The requesting entity shall provide a copy of the record report
to the applicant. When necessary, persons may be employed on a
conditional basis pending completion of the investigation and reporting
of the results, provided that the requesting entity made the request
within one week of the person's date of hire. If the applicant has had
a record check within the previous two years, the agency may waive the
requirement.

--- END ---