BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.535 and 2005 c 473 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every licensed child day-care center shall, at the time of
licensure or renewal and at any inspection, provide to the department
proof that the licensee has day-care insurance as defined in RCW
48.88.020, or is self-insured pursuant to chapter 48.90 RCW.
(a) Every licensed child day-care center shall comply with the
following requirements:
(i) Notify the department when coverage has been terminated;
(ii) Post at the day-care center, in a manner likely to be observed
by patrons, notice that coverage has lapsed or been terminated;
(iii) Provide written notice to parents that coverage has lapsed or
terminated within thirty days of lapse or termination.
(b) Liability limits under this subsection shall be the same as set
forth in RCW 48.88.050.
(c) The department may take action as provided in RCW 74.15.130 if
the licensee fails to maintain in full force and effect the insurance
required by this subsection.
(d) This subsection applies to child day-care centers holding
licenses, initial licenses, and probationary licenses under this
chapter.
(e) A child day-care center holding a license under this chapter on
July 24, 2005, is not required to be in compliance with this subsection
until the time of renewal of the license or until January 1, 2006,
whichever is sooner.
(2)(a) Every licensed family day-care provider shall, at the time
of licensure or renewal either:
(i) Provide to the department proof that the licensee has day-care
insurance as defined in RCW 48.88.020, or other applicable insurance;
or
(ii) Provide written notice of their insurance status on a standard
form developed by the department to parents with a child enrolled in
family day care and keep a copy of the notice to each parent on file.
Family day-care providers may choose to opt out of the requirement to
have day care or other applicable insurance but must provide written
notice of their insurance status to parents with a child enrolled and
shall not be subject to the requirements of (b)((,)) or (c)((, or (d)))
of this subsection.
(b) Any licensed family day-care provider that provides to the
department proof that the licensee has insurance as provided under
(a)(i) of this subsection shall comply with the following requirements:
(i) Notify the department when coverage has been terminated;
(ii) Post at the day-care home, in a manner likely to be observed
by patrons, notice that coverage has lapsed or been terminated;
(iii) Provide written notice to parents that coverage has lapsed or
terminated within thirty days of lapse or termination.
(c) Liability limits under (a)(i) of this subsection shall be the
same as set forth in RCW 48.88.050.
(d) The department may take action as provided in RCW 74.15.130 if
the licensee fails to ((notify the department when coverage has been
terminated as required under (b))) comply with the requirements of this
subsection.
(e) A family day-care provider holding a license under this chapter
on July 24, 2005, is not required to be in compliance with this
subsection until the time of renewal of the license or until January 1,
2006, whichever is sooner.
(3) Noncompliance or compliance with the provisions of this section
shall not constitute evidence of liability or nonliability in any
injury litigation.

--- END ---