BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington state
comprises a great diversity of biota and landscapes. Under widely
accepted scientific classifications, there are nine ecoregional areas
lying wholly or partially in Washington: Northwest coast, Puget
trough, northwest Cascades, west Cascades, east Cascades, Okanogan
highlands, Blue mountains, Columbia plateau, and Canadian Rocky
mountains. The Canadian Rocky mountains ecoregional area is a vast
region of the Rocky mountain chain stretching from the Yukon Territory
in Canada into the south central United States, encompassing all or
portions of three provinces and seven states. The Selkirk mountains in
the northeast portion of the state and the north-flowing Pend Oreille
river are the two dominant features of this ecoregion in Washington
state, with the Selkirks providing a transition between the rolling
Okanogan highlands to the west and the higher Rocky mountain ridges and
mountains interlaced with wide valleys to the east.
While the portion of this region lying within Washington state is
relatively small, it is an important component for conservation
initiatives involving the unique biota of this ecoregion. Within the
Rocky mountains ecoregional area there are landowners, communities,
wildlife management agencies, and wildlife conservation organizations
beginning to work together in a coordinated manner to consider this
region as a whole. These groups seek to combine science and
stewardship to ensure that the world-renowned wilderness, wildlife,
native plants, and natural processes of the region continue to function
as an interconnected web of life, capable of supporting all of the
natural and human communities that reside within it, for now and for
future generations. This effort is commonly referred to as the Yukon
to Yellowstone conservation initiative.
Within the Yukon to Yellowstone ecoregion are hundreds of small
communities, and two major metropolitan regions, Calgary and Spokane.
As the largest city within the Yukon to Yellowstone region in the
United States, the city of Spokane should be recognized as the United
States' capital of the Yukon to Yellowstone ecoregion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall participate with wildlife management agencies
and conservation organizations in other states and provinces,
comprising the Canadian Rocky mountains ecoregional area, in the
cooperative programs of the Yukon to Yellowstone conservation
initiative. Where the Yukon to Yellowstone conservation initiative has
identified priority species, habitats, or landscapes lying within
Washington state, the department shall actively seek to involve local
governments, landowners, and local conservation organizations in the
initiative. The department may integrate these activities with its
cooperative work with other states and provinces sharing ecoregional
areas with Washington state.

--- END ---