BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.44.020 and 2006 c 339 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(((1) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington,
juvenile department.
(2) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department, the
prosecuting attorney, the state patrol, the director of public safety,
or the office of the sheriff.
(3) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a
person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine and
surgery, optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic
medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery or to provide other
health services. The term "practitioner" includes a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a person who
is being furnished Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner will not be considered, for that reason
alone, a neglected person for the purposes of this chapter.
(4) "Institution" means a private or public hospital or any other
facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment or care.
(5) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(6) "Child" or "children" means any person under the age of
eighteen years of age.
(7) "Professional school personnel" include, but are not limited
to, teachers, counselors, administrators, child care facility
personnel, and school nurses.
(8) "Social service counselor" means anyone engaged in a
professional capacity during the regular course of employment in
encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support or education of
children, or providing social services to adults or families, including
mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and domestic violence
programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an employee or agent
of any public or private organization or institution.
(9) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology
under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as
an employee or agent of any public or private organization or
institution.
(10) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter
18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee
or agent of any public or private organization or institution.
(11) "Clergy" means any regularly licensed or ordained minister,
priest, or rabbi of any church or religious denomination, whether
acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any
public or private organization or institution.
(12) "Abuse or neglect" means sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or
injury of a child by any person under circumstances which cause harm to
the child's health, welfare, or safety, excluding conduct permitted
under RCW 9A.16.100; or the negligent treatment or maltreatment of a
child by a person responsible for or providing care to the child. An
abused child is a child who has been subjected to child abuse or
neglect as defined in this section.
(13) "Child protective services section" means the child protective
services section of the department.
(14) "Sexual exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing, permitting, or
encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any person; or (b)
allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in the obscene or
pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of a child by any
person.
(15) "Negligent treatment or maltreatment" means an act or a
failure to act, or the cumulative effects of a pattern of conduct,
behavior, or inaction, that evidences a serious disregard of
consequences of such magnitude as to constitute a clear and present
danger to a child's health, welfare, or safety, including but not
limited to conduct prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100. When considering
whether a clear and present danger exists, evidence of a parent's
substance abuse as a contributing factor to negligent treatment or
maltreatment shall be given great weight. The fact that siblings share
a bedroom is not, in and of itself, negligent treatment or
maltreatment. Poverty, homelessness, or exposure to domestic violence
as defined in RCW 26.50.010 that is perpetrated against someone other
than the child does not constitute negligent treatment or maltreatment
in and of itself.
(16) "Child protective services" means those services provided by
the department designed to protect children from child abuse and
neglect and safeguard such children from future abuse and neglect, and
conduct investigations of child abuse and neglect reports.
Investigations may be conducted regardless of the location of the
alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes referral
to services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of
children, the coordination of necessary programs and services relevant
to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse and
neglect, and services to children to ensure that each child has a
permanent home. In determining whether protective services should be
provided, the department shall not decline to provide such services
solely because of the child's unwillingness or developmental inability
to describe the nature and severity of the abuse or neglect.
(17) "Malice" or "maliciously" means an evil intent, wish, or
design to vex, annoy, or injure another person. Such malice may be
inferred from an act done in willful disregard of the rights of
another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an
act or omission of duty betraying a willful disregard of social duty.
(18) "Sexually aggressive youth" means a child who is defined in
RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive youth.
(19) "Unfounded" means available information indicates that, more
likely than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur. No unfounded
allegation of child abuse or neglect may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any other provider licensed
under chapter 74.15 RCW.))
(1) "Abuse or neglect" means sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or
injury of a child by any person under circumstances which cause harm to
the child's health, welfare, or safety, excluding conduct permitted
under RCW 9A.16.100; or the negligent treatment or maltreatment of a
child by a person responsible for or providing care to the child. An
abused child is a child who has been subjected to child abuse or
neglect as defined in this section.
(2) "Child" or "children" means any person under the age of
eighteen years of age.
(3) "Child protective services" means those services provided by
the department designed to protect children from child abuse and
neglect and safeguard such children from future abuse and neglect, and
conduct investigations of child abuse and neglect reports.
Investigations may be conducted regardless of the location of the
alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes referral
to services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of
children, the coordination of necessary programs and services relevant
to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse and
neglect, and services to children to ensure that each child has a
permanent home. In determining whether protective services should be
provided, the department shall not decline to provide such services
solely because of the child's unwillingness or developmental inability
to describe the nature and severity of the abuse or neglect.
(4) "Child protective services section" means the child protective
services section of the department.
(5) "Clergy" means any regularly licensed or ordained minister,
priest, or rabbi of any church or religious denomination, whether
acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any
public or private organization or institution.
(6) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington,
juvenile department.
(7) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(8) "Founded" means the determination following an investigation by
the department that, based on available information, it is more likely
than not that child abuse or neglect did occur.
(9) "Inconclusive" means the determination following an
investigation by the department, prior to the effective date of this
act, that based on available information a decision cannot be made that
more likely than not, child abuse or neglect did or did not occur.
(10) "Institution" means a private or public hospital or any other
facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment, or care.
(11) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department, the
prosecuting attorney, the state patrol, the director of public safety,
or the office of the sheriff.
(12) "Malice" or "maliciously" means an evil intent, wish, or
design to vex, annoy, or injure another person. Such malice may be
inferred from an act done in willful disregard of the rights of
another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an
act or omission of duty betraying a willful disregard of social duty.
(13) "Negligent treatment or maltreatment" means an act or a
failure to act, or the cumulative effects of a pattern of conduct,
behavior, or inaction, that evidences a serious disregard of
consequences of such magnitude as to constitute a clear and present
danger to a child's health, welfare, or safety, including but not
limited to conduct prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100. When considering
whether a clear and present danger exists, evidence of a parent's
substance abuse as a contributing factor to negligent treatment or
maltreatment shall be given great weight. The fact that siblings share
a bedroom is not, in and of itself, negligent treatment or
maltreatment. Poverty, homelessness, or exposure to domestic violence
as defined in RCW 26.50.010 that is perpetrated against someone other
than the child does not constitute negligent treatment or maltreatment
in and of itself.
(14) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter
18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee
or agent of any public or private organization or institution.
(15) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a
person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine and
surgery, optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic
medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery or to provide other
health services. The term "practitioner" includes a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a person who
is being furnished Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner will not be considered, for that reason
alone, a neglected person for the purposes of this chapter.
(16) "Professional school personnel" include, but are not limited
to, teachers, counselors, administrators, child care facility
personnel, and school nurses.
(17) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice
psychology under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual
capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private
organization or institution.
(18) "Screened-out report" means a report of alleged child abuse or
neglect that the department has determined does not rise to the level
of a credible report of abuse or neglect and is not referred for
investigation.
(19) "Sexual exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing, permitting, or
encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any person; or (b)
allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in the obscene or
pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of a child by any
person.
(20) "Sexually aggressive youth" means a child who is defined in
RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive youth.
(21) "Social service counselor" means anyone engaged in a
professional capacity during the regular course of employment in
encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support or education of
children, or providing social services to adults or families, including
mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and domestic violence
programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an employee or agent
of any public or private organization or institution.
(22) "Unfounded" means the determination following an investigation
by the department that available information indicates that, more
likely than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur, or that there is
insufficient evidence for the department to determine whether the
alleged child abuse did or did not occur.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.44.030 and 2005 c 417 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner,
law enforcement officer, professional school personnel, registered or
licensed nurse, social service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist,
licensed or certified child care providers or their employees, employee
of the department, juvenile probation officer, placement and liaison
specialist, responsible living skills program staff, HOPE center staff,
or state family and children's ombudsman or any volunteer in the
ombudsman's office has reasonable cause to believe that a child has
suffered abuse or neglect, he or she shall report such incident, or
cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to
the department as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(b) When any person, in his or her official supervisory capacity
with a nonprofit or for-profit organization, has reasonable cause to
believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect caused by a person
over whom he or she regularly exercises supervisory authority, he or
she shall report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the
proper law enforcement agency, provided that the person alleged to have
caused the abuse or neglect is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the organization and coaches, trains, educates, or
counsels a child or children or regularly has unsupervised access to a
child or children as part of the employment, contract, or voluntary
service. No one shall be required to report under this section when he
or she obtains the information solely as a result of a privileged
communication as provided in RCW 5.60.060.
Nothing in this subsection (1)(b) shall limit a person's duty to
report under (a) of this subsection.
For the purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Official supervisory capacity" means a position, status, or
role created, recognized, or designated by any nonprofit or for-profit
organization, either for financial gain or without financial gain,
whose scope includes, but is not limited to, overseeing, directing, or
managing another person who is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the nonprofit or for-profit organization.
(ii) "Regularly exercises supervisory authority" means to act in
his or her official supervisory capacity on an ongoing or continuing
basis with regards to a particular person.
(c) The reporting requirement also applies to department of
corrections personnel who, in the course of their employment, observe
offenders or the children with whom the offenders are in contact. If,
as a result of observations or information received in the course of
his or her employment, any department of corrections personnel has
reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect,
he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.
(d) The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult who has
reasonable cause to believe that a child who resides with them, has
suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable of making a report. For
the purposes of this subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the
following: Any single act of abuse that causes physical trauma of
sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause death; any
single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep
bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than
one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep
bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or
unconsciousness.
(e) The report must be made at the first opportunity, but in no
case longer than forty-eight hours after there is reasonable cause to
believe that the child has suffered abuse or neglect. The report must
include the identity of the accused if known.
(2) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred
during childhood if it is discovered after the child has become an
adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to believe other children
are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the accused, the reporting
requirement of subsection (1) of this section does apply.
(3) Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe that a
child has suffered abuse or neglect may report such incident to the
proper law enforcement agency or to the department of social and health
services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(4) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law
enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received
by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written
report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within
five days thereafter.
(5) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means, or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in writing as provided
in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney for
appropriate action whenever the law enforcement agency's investigation
reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law enforcement
agency shall also notify the department of all reports received and the
law enforcement agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases,
where the child's welfare is endangered, the law enforcement agency
shall notify the department within twenty-four hours. In all other
cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within
seventy-two hours after a report is received by the law enforcement
agency.
(6) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under
subsection (5) of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the
victim requests, and the local office of the department, of the
decision to charge or decline to charge a crime, within five days of
making the decision.
(7) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under
this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with
designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child
protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under
this section if the department determines it is in the best interests
of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(8) Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed
under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical
opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and
that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if returned home,
the department shall file a dependency petition unless a second
licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such expert
medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate a
second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that
such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the
child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the
physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home
while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.
(9) Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (7)
of this section shall not further disseminate or release the
information except as authorized by state or federal statute.
Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(10) Upon receiving a report((s)) of alleged abuse or neglect, the
department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the name, address,
and telephone number of each person making a report of abuse or neglect
under this section. The department shall provide assurances of
appropriate confidentiality of the identification of persons reporting
under this section. If the department is unable to learn the
information required under this subsection, the department shall only
investigate cases in which:
(a) The department believes there is a serious threat of
substantial harm to the child;
(b) The report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that
has, or is about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or
(c) The department has a prior founded report of abuse or neglect
with regard to a member of the household that is within three years of
receipt of the referral.
(11)(a) For reports of alleged abuse or neglect that are accepted
for investigation by the department, the investigation shall be
conducted within time frames established by the department in rule. In
no case shall the investigation extend longer than ninety days from the
date the report is received, unless the investigation is being
conducted under a written protocol pursuant to RCW 26.44.180 and a law
enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney has determined that a longer
investigation period is necessary. At the completion of the
investigation, the department shall make a finding that the report of
child abuse or neglect is founded or unfounded.
(b) If a court in a civil or criminal proceeding, considering the
same facts or circumstances as are contained in the report being
investigated by the department, makes a judicial finding by a
preponderance of the evidence or higher that the subject of the pending
investigation has abused or neglected the child, the department shall
adopt the finding in its investigation.
(12) In conducting an investigation of alleged abuse or neglect,
the department or law enforcement agency:
(a) May interview children. The interviews may be conducted on
school premises, at day-care facilities, at the child's home, or at
other suitable locations outside of the presence of parents. Parental
notification of the interview must occur at the earliest possible point
in the investigation that will not jeopardize the safety or protection
of the child or the course of the investigation. Prior to commencing
the interview the department or law enforcement agency shall determine
whether the child wishes a third party to be present for the interview
and, if so, shall make reasonable efforts to accommodate the child's
wishes. Unless the child objects, the department or law enforcement
agency shall make reasonable efforts to include a third party in any
interview so long as the presence of the third party will not
jeopardize the course of the investigation((.
(11) Upon receiving a report of alleged child abuse and neglect,
the department or investigating law enforcement agency)); and
(b) Shall have access to all relevant records of the child in the
possession of mandated reporters and their employees.
(((12))) (13) The department shall maintain investigation records
and conduct timely and periodic reviews of all founded cases
((constituting)) of abuse and neglect. The department shall maintain
a log of screened-out nonabusive cases.
(((13))) (14) The department shall use a risk assessment process
when investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The
department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the
placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a
risk factor. The department shall, within funds appropriated for this
purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to persons who are
determined not to require further state intervention.
(((14))) (15) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect
the law enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making
the report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is
involved in the reporting.
(((15) The department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the
name, address, and telephone number of each person making a report of
abuse or neglect under this section. The department shall provide
assurances of appropriate confidentiality of the identification of
persons reporting under this section. If the department is unable to
learn the information required under this subsection, the department
shall only investigate cases in which: (a) The department believes
there is a serious threat of substantial harm to the child; (b) the
report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that has, or is
about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or (c) the department
has, after investigation, a report of abuse or neglect that has been
founded with regard to a member of the household within three years of
receipt of the referral.))

Sec. 3 RCW 26.44.031 and 1997 c 282 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To protect the privacy in reporting and the maintenance of
reports of nonaccidental injury, neglect, death, sexual abuse, and
cruelty to children by their parents, and to safeguard against
arbitrary, malicious, or erroneous information or actions, the
department shall not disclose or maintain information related to
((unfounded referrals in files or)) reports of child abuse or neglect
((for longer than six years)) except as provided in this section or as
otherwise required by state and federal law.
((At the end of six years from receipt of the unfounded report, the
information shall be purged unless an additional report has been
received in the intervening period.))
(2) The department shall destroy all of its records concerning:
(a) A screened-out report, within three years from the receipt of
the report; and
(b) An unfounded or inconclusive report, within six years of
completion of the investigation, unless a prior or subsequent founded
report has been received before the records are destroyed.
(3) The department may keep records concerning founded reports of
child abuse or neglect as the department determines by rule.
(4) An unfounded, screened-out, or inconclusive report may not be
disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any
other provider licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.
(5)(a) If the department fails to comply with this section, an
individual who is the subject of a report may institute proceedings for
injunctive or other appropriate relief for enforcement of the
requirement to purge information. These proceedings may be instituted
in the superior court for the county in which the person resides or, if
the person is not then a resident of this state, in the superior court
for Thurston county.
(b) If the department fails to comply with subsection (4) of this
section and an individual who is the subject of the report is harmed by
the disclosure of information, in addition to the relief provided in
(a) of this subsection, the court may award a penalty of up to one
thousand dollars and reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs to the
petitioner.
(c) A proceeding under this subsection does not preclude other
methods of enforcement provided for by law.
(6) Nothing in this section shall prevent the department from
retaining general, nonidentifying information which is required for
state and federal reporting and management purposes.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.13.280 and 2001 c 318 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 70.24.105, whenever a child is placed
in out-of-home care by the department or a child-placing agency, the
department or agency shall share information known to the department or
agency about the child and the child's family with the care provider
and shall consult with the care provider regarding the child's case
plan. If the child is dependent pursuant to a proceeding under chapter
13.34 RCW, the department or agency shall keep the care provider
informed regarding the dates and location of dependency review and
permanency planning hearings pertaining to the child.
(2) Information about the child and the child's family shall
include information known to the department or agency as to whether the
child is a sexually reactive child, has exhibited high-risk behaviors,
or is physically assaultive or physically aggressive, as defined in
this section.
(3) Information about the child shall also include information
known to the department or agency that the child:
(a) Has received a medical diagnosis of fetal alcohol syndrome or
fetal alcohol effect;
(b) Has been diagnosed by a qualified mental health professional as
having a mental health disorder;
(c) Has witnessed a death or substantial physical violence in the
past or recent past; or
(d) Was a victim of sexual or severe physical abuse in the recent
past.
(4) Any person who receives information about a child or a child's
family pursuant to this section shall keep the information confidential
and shall not further disclose or disseminate the information except as
authorized by law.
(((3))) (5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the
authority of the department or child-placing agencies to disclose
client information or to maintain client confidentiality as provided by
law.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) "Sexually reactive child" means a child who exhibits sexual
behavior problems including, but not limited to, sexual behaviors that
are developmentally inappropriate for their age or are harmful to the
child or others.
(b) "High-risk behavior" means an observed or reported and
documented history of one or more of the following:
(i) Suicide attempts or suicidal behavior or ideation;
(ii) Self-mutilation or similar self-destructive behavior;
(iii) Fire-setting or a developmentally inappropriate fascination
with fire;
(iv) Animal torture;
(v) Property destruction; or
(vi) Substance or alcohol abuse.
(c) "Physically assaultive or physically aggressive" means a child
who exhibits one or more of the following behaviors that are
developmentally inappropriate and harmful to the child or to others:
(i) Observed assaultive behavior;
(ii) Reported and documented history of the child willfully
assaulting or inflicting bodily harm; or
(iii) Attempting to assault or inflict bodily harm on other
children or adults under circumstances where the child has the apparent
ability or capability to carry out the attempted assaults including
threats to use a weapon.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A care provider may not be found to have abused or neglected a
child under chapter 26.44 RCW or be denied a license pursuant to
chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 for any allegations of failure to
supervise wherein:
(a) The allegations arise from the child's conduct that is
substantially similar to prior behavior of the child, and:
(i) The child is a sexually reactive youth, exhibits high-risk
behaviors, or is physically assaultive or physically aggressive as
defined in RCW 74.13.280, and this information and the child's prior
behavior was not disclosed to the care provider as required by RCW
74.13.280; and
(ii) The care provider did not know or have reason to know that the
child needed supervision as a sexually reactive or physically
assaultive or physically aggressive youth, or because of a documented
history of high-risk behaviors, as a result of the care provider's
involvement with or independent knowledge of the child or training and
experience; or
(b) The child was not within the reasonable control of the care
provider at the time of the incident that is the subject of the
allegation, and the care provider was acting in good faith and did not
know or have reason to know that reasonable control or supervision of
the child was necessary to prevent harm or risk of harm to the child or
other persons.
(2) Allegations of child abuse or neglect that meet the provisions
of this section shall be designated as "unfounded" as defined in RCW
26.44.020.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.15.130 and 2006 c 265 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An agency may be denied a license, or any license issued
pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 may be suspended,
revoked, modified, or not renewed by the secretary upon proof (a) that
the agency has failed or refused to comply with the provisions of
chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 or the requirements promulgated
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031; or
(b) that the conditions required for the issuance of a license under
chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 have ceased to exist with respect
to such licenses. RCW 43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial,
revocation, suspension, or modification and provides the right to an
adjudicative proceeding.
(2) In any adjudicative proceeding regarding the denial,
modification, suspension, or revocation of a foster family home
license, the department's decision shall be upheld if there is
reasonable cause to believe that:
(a) The applicant or licensee lacks the character, suitability, or
competence to care for children placed in out-of-home care, however, no
unfounded, inconclusive, or screened-out report of child abuse or
neglect may be used to deny employment or a license;
(b) The applicant or licensee has failed or refused to comply with
any provision of chapter 74.15 RCW, RCW 74.13.031, or the requirements
adopted pursuant to such provisions; or
(c) The conditions required for issuance of a license under chapter
74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 have ceased to exist with respect to such
licenses.
(3) In any adjudicative proceeding regarding the denial,
modification, suspension, or revocation of any license under this
chapter, other than a foster family home license, the department's
decision shall be upheld if it is supported by a preponderance of the
evidence.
(4) The department may assess civil monetary penalties upon proof
that an agency has failed or refused to comply with the rules adopted
under the provisions of this chapter and RCW 74.13.031 or that an
agency subject to licensing under this chapter and RCW 74.13.031 is
operating without a license except that civil monetary penalties shall
not be levied against a licensed foster home. Monetary penalties
levied against unlicensed agencies that submit an application for
licensure within thirty days of notification and subsequently become
licensed will be forgiven. These penalties may be assessed in addition
to or in lieu of other disciplinary actions. Civil monetary penalties,
if imposed, may be assessed and collected, with interest, for each day
an agency is or was out of compliance. Civil monetary penalties shall
not exceed two hundred fifty dollars per violation for group homes and
child-placing agencies. Each day upon which the same or substantially
similar action occurs is a separate violation subject to the assessment
of a separate penalty. The department shall provide a notification
period before a monetary penalty is effective and may forgive the
penalty levied if the agency comes into compliance during this period.
The department may suspend, revoke, or not renew a license for failure
to pay a civil monetary penalty it has assessed pursuant to this
chapter within ten days after such assessment becomes final. Chapter
43.20A RCW governs notice of a civil monetary penalty and provides the
right of an adjudicative proceeding. The preponderance of evidence
standard shall apply in adjudicative proceedings related to assessment
of civil monetary penalties.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.13.650 and 2006 c 353 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A foster parent critical support and retention program is
established to retain foster parents who care for sexually reactive
children, physically assaultive children, or children with other high-risk behaviors, as defined in RCW 74.13.280. Services shall consist of
short-term therapeutic and educational interventions to support the
stability of the placement. The foster parent critical support and
retention program is to be implemented under the division of children
and family services' contract and supervision. A contractor must
demonstrate experience providing in-home case management, as well as
experience working with caregivers of children with significant
behavioral issues that pose a threat to others or themselves or the
stability of the placement.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.13.660 and 2006 c 353 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Under the foster parent critical support and retention program,
foster parents who care for sexually reactive children, physically
assaultive children, or children with other high-risk behaviors, as
defined in RCW 74.13.280, shall receive:
(1) Availability at any time of the day or night to address
specific concerns related to the identified child;
(2) Assessment of risk and development of a safety and supervision
plan;
(3) Home-based foster parent training utilizing evidence-based
models; and
(4) Referral to relevant community services and training provided
by the local children's administration office or community agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 3 of this act take effect
October 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The secretary of the department of social
and health services may take the necessary steps to ensure that
sections 1 through 3 of this act are implemented on their effective
date.

--- END ---