BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the needs of over
ten thousand students are forecast to be unmet by 2025 without state
action to improve access to higher education in the Snohomish-Island-Skagit county region. The legislature further finds that the
Snohomish-Island-Skagit county region needs a four-year comprehensive
institution of higher education to serve the demands of Washington
businesses. The legislature further finds that there is no idle
expansion capacity in public institutions of higher education in the
region. The legislature intends to expedite the development of a new
four-year comprehensive institution of higher education with a
polytechnical focus in the Snohomish-Island-Skagit county region. The
legislature further intends that this new institution shall focus on
providing polytechnical baccalaureate degrees in applied science,
engineering, and applied computer science, that prepare graduates to
compete in the global marketplace.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The office of financial management shall
assess options and make a recommendation on alternative sites and
secure purchase options for an institution of higher education in the
Snohomish-Island-Skagit county region. The office of financial
management shall evaluate sites based on, but not limited to, the
following criteria:
(a) Meeting the unmet baccalaureate needs in the region including
high-demand program needs;
(b) Accessibility from existing and planned transportation
infrastructure;
(c) Availability of land in Everett, Marysville, and the north
Snohomish county area;
(d) Whether the parcel size allows flexibility for future growth
and expansion;
(e) The costs of land acquisition;
(f) Whether the land is impacted by environmental hazards; and
(g) Meeting the objectives of the master business plan.
(2) The office of financial management shall develop specific
operational and management plans needed to establish the institution,
including but not limited to:
(a) A master business plan for design and implementation, including
public-private partnerships;
(b) A governance model; and
(c) A plan for comprehensive, four-year programs with a
polytechnical focus to be offered that addresses regional demographic
pressures and workforce needs.
(3) Planning and analysis shall be done in coordination with the
local community.
(4) The office of financial management shall report its
recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
senate and house of representatives by December 1, 2007.
(5) The office of financial management shall contract with an
outside neutral consultant to carry out the provisions of this section.

--- END ---