BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.069 and 2005 c 258 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the building
fee for each academic year shall be a percentage of total tuition fees.
This percentage shall be calculated by the higher education
coordinating board and be based on the actual percentage the building
fee is of total tuition for each tuition category in the 1994-95
academic year, rounded up to the nearest half percent.
(b) The University of Washington may establish the building fee for
each academic year.
(2) The governing boards of each institution of higher education,
except for the technical colleges, shall charge to and collect from
each student a services and activities fee. A governing board may
increase the existing fee annually, consistent with budgeting
procedures set forth in RCW 28B.15.045, by a percentage not to exceed
the annual percentage increase in student tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students: PROVIDED, That such percentage increase shall
not apply to that portion of the services and activities fee previously
committed to the repayment of bonded debt. These rate adjustments may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. For the 2003-04 academic year, the
services and activities fee shall be based upon the resident
undergraduate services and activities fee in 2002-03. The services and
activities fee committee provided for in RCW 28B.15.045 may initiate a
request to the governing board for a fee increase.
(3) Tuition and services and activities fees consistent with
subsection (2) of this section shall be set by the state board for
community and technical colleges for community college summer school
students unless the community college charges fees in accordance with
RCW 28B.15.515.
(4) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, each governing
board of a community college may charge such fees for ungraded courses,
noncredit courses, community services courses, and self-supporting
courses as it, in its discretion, may determine, consistent with the
rules of the state board for community and technical colleges.
(5) The governing board of a college offering an applied
baccalaureate degree program under RCW 28B.50.810 may charge tuition
fees for those courses above the associate degree level at rates
consistent with rules adopted by the state board for community and
technical colleges, not to exceed tuition fee rates at the regional
universities.

--- END ---