BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that protecting
the environment and human health and safety is a fundamental purpose of
government. To support this purpose the state has enacted laws
designed to limit and prevent environmental damage and risk to the
public health and safety caused by petroleum products being released
into the environment via storm water drains that are not constructed
properly so as to contain spills and prevent release of these products
into the environment. Damage caused by small spills to the environment
is often nearly irreversible and the cost to taxpayers to clean up and
remediate damage is extensive. Therefore, the legislature intends to
develop a financial assistance program to help prevent the release of
petroleum products into the environment by reconstructing storm water
drains and oil water separators at local gas stations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.148 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall establish and manage a program for providing
financial assistance to public and private owners and operators of an
underground storage tank, whose on-site storm water drain and oil water
separator are of insufficient size and design to meet local
regulations. In order to implement the program, the director shall:
(a) Require owners and operators who are currently exempt from
meeting or are failing to meet local storm water drain regulations to
demonstrate financial need;
(b) Consult with the department of ecology and appropriate local
government staff in approving financial assistance for corrective
action to ensure compliance with regulations governing storm water
drains and oil water separators; and
(c) Approve or disapprove applications for financial assistance
within sixty days of receipt of a completed application that meets all
requirements as designated by statute or rule.
(2) The director may adopt all rules necessary to implement the
financial assistance program.
(3) No grant of financial assistance may be used for any purpose
other than for corrective action and repair, replacement,
reconstruction, or improvement of a storm water drain vault or oil
water separator. The director shall contract directly with a qualified
contractor for the work performed on either a storm water drain or
water oil separator, or both.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.148.020 and 2006 c 276 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The pollution liability insurance program trust account is
established in the custody of the state treasurer. All funds
appropriated for this chapter and all premiums collected for
reinsurance shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter
including payment of costs of administering the pollution liability
insurance, storm water drain and oil water separator, and underground
storage tank community assistance programs. Expenditures for payment
of administrative and operating costs of the agency are subject to the
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW and may be made only after
appropriation by statute. No appropriation is required for other
expenditures from the account.
(2) Each calendar quarter, the director shall report to the
insurance commissioner the loss and surplus reserves required for the
calendar quarter. The director shall notify the department of revenue
of this amount by the fifteenth day of each calendar quarter.
(3) Each calendar quarter the director shall determine the amount
of reserves necessary to fund commitments made to provide financial
assistance under RCW 70.148.130 to the extent that the financial
assistance reserves do not jeopardize the operations and liabilities of
the pollution liability insurance program. The director shall notify
the department of revenue of this amount by the fifteenth day of each
calendar quarter. The director may immediately establish an initial
financial assistance reserve of five million dollars from available
revenues. The director may not expend more than fifteen million
dollars for the financial assistance program.
(4) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the pollution liability insurance program trust account
to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance of the account.
(5) This section expires June 1, 2013.

--- END ---