BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.025 and 1999 c 6 s 6 are each amended to read as
follows:
The following persons may operate a motor vehicle on a Washington
highway without a valid Washington driver's license:
(1) A member of the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine
Corps, or Coast Guard, or in the service of the National Guard of this
state or any other state, if licensed by the military to operate an
official motor vehicle in such service;
(2) A nonresident driver who is at least:
(a) Sixteen years of age and has immediate possession of a valid
driver's license issued to the driver by his or her home state; or
(b) ((Fifteen)) Sixteen years of age with:
(i) A valid instruction permit issued to the driver by his or her
home state; and
(ii) A licensed driver who has had at least five years of driving
experience occupying a seat beside the driver; or
(c) Sixteen years of age and has immediate possession of a valid
driver's license issued to the driver by his or her home country. A
nonresident driver may operate a motor vehicle in this state under this
subsection (2)(c) for up to one year;
(3) Any person operating special highway construction equipment as
defined in RCW 46.16.010;
(4) Any person while driving or operating any farm tractor or
implement of husbandry that is only incidentally operated or moved over
a highway; or
(5) An operator of a locomotive upon rails, including a railroad
crossing over a public highway. A locomotive operator is not required
to display a driver's license to any law enforcement officer in
connection with the operation of a locomotive or train within this
state.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.055 and 2006 c 219 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Driver's instruction permit. The department may issue a
driver's instruction permit with or without a photograph to an
applicant who has successfully passed all parts of the examination
other than the driving test, provided the information required by RCW
46.20.091, paid a fee of twenty dollars, and meets the following
requirements:
(a) Is at least fifteen and one-half years of age; or
(b) Is at least fifteen years of age and:
(i) Has submitted a proper application; and
(ii) Is enrolled in a ((traffic safety education program offered,
approved, and accredited by the superintendent of public instruction or
offered by a driver training school licensed and inspected by the
department of licensing under chapter 46.82 RCW, that includes practice
driving)) driver training and traffic safety education course as
defined in RCW 46.82.280.
(c) To obtain an instruction permit, an applicant under eighteen
years of age must be in compliance with the compulsory attendance
requirements established in RCW 28A.225.010.
(d) At the time the instruction permit is issued, the applicant's
parent or guardian or an applicant emancipated under chapter 13.64 RCW
must:
(i) Receive materials explaining the intermediate license;
(ii) Acknowledge that he or she understands the restrictions of the
intermediate license; and
(iii) Receive a department issued log book to record the required
supervised driving practice hours prescribed under RCW 46.20.075.
(2) Waiver of written examination for instruction permit. The
department may waive the written examination, if, at the time of
application, an applicant is enrolled in((:
(a) A traffic safety education course as defined by RCW
28A.220.020(2); or
(b) A course of instruction offered by a licensed driver training
school as defined by RCW 46.82.280(4))) a driver training and traffic
safety education course as defined in RCW 46.82.280.
The department may require proof of registration in such a course
as it deems necessary.
(3) Effect of instruction permit. A person holding a driver's
instruction permit may drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle,
upon the public highways if:
(a) The person has immediate possession of the permit; and
(b) An approved instructor, or a licensed driver with at least five
years of driving experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.
(4) Term of instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is
valid for one year from the date of issue.
(a) The department may issue one additional one-year permit.
(b) The department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds
after an investigation that the permittee is diligently seeking to
improve driving proficiency.
(c) A person applying to renew an instruction permit must submit
the application to the department in person.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.075 and 2000 c 115 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An intermediate license authorizes the holder to drive a motor
vehicle under the conditions specified in this section. An applicant
for an intermediate license must be at least sixteen years of age and:
(a) Have possessed a valid instruction permit for a period of not
less than six months;
(b) Have passed a driver licensing examination administered by the
department;
(c) Have passed a driver training and traffic safety education
course ((of driver's education)) in accordance with the standards
established in RCW 46.20.100;
(d) Present ((certification)) a department issued log book,
certified by his or her parent, guardian, or employer ((to the
department)) stating (((i))) that the applicant has had at least
((fifty)) sixty hours of driving experience, ten of which were at
night, during which the driver was supervised by a person at least
twenty-one years of age who has had a valid driver's license for at
least ((three)) five years((, and (ii)));
(e) Present certification that the applicant has not been issued a
notice of traffic infraction or cited for a traffic violation that is
pending at the time of the application for the intermediate license;
(((e))) (f) Not have been convicted of or found to have committed
a traffic violation within the last six months before the application
for the intermediate license; and
(((f))) (g) Not have been adjudicated for an offense involving the
use of alcohol or drugs during the period the applicant held an
instruction permit.
(2) ((For the first six months after the issuance of an
intermediate license or)) Until the holder reaches eighteen years of
age, ((whichever occurs first)) when the intermediate license
conditions in this section no longer apply, the holder of ((the)) an
intermediate license may not:
(a) Operate a motor vehicle that is carrying any passengers under
the age of twenty who are not members of the holder's immediate family
as defined in RCW 42.17.020((. For the remaining period of the
intermediate license, the holder may not operate a motor vehicle that
is carrying more than three passengers who are under the age of twenty
who are not members of the holder's immediate family.
(3) The holder of an intermediate license may not)), except as
permitted under RCW 46.20.055; or
(b) Operate a motor vehicle between the hours of ((1)) 12 a.m. and
((5)) 6 a.m. except when the holder is accompanied by a parent,
guardian, or a licensed driver who is at least twenty-five years of
age.
(((4))) (3) It is a traffic infraction for the holder of an
intermediate license to operate a motor vehicle in violation of the
restrictions imposed under this section.
(((5) Enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may
be accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor
vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of this title or an
equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.
(6))) (4) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without
restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if necessary
for agricultural purposes.
(((7) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without
restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if, for the
twelve-month period following the issuance of the intermediate license,
he or she:
(a) Has not been involved in an automobile accident; and
(b) Has not been convicted or found to have committed a traffic
offense described in chapter 46.61 RCW or violated restrictions placed
on an intermediate licensee under this section.))
(5) An intermediate licensee over the age of seventeen may drive
with one passenger under the age of twenty who is not an immediate
family member, if for the previous twelve-month period the intermediate
licensee has not been involved in a motor vehicle accident, has not
been convicted or found to have committed a traffic offense described
in chapter 46.61 RCW, or has not violated restrictions placed on an
intermediate licensee under this section.
(6) The department shall initiate a voluntary program that offers
intermediate license holders and their parents or guardians a sign, to
improve enforcement of the restrictions under this section, that can be
temporarily attached to the vehicle, identifying the driver as an
intermediate license holder.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.100 and 2002 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application. The application of a person under the age of
eighteen years for a driver's license or a motorcycle endorsement must
be signed by a parent or guardian with custody of the minor. If the
person under the age of eighteen has no father, mother, or guardian,
then the application must be signed by the minor's employer.
(2) Driver training and traffic safety education requirement. For
a person under the age of eighteen years to obtain a driver's license
he or she must meet the driver training and traffic safety education
requirements of this subsection.
(a) To meet the driver training and traffic safety education
requirement for a driver's license, the applicant must satisfactorily
complete a driver training and traffic safety education course as
defined in RCW ((28A.220.020 for a course offered by a school district,
or as defined by the department of licensing for a course offered by a
driver training school licensed under chapter 46.82 RCW)) 46.82.280.
The course ((offered by a school district or an approved private
school)) must meet the standards established by ((the office of the
state superintendent of public instruction. The course offered by a
driver training school must meet the standards established by)) the
department of licensing with the advice of the driver instructors'
advisory committee, pursuant to RCW 46.82.300. ((The traffic safety
education course may be provided by:
(i) A recognized secondary school; or
(ii) A driver training school licensed under chapter 46.82 RCW that
is annually approved by the department of licensing.))
(b) To meet the driver training and traffic safety education
requirement for a motorcycle endorsement, the applicant must
successfully complete a motorcycle safety education course that meets
the standards established by the department of licensing.
(c) The department may waive the driver training and traffic safety
education requirement for a driver's license if the applicant
demonstrates to the department's satisfaction that:
(i) He or she was unable to take or complete a driver training and
traffic safety education course;
(ii) A need exists for the applicant to operate a motor vehicle;
and
(iii) He or she has the ability to operate a motor vehicle in such
a manner as not to jeopardize the safety of persons or property.
The department may adopt rules to implement this subsection (2)(c) ((in
concert with the supervisor of the traffic safety education section of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction)).
(d) The department may waive the driver training and traffic safety
education requirement if the applicant is sixteen years of age and was
licensed to drive a motor vehicle or motorcycle outside this state and
provides proof that he or she has had education equivalent to that
required under this subsection.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.20.267 and 2000 c 115 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a person issued an intermediate license is convicted of or found
to have committed a traffic offense described in chapter 46.61 RCW or
violated restrictions placed on an intermediate license under RCW
46.20.075:
(1) ((On the first such conviction or finding the department shall
mail the parent or guardian of the person a letter warning the person
of the provisions of this section;
(2))) On the ((second such)) first conviction or finding, the
department shall suspend the person's intermediate driver's license for
a period of ((six)) three months or until the person reaches eighteen
years of age, whichever occurs first, and mail the parent or guardian
of the person a notification of the suspension. The person may apply
for a driver's instruction permit under RCW 46.20.055, which is valid
for the duration of the suspension;
(((3))) (2) On the ((third such)) second conviction or finding, the
department shall suspend the person's intermediate driver's license for
a period of six months or until the person reaches eighteen years of
age, whichever occurs first, and mail the parent or guardian of the
person a notification of the suspension;
(3) On the third such conviction or finding, the department shall
suspend the person's intermediate driver's license until the person
reaches eighteen years of age and mail the parent or guardian of the
person a notification of the suspension.
For the purposes of this section, a single ticket for one or more
traffic offenses constitutes a single traffic offense.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 46.82 RCW
to read as follows:
Driver training and traffic safety education courses administered
under this chapter must provide consistent instruction throughout the
state regarding: Motor vehicle laws and graduated licensing
requirements and restrictions; an acceptance of personal responsibility
on the public highways; an understanding of the causes and consequences
of traffic accidents; and supervised training and practice in the
skills necessary for the safe operation of motor vehicles. A driver
training and traffic safety education course must consist of integrated
classroom instruction and behind-the-wheel instruction, which may be
provided by licensed instructors employed by driver training schools or
school districts under section 12 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.82.280 and 2006 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Behind-the-wheel instruction" means instruction in an approved
driver training school instruction vehicle according to and inclusive
of the minimum required curriculum. Behind-the-wheel instruction is
characterized by driving experience.
(2) "Classroom" means a space dedicated to and used exclusively
((by a driver training instructor)) for the instruction of students.
With prior department approval, a branch office classroom may be
located within alternative facilities, such as a public or private
library, school, community college, college or university, or a
business training facility.
(3) "Classroom instruction" means that portion of a driver training
and traffic safety education course that is characterized by
classroom-based student instruction conducted by or under the direct
supervision of a licensed instructor or licensed instructors.
(4) "Driver training school" means a commercial driver training
school engaged in the business of giving instruction, for a fee, in the
operation of automobiles.
(5) "Driver training and traffic safety education course" means a
course of instruction in traffic safety education approved and licensed
by the department of licensing that consists of classroom and behind-the-wheel instruction as documented by the minimum approved curriculum.
(6) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing of
the state of Washington.
(7) "Advisory committee" means the driving instructors' advisory
committee as created in this chapter.
(8) "Fraudulent practices" means any conduct or representation on
the part of a driver training school owner or instructor including:
(a) Inducing anyone to believe, or to give the impression, that a
license to operate a motor vehicle or any other license granted by the
director may be obtained by any means other than those prescribed by
law, or furnishing or obtaining the same by illegal or improper means,
or requesting, accepting, or collecting money for such purposes;
(b) ((Operation of)) Operating a driver training school without a
license, providing instruction without an instructor's license,
verifying enrollment prior to being licensed, misleading or false
statements on applications for a commercial driver training school
license or instructor's license or on any required records or
supporting documentation;
(c) Failing to fully document and maintain all required driver
training school records of instruction, school operation, and
instructor training;
(d) Issuing a driver training and traffic safety education course
certificate without requiring completion of the necessary behind-the-wheel and classroom instruction.
(9) "Instructor" means any person employed by or otherwise
associated with a driver training school ((to instruct persons in the
operation of an automobile)), driver training education program, or
traffic safety education program to teach or instruct persons in the
classroom instruction phase or behind-the-wheel instruction phase, or
both, in the operation of an automobile.
(10) "Owner" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, or other person or group that holds a substantial interest
in a driver training school.
(11) "Place of business" means a designated location at which the
business of a driver training school is transacted and its records are
kept.
(12) "Person" means any individual, firm, corporation, partnership,
or association.
(13) "Substantial interest holder" means a person who has actual or
potential influence over the management or operation of any driver
training school. Evidence of substantial interest includes, but is not
limited to, one or more of the following:
(a) Directly or indirectly owning, operating, managing, or
controlling a driver training school or any part of a driver training
school;
(b) Directly or indirectly profiting from or assuming liability for
debts of a driver training school;
(c) Is an officer or director of a driver training school;
(d) Owning ten percent or more of any class of stock in a privately
or closely held corporate driver training school, or five percent or
more of any class of stock in a publicly traded corporate driver
training school;
(e) Furnishing ten percent or more of the capital, whether in cash,
goods, or services, for the operation of a driver training school
during any calendar year; or
(f) Directly or indirectly receiving a salary, commission,
royalties, or other form of compensation from the activity in which a
driver training school is or seeks to be engaged.
(14) "Student" means any person enrolled in a driver training
education course that pays a fee for instruction.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.82.290 and 1979 ex.s. c 51 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall be responsible for the administration and
enforcement of the law pertaining to driver training schools as set
forth in this chapter.
(2) The director is authorized to adopt and enforce such reasonable
rules as may be consistent with and necessary to carry out this
chapter.
(3)(a) The director shall develop a uniform driver training and
traffic safety education curriculum. The department, under the
direction of the director, shall produce instructional materials
consistent with the curriculum.
(b) The department shall develop a comprehensive strategy to engage
parents and guardians in the curriculum, including at least one
classroom session with parent or guardian participation to ensure that
parents and guardians understand their supportive roles and the driving
restrictions of the intermediate license. The department shall supply
a parental guide, available in both English and Spanish, to assist
parents and guardians in supporting the curriculum.
(c) The department shall undertake a statewide educational campaign
to educate parents, guardians, and the public about intermediate
license restrictions.
(4) The director shall advise the superintendent of public
instruction of the traffic safety benefits, including reduced accident
rates, of (a) shifting high school start times to 9 a.m. and end times
to 4 p.m., and (b) closing high school campuses during the lunch hour.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.82.300 and 2006 c 219 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The director shall be assisted in the duties and
responsibilities of this chapter by the driver instructors' advisory
committee, consisting of five members. Members of the advisory
committee shall be appointed by the director for two-year terms and
shall consist of a representative of the driver training schools, a
representative of the driving instructors (who shall not be from the
same school as the school member), a representative of the
superintendent of public instruction, a representative of the
department of licensing, and a representative from the Washington state
traffic safety commission. Members shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. A member who
is receiving a salary from the state shall not receive compensation
other than travel expenses incurred in such service.
(2) The advisory committee shall meet at least semiannually and
shall have additional meetings as may be called by the director. The
director or the director's representative shall attend all meetings of
the advisory committee and shall serve as chairman.
(3) Duties of the advisory committee shall be to:
(a) Advise and confer with the director or the director's
representative on matters pertaining to the establishment of rules
necessary to carry out this chapter;
(b) Review and update when necessary a curriculum consisting of a
list of items of knowledge and the processes of driving a motor vehicle
specifying the minimum requirements adjudged necessary in teaching a
proper and adequate course of driver education;
(c) Review and update instructor certification standards to be
consistent with RCW 46.82.330 and take into consideration those
standards required to be met by traffic safety education teachers under
RCW 28A.220.020(3); and
(d) Prepare the examination for a driver instructor's certificate
and review examination results at least once each calendar year for the
purpose of updating and revising examination standards.)) To ensure a
consistent and integrated driver training and traffic safety education
program, an advisory and oversight committee is created to assist the
director in his or her duties and responsibilities under this chapter.
(2) Members of the advisory and oversight committee are appointed
by the director for two-year terms and, at a minimum, include:
(a) The director, or his or her designee;
(b) A representative of the driver training schools;
(c) A representative of the driving instructors, who is not from
the same school as the driver training school representative;
(d) The superintendent of public instruction or his or her
designee;
(e) A representative from the traffic safety commission;
(f) A representative from the Washington state patrol;
(g) A representative from a group representing the concerns of
bicyclists or pedestrians, or both;
(h) A representative from the teen driver task force; and
(i) Other members as recommended by the director.
(3) Members are reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. A member who is receiving a salary from
the state shall not receive compensation other than travel expenses
incurred in such service.
(4) The advisory and oversight committee shall meet at least four
times per year and have additional meetings if required by the
director. The director or the director's designee shall attend all
meetings. Members shall vote among themselves for a chair whose term
shall be two years.
(5) The advisory and oversight committee shall:
(a) Advise and confer with the director on matters pertaining to
the establishment of rules necessary to carry out this chapter;
(b) Review and make recommendations pertaining to the driver
training and traffic safety education curriculum, including:
(i) A list of items of necessary knowledge;
(ii) A description of the process of driving a motor vehicle;
(iii) The minimum requirements that are necessary to teach a proper
and adequate course of driver training and traffic safety education;
and
(iv) Materials explaining intermediate license restrictions;
(c) Review and update instructor certification standards to be
consistent with RCW 46.82.330;
(d) Prepare the examination for a driver instructor's certificate
and review examination results at least once each calendar year for the
purpose of updating and revising examination standards;
(e) Consider and evaluate parent taught drivers training and
traffic safety education, and make recommendations as to (i) adapting
the Washington state curriculum for parent taught drivers training and
traffic safety education, (ii) the suitability of commercially
available parent taught drivers training and traffic safety education,
and (iii) whether parent taught drivers training and traffic safety
education could be a component of Washington's drivers training and
safety education; and
(f) Submit a report to the legislature, beginning by January 1,
2010, and every two years thereafter, on the condition of driver
training and traffic safety education in Washington state.

Sec. 10 RCW 46.82.320 and 2006 c 219 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person ((affiliated with a driver training school)) shall
give instruction in the operation of an automobile for a fee without a
license issued by the director for that purpose. An application for an
original or renewal instructor's license shall be filed with the
director, containing such information as prescribed by this chapter and
by the director, accompanied by an application fee set by rule of the
department, which shall in no event be refunded. An application for a
renewal instructor's license must be accompanied by proof of the
applicant's continuing professional development that meets the
standards adopted by the director. If the applicant satisfactorily
meets the application requirements and the examination requirements as
prescribed in RCW 46.82.330, the applicant shall be granted a license
valid for a period of one year from the date of issuance. An
instructor shall take a requalification examination every five years.
(2) The director shall issue a license certificate to each
qualified applicant.
(a) An employing driver training school must conspicuously display
an instructor's license at its established place of business and
display copies of the instructor's license at any branch office where
the instructor provides instruction.
(b) Unless revoked, canceled, or denied by the director, the
license shall remain the property of the licensee in the event of
termination of employment or employment by another driver training
school.
(c) If the director has not received a renewal application on or
before the date a license expires, the license will be voided requiring
a new application as provided for in this chapter, including
examination and payment of all fees.
(d) If revoked, canceled, or denied by the director, the license
must be surrendered to the department within ten days following the
effective date of such action.
(3) Instructors previously certificated as qualified teachers by
the superintendent of public instruction are subject to reasonable
qualification requirements jointly adopted by the superintendent of
public instruction and the director for a period not to exceed five
years and agreed upon by both.
(4) Each licensee shall be provided with a wallet-size
identification card by the director at the time the license is issued
which shall be carried on the instructor's person at all times while
engaged in instructing.
(((4))) (5) The person to whom an instructor's license has been
issued shall notify the director in writing within ten days of any
change of employment or termination of employment, providing the name
and address of the new driver training school by whom the instructor
will be employed.

Sec. 11 RCW 46.82.430 and 1998 c 165 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Instructional material used in driver training ((schools shall))
education courses must include information on:
(1) The proper use of the left-hand lane by motor vehicles on
multilane highways ((and on));
(2) Bicyclists' and pedestrians' rights and responsibilities and
suggested riding procedures in common traffic situations;
(3) Motorcycle awareness, as approved by the motorcycle safety
foundation, to instruct new drivers on the importance of safely sharing
the road with motorcyclists; and
(4) The effects of alcohol and drug use on motor vehicle operators,
including information on drug and alcohol-related injury and mortality
rates in the state of Washington, and the current penalties for driving
under the influence of drugs or alcohol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of every school district or combination
of school districts may establish and operate, or contract, a driver
training and traffic safety education course as described under chapter
46.82 RCW and assess the tuition and special fees necessary to offset
the maintenance and operation costs of this course in whole or in part.
Local school districts may teach this course after regular school
hours, on weekends, on regular school days, or as a summer school
course.
(2) Instructors providing driver training education under this
section must be properly qualified and licensed under chapter 46.82
RCW.
(3) Each school district shall submit an annual report to the
superintendent of public instruction on the condition of its driver
training and traffic safety education course.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor school
districts' driver training and traffic safety education courses and
adopt rules, in consultation with the department of licensing,
necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.220.010 (Legislative declaration) and 1977 c 76 s 1;
(2) RCW 28A.220.020 (Definitions) and 1990 c 33 s 218, 1979 c 158
s 195, 1977 c 76 s 2, 1969 ex.s. c 218 s 1, & 1963 c 39 s 2;
(3) RCW 28A.220.030 (Administration of program -- Powers and duties
of school officials) and 2000 c 115 s 9, 1979 c 158 s 196, 1977 c 76 s
3, 1969 ex.s. c 218 s 2, & 1963 c 39 s 3;
(4) RCW 28A.220.040 (Fiscal support -- Reimbursement to school
districts -- Enrollment fees -- Deposit) and 2000 c 115 s 10, 1984 c 258 s
331, 1977 c 76 s 4, 1969 ex.s. c 218 s 6, 1967 ex.s. c 147 s 5, & 1963
c 39 s 8;
(5) RCW 28A.220.050 (Information on proper use of left-hand lane)
and 1986 c 93 s 4;
(6) RCW 28A.220.060 (Information on effects of alcohol and drug
use) and 1991 c 217 s 2;
(7) RCW 28A.220.070 (Rules) and 2000 c 115 s 11;
(8) RCW 28A.220.080 (Information on motorcycle awareness) and 2004
c 126 s 1;
(9) RCW 28A.220.900 (Purpose) and 1991 c 217 s 1, 1969 ex.s. c 218
s 7, & 1963 c 39 s 1;
(10) RCW 43.131.397 (Intermediate driver's license program -- Review)
and 2000 c 115 s 12;
(11) RCW 43.131.398 (Intermediate driver's license program--Repeal)
and 2000 c 115 s 13; and
(12) RCW 46.82.400 (Chapter not applicable to educational
institutions) and 1979 ex.s. c 51 s 13.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---