BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.112.010 and 2006 c 338 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Biodiesel fuel" means the monoalkyl esters of long chain fatty
acids derived from plant or animal matter that meet the registration
requirements for fuels and fuel additives established by the federal
environmental protection agency and standards established by the
American society of testing and materials.
(2) "Diesel" means special fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020, and
diesel fuel dyed in accordance with the regulations in 26 C.F.R. Sec.
48.4082-1T as of October 24, 2005.
(3) "Director" means the director of agriculture.
(4) "Motor fuel" means any liquid product used for the generation
of power in an internal combustion engine used for the propulsion of a
motor vehicle upon the highways of this state, and any biodiesel fuel.
Motor fuels containing ethanol may be marketed if either (a) the base
motor fuel meets the applicable standards before the addition of the
ethanol or (b) the resultant blend meets the applicable standards after
the addition of the ethanol.
(5) "Retail outlet" means a facility, including land and
improvements, where motor fuel is offered for sale, at retail, to the
motoring public.
(6) "Terminal facility" means any inland, waterfront, or offshore
appurtenance on land used for the purpose of storing, handling, or
transferring motor fuel, but does not include bulk storage facilities
owned or operated by a wholesaler.
(7) "Wholesaler" means any person, other than a refiner or dealer,
who purchases motor fuel at a terminal facility and supplies motor fuel
to retail outlets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By June 1, 2008, each motor fuel terminal facility and
wholesaler that sells motor fuel in this state must be capable of
operating its distribution loading racks using an alternative generated
power source for a minimum of seventy-two hours. Pending a
postdisaster examination of the equipment by the operator to determine
any extenuating damage that might render it unsafe to use, the facility
must have the alternate generated power source available for operation
no later than thirty-six hours after an emergency or disaster as
defined in RCW 38.52.010. Installation of appropriate wiring,
including a transfer switch, must be performed by a certified
electrical contractor. Each business that is subject to this
subsection must keep a copy of the documentation of the wiring
installation on-site or at its corporate headquarters. In addition,
each business must keep a written statement attesting to the periodic
testing and ensured operational capacity of the equipment. These
required documents must be made available, upon request, to the
department of licensing, the emergency management division, and the
director of the county emergency management agency.
(2) Each newly constructed or substantially renovated motor fuel
retail outlet, for which a certificate of occupancy is issued on or
after January 1, 2008, must be prewired with an appropriate transfer
switch, and capable of operating all fuel pumps, dispensing equipment,
lifesafety systems, and payment-acceptance equipment using an
alternative generated power source. As used in this subsection,
"substantially renovated" means a renovation that results in a greater
than fifty percent increase in the assessed value of the motor fuel
retail outlet. Local building inspectors shall include an equipment
and operations check in the normal inspection process before issuing a
certificate of occupancy. Each retail outlet that is subject to this
subsection must keep a copy of the certificate of occupancy on-site or
at its corporate headquarters. In addition, each retail outlet must
keep a written statement attesting to the periodic testing of and
ensured operational capability of the equipment. These required
documents must be made available, upon request, to the department of
licensing, the emergency management division, and the director of the
county emergency management agency.
(3)(a) By June 1, 2008, the following motor fuel retail outlets,
which are located within one-half mile proximate to an interstate
highway or state or federally designated evacuation route, must be
prewired with an appropriate transfer switch and be capable of
operating all fuel pumps, dispensing equipment, lifesafety systems, and
payment-acceptance equipment using an alternate generated power source:
(i) A motor fuel retail outlet, with sixteen or more fueling positions,
located in a county having a population of three hundred thousand or
more; (ii) a motor fuel retail outlet, with twelve or more fueling
positions, located in a county having a population of one hundred
thousand or more, but fewer than three hundred thousand; and (iii) a
motor fuel retail outlet, with eight or more fueling positions, located
in a county having a population of fewer than one hundred thousand.
(b) Installation of appropriate wiring and transfer switches must
be performed by a certified electrical contractor. Each retail outlet
that is subject to this subsection must keep a copy of the
documentation of the wiring installation on-site or at its corporate
headquarters. In addition, each retail outlet must keep a written
statement attesting to the periodic testing of and ensured operational
capacity of the equipment. These required documents must be made
available, upon request, to the department of licensing, the emergency
management division, and the director of the county emergency
management agency.
(4)(a) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section apply to any self-service, full-service, or combination self-service and full-service
motor fuel retail outlet regardless of whether the retail outlet is
located on the grounds of, or is owned by, another retail business
establishment that does not engage in the business of selling motor
fuel.
(b) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section do not apply to: (i)
An automobile dealer; (ii) a person who operates a fleet of motor
vehicles; or (iii) a person who sells motor fuel exclusively to a fleet
of motor vehicles.
(5) Each corporation or other entity that owns ten or more motor
fuel retail outlets located within a single county shall maintain at
least one portable generator that is capable of providing an
alternative generated power source as required under subsection (2) of
this section for every ten outlets. If an entity owns more than ten
outlets or a multiple of ten outlets plus an additional six outlets,
the entity must provide one additional generator to accommodate the
additional outlets. Each portable generator must be stored within this
state and be available for use in an affected location within twenty-four hours after an emergency or disaster as defined in RCW 38.52.010.
(6) For purposes of this section, the owner of a motor fuel retail
outlet is the owner of record of the fuel storage systems operating at
the location.

--- END ---