BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Civil marriage is a legal institution
recognized by the state in order to promote stable relationships and to
protect individuals who are in those relationships. Civil marriage is
based on a civil contract between two persons and does not require the
sanction or involvement of religious institutions. Civil marriage
provides important protections for the families of those who are
married, including not only children and other dependents they may
have, but also members of their extended families. The legislature and
the people of the state of Washington find that strong, healthy
families promote social stability and economic growth, and that these
families are supported and protected by the contractual obligations and
benefits conferred by civil marriage licenses. On these bases, the
state therefore has a compelling state interest in ending
discrimination against otherwise qualified applicants for a civil
marriage license, including discrimination on the basis of gender or
sexual orientation of the applicants.
(2) The legislature finds and declares as follows:
(a) Despite longstanding social and economic discrimination, many
gay and lesbian Washingtonians have formed lasting, committed, caring,
and mutually supportive relationships with persons of their same
gender. These couples live together, participate in their communities
together, and many raise children and care for family members together,
just as do heterosexual couples who have the option to marry under
Washington law.
(b) The state of Washington has a proud tradition of respect for
the principle that no human being should be denied his or her full
rights and responsibilities under the law.
(c) According to the 2000 census, Washington state is home to at
least sixteen thousand same gender couples, ranking ninth among the
fifty states in the number of same gender couples. Seattle ranks
second among large cities in the United States in the percentage of
couples who are of the same gender. Same gender couples live in all
thirty-nine counties in Washington, and nearly one in four of these
couples is raising children. While some of these couples may have
domestic partner registries in their jurisdictions, such arrangements
do not offer the same scope and depth of rights, responsibilities,
privileges, and protections offered by civil marriages, nor do they
provide any legal standing outside the jurisdiction in which they
occur.
(d) Marriage laws support the core values of commitment and
responsibility. Washington's discriminatory exclusion of same gender
couples from marriage harms those couples and their families by denying
those couples and their families specific and equal rights and
responsibilities under state and federal law. At least four hundred
twenty-three Washington state statutes conferred either rights,
benefits, or obligations depending upon marital status, nearly all of
which are currently unavailable to Washington's same sex couples.
These include the right to bring a wrongful death action, the right to
inherit property when there is no will, the right to invoke the
evidentiary privilege not to testify against a spouse, the right to
certain employment and pension benefits as well as other specific
benefits, and the right to transfer property between spouses without
paying the real estate excise tax. The federal benefits withheld
include the right to file joint federal income tax returns, the right
to sponsor a partner for immigration to the United States, the right to
social security survivor benefits, the right to family and medical
leave, and many other substantial benefits and obligations.
(e) Washington's discriminatory exclusion of same gender couples
from marriage further harms same gender couples and their families by
denying them the unique public recognition and affirmation that civil
marriage confers on other couples, and the opportunity to express their
mutual dedication through the uniquely recognized rituals of marriage.
(f) The legislature has an interest in encouraging and supporting
loving, stable, committed, caregiving relationships regardless of the
gender or sexual orientation of the partners. The benefits that accrue
to the general community and to the state's economy when couples
undertake the mutual obligations of marriage accrue regardless of the
gender or sexual orientation of the partners.
(g) The highest courts in four states have held that denying the
legal rights and obligations of marriage to same gender couples is
constitutionally suspect or impermissible under their respective state
Constitutions. These states are Hawaii, Vermont, Massachusetts, and
New Jersey. In 2005, both houses of the California legislature
approved a bill, "The Religious Freedom and Civil Marriage Protection
Act," which would have ensured that the right to marry in California
applied to all of its citizens. In so doing, the California
legislature determined that ending the exclusion of lesbian and gay
couples from marriage is necessary to fulfill the state constitution's
guarantees of due process, privacy, equality, and free expression.
While challenges to the discriminatory exclusion from marriage continue
around the United States, countries such as Canada, the Netherlands,
Belgium, Spain, and South Africa have ended the denial of marriage to
same sex couples and provide full marriage equality to all of their
citizens.
(h) No official of any religious denomination or nonprofit
institution authorized to solemnize marriages shall be required to
solemnize any marriage in violation of his or her right to free
exercise of religion guaranteed by the First Amendment to the United
States Constitution or by the Washington state Constitution.
(i) It is the intent of this act to end discrimination in marriage
based on gender and sexual orientation in Washington, to ensure that
all persons in this state may enjoy the freedom to marry on equal
terms, while also respecting the religious freedom rights of clergy and
religious institutions to determine for whom to perform marriage
ceremonies and which marriages to recognize for religious purposes.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.04.010 and 1998 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Marriage is a civil contract between ((a male and a female))
two persons who have each attained the age of eighteen years, and who
are otherwise capable.
(2) Every marriage entered into in which either ((the husband or
the wife)) person has not attained the age of seventeen years is void
except where this section has been waived by a superior court judge of
the county in which one of the parties resides on a showing of
necessity.
(3) Where necessary to implement the rights and responsibilities of
spouses under the law, gender specific terms such as husband and wife
shall be construed to be gender neutral, except with respect to chapter
26.26 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.04.020 and 1998 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Marriages in the following cases are prohibited:
(a) When either party thereto has a ((wife or husband)) spouse
living at the time of such marriage; or
(b) When the ((husband and wife)) spouses are nearer of kin to each
other than second cousins, whether of the whole or half blood computing
by the rules of the civil law((; or
(c) When the parties are persons other than a male and a female)).
(2) It is unlawful for ((any man)) a person to marry his ((father's
sister, mother's sister, daughter, sister, son's daughter, daughter's
daughter, brother's daughter or sister's daughter; it is unlawful for
any woman to marry her father's brother, mother's brother, son,
brother, son's son, daughter's son, brother's son or sister's son)) or
her sibling, child, grandchild, aunt, uncle, niece, or nephew.
(3) A marriage between two persons that is recognized as valid in
another jurisdiction is valid in this state only if the marriage is not
prohibited or made unlawful under subsection (1)(a)((, (1)(c),)) or (2)
of this section.

--- END ---