BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.63.073 and 2005 c 331 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event a traffic infraction is based on a vehicle's
identification, and the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business, the law enforcement agency shall, before a notice of
infraction may be issued, provide a written notice to the rental car
business that a notice of infraction may be issued to the rental car
business if the rental car business does not, within thirty days of
receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing agency by return
mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine
who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction
occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction.
A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a
copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft.
Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
chapter for the notice of infraction. In lieu of identifying the
vehicle operator, the rental car business may pay the applicable
penalty. (((2))) For the purpose of this ((section)) subsection, a
"traffic infraction based on a vehicle's identification" includes, but
is not limited to, parking infractions, high-occupancy toll lane
violations, and violations recorded by automated traffic safety
cameras.
(2) In the event a parking infraction is issued by a private
parking facility and is based on a vehicle's identification, and the
registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car business, the parking
facility shall, before a notice of infraction may be issued, provide a
written notice to the rental car business that a notice of infraction
may be issued to the rental car business if the rental car business
does not, within thirty days of receiving the written notice, provide
to the parking facility by return mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine
who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction
occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction.
A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a
copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft.
Timely mailing of this statement to the parking facility relieves
a rental car business of any liability under this chapter for the
notice of infraction. In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the
rental car business may pay the applicable penalty. For the purpose of
this subsection, a "parking infraction based on a vehicle's
identification" is limited to parking infractions occurring on a
private parking facility's premises.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.63.160 and 2004 c 231 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies only to traffic infractions issued under
RCW 46.61.690 for toll collection evasion.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer
from issuing a notice of traffic infraction to a person in control of
a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a),
(b), or (c).
(3) Toll collection systems include manual cash collection,
electronic toll collection, and photo enforcement systems.
(4) "Electronic toll collection system" means a system of
collecting tolls or charges that is capable of charging the account of
the toll patron the appropriate toll or charge by electronic
transmission from the motor vehicle to the toll collection system,
which information is used to charge the appropriate toll or charge to
the patron's account.
(5) "Photo enforcement system" means a vehicle sensor installed to
work in conjunction with an electronic toll collection system that
automatically produces one or more photographs, one or more
microphotographs, a videotape, or other recorded images of a vehicle
operated in violation of an infraction under this chapter.
(6) The use of a toll collection system is subject to the following
requirements:
(a) The department of transportation shall adopt rules that allow
an open standard for automatic vehicle identification transponders used
for electronic toll collection to be compatible with other electronic
payment devices or transponders from the Washington state ferry system,
other public transportation systems, or other toll collection systems
to the extent that technology permits. The rules must also allow for
multiple vendors providing electronic payment devices or transponders
as technology permits.
(b) The department of transportation may not sell, distribute, or
make available in any way, the names and addresses of electronic toll
collection system account holders.
(7) The use of a photo enforcement system for issuance of notices
of infraction is subject to the following requirements:
(a) Photo enforcement systems may take photographs, digital
photographs, microphotographs, videotapes, or other recorded images of
the vehicle and vehicle license plate only.
(b) A notice of infraction must be mailed to the registered owner
of the vehicle or to the renter of a vehicle within sixty days of the
violation. The law enforcement officer issuing the notice of
infraction shall include with it a certificate or facsimile thereof,
based upon inspection of photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or
other recorded images produced by a photo enforcement system, stating
the facts supporting the notice of infraction. This certificate or
facsimile is prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it and is
admissible in a proceeding charging a violation under this chapter.
The photographs, digital photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or
other recorded images evidencing the violation must be available for
inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to adjudicate
the liability for the infraction.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs,
digital photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or other recorded
images prepared under this chapter are for the exclusive use of the
tolling agency and law enforcement in the discharge of duties under
this section and are not open to the public and may not be used in a
court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding
relates to a violation under this chapter. No photograph, digital
photograph, microphotograph, videotape, or other recorded image may be
used for any purpose other than enforcement of violations under this
chapter nor retained longer than necessary to enforce this chapter or
verify that tolls are paid.
(d) All locations where a photo enforcement system is used must be
clearly marked by placing signs in locations that clearly indicate to
a driver that he or she is entering a zone where traffic laws are
enforced by a photo enforcement system.
(8) Infractions detected through the use of photo enforcement
systems are not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW
46.52.101 and 46.52.120.
(9) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car business
the department of transportation or a law enforcement agency shall,
before a notice of infraction being issued under this section, provide
a written notice to the rental car business that a notice of infraction
may be issued to the rental car business if the rental car business
does not, within eighteen days of the mailing of the written notice,
provide to the issuing agency by return mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine
who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction
occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction.
A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a
copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft; or
(c) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car
business may pay the applicable toll and fee.
Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
chapter for the notice of infraction.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.63.170 and 2005 c 167 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The use of automated traffic safety cameras for issuance of
notices of infraction is subject to the following requirements:
(a) The appropriate local legislative authority must first enact an
ordinance allowing for their use to detect one or more of the
following: Stoplight, railroad crossing, or school speed zone
violations. At a minimum, the local ordinance must contain the
restrictions described in this section and provisions for public notice
and signage. Cities and counties using automated traffic safety
cameras before July 24, 2005, are subject to the restrictions described
in this section, but are not required to enact an authorizing
ordinance.
(b) Use of automated traffic safety cameras is restricted to two-arterial intersections, railroad crossings, and school speed zones
only.
(c) Automated traffic safety cameras may only take pictures of the
vehicle and vehicle license plate and only while an infraction is
occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of
passengers in the vehicle.
(d) A notice of infraction must be mailed to the registered owner
of the vehicle within fourteen days of the violation, or to the renter
of a vehicle within fourteen days of establishing the renter's name and
address under subsection (3)(a) of this section. The law enforcement
officer issuing the notice of infraction shall include with it a
certificate or facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of photographs,
microphotographs, or electronic images produced by an automated traffic
safety camera, stating the facts supporting the notice of infraction.
This certificate or facsimile is prima facie evidence of the facts
contained in it and is admissible in a proceeding charging a violation
under this chapter. The photographs, microphotographs, or electronic
images evidencing the violation must be available for inspection and
admission into evidence in a proceeding to adjudicate the liability for
the infraction. A person receiving a notice of infraction based on
evidence detected by an automated traffic safety camera may respond to
the notice by mail.
(e) The registered owner of a vehicle is responsible for an
infraction under RCW 46.63.030(1)(e) unless the registered owner
overcomes the presumption in RCW 46.63.075, or, in the case of a rental
car business, satisfies the conditions under subsection (3) of this
section. If appropriate under the circumstances, a renter identified
under subsection (3)(a) of this section is responsible for an
infraction.
(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs,
microphotographs, or electronic images prepared under this section are
for the exclusive use of law enforcement in the discharge of duties
under this section and are not open to the public and may not be used
in a court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or
proceeding relates to a violation under this section. No photograph,
microphotograph, or electronic image may be used for any purpose other
than enforcement of violations under this section nor retained longer
than necessary to enforce this section.
(g) All locations where an automated traffic safety camera is used
must be clearly marked by placing signs in locations that clearly
indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone where traffic
laws are enforced by an automated traffic safety camera.
(h) If a county or city has established an authorized automated
traffic safety camera program under this section, the compensation paid
to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based only
upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in
support of the system, and may not be based upon a portion of the fine
or civil penalty imposed or the revenue generated by the equipment.
(2) Infractions detected through the use of automated traffic
safety cameras are not part of the registered owner's driving record
under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, infractions generated
by the use of automated traffic safety cameras under this section shall
be processed in the same manner as parking infractions, including for
the purposes of RCW 3.46.120, 3.50.100, 35.20.220, 46.16.216, and
46.20.270(3). However, the amount of the fine issued for an infraction
generated through the use of an automated traffic safety camera shall
not exceed the amount of a fine issued for other parking infractions
within the jurisdiction.
(3) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business, the law enforcement agency shall, before a notice of
infraction being issued under this section, provide a written notice to
the rental car business that a notice of infraction may be issued to
the rental car business if the rental car business does not, within
eighteen days of receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing
agency by return mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine
who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction
occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction.
A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a
copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft; or
(c) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car
business may pay the applicable penalty.
Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
chapter for the notice of infraction.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer
from issuing a notice of traffic infraction to a person in control of
a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a),
(b), or (c).
(5) For the purposes of this section, "automated traffic safety
camera" means a device that uses a vehicle sensor installed to work in
conjunction with an intersection traffic control system, a railroad
grade crossing control system, or a speed measuring device, and a
camera synchronized to automatically record one or more sequenced
photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images of the rear of a
motor vehicle at the time the vehicle fails to stop when facing a
steady red traffic control signal or an activated railroad grade
crossing control signal, or exceeds a speed limit in a school speed
zone as detected by a speed measuring device.

--- END ---