BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.08.255 and 1984 c 122 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any port district in this state, acting through its commission,
has power to expend moneys and conduct promotion of resources and
facilities in the district or general area by advertising, publicizing,
or otherwise distributing information to attract visitors and encourage
tourist expansion.
(2)(a) Any port district is authorized either individually or
jointly with any other port district to acquire and to operate tourism-related facilities.
(b) When exercising the authority granted under (a) of this
subsection, a port district may exercise any of the powers granted to
a municipality under RCW 67.28.120, 67.28.130 through 67.28.170, and
67.28.220, but may not exercise powers granted to municipalities under
RCW 67.28.180 and 67.28.181 or other powers granted to municipalities
under chapter 67.28 RCW. The definitions contained in RCW 67.28.080
apply to the exercise of authority by a port district under (a) of this
subsection, and for that purpose the term "municipality" includes a
port district.
(c) Nothing in this section or section 2 of this act expands port
districts' right of eminent domain for the purpose of the activities
and projects authorized under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 67.28 RCW
to read as follows:
A port district and any municipality or other entity involved in a
joint venture or project with a port district under this chapter shall
comply with the provisions of chapter 39.12 RCW. However, nothing in
this section should be interpreted as a legislative intent to expand
the application of chapter 39.12 RCW.

--- END ---