BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.48.070 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of malicious mischief in the first degree if
he or she knowingly and maliciously:
(a) Causes physical damage to the property of another in an amount
exceeding ((one)) five thousand ((five hundred)) dollars;
(b) Causes an interruption or impairment of service rendered to the
public by physically damaging or tampering with an emergency vehicle or
property of the state, a political subdivision thereof, or a public
utility or mode of public transportation, power, or communication; or
(c) Causes an impairment of the safety, efficiency, or operation of
an aircraft by physically damaging or tampering with the aircraft or
aircraft equipment, fuel, lubricant, or parts.
(2) Malicious mischief in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.48.080 and 1994 c 261 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of malicious mischief in the second degree
if he or she knowingly and maliciously:
(a) Causes physical damage to the property of another in an amount
exceeding ((two)) seven hundred fifty dollars; or
(b) Creates a substantial risk of interruption or impairment of
service rendered to the public, by physically damaging or tampering
with an emergency vehicle or property of the state, a political
subdivision thereof, or a public utility or mode of public
transportation, power, or communication.
(2) Malicious mischief in the second degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.48.090 and 2003 c 53 s 71 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of malicious mischief in the third degree if
he or she:
(a) Knowingly and maliciously causes physical damage to the
property of another, under circumstances not amounting to malicious
mischief in the first or second degree; or
(b) Writes, paints, or draws any inscription, figure, or mark of
any type on any public or private building or other structure or any
real or personal property owned by any other person unless the person
has obtained the express permission of the owner or operator of the
property, under circumstances not amounting to malicious mischief in
the first or second degree.
(2)(((a))) Malicious mischief in the third degree ((under
subsection (1)(a) of this section is a gross misdemeanor if the damage
to the property is in an amount exceeding fifty dollars.
(b) Malicious mischief in the third degree under subsection (1)(a)
of this section is a misdemeanor if the damage to the property is fifty
dollars or less.
(c) Malicious mischief in the third degree under subsection (1)(b)
of this section)) is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 4 RCW 9A.56.030 and 2005 c 212 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft in the first degree if he or she
commits theft of:
(a) Property or services which exceed(s) ((one)) five thousand
((five hundred)) dollars in value other than a firearm as defined in
RCW 9.41.010;
(b) Property of any value other than a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 taken from the person of another; or
(c) A search and rescue dog, as defined in RCW 9.91.175, while the
search and rescue dog is on duty.
(2) Theft in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 5 RCW 9A.56.040 and 1995 c 129 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft in the second degree if he or she
commits theft of:
(a) Property or services which exceed(s) ((two)) seven hundred
((and)) fifty dollars in value other than a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010, but does not exceed ((one)) five thousand ((five hundred))
dollars in value; or
(b) A public record, writing, or instrument kept, filed, or
deposited according to law with or in the keeping of any public office
or public servant; or
(c) An access device; or
(d) A motor vehicle, of a value less than ((one)) five thousand
((five hundred)) dollars.
(2) Theft in the second degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 6 RCW 9A.56.050 and 1998 c 236 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft in the third degree if he or she
commits theft of property or services which (a) does not exceed ((two))
seven hundred ((and)) fifty dollars in value, or (b) includes ten or
more merchandise pallets, or ten or more beverage crates, or a
combination of ten or more merchandise pallets and beverage crates.
(2) Theft in the third degree is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 7 RCW 9A.56.060 and 1982 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who shall with intent to defraud, make, or draw, or
utter, or deliver to another person any check, or draft, on a bank or
other depository for the payment of money, knowing at the time of such
drawing, or delivery, that he or she has not sufficient funds in, or
credit with ((said)) the bank or other depository, to meet ((said)) the
check or draft, in full upon its presentation, ((shall be)) is guilty
of unlawful issuance of bank check. The word "credit" as used herein
shall be construed to mean an arrangement or understanding with the
bank or other depository for the payment of such check or draft, and
the uttering or delivery of such a check or draft to another person
without such fund or credit to meet the same shall be prima facie
evidence of an intent to defraud.
(2) Any person who shall with intent to defraud, make, or draw, or
utter, or deliver to another person any check, or draft on a bank or
other depository for the payment of money and who issues a stop-payment
order directing the bank or depository on which the check is drawn not
to honor ((said)) the check, and who fails to make payment of money in
the amount of the check or draft or otherwise arrange a settlement
agreed upon by the holder of the check within twenty days of issuing
((said)) the check or draft ((shall be)) is guilty of unlawful issuance
of a bank check.
(3) When any series of transactions which constitute unlawful
issuance of a bank check would, when considered separately, constitute
unlawful issuance of a bank check in an amount of ((two)) seven hundred
fifty dollars or less because of value, and the series of transactions
are a part of a common scheme or plan, the transactions may be
aggregated in one count and the sum of the value of all of the
transactions shall be the value considered in determining whether the
unlawful issuance of a bank check is to be punished as a class C felony
or a gross misdemeanor.
(4) Unlawful issuance of a bank check in an amount greater than
((two)) seven hundred fifty dollars is a class C felony.
(5) Unlawful issuance of a bank check in an amount of ((two)) seven
hundred fifty dollars or less is a gross misdemeanor and shall be
punished as follows:
(a) The court shall order the defendant to make full restitution;
(b) The defendant need not be imprisoned, but the court shall
impose a minimum fine of five hundred dollars. Of the fine imposed, at
least fifty dollars shall not be suspended or deferred. Upon
conviction for a second offense within any twelve-month period, the
court may suspend or defer only that portion of the fine which is in
excess of five hundred dollars.

Sec. 8 RCW 9A.56.096 and 2003 c 53 s 77 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who, with intent to deprive the owner or owner's
agent, wrongfully obtains, or exerts unauthorized control over, or by
color or aid of deception gains control of personal property that is
rented or leased to the person, is guilty of theft of rental, leased,
or lease-purchased property.
(2) The finder of fact may presume intent to deprive if the finder
of fact finds either of the following:
(a) That the person who rented or leased the property failed to
return or make arrangements acceptable to the owner of the property or
the owner's agent to return the property to the owner or the owner's
agent within seventy-two hours after receipt of proper notice following
the due date of the rental, lease, or lease-purchase agreement; or
(b) That the renter or lessee presented identification to the owner
or the owner's agent that was materially false, fictitious, or not
current with respect to name, address, place of employment, or other
appropriate items.
(3) As used in subsection (2) of this section, "proper notice"
consists of a written demand by the owner or the owner's agent made
after the due date of the rental, lease, or lease-purchase period,
mailed by certified or registered mail to the renter or lessee at: (a)
The address the renter or lessee gave when the contract was made; or
(b) the renter or lessee's last known address if later furnished in
writing by the renter, lessee, or the agent of the renter or lessee.
(4) The replacement value of the property obtained must be utilized
in determining the amount involved in the theft of rental, leased, or
lease-purchased property.
(5)(a) Theft of rental, leased, or lease-purchased property is a
class B felony if the rental, leased, or lease-purchased property is
valued at ((one)) five thousand ((five hundred)) dollars or more.
(b) Theft of rental, leased, or lease-purchased property is a class
C felony if the rental, leased, or lease-purchased property is valued
at ((two)) seven hundred fifty dollars or more but less than ((one))
five thousand ((five hundred)) dollars.
(c) Theft of rental, leased, or lease-purchased property is a gross
misdemeanor if the rental, leased, or lease-purchased property is
valued at less than ((two)) seven hundred fifty dollars.
(6) This section applies to rental agreements that provide that the
renter may return the property any time within the rental period and
pay only for the time the renter actually retained the property, in
addition to any minimum rental fee, to lease agreements, and to lease-purchase agreements as defined under RCW 63.19.010. This section does
not apply to rental or leasing of real property under the residential
landlord-tenant act, chapter 59.18 RCW.

Sec. 9 RCW 9A.56.150 and 1995 c 129 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of possessing stolen property in the first
degree if he or she possesses stolen property other than a firearm as
defined in RCW 9.41.010 which exceeds ((one)) five thousand ((five
hundred)) dollars in value.
(2) Possessing stolen property in the first degree is a class B
felony.

Sec. 10 RCW 9A.56.160 and 1995 c 129 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of possessing stolen property in the second
degree if:
(a) He or she possesses stolen property other than a firearm as
defined in RCW 9.41.010 which exceeds ((two)) seven hundred fifty
dollars in value but does not exceed ((one)) five thousand ((five
hundred)) dollars in value; or
(b) He or she possesses a stolen public record, writing or
instrument kept, filed, or deposited according to law; or
(c) He or she possesses a stolen access device; or
(d) He or she possesses a stolen motor vehicle of a value less than
((one)) five thousand ((five hundred)) dollars.
(2) Possessing stolen property in the second degree is a class C
felony.

Sec. 11 RCW 9A.56.170 and 1998 c 236 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of possessing stolen property in the third
degree if he or she possesses (a) stolen property which does not exceed
((two)) seven hundred fifty dollars in value, or (b) ten or more stolen
merchandise pallets, or ten or more stolen beverage crates, or a
combination of ten or more stolen merchandise pallets and beverage
crates.
(2) Possessing stolen property in the third degree is a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec. 12 RCW 9.94A.535 and 2005 c 68 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The court may impose a sentence outside the standard sentence range
for an offense if it finds, considering the purpose of this chapter,
that there are substantial and compelling reasons justifying an
exceptional sentence. Facts supporting aggravated sentences, other
than the fact of a prior conviction, shall be determined pursuant to
the provisions of RCW 9.94A.537.
Whenever a sentence outside the standard sentence range is imposed,
the court shall set forth the reasons for its decision in written
findings of fact and conclusions of law. A sentence outside the
standard sentence range shall be a determinate sentence.
If the sentencing court finds that an exceptional sentence outside
the standard sentence range should be imposed, the sentence is subject
to review only as provided for in RCW 9.94A.585(4).
A departure from the standards in RCW 9.94A.589 (1) and (2)
governing whether sentences are to be served consecutively or
concurrently is an exceptional sentence subject to the limitations in
this section, and may be appealed by the offender or the state as set
forth in RCW 9.94A.585 (2) through (6).
(1) Mitigating Circumstances - Court to Consider
The court may impose an exceptional sentence below the standard
range if it finds that mitigating circumstances are established by a
preponderance of the evidence. The following are illustrative only and
are not intended to be exclusive reasons for exceptional sentences.
(a) To a significant degree, the victim was an initiator, willing
participant, aggressor, or provoker of the incident.
(b) Before detection, the defendant compensated, or made a good
faith effort to compensate, the victim of the criminal conduct for any
damage or injury sustained.
(c) The defendant committed the crime under duress, coercion,
threat, or compulsion insufficient to constitute a complete defense but
which significantly affected his or her conduct.
(d) The defendant, with no apparent predisposition to do so, was
induced by others to participate in the crime.
(e) The defendant's capacity to appreciate the wrongfulness of his
or her conduct, or to conform his or her conduct to the requirements of
the law, was significantly impaired. Voluntary use of drugs or alcohol
is excluded.
(f) The offense was principally accomplished by another person and
the defendant manifested extreme caution or sincere concern for the
safety or well-being of the victim.
(g) The operation of the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.589
results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly excessive in light of
the purpose of this chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.
(h) The defendant or the defendant's children suffered a continuing
pattern of physical or sexual abuse by the victim of the offense and
the offense is a response to that abuse.
(2) Aggravating Circumstances - Considered and Imposed by the Court
The trial court may impose an aggravated exceptional sentence
without a finding of fact by a jury under the following circumstances:
(a) The defendant and the state both stipulate that justice is best
served by the imposition of an exceptional sentence outside the
standard range, and the court finds the exceptional sentence to be
consistent with and in furtherance of the interests of justice and the
purposes of the sentencing reform act.
(b) The defendant's prior unscored misdemeanor or prior unscored
foreign criminal history results in a presumptive sentence that is
clearly too lenient in light of the purpose of this chapter, as
expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.
(c) The defendant has committed multiple current offenses and the
defendant's high offender score results in some of the current offenses
going unpunished.
(d) The failure to consider the defendant's prior criminal history
which was omitted from the offender score calculation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.525 results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly too
lenient.
(3) Aggravating Circumstances - Considered by a Jury -Imposed by
the Court
Except for circumstances listed in subsection (2) of this section,
the following circumstances are an exclusive list of factors that can
support a sentence above the standard range. Such facts should be
determined by procedures specified in RCW 9.94A.537.
(a) The defendant's conduct during the commission of the current
offense manifested deliberate cruelty to the victim.
(b) The defendant knew or should have known that the victim of the
current offense was particularly vulnerable or incapable of resistance.
(c) The current offense was a violent offense, and the defendant
knew that the victim of the current offense was pregnant.
(d) The current offense was a major economic offense or series of
offenses, so identified by a consideration of any of the following
factors:
(i) The current offense involved multiple victims or multiple
incidents per victim;
(ii) The current offense involved attempted or actual monetary loss
substantially greater than typical for the offense;
(iii) The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication
or planning or occurred over a lengthy period of time; or
(iv) The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence,
or fiduciary responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current
offense.
(e) The current offense was a major violation of the Uniform
Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW (VUCSA), related to
trafficking in controlled substances, which was more onerous than the
typical offense of its statutory definition: The presence of ANY of
the following may identify a current offense as a major VUCSA:
(i) The current offense involved at least three separate
transactions in which controlled substances were sold, transferred, or
possessed with intent to do so;
(ii) The current offense involved an attempted or actual sale or
transfer of controlled substances in quantities substantially larger
than for personal use;
(iii) The current offense involved the manufacture of controlled
substances for use by other parties;
(iv) The circumstances of the current offense reveal the offender
to have occupied a high position in the drug distribution hierarchy;
(v) The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication or
planning, occurred over a lengthy period of time, or involved a broad
geographic area of disbursement; or
(vi) The offender used his or her position or status to facilitate
the commission of the current offense, including positions of trust,
confidence or fiduciary responsibility (e.g., pharmacist, physician, or
other medical professional).
(f) The current offense included a finding of sexual motivation
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.835.
(g) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of sexual abuse of
the same victim under the age of eighteen years manifested by multiple
incidents over a prolonged period of time.
(h) The current offense involved domestic violence, as defined in
RCW 10.99.020, and one or more of the following was present:
(i) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of psychological,
physical, or sexual abuse of the victim manifested by multiple
incidents over a prolonged period of time;
(ii) The offense occurred within sight or sound of the victim's or
the offender's minor children under the age of eighteen years; or
(iii) The offender's conduct during the commission of the current
offense manifested deliberate cruelty or intimidation of the victim.
(i) The offense resulted in the pregnancy of a child victim of
rape.
(j) The defendant knew that the victim of the current offense was
a youth who was not residing with a legal custodian and the defendant
established or promoted the relationship for the primary purpose of
victimization.
(k) The offense was committed with the intent to obstruct or impair
human or animal health care or agricultural or forestry research or
commercial production.
(l) The current offense is trafficking in the first degree or
trafficking in the second degree and any victim was a minor at the time
of the offense.
(m) The offense involved a high degree of sophistication or
planning.
(n) The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence, or
fiduciary responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current
offense.
(o) The defendant committed a current sex offense, has a history of
sex offenses, and is not amenable to treatment.
(p) The offense involved an invasion of the victim's privacy.
(q) The defendant demonstrated or displayed an egregious lack of
remorse.
(r) The offense involved a destructive and foreseeable impact on
persons other than the victim.
(s) The defendant committed the offense to obtain or maintain his
or her membership or to advance his or her position in the hierarchy of
an organization, association, or identifiable group.
(t) The defendant committed the current offense shortly after being
released from incarceration.
(u) The current offense is a burglary and the victim of the
burglary was present in the building or residence when the crime was
committed.
(v) The offense was committed against a law enforcement officer who
was performing his or her official duties at the time of the offense,
the offender knew that the victim was a law enforcement officer, and
the victim's status as a law enforcement officer is not an element of
the offense.
(w) The defendant committed the offense against a victim who was
acting as a good samaritan.
(x) The defendant committed the offense against a public official
or officer of the court in retaliation of the public official's
performance of his or her duty to the criminal justice system.
(y) The victim's injuries substantially exceed the level of bodily
harm necessary to satisfy the elements of the offense. This aggravator
is not an exception to RCW 9.94A.530(2).
(z) The offense was for a single or aggregated series of offenses
constituting theft, unlawful issuance of a check or draft, or forgery
with a total monetary value over two hundred thousand dollars.

--- END ---