BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.391 and 2004 c 95 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any person licensed under this chapter who is convicted of
an offense relating to motor vehicles for which suspension or
revocation of the driver's license is mandatory, other than vehicular
homicide or vehicular assault, or who has had his or her license
suspended, revoked, or denied under RCW 46.20.3101, may submit to the
department an application for a temporary restricted driver's license.
The department, upon receipt of the prescribed fee and upon determining
that the petitioner is eligible to receive the license, may issue a
temporary restricted driver's license and may set definite restrictions
as provided in RCW 46.20.394. No person may petition for, and the
department shall not issue, a temporary restricted driver's license
that is effective during the first thirty days of any suspension or
revocation imposed for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or,
for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under RCW 46.20.3101,
during the required minimum portion of the periods of suspension,
revocation, or denial established under (c) of this subsection.
(b) An applicant under this subsection whose driver's license is
suspended or revoked for an alcohol-related offense pursuant to an
administrative action under RCW 46.20.308 shall provide proof to the
satisfaction of the department that a functioning ignition interlock
device has been installed on a vehicle owned or operated by the person.
Proof of installation of an ignition interlock device shall not be
required if:
(i) The applicant provides a declaration pursuant to RCW 9A.72.085
to the department from his or her employer stating:
(A) That the applicant is employed;
(B) That the applicant's employment requires him or her to operate
a commercial motor vehicle;
(C) The normal business hours during which the applicant is
required to operate the commercial motor vehicle, not to exceed twelve
hours per day;
(D) That the commercial motor vehicle to be operated is owned by
the employer; and
(E) That the applicant will operate the commercial motor vehicle
only under supervision.
(ii) Upon the filing of such declaration as set forth in (b)(i) of
this subsection with the department, an ignition interlock device is
not necessary on employer-owned commercial motor vehicles operated
under conditions set forth in the declaration.
(iii) The department shall require the person to maintain such a
device on a vehicle owned or operated by the person and shall restrict
the person to operating only vehicles equipped with such a device, for
the remainder of the period of suspension, revocation, or denial.
(((ii))) (iv) Subject to any periodic renewal requirements
established by the department pursuant to this section and subject to
any applicable compliance requirements under this chapter or other law,
a temporary restricted driver's license granted after a suspension or
revocation under RCW 46.61.5055 or 46.20.3101 extends through the
remaining portion of any concurrent or consecutive suspension or
revocation that may be imposed as the result of administrative action
and criminal conviction arising out of the same incident.
(((iii))) (v) The time period during which the person is licensed
under this section shall apply on a day-for-day basis toward satisfying
the period of time the ignition interlock device restriction is
required under RCW 46.20.720 (1) and (2) (a), (b), and (c).
(c) The department shall provide by rule the minimum portions of
the periods of suspension, revocation, or denial set forth in RCW
46.20.3101 after which a person may apply for a temporary restricted
driver's license under this section. In establishing the minimum
portions of the periods of suspension, revocation, or denial, the
department shall consider the requirements of federal law regarding
state eligibility for grants or other funding, and shall establish such
periods so as to ensure that the state will maintain its eligibility,
or establish eligibility, to obtain incentive grants or any other
federal funding.
(2)(a) A person licensed under this chapter whose driver's license
is suspended administratively due to failure to appear or pay a traffic
ticket under RCW 46.20.289; a violation of the financial responsibility
laws under chapter 46.29 RCW; or for multiple violations within a
specified period of time under RCW 46.20.291, may apply to the
department for an occupational driver's license.
(b) If the suspension is for failure to respond, pay, or comply
with a notice of traffic infraction or conviction, the applicant must
enter into a payment plan with the court.
(c) An occupational driver's license issued to an applicant
described in (a) of this subsection shall be valid for the period of
the suspension or revocation.
(3) An applicant for an occupational or temporary restricted
driver's license who qualifies under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section is eligible to receive such license only if:
(a) Within seven years immediately preceding the date of the
offense that gave rise to the present conviction or incident, the
applicant has not committed vehicular homicide under RCW 46.61.520 or
vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522; and
(b) The applicant demonstrates that it is necessary for him or her
to operate a motor vehicle because he or she:
(i) Is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential
that he or she operate a motor vehicle;
(ii) Is undergoing continuing health care or providing continuing
care to another who is dependent upon the applicant;
(iii) Is enrolled in an educational institution and pursuing a
course of study leading to a diploma, degree, or other certification of
successful educational completion;
(iv) Is undergoing substance abuse treatment or is participating in
meetings of a twelve-step group such as Alcoholics Anonymous that
requires the petitioner to drive to or from the treatment or meetings;
(v) Is fulfilling court-ordered community service responsibilities;
(vi) Is in a program that assists persons who are enrolled in a
WorkFirst program pursuant to chapter 74.08A RCW to become gainfully
employed and the program requires a driver's license;
(vii) Is in an apprenticeship, on-the-job training, or welfare-to-work program; or
(viii) Presents evidence that he or she has applied for a position
in an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program for which a
driver's license is required to begin the program, provided that a
license granted under this provision shall be in effect for no longer
than fourteen days; and
(c) The applicant files satisfactory proof of financial
responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW; and
(d) Upon receipt of evidence that a holder of an occupational
driver's license granted under this subsection is no longer enrolled in
an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program, the director shall
give written notice by first class mail to the driver that the
occupational driver's license shall be canceled. The effective date of
cancellation shall be fifteen days from the date of mailing the notice.
If at any time before the cancellation goes into effect the driver
submits evidence of continued enrollment in the program, the
cancellation shall be stayed. If the cancellation becomes effective,
the driver may obtain, at no additional charge, a new occupational
driver's license upon submittal of evidence of enrollment in another
program that meets the criteria set forth in this subsection; and
(e) The department shall not issue an occupational driver's license
under (b)(iv) of this subsection if the applicant is able to receive
transit services sufficient to allow for the applicant's participation
in the programs referenced under (b)(iv) of this subsection.
(4) A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the
application for an occupational or temporary restricted driver's
license may request a hearing as provided by rule of the department.
(5) The director shall cancel an occupational or temporary
restricted driver's license upon receipt of notice that the holder
thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of
its restrictions, or of a separate offense that under chapter 46.20 RCW
would warrant suspension or revocation of a regular driver's license.
The cancellation is effective as of the date of the conviction, and
continues with the same force and effect as any suspension or
revocation under this title.

--- END ---