BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.537 and 2005 c 68 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At any time prior to trial or entry of the guilty plea if
substantial rights of the defendant are not prejudiced, the state may
give notice that it is seeking a sentence above the standard sentencing
range. The notice shall state aggravating circumstances upon which the
requested sentence will be based.
(2) At any time prior to the imposition of sentence, the sentencing
judge may give notice that the circumstances presented may warrant a
sentence above the standard sentencing range. The judge shall specify,
in writing, which of the aggravating circumstances stated in RCW
9.94A.535 (2) or (3) appear to be present.
(3) The facts supporting aggravating circumstances shall be proved
to a jury beyond a reasonable doubt. The jury's verdict on the
aggravating factor must be unanimous, and by special interrogatory. If
a jury is waived, proof shall be to the court beyond a reasonable
doubt, unless the defendant stipulates to the aggravating facts.
(((3))) (4) Evidence regarding any facts supporting aggravating
circumstances under RCW 9.94A.535(3) (a) through (y), shall be
presented to the jury during the trial of the alleged crime, unless the
state alleges the aggravating circumstances listed in RCW 9.94A.535(3)
(e)(iv), (h)(i), (o), or (t). If one of these aggravating
circumstances is alleged, the trial court may conduct a separate
proceeding if the evidence supporting the aggravating fact is not part
of the res geste of the charged crime, if the evidence is not otherwise
admissible in trial of the charged crime, and if the court finds that
the probative value of the evidence to the aggravated fact is
substantially outweighed by its prejudicial effect on the jury's
ability to determine guilt or innocence for the underlying crime.
(((4))) (5) If the court conducts a separate proceeding to
determine the existence of aggravating circumstances, the proceeding
shall immediately follow the trial on the underlying conviction, if
possible. If any person who served on the jury is unable to continue,
the court shall substitute an alternate juror.
(((5))) (6) If the jury finds, unanimously and beyond a reasonable
doubt, one or more of the facts alleged by the state in support of an
aggravated sentence, the court may sentence the offender pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.535 to a term of confinement up to the maximum allowed under
RCW 9A.20.021 for the underlying conviction if it finds, considering
the purposes of this chapter, that the facts found are substantial and
compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.431 and 1995 c 288 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a plea agreement has been reached by the prosecutor and the
defendant pursuant to RCW 9.94A.421, they shall at the time of the
defendant's plea state to the court, on the record, the nature of the
agreement and the reasons for the agreement. The prosecutor shall
inform the court on the record whether the victim or victims of all
crimes against persons, as defined in RCW 9.94A.411, covered by the
plea agreement have expressed any objections to or comments on the
nature of and reasons for the plea agreement. The court, at the time
of the plea, shall determine if the agreement is consistent with the
interests of justice and with the prosecuting standards. If the court
determines it is not consistent with the interests of justice and with
the prosecuting standards, the court shall, on the record, inform the
defendant and the prosecutor that they are not bound by the agreement
and that the defendant may withdraw the defendant's plea of guilty, if
one has been made, and enter a plea of not guilty.
(2) The sentencing judge is not bound by any recommendations
contained in an allowed plea agreement and the defendant shall be so
informed at the time of plea.
(3) The defendant shall be informed at the time of the plea that:
(a) The sentencing judge may decide to initiate proceedings pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.535 to impose an aggravated exceptional sentence pursuant to
this chapter at any time prior to the imposition of sentence; and (b)
if aggravated exceptional sentence proceedings are initiated the
defendant may withdraw the plea of guilty and enter a plea of not
guilty and the prosecutor shall not be bound by the plea agreement and
is relieved of any obligation to comply with the terms of the plea
agreement.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.10.030 and 1975 c 40 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The attorney general shall:
(1) Appear for and represent the state before the supreme court or
the court of appeals in all cases in which the state is interested;
(2) Institute and prosecute all actions and proceedings for, or for
the use of the state, which may be necessary in the execution of the
duties of any state officer;
(3) Defend all actions and proceedings against any state officer or
employee acting in his or her official capacity, in any of the courts
of this state or the United States;
(4) Consult with and advise the several prosecuting attorneys in
matters relating to the duties of their office, and when the interests
of the state require, he or she shall attend the trial of any person
accused of a crime, and assist in the prosecution;
(5) Appear for and represent the state whenever a superior court
judge has initiated aggravated exceptional sentence proceedings
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.537(2) and the prosecuting attorney has indicated
that he or she will not act to seek an exceptional sentence;
(6) Consult with and advise the governor, members of the
legislature, and other state officers, and when requested, give written
opinions upon all constitutional or legal questions relating to the
duties of such officers;
(((6))) (7) Prepare proper drafts of contracts and other
instruments relating to subjects in which the state is interested;
(((7))) (8) Give written opinions, when requested by either branch
of the legislature, or any committee thereof, upon constitutional or
legal questions;
(((8))) (9) Enforce the proper application of funds appropriated
for the public institutions of the state, and prosecute corporations
for failure or refusal to make the reports required by law;
(((9))) (10) Keep in proper books a record of all cases prosecuted
or defended by him or her, on behalf of the state or its officers, and
of all proceedings had in relation thereto, and deliver the same to his
or her successor in office;
(((10))) (11) Keep books in which he or she shall record all the
official opinions given by him or her during his or her term of office,
and deliver the same to his or her successor in office;
(((11))) (12) Pay into the state treasury all moneys received by
him or her for the use of the state.

--- END ---