BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person shall not be charged, subject to civil forfeiture, or
otherwise prosecuted for a violation of this chapter if:
(a) The person was a witness to a drug overdose;
(b) The person reasonably believed that the overdose would result
in an imminent threat to the health or life of the overdose victim;
(c) The person reported the drug overdose to law enforcement or
summoned medical assistance at the time it was witnessed; and
(d) All evidence of the specific violation was gained as a result
of the person's report.
(2) This section does not apply to prosecutions under RCW
69.50.415.
(3) This section does not apply to prosecutions where the person
who reported the overdose sold the drugs to the victim.

--- END ---