BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.130.100 and 1989 c 175 s 69 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The procedures governing adjudicative proceedings before
agencies under chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act,
govern all hearings before the disciplining authority. The
disciplining authority has, in addition to the powers and duties set
forth in this chapter, all of the powers and duties under chapter 34.05
RCW, which include, without limitation, all powers relating to the
administration of oaths, the receipt of evidence, the issuance and
enforcing of subpoenas, and the taking of depositions.
(2) With respect to the use of expert testimony in a hearing on
charges:
(a) Each party may designate, identify, or call to testify at
hearing no more than one expert witness on any issue presented.
(b) No expert testimony shall be permitted by any party unless the
following information is exchanged in written form with counsel for the
other party:
(i) A curriculum vitae setting forth the qualifications of the
expert.
(ii) A brief narrative statement of the general substance of the
testimony that the expert is expected to give, including any opinion
testimony and its basis.
(iii) A representation that the expert has agreed to testify at the
hearing.
(iv) A statement of the expert's hourly and daily fee for providing
testimony and for consulting with the party who retained his or her
services.
(3) The exchange of the information described in subsection (2) of
this section shall be completed at least seven calendar days prior to
the scheduled prehearing conference. In the event no prehearing
conference has been scheduled, the exchange shall be completed at least
thirty calendar days prior to the scheduled start date of the hearing.
(4) The uniform procedural rules adopted by all disciplining
authorities in accordance with RCW 18.130.095 may include further
regulations governing the required exchange of the information
described in this section.

--- END ---