BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 5.60.060 and 2006 c 259 s 2, 2006 c 202 s 1, and 2006
c 30 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A husband shall not be examined for or against his wife,
without the consent of the wife, nor a wife for or against her husband
without the consent of the husband; nor can either during marriage or
afterward, be without the consent of the other, examined as to any
communication made by one to the other during marriage. But this
exception shall not apply to a civil action or proceeding by one
against the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime
committed by one against the other, nor to a criminal action or
proceeding against a spouse if the marriage occurred subsequent to the
filing of formal charges against the defendant, nor to a criminal
action or proceeding for a crime committed by said husband or wife
against any child of whom said husband or wife is the parent or
guardian, nor to a proceeding under chapter 70.96A, 70.96B, 71.05, or
71.09 RCW: PROVIDED, That the spouse of a person sought to be detained
under chapter 70.96A, 70.96B, 71.05, or 71.09 RCW may not be compelled
to testify and shall be so informed by the court prior to being called
as a witness.
(2)(a) An attorney or counselor shall not, without the consent of
his or her client, be examined as to any communication made by the
client to him or her, or his or her advice given thereon in the course
of professional employment.
(b) A parent or guardian of a minor child arrested on a criminal
charge may not be examined as to a communication between the child and
his or her attorney if the communication was made in the presence of
the parent or guardian. This privilege does not extend to
communications made prior to the arrest.
(3) A member of the clergy, a Christian Science practitioner listed
in The Christian Science Journal, or a priest shall not, without the
consent of a person making the confession or sacred confidence, be
examined as to any confession or sacred confidence made to him or her
in his or her professional character, in the course of discipline
enjoined by the church to which he or she belongs.
(4) Subject to the limitations under RCW 70.96A.140 or 71.05.360
(8) and (9), a physician or surgeon or osteopathic physician or surgeon
or podiatric physician or surgeon shall not, without the consent of his
or her patient, be examined in a civil action as to any information
acquired in attending such patient, which was necessary to enable him
or her to prescribe or act for the patient, except as follows:
(a) In any judicial proceedings regarding a child's injury,
neglect, or sexual abuse or the cause thereof; and
(b) Ninety days after filing an action for personal injuries or
wrongful death, the claimant shall be deemed to waive the physician-patient privilege. Waiver of the physician-patient privilege for any
one physician or condition constitutes a waiver of the privilege as to
all physicians or conditions, subject to such limitations as a court
may impose pursuant to court rules.
(5) A public officer shall not be examined as a witness as to
communications made to him or her in official confidence, when the
public interest would suffer by the disclosure.
(6)(a) A peer support group counselor shall not, without consent of
the law enforcement officer or firefighter making the communication, be
compelled to testify about any communication made to the counselor by
the officer or firefighter while receiving counseling. The counselor
must be designated as such by the sheriff, police chief, fire chief, or
chief of the Washington state patrol, prior to the incident that
results in counseling. The privilege only applies when the
communication was made to the counselor while acting in his or her
capacity as a peer support group counselor. The privilege does not
apply if the counselor was an initial responding officer or
firefighter, a witness, or a party to the incident which prompted the
delivery of peer support group counseling services to the law
enforcement officer or firefighter.
(b) For purposes of this section, "peer support group counselor"
means a:
(i) Law enforcement officer, firefighter, civilian employee of a
law enforcement agency, or civilian employee of a fire department, who
has received training to provide emotional and moral support and
counseling to an officer or firefighter who needs those services as a
result of an incident in which the officer or firefighter was involved
while acting in his or her official capacity; or
(ii) Nonemployee counselor who has been designated by the sheriff,
police chief, fire chief, or chief of the Washington state patrol to
provide emotional and moral support and counseling to an officer or
firefighter who needs those services as a result of an incident in
which the officer or firefighter was involved while acting in his or
her official capacity.
(7) A sexual assault advocate may not, without the consent of the
victim, be examined as to any communication made between the victim and
the sexual assault advocate.
(a) For purposes of this section, "sexual assault advocate" means
the employee or volunteer from a rape crisis center, victim assistance
unit, program, or association, that provides information, medical or
legal advocacy, counseling, or support to victims of sexual assault,
who is designated by the victim to accompany the victim to the hospital
or other health care facility and to proceedings concerning the alleged
assault, including police and prosecution interviews and court
proceedings.
(b) A sexual assault advocate may disclose a confidential
communication without the consent of the victim if failure to disclose
is likely to result in a clear, imminent risk of serious physical
injury or death of the victim or another person. Any sexual assault
advocate participating in good faith in the disclosing of records and
communications under this section shall have immunity from any
liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result from the
action. In any proceeding, civil or criminal, arising out of a
disclosure under this section, the good faith of the sexual assault
advocate who disclosed the confidential communication shall be
presumed.
(8) A domestic violence advocate may not, without the consent of
the victim, be examined as to any communication between the victim and
the domestic violence advocate.
(a) For purposes of this section, "domestic violence advocate"
means an employee or supervised volunteer from a community-based
domestic violence program or human services program that provides
information, advocacy, counseling, crisis intervention, emergency
shelter, or support to victims of domestic violence and who is not
employed by, or under the direct supervision of, a law enforcement
agency, a prosecutor's office, or the child protective services section
of the department of social and health services as defined in RCW
26.44.020.
(b) A domestic violence advocate may disclose a confidential
communication without the consent of the victim if failure to disclose
is likely to result in a clear, imminent risk of serious physical
injury or death of the victim or another person. This section does not
relieve a domestic violence advocate from the requirement to report or
cause to be reported an incident under RCW 26.44.030(1) or to disclose
relevant records relating to a child as required by RCW 26.44.030(11).
Any domestic violence advocate participating in good faith in the
disclosing of communications under this subsection is immune from
liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result from the
action. In any proceeding, civil or criminal, arising out of a
disclosure under this subsection, the good faith of the domestic
violence advocate who disclosed the confidential communication shall be
presumed.

--- END ---