BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) There is growing interest in the tracking, registering, and
reduction of greenhouse gas emissions at both the state and federal
levels of government. This growing interest is evidenced by
Washington's creation of the Washington center for climate and rural
energy development at Washington State University in 2002, to serve as
a central, nonregulatory clearinghouse of credible and reliable
information addressing various aspects of climate change and clean
energy activities, and the 2003 West Coast governor's global warming
initiative launched by the governors of Washington, Oregon, and
California;
(2) Although regulatory regimes will likely be necessary to create
a framework for greenhouse gas reductions, market mechanisms will play
an integral role in any plan to reduce greenhouse gas emissions in the
next century;
(3) The federal government, states, and numerous private sector
businesses in the United States and abroad are discovering that it is
a sound business decision, both financially and environmentally, to
decrease their greenhouse gas emissions, through reduced emissions
and/or carbon sequestration;
(4) As part of the regulatory and market framework for the
reduction of greenhouse gas emissions, many states have enacted
greenhouse gas reporting programs that include a variety of carbon
registration and sequestration programs;
(5) It is important for Washington to analyze the various programs
in order to determine the best steps for the state to take in order to
protect its citizens and the environment as well as provide businesses
and owners of agriculture and forest lands the opportunity to
participate in the various carbon trading markets and programs while
reducing greenhouse gas emissions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The greenhouse gas reporting study panel
is created consisting of the following members appointed by the
governor:
(a) One representative of the governor's office;
(b) The director of the department of agriculture or the director's
designee;
(c) The director of the department of ecology or the director's
designee;
(d) The director of the department of natural resources or the
director's designee;
(e) The director of the department of fish and wildlife or the
director's designee;
(f) Two members from the climate academic sector, one from
Washington State University and one from the University of Washington;
(g) One member representing the department of community, trade, and
economic development;
(h) Two members from industries or businesses that produce carbon
emissions within the state of Washington;
(i) Two members from conservation or environmental groups;
(j) Two members representing owners of private forest lands, one
representative of owners of small private forest lands, and one
representative of owners of large or industrial private forest lands;
(k) Two members representing producers of field crops, at least one
of whom actively employs a minimum tillage management system in his or
her farming operation;
(l) Two members who are producers of livestock, at least one of
whom is actively involved in range management;
(m) One member with expertise in carbon dioxide emissions marketing
or trading;
(n) One member representing conservation districts in this state;
and
(o) One member representing an entity that generates electrical
energy.
(2) Members of the study panel shall serve without compensation but
shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses as provided
in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The Washington climate and rural
energy development center shall, subject to availability of
appropriations, provide space for meetings of the study panel and shall
provide other assistance and staffing needs of the study panel.
Staffing support shall also be provided by the department of community,
trade, and economic development, the department of natural resources,
and the department of ecology.
(3) The study panel shall prepare a report describing other state
registry programs and the opportunities to initiate a statewide
voluntary greenhouse gas emissions registry in Washington, as well as
the recommended structure of such a registry. The study panel and
report shall also:
(a) Investigate the feasibility of a carbon emissions cap and
trading program for the state as a strategy for further reducing
region-wide greenhouse gas emissions and identifying the effort
required to establish industry or sector-specific reporting and
baselines, qualification of third-party organizations to certify
reported baseline emissions, development of an emissions tracking
protocol, instituting an emissions trading mechanism, and any other
topics needed to better understand a registry and cap and trade
program; and
(b) Investigate the existence or potential for development of
sufficient regulatory basis for a carbon trading market that can be
accessed by Washington agricultural and forest landowners, the benefits
and drawbacks of existing models in other states as applied to
Washington, whether the implementation of a consistent protocol in all
western states for the accounting of carbon sequestration capacity
value will enhance carbon trading for the land owners, identify and
recommend areas of research needed to better understand and quantify
the processes of carbon sequestration, and other topics decided by the
study panel as necessary to explore in order to meet the charge of the
study panel.
(4) The study panel shall report the results of this study, along
with any recommendation for legislation, to the governor and the
appropriate standing committees of the legislature by November 1, 2007.

--- END ---