BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.34.230 and 2005 c 449 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Conservation futures are a useful tool for counties to preserve
lands of public interest for future generations. Counties are
encouraged to use some conservation futures as one tool for salmon
preservation purposes.
(2) For the purpose of acquiring conservation futures and other
rights and interests in real property pursuant to RCW 84.34.210 and
84.34.220, and for maintaining and operating any property acquired with
these funds, a county may levy an amount not to exceed six and one-quarter cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation against the
assessed valuation of all taxable property within the county.
(3) In addition to the levy under subsection (1) of this section,
a county may levy an amount not to exceed six and one-quarter cents per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation against the assessed valuation
of all taxable property within the county. At least one-half of the
revenues from this levy shall be used to acquire conservation easements
on farm and agricultural land or purchase the development rights to
farm and agricultural land. Such acquisition of a conservation
easement or purchase of a development right shall be made in a way to
retain the long-term farm and agricultural use of the land. The
remaining revenues from this levy may be used for the purpose of
acquiring conservation futures and other rights and interests in real
property pursuant to RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220, and for maintaining
and operating any property acquired with these funds. A county shall
not impose the levy under this subsection for more than ten years
unless specifically authorized at a general election by a majority of
the registered voters of the county voting on the proposition. The
ballot proposition submitted to the voters shall conform with RCW
29A.36.210.
(4) The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 shall not apply to the tax
((levy)) levies authorized in this section.
(5) Any rights or interests in real property acquired under this
section after July 24, 2005, must be located within the assessing
county. Further, the county must determine if the rights or interests
in real property acquired with these funds would reduce the capacity of
land suitable for development necessary to accommodate the allocated
housing and employment growth, as adopted in the countywide planning
policies. When actions are taken that reduce capacity to accommodate
planned growth, the jurisdiction shall adopt reasonable measures to
increase the capacity lost by such actions.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.36.210 and 2004 c 80 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
the regular property tax levies authorized in RCW 36.69.145, 67.38.130,
84.52.069, or 84.52.135 shall contain in substance the following:

"Shall the . . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose regular property tax levies of . . . . . . (insert
the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of assessed valuation
for each of . . . . . . (insert the maximum number of years allowable)
consecutive years?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"
Each voter shall indicate either "Yes" or "No" on his or her ballot
in accordance with the procedures established under this title.

(2) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
a permanent regular tax levy under RCW 84.52.069 or 84.34.230(3) shall
contain the following:

"Shall the . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing district) be
authorized to impose a PERMANENT regular property levy of . . . . .
(insert the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"

--- END ---