BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that
this act increase the tools available to the state's largest urban area
to increase pedestrian and driver safety. More than six hundred
pedestrians have been killed on Washington state streets and roadways
in the past eight years. The city of Seattle experiences more than
four hundred collisions involving pedestrians each year, and an average
of six pedestrian fatalities a year. Excessive driver speed is often
cited as a factor in traffic fatalities.
The state's largest urban area is encouraged to use traffic safety
cameras for the purpose of detecting speeding violations at locations
with the highest pedestrian, bicycle, and vehicular traffic accident
history.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.63.170 and 2007 c 372 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The use of automated traffic safety cameras for issuance of
notices of infraction is subject to the following requirements:
(a) The appropriate local legislative authority must first enact an
ordinance allowing for their use to detect one or more of the
following: Stoplight, railroad crossing, or school speed zone
violations, or speed violations on arterial streets in cities with a
population over five hundred thousand only. At a minimum, the local
ordinance must contain the restrictions described in this section and
provisions for public notice and signage. Cities and counties using
automated traffic safety cameras before July 24, 2005, are subject to
the restrictions described in this section, but are not required to
enact an authorizing ordinance.
(b) Use of automated traffic safety cameras is restricted to two-arterial intersections, railroad crossings, ((and)) school speed zones,
and arterial streets in cities with a population over five hundred
thousand only.
(c) Automated traffic safety cameras may only take pictures of the
vehicle and vehicle license plate and only while an infraction is
occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of
passengers in the vehicle.
(d) A notice of infraction must be mailed to the registered owner
of the vehicle within fourteen days of the violation, or to the renter
of a vehicle within fourteen days of establishing the renter's name and
address under subsection (3)(a) of this section. The law enforcement
officer issuing the notice of infraction shall include with it a
certificate or facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of photographs,
microphotographs, or electronic images produced by an automated traffic
safety camera, stating the facts supporting the notice of infraction.
This certificate or facsimile is prima facie evidence of the facts
contained in it and is admissible in a proceeding charging a violation
under this chapter. The photographs, microphotographs, or electronic
images evidencing the violation must be available for inspection and
admission into evidence in a proceeding to adjudicate the liability for
the infraction. A person receiving a notice of infraction based on
evidence detected by an automated traffic safety camera may respond to
the notice by mail.
(e) The registered owner of a vehicle is responsible for an
infraction under RCW 46.63.030(1)(e) unless the registered owner
overcomes the presumption in RCW 46.63.075, or, in the case of a rental
car business, satisfies the conditions under subsection (3) of this
section. If appropriate under the circumstances, a renter identified
under subsection (3)(a) of this section is responsible for an
infraction.
(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs,
microphotographs, or electronic images prepared under this section are
for the exclusive use of law enforcement in the discharge of duties
under this section and are not open to the public and may not be used
in a court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or
proceeding relates to a violation under this section. No photograph,
microphotograph, or electronic image may be used for any purpose other
than enforcement of violations under this section nor retained longer
than necessary to enforce this section.
(g) All locations where an automated traffic safety camera is used
must be clearly marked by placing signs in locations that clearly
indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone where traffic
laws are enforced by an automated traffic safety camera.
(h) If a county or city has established an authorized automated
traffic safety camera program under this section, the compensation paid
to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used must be based only
upon the value of the equipment and services provided or rendered in
support of the system, and may not be based upon a portion of the fine
or civil penalty imposed or the revenue generated by the equipment.
(2) Infractions detected through the use of automated traffic
safety cameras are not part of the registered owner's driving record
under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, infractions generated
by the use of automated traffic safety cameras under this section shall
be processed in the same manner as parking infractions, including for
the purposes of RCW 3.46.120, 3.50.100, 35.20.220, 46.16.216, and
46.20.270(3). However, the amount of the fine issued for an infraction
generated through the use of an automated traffic safety camera shall
not exceed the amount of a fine issued for other parking infractions
within the jurisdiction.
(3) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business, the law enforcement agency shall, before a notice of
infraction being issued under this section, provide a written notice to
the rental car business that a notice of infraction may be issued to
the rental car business if the rental car business does not, within
eighteen days of receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing
agency by return mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine
who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction
occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction.
A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a
copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft; or
(c) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car
business may pay the applicable penalty.
Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
chapter for the notice of infraction.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer
from issuing a notice of traffic infraction to a person in control of
a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a),
(b), or (c).
(5) For the purposes of this section, "automated traffic safety
camera" means a device that uses a vehicle sensor installed to work in
conjunction with an intersection traffic control system, a railroad
grade crossing control system, or a speed measuring device, and a
camera synchronized to automatically record one or more sequenced
photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images of the rear of a
motor vehicle at the time the vehicle fails to stop when facing a
steady red traffic control signal or an activated railroad grade
crossing control signal, or exceeds a speed limit ((in a school speed
zone)) as detected by a speed measuring device.

--- END ---