BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a memorandum of understanding
with any federal agency for the purposes of facilitating the crossing
of the border between the state of Washington and the Canadian province
of British Columbia.
(2) The department may enter into an agreement with the Canadian
province of British Columbia for the purposes of implementing a border-crossing initiative.
(3)(a) The department may issue an enhanced driver's license or
identicard for the purposes of crossing the border between the state of
Washington and the Canadian province of British Columbia to an
applicant who provides the department with proof of: United States
citizenship, identity, and state residency. The department shall
continue to offer a standard driver's license and identicard. If the
department chooses to issue an enhanced driver's license, the
department must allow each applicant to choose between a standard
driver's license or identicard, or an enhanced driver's license or
identicard.
(b) The department shall implement a one-to-many biometric matching
system for the enhanced driver's license or identicard. An applicant
for an enhanced driver's license or identicard shall submit a biometric
identifier as designated by the department. The biometric identifier
must be used solely for the purpose of verifying the identity of the
holders and for any purpose set out in RCW 46.20.037. Applicants are
required to sign a declaration acknowledging their understanding of the
one-to-many biometric match.
(c) The enhanced driver's license or identicard must include
reasonable security measures to protect the privacy of Washington state
residents, including reasonable safeguards to protect against
unauthorized disclosure of data about Washington state residents. If
the enhanced driver's license or identicard includes a radio frequency
identification chip, or similar technology, the department shall ensure
that the technology is encrypted or otherwise secure from unauthorized
data access.
(d) The requirements of this subsection are in addition to the
requirements otherwise imposed on applicants for a driver's license or
identicard. The department shall adopt such rules as necessary to meet
the requirements of this subsection. From time to time the department
shall review technological innovations related to the security of
identity cards and amend the rules related to enhanced driver's
licenses and identicards as the director deems consistent with this
section and appropriate to protect the privacy of Washington state
residents.
(4) The department may set a fee for the issuance of enhanced
drivers' licenses and identicards under this section.

--- END ---