BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Washington trade corps fellowship
program is established at the University of Washington center for
international business education and research to promote international
trade and award fellowships to students who have shown significant
interest in pursuing a career in international trade.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply to sections 1 through
7 of this act.
(1) "Center" means the center for international business education
and research at the University of Washington.
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development, or the department of agriculture.
(3) "Fellow" means the recipient of a Washington trade corps
fellowship award.
(4) "Institution" means an accredited public or private university
or college within the state of Washington.
(5) "Trade office" means an office located outside the United
States operated by a private company to promote its products or
services; or funded by the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the department of agriculture for the purpose of
promoting overseas trade and commerce.
(6) "Trading company" means a private company operating in the
state with at least one trade office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Candidates for the fellowship must be:
(a) A resident student as defined in RCW 28B.15.012;
(b) Enrolled in an institution's program offering a degree or
credential in international trade, international relations,
international business, or a related area;
(c) Proficient in the language common to the area in which they
will be placed.
(2) The center may require that fellowship candidates intern in the
state with a trading company or a department prior to final selection.
The department may impose additional requirements as necessary to
facilitate the efficient operation of its trade offices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A fellowship must be available for no more
than fifteen persons per year. Fellows shall serve a minimum of six
months and may serve a maximum of eighteen months. Fellows shall be
compensated with a stipend of no less than ten thousand dollars.
Fellows shall be provided living and travel expenses while overseas,
but the total cost provided by the center per fellow, per year, must
not exceed sixty percent of the state's average yearly wage, or twenty-five thousand dollars, whichever is greater. Institutions are
encouraged to and may provide students with college credit for serving
as a fellow. The center shall seek matching funds from trading
companies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The center shall appoint a committee to
assist it in evaluating and selecting applicants for the fellowships.
At least three of the committee members must be members of
organizations concerned with international trade; at least one must be
from a statewide organization; and at least two must represent regional
organizations from different regions of the state. At least three of
the committee members must be from institutions and have expertise in
international trade. The decision of the center in selecting fellows
is final.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The center shall assign fellows to trade
offices in consultation with each fellow's institution. A placement in
a department's trade office will be made with the approval of the
department. No more than two fellows shall be assigned to any trade
office at one time.
(2) The center shall establish reporting requirements, which the
fellows must meet. The center's reporting requirements may include
research of value to a trading company, a department's international
trade staff, or to trade promotion groups in the state, and may be in
conjunction with or in addition to any requirements of the institution.
(3) The center may require that the fellow enter into
postfellowship employment with a trading company or a department. The
center may require that some or all of the fellowship costs be repaid
if the fellowship requirements are not met.
(4) The center shall report to the legislature on the Washington
trade corps fellowship program by December 1, 2010, and by December 1st
of every other year thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Neither the center, the trading companies,
the departments, the institution, nor any other division of the state
is liable for injuries caused by a change in the security situation of
the country in which a fellow is stationed. Fellows shall follow all
travel advisories published by the United States department of state
for the country in which they are stationed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.31 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2008, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---