BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.230 and 1991 c 238 s 140 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that global competition requires an alignment
between economic development and workforce development and that the
needs of the workforce and the economy necessitate enhanced vocational
education opportunities in secondary education including
entrepreneurial training and curriculum which integrates vocational and
academic education. In order for the state's workforce to be
competitive in the world market, employees need to understand how
businesses operate and become successful. They also need competencies
in both vocational/technical skills and in core essential competencies
such as English, math, science/technology, geography, history, and
critical thinking. Curriculum which integrates vocational and academic
education reflects that many students learn best through applied
learning, and that students should be offered flexible education
opportunities which prepare them for both the world of work and for
higher education.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.300.235 and 1991 c 238 s 141 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall, with the advice
of the workforce training and education coordinating board, develop
model curriculum integrating vocational and academic education at the
secondary level. The curriculum shall integrate vocational education
for gainful employment with education in the academic subjects of
English, math, science/technology, geography, and history, and with
education in critical thinking. Upon completion, the model curriculum
shall be provided for consideration and use by school districts.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall, with the advice
of the workforce training and education coordinating board, distribute
grants for entrepreneurial education and development programs. School
districts may apply for and administer these grants independently or
jointly with other school districts or educational service districts.
(a) The grants may be expended on proven effective programs
including: Specialized curriculum for entrepreneurial studies offered
as stand-alone classes or integrated into existing subjects; extended
learning activities and use of volunteer instructors for classroom
instruction; summer camps; weekend or evening workshops; creation of
student enterprises; business plan competition; mentoring; and teacher
training.
(b) In selecting projects for grant awards, the superintendent of
public instruction shall give additional consideration to applicants
whose proposals include collaboration with community or business
organizations or financial institutions.
(c) Grant awards must be for new projects or expansion of existing
projects. Those grant applicants with existing projects must show that
the funds awarded will not go to the maintenance of effort of existing
projects but will be used to carry out new or expanded activities.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.630.881 and 1997 c 58 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that students who do not prepare for
postsecondary education, training, and employment are more likely to
become dependent on state assistance programs than those who do make
such preparation and that long-term employment and earning outcomes for
youth can be significantly improved through school-to-work transition
efforts, particularly through work-based learning experiences. The
legislature intends that every effort be made to involve all youth in
preparation for postsecondary education, training, and employment,
including out-of-school youth.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall, with the advice
of the workforce training and education coordinating board, distribute
grants for school-to-work transition programs. School districts may
apply for and administer these grants independently or jointly with
other school districts or educational service districts.
(a) In selecting programs for grant awards, the superintendent of
public instruction shall give additional consideration to applicants
whose proposals include collaboration with community organizations or
local businesses.
(b) Grant awards must be for new projects or expansion of existing
projects. Those grant applicants with existing projects must show that
the funds awarded will not go to the maintenance of effort of existing
projects but will be used to carry out new or expanded activities.
(3) Washington is engaged in developing school-to-work transitions
for all youth, which involves preparation for postsecondary education,
training, and employment and requires outreach to out-of-school youth.
All school-to-work transition projects in the state, therefore, whether
funded by state or federal funds, shall contain an outreach component
directed toward school-age youth not currently enrolled in school and
demonstrate the involvement of all in-school youth in preparation for
postsecondary education or training or employment. At the time a
school-to-work grant is made, the superintendent of public instruction
shall withhold twenty percent of the grant award and release the funds
upon a showing that the project has satisfactorily included outreach to
out-of-school youth and progress in involving students not
traditionally engaged in preparation for postsecondary education,
training, or employment.
(((3))) (4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall provide technical assistance to ensure that school districts
establish and operate outreach efforts under this section, and to
include out-of-school youth in school-to-work efforts within available
funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to any youth training activities that federal
regulations require of local workforce development councils, the
councils shall offer entrepreneurial training opportunities to youth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 28A.630.881 is recodified as a new
section in chapter 28A.300 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The sum of two million dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund
to the superintendent of public instruction for the biennium ending
June 30, 2009, for the purposes of RCW 28A.300.235(2).
(2) The sum of two million dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the superintendent
of public instruction for the biennium ending June 30, 2009, for the
purposes of section 3(2) of this act.

--- END ---