BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that encouraging
outstanding students to enter mathematics and science professions is of
paramount importance to the state of Washington. By creating the
mathematics and science professions conditional scholarship, the
legislature intends to assist in the effort to recruit as mathematics
and science professionals individuals who have distinguished themselves
through outstanding academic achievement or demonstrated their
commitment to mathematics and science professions. The legislature
urges business, industry, and philanthropic community organizations to
join with state government in making this program successful.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(2) "Conditional scholarship" means a loan that is forgiven in
whole or in part if the recipient renders service in a qualified
profession in this state.
(3) "Eligible student" means a student who is registered for at
least six credit hours or the equivalent, has a 3.0 grade point average
at an institution of higher education, is a resident student as defined
by RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013, has declared mathematics,
engineering, a physical science, or a natural science for his or her
major, and has a declared intention to complete a program leading to a
qualified profession in the state of Washington.
(4) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means to render
service in a qualified profession in the state of Washington in lieu of
monetary repayment.
(5) "Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a
college or university in the state of Washington that is accredited by
an accrediting association recognized as such by rule of the board.
(6) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received a
conditional scholarship under this chapter.
(7) "Qualified profession" means a mathematics, engineering,
physical science, or natural science profession.
(8) "Satisfied" means paid-in-full.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The qualified professions conditional
scholarship program is established. The program shall be administered
by the board. In administering the program, the board has the
following powers and duties:
(1) Select students to receive conditional scholarships;
(2) Adopt necessary rules and guidelines;
(3) Publicize the program;
(4) Collect and manage repayments from students who do not meet
their obligations under this chapter; and
(5) Solicit and accept grants and donations from public and private
sources for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The board may select participants based
on an application process conducted by the board.
(2) The board shall establish a selection committee for screening
and selecting recipients of the qualified professions conditional
scholarships. The criteria shall emphasize factors demonstrating
excellence including but not limited to superior scholastic
achievement, leadership ability, and community contributions. The
criteria shall also take into account the diverse nature of the
disciplines eligible for the conditional scholarship and allocate the
funds in a manner to represent a cross section of the fields.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 To receive additional disbursements under
the program under this chapter, a participant must be considered by his
or her institution of higher education to be in a satisfactory progress
condition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The board may award conditional scholarships
to eligible students from the funds appropriated to the board for this
purpose, or from any private donations, or any other funds given to the
board for this program. The amount of the conditional scholarship
awarded an individual shall not exceed the amount of tuition and fees
at the institution of higher education attended by the participant or
resident undergraduate tuition and fees at the University of Washington
per academic year for a full-time student, whichever is lower.
Participants are eligible to receive conditional scholarships for a
maximum of five years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Participants in the qualified
professions conditional scholarship program incur an obligation to
repay the conditional scholarship, with interest, unless they are
employed in a qualified profession for each year of scholarship
received, under rules adopted by the board.
(2) The interest rate shall be determined annually by the board.
(3) The minimum payment shall be set by the board. The maximum
period for repayment shall be ten years, with payments of principal and
interest accruing quarterly commencing six months from the date the
participant completes or discontinues the course of study. Provisions
for deferral of payment shall be determined by the board.
(4) The entire principal and interest of each payment shall be
forgiven for each payment period in which the participant is employed
in a qualified profession until the entire repayment obligation is
satisfied. Should the participant cease to be employed in a qualified
profession in this state before the participant's repayment obligation
is completed, payments on the unsatisfied portion of the principal and
interest shall begin the next payment period and continue until the
remainder of the participant's repayment obligation is satisfied.
(5) The board is responsible for collection of repayments made
under this section and shall exercise due diligence in such collection,
maintaining all necessary records to ensure that maximum repayments are
made. Collection and servicing of repayments under this section shall
be pursued using the full extent of the law, including wage garnishment
if necessary. The board is responsible to forgive all or parts of such
repayments under the criteria established in this section and shall
maintain all necessary records of forgiven payments.
(6) Receipts from the payment of principal or interest or any other
subsidies to which the board as administrator is entitled, that are
paid by or on behalf of participants under this section, shall be
deposited in the qualified professions conditional scholarship account
and shall be used to cover the costs of granting the conditional
scholarships, maintaining necessary records, and making collections
under subsection (5) of this section. The board shall maintain
accurate records of these costs, and all receipts beyond those
necessary to pay such costs shall be used to grant conditional
scholarships to eligible students.
(7) The board shall adopt rules to define the terms of repayment,
including applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The qualified professions conditional
scholarship account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
An appropriation is not required for expenditures of funds from the
account. The account is not subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW except for moneys used for program administration.
(2) The board shall deposit in the account all moneys received for
the program. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds
appropriated by the legislature for the qualified professions
conditional scholarship program, private contributions to the program,
and receipts from participant repayments.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for
conditional scholarships to participants in the program established by
this chapter and costs associated with program administration by the
board.
(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the
authorization of the board.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2006 c 311 s 21 and 2006 c 120 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers
conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the
grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the produce railcar
pool account, the qualified professions conditional scholarship
account, the regional transportation investment district account, the
rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing commission
class C purse fund account, the individual development account program
account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account
(earnings from the Washington horse racing commission operating account
must be credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account), the life sciences discovery fund, and the reading
achievement account. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---