BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the provision of
occupational skills, employment experience, and job placement
assistance to juvenile offenders is of particular value in reducing the
recidivism rate of such offenders and reducing the potential for
violent behavior by such offenders upon return to their communities.
It is the intent of the legislature that the educational and training
needs of all juvenile offenders in state institutions and group homes
be met in a manner that allows the youth to obtain gainful employment
upon release. It is the purpose of this act to enhance the career
options and job readiness of incarcerated youth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 13.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director of the division of juvenile rehabilitation and the
several school districts within which there is located a residential
school shall develop and implement a job skills training program as
part of the division's and the districts' overall treatment and
educational responsibilities to juvenile offenders in all residential
schools. The program shall provide youth with skills necessary to
locate, compete for, and maintain employment in demand occupations. In
operating the program the director and the several school districts
shall:
(a) Assure that educational programs offered are occupationally
based and provide a wide range of prevocational skills necessary to
career development;
(b) Assure that vocational skills obtained in the classroom and in
school are transferable to the emerging labor market;
(c) Assure that basic skill offerings include remedial and advanced
skills in workplace communication, negotiation, teamwork, and problem
solving;
(d) Develop a system-wide process for evaluating all youth on the
basis of self-management skills, employability skills, and life skills;
(e) Work with the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to assure that credit is awarded toward high school
completion for documented performance gains and vocational skill
acquisition in addition to traditional or standard academic credit
awarded for completion hours;
(f) Work with local business organizations to provide information
and career awareness to youth in all facilities; and
(g) Provide institutional work experience opportunities and
programs that are coordinated with educational programs to reinforce
learning and application of skills.
(2) The director and the several school districts shall consult
with the employment security department, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, and the workforce training and
education coordinating board on the design, implementation,
coordination, and management of the program.
(3) The director shall ensure that all facility counselors are
trained in the area of youth employment skills assessment and
development.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.190.030 and 1995 c 77 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each school district within which there is located a residential
school shall, singly or in concert with another school district
pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 or pursuant to chapter
39.34 RCW, conduct a program of education, including the job skills
training program created in section 2 of this act and related student
activities, for residents of the residential school. Except as
otherwise provided for by contract pursuant to RCW 28A.190.050, the
duties and authority of a school district and its employees to conduct
such a program shall be limited to the following:
(1) The employment, supervision and control of administrators,
teachers, specialized personnel and other persons, deemed necessary by
the school district for the conduct of the program of education;
(2) The purchase, lease or rental and provision of textbooks, maps,
audio-visual equipment, paper, writing instruments, physical education
equipment and other instructional equipment, materials and supplies,
deemed necessary by the school district for the conduct of the program
of education;
(3) The development and implementation, in consultation with the
superintendent or chief administrator of the residential school or his
or her designee, of the curriculum;
(4) The conduct of a program of education, including related
student activities, for residents who are three years of age and less
than twenty-one years of age, and have not met high school graduation
requirements as now or hereafter established by the state board of
education and the school district which includes:
(a) Not less than one hundred and eighty school days each school
year;
(b) Special education pursuant to RCW 28A.155.010 through
28A.155.100, and vocational education including the job skills training
program created in section 2 of this act, as necessary to address the
unique needs and limitations of residents. Vocational education
opportunities shall be made available to each residential school
student between the ages of fourteen and twenty-one. The vocational
programs offered shall be occupationally based and provide skills that
are transferrable to the emerging labor market; and
(c) Such courses of instruction and school related student
activities as are provided by the school district for nonresidential
school students to the extent it is practical and judged appropriate
for the residents by the school district after consultation with the
superintendent or chief administrator of the residential school:
PROVIDED, That a preschool special education program may be provided
for residential school students with disabilities;
(5) The control of students while participating in a program of
education conducted pursuant to this section and the discipline,
suspension or expulsion of students for violation of reasonable rules
of conduct adopted by the school district; and
(6) The expenditure of funds for the direct and indirect costs of
maintaining and operating the program of education that are
appropriated by the legislature and allocated by the superintendent of
public instruction for the exclusive purpose of maintaining and
operating residential school programs of education, and funds from
federal and private grants, bequests and gifts made for the purpose of
maintaining and operating the program of education.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.190.040 and 1990 c 33 s 173 are each amended to
read as follows:
The duties and authority of the department of social and health
services and of each superintendent or chief administrator of a
residential school to support each program of education conducted by a
school district pursuant to RCW 28A.190.030, shall include the
following:
(1) The provision of transportation for residential school students
to and from the sites of the program of education through the purchase,
lease or rental of school buses and other vehicles as necessary;
(2) The provision of safe and healthy building and playground space
for the conduct of the program of education through the construction,
purchase, lease or rental of such space as necessary;
(3) The provision of furniture, vocational instruction machines and
tools, building and playground fixtures, and other equipment and
fixtures for the conduct of the program of education through
construction, purchase, lease or rental as necessary;
(4) The provision of heat, lights, telephones, janitorial services,
repair services, and other support services for the vehicles, building
and playground spaces, equipment and fixtures provided for in this
section;
(5) The employment, supervision and control of persons to transport
students and to maintain the vehicles, building and playground spaces,
equipment and fixtures, provided for in this section;
(6) Clinical and medical evaluation services necessary to a
determination by the school district of the educational needs of
residential school students; and
(7) Such other support services and facilities as are reasonably
necessary for the conduct of the program of education and the job
skills training program created in section 2 of this act.

--- END ---