BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature declares that the exclusion of certain persons
from gambling premises that conduct licensed gambling activities is
necessary to carry out the policies of this chapter and to effectively
maintain the strict regulation of gambling.
(2)(a) The commission may, by rule, provide for the establishment
of a list of persons who are to be excluded from licensed gambling
premises.
(b) The commission's rules must define the standards for exclusion
and must include standards relating to persons:
(i) Who are career or professional offenders or involved in
organized crime;
(ii) Who have been convicted of a criminal violation of a gambling
law of any state or of the United States, or who have been convicted of
any felony including, but not limited to, theft, extortion, conspiracy
to defraud, or any similar offense involving, or in connection with,
any gambling activity; or
(iii) Who have been excluded under similar involuntary exclusion
laws or rules of any other state or nation that regulates gambling.
(c) A person may not be placed upon the list of exclusion because
of sex, sexual orientation, race, creed, color, national origin,
marital status, age, or the presence of any mental or physical
disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
person with a disability.
(3)(a) Any person listed on the commission's exclusion list will
remain listed until the person proves by clear and convincing evidence
that they are eligible to be removed from the commission's exclusion
list.
(b) The commission's rules must include the standards and processes
for removal.
(4) The commission may impose sanctions upon a licensee if the
licensee knowingly fails to exclude from its gambling premises any
person placed by the commission on the list of persons to be excluded.
(5)(a) Any list compiled by the commission of persons to be
excluded shall not be deemed an all-inclusive list. Licensees must
keep from their gambling premises persons known to them to fall within
the standards defined under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
When the commission places the name of a person on a list under
this section, the commission must serve notice to the person by
personal service or by certified mail to the last known address of the
person. If personal service is not accomplished and there is no last
known address, the commission must publish a notice daily for one week
in a newspaper of general circulation in Thurston county, and publish
a notice on the commission's official internet web site.
(b) Within thirty days after service of the notification, the
person named for exclusion may request a hearing before an
administrative law judge. The commission has the affirmative
obligation to demonstrate by a preponderance of the evidence that the
person named for exclusion satisfies the criteria for exclusion
established by this section and the commission's rules.
(c) Failure to request a hearing within thirty days after service
precludes a person from having an administrative hearing.
(d) If, upon completion of the hearing for exclusion, an
administrative law judge determines that the person named does not
satisfy the criteria for exclusion established by this section and the
commission's rules, the administrative law judge must issue an initial
order denying the listing. The order is subject to review by the
commission.
(e) If, upon completion of a hearing for exclusion, an
administrative law judge determines that placement of the name of the
person on the exclusion list is appropriate, the administrative law
judge must make and enter an initial order to that effect. The order
is subject to review by the commission.
(6) This section does not limit the right of a licensee to exercise
its common law right to exclude or eject permanently from its premises
any person who disrupts the operations of its premises, threatens the
security of its premises or its occupants, or is disorderly or
intoxicated.
(7) A person on the list of excluded persons shall not collect any
winnings or recover any losses arising as a result of any licensed
gambling activity. Additionally, any money or thing of value which has
been obtained by, or is owed to, any person placed on the list of
excluded persons must be forfeited by order of the commission, pursuant
to RCW 9.46.231, following notice to the person and to all claimants
and opportunity to be heard.
(8) A person on the list of excluded persons who enters a gambling
premises is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under RCW
9A.20.021.

--- END ---