BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.02.005 and 2005 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When used in this title, unless otherwise required from the
context:
(1) "Personal representative" includes executor, administrator,
special administrator, and guardian or limited guardian and special
representative.
(2) "Net estate" refers to the real and personal property of a
decedent exclusive of homestead rights, exempt property, the family
allowance and enforceable claims against, and debts of, the deceased or
the estate.
(3) "Representation" refers to a method of determining distribution
in which the takers are in unequal degrees of kinship with respect to
((the intestate)) a decedent, and is accomplished as follows: After
first determining who, of those entitled to share in the estate, are in
the nearest degree of kinship, the estate is divided into equal shares,
the number of shares being the sum of the number of persons who survive
the ((intestate)) decedent who are in the nearest degree of kinship and
the number of persons in the same degree of kinship who died before the
((intestate)) decedent but who left issue surviving the ((intestate))
decedent; each share of a deceased person in the nearest degree shall
be divided among those of the deceased person's issue who survive the
((intestate)) decedent and have no ancestor then living who is in the
line of relationship between them and the ((intestate)) decedent, those
more remote in degree taking together the share which their ancestor
would have taken had he or she survived the ((intestate)) decedent.
((Posthumous children are considered as living at the death of their
parent.))
(4) "Issue" means all the lineal descendants of an individual. An
adopted individual is a lineal descendant of each of his or her
adoptive parents and of all individuals with regard to which each
adoptive parent is a lineal descendant. A child conceived prior to the
death of a parent but born after the death of the deceased parent is
considered as living at the death of the deceased parent.
(5) "Degree of kinship" means the degree of kinship as computed
according to the rules of the civil law; that is, by counting upward
from the intestate to the nearest common ancestor and then downward to
the relative, the degree of kinship being the sum of these two counts.
(6) "Heirs" denotes those persons, including the surviving spouse,
who are entitled under the statutes of intestate succession to the real
and personal property of a decedent on the decedent's death intestate.
(7) "Real estate" includes, except as otherwise specifically
provided herein, all lands, tenements, and hereditaments, and all
rights thereto, and all interest therein possessed and claimed in fee
simple, or for the life of a third person.
(8) "Will" means an instrument validly executed as required by RCW
11.12.020.
(9) "Codicil" means a will that modifies or partially revokes an
existing earlier will. A codicil need not refer to or be attached to
the earlier will.
(10) "Guardian" or "limited guardian" means a personal
representative of the person or estate of an incompetent or disabled
person as defined in RCW 11.88.010 and the term may be used in lieu of
"personal representative" wherever required by context.
(11) "Administrator" means a personal representative of the estate
of a decedent and the term may be used in lieu of "personal
representative" wherever required by context.
(12) "Executor" means a personal representative of the estate of a
decedent appointed by will and the term may be used in lieu of
"personal representative" wherever required by context.
(13) "Special administrator" means a personal representative of the
estate of a decedent appointed for limited purposes and the term may be
used in lieu of "personal representative" wherever required by context.
(14) "Trustee" means an original, added, or successor trustee and
includes the state, or any agency thereof, when it is acting as the
trustee of a trust to which chapter 11.98 RCW applies.
(15) "Nonprobate asset" means those rights and interests of a
person having beneficial ownership of an asset that pass on the
person's death under a written instrument or arrangement other than the
person's will. "Nonprobate asset" includes, but is not limited to, a
right or interest passing under a joint tenancy with right of
survivorship, joint bank account with right of survivorship, payable on
death or trust bank account, transfer on death security or security
account, deed or conveyance if possession has been postponed until the
death of the person, trust of which the person is grantor and that
becomes effective or irrevocable only upon the person's death,
community property agreement, individual retirement account or bond, or
note or other contract the payment or performance of which is affected
by the death of the person. "Nonprobate asset" does not include: A
payable-on-death provision of a life insurance policy, annuity, or
other similar contract, or of an employee benefit plan; a right or
interest passing by descent and distribution under chapter 11.04 RCW;
a right or interest if, before death, the person has irrevocably
transferred the right or interest, the person has waived the power to
transfer it or, in the case of contractual arrangement, the person has
waived the unilateral right to rescind or modify the arrangement; or a
right or interest held by the person solely in a fiduciary capacity.
For the definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to revocation of a
provision for a former spouse upon dissolution of marriage or
declaration of invalidity of marriage, RCW 11.07.010(5) applies. For
the definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to revocation of a
provision for a former spouse upon dissolution of marriage or
declaration of invalidity of marriage, see RCW 11.07.010(5). For the
definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to testamentary disposition
of nonprobate assets, see RCW 11.11.010(7).
(16) "Internal Revenue Code" means the United States Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2001.
(17) References to "section 2033A" of the Internal Revenue Code in
wills, trust agreements, powers of appointment, beneficiary
designations, and other instruments governed by or subject to this
title shall be deemed to refer to the comparable or corresponding
provisions of section 2057 of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by
section 6006(b) of the Internal Revenue Service Restructuring Act of
1998 (H.R. 2676, P.L. 105-206); and references to the section 2033A
"exclusion" shall be deemed to mean the section 2057 deduction.
(18) "Surviving spouse" does not include an individual whose
marriage to the decedent has been dissolved or invalidated unless, by
virtue of a subsequent marriage, he or she is married to the decedent
at the time of death. A decree of separation that does not terminate
the status of husband and wife is not a dissolution or invalidation for
purposes of this subsection.
Words that import the singular number may also be applied to the
plural of persons and things.
Words importing the masculine gender only may be extended to
females also.

Sec. 2 RCW 11.07.010 and 2002 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies to all nonprobate assets, wherever
situated, held at the time of entry ((by a superior court of this
state)) of a decree of dissolution of marriage or a declaration of
invalidity.
(2)(a) If a marriage is dissolved or invalidated, a provision made
prior to that event that relates to the payment or transfer at death of
the decedent's interest in a nonprobate asset in favor of or granting
an interest or power to the decedent's former spouse is revoked. A
provision affected by this section must be interpreted, and the
nonprobate asset affected passes, as if the former spouse failed to
survive the decedent, having died at the time of entry of the decree of
dissolution or declaration of invalidity.
(b) This subsection does not apply if and to the extent that:
(i) The instrument governing disposition of the nonprobate asset
expressly provides otherwise;
(ii) The decree of dissolution or declaration of invalidity
requires that the decedent maintain a nonprobate asset for the benefit
of a former spouse or children of the marriage, payable on the
decedent's death either outright or in trust, and other nonprobate
assets of the decedent fulfilling such a requirement for the benefit of
the former spouse or children of the marriage do not exist at the
decedent's death; or
(iii) If not for this subsection, the decedent could not have
effected the revocation by unilateral action because of the terms of
the decree or declaration, or for any other reason, immediately after
the entry of the decree of dissolution or declaration of invalidity.
(3)(a) A payor or other third party in possession or control of a
nonprobate asset at the time of the decedent's death is not liable for
making a payment or transferring an interest in a nonprobate asset to
a decedent's former spouse whose interest in the nonprobate asset is
revoked under this section, or for taking another action in reliance on
the validity of the instrument governing disposition of the nonprobate
asset, before the payor or other third party has actual knowledge of
the dissolution or other invalidation of marriage. A payor or other
third party is liable for a payment or transfer made or other action
taken after the payor or other third party has actual knowledge of a
revocation under this section.
(b) This section does not require a payor or other third party to
pay or transfer a nonprobate asset to a beneficiary designated in a
governing instrument affected by the dissolution or other invalidation
of marriage, or to another person claiming an interest in the
nonprobate asset, if the payor or third party has actual knowledge of
the existence of a dispute between the former spouse and the
beneficiaries or other persons concerning rights of ownership of the
nonprobate asset as a result of the application of this section among
the former spouse and the beneficiaries or among other persons, or if
the payor or third party is otherwise uncertain as to who is entitled
to the nonprobate asset under this section. In such a case, the payor
or third party may, without liability, notify in writing all
beneficiaries or other persons claiming an interest in the nonprobate
asset of either the existence of the dispute or its uncertainty as to
who is entitled to payment or transfer of the nonprobate asset. The
payor or third party may also, without liability, refuse to pay or
transfer a nonprobate asset in such a circumstance to a beneficiary or
other person claiming an interest until the time that either:
(i) All beneficiaries and other interested persons claiming an
interest have consented in writing to the payment or transfer; or
(ii) The payment or transfer is authorized or directed by a court
of proper jurisdiction.
(c) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section and (a)
and (b) of this subsection, a payor or other third party having actual
knowledge of the existence of a dispute between beneficiaries or other
persons concerning rights to a nonprobate asset as a result of the
application of this section may condition the payment or transfer of
the nonprobate asset on execution, in a form and with security
acceptable to the payor or other third party, of a bond in an amount
that is double the fair market value of the nonprobate asset at the
time of the decedent's death or the amount of an adverse claim,
whichever is the lesser, or of a similar instrument to provide security
to the payor or other third party, indemnifying the payor or other
third party for any liability, loss, damage, costs, and expenses for
and on account of payment or transfer of the nonprobate asset.
(d) As used in this subsection, "actual knowledge" means, for a
payor or other third party in possession or control of the nonprobate
asset at or following the decedent's death, written notice to the payor
or other third party, or to an officer of a payor or third party in the
course of his or her employment, received after the decedent's death
and within a time that is sufficient to afford the payor or third party
a reasonable opportunity to act upon the knowledge. The notice must
identify the nonprobate asset with reasonable specificity. The notice
also must be sufficient to inform the payor or other third party of the
revocation of the provisions in favor of the decedent's spouse by
reason of the dissolution or invalidation of marriage, or to inform the
payor or third party of a dispute concerning rights to a nonprobate
asset as a result of the application of this section. Receipt of the
notice for a period of more than thirty days is presumed to be received
within a time that is sufficient to afford the payor or third party a
reasonable opportunity to act upon the knowledge, but receipt of the
notice for a period of less than five business days is presumed not to
be a sufficient time for these purposes. These presumptions may be
rebutted only by clear and convincing evidence to the contrary.
(4)(a) A person who purchases a nonprobate asset from a former
spouse or other person, for value and without actual knowledge, or who
receives from a former spouse or other person payment or transfer of a
nonprobate asset without actual knowledge and in partial or full
satisfaction of a legally enforceable obligation, is neither obligated
under this section to return the payment, property, or benefit nor is
liable under this section for the amount of the payment or the value of
the nonprobate asset. However, a former spouse or other person who,
with actual knowledge, not for value, or not in satisfaction of a
legally enforceable obligation, receives payment or transfer of a
nonprobate asset to which that person is not entitled under this
section is obligated to return the payment or nonprobate asset, or is
personally liable for the amount of the payment or value of the
nonprobate asset, to the person who is entitled to it under this
section.
(b) As used in this subsection, "actual knowledge" means, for a
person described in (a) of this subsection who purchases or receives a
nonprobate asset from a former spouse or other person, personal
knowledge or possession of documents relating to the revocation upon
dissolution or invalidation of marriage of provisions relating to the
payment or transfer at the decedent's death of the nonprobate asset,
received within a time after the decedent's death and before the
purchase or receipt that is sufficient to afford the person purchasing
or receiving the nonprobate asset reasonable opportunity to act upon
the knowledge. Receipt of the personal knowledge or possession of the
documents for a period of more than thirty days is presumed to be
received within a time that is sufficient to afford the payor or third
party a reasonable opportunity to act upon the knowledge, but receipt
of the notice for a period of less than five business days is presumed
not to be a sufficient time for these purposes. These presumptions may
be rebutted only by clear and convincing evidence to the contrary.
(5) As used in this section, "nonprobate asset" means those rights
and interests of a person having beneficial ownership of an asset that
pass on the person's death under only the following written instruments
or arrangements other than the decedent's will:
(a) A payable-on-death provision of a life insurance policy,
employee benefit plan, annuity or similar contract, or individual
retirement account, unless provided otherwise by controlling federal
law;
(b) A payable-on-death, trust, or joint with right of survivorship
bank account;
(c) A trust of which the person is a grantor and that becomes
effective or irrevocable only upon the person's death; ((or))
(d) Transfer on death beneficiary designations of a transfer on
death or pay on death security, or joint tenancy or joint tenancy with
right of survivorship designations of a security, if such designations
are authorized under Washington law;
(e) A transfer on death, pay on death, joint tenancy, or joint
tenancy with right of survivorship brokerage account;
(f) Unless otherwise specifically provided therein, a contract
wherein payment or performance under that contract is affected by the
death of the person; or
(g) Unless otherwise specifically provided therein, any other
written instrument of transfer, within the meaning of RCW 11.02.091(3),
containing a provision for the nonprobate transfer of an asset at
death.
For the general definition in this title of "nonprobate asset," see
RCW 11.02.005(15) and for the definition of "nonprobate asset" relating
to testamentary disposition of nonprobate assets, see RCW 11.11.010(7).
For the purposes of this chapter, a "bank account" includes an account
into or from which cash deposits and withdrawals can be made, and
includes demand deposit accounts, time deposit accounts, money market
accounts, or certificates of deposit, maintained at a bank, savings and
loan association, credit union, brokerage house, or similar financial
institution.
(6) This section is remedial in nature and applies as of July 25,
1993, to decrees of dissolution and declarations of invalidity entered
after July 24, 1993, and this section applies as of January 1, 1995, to
decrees of dissolution and declarations of invalidity entered before
July 25, 1993.

Sec. 3 RCW 11.12.260 and 1985 c 23 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A will or a trust of which the decedent is a grantor and which
by its terms becomes irrevocable upon or before the grantor's death may
refer to a writing that directs disposition of tangible personal
property not otherwise specifically disposed of by the will or trust
other than property used primarily in trade or business. Such a
writing shall not be effective unless: (a) An unrevoked will or trust
refers to the writing, (b) the writing is either in the handwriting of,
or signed by, the testator or grantor, and (c) the writing describes
the items and the recipients of the property with reasonable certainty.
(2) The writing may be written or signed before or after the
execution of the will or trust and need not have significance apart
from its effect upon the dispositions of property made by the will or
trust. A writing that meets the requirements of this section shall be
given effect as if it were actually contained in the will or trust
itself, except that if any person designated to receive property in the
writing dies before the testator or grantor, the property shall pass as
further directed in the writing and in the absence of any further
directions, the disposition shall lapse and, in the case of a will, RCW
11.12.110 shall not apply to such lapse.
(3) The testator or grantor may make subsequent handwritten or
signed changes to any writing. If there is an inconsistent disposition
of tangible personal property as between writings, the most recent
writing controls.
(4) As used in this section "tangible personal property" means
articles of personal or household use or ornament, for example,
furniture, furnishings, automobiles, boats, airplanes, and jewelry, as
well as precious metals in any tangible form, for example, bullion or
coins. The term includes articles even if held for investment purposes
and encompasses tangible property that is not real property. The term
does not include mobile homes or intangible property, for example,
money that is normal currency or normal legal tender, evidences of
indebtedness, bank accounts or other monetary deposits, documents of
title, or securities.

Sec. 4 RCW 11.24.010 and 1994 c 221 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
If any person interested in any will shall appear within four
months immediately following the probate or rejection thereof, and by
petition to the court having jurisdiction contest the validity of said
will, or appear to have the will proven which has been rejected, he or
she shall file a petition containing his or her objections and
exceptions to said will, or to the rejection thereof. Issues
respecting the competency of the deceased to make a last will and
testament, or respecting the execution by a deceased of the last will
and testament under restraint or undue influence or fraudulent
representations, or for any other cause affecting the validity of the
will or a part of it, shall be tried and determined by the court.
For the purpose of tolling the four-month limitations period, a
will contest is deemed commenced when a petition is filed with the
court. The petitioner shall personally serve the personal
representative within ninety days of the date of filing the petition.
If, following filing, service is not so made, the action is deemed to
not have been commenced for purposes of tolling the statute of
limitations.
If no person ((shall appear)) files and serves a petition within
the time under this section, the probate or rejection of such will
shall be binding and final.

Sec. 5 RCW 11.96A.150 and 1999 c 42 s 308 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Either the superior court or ((the)) any court on an appeal
may, in its discretion, order costs, including reasonable attorneys'
fees, to be awarded to any party: (a) From any party to the
proceedings; (b) from the assets of the estate or trust involved in the
proceedings; or (c) from any nonprobate asset that is the subject of
the proceedings. The court may order the costs, including reasonable
attorneys' fees, to be paid in such amount and in such manner as the
court determines to be equitable. In exercising its discretion under
this section, the court may consider any and all factors that it deems
to be relevant and appropriate, which factors may but need not include
whether the litigation benefits the estate or trust involved.
(2) This section applies to all proceedings governed by this title,
including but not limited to proceedings involving trusts, decedent's
estates and properties, and guardianship matters. This section shall
not be construed as being limited by any other specific statutory
provision providing for the payment of costs, including RCW 11.68.070
and 11.24.050, unless such statute specifically provides otherwise.
This ((statute [section])) section shall apply to matters involving
guardians and guardians ad litem and shall not be limited or controlled
by the provisions of RCW 11.88.090(((9))) (10).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 11.05.010 (Devolution of property in case of simultaneous
death of owners) and 1965 c 145 s 11.05.010;
(2) RCW 11.05.020 (Procedure when beneficiaries die simultaneously)
and 1965 c 145 s 11.05.020;
(3) RCW 11.05.030 (Joint tenants -- Simultaneous death) and 1965 c
145 s 11.05.030;
(4) RCW 11.05.040 (Distribution of insurance policy when insured
and beneficiary die simultaneously) and 1965 c 145 s 11.05.040;
(5) RCW 11.05.050 (Scope of chapter limited) and 1965 c 145 s
11.05.050;
(6) RCW 11.05.900 (Application of chapter to prior deaths) and 1965
c 145 s 11.05.900; and
(7) RCW 11.05.910 (Construction of chapter) and 1965 c 145 s
11.05.910.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Co-owners with right of survivorship" includes joint tenants,
tenants by the entireties, and other co-owners of property or accounts
held under circumstances that entitle one or more to the whole of the
property or account on the death of the other or others.
(2) "Governing instrument" means a deed, will, trust, insurance or
annuity policy, account with pay on death designation, pension,
profit-sharing, retirement, or similar benefit plan, instrument
creating or exercising a power of appointment or a power of attorney,
or a dispositive, appointive, or nominative instrument of any similar
type.
(3) "Payor" means a trustee, insurer, business entity, employer,
government, governmental agency, subdivision, or instrumentality, or
any other person authorized or obligated by law or a governing
instrument to make payments.
(4) "POD" means pay on death.
(5) "TOD" means transfer on death.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 REQUIREMENT OF SURVIVAL BY ONE HUNDRED
TWENTY HOURS UNDER PROBATE CODE. Except as provided in section 12 of
this act and except for the purposes of the Uniform TOD Security
Registration Act, if the title to property, the devolution of property,
the right to elect an interest in property, or the right to exempt
property, homestead, or family allowance depends upon an individual's
survivorship of the death of another individual, an individual who is
not established by clear and convincing evidence to have survived the
other individual by one hundred twenty hours is deemed to have
predeceased the other individual. This section does not apply if its
application would result in a taking of intestate estate by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 REQUIREMENT OF SURVIVAL BY ONE HUNDRED
TWENTY HOURS UNDER GOVERNING INSTRUMENTS. Except as provided in
section 12 of this act and except for a security registered in
beneficiary form (TOD) under the Uniform TOD Security Registration Act,
for purposes of a provision of a governing instrument that relates to
an individual surviving an event, including the death of another
individual, an individual who is not established by clear and
convincing evidence to have survived the event by one hundred twenty
hours is deemed to have predeceased the event.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 CO-OWNERS WITH RIGHT OF SURVIVORSHIP--REQUIREMENT OF SURVIVAL BY ONE HUNDRED TWENTY HOURS. Except as
provided in section 12 of this act, if (1) it is not established by
clear and convincing evidence that one of two co-owners with right of
survivorship survived the other co-owner by one hundred twenty hours,
one-half of the property passes as if one had survived by one hundred
twenty hours and one-half as if the other had survived by one hundred
twenty hours, and (2) there are more than two co-owners and it is not
established by clear and convincing evidence that at least one of them
survived the others by one hundred twenty hours, the property passes in
the proportion that one bears to the whole number of co-owners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 EVIDENCE OF DEATH OR STATUS. In addition
to the rules of evidence in courts of general jurisdiction, the
following rules relating to a determination of death and status apply:
(1) Death occurs when an individual is determined to be dead by the
attending physician, county coroner, or county medical officer.
(2) A certified or authenticated copy of a death certificate
purporting to be issued by an official or agency of the place where the
death purportedly occurred is prima facie evidence of the fact, place,
date, and time of death and the identity of the decedent.
(3) A certified or authenticated copy of any record or report of a
governmental agency, domestic or foreign, that an individual is
missing, detained, dead, or alive is prima facie evidence of the status
and of the dates, circumstances, and places disclosed by the record or
report.
(4) In the absence of prima facie evidence of death under
subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the fact of death may be
established by clear and convincing evidence, including circumstantial
evidence.
(5) An individual whose death is not established under this section
who is absent for a continuous period of seven years, during which he
or she has not been heard from, and whose absence is not satisfactorily
explained after diligent search or inquiry, is presumed to be dead.
His or her death is presumed to have occurred at the end of the period
unless there is sufficient evidence for determining that death occurred
earlier.
(6) In the absence of evidence disputing the time of death
stipulated on a document described in subsection (2) or (3) of this
section, a document described in subsection (2) or (3) of this section
that stipulates a time of death one hundred twenty hours or more after
the time of death of another individual, however the time of death of
the other individual is determined, establishes by clear and convincing
evidence that the individual survived the other individual by one
hundred twenty hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 EXCEPTIONS. This chapter does not apply
if:
(1) The governing instrument contains language dealing explicitly
with simultaneous deaths or deaths in a common disaster and that
language is operable under the facts of the case;
(2) The governing instrument expressly indicates that an individual
is not required to survive an event, including the death of another
individual, by any specified period or expressly requires the
individual to survive the event for a stated period;
(3) The imposition of a one hundred twenty-hour requirement of
survival would cause a nonvested property interest or a power of
appointment to be invalid under RCW 11.98.130 through 11.98.160; or
(4) The application of this chapter to multiple governing
instruments would result in an unintended failure or duplication of a
disposition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 PROTECTION OF PAYORS, BONA FIDE PURCHASERS,
AND OTHER THIRD PARTIES--PERSONAL LIABILITY OF RECIPIENT. (1)
Protection of Payors and Other Third Parties.
(a) A payor or other third party is not liable for having made a
payment or transferred an item of property or any other benefit to a
person designated in a governing instrument who, under this chapter, is
not entitled to the payment or item of property, or for having taken
any other action in good faith reliance on the person's apparent
entitlement under the terms of the governing instrument, before the
payor or other third party received written notice of a claimed lack of
entitlement under this chapter. A payor or other third party is liable
for a payment made or other action taken after the payor or other third
party received written notice of a claimed lack of entitlement under
this chapter.
(b) Written notice of a claimed lack of entitlement under (a) of
this subsection must be mailed to the payor's or other third party's
main office or home by registered or certified mail, return receipt
requested, or served upon the payor or other third party in the same
manner as a summons in a civil action. Upon receipt of written notice
of a claimed lack of entitlement under this chapter, a payor or other
third party may pay any amount owed or transfer or deposit any item of
property held by it to or with the court having jurisdiction of the
probate proceedings relating to the decedent's estate, or if no
proceedings have been commenced, to or with the court having
jurisdiction of probate proceedings relating to decedents' estates
located in the county of the decedent's residence. The court shall
hold the funds or item of property and, upon its determination under
this chapter, shall order disbursement in accordance with the
determination. Payments, transfers, or deposits made to or with the
court discharge the payor or other third party from all claims for the
value of amounts paid to or items of property transferred to or
deposited with the court.
(2) Protection of Bona Fide Purchasers--Personal Liability of
Recipient.
(a) A person who purchases property for value and without notice,
or who receives a payment or other item of property in partial or full
satisfaction of a legally enforceable obligation, is neither obligated
under this chapter to return the payment, item of property, or benefit
nor liable under this chapter for the amount of the payment or the
value of the item of property or benefit. But a person who, not for
value, receives a payment, item of property, or any other benefit to
which the person is not entitled under this chapter is obligated to
return the payment, item of property, or benefit, or is personally
liable for the amount of the payment or the value of the item of
property or benefit, to the person who is entitled to it under this
chapter.
(b) If this chapter or any part of this chapter is preempted by
federal law with respect to a payment, an item of property, or any
other benefit covered by this chapter, a person who, not for value,
receives the payment, item of property, or any other benefit to which
the person is not entitled under this chapter is obligated to return
the payment, item of property, or benefit, or is personally liable for
the amount of the payment or the value of the item of property or
benefit, to the person who would have been entitled to it were this
chapter or part of this chapter not preempted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 UNIFORMITY OF APPLICATION AND CONSTRUCTION.
This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general
purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this
chapter among states enacting it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as
the Uniform Simultaneous Death Act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 CAPTIONS. Captions used in sections 7
through 18 of this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If any provision of
this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 APPLICATION. On the effective date of this
section:
(1) An act done before the effective date of this section in any
proceeding and any accrued right is not impaired by this chapter. If
a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a
prescribed period of time that has commenced to run by the provisions
of any statute before the effective date of this section, the
provisions remain in force with respect to that right; and
(2) Any rule of construction or presumption provided in this
chapter applies to instruments executed and multiple-party accounts
opened before the effective date of this section unless there is a
clear indication of a contrary intent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 7 through 18 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 11 RCW.

--- END ---