BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 61.24.005 and 1998 c 295 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Grantor" means a person, or its successors, who executes a
deed of trust to encumber the person's interest in property as security
for the performance of all or part of the borrower's obligations.
(2) "Beneficiary" means the holder of the instrument or document
evidencing the obligations secured by the deed of trust, excluding
persons holding the same as security for a different obligation.
(3) "Affiliate of beneficiary" means any entity which controls, is
controlled by, or is under common control with a beneficiary.
(4) "Trustee" means the person designated as the trustee in the
deed of trust or appointed under RCW 61.24.010(2).
(5) "Borrower" means a person or a general partner in a
partnership, including a joint venture, that is liable for all or part
of the obligations secured by the deed of trust under the instrument or
other document that is the principal evidence of such obligations, or
the person's successors if they are liable for those obligations under
a written agreement with the beneficiary.
(6) "Guarantor" means any person and its successors who is not a
borrower and who guarantees any of the obligations secured by a deed of
trust in any written agreement other than the deed of trust.
(7) "Commercial loan" means a loan that is not made primarily for
personal, family, or household purposes.
(8) "Trustee's sale" means a nonjudicial sale under a deed of trust
undertaken pursuant to this chapter.
(9) "Fair value" means the value of the property encumbered by a
deed of trust that is sold pursuant to a trustee's sale. This value
shall be determined by the court or other appropriate adjudicator by
reference to the most probable price, as of the date of the trustee's
sale, which would be paid in cash or other immediately available funds,
after deduction of prior liens and encumbrances with interest to the
date of the trustee's sale, for which the property would sell on such
date after reasonable exposure in the market under conditions requisite
to a fair sale, with the buyer and seller each acting prudently,
knowledgeably, and for self-interest, and assuming that neither is
under duress.
(10) "Record" and "recorded" includes the appropriate registration
proceedings, in the instance of registered land.
(11) "Person" means any natural person, or legal or governmental
entity.
(12) "Residential property" means property upon which four or fewer
residential units are located and one of the residential units is
occupied by the borrower or the borrower's minor or dependent children
as their principal residence from and after the date the foreclosure is
commenced.

Sec. 2 RCW 61.24.010 and 1998 c 295 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The trustee of a deed of trust under this chapter shall be:
(a) Any domestic corporation incorporated under Title 23B, 30, 31,
32, or 33 RCW of which at least one officer is a Washington resident;
or
(b) Any title insurance company authorized to insure title to real
property under the laws of this state, or its agents; or
(c) Any attorney who is an active member of the Washington state
bar association at the time the attorney is named trustee; or
(d) Any professional corporation incorporated under chapter 18.100
RCW, any professional limited liability company formed under chapter
25.15 RCW, any general partnership, including limited liability
partnerships, formed under chapter 25.04 RCW, all of whose
shareholders, members, or partners, respectively, are either licensed
attorneys or entities, provided all of the owners of those entities are
licensed attorneys, or any domestic corporation wholly owned by any of
the entities under this subsection (1)(d); or
(e) Any agency or instrumentality of the United States government;
or
(f) Any national bank, savings bank, or savings and loan
association chartered under the laws of the United States.
(2) The trustee may resign at its own election or be replaced by
the beneficiary. The trustee shall give prompt written notice of its
resignation to the beneficiary. The resignation of the trustee shall
become effective upon the recording of the notice of resignation in
each county in which the deed of trust is recorded. If a trustee is
not appointed in the deed of trust, or upon the resignation,
incapacity, disability, absence, or death of the trustee, or the
election of the beneficiary to replace the trustee, the beneficiary
shall appoint a trustee or a successor trustee. Upon recording the
appointment of a successor trustee in each county in which the deed of
trust is recorded, the successor trustee shall be vested with all
powers of an original trustee.
(3) The trustee or successor trustee shall have no fiduciary duty
or fiduciary obligation to the grantor or other persons having an
interest in the property subject to the deed of trust.
(4) The trustee or successor trustee shall have a duty of fairness
and impartiality to the grantor, beneficiary, and other person having
an interest in the property subject to the deed of trust.

Sec. 3 RCW 61.24.030 and 1998 c 295 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be requisite to a trustee's sale:
(1) That the deed of trust contains a power of sale;
(2) That the deed of trust contains a statement that the real
property conveyed is not used principally for agricultural purposes;
provided, if the statement is false on the date the deed of trust was
granted or amended to include that statement, and false on the date of
the trustee's sale, then the deed of trust must be foreclosed
judicially. Real property is used for agricultural purposes if it is
used in an operation that produces crops, livestock, or aquatic goods;
(3) That a default has occurred in the obligation secured or a
covenant of the grantor, which by the terms of the deed of trust makes
operative the power to sell;
(4) That no action commenced by the beneficiary of the deed of
trust is now pending to seek satisfaction of an obligation secured by
the deed of trust in any court by reason of the grantor's default on
the obligation secured: PROVIDED, That (a) the seeking of the
appointment of a receiver shall not constitute an action for purposes
of this chapter; and (b) if a receiver is appointed, the grantor shall
be entitled to any rents or profits derived from property subject to a
homestead as defined in RCW 6.13.010. If the deed of trust was granted
to secure a commercial loan, this subsection shall not apply to actions
brought to enforce any other lien or security interest granted to
secure the obligation secured by the deed of trust being foreclosed;
(5) That the deed of trust has been recorded in each county in
which the land or some part thereof is situated;
(6) That prior to the date of the notice of trustee's sale and
continuing thereafter through the date of the trustee's sale, the
trustee must ((have)) maintain a street address in this state where
personal service of process may be made, and the trustee must maintain
a physical presence and have telephone service at such address; and
(7) That at least thirty days before notice of sale shall be
recorded, transmitted or served, written notice of default shall be
transmitted by the beneficiary or trustee to the borrower and grantor
at their last known addresses by both first class and either registered
or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the beneficiary or
trustee shall cause to be posted in a conspicuous place on the
premises, a copy of the notice, or personally served on the borrower
and grantor. This notice shall contain the following information:
(a) A description of the property which is then subject to the deed
of trust;
(b) Each county in which the deed of trust is recorded and the
document number given to the deed of trust upon recording by each
county auditor or recording officer;
(c) That the beneficiary has declared the borrower or grantor to be
in default, and a concise statement of the default alleged;
(d) An itemized account of the amount or amounts in arrears if the
default alleged is failure to make payments;
(e) An itemized account of all other specific charges, costs, or
fees that the borrower, grantor, or any guarantor is or may be obliged
to pay to reinstate the deed of trust before the recording of the
notice of sale;
(f) The total of (d) and (e) of this subsection, designated clearly
and conspicuously as the amount necessary to reinstate the note and
deed of trust before the recording of the notice of sale;
(g) That failure to cure the alleged default within thirty days of
the date of mailing of the notice, or if personally served, within
thirty days of the date of personal service thereof, may lead to
recordation, transmittal, and publication of a notice of sale, and that
the property described in (a) of this subsection may be sold at public
auction at a date no less than one hundred twenty days in the future;
(h) That the effect of the recordation, transmittal, and
publication of a notice of sale will be to (i) increase the costs and
fees and (ii) publicize the default and advertise the grantor's
property for sale;
(i) That the effect of the sale of the grantor's property by the
trustee will be to deprive the grantor of all their interest in the
property described in (a) of this subsection; and
(j) That the borrower, grantor, and any guarantor has recourse to
the courts pursuant to RCW 61.24.130 to contest the alleged default on
any proper ground.

Sec. 4 RCW 61.24.040 and 1998 c 295 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A deed of trust foreclosed under this chapter shall be foreclosed
as follows:
(1) At least ninety days before the sale, the trustee shall:
(a) Record a notice in the form described in RCW 61.24.040(1)(f) in
the office of the auditor in each county in which the deed of trust is
recorded;
(b) To the extent the trustee elects to foreclose its lien or
interest, or the beneficiary elects to preserve its right to seek a
deficiency judgment against a borrower or grantor under RCW
61.24.100(3)(a), and if their addresses are stated in a recorded
instrument evidencing their interest, lien, or claim of lien, or an
amendment thereto, or are otherwise known to the trustee, cause a copy
of the notice of sale described in RCW 61.24.040(1)(f) to be
transmitted by both first class and either certified or registered
mail, return receipt requested, to the following persons or their legal
representatives, if any, at such address:
(i) The borrower and grantor;
(ii) The beneficiary of any deed of trust or mortgagee of any
mortgage, or any person who has a lien or claim of lien against the
property, that was recorded subsequent to the recordation of the deed
of trust being foreclosed and before the recordation of the notice of
sale;
(iii) The vendee in any real estate contract, the lessee in any
lease, or the holder of any conveyances of any interest or estate in
any portion or all of the property described in such notice, if that
contract, lease, or conveyance of such interest or estate, or a
memorandum or other notice thereof, was recorded after the recordation
of the deed of trust being foreclosed and before the recordation of the
notice of sale;
(iv) The last holder of record of any other lien against or
interest in the property that is subject to a subordination to the deed
of trust being foreclosed that was recorded before the recordation of
the notice of sale;
(v) The last holder of record of the lien of any judgment
subordinate to the deed of trust being foreclosed; and
(vi) The occupants of property consisting solely of a single-family
residence, or a condominium, cooperative, or other dwelling unit in a
multiplex or other building containing fewer than five residential
units, whether or not the occupant's rental agreement is recorded,
which notice may be a single notice addressed to "occupants" for each
unit known to the trustee or beneficiary;
(c) Cause a copy of the notice of sale described in RCW
61.24.040(1)(f) to be transmitted by both first class and either
certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, to the
plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney of record, in any court action to
foreclose a lien or other encumbrance on all or any part of the
property, provided a court action is pending and a lis pendens in
connection therewith is recorded in the office of the auditor of any
county in which all or part of the property is located on the date the
notice is recorded;
(d) Cause a copy of the notice of sale described in RCW
61.24.040(1)(f) to be transmitted by both first class and either
certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, to any person
who has recorded a request for notice in accordance with RCW 61.24.045,
at the address specified in such person's most recently recorded
request for notice;
(e) Cause a copy of the notice of sale described in RCW
61.24.040(1)(f) to be posted in a conspicuous place on the property, or
in lieu of posting, cause a copy of said notice to be served upon any
occupant of the property;
(f) The notice shall be in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF TRUSTEE'S SALE

I.

NOTICE IS HEREBY GIVEN that the undersigned Trustee will on the . . . .
day of . . . . . ., . . ., at the hour of . . . . o'clock . . . . M. at
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . [street
address and location if inside a building] in the City of . . . . . .,
State of Washington, sell at public auction to the highest and best
bidder, payable at the time of sale, the following described real
property, situated in the County(ies) of . . . . . ., State of
Washington, to-wit:

[If any personal property is to be included in the trustee's
sale, include a description that reasonably identifies such
personal property]

which is subject to that certain Deed of Trust dated . . . . . .,
. . ., recorded . . . . . ., . . ., under Auditor's File No. . . . .,
records of . . . . . . County, Washington, from . . . . . . . . ., as
Grantor, to . . . . . . . . ., as Trustee, to secure an obligation in
favor of . . . . . . . . ., as Beneficiary, the beneficial interest in
which was assigned by . . . . . . . . ., under an Assignment recorded
under Auditor's File No. . . . . [Include recording information for
all counties if the Deed of Trust is recorded in more than one county.]

II.

No action commenced by the Beneficiary of the Deed of Trust is now
pending to seek satisfaction of the obligation in any Court by reason
of the Borrower's or Grantor's default on the obligation secured by the
Deed of Trust.

[If there is another action pending to foreclose other security
for all or part of the same debt, qualify the statement and
identify the action.]

III.

The default(s) for which this foreclosure is made is/are as follows:

[If default is for other than payment of money, set forth the
particulars]

Failure to pay when due the following amounts which are now in arrears:

IV.

The sum owing on the obligation secured by the Deed of Trust is:
Principal $ . . . . . ., together with interest as provided in the note
or other instrument secured from the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . .,
and such other costs and fees as are due under the note or other
instrument secured, and as are provided by statute.

V.

The above-described real property will be sold to satisfy the expense
of sale and the obligation secured by the Deed of Trust as provided by
statute. The sale will be made without warranty, express or implied,
regarding title, possession, or encumbrances on the . . . . day of
. . . . . ., . . . The default(s) referred to in paragraph III must be
cured by the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . (11 days before the sale
date), to cause a discontinuance of the sale. The sale will be
discontinued and terminated if at any time on or before the . . . . day
of . . . . . ., . . ., (11 days before the sale date), the default(s)
as set forth in paragraph III is/are cured and the Trustee's fees and
costs are paid. The sale may be terminated any time after the . . . .
day of . . . . . ., . . . (11 days before the sale date), and before
the sale by the Borrower, Grantor, any Guarantor, or the holder of any
recorded junior lien or encumbrance paying the entire principal and
interest secured by the Deed of Trust, plus costs, fees, and advances,
if any, made pursuant to the terms of the obligation and/or Deed of
Trust, and curing all other defaults.

VI.

A written notice of default was transmitted by the Beneficiary or
Trustee to the Borrower and Grantor at the following addresses:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

by both first class and certified mail on the . . . . day of
. . . . . ., . . ., proof of which is in the possession of the Trustee;
and the Borrower and Grantor were personally served on the . . . . day
of . . . . . ., . . ., with said written notice of default or the
written notice of default was posted in a conspicuous place on the real
property described in paragraph I above, and the Trustee has possession
of proof of such service or posting.

VII.

The Trustee whose name and address are set forth below will provide in
writing to anyone requesting it, a statement of all costs and fees due
at any time prior to the sale.

VIII.

The effect of the sale will be to deprive the Grantor and all those who
hold by, through or under the Grantor of all their interest in the
above-described property.

IX.

Anyone having any objection to the sale on any grounds whatsoever will
be afforded an opportunity to be heard as to those objections if they
bring a lawsuit to restrain the sale pursuant to RCW 61.24.130.
Failure to bring such a lawsuit may result in a waiver of any proper
grounds for invalidating the Trustee's sale.

[Add Part X to this notice if applicable under RCW 61.24.040(9)]

[Acknowledgment]

(2) In addition to providing the borrower and grantor the notice of
sale described in RCW 61.24.040(1)(f), the trustee shall include with
the copy of the notice which is mailed to the grantor, a statement to
the grantor in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF FORECLOSURE Pursuant to the Revised Code of Washington, Chapter 61.24 RCW

The attached Notice of Trustee's Sale is a consequence of
default(s) in the obligation to . . . . . ., the Beneficiary of your
Deed of Trust and owner of the obligation secured thereby. Unless the
default(s) is/are cured, your property will be sold at auction on the
. . . . day of . . . . . ., . . .
To cure the default(s), you must bring the payments current, cure
any other defaults, and pay accrued late charges and other costs,
advances, and attorneys' fees as set forth below by the . . . . day of
. . . . . ., . . . [11 days before the sale date]. To date, these
arrears and costs are as follows:

Estimated amount

Currently due that will be due

to reinstate to reinstate

on. . . . . on. . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

(11 days before

the date set

for sale)

Delinquent payments

from. . . . . . ,

. . . , in the

amount of

$. . . . /mo.: $. . . . $. . . .

Late charges in

the total

amount of: $. . . . $. . . .

Estimated

Amounts

Attorneys' fees: $. . . . $. . . .

Trustee's fee: $. . . . $. . . .

Trustee's expenses:

(Itemization)

Title report $. . . . $. . . .

Recording fees $. . . . $. . . .

Service/Posting
of Notices
$. . . .
$. . . .

Postage/Copying
expense
$. . . .
$. . . .

Publication $. . . . $. . . .

Telephone
charges
$. . . . $. . . .

Inspection fees $. . . . $. . . .

. . . . . . $. . . . $. . . .

. . . . . . $. . . . $. . . .

TOTALS $. . . . $. . . .

To pay off the entire obligation secured by your Deed of Trust as
of the . . . . . day of . . . . . . you must pay a total of $. . . . .
in principal, $. . . . . in interest, plus other costs and advances
estimated to date in the amount of $. . . . . . From and after the
date of this notice you must submit a written request to the Trustee to
obtain the total amount to pay off the entire obligation secured by
your Deed of Trust as of the payoff date.
As to the defaults which do not involve payment of money to the
Beneficiary of your Deed of Trust, you must cure each such default.
Listed below are the defaults which do not involve payment of money to
the Beneficiary of your Deed of Trust. Opposite each such listed
default is a brief description of the action necessary to cure the
default and a description of the documentation necessary to show that
the default has been cured.

You may reinstate your Deed of Trust and the obligation secured
thereby at any time up to and including the . . . . day of . . . . . .,
. . . [11 days before the sale date], by paying the amount set forth or
estimated above and by curing any other defaults described above. Of
course, as time passes other payments may become due, and any further
payments coming due and any additional late charges must be added to
your reinstating payment. Any new defaults not involving payment of
money that occur after the date of this notice must also be cured in
order to effect reinstatement. In addition, because some of the
charges can only be estimated at this time, and because the amount
necessary to reinstate or to pay off the entire indebtedness may
include presently unknown expenditures required to preserve the
property or to comply with state or local law, it will be necessary for
you to contact the Trustee before the time you tender reinstatement or
the payoff amount so that you may be advised of the exact amount you
will be required to pay. Tender of payment or performance must be made
to: . . . . . ., whose address is . . . . . ., telephone ( )
. . . . . . AFTER THE . . . . DAY OF . . . . . ., . . ., YOU MAY NOT
REINSTATE YOUR DEED OF TRUST BY PAYING THE BACK PAYMENTS AND COSTS AND
FEES AND CURING THE OTHER DEFAULTS AS OUTLINED ABOVE. The Trustee will
respond to any written request for current payoff or reinstatement
amounts within ten days of receipt of your written request. In such a
case, you will only be able to stop the sale by paying, before the
sale, the total principal balance ($ . . . . . .) plus accrued
interest, costs and advances, if any, made pursuant to the terms of the
documents and by curing the other defaults as outlined above.
You may contest this default by initiating court action in the
Superior Court of the county in which the sale is to be held. In such
action, you may raise any legitimate defenses you have to this default.
A copy of your Deed of Trust and documents evidencing the obligation
secured thereby are enclosed. You may wish to consult a lawyer. Legal
action on your part may prevent or restrain the sale, but only if you
persuade the court of the merits of your defense.
The court may grant a restraining order or injunction to restrain
a trustee's sale pursuant to RCW 61.24.130 upon five days notice to the
trustee of the time when, place where, and the judge before whom the
application for the restraining order or injunction is to be made.
This notice shall include copies of all pleadings and related documents
to be given to the judge. Notice and other process may be served on
the trustee at:

If you do not reinstate the secured obligation and your Deed of
Trust in the manner set forth above, or if you do not succeed in
restraining the sale by court action, your property will be sold. The
effect of such sale will be to deprive you and all those who hold by,
through or under you of all interest in the property;
(3) In addition, the trustee shall cause a copy of the notice of
sale described in RCW 61.24.040(1)(f) (excluding the acknowledgment) to
be published in a legal newspaper in each county in which the property
or any part thereof is situated, once on or between the thirty-fifth
and twenty-eighth day before the date of sale, and once on or between
the fourteenth and seventh day before the date of sale;
(4) On the date and at the time designated in the notice of sale,
the trustee or its authorized agent shall sell the property at public
auction to the highest bidder. The trustee may sell the property in
gross or in parcels as the trustee shall deem most advantageous;
(5) The place of sale shall be at any designated public place
within the county where the property is located and if the property is
in more than one county, the sale may be in any of the counties where
the property is located. The sale shall be on Friday, or if Friday is
a legal holiday on the following Monday, and during the hours set by
statute for the conduct of sales of real estate at execution;
(6) The trustee has no obligation to, but may, for any cause the
trustee deems advantageous, continue the sale for a period or periods
not exceeding a total of one hundred twenty days by (a) a public
proclamation at the time and place fixed for sale in the notice of sale
and by giving notice of the new time and place of the sale by both
first class and either certified or registered mail, return receipt
requested, to the persons specified in RCW 61.24.040(1) (b), (c), (d),
and (e) to be deposited in the mail (i) not less than four days before
the new date fixed for the sale if the sale is continued for up to
seven days; or (ii) not more than three days after the date of the
continuance by oral proclamation if the sale is continued for more than
seven days, or, alternatively, (b) by giving notice of the time and
place of the postponed sale in the manner and to the persons specified
in RCW 61.24.040(1) (b), (c), (d), and (e) and publishing a copy of
such notice once in the newspaper(s) described in RCW 61.24.040(3),
more than seven days before the date fixed for sale in the notice of
sale. No other notice of the postponed sale need be given;
(7) The purchaser shall forthwith pay the price bid and on payment
the trustee shall execute to the purchaser its deed; the deed shall
recite the facts showing that the sale was conducted in compliance with
all of the requirements of this chapter and of the deed of trust, which
recital shall be prima facie evidence of such compliance and conclusive
evidence thereof in favor of bona fide purchasers and encumbrancers for
value, except that these recitals shall not affect the lien or interest
of any person entitled to notice under RCW 61.24.040(1), if the trustee
fails to give the required notice to such person. In such case, the
lien or interest of such omitted person shall not be affected by the
sale and such omitted person shall be treated as if such person was the
holder of the same lien or interest and was omitted as a party
defendant in a judicial foreclosure proceeding;
(8) The sale as authorized under this chapter shall not take place
less than one hundred ninety days from the date of default in any of
the obligations secured.
(9) If the trustee elects to foreclose the interest of any occupant
or tenant of property comprised solely of a single-family residence, or
a condominium, cooperative, or other dwelling unit in a multiplex or
other building containing fewer than five residential units, the
following notice shall be included as Part X of the Notice of Trustee's
Sale:

X. NOTICE TO OCCUPANTS OR TENANTS

The purchaser at the trustee's sale is entitled to possession of the
property on the 20th day following the sale, as against the grantor
under the deed of trust (the owner) and anyone having an interest
junior to the deed of trust, including occupants and tenants. After
the 20th day following the sale the purchaser has the right to evict
occupants and tenants by summary proceedings under the unlawful
detainer act, chapter 59.12 RCW.
(10) Only one copy of all notices required by this chapter need be
given to a person who is both the borrower and the grantor. All
notices required by this chapter that are given to a general
partnership are deemed given to each of its general partners, unless
otherwise agreed by the parties.

Sec. 5 RCW 61.24.045 and 1985 c 193 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person desiring a copy of any notice of sale described in RCW
61.24.040(1)(f) under any deed of trust, other than a person entitled
to receive such a notice under RCW 61.24.040(1) (b) or (c), must, after
the recordation of such deed of trust and before the recordation of the
notice of sale, cause to be filed for record, in the office of the
auditor of any county in which the deed of trust is recorded, a duly
acknowledged request for a copy of any notice of sale. The request
shall be signed and acknowledged by the person to be notified or such
person's agent, attorney, or representative; shall set forth the name,
mailing address, and telephone number, if any, of the person or persons
to be notified; shall identify the deed of trust by stating the names
of the parties thereto, the date the deed of trust was recorded, the
legal description of the property encumbered by the deed of trust, and
the auditor's file number under which the deed of trust is recorded;
and shall be in substantially the following form:

REQUEST FOR NOTICE

Request is hereby made that a copy of any notice of sale described in
RCW 61.24.040(1)(f) under that certain Deed of Trust dated . . . . . .,
((19)) 20. . ., recorded on . . . . . ., ((19)) 20. . ., under
auditor's file No. . . . . . ., records of . . . . . . County,
Washington, from . . . . . ., as Grantor, to . . . . . . . . ., as
Trustee, to secure an obligation in favor of . . . . . . . . ., as
Beneficiary, and affecting the following described real property:

(Legal Description)

be sent by both first class and either registered or certified mail,
return receipt requested, to . . . . . . . . . at . . . . . . . . .
Dated this . . . . day of . . . . . ., ((19)) 20. . .

(Acknowledgment)

A request for notice under this section shall not affect title to, or
be deemed notice to any person that any person has any right, title,
interest in, lien or charge upon, the property described in the request
for notice.

Sec. 6 RCW 61.24.130 and 1998 c 295 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prejudice the right of
the borrower, grantor, any guarantor, or any person who has an interest
in, lien, or claim of lien against the property or some part thereof,
to restrain, on any proper legal or equitable ground, a trustee's sale.
The court shall require as a condition of granting the restraining
order or injunction on the sale of nonresidential property that the
applicant pay to the clerk of the court the sums that would be due on
the obligation secured by the deed of trust if the deed of trust was
not being foreclosed:
(a) In the case of default in making the periodic payment of
principal, interest, and reserves, such sums shall be the periodic
payment of principal, interest, and reserves paid to the clerk of the
court every thirty days.
(b) In the case of default in making payment of an obligation then
fully payable by its terms, such sums shall be the amount of interest
accruing monthly on said obligation at the nondefault rate, paid to the
clerk of the court every thirty days.
(2) In the case of residential property, the court shall require as
a condition of granting the restraining order or injunction that the
applicant give security in such sum as the court deems proper, for the
payment of such costs and damages, including attorneys' fees, as may be
incurred or suffered by any party who is found to have been wrongfully
enjoined or restrained.
(3) In the case of default in performance of any nonmonetary
obligation secured by the deed of trust on nonresidential or
residential property, the court shall impose such conditions as it
deems just.
In addition, the court may condition granting the restraining order
or injunction of the sale of nonresidential or residential property
upon the giving of security by the applicant, in such form and amount
as the court deems proper, for the payment of such costs and damages,
including attorneys' fees, as may be later found by the court to have
been incurred or suffered by any party by reason of the restraining
order or injunction. The court may consider, upon proper showing, the
grantor's equity in the property in determining the amount of said
security.
(((2))) (4) No court may grant a restraining order or injunction to
restrain a trustee's sale of nonresidential or residential property
unless the person seeking the restraint gives five days notice to the
trustee of the time when, place where, and the judge before whom the
application for the restraining order or injunction is to be made.
This notice shall include copies of all pleadings and related documents
to be given to the judge. No judge may act upon such application
unless it is accompanied by proof, evidenced by return of a sheriff,
the sheriff's deputy, or by any person eighteen years of age or over
who is competent to be a witness, that the notice has been served on
the trustee.
(((3))) (5) If the restraining order or injunction is dissolved
after the date of the trustee's sale set forth in the notice as
provided in RCW 61.24.040(1)(f), the court granting such restraining
order or injunction, or before whom the order or injunction is
returnable, shall, at the request of the trustee, set a new sale date
which shall be not less than forty-five days from the date of the order
dissolving the restraining order. The trustee shall:
(a) Comply with the requirements of RCW 61.24.040(1) (a) through
(f) at least thirty days before the new sale date; and
(b) Cause a copy of the notice of trustee's sale as provided in RCW
61.24.040(1)(f) to be published in a legal newspaper in each county in
which the property or any part thereof is situated once between the
thirty-fifth and twenty-eighth day before the sale and once between the
fourteenth and seventh day before the sale.
(((4))) (6) If a trustee's sale has been stayed as a result of the
filing of a petition in federal bankruptcy court and an order is
entered in federal bankruptcy court granting relief from the stay or
closing or dismissing the case, or discharging the debtor with the
effect of removing the stay, the trustee may set a new sale date which
shall not be less than forty-five days after the date of the bankruptcy
court's order. The trustee shall:
(a) Comply with the requirements of RCW 61.24.040(1) (a) through
(f) at least thirty days before the new sale date; and
(b) Cause a copy of the notice of trustee's sale as provided in RCW
61.24.040(1)(f) to be published in a legal newspaper in each county in
which the property or any part thereof is situated, once between the
thirty-fifth and twenty-eighth day before the sale and once between the
fourteenth and seventh day before the sale.
(((5))) (7) Subsections (((3))) (5) and (((4))) (6) of this section
are permissive only and do not prohibit the trustee from proceeding
with a trustee's sale following termination of any injunction or stay
on any date to which such sale has been properly continued in
accordance with RCW 61.24.040(6).
(8) The issuance of a restraining order or injunction shall not
prohibit the trustee from continuing the sale as provided in RCW
61.24.040(6).

Sec. 7 RCW 61.24.135 and 1998 c 295 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW, for any person, acting alone or in
concert with others, to offer, or offer to accept or accept from
another, any consideration of any type not to bid, or to reduce a bid,
at a sale of property conducted pursuant to a power of sale in a deed
of trust. The trustee may decline to complete a sale or deliver the
trustee's deed and refund the purchase price, if it appears that the
bidding has been collusive or defective, or that the sale might have
been void. However, it is not an unfair or deceptive act or practice
for any person, including a trustee, to state that a property subject
to a recorded notice of trustee's sale or subject to a sale conducted
pursuant to this chapter is being sold in an "as-is" condition, or for
the beneficiary to arrange to provide financing for a particular bidder
or to reach any good faith agreement with the borrower, grantor, any
guarantor, or any junior lienholder.

--- END ---