BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.138 and 2005 c 512 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for children whose cases are reviewed by a citizen
review board under chapter 13.70 RCW, the status of all children found
to be dependent shall be reviewed by the court at least every six
months from the beginning date of the placement episode or the date
dependency is established, whichever is first, at a hearing in which it
shall be determined whether court supervision should continue. The
initial review hearing shall be an in-court review and shall be set six
months from the beginning date of the placement episode or no more than
ninety days from the entry of the disposition order, whichever comes
first. The initial review hearing may be a permanency planning hearing
when necessary to meet the time frames set forth in RCW 13.34.145(3) or
13.34.134. The review shall include findings regarding the agency and
parental completion of disposition plan requirements, and if necessary,
revised permanency time limits. This review shall consider both the
agency's and parent's efforts that demonstrate consistent measurable
progress over time in meeting the disposition plan requirements. The
requirements for the initial review hearing, including the in-court
requirement, shall be accomplished within existing resources. The
supervising agency shall provide a foster parent, preadoptive parent,
or relative with notice of, and their right to an opportunity to be
heard in, a review hearing pertaining to the child, but only if that
person is currently providing care to that child at the time of the
hearing. This section shall not be construed to grant party status to
any person who has been provided an opportunity to be heard.
(a) A child shall not be returned home at the review hearing unless
the court finds that a reason for removal as set forth in RCW 13.34.130
no longer exists. The parents, guardian, or legal custodian shall
report to the court the efforts they have made to correct the
conditions which led to removal. If a child is returned, casework
supervision shall continue for a period of six months, at which time
there shall be a hearing on the need for continued intervention.
(b) Prior to the child returning home, the department must complete
the following:
(i) Identify any persons who may act as a caregiver for the child
in addition to the parent with whom the child is being placed and
determine whether such persons are in need of any services in order to
ensure the safety of the child, regardless of whether such persons are
a party to the dependency. The department or supervising agency may
recommend to the court and the court may order that placement of the
child in the parent's home be contingent on or delayed based on the
need for such persons to engage in or complete services to ensure the
safety of the child prior to placement. If services are recommended
for the caregiver, and the caregiver fails to engage in or follow
through with the recommended services, the department or supervising
agency must promptly notify the court; and
(ii) Notify the parent with whom the child is being placed that he
or she has an ongoing duty to notify the department or supervising
agency of all persons who reside in the home or who may act as a
caregiver for the child both prior to the placement of the child in the
home and subsequent to the placement of the child in the home as long
as the court retains jurisdiction of the dependency proceeding or the
department is providing or monitoring either remedial services to the
parent or services to ensure the safety of the child to any caregivers.
Caregivers may be required to engage in services under this
subsection solely for the purpose of ensuring the present and future
safety of a child who is a ward of the court. This subsection does not
grant party status to any individual not already a party to the
dependency proceeding, create an entitlement to services or a duty on
the part of the department or supervising agency to provide services,
or create judicial authority to order the provision of services to any
person other than for the express purposes of this section or RCW
13.34.025 or if the services are unavailable or unsuitable or the
person is not eligible for such services.
(c) If the child is not returned home, the court shall establish in
writing:
(i) Whether reasonable services have been provided to or offered to
the parties to facilitate reunion, specifying the services provided or
offered;
(ii) Whether the child has been placed in the least-restrictive
setting appropriate to the child's needs, including whether
consideration and preference has been given to placement with the
child's relatives;
(iii) Whether there is a continuing need for placement and whether
the placement is appropriate;
(iv) Whether there has been compliance with the case plan by the
child, the child's parents, and the agency supervising the placement;
(v) Whether progress has been made toward correcting the problems
that necessitated the child's placement in out-of-home care;
(vi) Whether the parents have visited the child and any reasons why
visitation has not occurred or has been infrequent;
(vii) Whether additional services, including housing assistance,
are needed to facilitate the return of the child to the child's
parents; if so, the court shall order that reasonable services be
offered specifying such services; and
(viii) The projected date by which the child will be returned home
or other permanent plan of care will be implemented.
(((c))) (d) The court at the review hearing may order that a
petition seeking termination of the parent and child relationship be
filed.
(2)(a) In any case in which the court orders that a dependent child
may be returned to or remain in the child's home, the in-home placement
shall be contingent upon the following:
(i) The compliance of the parents with court orders related to the
care and supervision of the child, including compliance with an agency
case plan; and
(ii) The continued participation of the parents, if applicable, in
available substance abuse or mental health treatment if substance abuse
or mental illness was a contributing factor to the removal of the
child.
(b) The following may be grounds for removal of the child from the
home, subject to review by the court:
(i) Noncompliance by the parents with the agency case plan or court
order;
(ii) The parent's inability, unwillingness, or failure to
participate in available services or treatment for themselves or the
child, including substance abuse treatment if a parent's substance
abuse was a contributing factor to the abuse or neglect; or
(iii) The failure of the parents to successfully and substantially
complete available services or treatment for themselves or the child,
including substance abuse treatment if a parent's substance abuse was
a contributing factor to the abuse or neglect.
(c) In a pending dependency case in which the court orders that a
dependent child may be returned home and that child is later removed
from the home, the court shall hold a review hearing within thirty days
from the date of removal to determine whether the permanency plan
should be changed, a termination petition should be filed, or other
action is warranted. The best interests of the child shall be the
court's primary consideration in the review hearing.
(3) The court's ability to order housing assistance under RCW
13.34.130 and this section is: (a) Limited to cases in which
homelessness or the lack of adequate and safe housing is the primary
reason for an out-of-home placement; and (b) subject to the
availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose.
(4) The court shall consider the child's relationship with siblings
in accordance with RCW 13.34.130(3).

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.025 and 2002 c 52 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall develop
methods for coordination of services to parents and children in child
dependency cases. To the maximum extent possible under current funding
levels, the department must:
(((1))) (a) Coordinate and integrate services to children and
families, using service plans and activities that address the
children's and families' multiple needs, including ensuring that
siblings have regular visits with each other, as appropriate.
Assessment criteria should screen for multiple needs;
(((2))) (b) Develop treatment plans for the individual needs of the
client in a manner that minimizes the number of contacts the client is
required to make; and
(((3))) (c) Access training for department staff to increase skills
across disciplines to assess needs for mental health, substance abuse,
developmental disabilities, and other areas.
(2) The department shall coordinate within the administrations of
the department, and with contracted service providers, to ensure that
parents in dependency proceedings under this chapter receive priority
access to remedial services recommended by the department in its social
study or ordered by the court for the purpose of correcting any
parental deficiencies identified in the dependency proceeding that are
capable of being corrected in the foreseeable future. Services may
also be provided to caregivers other than the parents as identified in
RCW 13.34.138.
(a) For purposes of this chapter, remedial services are those
services defined in the federal adoption and safe families act as
time-limited family reunification services. Remedial services include
individual, group, and family counseling; substance abuse treatment
services; mental health services; assistance to address domestic
violence; services designed to provide temporary child care and
therapeutic services for families; and transportation to or from any of
the above services and activities.
(b) The department shall provide funds for remedial services if the
parent is unable to pay to the extent funding is appropriated in the
operating budget or otherwise available to the department for such
specific services. As a condition for receiving funded remedial
services, the court may inquire into the parent's ability to pay for
all or part of such services or may require that the parent make
appropriate applications for funding to alternative funding sources for
such services.
(c) If court-ordered remedial services are unavailable for any
reason, including lack of funding, lack of services, or language
barriers, the department shall promptly notify the court that the
parent is unable to engage in the treatment due to the inability to
access such services.
(d) This section does not create an entitlement to services and
does not create judicial authority to order the provision of services
except for the specific purpose of making reasonable efforts to remedy
parental deficiencies identified in a dependency proceeding under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each county shall revise and expand its existing child sexual
abuse investigation protocol to address investigations of child
fatality, child physical abuse, and criminal child neglect cases and to
incorporate the statewide guidelines for first responders to child
fatalities developed by the criminal justice training commission. The
protocols shall address the coordination of child fatality, child
physical abuse, and criminal child neglect investigations between the
county and city prosecutor's offices, law enforcement, children's
protective services, local advocacy groups, emergency medical services,
and any other local agency involved in the investigation of such cases.
The protocol revision and expansion shall be developed by the
prosecuting attorney in collaboration with the agencies referenced in
this section.
(2) Revised and expanded protocols under this section shall be
adopted and in place by July 1, 2008. Thereafter, the protocols shall
be reviewed every two years to determine whether modifications are
needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission, in consultation with the department of social
and health services, the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs, and the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, shall
develop a curriculum related to child abuse and neglect to be included
in the basic law enforcement training that must be successfully
completed within the first fifteen months of employment of all law
enforcement personnel.
(2) The curriculum must be incorporated into the basic law
enforcement training program by July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall analyze gaps throughout the state in the availability
and accessibility of services identified in the federal adoption and
safe families act as it existed on the effective date of this section.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall submit
to appropriate committees of the legislature a report and
recommendations by December 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The administrative office of the courts, in consultation with
the attorney general's office and the department of social and health
services, shall compile an annual report, providing information about
cases that fail to meet statutory guidelines to achieve permanency for
dependent children.
(2) The administrative office of the courts shall submit the annual
report required by this section to appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1st of each year, beginning on December 1,
2007.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.13.330 and 1990 c 284 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
Foster parents are responsible for the protection, care,
supervision, and nurturing of the child in placement. As an integral
part of the foster care team, foster parents shall, if appropriate and
they desire to: Participate in the development of the service plan for
the child and the child's family; assist in family visitation,
including monitoring; ((and)) model effective parenting behavior for
the natural family; and be available to help with the child's
transition back to the natural family.

Sec. 8 RCW 71.24.035 and 2006 c 333 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department is designated as the state mental health
authority.
(2) The secretary shall provide for public, client, and licensed
service provider participation in developing the state mental health
program, developing contracts with regional support networks, and any
waiver request to the federal government under medicaid.
(3) The secretary shall provide for participation in developing the
state mental health program for children and other underserved
populations, by including representatives on any committee established
to provide oversight to the state mental health program.
(4) The secretary shall be designated as the regional support
network if the regional support network fails to meet state minimum
standards or refuses to exercise responsibilities under RCW 71.24.045.
(5) The secretary shall:
(a) Develop a biennial state mental health program that
incorporates regional biennial needs assessments and regional mental
health service plans and state services for mentally ill adults and
children. The secretary shall also develop a six-year state mental
health plan;
(b) Assure that any regional or county community mental health
program provides access to treatment for the region's residents,
including parents who are defendants in dependency cases, in the
following order of priority: (i) The acutely mentally ill; (ii)
chronically mentally ill adults and severely emotionally disturbed
children; and (iii) the seriously disturbed. Such programs shall
provide:
(A) Outpatient services;
(B) Emergency care services for twenty-four hours per day;
(C) Day treatment for mentally ill persons which includes training
in basic living and social skills, supported work, vocational
rehabilitation, and day activities. Such services may include
therapeutic treatment. In the case of a child, day treatment includes
age-appropriate basic living and social skills, educational and
prevocational services, day activities, and therapeutic treatment;
(D) Screening for patients being considered for admission to state
mental health facilities to determine the appropriateness of admission;
(E) Employment services, which may include supported employment,
transitional work, placement in competitive employment, and other work-related services, that result in mentally ill persons becoming engaged
in meaningful and gainful full or part-time work. Other sources of
funding such as the division of vocational rehabilitation may be
utilized by the secretary to maximize federal funding and provide for
integration of services;
(F) Consultation and education services; and
(G) Community support services;
(c) Develop and adopt rules establishing state minimum standards
for the delivery of mental health services pursuant to RCW 71.24.037
including, but not limited to:
(i) Licensed service providers. These rules shall permit a county-operated mental health program to be licensed as a service provider
subject to compliance with applicable statutes and rules. The
secretary shall provide for deeming of compliance with state minimum
standards for those entities accredited by recognized behavioral health
accrediting bodies recognized and having a current agreement with the
department;
(ii) Regional support networks; and
(iii) Inpatient services, evaluation and treatment services and
facilities under chapter 71.05 RCW, resource management services, and
community support services;
(d) Assure that the special needs of minorities, the elderly,
disabled, children, ((and)) low-income persons, and parents who are
defendants in dependency cases are met within the priorities
established in this section;
(e) Establish a standard contract or contracts, consistent with
state minimum standards and RCW 71.24.320, 71.24.330, and 71.24.3201,
which shall be used in contracting with regional support networks. The
standard contract shall include a maximum fund balance, which shall be
consistent with that required by federal regulations or waiver
stipulations;
(f) Establish, to the extent possible, a standardized auditing
procedure which minimizes paperwork requirements of regional support
networks and licensed service providers. The audit procedure shall
focus on the outcomes of service and not the processes for
accomplishing them;
(g) Develop and maintain an information system to be used by the
state and regional support networks that includes a tracking method
which allows the department and regional support networks to identify
mental health clients' participation in any mental health service or
public program on an immediate basis. The information system shall not
include individual patient's case history files. Confidentiality of
client information and records shall be maintained as provided in this
chapter and in RCW 71.05.390, 71.05.420, and 71.05.440;
(h) License service providers who meet state minimum standards;
(i) Certify regional support networks that meet state minimum
standards;
(j) Periodically monitor the compliance of certified regional
support networks and their network of licensed service providers for
compliance with the contract between the department, the regional
support network, and federal and state rules at reasonable times and in
a reasonable manner;
(k) Fix fees to be paid by evaluation and treatment centers to the
secretary for the required inspections;
(l) Monitor and audit regional support networks and licensed
service providers as needed to assure compliance with contractual
agreements authorized by this chapter;
(m) Adopt such rules as are necessary to implement the department's
responsibilities under this chapter; and
(n) Assure the availability of an appropriate amount, as determined
by the legislature in the operating budget by amounts appropriated for
this specific purpose, of community-based, geographically distributed
residential services.
(6) The secretary shall use available resources only for regional
support networks, except to the extent authorized, and in accordance
with any priorities or conditions specified, in the biennial
appropriations act.
(7) Each certified regional support network and licensed service
provider shall file with the secretary, on request, such data,
statistics, schedules, and information as the secretary reasonably
requires. A certified regional support network or licensed service
provider which, without good cause, fails to furnish any data,
statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent
reports thereof, may have its certification or license revoked or
suspended.
(8) The secretary may suspend, revoke, limit, or restrict a
certification or license, or refuse to grant a certification or license
for failure to conform to: (a) The law; (b) applicable rules and
regulations; (c) applicable standards; or (d) state minimum standards.
(9) The superior court may restrain any regional support network or
service provider from operating without certification or a license or
any other violation of this section. The court may also review,
pursuant to procedures contained in chapter 34.05 RCW, any denial,
suspension, limitation, restriction, or revocation of certification or
license, and grant other relief required to enforce the provisions of
this chapter.
(10) Upon petition by the secretary, and after hearing held upon
reasonable notice to the facility, the superior court may issue a
warrant to an officer or employee of the secretary authorizing him or
her to enter at reasonable times, and examine the records, books, and
accounts of any regional support network or service provider refusing
to consent to inspection or examination by the authority.
(11) Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy,
the secretary may file an action for an injunction or other process
against any person or governmental unit to restrain or prevent the
establishment, conduct, or operation of a regional support network or
service provider without certification or a license under this chapter.
(12) The standards for certification of evaluation and treatment
facilities shall include standards relating to maintenance of good
physical and mental health and other services to be afforded persons
pursuant to this chapter and chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW, and shall
otherwise assure the effectuation of the purposes of these chapters.
(13) The department shall distribute appropriated state and federal
funds in accordance with any priorities, terms, or conditions specified
in the appropriations act.
(14) The secretary shall assume all duties assigned to the
nonparticipating regional support networks under chapters 71.05, 71.34,
and 71.24 RCW. Such responsibilities shall include those which would
have been assigned to the nonparticipating counties in regions where
there are not participating regional support networks.
The regional support networks, or the secretary's assumption of all
responsibilities under chapters 71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW, shall be
included in all state and federal plans affecting the state mental
health program including at least those required by this chapter, the
medicaid program, and P.L. 99-660. Nothing in these plans shall be
inconsistent with the intent and requirements of this chapter.
(15) The secretary shall:
(a) Disburse funds for the regional support networks within sixty
days of approval of the biennial contract. The department must either
approve or reject the biennial contract within sixty days of receipt.
(b) Enter into biennial contracts with regional support networks.
The contracts shall be consistent with available resources. No
contract shall be approved that does not include progress toward
meeting the goals of this chapter by taking responsibility for: (i)
Short-term commitments; (ii) residential care; and (iii) emergency
response systems.
(c) Notify regional support networks of their allocation of
available resources at least sixty days prior to the start of a new
biennial contract period.
(d) Deny all or part of the funding allocations to regional support
networks based solely upon formal findings of noncompliance with the
terms of the regional support network's contract with the department.
Regional support networks disputing the decision of the secretary to
withhold funding allocations are limited to the remedies provided in
the department's contracts with the regional support networks.
(16) The department, in cooperation with the state congressional
delegation, shall actively seek waivers of federal requirements and
such modifications of federal regulations as are necessary to allow
federal medicaid reimbursement for services provided by free-standing
evaluation and treatment facilities certified under chapter 71.05 RCW.
The department shall periodically report its efforts to the appropriate
committees of the senate and the house of representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act may be known and cited as Sirita's
law.

--- END ---