BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.110.005 and 2006 c 171 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington's dependence on energy supplied from outside the
state and volatile global energy markets makes its economy and citizens
vulnerable to unpredictable and high energy prices;
(2) Community action agencies in the state are an extremely
valuable resource because they focus all available, state, local,
private, and federal resources upon the goal of enabling low-income
families and low-income individuals of all ages in rural and urban
areas to attain the skills, knowledge, and motivations and secure the
opportunities needed for them to become free and self-sufficient;
(3) Washington's dependence on petroleum-based fuels increases
energy costs for citizens and businesses;
(((3))) (4) Diesel soot from diesel engines ranks as the highest
toxic air pollutant in Washington, leading to hundreds of premature
deaths and increasing rates of asthma and other lung diseases;
(((4))) (5) The use of biodiesel results in significantly less air
pollution than traditional diesel fuels;
(((5))) (6) Improper disposal and treatment of organic waste from
farms and livestock operations can have a significant negative impact
on water quality;
(((6))) (7) Washington has abundant supplies of organic wastes from
farms that can be used for energy production and abundant farmland
where crops could be grown to supplement or supplant petroleum-based
fuels;
(((7))) (8) The use of energy and fuel derived from these sources
can help citizens and businesses conserve energy and reduce the use of
petroleum-based fuels, would improve air and water quality in
Washington, reduce environmental risks from farm wastes, create new
markets for farm products, and provide new industries and jobs for
Washington citizens;
(((8))) (9) The bioenergy industry is a new and developing industry
that is, in part, limited by the availability of capital for the
construction of facilities for converting farm and forest products into
energy and fuels;
(((9))) (10) Wind-generated electricity provides a pollution-free
source of electricity, the utilization of which would be a valuable
step toward improving the health of the regional environment;
(11) Instead of leaving our economy at the mercy of global events,
and the policies of foreign nations, Washington state should adopt a
policy of energy independence; and
(((10))) (12) The energy freedom program is meant to lead
Washington state towards energy independence.
Therefore, the legislature finds that it is in the public interest
to encourage the rapid adoption and use of wind power and bioenergy, to
develop a viable wind and bioenergy industry within Washington state,
to promote public research and development in wind and bioenergy
sources and markets, and to support wind power production and a viable
agriculture industry to grow bioenergy crops. To accomplish this, the
energy freedom program is established to promote public research and
development in wind power and bioenergy, and to stimulate the
construction of facilities in Washington to generate energy from wind
and farm sources, or to convert organic matter into fuels.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.110.010 and 2006 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means any political subdivision of the state,
including port districts, counties, cities, towns, special purpose
districts, and other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal
corporations. "Applicant" may also include federally recognized tribes
((and)), state institutions of higher education with appropriate
research capabilities, and community action agencies in the state.
(2) "Assistance" includes loans, leases, product purchases, or
other forms of financial or technical assistance.
(3) "Community action agency" means the same as defined in RCW
43.185C.010.
(4) "Department" means the department of agriculture.
(((4))) (5) "Director" means the director of the department of
agriculture.
(((5))) (6) "Peer review committee" means a board, appointed by the
director, that includes wind or bioenergy specialists, energy
conservation specialists, scientists, and individuals with specific
recognized expertise.
(((6))) (7) "Project" means the construction of facilities,
including the purchase of equipment, to convert wind or farm products
or wastes into electricity or gaseous or liquid fuels or other
coproducts associated with such conversion. These specifically include
fixed or mobile facilities to generate electricity or methane from the
anaerobic digestion of organic matter, and fixed or mobile facilities
for extracting oils from canola, rape, mustard, and other oilseeds.
"Project" may also include the construction of facilities associated
with such conversion for the distribution and storage of such
feedstocks and fuels.
(((7))) (8) "Research and development project" means research and
development, by an institution of higher education as defined in
subsection (1) of this section, relating to:
(a) Wind power owned by community action agencies in the state;
(b) Bioenergy sources including but not limited to biomass and
associated gases; or
(((b))) (c) The development of markets for bioenergy coproducts.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.110.020 and 2006 c 171 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The energy freedom program is established within the
department. The director may establish policies and procedures
necessary for processing, reviewing, and approving applications made
under this chapter.
(2) When reviewing applications submitted under this program, the
director shall consult with those agencies having expertise and
knowledge to assess the technical and business feasibility of the
project and probability of success. These agencies may include, but
are not limited to, Washington State University, the University of
Washington, the department of ecology, the department of community,
trade, and economic development, and the Washington state conservation
commission.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
director, in cooperation with the department of community, trade, and
economic development, may approve an application only if the director
finds:
(a) The project will convert farm products or wastes directly into
electricity or into gaseous or liquid fuels or other coproducts
associated with such conversion;
(b) The project demonstrates technical feasibility and directly
assists in moving a commercially viable project into the marketplace
for use by Washington state citizens;
(c) The facility will produce long-term economic benefits to the
state, a region of the state, or a particular community in the state;
(d) The project does not require continuing state support;
(e) The assistance will result in new jobs, job retention, or
higher incomes for citizens of the state;
(f) The state is provided an option under the assistance agreement
to purchase a portion of the fuel or feedstock to be produced by the
project, exercisable by the department of general administration;
(g) The project will increase energy independence or diversity for
the state;
(h) The project will use feedstocks produced in the state, if
feasible, except this criterion does not apply to the construction of
facilities used to distribute and store fuels that are produced from
farm products or wastes;
(i) Any product produced by the project will be suitable for its
intended use, will meet accepted national or state standards, and will
be stored and distributed in a safe and environmentally sound manner;
(j) The application provides for adequate reporting or disclosure
of financial and employment data to the director, and permits the
director to require an annual or other periodic audit of the project
books; and
(k) For research and development projects, the application has been
independently reviewed by a peer review committee as defined in RCW
15.110.010 and the findings delivered to the director.
(4) When reviewing an application for a wind project, the director,
in cooperation with the department of community, trade, and economic
development, may approve an award for assistance only if the director
finds that:
(a) The project is owned by a community action agency in the state;
and
(b) Any profits generated from the sale of the wind power are
wholly used for the agency's nonprofit purposes.
(5) The director may approve an application for assistance up to
five million dollars. In no circumstances shall this assistance
constitute more than fifty percent of the total project cost, except
that in the case of an application submitted by a community action
agency, the assistance may constitute one hundred percent of the total
project cost.
(((5))) (6) The director shall enter into agreements with approved
applicants to fix the terms and rates of the assistance to minimize the
costs to the applicants, and to encourage establishment of a viable
bioenergy industry. The agreement shall include provisions to protect
the state's investment, including a requirement that a successful
applicant enter into contracts with any partners that may be involved
in the use of any assistance provided under this program, including
services, facilities, infrastructure, or equipment. Contracts with any
partners shall become part of the application record.
(((6))) (7) The director may defer any payments for up to twenty-four months or until the project starts to receive revenue from
operations, whichever is sooner.

Sec. 4 RCW 15.110.040 and 2006 c 171 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the total requested dollar amount of assistance exceeds the
amount available in the energy freedom account created in RCW
15.110.050, the applications must be prioritized based upon the
following criteria:
(1) The extent to which the project will support a community action
agency in its mission to assist low-income families and low-income
individuals of all ages in rural and urban areas to attain the skills,
knowledge, and motivations and secure the opportunities needed for them
to become free and self-sufficient;
(2) The extent to which the project will help reduce dependence on
petroleum fuels and imported energy either directly or indirectly;
(((2))) (3) The extent to which the project will reduce air and
water pollution either directly or indirectly;
(((3))) (4) The extent to which the project will establish a viable
bioenergy production capacity in Washington;
(((4))) (5) The benefits to Washington's agricultural producers;
and
(((5))) (6) The number and quality of jobs and economic benefits
created by the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires June 30, 2016.

--- END ---