BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LEGISLATIVE DECLARATION. It is the public
policy of the state and a recognized governmental function to
facilitate student loan financing and thereby increase access to higher
education for Washington's citizens. The purpose of this act is to
bring to the citizens of the state the applicable advantages of federal
tax law and federal loan guaranties and to authorize the Washington
higher education facilities authority to originate and acquire
educational loans and to issue nonrecourse revenue bonds to be paid
from such loans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.07 RCW
to read as follows:
DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means the Washington higher education facilities
authority established pursuant to RCW 28B.07.030 or any board, body,
commission, department, or officer succeeding to the principal
functions of the authority or to whom the powers conferred upon the
authority shall be given by law.
(2) "Educational loans" means:
(a) Guaranteed federal educational loans made in accordance with
Title IV, Part B, of the higher education act of 1965, or its
successor, to a qualified borrower for payment of educational expenses
incurred by a student while attending a participating institution, the
payment of principal of and interest on which is insured by the United
States secretary of education under the higher education act of 1965,
or its successor; and
(b) Alternative state educational loans made in accordance with
this act to a qualified borrower as determined by the authority for
payment of educational expenses incurred by a student while attending
a participating institution under the terms and conditions determined
by the authority.
(3) "Obligation," "bond," or "bonds" means bonds, notes, commercial
paper, certificates of indebtedness, or other evidences of indebtedness
of the authority issued under this act, whether or not the interest on
the obligation is subject to federal income taxation.
(4) "Participating institution" means any post high school
educational institution, public or private, whose students are eligible
for educational loans.
(5) "Qualified borrower" means a student, or the parent of a
student, who: (a) Qualifies for an educational loan; and (b) is a
resident of the state of Washington or has been accepted for enrollment
at or is attending a participating institution within the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.07 RCW
to read as follows:
STUDENT LOAN AUTHORITY. (1) In addition to its existing powers,
the authority has the following powers with respect to student loan
financing:
(a) To originate and purchase educational loans;
(b) To issue revenue bonds payable from and secured by educational
loans;
(c) To execute financing documents in connection with such
educational loans and bonds;
(d) To adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW;
(e) To participate fully in federal programs that provide
guaranties for the repayment of educational loans and do all things
necessary, useful, or convenient to make such programs available in the
state and carry out the purposes of this act;
(f) To contract with an agency, financial institution, or
corporation, whether organized under the laws of this state or
otherwise, whereby such agency, financial institution, or corporation
shall provide billing, accounting, reporting, or administrative
services required for educational loan programs administered by the
authority or in which the authority participates; and
(g) To form one or more nonprofit special purpose corporations for
accomplishing the purposes set forth in this act. The authority may
contract with any such nonprofit corporation, as set forth in (f) of
this subsection.
(2) In the exercise of any of these powers, the authority shall
incur no expense or liability that shall be an obligation, either
general or special, of the state, and shall pay no expense or liability
from funds other than funds of the authority. Funds of the state may
not be used for such purpose unless appropriated for such purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.07 RCW
to read as follows:
ALTERNATIVE STATE EDUCATIONAL LOANS. The authority, in addition to
administering federal loan programs, may administer an alternative
state educational loan program that may include the purchase or
origination of alternative state educational loans with terms as
determined by the authority. These loans are not guaranteed by the
state and the proceeds from loan repayment including interest or other
loan-related payments or authority or contractor revenue may be used by
the authority to make any required payments to bondholders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28B.07 RCW
to read as follows:
REVENUE BONDS. (1) The authority may, from time to time, issue
revenue bonds in order to carry out the purposes of this act.
(2) The bonds shall be issued pursuant to a bond resolution or
trust indenture and shall be payable solely out of the special fund or
funds created by the authority in the bond resolution or trust
indenture. Any security interest created against the unexpended bond
proceeds and against the special funds created by the authority shall
be immediately valid and binding against the moneys and any securities
in which the moneys may be invested without authority or trustee
possession, and the security interest shall be prior to any party
having any competing claim against the moneys or securities, without
filing or recording under Article 62A.9A of the uniform commercial
code, and regardless of whether the party has notice of the security
interest.
(3) The obligations shall be payable from and secured by a pledge
of revenues derived from or by reason of ownership of guaranteed
educational loans and investment income, after deduction of expenses of
operating the authority's program.
(4) The bonds may be issued as serial bonds or as term bonds or any
such combination. The bonds shall bear such date or dates; mature at
such time or times; bear interest at such rate or rates, either fixed
or variable; be payable at such time or times; be in such
denominations; be in such form; carry such registration privileges; be
made transferable, exchangeable, and interchangeable; be payable in
lawful money of the United States of America at such place or places;
be subject to such terms of redemption; and be sold at public or
private sale, in such manner, at such time, and at such price as the
authority shall determine. The bonds shall be executed by the manual
or facsimile signatures of the chairperson and the authority's duly
elected secretary or its executive director, and by the trustee if the
authority determines to use a trustee. At least one signature shall be
manually subscribed.
(5) Any bond resolution, trust indenture, or other financing
document may contain provisions, which may be made a part of the
contract with the holders or owners of the bonds to be issued,
pertaining to the following, among other matters: (a) The security
interests granted to the holders or owners of the bonds to secure
repayment of the bonds; (b) the segregation of reserves or sinking
funds, and the regulation, investment, and disposition thereof; (c)
limitations on the purposes to which, or the investments in which, the
proceeds of the sale of any issue of bonds may be applied; (d) terms
pertaining to the issuance of additional parity bonds; (e) the
refunding of outstanding bonds; (f) procedures, if any, by which the
terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated; (g)
events of default as well as rights and remedies in the event of a
default including without limitation the right to declare all principal
and interest immediately due and payable; (h) terms governing
performance by the trustee of its obligation; or (i) such other
additional covenants, agreements, and provisions as are deemed
necessary, useful, or convenient by the authority for the security of
the holders of the bonds.
(6) All bonds and any interest coupons appertaining to the bonds
shall be negotiable instruments under Title 62A RCW.
(7) Neither the members of the authority, nor its employees or
agents, nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally
on the bonds or be subject to any personal liability or accountability
by reason of the issuance of the bonds.
(8) The authority may purchase its bonds with any of its funds
available for the purchase. The authority may hold, pledge, cancel, or
resell the bonds subject to and in accordance with agreements with
bondholders.
(9) Bonds issued under this act shall not be deemed to constitute
obligations, either general or special, of the state or of any
political subdivision of the state, or a pledge of the faith and credit
of the state or of any political subdivision, or a general obligation
of the authority. The bonds shall be special obligations of the
authority and shall be payable solely from the special fund or funds
created by the authority in the bond resolution or trust indenture
pursuant to which the bonds were issued. The issuance of bonds under
this act shall not obligate, directly, indirectly, or contingently, the
state or any political subdivision of the state to levy any taxes or
appropriate or expend any funds for the payment of the principal or the
interest on the bonds.
(10) Neither the proceeds of bonds issued under this act, any
moneys used or to be used to pay the principal of or interest on the
bonds, nor any moneys received by the authority to defray its
administrative costs shall constitute public money or property. All of
such moneys shall be kept segregated and set apart from funds of the
state and any political subdivision of the state and shall not be
subject to appropriation or allotment by the state or subject to the
provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28B.07 RCW
to read as follows:
REVENUE REFUNDING BONDS. Bonds may be issued by the authority to
refund other outstanding bonds issued pursuant to this act, at or prior
to the maturity thereof, and to pay any redemption premium with respect
thereto. Bonds issued for such refunding purposes may be combined with
bonds issued for the origination or purchase of educational loans.
Pending the application of the proceeds of the refunding bonds to the
redemption of the bonds to be redeemed, the authority may enter into an
agreement or agreements with a corporate trustee with respect to the
interim investment of the proceeds and the application of the proceeds
and the earnings on the proceeds to the payment of the principal of and
interest on, and the redemption of the bonds to be redeemed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28B.07 RCW
to read as follows:
TRUST AGREEMENTS. All moneys received by or on behalf of the
authority under this chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of
bonds or from other sources shall be deemed to be trust funds to be
held and applied solely as provided in this chapter. The authority, in
lieu of receiving and applying the moneys itself, may enter into an
agreement or trust indenture with one or more banks or trust companies
having the power and authority to conduct trust business in the state
to:
(1) Perform all or any part of the obligations of the authority
with respect to: (a) Bonds issued by it; (b) the receipt, investment,
and application of the proceeds of the bonds and moneys available for
the payment of the bonds; and (c) other matters relating to the
exercise of the authority's powers under this chapter;
(2) Receive, hold, preserve, and enforce any security interest or
evidence of security interest granted by a participant for purposes of
securing the payment of the bonds; and
(3) Act on behalf of the authority or the holders or owners of
bonds of the authority for purposes of assuring or enforcing the
payment of the bonds, when due.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28B.07 RCW
to read as follows:
PROCEEDS FUNDS. (1) All proceeds derived from a particular bond
under the provisions of this act shall be deposited in a fund to be
known as the proceeds fund, which shall be maintained in such bank or
banks as shall be determined by the authority. Proceeds deposited in
the fund shall be expended only on approval of the authority.
(2) A separate proceeds fund shall be maintained for each series of
bonds issued by the authority.
(3) Funds credited to a proceeds fund may be used for any or all of
the following purposes:
(a) The payment of the necessary expenses, including, without
limitation, the costs of issuing the authority's bonds, incurred by the
authority in carrying out its responsibilities under sections 2 through
13 of this act and RCW 28B.07.030;
(b) The establishment of a debt service reserve account to secure
the payment of bonds;
(c) The making of educational loans to qualified borrowers;
(d) The purchase, either directly or acting through a bank with
trust powers for its account, of educational loans; and
(e) The acquisition of an investment contract or contracts or any
other investments permitted under an indenture of the authority
securing its bonds. The income from the contract, contracts, or
investments, after payment of the bonds and all expenses associated
therewith, shall be used by the authority to assist in carrying out its
purposes under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 28B.07 RCW
to read as follows:
DEFAULT. The proceedings authorizing any revenue obligations under
this act or any financing document securing the revenue bonds may
provide that if there is a default in the payment of the principal of
or the interest on the bonds or in the performance of any agreement
contained in the proceedings or financing document, the payment and
performance may be enforced by mandamus or by the appointment of a
receiver in equity with power to collect revenues in accordance with
the proceedings or provisions of the financing document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28B.07
RCW to read as follows:
CONFLICT WITH FEDERAL REQUIREMENTS. If any part of this act is
found to be in conflict with federal requirements under the higher
education act of 1965, the conflicting part of this act is hereby
declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and
with respect to the agencies directly affected, and such finding or
determination shall not affect the operation of the remainder of this
act in its application to the agencies concerned. The rules under this
act shall meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition for
participation of a state agency under the higher education act of 1965,
or its successor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 28B.07
RCW to read as follows:
EXCLUDED FROM DEBT LIMITATION. Bonds issued by the authority under
this chapter shall not be subject to the debt limitation set forth in
RCW 28B.07.050(9).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 28B.07
RCW to read as follows:
SALE OF ASSETS. The authority is authorized to offer for sale from
time to time loan portfolios or other assets accumulated by the
authority. Sales shall be conducted in a competitive manner and shall
be approved by the authority board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 28B.07
RCW to read as follows:
CHAPTER SUPPLEMENTAL. This chapter shall be regarded as
supplemental and additional to the powers conferred on the authority by
other laws. The issuance of bonds and refunding bonds under this
chapter need not comply with requirements of any other laws applicable
to the issuance of bonds.

Sec. 14 RCW 28B.07.030 and 1985 c 370 s 48 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington higher education facilities authority is hereby
established as a public body corporate and politic, with perpetual
corporate succession, constituting an agency of the state of Washington
exercising essential governmental functions. The authority is a
"public body" within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010.
(2) The authority shall consist of seven members as follows: The
governor, lieutenant governor, executive director of the higher
education coordinating board, and four public members, one of whom
shall be the president of a higher education institution at the time of
appointment. The public members shall be residents of the state and
appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by the senate, on
the basis of their interest or expertise in the provision of higher
education and the financing of higher education. The public members of
the authority shall serve for terms of four years. The initial terms
of the public members shall be staggered in a manner determined by the
governor. In the event of a vacancy on the authority due to death,
resignation, or removal of one of the public members, and upon the
expiration of the term of any public member, the governor shall appoint
a successor for a term expiring on the fourth anniversary of the
successor's date of the appointment. If any of the state offices are
abolished, the resulting vacancy on the authority shall be filled by
the state officer who shall succeed substantially to the power and
duties of the abolished office. Any public member of the authority may
be removed by the governor for misfeasance, malfeasance, wilful neglect
of duty, or any other cause after notice and a public hearing, unless
such notice and hearing shall be expressly waived in writing.
(3) The governor shall serve as chairperson of the authority. The
authority shall elect annually one of its members as secretary. If the
governor shall be absent from a meeting of the authority, the secretary
shall preside. However, the governor may designate an employee of the
governor's office to act on the governor's behalf in all other respects
during the absence of the governor at any meeting of the authority. If
the designation is in writing and is presented to the person presiding
at the meetings of the authority who is included in the designation,
the vote of the designee has the same effect as if cast by the
governor.
(4) Any person designated by resolution of the authority shall keep
a record of the proceedings of the authority and shall be the custodian
of all books, documents, and papers filed with the authority, the
minute book or a journal of the authority, and the authority's official
seal, if any. The person may cause copies to be made of all minutes
and other records and documents of the authority, and may give
certificates to the effect that such copies are true copies. All
persons dealing with the authority may rely upon the certificates.
(5) Four members of the authority constitute a quorum. Members
participating in a meeting through the use of any means of
communication by which all members participating can hear each other
during the meeting shall be deemed to be present in person at the
meeting for all purposes. The authority may act on the basis of a
motion except when authorizing the issuance and sale of bonds, in which
case the authority shall act by resolution. Bond resolutions and other
resolutions shall be adopted upon the affirmative vote of four members
of the authority, and shall be signed by those members voting yes.
Motions shall be adopted upon the affirmative vote of a majority of a
quorum of members present at any meeting of the authority. All actions
taken by the authority shall take effect immediately without need for
publication or other public notice. A vacancy in the membership of the
authority does not impair the power of the authority to act under this
chapter.
(6) The members of the authority shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be entitled to reimbursement, solely from
the funds of the authority, for travel expenses as determined by the
authority incurred in the discharge of their duties under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 LIBERAL CONSTRUCTION. This act, being
necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be
liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are
not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---