BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.20.297 and 2005 c 357 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that small technology-based firms are the
source of approximately one-half of the economy's major innovations
((and that)). The legislature further finds that economic development
in the state is increasingly driven by innovative firms and that it is
in the interest of the state to:
(a) Increase participation by Washington state small businesses in
the federal small business innovation research program by assisting
them in becoming small business innovation research program grant
recipients((.
The legislature further finds that many small business innovators
lack the grant-writing skills necessary to prepare a successful small
business innovation research program proposal, and the federal program
that funded grant-writing assistance has stopped operations. Nearly
fifty percent of small businesses trained under the federal program won
grants compared to less than ten percent of those that did not receive
training));
(b) Increase the number of innovative firms that understand and
engage in the technology commercialization process by providing
information resources and technical assistance in accessing new
technologies;
(c) Increase funding for product development and production by
providing information on available finance options and facilitating the
matching of investors with innovative entrepreneurs; and
(d) Coordinate these commercialization, assistance, and information
functions through existing statewide organizations and reinforce
collaboration among the network of the state's research, economic
development and technology assistance organizations for this purpose.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Small business innovation research program" means the program,
enacted pursuant to the small business innovation development act of
1982, P.L. 97-219, that provided funds to small businesses to conduct
innovative research having commercial application.
(b) "Small business" means a corporation, partnership, sole
proprietorship, or individual, operating a business for profit, with
two hundred fifty employees or fewer, including employees employed in
a subsidiary or affiliated corporation, that otherwise meets the
requirements of the federal small business innovation research program.
(3) To the extent funds are appropriated for these purposes, the
Washington technology center shall provide or contract for the
provision of the following in conjunction with the state's public
universities and colleges, private and federal research laboratories,
and local and regional economic development and technology assistance
organizations:
(a) Establish a small business innovation research assistance
program, including a proposal review process, to train and assist
Washington small businesses to win phase I small business innovation
research program awards. (((a))) In operating the program the
Washington technology center shall give priority to first-time small
business innovation research program applicants, new businesses, and
firms with fewer than ten employees((.));
(b) Develop and disseminate a guide to the technology
commercialization process in the research and academic institutions in
the state;
(c) Develop, maintain, and provide access to a database of
technologies and inventions developed in the state available for
commercialization and licensing;
(d) Offer training on the provision of commercialization assistance
to technical assistance providers at the state's small business
development centers, economic development councils, chambers of
commerce, industry cluster associations, the Washington manufacturing
service, and private consulting firms;
(e) Develop a funding resource guide, offer workshops on how to
access financing for commercializing new technologies, provide
opportunities for novice investors to learn about investing in
technology-based companies, host events to connect entrepreneurs and
investors, and maintain an interactive web site accessible by
researchers, entrepreneurs, and investors; and
(f) Report on the impact of commercialization activities at
Washington research institutions on an annual basis.
(4) The Washington technology center may charge a fee for ((this
service)) its services.

--- END ---