BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that between the years
2000 and 2005, three hundred twenty-six initiatives were filed with the
secretary of state's office and twenty-one initiatives were certified
to the ballot. Each initiative filed requires the state to invest, at
a minimum, the time and resources to process the filed initiative in
the secretary of state's office, allow the code reviser to review draft
initiatives for errors, review for potential conflict with existing
statutes, and prepare a certificate of review for the initiative
sponsor. Additionally, the secretary of state's office assigns a
serial number to all initiatives and forwards the initiative to the
attorney general for formulation of the ballot title and summary.
After an initiative sponsor obtains and submits signatures, the
secretary of state must check the signatures to ascertain whether there
are sufficient signatures to qualify the measure for the ballot. The
legislature finds that the current initiative filing fee of five
dollars, originally set in 1912, is insufficient to offset the
administrative costs involved in the initiative process. Therefore, to
more adequately provide for the administrative costs involved in the
initiative process, it is the intent of the legislature to increase the
initiative filing fee to one hundred dollars. The filing fee shall be
refunded in full upon the initiative being certified by the secretary
of state for the general election ballot.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.72.010 and 2003 c 111 s 1802 are each amended to
read as follows:
If any legal voter of the state, either individually or on behalf
of an organization, desires to petition the legislature to enact a
proposed measure, or submit a proposed initiative measure to the
people, or order that a referendum of all or part of any act, bill, or
law, passed by the legislature be submitted to the people, he or she
shall file with the secretary of state a legible copy of the measure
proposed, or the act or part of such act on which a referendum is
desired, accompanied by an affidavit that the sponsor is a legal voter
and a filing fee ((prescribed under RCW 43.07.120)) of one hundred
dollars. The filing fee shall be refunded in full upon the measure
being certified by the secretary of state for the general election
ballot.

--- END ---