BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.68.130 and 1995 c 33 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Benefits payable pursuant to this chapter shall be reduced by
the amount of any other public or private insurance available, less a
proportionate share of reasonable attorneys' fees and costs, if any,
incurred by the victim in obtaining recovery from the insurer.
Calculation of a proportionate share of attorneys' fees and costs shall
be made under the formula established in RCW 51.24.060. The department
or the victim may require court approval of costs and attorneys' fees
or may petition a court for determination of the reasonableness of
costs and attorneys' fees. This section shall not apply to damages
recovered by the victim pursuant to an insurance policy if the
department has determined that the victim has been permanently
partially disabled, permanently totally disabled, or has died as a
result of the criminal act for which benefits are payable under this
chapter and (a) the owner of the policy is the person that committed
the criminal act for which benefits are payable under this chapter, or
(b) the owner of the policy is the victim of the criminal act for which
benefits are payable under this chapter.
(2) Benefits payable after 1980 to victims injured or killed before
1980 shall be reduced by any other public or private insurance
including but not limited to social security.
(3) Payment by the department under this chapter shall be secondary
to other insurance benefits, notwithstanding the provision of any
contract or coverage to the contrary. In the case of private life
insurance proceeds, the first forty thousand dollars of the proceeds
shall not be considered for purposes of any reduction in benefits.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the collection methods
available under RCW 7.68.125(4) apply.
(5) This section applies to victims injured or killed on or after
January 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 7.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a victim has made applications for benefits for which there
was a final order on or after January 1, 2004, and prior to the
effective date of this act for injuries sustained on or after January
1, 2004, and:
(a) The victim was determined by the department to be permanently
partially disabled, permanently totally disabled, or died as a result
of the criminal act;
(b) The victim received benefits;
(c) The victim recovered damages pursuant to an insurance policy
and the owner of the policy was the person that committed the criminal
act or the owner of the policy was the victim of the criminal act for
which benefits are payable under this chapter; and
(d) The department recovered all or a portion of the benefits paid
to the victim after the victim recovered damages under the
circumstances in (c) of this subsection,
then the victim or, in the case of death, the victim's family or
dependents may make an application to reopen the original claim as
provided in this section.
(2) Determination of benefits of reopened claims shall be governed
by the provisions of this chapter.
(3) With respect to an application to reopen a claim as provided in
subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The department must notify the victim by mail at the victim's
last known address as shown by department records that the application
has been received.
(b) If an order denying or granting the application is not issued
within ninety days of mailing notice to the victim of receipt of the
application, the application shall be deemed granted.
(c) For good cause, the department may extend the time for making
the final determination on the application made under this section for
an additional sixty days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---