BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) If during the 2006-07 school year a
school district is unable to fulfill for one or more schools as
officially scheduled the requirement of a full school year of one
hundred eighty days or the annual average total instructional hour
offering required by RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.260 due to one or more
of the conditions listed in subsection (2) of this section, then the
school district is not required to make up any school days and the
state basic education moneys received by the school district pursuant
to RCW 28A.150.250 shall not be affected, but shall be provided as
though no school days were missed.
(2) The conditions required to meet subsection (1) of this section
are:
(a) An unforeseen natural event including, but not limited to, a
flood, windstorm, ice storm, or snowstorm, that has the direct or
indirect effect of rendering one or more school district facilities
unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible, or inoperative; and
(b) An unforeseen mechanical failure including, but not limited to,
the discontinuance or disruption of utilities such as heating,
lighting, and water, that (i) is beyond the control of both a school
district board of directors and its employees and (ii) has the direct
or indirect effect of rendering one or more school district facilities
unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible, or inoperative.
(3) For the purposes of this section, a condition is foreseeable to
the extent a reasonably prudent person would have anticipated before
August 1st of the preceding school year that the condition probably
would occur during the ensuing school year because of the occurrence of
an event or a circumstance that existed during the preceding school
year or a prior school year. A board of directors of a school district
is deemed for the purposes of this section to have knowledge of events
and circumstances that are a matter of common knowledge within the
school district and of those events and circumstances that can be
discovered upon prudent inquiry or inspection.
(4) This section expires August 31, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---