BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The superintendent of public instruction
shall establish a grant program to provide school districts with funds
to visit college campuses and recruit undergraduate students to become
mathematics and special education teachers. The recruits may be used
to help school districts meet the need for additional mathematics
teachers and improve student scores on the Washington assessment of
student learning in mathematics. The Washington association of school
administrators shall develop the criteria for eligible districts, which
may include districts with low scores on the Washington assessment of
student learning in mathematics.
(2) School districts receiving grants under this section may
determine how to apply the funds, including but not limited to sign-up
bonuses, tuition payments, and recruiting students anywhere in the
United States. Funds may not be directed at teacher preparation
departments or programs.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall report on the
number of school districts that received grants and how the grants were
used, and make recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2009.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of five hundred thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the
superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of this act.
(2) The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2009, from the general fund to the superintendent of public instruction
for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---