BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that workforce investment is an indispensable
economic development strategy in a global economy but the connections
between workforce and economic development programs have not been
strong enough. The legislature further finds that workforce agencies
and the department of community, trade, and economic development
operate a number of programs, which award grants with the ultimate goal
of increasing the competitiveness of industry clusters and that it is
in the state's interest that workforce development and economic
development agencies establish coordinated mechanisms for disbursing
these state funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
The workforce training and education coordinating board and the
economic development commission shall convene a working group,
consisting of the department of community, trade, and economic
development, the employment security department, the state board for
community and technical colleges, a representative of local economic
development councils and local workforce development councils to create
a framework for the identification of economic clusters, as well as
service and resource delivery to the clusters. The working group
shall:
(1) Specify the process for identification of substate geographic
concentrations of firms or employment in an industry and their
customers, suppliers, supporting businesses, and institutions, which
process will include the use of labor market information from the
employment security department and local labor markets;
(2) Establish criteria for identifying strategic clusters, which
are important to economic prosperity in the state, considering cluster
size, growth rate, and wage levels among other factors;
(3) Identify the public resources available which could be more
intensively devoted to assist clusters;
(4) Identify mechanisms by which public resources can be
coordinated and more efficiently delivered to support the growth and
competitiveness of clusters, including the consistent timing of grant
applications, the development of common criteria for receipt of grants,
and the establishment of grant review committees with overlapping
membership.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.330.090 and 2006 c 105 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall work with private sector organizations,
industry and cluster associations, federal agencies, state agencies
that use a cluster-based approach to service delivery, local
governments, local associate development organizations, and higher
education and training institutions in the development of industry
cluster-based strategies to diversify the economy, facilitate
technology transfer and diffusion, and increase value-added production.
The industry clusters targeted by the department may include, but are
not limited to, aerospace, agriculture, food processing, forest
products, marine services, health and biomedical, software, digital and
interactive media, transportation and distribution, and
microelectronics. The department shall, on a continuing basis,
evaluate the potential return to the state from devoting additional
resources to an industry cluster-based approach to economic development
and identifying and assisting additional clusters consistent with the
process and criteria in section 2 of this act. The department shall
use information gathered in each service delivery region in formulating
its industry cluster-based strategies and shall assist local
communities in identifying regional industry clusters and developing
industry cluster-based strategies.
(2) The department shall pursue a coordinated program to expand the
tourism industry throughout the state in cooperation with the public
and private tourism development organizations. The department, in
operating its tourism program, shall:
(a) Promote Washington as a tourism destination to national and
international markets to include nature-based and wildlife viewing
tourism;
(b) Provide information to businesses and local communities on
tourism opportunities that could expand local revenues;
(c) Assist local communities to strengthen their tourism
partnerships, including their relationships with state and local
agencies;
(d) Provide leadership training and assistance to local communities
to facilitate the development and implementation of local tourism
plans;
(e) Coordinate the development of a statewide tourism and marketing
plan. The department's tourism planning efforts shall be carried out
in conjunction with public and private tourism development
organizations including the department of fish and wildlife and other
appropriate agencies. The plan shall specifically address mechanisms
for: (i) Funding national and international marketing and nature-based
tourism efforts; (ii) interagency cooperation; and (iii) integrating
the state plan with local tourism plans.
(3) The department may, in carrying out its efforts to expand the
tourism industry in the state:
(a) Solicit and receive gifts, grants, funds, fees, and endowments,
in trust or otherwise, from tribal, local or other governmental
entities, as well as private sources, and may expend the same or any
income therefrom for tourism purposes. All revenue received for
tourism purposes shall be deposited into the tourism development and
promotion account created in RCW 43.330.094;
(b) Host conferences and strategic planning workshops relating to
the promotion of nature-based and wildlife viewing tourism;
(c) Conduct or contract for tourism-related studies;
(d) Contract with individuals, businesses, or public entities to
carry out its tourism-related activities under this section;
(e) Provide tourism-related organizations with marketing and other
technical assistance;
(f) Evaluate and make recommendations on proposed tourism-related
policies.
(4)(a) The department shall promote, market, and encourage growth
in the production of films and videos, as well as television
commercials within the state; to this end the department is directed to
assist in the location of a film and video production studio within the
state.
(b) The department may, in carrying out its efforts to encourage
film and video production in the state, solicit and receive gifts,
grants, funds, fees, and endowments, in trust or otherwise, from
tribal, local, or other governmental entities, as well as private
sources, and may expend the same or any income therefrom for the
encouragement of film and video production. All revenue received for
such purposes shall be deposited into the film and video promotion
account created in RCW 43.330.092.
(5) In assisting in the development of regional and statewide
industry cluster-based strategies, the department's activities shall
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Facilitating regional focus group discussions and conducting
studies to identify industry clusters consistent with the process and
criteria in section 2 of this act, appraise the current information
linkages within a cluster, and identify issues of common concern within
a cluster;
(b) Supporting industry and cluster associations, publications of
association and cluster directories, and related efforts to create or
expand the activities of industry and cluster associations;
(c) Administering a competitive grant program to fund activities
designed to further regional cluster growth. In administering the
program, the department shall work with an industry cluster advisory
committee with equal representation from the work force training and
education coordinating board, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the employment security department, business, and
labor.
(i) The industry cluster advisory committee shall recommend
criteria for evaluating applications for grant funds and recommend
applicants for receipt of grant funds.
(ii) Applicants must include organizations from at least two
counties and participants from the local business community. Eligible
organizations include, but are not limited to, local governments,
economic development councils, chambers of commerce, federally
recognized Indian tribes, work force development councils, and
educational institutions.
(iii) Applications must evidence financial participation of the
partner organizations.
(iv) Priority shall be given to applicants which will use the grant
funds to build linkages and joint projects, to develop common resources
and common training, and to develop common research and development
projects or facilities.
(v) The maximum amount of a grant is one hundred thousand dollars.
(vi) A maximum of one hundred thousand dollars total can go to
King, Pierce, Kitsap, and Snohomish counties combined.
(vii) No more than ten percent of funds received for the grant
program may be used by the department for administrative costs.
(6) As used in subsection (5) of this section, "industry cluster"
means a geographic concentration of interdependent competitive firms
that do business with each other. "Industry cluster" also includes
firms that sell inside and outside of the geographic region as well as
support firms that supply raw materials, components, and business
services.

--- END ---