BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that workforce
investment is an indispensable economic development strategy in a
global economy, but the connections between workforce and economic
development programs have not been strong enough. It is the purpose of
this act to facilitate interagency coordination, helping to strengthen
the connection between workforce and economic development programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.162.010 and 2003 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission is
established to oversee the economic development strategies and policies
of the department of community, trade, and economic development.
(2)(a) The Washington state economic development commission shall
consist of at least seven and no more than ((nine)) ten members
appointed by the governor.
(b) In making the appointments, the governor shall consult with
organizations that have an interest in economic development, including,
but not limited to, industry associations, labor organizations,
minority business associations, economic development councils, chambers
of commerce, port associations, tribes, and the chairs of the
legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development.
(c) The members shall be representative of the geographic regions
of the state, including eastern and central Washington, as well as
represent the ethnic diversity of the state. Representation shall
derive primarily from the private sector, including, but not limited
to, existing and emerging industries, small businesses, women-owned
businesses, and minority-owned businesses, but other sectors of the
economy that have experience in economic development, including labor
organizations and nonprofit organizations, shall be represented as
well. A minimum of seventy-five percent of the members shall represent
the private sector. Members of the commission shall serve statewide
interests while preserving their diverse perspectives, and shall be
recognized leaders in their fields with demonstrated experience in
disciplines related to economic development. The executive director of
the workforce training and education coordinating board, created under
RCW 28C.18.020, shall be appointed ex officio, as a nonvoting member of
the economic development commission.
(3) Members appointed by the governor shall serve at the pleasure
of the governor for three-year terms, except that through June 30,
2004, members currently serving on the economic development commission
created by executive order may continue to serve at the pleasure of the
governor. Of the initial members appointed to serve after June 30,
2004, two members shall serve one-year terms, three members shall serve
two-year terms, and the remainder of the commission members shall serve
three-year terms.
(4) The commission chair shall be selected from among the appointed
members by the majority vote of the members.
(5) The commission may establish committees as it desires, and may
invite nonmembers of the commission to serve as committee members.
(6) The commission may adopt rules for its own governance.

Sec. 3 RCW 28C.18.020 and 1991 c 238 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the workforce training and education
coordinating board as a state agency and as the successor agency to the
state board for vocational education. Once the coordinating board has
convened, all references to the state board for vocational education in
the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the workforce
training and education coordinating board, except that reference to the
state board for vocational education in RCW 49.04.030 shall mean the
state board for community and technical colleges.
(2)(a) The board shall consist of nine voting members appointed by
the governor with the consent of the senate, as follows: Three
representatives of business, three representatives of labor, and,
serving as ex officio members, the superintendent of public
instruction, the executive director of the state board for community
and technical colleges, and the commissioner of the employment security
department. The chair of the board shall be a nonvoting member
selected by the governor with the consent of the senate, and shall
serve at the pleasure of the governor. In selecting the chair, the
governor shall seek a person who understands the future economic needs
of the state and nation and the role that the state's training system
has in meeting those needs. Each voting member of the board may
appoint a designee to function in his or her place with the right to
vote. In making appointments to the board, the governor shall seek to
ensure geographic, ethnic, and gender diversity and balance. The
governor shall also seek to ensure diversity and balance by the
appointment of persons with disabilities.
(b) The business representatives shall be selected from among
nominations provided by a statewide business organization representing
a cross-section of industries. However, the governor may request, and
the organization shall provide, an additional list or lists from which
the governor shall select the business representatives. The
nominations and selections shall reflect the cultural diversity of the
state, including women, people with disabilities, and racial and ethnic
minorities, and diversity in sizes of businesses.
(c) The labor representatives shall be selected from among
nominations provided by statewide labor organizations. However, the
governor may request, and the organizations shall provide, an
additional list or lists from which the governor shall select the labor
representatives. The nominations and selections shall reflect the
cultural diversity of the state, including women, people with
disabilities, and racial and ethnic minorities.
(d) Each business member may cast a proxy vote or votes for any
business member who is not present and who authorizes in writing the
present member to cast such vote.
(e) Each labor member may cast a proxy vote for any labor member
who is not present and who authorizes in writing the present member to
cast such vote.
(f) The chair shall appoint to the board one nonvoting member to
represent racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with
disabilities. The nonvoting member appointed by the chair shall serve
for a term of four years with the term expiring on June 30th of the
fourth year of the term.
(g) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall serve ex officio, as a nonvoting member of
the board.
(h) The business members of the board shall serve for terms of four
years, the terms expiring on June 30th of the fourth year of the term
except that in the case of initial members, one shall be appointed to
a two-year term and one appointed to a three-year term.
(((h))) (i) The labor members of the board shall serve for terms of
four years, the terms expiring on June 30th of the fourth year of the
term except that in the case of initial members, one shall be appointed
to a two-year term and one appointed to a three-year term.
(((i))) (j) Any vacancies among board members representing business
or labor shall be filled by the governor with nominations provided by
statewide organizations representing business or labor, respectively.
(((j))) (k) The board shall adopt bylaws and shall meet at least
bimonthly and at such other times as determined by the chair who shall
give reasonable prior notice to the members or at the request of a
majority of the voting members.
(((k))) (l) Members of the board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.040 and shall receive travel expenses in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(((l))) (m) The board shall be formed and ready to assume its
responsibilities under this chapter by October 1, 1991.
(((m))) (n) The director of the board shall be appointed by the
governor from a list of three names submitted by a committee made up of
the business and labor members of the board. However, the governor may
request, and the committee shall provide, an additional list or lists
from which the governor shall select the director. The lists compiled
by the committee shall not be subject to public disclosure. The
governor may dismiss the director only with the approval of a majority
vote of the board. The board, by a majority vote, may dismiss the
director with the approval of the governor.
(3) The state board for vocational education is hereby abolished
and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby transferred to the
workforce training and education coordinating board. All references to
the director or the state board for vocational education in the Revised
Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the
workforce training and education coordinating board.

--- END ---