BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.13.250 and 2000 c 144 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of this chapter:
(1) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state
of Washington.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department or the
director's duly authorized representative.
(3) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, society and association, and every officer, agent or employee
thereof.
(4) "Horticultural plant" includes, but is not limited to, any
horticultural, floricultural, or viticultural plant, or turf, for
planting, propagation or ornamentation growing or otherwise. The term
does not apply to potato, garlic, or onion planting stock or to cut
plant material, except plant parts used for propagative purposes.
(5) "Horticultural facilities" means, but is not limited to, the
premises where horticultural plants or Christmas trees are grown,
stored, handled or delivered for sale or transportation, or where
records required under this chapter are stored or kept, and all
vehicles and equipment used to transport horticultural plants or
Christmas trees.
(6) "Plant pests" means, but is not limited to, a living stage of
insect, mite, or other arthropod; nematode; slug, snail, or other
mollusk; protozoa or other invertebrate animals; bacteria; fungus;
virus; viroid; phytoplasma; weed or parasitic plant; or any organisms
similar to or allied with any of the plant pests listed in this
section; or any infectious substance; which can directly or indirectly
injure or cause disease or damage to any plant or plant product or that
threatens the diversity or abundance of native species.
(7) "Inspection and/or certification" means, but is not limited to,
the inspection by the director of horticultural plants or Christmas
trees at any time prior to, during, or subsequent to harvest or sale
and the issuance by the director of a written certificate stating if
the horticultural plants or Christmas trees are in compliance with the
provisions of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.
Inspection may include, but is not limited to, examination of
horticultural plants or Christmas trees, taking samples, destructive
testing, conducting interviews, taking photographs, and examining
records.
(8) "Nursery dealer" means any person who sells horticultural
plants or plants, grows, receives, or handles horticultural plants for
the purpose of selling or planting for another person.
(9) "Sell" means to sell, hold for sale, offer for sale, handle, or
to use as an inducement for the sale of another article or product.
(10) "Master license system" means the mechanism established by
chapter 19.02 RCW by which master licenses, endorsed for individual
state-issued licenses, are issued and renewed utilizing a master
application and a master license expiration date common to each
renewable license endorsement.
(11) "Certificate" or "certificate of inspection" means an official
document certifying compliance with the requirements of this chapter.
The term "certificate" includes labels, rubber stamp imprints, tags,
permits, written statements, or any other form of certification
document that accompanies the movement of inspected and certified plant
material, including Christmas trees.
(12) "Turf" means field-cultivated turf grass sod consisting of
grass varieties, or blends of grass varieties, and dichondra for use in
residential and commercial landscapes.
(13) "This chapter" means this chapter and the rules adopted under
this chapter.
(14) "Compliance agreement" means a written agreement between the
department and a person engaged in growing, handling, or moving
articles, plants, or plant products regulated under this chapter or
title, in which the person agrees to comply with stipulated
requirements.
(15) "Consignor" means the person named in the invoice, bill, or
other shipping document accompanying a horticultural plant as the
person from whom the horticultural plant has been received for
shipment.
(16) "Christmas tree" means a cut evergreen tree:
(a) Of a marketable species;
(b) Managed to produce trees meeting United States number 2 or
better standards for Christmas trees as specified by the United States
department of agriculture; and
(c) Evidencing periodic maintenance practices of shearing or
culturing, or both; weed and brush control; and one or more of the
following practices: Basal pruning, fertilization, insect and disease
control, stump culture, soil cultivation, and irrigation.
(17) "Christmas tree grower" means any person who grows Christmas
trees for sale.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.13.260 and 2000 c 144 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall enforce the provisions of this chapter and may
adopt any rule necessary to carry out its purpose and provisions
including but not limited to the following:
(1) The director may adopt rules establishing standards for grades
and/or classifications for any horticultural plant.
(2) The director shall adopt rules for labeling or tagging
horticultural plants.
(3) The director may adopt rules for the inspection and/or
certification of any horticultural plant as to variety, quality, size
and freedom from infestation by plant pests.
(4) The director may adopt rules for the inspection and/or
certification of any Christmas tree as to freedom from infestation by
plant pests.
(5) The director shall adopt rules establishing fees for nursery
dealer licenses and for inspection of horticultural plants and methods
of fee collection.
(((5))) (6) The director may adopt rules prescribing minimum
informational requirements for advertising for the sale of
horticultural plants within the state.
(((6))) (7) The director may adopt rules establishing categories of
sales and fees for permits established in RCW 15.13.270.
(8) The director may adopt rules establishing fees for Christmas
tree grower licenses and for inspection of Christmas trees and methods
of fee collection.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.13.265 and 2000 c 144 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may enter and inspect the horticultural facilities
of a nursery dealer at reasonable times for the purpose of carrying out
the provisions of this chapter.
(2) If the director is denied access, the director may apply to a
court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant authorizing access
to the premises. The court may upon such application issue the search
warrant for the purposes requested. The warrant shall be issued on
probable cause. It is sufficient probable cause to show (a) the
inspection is pursuant to a general administrative practice to
determine compliance with this chapter or (b) the director has reason
to believe that a violation of this chapter has occurred, is occurring,
or may occur.
(3) Denial of access to the director to perform inspections may
subject a nursery dealer or Christmas tree grower to license revocation
((of the nursery license)).

Sec. 4 RCW 15.13.270 and 2000 c 144 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter relating to nursery dealer licensing
do not apply to: (1) Persons making casual or isolated sales that do
not exceed one hundred dollars annually; (2) any garden club,
conservation district, or charitable nonprofit association conducting
not more than three sales per year for not more than four consecutive
days each of horticultural plants which are grown by or donated to its
members; (3) educational organizations associated with private or
public secondary schools. However, such a club, conservation district,
association, or organization shall apply to the director for a permit
to conduct such sales.
All horticultural plants sold under such a permit shall be in
compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 15.13 RCW,
to be codified after RCW 15.13.310, to read as follows:
(1) Any Christmas tree grower owning Christmas trees, whose
business consists solely of retail sales to the ultimate consumer, is
exempt from the requirements of this section if:
(a) The grower has less than one acre of Christmas trees; or
(b) The grower harvests, by u-cut or otherwise, fewer than four
hundred Christmas trees per year.
(2) Licensed nursery dealers who furnish live plants for planting
to Christmas tree growers are exempt from the requirements of this
section.
(3) No person may operate as a Christmas tree grower without first
obtaining a license from the department.
(a) The application must be accompanied by an annual fee, as
established by the director in rule. The annual fee must not exceed
forty dollars as a basic charge and a maximum of four dollars per acre
as an acreage assessment. The annual Christmas tree grower license fee
for any person may not exceed five thousand dollars.
(b) The department may audit licensees during normal business hours
to determine that appropriate fees have been paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 15.13 RCW,
to be codified after RCW 15.13.310, to read as follows:
Application for a Christmas tree grower license shall include:
(1) The full name of the person applying for the license, whether
the applicant is an individual, receiver, trustee, firm, partnership,
association, or corporation, and if the applicant is a firm or
partnership the full name of each member of the firm or partnership,
and if the applicant is an association or corporation the names of the
officers of the association or corporation;
(2) The principal business address of the applicant in the state
and elsewhere;
(3) The address and acreage of Christmas trees for each location
included in the application;
(4) The names of the persons authorized to receive and accept
service of summons and legal notices of all kinds for the applicant;
and
(5) Any other information prescribed by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 15.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall immediately suspend any license issued under
this chapter if the holder of the license has been certified pursuant
to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a
person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person
has continued to meet all other requirements for licensure during the
suspension, reissuance of the license shall be automatic upon the
department's receipt of a release issued by the department of social
and health services stating that the person is in compliance with the
order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 15.13 RCW,
to be codified between RCW 15.13.310 and 15.13.315, to read as follows:
(1) An advisory committee is established to advise the director in
the administration of the Christmas tree program.
(2) When appointing this committee, the director shall consider
names submitted by the Puget Sound Christmas tree association and the
Pacific Northwest Christmas tree association.
(3) The committee consists of no fewer than five members,
representing the interests of licensed Christmas tree growers and the
Christmas tree industry, and the director or the director's designee.
(4) The terms of the members of the committee shall be staggered
and the members shall serve a term of three years or until their
successor has been appointed.
(5) In the event a committee member resigns, is disqualified, or
vacates a position on the committee for any other reason, the vacancy
shall be filled by the director under the provisions of this section
governing appointments.

Sec. 9 RCW 15.13.340 and 2000 c 144 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A late fee of twenty percent of the amount due shall be levied
on all delinquent assessments for each license period the assessment is
delinquent.
(2) The director shall not issue a nursery dealer license or
Christmas tree grower license to any applicant who has failed to pay
any assessment due under the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 10 RCW 15.13.370 and 2002 c 215 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person licensed under the provisions of this chapter may
request the services of a department inspector at the licensee's place
of business or point of shipment during the shipping season.
Subsequent to inspection the inspector shall issue to the licensee a
certificate of inspection signed by the inspector covering any
horticultural plants or Christmas trees which the inspector finds to be
in compliance with the provisions of this chapter.
(2) Any person financially interested in any horticultural plants
or Christmas trees may request inspection and/or certification services
provided for horticultural plants or Christmas trees under this
chapter.
(3) To facilitate the marketing of agricultural commodities and
other plant products, the director may provide, if requested, special
inspections or certifications not otherwise authorized under this
chapter and shall prescribe a fee for that service.

Sec. 11 RCW 15.13.390 and 2000 c 144 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is unlawful for any person to sell, ship, or transport any
horticultural plant or Christmas tree in this state unless it meets
standards established in rule for freedom from infestation by plant
pests and the other requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 12 RCW 15.13.400 and 2000 c 144 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to ship or deliver any
horticultural plant into this state unless it is accompanied by an
inspection certificate from the state or country of origin stating that
the horticultural plant meets the requirements of this chapter. The
director may require the shipper or receiver to file a copy of the
manifest of nursery cargo or shipment of horticultural plants into this
state with the director on or before the date the horticultural plants
enter into the state.
(2) The director may by rule require that any or all ((such))
horticultural plants or Christmas trees delivered or shipped into the
state be inspected for conformance with the requirements of this
chapter prior to release by the person delivering or transporting such
horticultural plants or Christmas trees even though accompanied by
acceptable inspection certificates issued by the state or country of
origin.
(3) Any shipment found not to be in compliance with the
requirements of this chapter may be returned to the consignor at the
consignor's expense. The consignor may subsequently request a hearing
which shall be held in conformance with RCW 34.05.479 or other
applicable provision of chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 13 RCW 15.13.420 and 2000 c 144 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is unlawful for any person:
(1) To falsely claim to be an agent or representative of any
nursery dealer in horticultural plants or Christmas tree grower;
(2) To sell or distribute horticultural plants by any method which
has the capacity and tendency or effect of deceiving any purchaser or
prospective purchaser as to the quantity, size, grade, kind, species,
age, method of propagation, maturity, condition, vigor, hardiness,
number of times transplanted, growth ability, growth characteristics,
rate of growth or time required before flowering or fruiting, price,
origin or place where grown, or in any other material respect;
(3) To alter an official certificate or other official inspection
document for plant materials, including Christmas trees, covered by
this chapter or to falsely represent a document as an official
certificate;
(4) To substitute any horticultural plant, Christmas tree, or
agricultural commodity for a horticultural plant, Christmas tree, or
agricultural commodity covered by an inspection certificate.

Sec. 14 RCW 15.13.430 and 2000 c 144 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the director has cause to believe that any horticultural
plants or Christmas trees are damaged or are infested or infected by
any plant pest, the director may issue a hold order on such
horticultural plants or Christmas trees. A hold order may prescribe
conditions under which ((plants)) the damaged, infested, or infected
material must be held to prevent spread of the infestation or
infection. Treatment or other corrective measures shall be the sole
responsibility of the persons holding the ((plant)) material for sale.
It is unlawful to sell or move such plants until released in writing by
the director.

Sec. 15 RCW 15.13.440 and 2000 c 144 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall condemn any horticultural plants shipped or sold
when such horticultural plants are found to be dead, in a dying
condition, seriously broken, diseased or infested to the extent that
treatment is not practical, damaged, frozen, or abnormally potbound.
The director shall condemn any Christmas trees shipped or sold if they
are found to be diseased, infected, or infested to the extent that
treatment is not practical. The director shall order such
horticultural plants or Christmas trees to be destroyed or returned at
shipper's option.

Sec. 16 RCW 15.13.455 and 2000 c 144 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director may apply to the superior court of Thurston county
for a prompt hearing on, and the court shall have jurisdiction upon,
and for cause shown the court shall, without proof that an adequate
remedy at law does not exist, grant an injunction restraining any
person from operating as a nursery dealer or Christmas tree grower
without a valid license.
(2) An order restraining any person from operating as a nursery
dealer or Christmas tree grower without a valid license shall contain
such provision for the payment of pertinent court costs and reasonable
attorneys' fees and administrative expenses as is equitable and the
court deems appropriate in the circumstances.

Sec. 17 RCW 15.13.470 and 2002 c 215 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 15.13.285 and in subsections (2)
((and)), (3), and (4) of this section, all moneys collected under this
chapter shall be paid to the director, deposited in an account within
the agricultural local fund, and used solely for carrying out this
chapter. No appropriation is required for the disbursement of moneys
from the account by the director.
(2) All fees collected under RCW 15.13.310 shall be deposited in
the planting stock certification account within the agricultural local
fund to be used only for the Washington grapevine and fruit tree
certification and nursery improvement programs as set forth in this
chapter and chapter 15.14 RCW.
(3) All fees collected under section 5 of this act shall be
deposited in the Christmas tree account within the agricultural local
fund to be used only for the Washington Christmas tree program as
established under this chapter, which may include market surveys and
research related to Christmas trees.
(4) All moneys collected for civil penalties under this chapter
shall be deposited in the nursery research account within the
agricultural local fund.

Sec. 18 RCW 15.13.490 and 2000 c 144 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who fails to comply with this chapter may be subject to:
(1) Denial, revocation, or suspension of the person's nursery
dealer license or Christmas tree grower license; and/or
(2) A civil penalty in an amount of not more than one thousand
dollars for each violation. Each violation shall be a separate and
distinct offense. Every person who, through an act of commission or
omission, procures, aids, or abets in the violation shall be considered
to have violated this section and may be subject to the civil penalty
provided in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 This act expires July 1, 2014.

--- END ---