BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28C.10.020 and 1993 c 445 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agency" means the work force training and education
coordinating board.
(2) "Agent" means a person owning an interest in, employed by, or
representing for remuneration a private vocational school within or
without this state, who enrolls or personally attempts to secure the
enrollment in a private vocational school of a resident of this state,
offers to award educational credentials for remuneration on behalf of
a private vocational school, or holds himself or herself out to
residents of this state as representing a private vocational school for
any of these purposes.
(3) "Degree" means any designation, appellation, letters, or words
including but not limited to "associate," "bachelor," "master,"
"doctor," or "fellow" which signify or purport to signify satisfactory
completion of an academic program of study beyond the secondary school
level.
(4) "Education" includes but is not limited to, any class, course,
or program of training, instruction, or study.
(5) "Educational credentials" means degrees, diplomas,
certificates, transcripts, reports, or documents, ((or letters of
designation, marks, appellations, series of letters, numbers, or words
which)) that signify ((or appear to signify enrollment, attendance,
progress, or)) satisfactory completion of the requirements or
prerequisites for any educational program.
(6) "Entity" includes, but is not limited to, a person, company,
firm, society, association, partnership, corporation, or trust.
(7) "Private vocational school" means any location where an entity
is offering postsecondary education in any form or manner for the
purpose of instructing, training, or preparing persons for any vocation
or profession.
(8) "Probation" means the agency has officially notified a private
vocational school in writing that the school or a program offered by
the school has been identified by the agency as at risk and has
deficiencies that must be corrected within a specified time period.
(9) "Program" means a sequence of approved subjects offered by a
school that teaches skills and fundamental knowledge required for
employment in a particular occupation.
(10) "To grant" includes to award, issue, sell, confer, bestow, or
give.
(((9))) (11) "To offer" includes, in addition to its usual
meanings, to advertise or publicize. "To offer" also means to solicit
or encourage any person, directly or indirectly, to perform the act
described.
(((10))) (12) "To operate" means to establish, keep, or maintain
any facility or location where, from, or through which education is
offered or educational credentials are offered or granted to residents
of this state, and includes contracting for the performance of any such
act.

Sec. 2 RCW 28C.10.050 and 2005 c 274 s 247 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The agency shall adopt by rule minimum standards for entities
operating private vocational schools. The minimum standards shall
include, but not be limited to, requirements ((for each)) to assess
whether a private vocational school is eligible to obtain and maintain
a license in this state.
(2) The requirements adopted by the agency shall, at a minimum,
require a private vocational school to:
(a) Disclose to the agency information about its ownership and
financial position and to demonstrate to the agency that the school is
financially viable and responsible and that it has sufficient financial
resources to fulfill its commitments to students. Financial
disclosures provided to the agency shall not be subject to public
disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW;
(b) Follow a uniform statewide cancellation and refund policy as
specified by the agency;
(c) Disclose through use of a school catalog, brochure, or other
written material, necessary information to students so that students
may make informed enrollment decisions. The agency shall specify what
information is required;
(d) Use an enrollment contract or agreement that includes: (i) The
school's cancellation and refund policy, (ii) a brief statement that
the school is licensed under this chapter and that inquiries may be
made to the agency, and (iii) other necessary information as determined
by the agency;
(e) Describe accurately and completely in writing to students
before their enrollment prerequisites and requirements for (i)
completing successfully the programs of study in which they are
interested and (ii) qualifying for the fields of employment for which
their education is designed;
(f) Comply with the requirements of RCW 28C.10.084;
(g) Assess the basic skills and relevant aptitudes of each
potential student to determine that a potential student has the basic
skills and relevant aptitudes necessary to complete and benefit from
the program in which the student plans to enroll, including but not
limited to administering a United States department of education-approved English as a second language exam before enrolling students
for whom English is a second language unless the students provide proof
of graduation from a United States high school or proof of completion
of a GED in English or results of another academic assessment
determined appropriate by the agency. Guidelines for such assessments
shall be developed by the agency, in consultation with the schools((.
The method of assessment shall be reported to the agency. Assessment
records shall be maintained in the student's file));
(h) Discuss with each potential student the potential student's
obligations in signing any enrollment contract and/or incurring any
debt for educational purposes. The discussion shall include the
inadvisability of acquiring an excessive educational debt burden that
will be difficult to repay given employment opportunities and average
starting salaries in the potential student's chosen occupation((.));
(((2) Any enrollment contract shall have)) (i) Ensure that any
enrollment contract between the private vocational school and its
students has an attachment in a format provided by the agency. The
attachment shall be signed by both the school and the student. The
attachment shall stipulate that the school has complied with
((subsection (1)))(h) of this ((section)) subsection and that the
student understands and accepts his or her responsibilities in signing
any enrollment contract or debt application. The attachment shall also
stipulate that the enrollment contract shall not be binding for at
least five days, excluding Sundays and holidays, following signature of
the enrollment contract by both parties((.
(3) The agency shall deny, revoke, or suspend the license of any
school that does not meet or maintain the minimum standards)); and
(j) Comply with the requirements related to qualifications of
administrators and instructors.
(3) The agency may deny a private vocational school's application
for licensure if the school fails to meet the requirements in this
section.
(4) The agency may determine that a licensed private vocational
school or a particular program of a private vocational school is at
risk of closure or termination if:
(a) There is a pattern or history of substantiated student
complaints filed with the agency pursuant to RCW 28C.10.120; or
(b) The private vocational school fails to meet minimum licensing
requirements and has a pattern or history of failing to meet the
minimum requirements.
(5) If the agency determines that a private vocational school or a
particular program is at risk of closure or termination, the agency
shall require the school to take corrective action.

Sec. 3 RCW 28C.10.120 and 1993 c 445 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Complaints may be filed under this chapter only by a person
claiming loss of tuition or fees as a result of an unfair business
practice. The complaint shall set forth the alleged violation and
shall contain information required by the agency on forms provided for
that purpose. A complaint may also be filed with the agency by an
authorized staff member of the agency or by the attorney general.
(2) The agency shall investigate any complaint under this section
and shall first attempt to bring about a negotiated settlement. The
agency director or the director's designee may conduct an informal
hearing with the affected parties in order to determine whether a
violation has occurred.
(3) If the agency finds that the private vocational school or its
agent engaged in or is engaging in any unfair business practice, the
agency shall issue and cause to be served upon the violator an order
requiring the violator to cease and desist from the act or practice and
may impose the penalties provided under RCW 28C.10.130. If the agency
finds that the complainant has suffered loss as a result of the act or
practice, the agency may order the violator to pay full or partial
restitution of any amounts lost. The loss may include any money paid
for tuition, required or recommended course materials, and any
reasonable living expenses incurred by the complainant during the time
the complainant was enrolled at the school.
(4) The complainant is not bound by the agency's determination of
restitution. The complainant may reject that determination and may
pursue any other legal remedy.
(5) The violator may, within twenty days of being served any order
described under subsection (3) of this section, file an appeal under
the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Timely filing
stays the agency's order during the pendency of the appeal. If the
agency prevails, the appellant shall pay the costs of the
administrative hearing.
(6) If a private vocational school closes without providing
adequate notice to its enrolled students, the agency shall provide
transition assistance to the school's students including, but not
limited to, information regarding: (a) Transfer options available to
students; (b) financial aid discharge eligibility and procedures; (c)
the labor market, job search strategies, and placement assistance
services; and (d) other support services available to students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The sum of fifty-three thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the work force
training and education coordinating board for the purposes of this act.
(2) The sum of fifty-three thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2009, from the general fund to the work force training and education
coordinating board for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---