BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county; and
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030.
(2) For purposes of providing additional funding sufficient to
complete the highway construction projects identified in subsection (8)
of this section, and subject to the conditions of this section,
counties eligible under subsection (10) of this section may jointly
levy additional excise taxes equal to fifteen percent of the statewide
motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on each gallon of special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the
counties. The additional excise taxes are subject to the approval of
each respective county's legislative body and a majority of the
registered voters of each respective county voting on the proposition
at a general or special election. An election held under this section
must be held not more than twelve months before the date on which the
proposed taxes are to be levied. The ballot setting forth the
proposition must state that the revenues from the taxes will be used to
provide additional funding sufficient to complete the identified
highway construction projects. The counties' authority to levy
additional excise taxes under this section includes the incorporated
and unincorporated areas of the counties. Vehicles paying an annual
license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are exempt from the excise taxes
authorized under this section. The additional excise taxes are subject
to the same exceptions and rights of refund as applicable to other
motor vehicle fuel and special fuel excise taxes levied under chapters
82.36 and 82.38 RCW. The proposed taxes may not be levied less than
one month from the date the election results are certified by the
county election officers. The commencement date for the levy of any
taxes under this section will be the first day of January, April, July,
or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel taxes authorized under this
section on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel and on each gallon of
special fuel are imposed upon the distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of a county to
a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, eligible counties shall contract with the
department of revenue for the administration and collection of the
taxes. The contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to
exceed one percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be
deposited into the local tax administration account created in the
custody of the state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend
money from this account, upon appropriation, for the administration of
the local taxes imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer shall distribute the proceeds monthly to
the counties levying the taxes under this section, after the deductions
for payments and expenditures as provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) (a) and
(b).
(8) The proceeds of the additional taxes levied by eligible
counties under this section may only be used to provide additional
funding sufficient to complete the following highway construction
projects and only for those areas that are considered "highway
purposes" as that term is construed in Article II, section 40 of the
state Constitution:
(a) Phases I and II of the state route number 167 project;
(b) The Federal Way Triangle Project (Interstate 5, state route
number 18, and state route number 161);
(c) Extending state route number 509 west of SeaTac to Interstate
5;
(d) State route number 516 (Kent-Kangley) improvements including
widening from Wax Road to Maple Valley; and
(e) The state route number 704 project (Cross Base Highway).
(9) A county may not levy the tax under this section if they are a
member of a regional transportation investment district that is levying
the tax in RCW 82.80.120 or the county is levying the tax in RCW
82.80.010 or 82.80.110. Additionally, a tax may only be levied under
this section if levied jointly by the eligible counties described under
subsection (10) of this section.
(10) Counties eligible to jointly impose taxes under this section
include a county with a population greater than one million five
hundred thousand persons and an adjoining county with a population
greater than seven hundred fifty thousand persons, as determined by the
office of financial management's population estimates.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.80.010 and 2003 c 350 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county;
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030.
(2) Subject to the conditions of this section, any county may levy,
by approval of its legislative body and a majority of the registered
voters of the county voting on the proposition at a general or special
election, additional excise taxes equal to ten percent of the statewide
motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on each gallon of special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the
county. Vehicles paying an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are
exempt from the county fuel excise tax. An election held under this
section must be held not more than twelve months before the date on
which the proposed tax is to be levied. The ballot setting forth the
proposition shall state the tax rate that is proposed. The county's
authority to levy additional excise taxes under this section includes
the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the county. The
additional excise taxes are subject to the same exceptions and rights
of refund as applicable to other motor vehicle fuel and special fuel
excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW. The proposed
tax shall not be levied less than one month from the date the election
results are certified by the county election officer. The commencement
date for the levy of any tax under this section shall be the first day
of January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is imposed upon the
distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of a county to
a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a county shall contract with the department of
revenue for the administration and collection of the taxes. The
contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to exceed one
percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be deposited into
the local tax administration account created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend money from this
account, upon appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes
imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer shall distribute monthly to the levying
county and cities contained therein the proceeds of the additional
excise taxes collected under this section, after the deductions for
payments and expenditures as provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) (a) and (b)
and under the conditions and limitations provided in RCW 82.80.080.
(8) The proceeds of the additional excise taxes levied under this
section shall be used strictly for transportation purposes in
accordance with RCW 82.80.070.
(9) A county may not levy the tax under this section if they are
levying the tax in RCW 82.80.110 or if they are a member of a regional
transportation investment district levying the tax in RCW 82.80.120, or
if they are levying the tax in section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.80.110 and 2003 c 350 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county;
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030.
(2) For purposes of dedication to a regional transportation
investment district plan under chapter 36.120 RCW, subject to the
conditions of this section, a county may levy additional excise taxes
equal to ten percent of the statewide motor vehicle fuel tax rate under
RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel as defined in RCW
82.36.010 and on each gallon of special fuel as defined in RCW
82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the county. The additional
excise tax is subject to the approval of the county's legislative body
and a majority of the registered voters of the county voting on the
proposition at a general or special election. An election held under
this section must be held not more than twelve months before the date
on which the proposed tax is to be levied. The ballot setting forth
the proposition must state that the revenues from the tax will be used
for a regional transportation investment district plan. The county's
authority to levy additional excise taxes under this section includes
the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the county. Vehicles
paying an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are exempt from the
county fuel excise tax. The additional excise taxes are subject to the
same exceptions and rights of refund as applicable to other motor
vehicle fuel and special fuel excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36
and 82.38 RCW. The proposed tax may not be levied less than one month
from the date the election results are certified by the county election
officer. The commencement date for the levy of any tax under this
section will be the first day of January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is imposed upon the
distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of a county to
a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a county shall contract with the department of
revenue for the administration and collection of the taxes. The
contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to exceed one
percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be deposited into
the local tax administration account created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend money from this
account, upon appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes
imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer shall distribute monthly to the county
levying the tax as part of a regional transportation investment plan,
after the deductions for payments and expenditures as provided in RCW
46.68.090(1) (a) and (b).
(8) The proceeds of the additional taxes levied by a county in this
section, to be used as a part of a regional transportation investment
plan, must be used in accordance with chapter 36.120 RCW, but only for
those areas that are considered "highway purposes" as that term is
construed in Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution.
(9) A county may not levy the tax under this section if they are a
member of a regional transportation investment district that is levying
the tax in RCW 82.80.120 ((or)), if the county is levying the tax in
RCW 82.80.010, or if the county is levying the tax in section 1 of this
act.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.80.120 and 2006 c 311 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county;
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030;
(c) "District" means a regional transportation investment district
under chapter 36.120 RCW.
(2) A regional transportation investment district under chapter
36.120 RCW, subject to the conditions of this section, may levy
additional excise taxes equal to ten percent of the statewide motor
vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on each gallon of special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the
district. The additional excise tax is subject to the approval of a
majority of the voters within the district boundaries. Vehicles paying
an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are exempt from the
district's fuel excise tax. The additional excise taxes are subject to
the same exceptions and rights of refund as applicable to other motor
vehicle fuel and special fuel excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36
and 82.38 RCW. The proposed tax may not be levied less than one month
from the date the election results are certified. The commencement
date for the levy of any tax under this section will be the first day
of January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is imposed upon the
distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of the
district to a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the
fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a district shall contract with the department of
licensing for the administration and collection of the taxes. The
contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to exceed one
percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be deposited into
the local tax administration account created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The department of licensing may spend money from this
account, upon appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes
imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer shall distribute monthly to the district
levying the tax as part of the regional transportation investment
district plan, after the deductions for payments and expenditures as
provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) (a) and (b).
(8) The proceeds of the additional taxes levied by a district in
this section, to be used as a part of a regional transportation
investment district plan, must be used in accordance with chapter
36.120 RCW, but only for those areas that are considered "highway
purposes" as that term is construed in Article II, section 40 of the
state Constitution.
(9) A district may only levy the tax under this section if the
district is comprised of boundaries identical to the boundaries of a
county or counties. A district may not levy the tax in this section if
a member county is levying the tax in RCW 82.80.010 or 82.80.110, or is
levying the tax in section 1 of this act.

--- END ---