BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the overall death
rate for those with fewer than twelve years of education is more than
twice that for people with more education. Students who drop out also
experience higher rates of early pregnancy and substance abuse and they
often require more social services of various types. Graduation rates
in Washington vary significantly by racial and ethnic groups and by
gender. These rates reflect the same type of disparity that is found
on health indicators of teen pregnancy, chronic disease, and the use of
tobacco, alcohol, and other drugs. Academic and health outcomes are
inexorably linked. It is the goal of this act to create a system for
proactively coordinating approaches to improving child and adolescent
health and education outcomes in Washington.
Schools should do all they can to promote student health and well-being if Washington's ambitious academic achievement goals and the
goals of the federal no child left behind act of 2001 are to be
realistically attained. Schools cannot achieve their primary mission
of education if students and staff are not physically, mentally, and
socially healthy.
Schools often have multiple advisory groups with health-related
missions that overlap, which can result in competition for resources
and influence. Consolidation of these groups into school health
advisory councils with broad missions leads to efficiency,
nonduplication of efforts, and a coordinated approach to student and
school health. Leadership at the state level is also required. A
purpose of this act is to create a state level school health advisory
council to provide guidance on coordination of many efforts that start
in state level agencies and organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state school health advisory council is created
consisting of twenty-one members.
(2) Members of the council shall include one representative from
each of the following organizations or agencies: The department of
health; the Washington academy of pediatrics; the American cancer
society; the University of Washington school of public health; the
nursing commission; the Washington asthma institute; the family policy
council; the health and recovery services administration; the
children's alliance; the state board of health; the superintendent of
public instruction or the superintendent's designee; the Washington
State University cooperative extension; the Washington association for
health, physical education, recreation, and dance; the Washington
health foundation; the Washington school nutrition association; the
school nurses of Washington; the Washington state parent and teacher
association; the Washington education association; the Washington
association of school administrators; the Washington state school
directors' association; and the state board of education.
(3)(a) Councilmembers shall serve for terms of three years except
for the initial members, whose terms shall be staggered so that seven
shall serve for one-year terms, seven shall serve for two-year terms,
and seven shall serve for full three-year terms. Members may serve
more than one term. If a vacancy occurs, the organization or agency
that made the original designation shall appoint a person to fill the
vacancy for the remainder of the leaving member's term. Members of the
council shall serve without pay but may receive reimbursement for
travel expenses if funds are available.
(b) The council shall select from its membership a chair and a
vice-chair who shall each serve a one-year term. The chair and vice-chair may serve more than one term if selected to do so by the members.
(c) The council shall meet at least quarterly.
(d) The department of health and the office of the superintendent
of public instruction's coordinated school health infrastructure
initiative shall provide office space and staffing for the council.
(4) Powers and duties of the council include but are not limited
to: Modeling collaboration and coordination of all aspects of school
health programs; identifying and recommending model policies and
procedures that result in efficient uses of resources to improve
student and school health; developing model program guidelines, sample
policies, resource lists, and position papers to further the work of
school district health advisory councils, including obesity prevention
strategies; and promoting the coordinated school health approach.
(5) The council shall submit an annual report to the legislature on
the progress of the local school health advisory councils and of their
own activities by December of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
Subject to available funds, the legislature intends to develop a
grant program to enable school districts to establish and maintain
their own school district health advisory council to implement a
coordinated school health program. A school district may, in its
discretion, use the grant program funds to establish councils and
coordinated school health programs at each school within the district
in order to assist in meeting the requirements established in this
section. It is the intent of the legislature that the school district
health advisory councils and programs:
(1) Assist in the development of health policy at the district
level;
(2) Evaluate the status of school and student health, health and
physical education, the school environment, and food service,
counseling and support, and health services;
(3) Recommend to the local school board policies and procedures
relating to students with acute or chronic illnesses or conditions;
health and safety; physical activity, obesity prevention, and
nutrition; contaminants and toxins; delivery of health services; and/or
other issues deemed appropriate based on the scope and membership of
the school district health advisory council;
(4) Coordinate the school district's health and other related
student support services with other relevant services within the
community;
(5) Be composed of members who broadly represent the community and
education stakeholders including, but not limited to, parents,
students, teachers, health professionals, employee bargaining units,
school facility staff, educators, district officials, and business
leaders. The council membership should adequately represent school
environmental health, health services, health and fitness education,
nutrition services, guidance and psychosocial health, parent and
community involvement, and staff wellness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
allocate grants from private donations or within amounts appropriated
for these specific purposes: (a) To allow school districts to
establish and maintain a school district health advisory council and
(b) to fund specific improvements to the health-related policies and
practices within a school recommended by a school district health
advisory council and requested by a local school board. The grants
shall be awarded on a competitive basis. Priority shall be given to
districts that best meet the criteria established in section 3 of this
act.
(2) The school district health advisory council shall hold meetings
at least twice a year and shall biennially report on the status and
needs of student health and safety in the school district to the
schools within the district, the school board, the department of
health, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(3) The local school superintendent and the local health officer
shall jointly be responsible for the establishment and maintenance of
the school district health advisory council with assistance from the
Washington state school health advisory council.

--- END ---