BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.36.071 and 2006 c 311 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided to the contrary in RCW 82.14.036, 82.46.021,
or 82.80.090, the ballot title of any referendum filed on an enactment
or portion of an enactment of a local government and any other question
submitted to the voters of a local government consists of three
elements: (a) An identification of the enacting legislative body and
a statement of the subject matter; (b) a concise description of the
measure; and (c) a question. The ballot title must conform with the
requirements and be displayed substantially as provided under RCW
29A.72.050, except that the concise description must not exceed
seventy-five words and must include a statement describing the amount
the measure will increase or decrease taxes if the measure has tax
implications; however, a concise description submitted on behalf of a
proposed or existing regional transportation investment district may
exceed seventy-five words. If the local governmental unit is a city or
a town, the concise statement shall be prepared by the city or town
attorney. If the local governmental unit is a county, the concise
statement shall be prepared by the prosecuting attorney of the county.
If the unit is a unit of local government other than a city, town, or
county, the concise statement shall be prepared by the prosecuting
attorney of the county within which the majority area of the unit is
located.
(2) A referendum measure on the enactment of a unit of local
government shall be advertised in the manner provided for nominees for
elective office.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if another
provision of law specifies the ballot title for a specific type of
ballot question or proposition.

--- END ---