BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A public hospital district shall, whenever the proposed
annexation of territory to its jurisdiction is scheduled to appear on
a special election ballot, print and distribute a local voters'
pamphlet. However, a public hospital district may satisfy its
requirements under this section to the extent it enters into interlocal
agreements with all counties within which the public hospital district
and its proposed territorial additions are located for the publication
of the proposed annexation measure in the respective counties'
pamphlets for special elections.
(2) If a public hospital district's proposed annexation measure is
scheduled to appear on a primary or general election ballot and any
county within which the public hospital district is located has not
adopted an ordinance authorizing the publication and distribution of a
local voters' pamphlet, a public hospital district shall print and
distribute a local voters' pamphlet to voters within its jurisdiction
and to voters in the territory proposed for annexation. If a public
hospital district's proposed annexation measure is scheduled to appear
on a primary or general election ballot but any local voters' pamphlet
published by any county within which the hospital district is located
does not publish the public hospital district's proposed annexation
measure, a public hospital district shall print and distribute a local
voters' pamphlet to voters within its jurisdiction and to voters in the
territory proposed for annexation.
(3) The format of all public hospital district's voters' pamphlets
shall, whenever applicable, comply with the provisions of chapter
29A.32 RCW regarding the publication of local voters' pamphlets.

--- END ---