BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The agenda of all regular meetings of the governing body of
every public agency, special purpose district, and any municipality
that owns or maintains a web site shall be posted within seventy-two
hours before a meeting. The agenda of all special or emergency
meetings shall be posted within twenty-four hours before a meeting.
The posting shall indicate if the agendas are in draft form.
(2) The text of any ordinance, rule, or regulation that is under
consideration at the meeting shall be included on the web site at the
same time the agenda is posted.
(3) The minutes of all regular and special meetings of the
governing body of every public agency, special purpose district, and
any municipality that owns or maintains a web site shall be posted
within fifteen business days after a meeting. The posting shall
indicate if the minutes are in draft form or adopted. All postings
under this section shall remain on the web site for one calendar year.
(4) Every public agency, special purpose district, and any
municipality that owns or maintains a public internet web site shall at
all times have posted to it a roster of the names of all members of its
governing body, identifying the positions, and constituency where
applicable, of all members. The web site shall at all times provide
both the start date and end date of the elective or appointed terms of
all members.
(5) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section do not apply to the
following public agencies, municipalities, or their respective
subagencies: (a) Counties with a population of less than twenty
thousand; (b) cities or towns with a population of less than eight
thousand; or (c) school districts or special purpose districts
providing services to a population of less than one thousand.
(6) This section shall not be construed to affect existing public
agency notice requirements in RCW 42.30.060 or 42.30.075.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---