BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the national
conference of commissioners on uniform state laws has developed uniform
legislation called the uniform environmental covenants act. The act
ensures that environmental covenants, recorded use restrictions
negotiated in connection with hazardous waste site cleanups, and other
environmental response projects are legally valid and enforceable. The
uniform environmental covenants act achieves this objective by
providing clear statutory standards that override court-made doctrines
that do not fit such cleanup and reuse contexts. The legislature
further finds that nothing in this chapter will amend or modify any
local or state laws that determine when environmental covenants are
required, when a particular contaminated site must be cleaned up, or
the standards for a cleanup.
Adoption of the uniform environmental covenants act in Washington
will provide all participants in a cleanup with greater confidence that
environmental covenants and other institutional controls will be
effective over the life of the cleanup. This will facilitate cleanups
of many sites and assist in the recycling of urban brownfield
properties into new economic uses for the benefit of the citizens of
Washington.
This chapter adopts most provisions of the uniform legislation
while making modifications to integrate the uniform environmental
covenants act with Washington's environmental cleanup programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This chapter may be cited as the uniform
environmental covenants act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Activity or use limitations" means restrictions or obligations
created under this chapter with respect to real property.
(2) "Agency" means either the department of ecology or the United
States environmental protection agency, whichever determines or
approves the environmental response project pursuant to which the
environmental covenant is created.
(3)(a) "Common interest community" means a condominium,
cooperative, or other real property with respect to which a person, by
virtue of the person's ownership of a parcel of real property, is
obligated to pay property taxes or insurance premiums, or for
maintenance, or improvement of other real property described in a
recorded covenant that creates the common interest community.
(b) "Common interest community" includes but is not limited to:
(i) An association of apartment owners as defined in RCW 64.32.010;
(ii) A unit owners' association as defined in RCW 64.34.020 and
organized under RCW 64.34.300;
(iii) A master association as provided in RCW 64.34.276;
(iv) A subassociation as provided in RCW 64.34.278; and
(v) A homeowners' association as defined in RCW 64.38.010.
(4) "Environmental covenant" means a servitude arising under an
environmental response project that imposes activity or use
limitations.
(5) "Environmental response project" means a plan or work performed
for environmental remediation of real property and conducted:
(a) Under a federal or state program governing environmental
remediation of real property, including chapters 43.21C, 64.44, 70.95,
70.98, 70.105, 70.105D, 90.48, and 90.52 RCW;
(b) Incident to closure of a solid or hazardous waste management
unit, if the closure is conducted with approval of an agency; or
(c) Under the state voluntary clean-up program authorized under
chapter 70.105D RCW.
(6) "Holder" means the grantee of an environmental covenant as
specified in section 4(1) of this act.
(7) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, public corporation, government, governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or
commercial entity.
(8) "Record", used as a noun, means information that is inscribed
on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium
and is retrievable in perceivable form.
(9) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any
territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Any person, including a person that owns
an interest in the real property, the agency, or a municipality or
other unit of local government, may be a holder. An environmental
covenant may identify more than one holder. The interest of a holder
is an interest in real property.
(2) A right of an agency under this chapter or under an
environmental covenant, other than a right as a holder, is not an
interest in real property.
(3) An agency is bound by any obligation it assumes in an
environmental covenant, but an agency does not assume obligations
merely by signing an environmental covenant. Any other person that
signs an environmental covenant is bound by the obligations the person
assumes in the covenant, but signing the covenant does not change
obligations, rights, or protections granted or imposed under law other
than this chapter except as provided in the covenant.
(4) The following rules apply to interests in real property in
existence at the time an environmental covenant is created or amended:
(a) An interest that has priority under other law is not affected
by an environmental covenant unless the person that owns the interest
subordinates that interest to the covenant.
(b) This chapter does not require a person that owns a prior
interest to subordinate that interest to an environmental covenant or
to agree to be bound by the covenant.
(c) A subordination agreement may be contained in an environmental
covenant covering real property or in a separate record. If the
environmental covenant covers commonly owned property in a common
interest community, the record may be signed by any person authorized
by the governing board of the owners' association.
(d) An agreement by a person to subordinate a prior interest to an
environmental covenant affects the priority of that person's interest
but does not by itself impose any affirmative obligation on the person
with respect to the environmental covenant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) An environmental covenant must:
(a) State that the instrument is an environmental covenant executed
pursuant to this chapter;
(b) Contain a legally sufficient description of the real property
subject to the covenant;
(c) Describe with specificity the activity or use limitations on
the real property;
(d) Identify every holder;
(e) Be signed by the agency, every holder, and unless waived by the
agency every owner of the fee simple of the real property subject to
the covenant; and
(f) Identify the name and location of any administrative record for
the environmental response project reflected in the environmental
covenant.
(2) In addition to the information required by subsection (1) of
this section, an environmental covenant may contain other information,
restrictions, and requirements agreed to by the persons who signed it,
including any:
(a) Requirements for notice following transfer of a specified
interest in, or concerning proposed changes in use of, applications for
building permits for, or proposals for any site work affecting the
contamination on, the property subject to the covenant;
(b) Requirements for periodic reporting describing compliance with
the covenant;
(c) Rights of access to the property granted in connection with
implementation or enforcement of the covenant;
(d) Narrative descriptions of the contamination and remedy,
including the contaminants of concern, the pathways of exposure, limits
on exposure, and the location and extent of the contamination;
(e) Limitations on amendment or termination of the covenant in
addition to those contained in sections 10 and 11 of this act;
(f) Rights of the holder in addition to its right to enforce the
covenant pursuant to section 12 of this act;
(g) Other information, restrictions, or requirements required by
the agency, including the department of ecology under the authority of
chapter 70.105D RCW.
(3) In addition to other conditions for its approval of an
environmental covenant, the agency may require those persons specified
by the agency who have interests in the real property to sign the
covenant.
(4) The agency may also require notice and opportunity to comment
upon an environmental covenant as part of public participation efforts
related to the environmental response project.
(5) The agency shall consult with local land use planning
authorities in the development of the land use or activity restrictions
in the environmental covenant. The agency shall consider potential
redevelopment and revitalization opportunities and obtain information
regarding present and proposed land and resource uses, and consider
comprehensive land use plan and zoning provisions applicable to the
real property to be subject to the environmental covenant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) An environmental covenant that complies
with this chapter runs with the land.
(2) An environmental covenant that is otherwise effective is valid
and enforceable even if:
(a) It is not appurtenant to an interest in real property;
(b) It can be or has been assigned to a person other than the
original holder;
(c) It is not of a character that has been recognized traditionally
at common law;
(d) It imposes a negative burden;
(e) It imposes an affirmative obligation on a person having an
interest in the real property or on the holder;
(f) The benefit or burden does not touch or concern real property;
(g) There is no privity of estate or contract;
(h) The holder dies, ceases to exist, resigns, or is replaced; or
(i) The owner of an interest subject to the environmental covenant
and the holder are the same person.
(3) An instrument that creates restrictions or obligations with
respect to real property that would qualify as activity or use
limitations except for the fact that the instrument was recorded before
the effective date of this section is not invalid or unenforceable
because of any of the limitations on enforcement of interests described
in subsection (2) of this section or because it was identified as an
easement, servitude, deed restriction, or other interest. This chapter
does not apply in any other respect to such an instrument.
(4) This chapter does not invalidate or render unenforceable any
interest, whether designated as an environmental covenant or other
interest, that is otherwise enforceable under the law of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This chapter does not authorize a use of
real property that is otherwise prohibited by zoning, by law other than
this chapter regulating use of real property, or by a recorded
instrument that has priority over the environmental covenant. An
environmental covenant may prohibit or restrict uses of real property
that are authorized by zoning or by law other than this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A copy of an environmental covenant
shall be provided by the persons and in the manner required by the
agency to:
(a) Each person that signed the covenant;
(b) Each person holding a recorded interest in the real property
subject to the covenant;
(c) Each person in possession of the real property subject to the
covenant at the time the covenant is executed;
(d) Each municipality or other unit of local government in which
real property subject to the covenant is located;
(e) The department of ecology; and
(f) Any other person the agency requires.
(2) The validity of an environmental covenant is not affected by
failure to provide a copy of the covenant as required under this
section.
(3) If the agency has not designated the persons to provide a copy
of an environmental covenant, the grantor shall be responsible for
providing a copy of an environmental covenant as required under
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) An environmental covenant and any
amendment or termination of the covenant must be recorded in every
county in which any portion of the real property subject to the
covenant is located. For purposes of indexing, a holder shall be
treated as a grantee.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in section 10(3) of this act, an
environmental covenant is subject to the laws of this state governing
recording and priority of interests in real property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) An environmental covenant is perpetual
unless it is:
(a) By its terms limited to a specific duration or terminated by
the occurrence of a specific event;
(b) Terminated by consent pursuant to section 11 of this act;
(c) Terminated pursuant to subsection (2) of this section;
(d) Terminated by foreclosure of an interest that has priority over
the environmental covenant; or
(e) Terminated or modified in an eminent domain proceeding, but
only if:
(i) The agency that signed the covenant is a party to the
proceeding;
(ii) All persons identified in section 11 (1) and (2) of this act
are given notice of the pendency of the proceeding; and
(iii) The court determines, after hearing, that the termination or
modification will not adversely affect human health or the environment.
(2) If the agency that signed an environmental covenant has
determined that the intended benefits of the covenant can no longer be
realized, a court, under the doctrine of changed circumstances, in an
action in which all persons identified in section 11 (1) and (2) of
this act have been given notice, may terminate the covenant or reduce
its burden on the real property subject to the covenant.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, an environmental covenant may not be extinguished, limited, or
impaired through issuance of a tax deed, foreclosure of a tax lien, or
application of the doctrine of adverse possession, prescription,
abandonment, waiver, lack of enforcement, or acquiescence, or a similar
doctrine.
(4) An environmental covenant may not be extinguished, limited, or
impaired by the extinguishment of a mineral interest under chapter
78.22 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) An environmental covenant may be
amended or terminated by consent only if the amendment or termination
is signed by:
(a) The agency;
(b) Unless waived by the agency, the current owner of the fee
simple of the real property subject to the covenant;
(c) Each person that originally signed the covenant, unless the
person waived in a signed record the right to consent or a court finds
that the person no longer exists or cannot be located or identified
with the exercise of reasonable diligence; and
(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4)(b) of this
section, the holder.
(2) If an interest in real property is subject to an environmental
covenant, the interest is not affected by an amendment of the covenant
unless the current owner of the interest consents to the amendment or
has waived in a signed record the right to consent to amendments.
(3) Except for an assignment undertaken pursuant to a governmental
reorganization, assignment of an environmental covenant to a new holder
is an amendment.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in an environmental covenant:
(a) A holder may not assign its interest without consent of the
other parties;
(b) A holder may be removed and replaced by agreement of the other
parties specified in subsection (1) of this section; and
(c) A court of competent jurisdiction may fill a vacancy in the
position of holder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) A civil action for injunctive or other
equitable relief for violation of an environmental covenant may be
maintained by:
(a) A party to the covenant;
(b) The agency or, if it is not the agency, the department of
ecology;
(c) Any person to whom the covenant expressly grants power to
enforce;
(d) A person whose interest in the real property or whose
collateral or liability may be affected by the alleged violation of the
covenant; and
(e) A municipality or other unit of local government in which the
real property subject to the covenant is located.
(2) This chapter does not limit the regulatory authority of the
agency or the department of ecology under law other than this chapter
with respect to an environmental response project.
(3) A person is not responsible for or subject to liability for
environmental remediation solely because it has the right to enforce an
environmental covenant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The department of ecology shall
establish and maintain a registry that contains information identifying
all environmental covenants established under this chapter and any
amendment or termination of those covenants, including the county where
the covenant is recorded and the recording number. The registry may
also contain any other information concerning environmental covenants
and the real property subject to them that the department of ecology
considers appropriate. The registry is a public record for purposes of
chapter 42.56 RCW, but the department shall maintain electronic access
to the registry without requiring a public records request for any
information included in the registry.
(2) Failure to include information or inclusion of inaccurate
information concerning an environmental covenant in the registry does
not invalidate or limit the application or enforceability of the
covenant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 In applying and construing this uniform
act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of
the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This chapter modifies, limits, or
supersedes the federal electronic signatures in global and national
commerce act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq.) but does not modify, limit,
or supersede section 101 of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(a)) or
authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in
section 103 of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b)).

Sec. 16 RCW 35.21.755 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 29 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A public corporation, commission, or authority created pursuant
to RCW 35.21.730, 35.21.660, or 81.112.320 shall receive the same
immunity or exemption from taxation as that of the city, town, or
county creating the same: PROVIDED, That, except for (a) any property
within a special review district established by ordinance prior to
January 1, 1976, or listed on or which is within a district listed on
any federal or state register of historical sites or (b) any property
owned, operated, or controlled by a public corporation that is used
primarily for low-income housing, or that is used as a convention
center, performing arts center, public assembly hall, public meeting
place, public esplanade, street, public way, public open space, park,
public utility corridor, or view corridor for the general public or (c)
any blighted property owned, operated, or controlled by a public
corporation that was acquired for the purpose of remediation and
redevelopment of the property in accordance with an agreement or plan
approved by the city, town, or county in which the property is located,
or (d) any property owned, operated, or controlled by a public
corporation created under RCW 81.112.320, any such public corporation,
commission, or authority shall pay to the county treasurer an annual
excise tax equal to the amounts which would be paid upon real property
and personal property devoted to the purposes of such public
corporation, commission, or authority were it in private ownership, and
such real property and personal property is acquired and/or operated
under RCW 35.21.730 through 35.21.755, and the proceeds of such excise
tax shall be allocated by the county treasurer to the various taxing
authorities in which such property is situated, in the same manner as
though the property were in private ownership: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
the provisions of chapter 82.29A RCW shall not apply to property within
a special review district established by ordinance prior to January 1,
1976, or listed on or which is within a district listed on any federal
or state register of historical sites and which is controlled by a
public corporation, commission, or authority created pursuant to RCW
35.21.730 or 35.21.660, which was in existence prior to January 1,
1987: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That property within a special review
district established by ordinance prior to January 1, 1976, or property
which is listed on any federal or state register of historical sites
and controlled by a public corporation, commission, or authority
created pursuant to RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660, which was in existence
prior to January 1, 1976, shall receive the same immunity or exemption
from taxation as if such property had been within a district listed on
any such federal or state register of historical sites as of January 1,
1976, and controlled by a public corporation, commission, or authority
created pursuant to RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660 which was in existence
prior to January 1, 1976.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Low-income" means a total annual income, adjusted for family
size, not exceeding fifty percent of the area median income.
(b) "Area median income" means:
(i) For an area within a standard metropolitan statistical area,
the area median income reported by the United States department of
housing and urban development for that standard metropolitan
statistical area; or
(ii) For an area not within a standard metropolitan statistical
area, the county median income reported by the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(c) "Blighted property" means property that is contaminated with
hazardous substances as defined under RCW 70.105D.020(((7))).

Sec. 17 RCW 69.50.511 and 1990 c 213 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Law enforcement agencies who during the official investigation or
enforcement of any illegal drug manufacturing facility come in contact
with or are aware of any substances suspected of being hazardous as
defined in RCW 70.105D.020(((5))), shall notify the department of
ecology for the purpose of securing a contractor to identify, clean-up,
store, and dispose of suspected hazardous substances, except for those
random and representative samples obtained for evidentiary purposes.
Whenever possible, a destruct order covering hazardous substances which
may be described in general terms shall be obtained concurrently with
a search warrant. Materials that have been photographed,
fingerprinted, and subsampled by police shall be destroyed as soon as
practical. The department of ecology shall make every effort to
recover costs from the parties responsible for the suspected hazardous
substance. All recoveries shall be deposited in the account or fund
from which contractor payments are made.
The department of ecology may adopt rules to carry out its
responsibilities under this section. The department of ecology shall
consult with law enforcement agencies prior to adopting any rule or
policy relating to this section.

Sec. 18 RCW 70.105D.020 and 2005 c 191 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) "Agreed order" means an order issued by the department under
this chapter with which the potentially liable person receiving the
order agrees to comply. An agreed order may be used to require or
approve any cleanup or other remedial actions but it is not a
settlement under RCW 70.105D.040(4) and shall not contain a covenant
not to sue, or provide protection from claims for contribution, or
provide eligibility for public funding of remedial actions under RCW
70.105D.070(2)(d)(xi).
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Director" means the director of ecology or the director's
designee.
(4) "Environmental covenant" has the same meaning as defined in
section 3 of this act.
(5) "Facility" means (a) any building, structure, installation,
equipment, pipe or pipeline (including any pipe into a sewer or
publicly owned treatment works), well, pit, pond, lagoon, impoundment,
ditch, landfill, storage container, motor vehicle, rolling stock,
vessel, or aircraft, or (b) any site or area where a hazardous
substance, other than a consumer product in consumer use, has been
deposited, stored, disposed of, or placed, or otherwise come to be
located.
(((5))) (6) "Federal cleanup law" means the federal comprehensive
environmental response, compensation, and liability act of 1980, 42
U.S.C. Sec. 9601 et seq., as amended by Public Law 99-499.
(((6))) (7)(a) "Fiduciary" means a person acting for the benefit of
another party as a bona fide trustee; executor; administrator;
custodian; guardian of estates or guardian ad litem; receiver;
conservator; committee of estates of incapacitated persons; trustee in
bankruptcy; trustee, under an indenture agreement, trust agreement,
lease, or similar financing agreement, for debt securities,
certificates of interest or certificates of participation in debt
securities, or other forms of indebtedness as to which the trustee is
not, in the capacity of trustee, the lender. Except as provided in
subsection (17)(b)(iii) of this section, the liability of a fiduciary
under this chapter shall not exceed the assets held in the fiduciary
capacity.
(b) "Fiduciary" does not mean:
(i) A person acting as a fiduciary with respect to a trust or other
fiduciary estate that was organized for the primary purpose of, or is
engaged in, actively carrying on a trade or business for profit, unless
the trust or other fiduciary estate was created as part of, or to
facilitate, one or more estate plans or because of the incapacity of a
natural person;
(ii) A person who acquires ownership or control of a facility with
the objective purpose of avoiding liability of the person or any other
person. It is prima facie evidence that the fiduciary acquired
ownership or control of the facility to avoid liability if the facility
is the only substantial asset in the fiduciary estate at the time the
facility became subject to the fiduciary estate;
(iii) A person who acts in a capacity other than that of a
fiduciary or in a beneficiary capacity and in that capacity directly or
indirectly benefits from a trust or fiduciary relationship;
(iv) A person who is a beneficiary and fiduciary with respect to
the same fiduciary estate, and who while acting as a fiduciary receives
benefits that exceed customary or reasonable compensation, and
incidental benefits permitted under applicable law;
(v) A person who is a fiduciary and receives benefits that
substantially exceed customary or reasonable compensation, and
incidental benefits permitted under applicable law; or
(vi) A person who acts in the capacity of trustee of state or
federal lands or resources.
(8) "Fiduciary capacity" means the capacity of a person holding
title to a facility, or otherwise having control of an interest in the
facility pursuant to the exercise of the responsibilities of the person
as a fiduciary.
(9) "Foreclosure and its equivalents" means purchase at a
foreclosure sale, acquisition, or assignment of title in lieu of
foreclosure, termination of a lease, or other repossession, acquisition
of a right to title or possession, an agreement in satisfaction of the
obligation, or any other comparable formal or informal manner, whether
pursuant to law or under warranties, covenants, conditions,
representations, or promises from the borrower, by which the holder
acquires title to or possession of a facility securing a loan or other
obligation.
(((7))) (10) "Hazardous substance" means:
(a) Any dangerous or extremely hazardous waste as defined in RCW
70.105.010 (5) and (6), or any dangerous or extremely dangerous waste
designated by rule pursuant to chapter 70.105 RCW;
(b) Any hazardous substance as defined in RCW 70.105.010(14) or any
hazardous substance as defined by rule pursuant to chapter 70.105 RCW;
(c) Any substance that, on March 1, 1989, is a hazardous substance
under section 101(14) of the federal cleanup law, 42 U.S.C. Sec.
9601(14);
(d) Petroleum or petroleum products; and
(e) Any substance or category of substances, including solid waste
decomposition products, determined by the director by rule to present
a threat to human health or the environment if released into the
environment.
The term hazardous substance does not include any of the following
when contained in an underground storage tank from which there is not
a release: Crude oil or any fraction thereof or petroleum, if the tank
is in compliance with all applicable federal, state, and local law.
(((8))) (11) "Holder" means a person who holds indicia of ownership
primarily to protect a security interest. A holder includes the
initial holder such as the loan originator, any subsequent holder such
as a successor-in-interest or subsequent purchaser of the security
interest on the secondary market, a guarantor of an obligation, surety,
or any other person who holds indicia of ownership primarily to protect
a security interest, or a receiver, court-appointed trustee, or other
person who acts on behalf or for the benefit of a holder. A holder can
be a public or privately owned financial institution, receiver,
conservator, loan guarantor, or other similar persons that loan money
or guarantee repayment of a loan. Holders typically are banks or
savings and loan institutions but may also include others such as
insurance companies, pension funds, or private individuals that engage
in loaning of money or credit.
(12) "Independent remedial actions" means remedial actions
conducted without department oversight or approval, and not under an
order, agreed order, or consent decree.
(((9) "Holder" means a person who holds indicia of ownership
primarily to protect a security interest. A holder includes the
initial holder such as the loan originator, any subsequent holder such
as a successor-in-interest or subsequent purchaser of the security
interest on the secondary market, a guarantor of an obligation, surety,
or any other person who holds indicia of ownership primarily to protect
a security interest, or a receiver, court-appointed trustee, or other
person who acts on behalf or for the benefit of a holder. A holder can
be a public or privately owned financial institution, receiver,
conservator, loan guarantor, or other similar persons that loan money
or guarantee repayment of a loan. Holders typically are banks or
savings and loan institutions but may also include others such as
insurance companies, pension funds, or private individuals that engage
in loaning of money or credit.
(10))) (13) "Indicia of ownership" means evidence of a security
interest, evidence of an interest in a security interest, or evidence
of an interest in a facility securing a loan or other obligation,
including any legal or equitable title to a facility acquired incident
to foreclosure and its equivalents. Evidence of such interests
includes, mortgages, deeds of trust, sellers interest in a real estate
contract, liens, surety bonds, and guarantees of obligations, title
held pursuant to a lease financing transaction in which the lessor does
not select initially the leased facility, or legal or equitable title
obtained pursuant to foreclosure and their equivalents. Evidence of
such interests also includes assignments, pledges, or other rights to
or other forms of encumbrance against the facility that are held
primarily to protect a security interest.
(((11))) (14) "Industrial properties" means properties that are or
have been characterized by, or are to be committed to, traditional
industrial uses such as processing or manufacturing of materials,
marine terminal and transportation areas and facilities, fabrication,
assembly, treatment, or distribution of manufactured products, or
storage of bulk materials, that are either:
(a) Zoned for industrial use by a city or county conducting land
use planning under chapter 36.70A RCW; or
(b) For counties not planning under chapter 36.70A RCW and the
cities within them, zoned for industrial use and adjacent to properties
currently used or designated for industrial purposes.
(15) "Institutional controls" means measures undertaken to limit or
prohibit activities that may interfere with the integrity of a remedial
action or result in exposure to or migration of hazardous substances at
a site. "Institutional controls" include environmental covenants.
(16) "Operating a facility primarily to protect a security
interest" occurs when all of the following are met: (a) Operating the
facility where the borrower has defaulted on the loan or otherwise
breached the security agreement; (b) operating the facility to preserve
the value of the facility as an ongoing business; (c) the operation is
being done in anticipation of a sale, transfer, or assignment of the
facility; and (d) the operation is being done primarily to protect a
security interest. Operating a facility for longer than one year prior
to foreclosure or its equivalents shall be presumed to be operating the
facility for other than to protect a security interest.
(((12))) (17) "Owner or operator" means:
(a) Any person with any ownership interest in the facility or who
exercises any control over the facility; or
(b) In the case of an abandoned facility, any person who had owned,
or operated, or exercised control over the facility any time before its
abandonment;
The term does not include:
(i) An agency of the state or unit of local government which
acquired ownership or control through a drug forfeiture action under
RCW 69.50.505, or involuntarily through bankruptcy, tax delinquency,
abandonment, or other circumstances in which the government
involuntarily acquires title. This exclusion does not apply to an
agency of the state or unit of local government which has caused or
contributed to the release or threatened release of a hazardous
substance from the facility;
(ii) A person who, without participating in the management of a
facility, holds indicia of ownership primarily to protect the person's
security interest in the facility. Holders after foreclosure and its
equivalent and holders who engage in any of the activities identified
in subsection (((13))) (18)(e) through (g) of this section shall not
lose this exemption provided the holder complies with all of the
following:
(A) The holder properly maintains the environmental compliance
measures already in place at the facility;
(B) The holder complies with the reporting requirements in the
rules adopted under this chapter;
(C) The holder complies with any order issued to the holder by the
department to abate an imminent or substantial endangerment;
(D) The holder allows the department or potentially liable persons
under an order, agreed order, or settlement agreement under this
chapter access to the facility to conduct remedial actions and does not
impede the conduct of such remedial actions;
(E) Any remedial actions conducted by the holder are in compliance
with any preexisting requirements identified by the department, or, if
the department has not identified such requirements for the facility,
the remedial actions are conducted consistent with the rules adopted
under this chapter; and
(F) The holder does not exacerbate an existing release. The
exemption in this subsection (((12))) (17)(b)(ii) does not apply to
holders who cause or contribute to a new release or threatened release
or who are otherwise liable under RCW 70.105D.040(1) (b), (c), (d), and
(e); provided, however, that a holder shall not lose this exemption if
it establishes that any such new release has been remediated according
to the requirements of this chapter and that any hazardous substances
remaining at the facility after remediation of the new release are
divisible from such new release;
(iii) A fiduciary in his, her, or its personal or individual
capacity. This exemption does not preclude a claim against the assets
of the estate or trust administered by the fiduciary or against a
nonemployee agent or independent contractor retained by a fiduciary.
This exemption also does not apply to the extent that a person is
liable under this chapter independently of the person's ownership as a
fiduciary or for actions taken in a fiduciary capacity which cause or
contribute to a new release or exacerbate an existing release of
hazardous substances. This exemption applies provided that, to the
extent of the fiduciary's powers granted by law or by the applicable
governing instrument granting fiduciary powers, the fiduciary complies
with all of the following:
(A) The fiduciary properly maintains the environmental compliance
measures already in place at the facility;
(B) The fiduciary complies with the reporting requirements in the
rules adopted under this chapter;
(C) The fiduciary complies with any order issued to the fiduciary
by the department to abate an imminent or substantial endangerment;
(D) The fiduciary allows the department or potentially liable
persons under an order, agreed order, or settlement agreement under
this chapter access to the facility to conduct remedial actions and
does not impede the conduct of such remedial actions;
(E) Any remedial actions conducted by the fiduciary are in
compliance with any preexisting requirements identified by the
department, or, if the department has not identified such requirements
for the facility, the remedial actions are conducted consistent with
the rules adopted under this chapter; and
(F) The fiduciary does not exacerbate an existing release.
The exemption in this subsection (((12))) (17)(b)(iii) does not
apply to fiduciaries who cause or contribute to a new release or
threatened release or who are otherwise liable under RCW 70.105D.040(1)
(b), (c), (d), and (e); provided however, that a fiduciary shall not
lose this exemption if it establishes that any such new release has
been remediated according to the requirements of this chapter and that
any hazardous substances remaining at the facility after remediation of
the new release are divisible from such new release. The exemption in
this subsection (((12))) (17)(b)(iii) also does not apply where the
fiduciary's powers to comply with this subsection (((12))) (17)(b)(iii)
are limited by a governing instrument created with the objective
purpose of avoiding liability under this chapter or of avoiding
compliance with this chapter; or
(iv) Any person who has any ownership interest in, operates, or
exercises control over real property where a hazardous substance has
come to be located solely as a result of migration of the hazardous
substance to the real property through the ground water from a source
off the property, if:
(A) The person can demonstrate that the hazardous substance has not
been used, placed, managed, or otherwise handled on the property in a
manner likely to cause or contribute to a release of the hazardous
substance that has migrated onto the property;
(B) The person has not caused or contributed to the release of the
hazardous substance;
(C) The person does not engage in activities that damage or
interfere with the operation of remedial actions installed on the
person's property or engage in activities that result in exposure of
humans or the environment to the contaminated ground water that has
migrated onto the property;
(D) If requested, the person allows the department, potentially
liable persons who are subject to an order, agreed order, or consent
decree, and the authorized employees, agents, or contractors of each,
access to the property to conduct remedial actions required by the
department. The person may attempt to negotiate an access agreement
before allowing access; and
(E) Legal withdrawal of ground water does not disqualify a person
from the exemption in this subsection (((12))) (17)(b)(iv).
(((13))) (18) "Participation in management" means exercising
decision-making control over the borrower's operation of the facility,
environmental compliance, or assuming or manifesting responsibility for
the overall management of the enterprise encompassing the day-to-day
decision making of the enterprise.
The term does not include any of the following: (a) A holder with
the mere capacity or ability to influence, or the unexercised right to
control facility operations; (b) a holder who conducts or requires a
borrower to conduct an environmental audit or an environmental site
assessment at the facility for which indicia of ownership is held; (c)
a holder who requires a borrower to come into compliance with any
applicable laws or regulations at the facility for which indicia of
ownership is held; (d) a holder who requires a borrower to conduct
remedial actions including setting minimum requirements, but does not
otherwise control or manage the borrower's remedial actions or the
scope of the borrower's remedial actions except to prepare a facility
for sale, transfer, or assignment; (e) a holder who engages in workout
or policing activities primarily to protect the holder's security
interest in the facility; (f) a holder who prepares a facility for
sale, transfer, or assignment or requires a borrower to prepare a
facility for sale, transfer, or assignment; (g) a holder who operates
a facility primarily to protect a security interest, or requires a
borrower to continue to operate, a facility primarily to protect a
security interest; and (h) a prospective holder who, as a condition of
becoming a holder, requires an owner or operator to conduct an
environmental audit, conduct an environmental site assessment, come
into compliance with any applicable laws or regulations, or conduct
remedial actions prior to holding a security interest is not
participating in the management of the facility.
(((14))) (19) "Person" means an individual, firm, corporation,
association, partnership, consortium, joint venture, commercial entity,
state government agency, unit of local government, federal government
agency, or Indian tribe.
(((15))) (20) "Policing activities" means actions the holder takes
to ((insure)) ensure that the borrower complies with the terms of the
loan or security interest or actions the holder takes or requires the
borrower to take to maintain the value of the security. Policing
activities include: Requiring the borrower to conduct remedial actions
at the facility during the term of the security interest; requiring the
borrower to comply or come into compliance with applicable federal,
state, and local environmental and other laws, regulations, and permits
during the term of the security interest; securing or exercising
authority to monitor or inspect the facility including on-site
inspections, or to monitor or inspect the borrower's business or
financial condition during the term of the security interest; or taking
other actions necessary to adequately police the loan or security
interest such as requiring a borrower to comply with any warranties,
covenants, conditions, representations, or promises from the borrower.
(((16))) (21) "Potentially liable person" means any person whom the
department finds, based on credible evidence, to be liable under RCW
70.105D.040. The department shall give notice to any such person and
allow an opportunity for comment before making the finding, unless an
emergency requires otherwise.
(((17))) (22) "Prepare a facility for sale, transfer, or
assignment" means to secure access to the facility; perform routine
maintenance on the facility; remove inventory, equipment, or
structures; properly maintain environmental compliance measures already
in place at the facility; conduct remedial actions to clean up releases
at the facility; or to perform other similar activities intended to
preserve the value of the facility where the borrower has defaulted on
the loan or otherwise breached the security agreement or after
foreclosure and its equivalents and in anticipation of a pending sale,
transfer, or assignment, primarily to protect the holder's security
interest in the facility. A holder can prepare a facility for sale,
transfer, or assignment for up to one year prior to foreclosure and its
equivalents and still stay within the security interest exemption in
subsection (((12))) (17)(b)(ii) of this section.
(((18))) (23) "Primarily to protect a security interest" means the
indicia of ownership is held primarily for the purpose of securing
payment or performance of an obligation. The term does not include
indicia of ownership held primarily for investment purposes nor indicia
of ownership held primarily for purposes other than as protection for
a security interest. A holder may have other, secondary reasons, for
maintaining indicia of ownership, but the primary reason must be for
protection of a security interest. Holding indicia of ownership after
foreclosure or its equivalents for longer than five years shall be
considered to be holding the indicia of ownership for purposes other
than primarily to protect a security interest. For facilities that
have been acquired through foreclosure or its equivalents prior to July
23, 1995, this five-year period shall begin as of July 23, 1995.
(((19))) (24) "Public notice" means, at a minimum, adequate notice
mailed to all persons who have made timely request of the department
and to persons residing in the potentially affected vicinity of the
proposed action; mailed to appropriate news media; published in the
newspaper of largest circulation in the city or county of the proposed
action; and opportunity for interested persons to comment.
(((20))) (25) "Release" means any intentional or unintentional
entry of any hazardous substance into the environment, including but
not limited to the abandonment or disposal of containers of hazardous
substances.
(((21))) (26) "Remedy" or "remedial action" means any action or
expenditure consistent with the purposes of this chapter to identify,
eliminate, or minimize any threat or potential threat posed by
hazardous substances to human health or the environment including any
investigative and monitoring activities with respect to any release or
threatened release of a hazardous substance and any health assessments
or health effects studies conducted in order to determine the risk or
potential risk to human health.
(((22))) (27) "Security interest" means an interest in a facility
created or established for the purpose of securing a loan or other
obligation. Security interests include deeds of trusts, sellers
interest in a real estate contract, liens, legal, or equitable title to
a facility acquired incident to foreclosure and its equivalents, and
title pursuant to lease financing transactions. Security interests may
also arise from transactions such as sale and leasebacks, conditional
sales, installment sales, trust receipt transactions, certain
assignments, factoring agreements, accounts receivable financing
arrangements, easements, and consignments, if the transaction creates
or establishes an interest in a facility for the purpose of securing a
loan or other obligation.
(((23) "Industrial properties" means properties that are or have
been characterized by, or are to be committed to, traditional
industrial uses such as processing or manufacturing of materials,
marine terminal and transportation areas and facilities, fabrication,
assembly, treatment, or distribution of manufactured products, or
storage of bulk materials, that are either:
(a) Zoned for industrial use by a city or county conducting land
use planning under chapter 36.70A RCW; or
(b) For counties not planning under chapter 36.70A RCW and the
cities within them, zoned for industrial use and adjacent to properties
currently used or designated for industrial purposes.
(24))) (28) "Workout activities" means those actions by which a
holder, at any time prior to foreclosure and its equivalents, seeks to
prevent, cure, or mitigate a default by the borrower or obligor; or to
preserve, or prevent the diminution of, the value of the security.
Workout activities include: Restructuring or renegotiating the terms
of the security interest; requiring payment of additional rent or
interest; exercising forbearance; requiring or exercising rights
pursuant to an assignment of accounts or other amounts owed to an
obligor; requiring or exercising rights pursuant to an escrow agreement
pertaining to amounts owed to an obligor; providing specific or general
financial or other advice, suggestions, counseling, or guidance; and
exercising any right or remedy the holder is entitled to by law or
under any warranties, covenants, conditions, representations, or
promises from the borrower.
(((25)(a) "Fiduciary" means a person acting for the benefit of
another party as a bona fide trustee; executor; administrator;
custodian; guardian of estates or guardian ad litem; receiver;
conservator; committee of estates of incapacitated persons; trustee in
bankruptcy; trustee, under an indenture agreement, trust agreement,
lease, or similar financing agreement, for debt securities,
certificates of interest or certificates of participation in debt
securities, or other forms of indebtedness as to which the trustee is
not, in the capacity of trustee, the lender. Except as provided in
subsection (12)(b)(iii) of this section, the liability of a fiduciary
under this chapter shall not exceed the assets held in the fiduciary
capacity.
(b) "Fiduciary" does not mean:
(i) A person acting as a fiduciary with respect to a trust or other
fiduciary estate that was organized for the primary purpose of, or is
engaged in, actively carrying on a trade or business for profit, unless
the trust or other fiduciary estate was created as part of, or to
facilitate, one or more estate plans or because of the incapacity of a
natural person;
(ii) A person who acquires ownership or control of a facility with
the objective purpose of avoiding liability of the person or any other
person. It is prima facie evidence that the fiduciary acquired
ownership or control of the facility to avoid liability if the facility
is the only substantial asset in the fiduciary estate at the time the
facility became subject to the fiduciary estate;
(iii) A person who acts in a capacity other than that of a
fiduciary or in a beneficiary capacity and in that capacity directly or
indirectly benefits from a trust or fiduciary relationship;
(iv) A person who is a beneficiary and fiduciary with respect to
the same fiduciary estate, and who while acting as a fiduciary receives
benefits that exceed customary or reasonable compensation, and
incidental benefits permitted under applicable law;
(v) A person who is a fiduciary and receives benefits that
substantially exceed customary or reasonable compensation, and
incidental benefits permitted under applicable law; or
(vi) A person who acts in the capacity of trustee of state or
federal lands or resources.
(26) "Fiduciary capacity" means the capacity of a person holding
title to a facility, or otherwise having control of an interest in the
facility pursuant to the exercise of the responsibilities of the person
as a fiduciary.))

Sec. 19 RCW 70.105D.030 and 2002 c 288 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may exercise the following powers in addition to
any other powers granted by law:
(a) Investigate, provide for investigating, or require potentially
liable persons to investigate any releases or threatened releases of
hazardous substances, including but not limited to inspecting,
sampling, or testing to determine the nature or extent of any release
or threatened release. If there is a reasonable basis to believe that
a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance may exist, the
department's authorized employees, agents, or contractors may enter
upon any property and conduct investigations. The department shall
give reasonable notice before entering property unless an emergency
prevents such notice. The department may by subpoena require the
attendance or testimony of witnesses and the production of documents or
other information that the department deems necessary;
(b) Conduct, provide for conducting, or require potentially liable
persons to conduct remedial actions (including investigations under (a)
of this subsection) to remedy releases or threatened releases of
hazardous substances. In carrying out such powers, the department's
authorized employees, agents, or contractors may enter upon property.
The department shall give reasonable notice before entering property
unless an emergency prevents such notice. In conducting, providing
for, or requiring remedial action, the department shall give preference
to permanent solutions to the maximum extent practicable and shall
provide for or require adequate monitoring to ensure the effectiveness
of the remedial action;
(c) Indemnify contractors retained by the department for carrying
out investigations and remedial actions, but not for any contractor's
reckless or willful misconduct;
(d) Carry out all state programs authorized under the federal
cleanup law and the federal resource, conservation, and recovery act,
42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq., as amended;
(e) Classify substances as hazardous substances for purposes of RCW
70.105D.020(((7))) and classify substances and products as hazardous
substances for purposes of RCW 82.21.020(1);
(f) Issue orders or enter into consent decrees or agreed orders
that include, or issue written opinions under (i) of this subsection
that may be conditioned upon, ((deed restrictions)) environmental
covenants where necessary to protect human health and the environment
from a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance from a
facility. Prior to establishing ((a deed restriction)) an
environmental covenant under this subsection, the department shall
((notify)) consult with and seek comment from a city or county
department with land use planning authority for real property subject
to ((a deed restriction)) the environmental covenant;
(g) Enforce the application of permanent and effective
institutional controls that are necessary for a remedial action to be
protective of human health and the environment and the notification
requirements established in RCW 70.105D.110, and impose penalties for
violations of that section consistent with RCW 70.105D.050;
(h) Require holders to conduct remedial actions necessary to abate
an imminent or substantial endangerment pursuant to RCW
70.105D.020(((12))) (17)(b)(ii)(C);
(i) Provide informal advice and assistance to persons regarding the
administrative and technical requirements of this chapter. This may
include site-specific advice to persons who are conducting or otherwise
interested in independent remedial actions. Any such advice or
assistance shall be advisory only, and shall not be binding on the
department. As a part of providing this advice and assistance for
independent remedial actions, the department may prepare written
opinions regarding whether the independent remedial actions or
proposals for those actions meet the substantive requirements of this
chapter or whether the department believes further remedial action is
necessary at the facility. The department may collect, from persons
requesting advice and assistance, the costs incurred by the department
in providing such advice and assistance; however, the department shall,
where appropriate, waive collection of costs in order to provide an
appropriate level of technical assistance in support of public
participation. The state, the department, and officers and employees
of the state are immune from all liability, and no cause of action of
any nature may arise from any act or omission in providing, or failing
to provide, informal advice and assistance; and
(j) Take any other actions necessary to carry out the provisions of
this chapter, including the power to adopt rules under chapter 34.05
RCW.
(2) The department shall immediately implement all provisions of
this chapter to the maximum extent practicable, including investigative
and remedial actions where appropriate. The department shall adopt,
and thereafter enforce, rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to:
(a) Provide for public participation, including at least (i) public
notice of the development of investigative plans or remedial plans for
releases or threatened releases and (ii) concurrent public notice of
all compliance orders, agreed orders, enforcement orders, or notices of
violation;
(b) Establish a hazard ranking system for hazardous waste sites;
(c) Provide for requiring the reporting by an owner or operator of
releases of hazardous substances to the environment that may be a
threat to human health or the environment within ninety days of
discovery, including such exemptions from reporting as the department
deems appropriate, however this requirement shall not modify any
existing requirements provided for under other laws;
(d) Establish reasonable deadlines not to exceed ninety days for
initiating an investigation of a hazardous waste site after the
department receives notice or otherwise receives information that the
site may pose a threat to human health or the environment and other
reasonable deadlines for remedying releases or threatened releases at
the site;
(e) Publish and periodically update minimum cleanup standards for
remedial actions at least as stringent as the cleanup standards under
section 121 of the federal cleanup law, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9621, and at
least as stringent as all applicable state and federal laws, including
health-based standards under state and federal law; and
(f) Apply industrial clean-up standards at industrial properties.
Rules adopted under this subsection shall ensure that industrial
properties cleaned up to industrial standards cannot be converted to
nonindustrial uses without approval from the department. The
department may require that a property cleaned up to industrial
standards is cleaned up to a more stringent applicable standard as a
condition of conversion to a nonindustrial use. Industrial clean-up
standards may not be applied to industrial properties where hazardous
substances remaining at the property after remedial action pose a
threat to human health or the environment in adjacent nonindustrial
areas.
(3) Before November 1st of each even-numbered year, the department
shall develop, with public notice and hearing, and submit to the ways
and means and appropriate standing environmental committees of the
senate and house of representatives a ranked list of projects and
expenditures recommended for appropriation from both the state and
local toxics control accounts. The department shall also provide the
legislature and the public each year with an accounting of the
department's activities supported by appropriations from the state
toxics control account, including a list of known hazardous waste sites
and their hazard rankings, actions taken and planned at each site, how
the department is meeting its top two management priorities under RCW
70.105.150, and all funds expended under this chapter.
(4) The department shall establish a scientific advisory board to
render advice to the department with respect to the hazard ranking
system, cleanup standards, remedial actions, deadlines for remedial
actions, monitoring, the classification of substances as hazardous
substances for purposes of RCW 70.105D.020(((7))) and the
classification of substances or products as hazardous substances for
purposes of RCW 82.21.020(1). The board shall consist of five
independent members to serve staggered three-year terms. No members
may be employees of the department. Members shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) The department shall establish a program to identify potential
hazardous waste sites and to encourage persons to provide information
about hazardous waste sites.
(6) For all facilities where an environmental covenant has been
required under subsection (1)(f) of this section, including all
facilities where the department has required an environmental covenant
under an order, agreed order, or consent decree, or as a condition of
a written opinion issued under the authority of subsection (1)(i) of
this section, the department shall periodically review the
environmental covenant for effectiveness. Except as otherwise provided
in (c) of this subsection, the department shall conduct a review at
least once every five years after an environmental covenant is
recorded.
(a) The review shall consist of, at a minimum:
(i) A review of the title of the real property subject to the
environmental covenant to determine whether the environmental covenant
was properly recorded and, if applicable, amended or terminated;
(ii) A physical inspection of the real property subject to the
environmental covenant to determine compliance with the environmental
covenant, including whether any development or redevelopment of the
real property has violated the terms of the environmental covenant; and
(iii) A review of the effectiveness of the environmental covenant
in limiting or prohibiting activities that may interfere with the
integrity of the remedial action or that may result in exposure to or
migration of hazardous substances. This shall include a review of
available monitoring data.
(b) If an environmental covenant has been amended or terminated
without proper authority, or if the terms of an environmental covenant
have been violated, or if the environmental covenant is no longer
effective in limiting or prohibiting activities that may interfere with
the integrity of the remedial action or that may result in exposure to
or migration of hazardous substances, then the department shall take
any and all appropriate actions necessary to ensure compliance with the
environmental covenant and the policies and requirements of this
chapter.
(c) For facilities where an environmental covenant required by the
department under subsection (1)(f) of this section was required before
July 1, 2007, the department shall:
(i) Enter all required information about the environmental covenant
into the registry established under section 13 of this act by June 30,
2008;
(ii) For those facilities where more than five years has elapsed
since the environmental covenant was required and the department has
yet to conduct a review, conduct an initial review according to the
following schedule:
(A) By December 30, 2008, fifty facilities;
(B) By June 30, 2009, fifty additional facilities; and
(C) By June 30, 2010, the remainder of the facilities;
(iii) Once this initial review has been completed, conduct
subsequent reviews at least once every five years.

Sec. 20 RCW 70.105D.060 and 2005 c 211 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department's investigative and remedial decisions under RCW
70.105D.030 and 70.105D.050, its decisions regarding filing a lien
under RCW 70.105D.055, and its decisions regarding liable persons under
RCW 70.105D.020(((16))), 70.105D.040, 70.105D.050, and 70.105D.055
shall be reviewable exclusively in superior court and only at the
following times: (1) In a cost recovery suit under RCW 70.105D.050(3);
(2) in a suit by the department to enforce an order or an agreed order,
or seek a civil penalty under this chapter; (3) in a suit for
reimbursement under RCW 70.105D.050(2); (4) in a suit by the department
to compel investigative or remedial action; (5) in a citizen's suit
under RCW 70.105D.050(5); and (6) in a suit for removal or reduction of
a lien under RCW 70.105D.050(7). Except in suits for reduction or
removal of a lien under RCW 70.105D.050(7), the court shall uphold the
department's actions unless they were arbitrary and capricious. In
suits for reduction or removal of a lien under RCW 70.105D.050(7), the
court shall review such suits pursuant to the standards set forth in
RCW 70.105D.050(7).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Sections 1 through 15 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 64 RCW.

--- END ---