BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits in this section, an eligible person is
authorized a credit against the tax due under this chapter for the
acquisition of health information technologies certified as eligible
for credit by the health care authority as provided in RCW 41.05.021.
(2) The credit allowed under this section:
(a) Is limited to fifty percent of the amount expended to acquire
computer hardware, software, labor, or services necessary for the
development, enhancement, or installation of certified health
information technologies. Expenditures may include those amounts for
leased equipment and software.
(b) Is subject to a lifetime maximum of ten thousand dollars for
each eligible person.
(c) Must be claimed in the calendar year in which the expenditure
occurs by the due date of the last tax return for the calendar year in
which the expenditure occurs and may not exceed the amount of tax
imposed under this chapter.
(d) In no case may a credit earned during one calendar year be
carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent
calendar year. No refunds may be granted for credits under this
section.
(3) The credit allowed under this section shall not be claimed for
expenditures that occur before the effective date of this section.
(4) No application is necessary for the tax credit. An eligible
person claiming this credit must keep records necessary for the
department to verify eligibility under this section. This includes,
but is not limited to, a personal attestation or documentation
substantiating that the health information technologies acquired by the
person are certified by a state, regional, or national commission for
health information technology, the American health information
committee, the United States department of health and human services,
related to: (a) Interoperability; (b) security; and (c) the protection
of confidentiality.
(5) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been used shall be immediately due. The department
shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the credited taxes for
which the person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
shall be assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken,
and shall accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are
repaid.
(6) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Eligible person" means:
(i) A physician licensed under chapter 18.22, 18.36A, 18.57, or
18.71 RCW, who is registered as a sole proprietor;
(ii) Any entity consisting of at least one but not more than five
physicians licensed under chapter 18.22, 18.36A, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW,
including physicians who are employees, officers, or owners of such
entity;
(iii) An advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW who is a sole proprietor;
(iv) Any entity consisting of at least two but not more than five
advanced registered nurse practitioners licensed under chapter 18.79
RCW, including advanced registered nurse practitioners who are
employees, officers, or owners of such entity; or
(v) Any entity consisting of a combination of physicians licensed
under chapter 18.22, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW and advanced registered nurse
practitioners licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW not to exceed five,
including physicians and advanced registered nurse practitioners who
are employees, officers, or owners of such entity.
(b) "Health information technologies" has the meaning provided in
RCW 41.05.021.
(7) This section expires December 31, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---