BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever volunteer firefighters respond to an incident on a state
highway, the department of transportation shall reimburse the volunteer
fire department for any costs or expenses incurred by the volunteer
fire department in responding to the incident after the first hour.

--- END ---