BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.16.050 and 2006 c 336 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the gross income the
following items:
(1) Amounts derived by municipally owned or operated public service
businesses, directly from taxes levied for the support or maintenance
thereof((: PROVIDED, That)). This ((section shall)) subsection may
not be construed to exempt service charges which are spread on the
property tax rolls and collected as taxes;
(2) Amounts derived from the sale of commodities to persons in the
same public service business as the seller, for resale as such within
this state. This deduction is allowed only with respect to water
distribution, gas distribution or other public service businesses which
furnish water, gas or any other commodity in the performance of public
service businesses;
(3) Amounts actually paid by a taxpayer to another person taxable
under this chapter as the latter's portion of the consideration due for
services furnished jointly by both, if the total amount has been
credited to and appears in the gross income reported for tax by the
former;
(4) The amount of cash discount actually taken by the purchaser or
customer;
(5) The amount of bad debts, as that term is used in 26 U.S.C. Sec.
166, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003, on which tax was
previously paid under this chapter;
(6) Amounts derived from business which the state is prohibited
from taxing under the Constitution of this state or the Constitution or
laws of the United States;
(7) Amounts derived from the distribution of water through an
irrigation system, for irrigation purposes;
(8) Amounts derived from the transportation of commodities from
points of origin in this state to final destination outside this state,
or from points of origin outside this state to final destination in
this state, with respect to which the carrier grants to the shipper the
privilege of stopping the shipment in transit at some point in this
state for the purpose of storing, manufacturing, milling, or other
processing, and thereafter forwards the same commodity, or its
equivalent, in the same or converted form, under a through freight rate
from point of origin to final destination; ((and))
(9) Amounts derived from the transportation of commodities from
points of origin in the state to an export elevator, wharf, dock or
ship side on tidewater or its navigable tributaries ((thereto from
which such commodities are)) to be forwarded, without intervening
transportation, by vessel, in their original form, to interstate or
foreign destinations((: PROVIDED, That)). No deduction ((will be)) is
allowed under this subsection when the point of origin and the point of
delivery to ((such an)) the export elevator, wharf, dock, or ship side
are located within the corporate limits of the same city or town;
(((9))) (10) Amounts derived from the transportation of
agricultural commodities, not including manufactured substances or
articles, from points of origin in the state to interim storage
facilities in this state for transshipment, without intervening
transportation, to an export elevator, wharf, dock, or ship side on
tidewater or its navigable tributaries to be forwarded, without
intervening transportation, by vessel, in their original form, to
interstate or foreign destinations. If agricultural commodities are
transshipped from interim storage facilities in this state to storage
facilities at a port on tidewater or its navigable tributaries, the
same agricultural commodity dealer must operate both the interim
storage facilities and the storage facilities at the port.
(a) The deduction under this subsection is available only when the
person claiming the deduction obtains a certificate from the
agricultural commodity dealer operating the interim storage facilities,
in a form and manner prescribed by the department, certifying that:
(i) More than ninety-six percent of all of the type of agricultural
commodity delivered by the person claiming the deduction under this
subsection and delivered by all other persons to the dealer's interim
storage facilities during the preceding calendar year was shipped by
vessel in original form to interstate or foreign destinations; and
(ii) Any of the agricultural commodity that is transshipped to
ports on tidewater or its navigable tributaries will be received at
storage facilities operated by the same agricultural commodity dealer
and will be shipped from such facilities, without intervening
transportation, by vessel, in their original form, to interstate or
foreign destinations.
(b) As used in this subsection, "agricultural commodity" has the
same meaning as agricultural product in RCW 82.04.213;
(11) Amounts derived from the production, sale, or transfer of
electrical energy for resale within or outside the state or for
consumption outside the state;
(((10))) (12) Amounts derived from the distribution of water by a
nonprofit water association and used for capital improvements by that
nonprofit water association;
(((11))) (13) Amounts paid by a sewerage collection business
taxable under RCW 82.16.020(1)(a) to a person taxable under chapter
82.04 RCW for the treatment or disposal of sewage;
(((12))) (14) Amounts derived from fees or charges imposed on
persons for transit services provided by a public transportation
agency. For the purposes of this subsection, "public transportation
agency" means a municipality, as defined in RCW 35.58.272, and urban
public transportation systems, as defined in RCW 47.04.082. Public
transportation agencies shall spend an amount equal to the reduction in
tax provided by this tax deduction solely to adjust routes to improve
access for citizens using food banks and senior citizen services or to
extend or add new routes to assist low-income citizens and seniors.

--- END ---