BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.14.010 and 1998 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The affairs of the district shall be managed by a board of fire
commissioners composed initially of three registered voters residing in
the district except as provided in RCW 52.14.015 and 52.14.020. Each
member shall each receive seventy dollars per day or portion thereof,
not to exceed six thousand seven hundred twenty dollars per year, for
attendance at board meetings and for performance of other services in
behalf of the district.
In addition, they shall receive necessary expenses incurred in
attending meetings of the board or when otherwise engaged in district
business, and shall be entitled to receive the same insurance available
to all firefighters of the district: PROVIDED, That the premiums for
such insurance, except liability insurance, shall be paid by the
individual commissioners who elect to receive it.
Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to
the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
The board shall fix the compensation to be paid the secretary and
all other agents and employees of the district. The board may, by
resolution adopted by unanimous vote, authorize any of its members to
serve as volunteer firefighters without compensation. A commissioner
actually serving as a volunteer firefighter may enjoy the rights and
benefits of a volunteer firefighter.

Sec. 2 RCW 52.14.015 and 1994 c 223 s 50 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the event a three member board of commissioners of any fire
protection district determines by resolution that it would be in the
best interest of the district to increase the number of commissioners
from three to five or seven, or in the event the board is presented
with a petition signed by ten percent of the registered voters resident
within the district who voted in the last general municipal election
calling for such an increase in the number of commissioners of the
district, the board shall submit a resolution to the county legislative
authority or authorities of the county or counties in which the
district is located requesting that an election be held. Upon receipt
of the resolution, the legislative authority or authorities of the
county or counties shall call a special election to be held within the
fire protection district at which election the following proposition
shall be submitted to the voters substantially as follows:

Shall the board of commissioners of . . . . . county fire
protection district no. . . . . . be increased from three members to
five (or seven) members?

Yes . . . . .
No . . . . . .

If the fire protection district is located in more than a single
county, this proposition shall indicate the name of the district.
If the proposition receives a majority approval at the election,
the board of commissioners of the fire protection district shall be
increased to five or seven members. The two or four additional members
shall be appointed in the same manner as provided in RCW 52.14.020.

Sec. 3 RCW 52.14.013 and 1994 c 223 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board of fire commissioners of a fire protection district may
adopt a resolution by unanimous vote causing a ballot proposition to be
submitted to voters of the district authorizing the creation of
commissioner districts. The board of fire commissioners shall create
commissioner districts if the ballot proposition authorizing the
creation of commissioner districts is approved by a simple majority
vote of the voters of the fire protection district voting on the
proposition. Three commissioner districts shall be created for a fire
protection district with three commissioners, ((and)) five commissioner
districts shall be created for a fire protection district with five
commissioners, and seven commissioner districts shall be created for a
fire protection district with seven commissioners. No two
commissioners may reside in the same commissioner district.
No change in the boundaries of any commissioner district shall be
made within one hundred twenty days next before the date of a general
district election, nor within twenty months after the commissioner
districts have been established or altered. However, if a boundary
change results in one commissioner district being represented by two or
more commissioners, those commissioners having the shortest unexpired
terms shall be assigned by the commission to commissioner districts
where there is a vacancy, and the commissioners so assigned shall be
deemed to be residents of the commissioner districts to which they are
assigned for purposes of determining whether those positions are
vacant.
The population of each commissioner district shall include
approximately equal population. Commissioner districts shall be
redrawn as provided in chapter ((29.70)) 29A.76 RCW. Commissioner
districts shall be used as follows: (1) Only a registered voter who
resides in a commissioner district may be a candidate for, or serve as,
a commissioner of the commissioner district; and (2) only voters of a
commissioner district may vote at a primary to nominate candidates for
a commissioner of the commissioner district. Voters of the entire fire
protection district may vote at a general election to elect a person as
a commissioner of the commissioner district.
When a board of fire commissioners that has commissioner districts
has been increased to five or seven members under RCW 52.14.015, the
board of fire commissioners shall divide the fire protection district
into five or seven commissioner districts before it appoints the two or
four additional fire commissioners. The two or four additional fire
commissioners who are appointed shall reside in separate commissioner
districts in which no other fire commissioner resides.

Sec. 4 RCW 52.14.017 and 1997 c 43 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 52.14.020, in the event a five-member or
seven-member board of commissioners of any fire protection district
determines by resolution that it would be in the best interest of the
fire protection district to decrease the number of commissioners from
five to three or from seven to five, or in the event the board is
presented with a petition signed by ten percent of the registered
voters resident within the district who voted in the last general
municipal election calling for such a decrease in the number of
commissioners of the district, the board shall submit a resolution to
the county legislative authority or authorities of the county or
counties in which the district is located requesting that an election
be held. Upon receipt of the resolution, the legislative authority or
authorities of the county or counties shall call a special election to
be held within the fire protection district at which election the
following proposition shall be submitted to the voters substantially as
follows:

Shall the board of commissioners of . . . . . . county fire
protection district no. . . . be decreased from five (seven) members to
three (five) members?

Yes . . .
No . . .

If the fire protection district has commissioner districts, the
commissioners of the district must pass a resolution, before the
submission of the proposition to the voters, to either redistrict from
five or seven commissioner districts to three or five commissioner
districts or eliminate the commissioner districts. The resolution
takes effect upon approval of the proposition by the voters.
If the fire protection district is located in more than a single
county, this proposition shall indicate the name of the district.
If the proposition receives a majority approval at the election,
the board of commissioners of the fire protection district shall be
decreased to five or three members. The two members shall be decreased
in accordance with RCW 52.06.085.

--- END ---