BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.14.110 and 2001 c 79 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Insofar as practicable, purchases and any public works by the
district shall be based on competitive bids. A formal sealed bid
procedure shall be used as standard procedure for purchases and
contracts for purchases executed by the board of commissioners. Formal
sealed bidding shall not be required for:
(1) The purchase of any materials, supplies, or equipment if the
cost will not exceed the sum of ten thousand dollars. However,
whenever the estimated cost does not exceed fifty thousand dollars, the
commissioners may by resolution use the process provided in RCW
39.04.190 to award contracts;
(2) Contracting for work to be done involving the construction or
improvement of a fire station or other buildings where the estimated
cost will not exceed the sum of two thousand five hundred dollars,
which includes the costs of labor, material, and equipment;
(3) Contracts using the small works roster process under RCW
39.04.155; ((and))
(4) Any contract for purchases or public work pursuant to RCW
39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the
purchase or public work; and
(5) Public work that the board of fire commissioners determines
will be performed by fire district employees or community volunteers.

--- END ---