BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The public records exemptions accountability committee is
created to review all exemptions from public disclosure under this
chapter and throughout the Revised Code of Washington.
(2) The committee consists of fifteen members as follows:
(a) A representative appointed by the governor;
(b) A representative appointed by the attorney general;
(c) A representative appointed by the state auditor;
(d) A representative of local government, to be selected by the
governor;
(e) A representative of a statewide media association, to be
selected by the attorney general;
(f) A member of the senate, to be selected by the senate majority
leader;
(g) A member of the senate, to be selected by the senate minority
leader;
(h) A member of the house of representatives, to be selected by the
speaker of the house of representatives;
(i) A member of the house of representatives, to be selected by the
house of representatives minority leader;
(j) Four members of the public, to be selected by the nine members
described in (a) through (i) of this subsection. Members of the public
shall be selected with consideration given to diversity of viewpoint
and geographic diversity;
(k) A representative appointed by the state archivist; and
(l) A representative appointed by the director of financial
management.
(3) The committee members shall elect a member of the committee to
serve as chair of the committee.
(4) Terms of the members shall be two years and shall be staggered,
beginning August 1, 2007.
(5) All meetings of the committee shall be open to the public.
(6) The committee must consider input from interested parties.
(7) By August 1, 2007, the code reviser shall provide the committee
with a list of all exemptions from public disclosure under this chapter
that are not codified in this chapter.
(8) The committee shall meet by September 1, 2007, to discuss the
exemptions and recommend the repeal or amendment of any exemptions. By
January 1, 2008, the committee shall transmit its initial
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the house of
representatives and the senate.
(9) Beginning in 2008, the code reviser shall by August 1st of each
year provide the committee with a list of all exemptions from public
disclosure under this chapter that are not codified in this chapter.
The committee shall meet a minimum of four times each year. Each year,
the committee shall prepare a list of exemptions, if any, that it
recommends for repeal or amendment, and transmit the information to
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of that year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The public records exemptions accountability committee and its
powers and duties shall be terminated June 30, 2011, as provided in
section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
RCW 42.56.--- (section 1 of this act) as now existing or hereafter
amended, is repealed, effective June 30, 2012.

--- END ---