BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature agrees with the findings
of the Washington learns report that research shows that after-school
programs that are well designed and connected with students' school
studies can improve academic learning for those struggling in school
and that after-school programs can play a strong role in supporting
increased math and science learning. The legislature finds that good
after-school programs and activities provide safe and effective
learning environments for children, including children who might
otherwise be alone and unsupervised after school. These programs not
only support children's academic efforts, they also build community
partnerships that support children and their learning.
(2) The legislature finds that students who participate in good
after-school care programs:
(a) Miss fewer days of school and have better behavior in school,
test scores, grades, and records of homework completion than children
who are left alone;
(b) Spend more time actively learning in a variety of settings and
less time watching television than their peers who are left alone; and
(c) Have better peer relations, emotional adjustment, and conflict
resolution skills than children who are left alone.
(3) The legislature further finds that there are statewide after-school plans that have been developed and are available that would help
the state make strategic investments in programs and activities that
support children academically while keeping them safe and well-supervised. Therefore, the legislature intends to implement the plan
by expanding high quality after-school programs, supporting
professional development for after-school program staff, increasing
public awareness of program benefits, and supporting the after-school
organizational infrastructure to ensure economies of scale in support
of after-school programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.215
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The Washington community learning center program is
established. The program shall be administered by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. The purposes of the program
include:
(a) Supporting the creation or expansion of community learning
centers that provide students with tutoring and educational enrichment
when school is not in session;
(b) Providing training and professional development for community
learning center program staff;
(c) Increasing public awareness of the availability and benefits of
after-school programs; and
(d) Supporting statewide after-school intermediary organizations in
their efforts to provide leadership, coordination, technical
assistance, advocacy, and programmatic support to after-school programs
throughout the state.
(2) To the extent that funding is available for this purpose, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction may provide
community learning center grants to any public or private organization
that meets the eligibility criteria of the federal twenty-first century
community learning centers program. Priority may be given to grant
requests submitted jointly by one or more schools or school districts
and one or more community-based organizations or other nonschool
partners. Priority shall be given to grant requests that:
(a) Focus on improving reading and mathematics proficiency for
students who attend schools that have been identified as being in need
of improvement under section 1116 of Title I of the federal no child
left behind act of 2001; and
(b) Include a public/private partnership agreement or proposal for
how to provide free transportation for those students in need that are
involved in the program.
(3) Community learning center grant funds may be used to carry out
a broad array of out-of-school activities that support and enhance
academic achievement. The activities may include but need not be
limited to:
(a) Remedial and academic enrichment;
(b) Mathematics, reading, and science education;
(c) Arts and music education;
(d) Entrepreneurial education;
(e) Community service;
(f) Tutoring and mentoring programs;
(g) Programs enhancing the language skills and academic achievement
of limited English proficient students;
(h) Recreational and athletic activities;
(i) Telecommunications and technology education;
(j) Programs that promote parental involvement and family literacy;
(k) Drug and violence prevention, counseling, and character
education programs; and
(l) Programs that assist students who have been truant, suspended,
or expelled, to improve their academic achievement.
(4) Each community learning center grant may be made for a maximum
of five years. Each grant recipient shall report annually to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction on what
transportation services are being used to assist students in accessing
the program and how those services are being funded. Based on this
information, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall compile a list of transportation service options being used and
make that list available to all after-school program providers that
were eligible for the community learning center program grants.
(5) To the extent that funding is available for this purpose, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction may provide grants
or other support for the training and professional development of
community learning center staff, the activities of intermediary after-school organizations, and efforts to increase public awareness of the
availability and benefits of after-school programs.
(6) Schools or school districts that receive a community learning
center grant under this section may seek approval from the office of
the superintendent of public instruction for flexibility to use a
portion of their state transportation funds for the costs of
transporting students to and from the community learning center
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2007.

--- END ---