BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.050 and 1997 c 392 s 514 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of rape in the second degree when, under
circumstances not constituting rape in the first degree, the person
engages in sexual intercourse with another person:
(a) By forcible compulsion;
(b) When the victim is incapable of consent by reason of being
physically helpless or mentally incapacitated;
(c) When the victim ((is developmentally disabled)) has a
developmental disability and the perpetrator is a person who is not
married to the victim and who:
(i) Has supervisory authority over the victim; or
(ii) Was providing transportation, within the course of his or her
employment, to the victim at the time of the offense;
(d) When the perpetrator is a health care provider, the victim is
a client or patient, and the sexual intercourse occurs during a
treatment session, consultation, interview, or examination. It is an
affirmative defense that the defendant must prove by a preponderance of
the evidence that the client or patient consented to the sexual
intercourse with the knowledge that the sexual intercourse was not for
the purpose of treatment;
(e) When the victim is a resident of a facility for ((mentally
disordered or chemically dependent)) persons with a mental disorder or
chemical dependency and the perpetrator is a person who is not married
to the victim and has supervisory authority over the victim; or
(f) When the victim is a frail elder or vulnerable adult and the
perpetrator is a person who is not married to the victim and who:
(i) Has a significant relationship with the victim; or
(ii) Was providing transportation, within the course of his or her
employment, to the victim at the time of the offense.
(2) Rape in the second degree is a class A felony.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.44.100 and 2003 c 53 s 67 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of indecent liberties when he or she
knowingly causes another person who is not his or her spouse to have
sexual contact with him or her or another:
(a) By forcible compulsion;
(b) When the other person is incapable of consent by reason of
being mentally defective, mentally incapacitated, or physically
helpless;
(c) When the victim ((is developmentally disabled)) has a
developmental disability and the perpetrator is a person who is not
married to the victim and who:
(i) Has supervisory authority over the victim; or
(ii) Was providing transportation, within the course of his or her
employment, to the victim at the time of the offense;
(d) When the perpetrator is a health care provider, the victim is
a client or patient, and the sexual contact occurs during a treatment
session, consultation, interview, or examination. It is an affirmative
defense that the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the
evidence that the client or patient consented to the sexual contact
with the knowledge that the sexual contact was not for the purpose of
treatment;
(e) When the victim is a resident of a facility for ((mentally
disordered or chemically dependent)) persons with a mental disorder or
chemical dependency and the perpetrator is a person who is not married
to the victim and has supervisory authority over the victim; or
(f) When the victim is a frail elder or vulnerable adult and the
perpetrator is a person who is not married to the victim and who:
(i) Has a significant relationship with the victim; or
(ii) Was providing transportation, within the course of his or her
employment, to the victim at the time of the offense.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, indecent
liberties is a class B felony.
(b) Indecent liberties by forcible compulsion is a class A felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---