BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.28.010 and 2001 c 231 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any accident occurs to any worker it shall be the duty
of such worker or someone in his or her behalf to forthwith report such
accident to his or her employer, superintendent, or supervisor in
charge of the work, and of the employer to at once report such accident
and the injury resulting therefrom to the department pursuant to RCW
51.28.025 where the worker has received treatment from a physician, has
been hospitalized, disabled from work, or has died as the apparent
result of such accident and injury.
(2) Upon receipt of such notice of accident, the department shall
immediately forward to the worker or his or her beneficiaries or
dependents notification, in nontechnical language, of their rights
under this title. The notice must specify the worker's right to
receive health services from a physician of the worker's choice under
RCW 51.36.010, including chiropractic services under RCW 51.36.015, and
must list the types of providers authorized to provide these services.
(3) Employers shall not engage in claim suppression.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "claim suppression" means
intentionally:
(a) Inducing employees to fail to report injuries;
(b) Inducing employees to treat injuries in the course of
employment as off-the-job injuries; or
(c) Acting otherwise to suppress legitimate industrial insurance
claims.
(5) In determining whether an employer has engaged in claim
suppression, the department shall consider the employer's history of
compliance with industrial insurance reporting requirements, and
whether the employer has discouraged employees from reporting injuries
or filing claims. The department has the burden of proving claim
suppression by a preponderance of the evidence.
(6) Claim suppression does not include bona fide workplace safety
and accident prevention programs or an employer's provision at the
worksite of first aid as defined by the department. The department
shall adopt rules defining bona fide workplace safety and accident
prevention programs and defining first aid.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.28.025 and 1987 c 185 s 32 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever an employer has notice or knowledge of an injury or
occupational disease sustained by any worker in his or her employment
who has received treatment from a physician, has been hospitalized,
disabled from work or has died as the apparent result of such injury or
occupational disease, the employer shall immediately report the same to
the department on forms prescribed by it. The report shall include:
(a) The name, address, and business of the employer;
(b) The name, address, and occupation of the worker;
(c) The date, time, cause, and nature of the injury or occupational
disease;
(d) Whether the injury or occupational disease arose in the course
of the injured worker's employment;
(e) All available information pertaining to the nature of the
injury or occupational disease including but not limited to any visible
signs, any complaints of the worker, any time lost from work, and the
observable effect on the worker's bodily functions, so far as is known;
and
(f) Such other pertinent information as the department may
prescribe by regulation.
(2) ((Failure or refusal to file the report required by subsection
(1) shall subject the offending employer to a penalty determined by the
director but not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars for each offense,
to be collected in a civil action in the name of the department and
paid into the supplemental pension fund.)) The employer shall not
engage in claim suppression. An employer found to have engaged in
claim suppression shall be subject to a penalty of at least two hundred
fifty dollars, not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars, for
each offense. The penalty shall be payable to the supplemental pension
fund. The department shall adopt rules establishing the amount of
penalties, taking into account the size of the employer and whether
there are prior findings of claim suppression. When a determination of
claim suppression has been made, the employer shall be prohibited from
any current or future participation in a retrospective rating program.
If self-insured, the director shall withdraw certification as provided
in RCW 51.14.080.
(3) When a determination of claim suppression is made and the
penalty is assessed, the department shall serve the employer and any
affected retrospective rating group with a determination as provided in
RCW 51.52.050. The determination may be protested to the department or
appealed to the board of industrial insurance appeals. Once the order
is final, the amount due shall be collected in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 51.48.140 and 51.48.150.
(4) The director, or the director's designee, shall investigate
reports or complaints that an employer has engaged in claim suppression
as prohibited in RCW 51.28.010(3). The complaints or allegations must
be received in writing, and must include the name or names of the
individuals or organizations submitting the complaint. In cases where
the department can show probable cause, the director may subpoena
records from the employer, medical providers, and any other entity that
the director believes may have relevant information. The director's
investigative and subpoena authority in this subsection is limited
solely to investigations into allegations of claim suppression or where
the director has probable cause that claim suppression might have
occurred.
(5) If the director determines that an employer has engaged in
claim suppression and, as a result, the worker has not filed a claim
for industrial insurance benefits as prescribed by law, then the
director in his or her sole discretion may waive the time limits for
filing a claim provided in RCW 51.28.050, if the complaint or
allegation of claim suppression is received within two years of the
worker's accident or exposure. For the director to exercise this
discretion, the claim must be filed with the department within ninety
days of the date the determination of claim suppression is issued.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "claim suppression" has the
same meaning as in RCW 51.28.010(4).

Sec. 3 RCW 51.28.050 and 1984 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
No application shall be valid or claim thereunder enforceable
unless filed within one year after the day upon which the injury
occurred or the rights of dependents or beneficiaries accrued, except
as provided in RCW 51.28.055 and 51.28.025(5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of labor and industries shall
adopt rules necessary to implement this act.

--- END ---