BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 8.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The condemnor must provide notice as required by this section
prior to a final action or public meeting at which:
(a) A state agency or other entity subject to chapter 8.04 RCW
takes a final action to authorize the condemnation of a specific
parcel;
(b) A county or other entity subject to chapter 8.08 RCW takes a
final action deeming a specific parcel or other property to be "for
county purposes" as provided in RCW 8.08.010;
(c) A city or town or other entity subject to chapter 8.12 RCW
takes a final action authorizing condemnation as provided in RCW
8.12.040;
(d) A school district or other entity subject to chapter 8.16 RCW
takes a final action selecting property for condemnation as provided in
RCW 8.16.010;
(e) Any other corporation authorized to condemn property takes a
final action to authorize condemnation as provided in RCW 8.20.010; or
(f) Any other entity subject to chapter 8.04, 8.08, 8.12, 8.16, or
8.20 RCW takes any final action to authorize the condemnation of a
specific parcel of property.
(2)(a)(i) Notice of the final action or public meeting shall be
mailed by certified mail to each and every property owner of record as
indicated on the tax rolls of the county to the address provided on
such tax rolls, for each parcel subject to the declaration of
necessity, at least fifteen days before the public meeting. If no
address is provided for a parcel on the tax rolls of the county, the
condemnor shall conduct a diligent inquiry for the address for each and
every parcel owner of record and send the notice to that address. In
case the property sought to be appropriated is school or county land,
such notice shall be mailed to the auditor of the county in which the
property sought to be acquired and appropriated is situated.
(ii) The notice must contain a general description of the property
such as an address, lot number, or parcel number and specify that
condemnation of the property will be considered during the final action
or at the public meeting. The notice must also describe the date,
time, and location of the final action or public meeting at which the
condemnor will decide whether or not to authorize the condemnation of
the property.
(iii) Mailing of the certified letter to the proper addressee or
addressees is deemed to be sufficient notice under this subsection
(2)(a).
(b)(i) Notice of a public meeting or final action described in
subsection (1) of this section shall also be given by publication in
the legal newspaper with the largest circulation in the jurisdiction
where such lands are situated once a week for two successive weeks
before the public meeting. Proof of circulation shall be established
by publisher's affidavit filed with the governing body of the
condemnor. Such publication shall be deemed sufficient notice in lieu
of a certified letter for each owner of record for the property whose
residence is unknown or cannot be ascertained after a diligent inquiry.
(ii) The notice published under this subsection (2)(b) shall
contain the same information as is required under (a) of this
subsection.
(3) Lack of sufficient notice under this section shall render the
subsequent proceedings void as to the person not served, but the
subsequent proceedings shall not be void as to all persons or parties
having been served with notice as provided in this section, either by
publication or otherwise. A condemnor may cure insufficient notice
under this section by providing an additional sufficient notice. In
such a case, RCW 8.12.530 shall not apply and a subsequent proceeding
may be filed sooner than one year after discontinuance. In a
subsequent condemnation action subject to this section in which a
condemnee alleges insufficient notice under this section, the court may
determine whether the condemnor made a diligent attempt to provide
sufficient notice and issue a finding on the sufficiency of the notice.
(4) For units of local government, "final action" has the same
meaning as that provided in RCW 42.30.020. For state agencies, the
office of the attorney general shall publish procedures that define
"final action" for state agencies to ensure that property owners are
provided with notice and opportunity for review and comment before the
agency makes a final decision to authorize the condemnation of specific
parcels of property. For all other entities subject to this act,
"final action" means a public meeting at which the entity decides
whether to authorize the condemnation of specific parcels of property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 8.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Proceedings under this chapter are subject to the notice
requirements of section 1 of this act. Compliance with section 1 of
this act is required before an action can be filed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 8.08 RCW
to read as follows:
Proceedings under this chapter are subject to the notice
requirements of section 1 of this act. Compliance with section 1 of
this act is required before an action can be filed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 8.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Proceedings under this chapter are subject to the notice
requirements of section 1 of this act. Compliance with section 1 of
this act is required before an action can be filed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 8.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Proceedings under this chapter are subject to the notice
requirements of section 1 of this act. Compliance with section 1 of
this act is required before an action can be filed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 8.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Proceedings under this chapter are subject to the notice
requirements of section 1 of this act. Compliance with section 1 of
this act is required before an action can be filed under this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 8.12.530 and 1988 c 202 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
At any time within six months from the date of rendition of the
last judgment awarding compensation for any such improvement in the
superior court, or if appellate review is sought, then within two
months after the final determination of the proceeding in the supreme
court or the court of appeals, any such city may discontinue the
proceedings by ordinance passed for that purpose before making payment
or proceeding with the improvement by paying or depositing in court all
taxable costs incurred by any parties to the proceedings up to the time
of such discontinuance. Except as provided in section 1(3) of this
act, if any such improvement be discontinued, no new proceedings shall
be undertaken therefor until the expiration of one year from the date
of such discontinuance.

--- END ---