BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "mental health services"
means medically necessary outpatient and inpatient services provided to
treat mental disorders covered by the diagnostic categories listed in
the most current version of the diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, published by the American psychiatric association, on
July 24, 2005, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
insurance commissioner by rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter
6, Laws of 2005, with the exception of the following categories, codes,
and services: (a) Substance related disorders; (b) life transition
problems, currently referred to as "V" codes, and diagnostic codes 302
through 302.9 as found in the diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, 4th edition, published by the American psychiatric
association; (c) skilled nursing facility services, home health care,
residential treatment, and custodial care; and (d) court-ordered
treatment unless the insurer's medical director or designee determines
the treatment to be medically necessary.
(2) Each disability insurance contract delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed on or after January 1, 2008, providing coverage
for medical and surgical services shall provide coverage for:
(a) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the
disability insurance contract. Wellness and preventive services that
are provided or reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other
cost sharing than other medical and surgical services are excluded from
this comparison. If the disability insurance contract imposes a
maximum out-of-pocket limit or stop loss, it shall be a single limit or
stop loss for medical, surgical, and mental health services; and
(b) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the disability insurance contract.
(3) Each disability insurance contract delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed on or after July 1, 2010, providing coverage for
medical and surgical services shall provide coverage for:
(a) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the
disability insurance contract. Wellness and preventive services that
are provided or reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other
cost sharing than other medical and surgical services are excluded from
this comparison. If the disability insurance contract imposes a
maximum out-of-pocket limit or stop loss, it shall be a single limit or
stop loss for medical, surgical, and mental health services. If the
disability insurance contract imposes any deductible, mental health
services shall be included with medical and surgical services for the
purpose of meeting the deductible requirement. Treatment limitations
or any other financial requirements on coverage for mental health
services are only allowed if the same limitations or requirements are
imposed on coverage for medical and surgical services; and
(b) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the disability insurance contract.
(4) In meeting the requirements of this section, disability
insurance contracts may not reduce the number of mental health
outpatient visits or mental health inpatient days below the level in
effect on July 1, 2002.
(5) This section does not prohibit a requirement that mental health
services be medically necessary as determined by the medical director
or designee, if a comparable requirement is applicable to medical and
surgical services.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the
management of mental health services.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.21.241 and 2006 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "mental health services"
means medically necessary outpatient and inpatient services provided to
treat mental disorders covered by the diagnostic categories listed in
the most current version of the diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, published by the American psychiatric association, on
July 24, 2005, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
insurance commissioner by rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter
6, Laws of 2005, with the exception of the following categories, codes,
and services: (a) Substance related disorders; (b) life transition
problems, currently referred to as "V" codes, and diagnostic codes 302
through 302.9 as found in the diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, 4th edition, published by the American psychiatric
association; (c) skilled nursing facility services, home health care,
residential treatment, and custodial care; and (d) court ordered
treatment unless the insurer's medical director or designee determines
the treatment to be medically necessary.
(2) All group disability insurance contracts and blanket disability
insurance contracts providing health benefit plans that provide
coverage for medical and surgical services shall provide:
(a) For all group health benefit plans for groups other than small
groups, as defined in RCW 48.43.005 delivered, issued for delivery, or
renewed on or after January 1, 2006, coverage for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(b) For all group health benefit plans ((for groups other than
small groups, as defined in RCW 48.43.005)) delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed on or after January 1, 2008, coverage for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison. If the health benefit plan imposes a maximum out-of-pocket
limit or stop loss, it shall be a single limit or stop loss for
medical, surgical, and mental health services; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(c) For all group health benefit plans ((for groups other than
small groups, as defined in RCW 48.43.005)) delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed on or after July 1, 2010, coverage for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison. If the health benefit plan imposes a maximum out-of-pocket
limit or stop loss, it shall be a single limit or stop loss for
medical, surgical, and mental health services. If the health benefit
plan imposes any deductible, mental health services shall be included
with medical and surgical services for the purpose of meeting the
deductible requirement. Treatment limitations or any other financial
requirements on coverage for mental health services are only allowed if
the same limitations or requirements are imposed on coverage for
medical and surgical services; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(3) In meeting the requirements of subsection (2)(a) and (b) of
this section, health benefit plans may not reduce the number of mental
health outpatient visits or mental health inpatient days below the
level in effect on July 1, 2002.
(4) This section does not prohibit a requirement that mental health
services be medically necessary as determined by the medical director
or designee, if a comparable requirement is applicable to medical and
surgical services.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the
management of mental health services.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.44.341 and 2006 c 74 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "mental health services"
means medically necessary outpatient and inpatient services provided to
treat mental disorders covered by the diagnostic categories listed in
the most current version of the diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, published by the American psychiatric association, on
July 24, 2005, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
insurance commissioner by rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter
6, Laws of 2005, with the exception of the following categories, codes,
and services: (a) Substance related disorders; (b) life transition
problems, currently referred to as "V" codes, and diagnostic codes 302
through 302.9 as found in the diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, 4th edition, published by the American psychiatric
association; (c) skilled nursing facility services, home health care,
residential treatment, and custodial care; and (d) court ordered
treatment unless the health care service contractor's medical director
or designee determines the treatment to be medically necessary.
(2) All health service contracts providing health benefit plans
that provide coverage for medical and surgical services shall provide:
(a) For all group health benefit plans for groups other than small
groups, as defined in RCW 48.43.005 delivered, issued for delivery, or
renewed on or after January 1, 2006, coverage for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(b) For all ((group)) health benefit plans ((for groups other than
small groups, as defined in RCW 48.43.005)) delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed on or after January 1, 2008, coverage for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison. If the health benefit plan imposes a maximum out-of-pocket
limit or stop loss, it shall be a single limit or stop loss for
medical, surgical, and mental health services; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(c) For all ((group)) health benefit plans ((for groups other than
small groups, as defined in RCW 48.43.005)) delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed on or after July 1, 2010, coverage for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison. If the health benefit plan imposes a maximum out-of-pocket
limit or stop loss, it shall be a single limit or stop loss for
medical, surgical, and mental health services. If the health benefit
plan imposes any deductible, mental health services shall be included
with medical and surgical services for the purpose of meeting the
deductible requirement. Treatment limitations or any other financial
requirements on coverage for mental health services are only allowed if
the same limitations or requirements are imposed on coverage for
medical and surgical services; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(3) In meeting the requirements of subsection (2)(a) and (b) of
this section, health benefit plans may not reduce the number of mental
health outpatient visits or mental health inpatient days below the
level in effect on July 1, 2002.
(4) This section does not prohibit a requirement that mental health
services be medically necessary as determined by the medical director
or designee, if a comparable requirement is applicable to medical and
surgical services.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the
management of mental health services.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.46.291 and 2006 c 74 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "mental health services"
means medically necessary outpatient and inpatient services provided to
treat mental disorders covered by the diagnostic categories listed in
the most current version of the diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, published by the American psychiatric association, on
July 24, 2005, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
insurance commissioner by rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter
6, Laws of 2005, with the exception of the following categories, codes,
and services: (a) Substance related disorders; (b) life transition
problems, currently referred to as "V" codes, and diagnostic codes 302
through 302.9 as found in the diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, 4th edition, published by the American psychiatric
association; (c) skilled nursing facility services, home health care,
residential treatment, and custodial care; and (d) court ordered
treatment unless the health maintenance organization's medical director
or designee determines the treatment to be medically necessary.
(2) All health benefit plans offered by health maintenance
organizations that provide coverage for medical and surgical services
shall provide:
(a) For all group health benefit plans for groups other than small
groups, as defined in RCW 48.43.005 delivered, issued for delivery, or
renewed on or after January 1, 2006, coverage for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(b) For all ((group)) health benefit plans ((for groups other than
small groups, as defined in RCW 48.43.005)) delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed on or after January 1, 2008, coverage for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison. If the health benefit plan imposes a maximum out-of-pocket
limit or stop loss, it shall be a single limit or stop loss for
medical, surgical, and mental health services; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(c) For all ((group)) health benefit plans ((for groups other than
small groups, as defined in RCW 48.43.005)) delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed on or after July 1, 2010, coverage for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison. If the health benefit plan imposes a maximum out-of-pocket
limit or stop loss, it shall be a single limit or stop loss for
medical, surgical, and mental health services. If the health benefit
plan imposes any deductible, mental health services shall be included
with medical and surgical services for the purpose of meeting the
deductible requirement. Treatment limitations or any other financial
requirements on coverage for mental health services are only allowed if
the same limitations or requirements are imposed on coverage for
medical and surgical services; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(3) In meeting the requirements of subsection (2)(a) and (b) of
this section, health benefit plans may not reduce the number of mental
health outpatient visits or mental health inpatient days below the
level in effect on July 1, 2002.
(4) This section does not prohibit a requirement that mental health
services be medically necessary as determined by the medical director
or designee, if a comparable requirement is applicable to medical and
surgical services.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the
management of mental health services.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.41.110 and 2001 c 196 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The pool shall offer one or more care management plans of
coverage. Such plans may, but are not required to, include point of
service features that permit participants to receive in-network
benefits or out-of-network benefits subject to differential cost
shares. Covered persons enrolled in the pool on January 1, 2001, may
continue coverage under the pool plan in which they are enrolled on
that date. However, the pool may incorporate managed care features
into such existing plans.
(2) The administrator shall prepare a brochure outlining the
benefits and exclusions of the pool policy in plain language. After
approval by the board, such brochure shall be made reasonably available
to participants or potential participants.
(3) The health insurance policy issued by the pool shall pay only
reasonable amounts for medically necessary eligible health care
services rendered or furnished for the diagnosis or treatment of
illnesses, injuries, and conditions which are not otherwise limited or
excluded. Eligible expenses are the reasonable amounts for the health
care services and items for which benefits are extended under the pool
policy. Such benefits shall at minimum include, but not be limited to,
the following services or related items:
(a) Hospital services, including charges for the most common
semiprivate room, for the most common private room if semiprivate rooms
do not exist in the health care facility, or for the private room if
medically necessary, but limited to a total of one hundred eighty
inpatient days in a calendar year, and limited to thirty days inpatient
care for ((mental and nervous conditions, or)) alcohol, drug, or
chemical dependency or abuse per calendar year;
(b) Professional services including surgery for the treatment of
injuries, illnesses, or conditions, other than dental, which are
rendered by a health care provider, or at the direction of a health
care provider, by a staff of registered or licensed practical nurses,
or other health care providers;
(c) The first twenty outpatient professional visits for the
diagnosis or treatment of ((one or more mental or nervous conditions
or)) alcohol, drug, or chemical dependency or abuse rendered during a
calendar year by a state-certified chemical dependency program approved
under chapter 70.96A RCW, or by one or more physicians, psychologists,
or community mental health professionals, or, at the direction of a
physician, by other qualified licensed health care practitioners((, in
the case of mental or nervous conditions, and rendered by a state
certified chemical dependency program approved under chapter 70.96A
RCW, in the case of alcohol, drug, or chemical dependency or abuse));
(d) Drugs and contraceptive devices requiring a prescription;
(e) Services of a skilled nursing facility, excluding custodial and
convalescent care, for not more than one hundred days in a calendar
year as prescribed by a physician;
(f) Services of a home health agency;
(g) Chemotherapy, radioisotope, radiation, and nuclear medicine
therapy;
(h) Oxygen;
(i) Anesthesia services;
(j) Prostheses, other than dental;
(k) Durable medical equipment which has no personal use in the
absence of the condition for which prescribed;
(l) Diagnostic x-rays and laboratory tests;
(m) Oral surgery limited to the following: Fractures of facial
bones; excisions of mandibular joints, lesions of the mouth, lip, or
tongue, tumors, or cysts excluding treatment for temporomandibular
joints; incision of accessory sinuses, mouth salivary glands or ducts;
dislocations of the jaw; plastic reconstruction or repair of traumatic
injuries occurring while covered under the pool; and excision of
impacted wisdom teeth;
(n) Maternity care services;
(o) Services of a physical therapist and services of a speech
therapist;
(p) Hospice services;
(q) Professional ambulance service to the nearest health care
facility qualified to treat the illness or injury; ((and))
(r) Mental health services pursuant to section 6 of this act; and
(s) Other medical equipment, services, or supplies required by
physician's orders and medically necessary and consistent with the
diagnosis, treatment, and condition.
(4) The board shall design and employ cost containment measures and
requirements such as, but not limited to, care coordination, provider
network limitations, preadmission certification, and concurrent
inpatient review which may make the pool more cost-effective.
(5) The pool benefit policy may contain benefit limitations,
exceptions, and cost shares such as copayments, coinsurance, and
deductibles that are consistent with managed care products, except that
differential cost shares may be adopted by the board for nonnetwork
providers under point of service plans. The pool benefit policy cost
shares and limitations must be consistent with those that are generally
included in health plans approved by the insurance commissioner;
however, no limitation, exception, or reduction may be used that would
exclude coverage for any disease, illness, or injury.
(6) The pool may not reject an individual for health plan coverage
based upon preexisting conditions of the individual or deny, exclude,
or otherwise limit coverage for an individual's preexisting health
conditions; except that it shall impose a six-month benefit waiting
period for preexisting conditions for which medical advice was given,
for which a health care provider recommended or provided treatment, or
for which a prudent layperson would have sought advice or treatment,
within six months before the effective date of coverage. The
preexisting condition waiting period shall not apply to prenatal care
services. The pool may not avoid the requirements of this section
through the creation of a new rate classification or the modification
of an existing rate classification. Credit against the waiting period
shall be as provided in subsection (7) of this section.
(7)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the pool shall
credit any preexisting condition waiting period in its plans for a
person who was enrolled at any time during the sixty-three day period
immediately preceding the date of application for the new pool plan.
For the person previously enrolled in a group health benefit plan, the
pool must credit the aggregate of all periods of preceding coverage not
separated by more than sixty-three days toward the waiting period of
the new health plan. For the person previously enrolled in an
individual health benefit plan other than a catastrophic health plan,
the pool must credit the period of coverage the person was continuously
covered under the immediately preceding health plan toward the waiting
period of the new health plan. For the purposes of this subsection, a
preceding health plan includes an employer-provided self-funded health
plan.
(b) The pool shall waive any preexisting condition waiting period
for a person who is an eligible individual as defined in section
2741(b) of the federal health insurance portability and accountability
act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. 300gg-41(b)).
(8) If an application is made for the pool policy as a result of
rejection by a carrier, then the date of application to the carrier,
rather than to the pool, should govern for purposes of determining
preexisting condition credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "mental health services"
means medically necessary outpatient and inpatient services provided to
treat mental disorders covered by the diagnostic categories listed in
the most current version of the diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, published by the American psychiatric association, on
July 24, 2005, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
insurance commissioner by rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter
6, Laws of 2005, with the exception of the following categories, codes,
and services: (a) Substance related disorders; (b) life transition
problems, currently referred to as "V" codes, and diagnostic codes 302
through 302.9 as found in the diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, 4th edition, published by the American psychiatric
association; (c) skilled nursing facility services, home health care,
residential treatment, and custodial care; and (d) court-ordered
treatment unless the insurer's medical director or designee determines
the treatment to be medically necessary.
(2) Each health insurance policy issued by the pool on or after
January 1, 2008, shall provide coverage for:
(a) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the policy.
Wellness and preventive services that are provided or reimbursed at a
lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing than other medical
and surgical services are excluded from this comparison. If the policy
imposes a maximum out-of-pocket limit or stop loss, it shall be a
single limit or stop loss for medical, surgical, and mental health
services; and
(b) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the policy.
(3) Each health insurance policy issued by the pool on or after
July 1, 2010, shall provide coverage for:
(a) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the policy.
Wellness and preventive services that are provided or reimbursed at a
lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing than other medical
and surgical services are excluded from this comparison. If the policy
imposes a maximum out-of-pocket limit or stop loss, it shall be a
single limit or stop loss for medical, surgical, and mental health
services. If the policy imposes any deductible, mental health services
shall be included with medical and surgical services for the purpose of
meeting the deductible requirement. Treatment limitations or any other
financial requirements on coverage for mental health services are only
allowed if the same limitations or requirements are imposed on coverage
for medical and surgical services; and
(b) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the policy.
(4) In meeting the requirements of this section, a policy may not
reduce the number of mental health outpatient visits or mental health
inpatient days below the level in effect on July 1, 2002.
(5) This section does not prohibit a requirement that mental health
services be medically necessary as determined by the medical director
or designee, if a comparable requirement is applicable to medical and
surgical services.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the
management of mental health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 48.21.240 (Mental health treatment, optional supplemental
coverage -- Waiver) and 2005 c 6 s 7, 1987 c 283 s 3, 1986 c 184 s 2, &
1983 c 35 s 1;
(2) RCW 48.44.340 (Mental health treatment, optional supplemental
coverage -- Waiver) and 2005 c 6 s 8, 1987 c 283 s 4, 1986 c 184 s 3, &
1983 c 35 s 2; and
(3) RCW 48.46.290 (Mental health treatment, optional supplemental
coverage -- Waiver) and 2005 c 6 s 9, 1987 c 283 s 5, 1986 c 184 s 4, &
1983 c 35 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---