BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the coastal
Dungeness crab fishery is one of the most valuable commercial fisheries
in Washington state. For example, the 2004-05 season resulted in
landings of twenty-one million pounds with an estimated ex-vessel value
of over thirty million dollars. The fishery represents a vital
economic foundation for many coastal communities.
Since 1994, the coastal Dungeness crab fishery has faced
significant pressure and has undergone many regulatory changes stemming
from issues relating to the sustainability of the resource, the safety
and sustainability of the fleet, interstate and federal jurisdiction
questions, as well as allocation issues.
In order to further promote the sustainability of the coastal
Dungeness crab resource, the coastal crab fleet, and coastal
communities, the legislature intends to institute a coastal Dungeness
buyback program in cooperation with the federal government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall develop a Dungeness crab-coastal fishery
buyback program. The program must provide for the purchase and
permanent retirement of Dungeness crab-coastal fishery licenses. The
department shall design this element of the program with the goal of
purchasing between eighty and one hundred Dungeness crab-coastal
fishery licenses.
(2) In addition to license purchase and retirement, the program may
provide for the purchase or retirement of vessels designated on
Dungeness crab-coastal fishery licenses.
(3) The program must explore funding alternatives that involve
federal funding, state funding, funding provided by Dungeness crab-coastal license holders, and combinations thereof.
(4)(a) The department must include in the program those elements
necessary for the administration of the buyback, including the
mechanisms by which Dungeness crab-coastal license holders may apply to
participate in the program and by which the department will select
licenses or vessels for purchase from among the applicants.
(b) The program must include and clearly set forth any conditions
that will be placed on Dungeness crab-coastal license holders
participating in the program.
(5) The program must be designed to have a neutral impact on
Dungeness crab harvests in the state and federal waters off the coasts
of Oregon and California.
(6) Participation by Dungeness crab-coastal license holders in the
program is entirely voluntary.
(7) The department shall consult with Dungeness crab-coastal
license holders when designing the program.
(8) To assist the department in the development of the program, the
department may contract with persons not employed by the state.
(9) By December 1, 2007, the department shall provide a report
detailing the program to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the senate and house of representatives.
(10) The program may not be implemented, and state funds may not be
expended, without specific legislative authorization.
(11) This section expires June 30, 2010.

--- END ---