BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.220.020 and 1990 c 33 s 218 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following words and phrases whenever used in chapter 28A.220
RCW shall have the following meaning:
(1) "Superintendent" or "state superintendent" ((shall)) means the
superintendent of public instruction.
(2) "Traffic safety education course" ((shall)) means (a) an
accredited course of instruction in traffic safety education ((which
shall)) that consists of two phases, classroom instruction((,)) and
laboratory experience, or (b) a course of instruction approved by the
director of the department of licensing under RCW 46.82.290(3).
"Laboratory experience" ((shall)) must include on-street, driving
range, or simulator experience or some combination thereof. Each phase
((shall)) must meet basic course requirements ((which shall be))
established by the superintendent of public instruction and each part
of ((said)) the course ((shall)) must be taught by a qualified teacher
of traffic safety education. Any portions of the course may be taught
after regular school hours or on Saturdays as well as on regular school
days or as a summer school course, at the option of the local school
districts.
(3) "Qualified teacher of traffic safety education" ((shall)) means
an instructor certificated under ((the provisions of)) chapter 28A.410
RCW and certificated by the superintendent of public instruction to
teach either the classroom phase or the laboratory phase of the traffic
safety education course, or both, under ((regulations promulgated))
rules adopted by the superintendent((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the
laboratory experience phase of the traffic safety education course may
be taught by instructors certificated under rules ((promulgated))
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction, exclusive of any
requirement that the instructor be certificated under ((the provisions
of)) chapter 28A.410 RCW. Professional instructors certificated under
((the provisions of)) chapter 46.82 RCW, and participating in this
program, ((shall be)) are subject to reasonable qualification
requirements jointly adopted by the superintendent of public
instruction and the director of licensing. "Qualified teacher of
traffic safety education" includes a parent or guardian teaching a
traffic safety education course, as defined in subsection (2)(b) of
this section, to his or her own child.
(4) "Realistic level of effort" means the classroom and laboratory
student learning experiences considered acceptable to the
superintendent of public instruction that must be satisfactorily
accomplished by the student in order to successfully complete the
traffic safety education course.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.82.280 and 2006 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Behind-the-wheel instruction" means instruction in an approved
driver training school instruction vehicle according to and inclusive
of the minimum required curriculum. Behind-the-wheel instruction is
characterized by driving experience.
(2) "Classroom" means a space dedicated to and used exclusively by
a driver training instructor for the instruction of students. With
prior department approval, a branch office classroom may be located
within alternative facilities, such as a public or private library,
school, community college, college or university, or a business
training facility.
(3) "Classroom instruction" means that portion of a traffic safety
education course that is characterized by classroom-based student
instruction conducted by or under the direct supervision of a licensed
instructor or licensed instructors.
(4) "Driver training school" means a commercial driver training
school engaged in the business of giving instruction, for a fee, in the
operation of automobiles.
(5) "Driver training education course" means (a) a course of
instruction in traffic safety education approved and licensed by the
department of licensing that consists of classroom and behind-the-wheel
instruction as documented by the minimum approved curriculum, or (b) a
commercially available, parent taught course of instruction in traffic
safety education that has been approved by the director under RCW
46.82.290(3).
(6) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing of
the state of Washington.
(7) "Advisory committee" means the driving instructors' advisory
committee as created in this chapter.
(8) "Fraudulent practices" means any conduct or representation on
the part of a driver training school owner or instructor including:
(a) Inducing anyone to believe, or to give the impression, that a
license to operate a motor vehicle or any other license granted by the
director may be obtained by any means other than those prescribed by
law, or furnishing or obtaining the same by illegal or improper means,
or requesting, accepting, or collecting money for such purposes;
(b) ((Operation of)) Operating a driver training school without a
license, providing instruction without an instructor's license,
verifying enrollment prior to being licensed, misleading or false
statements on applications for a commercial driver training school
license or instructor's license or on any required records or
supporting documentation;
(c) Failing to fully document and maintain all required driver
training school records of instruction, school operation, and
instructor training;
(d) Issuing a driver training course certificate without requiring
completion of the necessary behind-the-wheel and classroom instruction.
(9) "Instructor" means (a) any person employed by or otherwise
associated with a driver training school to instruct persons in the
operation of an automobile or (b) a parent or guardian teaching his or
her own child.
(10) "Owner" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, or other person or group that holds a substantial interest
in a driver training school.
(11) "Place of business" means a designated location at which the
business of a driver training school is transacted and its records are
kept.
(12) "Person" means any individual, firm, corporation, partnership,
or association.
(13) "Substantial interest holder" means a person who has actual or
potential influence over the management or operation of any driver
training school. Evidence of substantial interest includes, but is not
limited to, one or more of the following:
(a) Directly or indirectly owning, operating, managing, or
controlling a driver training school or any part of a driver training
school;
(b) Directly or indirectly profiting from or assuming liability for
debts of a driver training school;
(c) Is an officer or director of a driver training school;
(d) Owning ten percent or more of any class of stock in a privately
or closely held corporate driver training school, or five percent or
more of any class of stock in a publicly traded corporate driver
training school;
(e) Furnishing ten percent or more of the capital, whether in cash,
goods, or services, for the operation of a driver training school
during any calendar year; or
(f) Directly or indirectly receiving a salary, commission,
royalties, or other form of compensation from the activity in which a
driver training school is or seeks to be engaged.
(14) "Student" means any person enrolled in a driver training
course that pays a fee for instruction.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.82.290 and 1979 ex.s. c 51 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director ((shall be)) is responsible for the administration
and enforcement of the law pertaining to driver training schools as set
forth in this chapter.
(2) The director ((is authorized to)) may adopt and enforce ((such
reasonable)) rules ((as may be)) that are consistent with and necessary
to carry out this chapter.
(3) The director may review and approve parent taught driver
training education courses designed for use in the home. The director
may charge a fee for enrollment in a parent taught driver training
education course that may not exceed the department's actual cost to
implement the course.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.82.300 and 2006 c 219 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall be assisted in the duties and
responsibilities of this chapter by the driver instructors' advisory
committee, consisting of five members. Members of the advisory
committee shall be appointed by the director for two-year terms and
shall consist of a representative of the driver training schools, a
representative of the driving instructors (who shall not be from the
same school as the school member), a representative of the
superintendent of public instruction, a representative of the
department of licensing, and a representative from the Washington state
traffic safety commission. Members shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. A member who
is receiving a salary from the state shall not receive compensation
other than travel expenses incurred in such service.
(2) The advisory committee shall meet at least semiannually and
shall have additional meetings as may be called by the director. The
director or the director's representative shall attend all meetings of
the advisory committee and shall serve as chairman.
(3) Duties of the advisory committee shall be to:
(a) Advise and confer with the director or the director's
representative on matters pertaining to the establishment of rules
necessary to carry out this chapter;
(b) Review and update when necessary a curriculum consisting of a
list of items of knowledge and the processes of driving a motor vehicle
specifying the minimum requirements adjudged necessary in teaching a
proper and adequate course of driver education;
(c) Review and update instructor certification standards to be
consistent with RCW 46.82.330 and take into consideration those
standards required to be met by traffic safety education teachers under
RCW 28A.220.020(3); ((and))
(d) Prepare the examination for a driver instructor's certificate
and review examination results at least once each calendar year for the
purpose of updating and revising examination standards; and
(e) Review and recommend parent taught driver training education
courses designed for use in the home.

--- END ---