BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there is a
broadly held ethic among the citizens of the state that includes
appreciation of nature and environmental values, and that many citizens
are willing to voluntarily undertake activities to protect and enhance
environmental values on their own land and in their communities.
(2) The purposes of this act are to: Promote nonregulatory
measures, incentives, and educational programs; reduce conflict between
agencies, local governments, and stakeholders; alleviate adverse
consequences of prescriptive rules; and protect both property rights
and values and critical area functions and values.
(3) The legislature therefore intends that counties and cities
utilize voluntary solutions as a planning priority where they would be
effective in substantially meeting the goals and requirements of the
growth management act, and provide ample opportunities for citizens to
understand and pursue voluntary options to improve their own
environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Cities and counties may:
(a) Initiate or participate in environmental management and
incentive zone subarea planning partnerships;
(b) Adopt proposed environmental and incentive zone subarea plans
as an alternative means, within a subarea, of meeting the requirements
to protect the functions and values of critical areas under this
chapter, including critical areas defined in RCW 36.70A.030(5) (a)
through (d);
(c) Provide exceptions or individual waivers to critical area
requirements, within a subarea, including the requirements pertaining
to critical areas contained in RCW 36.70A.060, 36.70A.170, and
36.70A.172, if the plan as a whole includes best available science for
the subarea under consideration and provides at least the equivalent
protection of critical area function and value; and
(d) Integrate voluntary and nonregulatory incentives and regulatory
programs to meet other requirements of this chapter, as well as other
state and federal requirements.
(2) Cities and counties choosing to initiate planning under this
section shall:
(a) Appoint a lead management entity; and
(b) Create a scoping document to identify: (i) The geographic
boundaries of the proposed planning subarea; and (ii) requirements and
responsibilities the environmental management incentive zone subarea
planning process is designed to meet.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Lead management entity" means a lead subarea planning entity
appointed by a city or county, or jointly by participating cities and
counties, to coordinate and facilitate the use of nonregulatory
incentives under the environmental management incentive zone subarea
planning process. Cities, counties, conservation districts, public
organizations, and private nongovernmental organizations with authority
to receive public funds may serve as a lead management entity.
(b) "Planning partnership" means a city or county, or combination
of cities and counties, partnering with property owners, stakeholders,
conservation districts, and a lead management entity to create and
implement an environmental management incentive zone subarea plan.
(c) "Plan" means an environmental management incentive zone subarea
plan.
(4) An appointed lead management entity shall:
(a) Apply to the department for funding to plan under this section;
(b) Identify and apply for financial and technical assistance from
other appropriate public and private sources, including sources at the
federal, state, or local level; and
(c) Promote and facilitate voluntary contracts, projects, and
commitments, and assist partner communities and their constituents in
formalizing attendant financial and legal documents.
(5) The department shall:
(a) Prescribe the form and manner of applications for funding under
this section;
(b) Select and fund at least five pilot planning efforts; and
(c) Rank applications for funding, giving preference to
applications with the greatest potential to: (i) Promote voluntary
measures, incentives, and educational programs that, when integrated
with regulatory measures authorized outside this chapter, will
contribute to both the protection of critical area functions and values
and the protection of property rights and values; (ii) promote
cooperation between multiple and diverse jurisdictions and stakeholders
in efforts to conserve contiguous landscapes and avoid uncoordinated
land use patterns; (iii) use proven monitoring and adaptive management
methods to measure the effectiveness of incentives and programs adopted
under this section in achieving critical area protection, and allow for
necessary adjustments or improvements to those incentives and programs
over time; and (iv) support the economic viability of working natural
resource lands and industries.
(6) For the purpose of planning or implementing any element of an
environmental management and incentive zone subarea plan:
(a) Cities, counties, and other appropriate government
jurisdictions may enter into interlocal agreements with each other
under RCW 39.34.030 or adopt memorandums of agreement with each other
or with private entities and nongovernmental organizations;
(b) Planning partnerships are encouraged to invite participation
from appropriate federal, state, local, private, or tribal agencies,
authorities, and organizations with nonregulatory incentive programs or
regulatory jurisdiction related to environmental, fish, or wildlife
issues within the planning region; and
(c) Invited agencies, authorities, and organizations are encouraged
to broadly interpret their ability to collaborate as part of a
multiagency team and provide a unified assessment of regulatory
requirements and nonregulatory opportunities pertinent to planning
under this section.
(7)(a) A plan adopted under this section must, to the maximum
extent practicable, promote and include voluntary, nonregulatory
solutions as a planning priority where they would be effective in
substantially meeting the goals and requirements of this chapter.
(b) Development policies, rules, or conditions may also be included
in a plan as necessary, in accordance with nexus and rough
proportionality requirements, to provide adequate protection of
critical area functions and values.
(c) Development policies, rules, and conditions included in the
plan under this section may not prohibit uses legally existing on any
parcel prior to plan adoption except for those uses restricted or
limited through voluntary agreements by landowners included in the plan
as permanent or long-term commitments.
(d) This section is not intended to impair a landowner's ability to
qualify for voluntary incentive programs, such as the conservation
reserve enhancement program, that provide for the restoration of fish
and wildlife habitat or the improvement of water quality.
(8) The legislature intends that cities and counties be given broad
deference and discretion consistent with RCW 36.70A.320 to prioritize
and balance the goals of this chapter and critical area requirements
under RCW 36.70A.060 and 36.70A.172, if the plan as a whole includes
best available science for the subarea under consideration and provides
at least the equivalent protection of critical area function and value.
Growth management hearings boards and reviewing courts shall not find
an adopted plan to be out of compliance with this chapter if the
adopted plan as a whole satisfies the requirements of this section.
(9) A joint legislative oversight committee, consisting of two
members from each caucus of the house of representatives and two
members from each caucus of the senate, is created. The committee
shall appoint a nonvoting advisory counsel, composed of a broad and
balanced range of stakeholders, to advise and consult with the
committee. Within one year after the effective date of this act, the
committee shall review progress of planning efforts initiated under
this section and provide the department written comments, if any, on
proposed or adopted plans. The department shall cooperate by providing
information as requested by the committee. By December 1, 2009, the
committee shall provide a joint report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature, with recommendations for statutory changes that would
provide better integration of voluntary incentives and regulatory
programs and promote more effective protection of both property rights
and values and critical area functions and values.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.060 and 2005 c 423 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) ((Except as provided in RCW 36.70A.1701,)) Each county that
is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, and each city
within such county, shall adopt development regulations on or before
September 1, 1991, to assure the conservation of agricultural, forest,
and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
Regulations adopted under this subsection may not prohibit uses legally
existing on any parcel prior to their adoption and shall remain in
effect until the county or city adopts development regulations pursuant
to RCW 36.70A.040. Such regulations shall assure that the use of lands
adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands shall not
interfere with the continued use, in the accustomed manner and in
accordance with best management practices, of these designated lands
for the production of food, agricultural products, or timber, or for
the extraction of minerals.
(b) Counties and cities shall require that all plats, short plats,
development permits, and building permits issued for development
activities on, or within five hundred feet of, lands designated as
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands, contain a
notice that the subject property is within or near designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands on which a
variety of commercial activities may occur that are not compatible with
residential development for certain periods of limited duration. The
notice for mineral resource lands shall also inform that an application
might be made for mining-related activities, including mining,
extraction, washing, crushing, stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and
recycling of minerals.
(2) Each county and city shall adopt development regulations that
protect critical areas that are required to be designated under RCW
36.70A.170. For counties and cities that are required or choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be
adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the
counties and cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on
or before March 1, 1992.
(3) Such counties and cities shall review these designations and
development regulations when adopting their comprehensive plans under
RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development regulations under RCW
36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and development regulations
to insure consistency or to include provisions related to an
environmental management and incentive zone subarea plan adopted under
section 2 of this act.
(4) Forest land and agricultural land located within urban growth
areas shall not be designated by a county or city as forest land or
agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW
36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a program authorizing
transfer or purchase of development rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the department of
community, trade, and economic development for the purposes of
environmental management incentive zone subarea planning under this
act.

--- END ---