BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds:
(1) There are students with disabilities throughout the state of
Washington who have attended four years of high school, but whose
individualized education programs prescribe the continuation of special
education and related services beyond the fourth year of high school;
(2) Through their participation in the public schools and the
community, students with disabilities have frequently become identified
with and connected to a class of typically developing, age-appropriate
peers who will graduate in four years and participate in a high school
graduation ceremony;
(3) A high school graduation ceremony is an important rite of
passage for students regardless of their abilities or limitations; and
(4) There is significant value in recognizing students' attendance
and accomplishments in their individualized education programs and in
allowing students with disabilities to participate in high school
graduation ceremonies and activities with their age-appropriate peers
without the forfeiture of their continuing special education and
related services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2007, each school district that operates a
high school shall establish a policy and procedures that permit any
student who is receiving special education or related services under an
individualized education program pursuant to state and federal law and
who will continue to receive such services between the ages of eighteen
and twenty-one to participate in the graduation ceremony and activities
after four years of high school attendance with his or her age-appropriate peers and receive a certificate of attendance.
(2) Participation in a graduation ceremony and receipt of a
certificate of attendance under this section does not preclude a
student from continuing to receive special education and related
services under an individualized education program beyond the
graduation ceremony.
(3) A student's participation in a graduation ceremony and receipt
of a certificate of attendance under this section shall not be
construed as the student's receipt of either:
(a) A high school diploma pursuant to RCW 28A.230.120; or
(b) A certificate of individual achievement pursuant to RCW
28A.155.045.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as Kevin's
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---