BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.155.045 and 2004 c 19 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, students served under
this chapter, including students who are covered by section 504 of the
federal rehabilitation act of 1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794),
who are not appropriately assessed by the high school Washington
assessment system as defined in RCW 28A.655.061, even with
accommodations, may earn a certificate of individual achievement. The
certificate may be earned using multiple ways to demonstrate skills and
abilities commensurate with their individual education programs. The
determination of whether the high school assessment system is
appropriate shall be made by the student's individual education program
team. For these students, the certificate of individual achievement is
required for graduation from a public high school, but need not be the
only requirement for graduation. When measures other than the high
school assessment system as defined in RCW 28A.655.061 are used, the
measures shall be in agreement with the appropriate educational
opportunity provided for the student as required by this chapter. The
superintendent of public instruction shall develop the guidelines for
determining which students should not be required to participate in the
high school assessment system and which types of assessments are
appropriate to use. The guidelines developed by the superintendent of
public instruction shall allow students covered by section 504 of the
rehabilitation act of 1973 to participate in the alternative assessment
options leading to a certificate of individual achievement if the
student has taken the Washington assessment of student learning once.
When measures other than the high school assessment system as
defined in RCW 28A.655.061 are used for high school graduation
purposes, the student's high school transcript shall note whether that
student has earned a certificate of individual achievement.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny a student the
right to participation in the high school assessment system as defined
in RCW 28A.655.061, and, upon successfully meeting the high school
standard, receipt of the certificate of academic achievement.

--- END ---