BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.27.020 and 1997 c 314 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every contractor shall register with the department.
(2) It is a misdemeanor for any contractor to:
(a) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor without being registered as required by this chapter;
(b) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor when the contractor's registration is suspended or
revoked;
(c) Use a false or expired registration number in purchasing or
offering to purchase an advertisement for which a contractor
registration number is required; ((or))
(d) Transfer a valid registration to an unregistered contractor or
allow an unregistered contractor to work under a registration issued to
another contractor; or
(e) Subcontract to or employ an unregistered contractor.
(3) It is not unlawful for a general contractor to employ an
unregistered contractor who was registered at the time he or she
entered into a contract with the general contractor, unless the general
contractor or his or her representative has been notified in writing by
the department of labor and industries that the contractor has become
unregistered.
(4) All misdemeanor actions under this chapter shall be prosecuted
in the county where the infraction occurs.
(5) A person is guilty of a separate misdemeanor for each day
worked if, after the person receives a citation from the department,
the person works while unregistered, or while his or her registration
is suspended or revoked, or works under a registration issued to
another contractor. A person is guilty of a separate misdemeanor for
each worksite on which he or she violates subsection (2) of this
section. Nothing in this subsection applies to a registered
contractor.
(6) The director by rule shall establish a two-year audit and
monitoring program for a contractor not registered under this chapter
who becomes registered after receiving an infraction or conviction
under this chapter as an unregistered contractor. The director shall
notify the departments of revenue and employment security of the
infractions or convictions and shall cooperate with these departments
to determine whether any taxes or registration, license, or other fees
or penalties are owed the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.27.030 and 2001 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant for registration as a contractor shall submit an
application under oath upon a form to be prescribed by the director and
which shall include the following information pertaining to the
applicant:
(a) Employer social security number.
(b) Unified business identifier number, if required by the
department of revenue.
(c) Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's
employees working in Washington, as follows:
(i) The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by
the department;
(ii) The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department;
or
(iii) For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada
subject to an agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as
permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of coverage issued by
the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the
applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant
has secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or
province's workers' compensation law.
(d) Employment security department number.
(e) State excise tax registration number.
(f) Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be
substituted for the information required by (c) of this subsection if
the applicant will not employ employees in Washington, and by (d) and
(e) of this subsection.
(g) Type of contracting activity, whether a general or a specialty
contractor and if the latter, the type of specialty.
(h) The name and address of each partner if the applicant is a firm
or partnership, or the name and address of the owner if the applicant
is an individual proprietorship, or the name and address of the
corporate officers and statutory agent, if any, if the applicant is a
corporation or the name and address of all members of other business
entities. The information contained in such application is a matter of
public record and open to public inspection.
(2) The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage
information provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(c) of this
section, including but not limited to information regarding the
coverage of an individual employee of the applicant. If coverage is
provided under the laws of another state, the department may notify the
other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.
(3)(a) The department shall deny an application for registration
if: (i) The applicant has been previously performing work subject to
this chapter as a sole proprietor, partnership, corporation, or other
entity and the department has notice that the applicant has an
unsatisfied final judgment against him or her in an action based on
this chapter or the applicant owes the department money for penalties
assessed or fees due under this chapter as a result of a final
judgment; (ii) the applicant was a principal or officer of a
partnership, corporation, or other entity that either has an
unsatisfied final judgment against it in an action that was incurred
for work performed subject to this chapter or owes the department money
for penalties assessed or fees due under this chapter as a result of a
final judgment; or (iii) the applicant does not have a valid unified
business identifier number, if required by the department of revenue.
(b) The department shall suspend an active registration if (i) the
department has notice that the registrant has an unsatisfied final
judgment against it for work within the scope of this chapter; (ii) the
department has notice that the registrant is a sole proprietor or a
principal or officer of a registered contractor that has an unsatisfied
final judgment against it for work within the scope of this chapter; or
(((ii))) (iii) the applicant does not maintain a valid unified business
identifier number, if required by the department of revenue.
(4) The department shall not deny an application or suspend a
registration because of an unsatisfied final judgment if the
applicant's or registrant's unsatisfied final judgment was determined
by the director to be the result of the fraud or negligence of another
party.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.27.040 and 2001 c 159 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each applicant shall file with the department a surety bond
issued by a surety insurer who meets the requirements of chapter 48.28
RCW in the sum of twelve thousand dollars if the applicant is a general
contractor and six thousand dollars if the applicant is a specialty
contractor. If no valid bond is already on file with the department at
the time the application is filed, a bond must accompany the
registration application. The bond shall have the state of Washington
named as obligee with good and sufficient surety in a form to be
approved by the department. The bond shall be continuous and may be
canceled by the surety upon the surety giving written notice to the
director. A cancellation or revocation of the bond or withdrawal of
the surety from the bond automatically suspends the registration issued
to the registrant until a new bond or reinstatement notice has been
filed and approved as provided in this section. The bond shall be
conditioned that the applicant will pay all persons performing labor,
including employee benefits, for the contractor, will pay all taxes and
contributions due to the state of Washington, and will pay all persons
furnishing labor or material or renting or supplying equipment to the
contractor and will pay all amounts that may be adjudged against the
contractor by reason of breach of contract including negligent or
improper work in the conduct of the contracting business. A change in
the name of a business or a change in the type of business entity shall
not impair a bond for the purposes of this section so long as one of
the original applicants for such bond maintains partial ownership in
the business covered by the bond.
(2) At the time of initial registration or renewal, the contractor
shall provide a bond or other security deposit as required by this
chapter and comply with all of the other provisions of this chapter
before the department shall issue or renew the contractor's certificate
of registration. Any contractor registered as of July 1, 2001, who
maintains that registration in accordance with this chapter is in
compliance with this chapter until the next renewal of the contractor's
certificate of registration.
(3) Any person, firm, or corporation having a claim against the
contractor for any of the items referred to in this section may bring
suit upon the bond or deposit in the superior court of the county in
which the work was done or of any county in which jurisdiction of the
contractor may be had. The surety issuing the bond shall be named as
a party to any suit upon the bond. Action upon the bond or deposit
brought by a residential homeowner for breach of contract by a party to
the construction contract shall be commenced by filing the summons and
complaint with the clerk of the appropriate superior court within two
years from the date the claimed contract work was substantially
completed or abandoned. Action upon the bond or deposit brought by any
other authorized party shall be commenced by filing the summons and
complaint with the clerk of the appropriate superior court within one
year from the date the claimed labor was performed and benefits
accrued, taxes and contributions owing the state of Washington became
due, materials and equipment were furnished, or the claimed contract
work was substantially completed or abandoned. Service of process in
an action against the contractor, the contractor's bond, or the deposit
shall be exclusively by service upon the department. Three copies of
the summons and complaint and a fee adopted by rule of not less than
twenty dollars to cover the costs shall be served by registered or
certified mail, or other delivery service requiring notice of receipt,
upon the department at the time suit is started and the department
shall maintain a record, available for public inspection, of all suits
so commenced. Service is not complete until the department receives
the fee and three copies of the summons and complaint. The service
shall constitute service on the registrant and the surety for suit upon
the bond or deposit and the department shall transmit the summons and
complaint or a copy thereof to the registrant at the address listed in
the registrant's application and to the surety within two days after it
shall have been received.
(4) The surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate
amount in excess of the amount named in the bond nor for any monetary
penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter for an infraction. The
liability of the surety shall not cumulate where the bond has been
renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued or otherwise extended. The
surety upon the bond may, upon notice to the department and the
parties, tender to the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of the
action an amount equal to the claims thereunder or the amount of the
bond less the amount of judgments, if any, previously satisfied
therefrom and to the extent of such tender the surety upon the bond
shall be exonerated but if the actions commenced and pending at any one
time exceed the amount of the bond then unimpaired, claims shall be
satisfied from the bond in the following order:
(a) Employee labor and claims of laborers, including employee
benefits;
(b) Claims for breach of contract by a party to the construction
contract;
(c) Registered or licensed subcontractors, material, and equipment;
(d) Taxes and contributions due the state of Washington;
(e) Any court costs, interest, and ((attorney's [attorneys']))
attorneys' fees plaintiff may be entitled to recover. The surety is
not liable for any amount in excess of the penal limit of its bond.
A payment made by the surety in good faith exonerates the bond to
the extent of any payment made by the surety.
(5) The total amount paid from a bond or deposit required of a
general contractor by this section to claimants other than residential
homeowners must not exceed one-half of the bond amount. The total
amount paid from a bond or deposit required of a specialty contractor
by this section to claimants other than residential homeowners must not
exceed one-half of the bond amount or four thousand dollars, whichever
is greater.
(6) The prevailing party in an action filed under this section
against the contractor and contractor's bond or deposit, for breach of
contract by a party to a construction contract, is entitled to costs,
interest, and reasonable attorneys' fees. The surety upon the bond is
not liable in an aggregate amount in excess of the amount named in the
bond nor for any monetary penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter for
an infraction.
(7) If a final judgment impairs the liability of the surety upon
the bond so furnished that there is not in effect a bond in the full
amount prescribed in this section, the registration of the contractor
is automatically suspended until the bond liability in the required
amount unimpaired by unsatisfied judgment claims is furnished.
(8) In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the
contractor may file with the department a deposit consisting of cash or
other security acceptable to the department.
(9) Any person having filed and served a summons and complaint as
required by this section having an unsatisfied final judgment against
the registrant for any items referred to in this section may execute
upon the security held by the department by serving a certified copy of
the unsatisfied final judgment by registered or certified mail upon the
department within one year of the date of entry of such judgment. Upon
the receipt of service of such certified copy the department shall pay
or order paid from the deposit, through the registry of the superior
court which rendered judgment, towards the amount of the unsatisfied
judgment. The priority of payment by the department shall be the order
of receipt by the department, but the department shall have no
liability for payment in excess of the amount of the deposit.
(10) The director may require an applicant applying to renew or
reinstate a registration or applying for a new registration to file a
bond of up to three times the normally required amount, if the director
determines that an applicant, or a previous registration of a corporate
officer, owner, or partner of a current applicant, has had in the past
five years a total of ((six)) three final judgments in actions under
this chapter involving a residential single-family dwelling on two or
more different structures.
(11) The director may adopt rules necessary for the proper
administration of the security.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.27.200 and 2002 c 82 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a violation of this chapter and an infraction for any
contractor to:
(a) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor without being registered as required by this chapter;
(b) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor when the contractor's registration is suspended or
revoked;
(c) Transfer a valid registration to an unregistered contractor or
allow an unregistered contractor to work under a registration issued to
another contractor; ((or))
(d) If the contractor is a contractor as defined in RCW 18.106.010,
violate RCW 18.106.320; or
(e) Subcontract to, or employ, an unregistered contractor.
(2) It is not a violation of this chapter for a general contractor
to employ an unregistered contractor who was registered at the time he
or she entered into a contract with the general contractor, unless the
general contractor or his or her representative has been notified in
writing by the department of labor and industries that the contractor
has become unregistered.
(((2))) (3) Each day that a contractor works without being
registered as required by this chapter, works while the contractor's
registration is suspended or revoked, or works under a registration
issued to another contractor is a separate infraction. Each worksite
at which a contractor works without being registered as required by
this chapter, works while the contractor's registration is suspended or
revoked, or works under a registration issued to another contractor is
a separate infraction.

--- END ---