BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT--FINDINGS. The legislature finds
that the economic health and well-being of the state is of substantial
public concern, particularly in geographic areas lacking employment
opportunities, well-maintained public infrastructure, safe and
affordable housing, and adequate facilities for delivering public
safety, health, and social services. Economic stagnation, poverty,
persistent unemployment, and underemployment threaten the self-sufficiency and quality of life of area residents, decrease the value
of private investments, and jeopardize sources of public revenue. The
legislature therefore declares there to be a substantial public purpose
in targeting, on a pilot basis, state resources to communities with the
greatest need in order to help them achieve locally determined economic
opportunities and sustainable community development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Baseline condition" means a measurable condition or problem
for which benchmark goals have been established for improvement.
(2) "Benchmark goal" means a measurable goal targeted for
achievement in a strategic plan.
(3) "Demonstration project" means the five star enterprise
community program in Ferry, Stevens, and Pend Oreille counties, the
Colville and Spokane Indian reservations, and the Kalispel developable
site.
(4) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department, or the
director's designee.
(6) "Lead managing entity" means a local entity that will
administer and be responsible for implementing the strategic plan.
Lead managing entities may include, but are not limited to, nonprofit
community-based organizations or regional planning agencies that have
the authority to receive public funds to promote community and economic
revitalization.
(7) "Partner community" means a community in a rural economically
distressed area that works with the lead managing entity to implement
the strategic plan and projects in the community revitalization
partnership pilot program.
(8) "Poverty rate" means the poverty rate for a given census tract
as reported by the bureau of the census in the most recent United
States decennial census.
(9) "Program" means the community revitalization partnership pilot
program.
(10) "Project" means a locally determined series of actions
designed to result in economic opportunities and sustainable community
development in a targeted geographic area.
(11) "Rural area" means an area located in a county with a
population density of fewer than one hundred persons per square mile as
determined by the office of financial management.
(12) "Strategic plan" means a plan for achieving benchmark goals
evidencing improvement over identified baseline conditions, developed
with the participation and commitment of community members, the private
sector, local governments, tribal governments, state government, and
others.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 PROGRAM GOALS AND RESPONSIBILITIES. (1) A
community revitalization partnership program is created on a pilot
basis to enable the state's most economically distressed areas to plan
and carry out comprehensive, locally determined projects designed to
result in sustainable community development and economic opportunities.
The program shall emphasize local decision making, grassroots
participation, and community partnerships, as well as accountability
and leveraging of public and private sector resources to accomplish
priority projects.
(2) Projects:
(a) Must be consistent with applicable environmental and land use
laws; and
(b) May include:
(i) Constructing infrastructure;
(ii) Retaining, expanding, and diversifying businesses and jobs;
(iii) Developing safe and affordable housing;
(iv) Providing health, public safety, social, and youth services;
(v) Creating accessible cultural, artistic, and recreational
facilities, equipment, and services for residents and tourists; and
(vi) Providing youth leadership, educational, entrepreneurial, and
workforce training opportunities.
(3) Each community revitalization partnership shall include partner
communities and a lead managing entity. The legislature intends that
partner communities and the lead managing entity have primary decision-making authority and accountability in carrying out the strategic plan
and projects.
(4) The partner communities and lead managing entity shall have the
following responsibilities:
(a) Developing a strategic plan for the rural economically
distressed area and updating it on a biennial basis;
(b) Creating a work plan on a biennial basis that identifies and
recommends for funding diverse projects that are consistent with the
strategic plan and are important to the partner communities;
(c) Identifying and applying for financial and technical assistance
for projects from public and private sources at the federal, state, and
local levels;
(d) Allocating funding for approved projects among partner
communities;
(e) Implementing the strategic plan and locally driven projects;
(f) Accounting to the department and all other funding sources the
expenditure of cash and in-kind resources;
(g) Working with the department to develop program performance
measures, evaluate projects, and communicate the results and
recommendations for program improvement to the legislature; and
(h) Encouraging participation by a cross-section of area residents,
businesses, and community organizations in developing and implementing
the strategic plan and projects.
(5) The department has the following responsibilities:
(a) Identifying areas that are eligible to apply for designation as
community revitalization partnerships, soliciting and evaluating
applications from them, and designating up to five areas for pilot
program participation;
(b) Contracting with the lead managing entity in each designated
area to formalize financial, legal, procedural, participation, and
other program requirements;
(c) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, providing core funding to the lead managing entity
for its use in program administration and for allocation to partner
communities as seed money for priority projects;
(d) Performing compliance checks on projects and funding as
recommended by the lead managing entity and partner communities, and
giving final approval to proceed; and
(e) Consulting with and utilizing the expertise of the lead
managing entity and partner communities to develop performance
measures, evaluate projects, and communicate the results and
recommendations for program improvement to the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 ELIGIBILITY AND APPLICATION PROCESS. (1)
The department shall conduct a competitive application process to
designate up to five community revitalization partnerships statewide.
Applications must be submitted by a lead managing entity on behalf of
eligible partner communities in the form and manner and containing such
information as this chapter and the department may prescribe.
(2) To be eligible to apply for designation as a community
revitalization partnership, a rural area must:
(a) Have a population of less than thirty thousand;
(b) Contain one thousand square miles or less, except that land
owned by the federal, state, or local government may be excluded in
determining the square mileage of an area;
(c) Have a poverty rate of no less than seventeen percent in all
census tracts within the area and no less than nineteen percent in at
least ninety percent of the census tracts within the area; and
(d) Be in a rural area that exhibits other evidence of pervasive
poverty, unemployment, and general distress such as low-income
population, dependence upon public assistance, high unemployment rates,
job loss, plant closures, out-migration, high crime incidence,
abandoned housing stock, and deteriorated infrastructure.
(3) An application must include:
(a) Documentation demonstrating that the rural area is eligible for
the program and describing existing baseline conditions that require
improvement; and
(b) A strategic plan that addresses:
(i) The current economic and social conditions of the rural area;
(ii) The participants in the community revitalization pilot
program;
(iii) The vision of the future for the rural area including goals
and strategies;
(iv) A work plan and budget;
(v) The organizational structure of the partnership; and
(vi) Whether the community revitalization program will:
(A) Be technically feasible;
(B) Serve the represented communities;
(C) Be ready to start;
(D) Build local capacity;
(E) Develop leadership;
(F) Have a positive impact on the communities;
(G) Leverage funding from other sources;
(H) Create and/or maintain jobs;
(I) Build infrastructure; and
(J) Involve other partners.
(4) The director shall designate up to five community
revitalization partnerships after assessing the applications received
on the following factors:
(a) The severity of economic distress, as measured by documentation
of pervasive poverty, unemployment, and general distress;
(b) The likelihood that the proposed strategic plan and projects
will achieve benchmark goals and improve baseline conditions;
(c) The degree of grassroots community involvement with local
partnerships in developing and carrying out the strategic plan and
projects;
(d) Demonstration of leveraging of public or private funds,
including in-kind match, committed to projects in the plan; and
(e) Demonstrated experience and record of accomplishments by the
lead managing entity and partner communities.
(5) In addition to a competitive process, one demonstration
project, as defined in section 2(3) of this act, shall be provided to
assist in determining the feasibility of the community revitalization
partnership pilot program. Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4)
of this section, the department shall approve this demonstration
project before approving any other application.
(6) The demonstration project and each of the competitively
designated community revitalization partnerships are expected to
participate in the pilot program for ten years. To ensure that the
program retains flexibility to respond to changing economic conditions,
the department shall, every four years, assess for each rural area in
the program the key economic factors contained in section 4(2) of this
act. If the department finds that conditions have either declined or
improved significantly in any of the geographic areas contained within
the community revitalization partnership, the department may consider
the evidence, consult with the lead managing entity and partner
communities, and either remove areas that have improved or add areas
that have declined.
(7) Each community revitalization partnership shall receive an
equal share of the state funding, exclusive of the administrative funds
earmarked for the department. The director must designate the
community revitalization partnerships no later than September 30, 2008.
Awards to designated areas will take effect January 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 STATE PROGRAM PREFERENCE. Each community
revitalization partnership is entitled to receive annual core funding
from the department as provided in section 3(5)(c) of this act. In
addition, each community revitalization partnership shall be given
preference by any state program to which it applies for support,
whether within or outside the department. State programs shall provide
this preference either by awarding additional points in the evaluation
process to community revitalization partnerships or by setting aside
for them a designated portion of the total funds available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 REPORTS TO LEGISLATURE. The department,
lead managing entities, and partner communities shall prepare a joint
report regarding the results of the pilot program in this chapter and
make recommendations for statutory changes to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by January 1, 2010, and every two years
thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The legislature intends that the community
revitalization partnership pilot program be funded by the legislature
in the amount of eight hundred fifty thousand dollars each year
beginning with fiscal year 2010 and ending with fiscal year 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 EXPIRATION OF CHAPTER. This chapter expires
December 31, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---