BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.170 and 1996 c 295 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, it is a
class C felony for any person who is not a citizen of the United States
to carry or possess any firearm, without first having obtained an alien
firearm license ((from the director of licensing)). In order to be
eligible for a license, an alien must provide proof that he or she is
lawfully present in the United States, which ((the director of
licensing)) a county sheriff shall verify through the appropriate
authorities. Except as provided in subsection (2)(a) of this section,
and subject to the additional requirements of subsection (2)(b) of this
section, ((the director of licensing)) a county sheriff may issue an
alien firearm license only upon receiving from the consul domiciled in
this state representing the country of the alien, a certified copy of
the alien's criminal history in the alien's country indicating the
alien is not ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to own, possess, or control
a firearm, and the consul's attestation that the alien is a responsible
person.
(2)(a) Subject to the additional requirements of (b) of this
subsection, ((the director of licensing)) a county sheriff may issue an
alien firearm license without a certified copy of the alien's criminal
history or the consul's attestation required by subsection (1) of this
section, if the alien has been a resident of this state for at least
two years and: (i) The alien is from a country without a consul
domiciled within this state, or (ii) the consul has failed to provide,
within ninety days after a request by the alien, the criminal history
or attestation required by subsection (1) of this section.
(b) Before issuing an alien firearm license under subsection (1) of
this section or this subsection (2), the ((director of licensing))
county sheriff shall ((ask the local law enforcement agency of the
jurisdiction in which the alien resides to)) complete a background and
fingerprint check to determine the alien's eligibility under RCW
9.41.040 to own, possess, or control a firearm. The ((law enforcement
agency)) background check shall be completed ((a background check))
within thirty days after the request, unless the alien does not have a
valid Washington driver's license or Washington state identification
card. In the latter case, ((the law enforcement agency)) a county
sheriff shall complete the background check within sixty days after the
request.
A signed application for an alien firearm license shall constitute
a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the department of
social and health services, mental health institutions, and other
health care facilities release information relevant to the applicant's
eligibility for an alien firearm license to an inquiring law
enforcement agency.
(3) The alien firearm license shall be valid for five years from
the date of issue so long as the alien is lawfully present in the
United States. The nonrefundable fee, paid upon application, for the
five-year license shall be ((fifty-five)) thirty dollars plus
additional charges imposed by the Washington state patrol and the
Federal Bureau of Investigation that are passed on to the applicant.
The nonrefundable license fee shall be ((distributed as follows:
(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the department of licensing;
(b) Twenty-five dollars shall be paid to the Washington state
patrol; and
(c) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the local law enforcement
agency)) paid to the county sheriff's department conducting the
background check.
(4) This section shall not apply to ((Canadian citizens resident in
a province which has an enactment or public policy providing
substantially similar privilege to residents of the state of
Washington)) nonimmigrant aliens in possession of a valid Washington
hunting license or an invitation or registration to attend a
competitive target shooting event and who are carrying or possessing
weapons for the purpose of using them in the hunting of game while such
persons are in the act of hunting, or while on a hunting trip, or while
such persons are competing in a bona fide trap or skeet shoot or any
other organized contest sponsored by a national, state, or local
organization devoted to the competitive or sporting use of firearms
where rifles, pistols, or shotguns are used, so long as the
nonimmigrant alien possesses:
(a) A valid passport and visa, if required by the United States,
showing they are in the country legally; and
(b) An approved United States department of the treasury ATF-6 NIA
application and permit for temporary importation of firearms and
ammunition by nonimmigrant aliens. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to allow aliens to hunt or fish in this state without first
having obtained a regular hunting or fishing license.

--- END ---