BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.080 and 2005 c 273 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A special meeting may be called at any time by the presiding
officer of the governing body of a public agency or by a majority of
the members of the governing body ((by delivering written notice)). To
call the meeting, notice must be delivered personally, as follows:
(a) By mail, by fax, or by electronic mail to each member of the
governing body; and to each local newspaper of general circulation and
to each local radio or television station which has on file with the
governing body a written request to be notified of such special meeting
or of all special meetings; and
(b) If the voting district for the governing body has fewer than
one thousand registered voters, individuals residing in the district
who have a written request to be notified of special meetings on file
with the governing body may receive such notice by fax, electronic
mail, or telephonic message. ((Such))
(2) Notice must be delivered ((personally, by mail, by fax, or by
electronic mail)) at least twenty-four hours before the time of such
meeting as specified in the notice.
(3) The call and notice shall specify the time and place of the
special meeting and the business to be transacted. Final disposition
shall not be taken on any other matter at such meetings by the
governing body. ((Such written))
(4)(a) Notice may be dispensed with as to any member who at or
prior to the time the meeting convenes files with the clerk or
secretary of the governing body a written waiver of notice. ((Such))
The waiver may be given by telegram, by fax, or electronic mail.
((Such written))
(b) Notice may ((also)) be dispensed with as to any member who is
actually present at the meeting at the time it convenes. ((The))
(c) Notice((s provided in this section)) may be dispensed with in
the event a special meeting is called to deal with an emergency
involving injury or damage to persons or property or the likelihood of
such injury or damage, when time requirements of such notice would make
notice impractical and increase the likelihood of such injury or
damage.

--- END ---