BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section and the availability
of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, any individual who
completes trooper basic training after January 1, 2007, and serves a
continuous commission with the Washington state patrol of at least four
years is eligible to receive a one-time longevity bonus of five
thousand dollars.
(2) The longevity bonus specified in subsection (1) of this section
is subject to the chief's discretion and is not available to a trooper
who, within the first four years of the trooper's commission (a)
accepts a reassignment or transfer to a specialty position or (b)
accepts a transfer of assignment granted at the trooper's request,
unless: (i) The requested transfer is a hardship or intradivision
transfer; or (ii) the requested transfer is a condition of an offer of
promotion within the state patrol.
(3) Sums paid under this section do not constitute salary or
compensation for purposes of any pension calculations, disability
benefits, or retirement benefits.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.120 and 2001 c 329 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in the following sections, unless a different meaning is
plainly required by the context:
(1) "Retirement system" means the Washington state patrol
retirement system.
(2) "Retirement fund" means the Washington state patrol retirement
fund.
(3) "State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of
Washington.
(4) "Member" means any person included in the membership of the
retirement fund.
(5) "Employee" means any commissioned employee of the Washington
state patrol.
(6)(a) "Cadet," for a person who became a member of the retirement
system after June 12, 1980, is a person who has passed the Washington
state patrol's entry-level oral, written, physical performance, and
background examinations and is, thereby, appointed by the chief as a
candidate to be a commissioned officer of the Washington state patrol.
(b) "Cadet," for a person who became a member of the retirement
system before June 12, 1980, is a trooper cadet, patrol cadet, or
employee of like classification, employed for the express purpose of
receiving the on-the-job training required for attendance at the state
patrol academy and for becoming a commissioned trooper. "Like
classification" includes: Radio operators or dispatchers; persons
providing security for the governor or legislature; patrolmen; drivers'
license examiners; weighmasters; vehicle safety inspectors; central
wireless operators; and warehousemen.
(7) "Beneficiary" means any person in receipt of retirement
allowance or any other benefit allowed by this chapter.
(8) "Regular interest" means interest compounded annually at such
rates as may be determined by the director.
(9) "Retirement board" means the board provided for in this
chapter.
(10) "Insurance commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of
the state of Washington.
(11) "Lieutenant governor" means the lieutenant governor of the
state of Washington.
(12) "Service" shall mean services rendered to the state of
Washington or any political subdivisions thereof for which compensation
has been paid. Full time employment for seventy or more hours in any
given calendar month shall constitute one month of service. An
employee who is reinstated in accordance with RCW 43.43.110 shall
suffer no loss of service for the period reinstated subject to the
contribution requirements of this chapter. Only months of service
shall be counted in the computation of any retirement allowance or
other benefit provided for herein. Years of service shall be
determined by dividing the total number of months of service by twelve.
Any fraction of a year of service as so determined shall be taken into
account in the computation of such retirement allowance or benefit.
(13) "Prior service" shall mean all services rendered by a member
to the state of Washington, or any of its political subdivisions prior
to August 1, 1947, unless such service has been credited in another
public retirement or pension system operating in the state of
Washington.
(14) "Current service" shall mean all service as a member rendered
on or after August 1, 1947.
(15)(a) "Average final salary," for members commissioned prior to
January 1, 2003, shall mean the average monthly salary received by a
member during the member's last two years of service or any consecutive
two-year period of service, whichever is the greater, as an employee of
the Washington state patrol; or if the member has less than two years
of service, then the average monthly salary received by the member
during the member's total years of service.
(b) "Average final salary," for members commissioned on or after
January 1, 2003, shall mean the average monthly salary received by a
member for the highest consecutive sixty service credit months; or if
the member has less than sixty months of service, then the average
monthly salary received by the member during the member's total months
of service.
(16) "Actuarial equivalent" shall mean a benefit of equal value
when computed upon the basis of such mortality table as may be adopted
and such interest rate as may be determined by the director.
(17) Unless the context expressly indicates otherwise, words
importing the masculine gender shall be extended to include the
feminine gender and words importing the feminine gender shall be
extended to include the masculine gender.
(18) "Director" means the director of the department of retirement
systems.
(19) "Department" means the department of retirement systems
created in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(20) "State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).
(21) "Contributions" means the deduction from the compensation of
each member in accordance with the contribution rates established under
chapter 41.45 RCW.
(22) "Annual increase" means as of July 1, 1999, seventy-seven
cents per month per year of service which amount shall be increased
each subsequent July 1st by three percent, rounded to the nearest cent.
(23)(a) "Salary," for members commissioned prior to July 1, 2001,
shall exclude any overtime earnings related to RCW 47.46.040, ((or))
any voluntary overtime, earned on or after July 1, 2001, or any sum
paid under section 1 of this act.
(b) "Salary," for members commissioned on or after July 1, 2001,
shall exclude any overtime earnings related to RCW 47.46.040 or any
voluntary overtime, lump sum payments for deferred annual sick leave,
unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, holiday
pay, ((or)) any form of severance pay, or any sum paid under section 1
of this act.
(24) "Plan 2" means the Washington state patrol retirement system
plan 2, providing the benefits and funding provisions covering
commissioned employees who first become members of the system on or
after January 1, 2003.

--- END ---