BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.64.040 and 2005 c 518 s 945 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall determine the amount deemed necessary in order
to achieve the purposes of this chapter and shall provide by rule for
the deduction of this amount from the moneys received from all leases,
sales, contracts, licenses, permits, easements, and rights of way
issued by the department and affecting state lands and aquatic lands,
provided that no deduction shall be made from the proceeds from
agricultural college lands.
(2) Moneys received as deposits from successful bidders, advance
payments, and security under RCW 79.15.100, 79.15.080, and 79.11.150
prior to December 1, 1981, which have not been subjected to deduction
under this section are not subject to deduction under this section.
(3) ((Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this
section,)) (a) The deductions authorized under this section shall not
exceed twenty-five percent of the moneys received by the department in
connection with any one transaction pertaining to ((state lands and))
aquatic lands other than second class tide and shore lands and the beds
of navigable waters, and fifty percent of the moneys received by the
department pertaining to second class tide and shore lands and the beds
of navigable waters.
(b) Prior to June 30, 2017, the deductions authorized under this
section shall not exceed thirty percent of the moneys received by the
department in connection with any one transaction pertaining to state
lands. After July 1, 2017, the deductions authorized under this
section shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the moneys received by
the department in connection with any one transaction pertaining to
state lands.
(4) In the event that the department sells logs using the contract
harvesting process described in RCW 79.15.500 through 79.15.530, the
moneys received subject to this section are the net proceeds from the
contract harvesting sale.
(5) ((During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the twenty-five percent
limitation on deductions set in subsection (3) of this section may be
increased to thirty percent by the board. If so increased, the
department must provide a report by January 9, 2006, to the appropriate
committees of the legislature on the use of the increased amount))
Beginning December 1, 2008, and continuing until December 1, 2017, the
commissioner, on behalf of the board, shall report each biennium to the
appropriate committees of the legislature any actions taken by the
board to adjust the management fees as authorized by subsection (3)(b)
of this section.

--- END ---