BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.040 and 2005 c 453 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person, whether an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the
crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree, if the
person owns, has in his or her possession, or has in his or her control
any firearm after having previously been convicted or found not guilty
by reason of insanity in this state or elsewhere of any serious offense
as defined in this chapter.
(b) Unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree is a class
B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2)(a) A person, whether an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the
crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the second degree, if the
person does not qualify under subsection (1) of this section for the
crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree and the
person owns, has in his or her possession, or has in his or her control
any firearm:
(i) After having previously been convicted or found not guilty by
reason of insanity in this state or elsewhere of any felony not
specifically listed as prohibiting firearm possession under subsection
(1) of this section, or any of the following crimes when committed by
one family or household member against another, committed on or after
July 1, 1993: Assault in the fourth degree, coercion, stalking,
reckless endangerment, criminal trespass in the first degree, or
violation of the provisions of a protection order or no-contact order
restraining the person or excluding the person from a residence (RCW
26.50.060, 26.50.070, 26.50.130, or 10.99.040);
(ii) After having previously been involuntarily committed for
mental health treatment under RCW 71.05.320, ((71.34.090)) 71.34.750,
chapter 10.77 RCW, or equivalent statutes of another jurisdiction,
unless his or her right to possess a firearm has been restored as
provided in RCW 9.41.047;
(iii) If the person is under eighteen years of age, except as
provided in RCW 9.41.042; and/or
(iv) If the person is free on bond or personal recognizance pending
trial, appeal, or sentencing for a serious offense as defined in RCW
9.41.010.
(b) Unlawful possession of a firearm in the second degree is a
class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(3) Notwithstanding RCW 9.41.047 or any other provisions of law, as
used in this chapter, a person has been "convicted", whether in an
adult court or adjudicated in a juvenile court, at such time as a plea
of guilty has been accepted, or a verdict of guilty has been filed,
notwithstanding the pendency of any future proceedings including but
not limited to sentencing or disposition, post-trial or post-factfinding motions, and appeals. Conviction includes a dismissal
entered after a period of probation, suspension or deferral of
sentence, and also includes equivalent dispositions by courts in
jurisdictions other than Washington state. ((A person shall not be
precluded from possession of a firearm if the conviction has been the
subject of a pardon, annulment, certificate of rehabilitation, or other
equivalent procedure based on a finding of the rehabilitation of the
person convicted or the conviction or disposition has been the subject
of a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based on a
finding of innocence.)) Where no record of the court's disposition of
the charges can be found, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that
the person was not convicted of the charge.
(4) ((Notwithstanding subsection (1) or (2) of this section, a
person convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of an
offense prohibiting the possession of a firearm under this section
other than murder, manslaughter, robbery, rape, indecent liberties,
arson, assault, kidnapping, extortion, burglary, or violations with
respect to controlled substances under RCW 69.50.401 and 69.50.410, who
received a probationary sentence under RCW 9.95.200, and who received
a dismissal of the charge under RCW 9.95.240, shall not be precluded
from possession of a firearm as a result of the conviction or finding
of not guilty by reason of insanity. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of this section, if a person is prohibited from possession
of a firearm under subsection (1) or (2) of this section and has not
previously been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of
a sex offense prohibiting firearm ownership under subsection (1) or (2)
of this section and/or any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both,
the individual may petition a court of record to have his or her right
to possess a firearm restored:
(a) Under RCW 9.41.047; and/or
(b)(i) If the conviction or finding of not guilty by reason of
insanity was for a felony offense, after five or more consecutive years
in the community without being convicted or found not guilty by reason
of insanity or currently charged with any felony, gross misdemeanor, or
misdemeanor crimes, if the individual has no prior felony convictions
that prohibit the possession of a firearm counted as part of the
offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; or
(ii) If the conviction or finding of not guilty by reason of
insanity was for a nonfelony offense, after three or more consecutive
years in the community without being convicted or found not guilty by
reason of insanity or currently charged with any felony, gross
misdemeanor, or misdemeanor crimes, if the individual has no prior
felony convictions that prohibit the possession of a firearm counted as
part of the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525 and the individual has
completed all conditions of the sentence.
(5))) In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, if a
person under the age of eighteen years is found by a court to have
possessed a firearm in a vehicle in violation of subsection (1) or (2)
of this section or to have committed an offense while armed with a
firearm during which offense a motor vehicle served an integral
function, the court shall notify the department of licensing within
twenty-four hours and the person's privilege to drive shall be revoked
under RCW 46.20.265.
(((6))) (5) Nothing in chapter 129, Laws of 1995 shall ever be
construed or interpreted as preventing an offender from being charged
and subsequently convicted for the separate felony crimes of theft of
a firearm or possession of a stolen firearm, or both, in addition to
being charged and subsequently convicted under this section for
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second degree.
Notwithstanding any other law, if the offender is convicted under this
section for unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second
degree and for the felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession of
a stolen firearm, or both, then the offender shall serve consecutive
sentences for each of the felony crimes of conviction listed in this
subsection.
(((7))) (6) Each firearm unlawfully possessed under this section
shall be a separate offense.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.41.047 and 2005 c 453 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time a person is convicted or found not guilty by reason
of insanity of an offense making the person ineligible to possess a
firearm, or at the time a person is committed by court order under RCW
71.05.320, ((71.34.090)) 71.34.750, or chapter 10.77 RCW for mental
health treatment, the convicting or committing court shall notify the
person, orally and in writing, that the person must immediately
surrender any concealed pistol license and that the person may not
possess a firearm unless his or her right to do so is restored by a
court of record pursuant to subsection (6) of this section. For
purposes of this section a convicting court includes a court in which
a person has been found not guilty by reason of insanity.
The convicting or committing court also shall forward a copy of the
person's driver's license or identicard, or comparable information, to
the department of licensing, along with the date of conviction or
commitment.
(2) Upon receipt of the information provided for by subsection (1)
of this section, the department of licensing shall determine if the
convicted or committed person has a concealed pistol license. If the
person does have a concealed pistol license, the department of
licensing shall immediately notify the license-issuing authority which,
upon receipt of such notification, shall immediately revoke the
license.
(3)(a) A person who is prohibited from possessing a firearm, by
reason of having been involuntarily committed for mental health
treatment under RCW 71.05.320, ((71.34.090)) 71.34.750, chapter 10.77
RCW, or equivalent statutes of another jurisdiction may, upon
discharge, petition a court of record to have his or her right to
possess a firearm restored pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.
At the time of commitment, the court shall specifically state to the
person that he or she is barred from possession of firearms.
(b) The secretary of social and health services shall develop
appropriate rules to create an approval process under this subsection.
The rules must provide for the restoration of the right to possess a
firearm upon a showing in a court of competent jurisdiction that the
person is no longer required to participate in an inpatient or
outpatient treatment program, is no longer required to take medication
to treat any condition related to the commitment, and does not present
a substantial danger to himself or herself, others, or the public.
Unlawful possession of a firearm under this subsection shall be
punished as a class C felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(c) A person petitioning the court under this subsection (3) shall
bear the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the
circumstances resulting in the commitment no longer exist and are not
reasonably likely to recur. If a preponderance of the evidence in the
record supports a finding that the person petitioning the court has
engaged in violence and that it is more likely than not that the person
will engage in violence after his or her right to possess a firearm is
restored, the person shall bear the burden of proving by clear, cogent,
and convincing evidence that he or she does not present a substantial
danger to the safety of others.
(4) No person who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity
may petition a court for restoration of the right to possess a firearm
unless the person meets the requirements for the restoration of the
right to possess a firearm under ((RCW 9.41.040(4))) subsection (5) of
this section.
(5) Notwithstanding RCW 9.41.040 (1) or (2), a person convicted or
found not guilty by reason of insanity of an offense prohibiting the
possession of a firearm under RCW 9.41.040 other than murder,
manslaughter, robbery, rape, indecent liberties, arson, assault,
kidnapping, extortion, burglary, or violations with respect to
controlled substances under RCW 69.50.401 and 69.50.410, who received
a probationary sentence under RCW 9.95.200, and who received a
dismissal of the charge under RCW 9.95.240, shall not be precluded from
possession of a firearm as a result of the conviction or finding of not
guilty by reason of insanity. Notwithstanding any other provisions of
RCW 9.41.040, if a person is prohibited from possession of a firearm
under RCW 9.41.040 (1) or (2) and has not previously been convicted or
found not guilty by reason of insanity of a sex offense prohibiting
firearm ownership under RCW 9.41.040 (1) or (2) and/or any felony
defined under any law as a class A felony or with a maximum sentence of
at least twenty years, or both, the individual may petition a court of
record pursuant to subsection (6) of this section to have his or her
right to possess a firearm restored:
(a) Under this section; and/or
(b)(i) If the conviction or finding of not guilty by reason of
insanity was for a felony offense, after five or more consecutive years
in the community without being convicted or found not guilty by reason
of insanity or currently charged with any felony, gross misdemeanor, or
misdemeanor crimes, if the individual has no prior felony convictions
that prohibit the possession of a firearm counted as part of the
offender score under RCW 9.94A.525 and the individual has completed all
conditions of the sentence; or
(ii) If the conviction or finding of not guilty by reason of
insanity was for a nonfelony offense, after three or more consecutive
years in the community without being convicted or found not guilty by
reason of insanity or currently charged with any felony, gross
misdemeanor, or misdemeanor crimes, if the individual has no prior
felony convictions that prohibit the possession of a firearm counted as
part of the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525 and the individual has
completed all conditions of the sentence.
(6)(a) A petition to have the right to possess a firearm restored
must be filed as a civil suit in the superior court of the county where
the conviction occurred and judgment was entered, or where the finding
of not guilty by reason of insanity was entered. If the person has
disqualifying convictions from more than one county, a separate
petition must be filed in each county. If the person has disqualifying
convictions from another state, or a finding of not guilty by reason of
insanity from another state, a petition must be filed in Thurston
county superior court.
(b) Within ninety days of receipt of the master copy from the
administrative office of the courts, all court clerk's offices shall
make available the model forms and instructional brochures required by
section 5 of this act. Any assistance or information provided by
clerks under this section does not constitute the practice of law and
clerks are not responsible for incorrect information contained in a
petition.
(c) A petition shall be granted if the person meets all
requirements of this section for restoration of the right to possess a
firearm and the petition:
(i) Was served on the prosecuting attorney's office or the city
attorney's office that prosecuted the crime or crimes for which relief
is sought or on the attorney general for the state of Washington, if
the petitioner has disqualifying convictions from another state.
Service may be accomplished by mailing a copy of the petition no later
than ten days before any scheduled hearing. Failure to serve a copy of
the petition upon the proper prosecuting attorney's office, city
attorney's office, or attorney general will result in a void order;
(ii) Included a statement, under oath, setting out the person's
criminal history and the date the person was last released from prison
or jail; and
(iii) Was accompanied by one of the following documents for each
disqualifying conviction:
(A) A certificate of discharge issued pursuant to RCW 9.94A.637 or
an equivalent out-of-state statute;
(B) A certificate of discharge issued pursuant to RCW 9.96.050 or
an equivalent out-of-state statute;
(C) A copy of the person's case financial history screen from the
superior court clerk which provides whether the person has met the
required legal financial obligations;
(D) A declaration from the appropriate parole or probation office
stating that the office's records demonstrate that the person has
completed all conditions of the sentence; or
(E) A declaration from the city, county, or state prosecuting
attorney whose office was responsible for the proceeding against the
person which resulted in a disqualifying conviction that states that
the city, county, or state prosecuting attorney's office files indicate
that the person has satisfied all of the conditions of the sentence
that were imposed as a result of the disqualifying conviction.
(d) In cases where the person has disqualifying convictions in more
than one county or from another state or the federal government, a
court may only issue an order indicating that the disqualification
arising from the convictions for offenses committed within that county
is hereby removed, unless the person presents orders demonstrating that
the disqualification arising from the convictions for all offenses
committed outside the county has been removed. In such a case, the
court may issue an order restoring the person's right to possess a
firearm.
(e) The clerk of the court in which an order granting a petition
restoring a person's right to possess a firearm within the state of
Washington is entered shall immediately transmit information regarding
the order restoring the right to possess a firearm to the Washington
state patrol identification section and the department of licensing.
The Washington state patrol and the department of licensing shall
immediately update their records to reflect the entry of the order
restoring the person's right to possess a firearm.
(f) Any order restoring the right to possess a firearm shall
contain a warning substantially as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal
law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you
are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you
may be prosecuted in federal court. An order restoring your
right to possess a firearm in Washington is not a defense to a
federal prosecution or to a prosecution under the laws of
another state.

(7) A person shall not be precluded from possession of a firearm if
the conviction has been the subject of a pardon, annulment, an
executive branch certificate of rehabilitation, or other equivalent
executive branch procedure based on a finding of the rehabilitation of
the person convicted or the conviction or disposition has been the
subject of a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based on
a finding of innocence.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.41.070 and 2002 c 302 s 703 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of a
county shall within thirty days after the filing of an application of
any person, issue a license to such person to carry a pistol concealed
on his or her person within this state for five years from date of
issue, for the purposes of protection or while engaged in business,
sport, or while traveling. However, if the applicant does not have a
valid permanent Washington driver's license or Washington state
identification card or has not been a resident of the state for the
previous consecutive ninety days, the issuing authority shall have up
to sixty days after the filing of the application to issue a license.
The issuing authority shall not refuse to accept completed applications
for concealed pistol licenses during regular business hours.
The applicant's constitutional right to bear arms shall not be
denied, unless:
(a) He or she is ineligible to possess a firearm under the
provisions of RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045;
(b) The applicant's concealed pistol license is in a revoked
status;
(c) He or she is under twenty-one years of age;
(d) He or she is subject to a court order or injunction regarding
firearms pursuant to RCW 9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045,
26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26.130, 26.50.060,
26.50.070, or 26.26.590;
(e) He or she is free on bond or personal recognizance pending
trial, appeal, or sentencing for a felony offense;
(f) He or she has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from
any court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor; or
(g) He or she has been ordered to forfeit a firearm under RCW
9.41.098(1)(e) within one year before filing an application to carry a
pistol concealed on his or her person.
No person convicted of a felony may have his or her right to
possess firearms restored or his or her privilege to carry a concealed
pistol restored, unless the person has been granted relief from
disabilities by the secretary of the treasury under 18 U.S.C. Sec.
925(c), or RCW ((9.41.040 (3) or (4))) 9.41.047 applies.
(2) The issuing authority shall check with the national crime
information center, the Washington state patrol electronic data base,
the department of social and health services electronic data base, and
with other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether
the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045 to possess
a firearm and therefore ineligible for a concealed pistol license.
This subsection applies whether the applicant is applying for a new
concealed pistol license or to renew a concealed pistol license.
(3) Any person whose firearms rights have been restricted and who
has been granted relief from disabilities by the secretary of the
treasury under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c) or who is exempt under 18 U.S.C.
Sec. 921(a)(20)(A) shall have his or her right to acquire, receive,
transfer, ship, transport, carry, and possess firearms in accordance
with Washington state law restored except as otherwise prohibited by
this chapter.
(4) The license application shall bear the full name, residential
address, telephone number at the option of the applicant, date and
place of birth, race, gender, description, not more than two complete
sets of fingerprints, and signature of the licensee, and the licensee's
driver's license number or state identification card number if used for
identification in applying for the license. A signed application for
a concealed pistol license shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality
and written request that the department of social and health services,
mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release
information relevant to the applicant's eligibility for a concealed
pistol license to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency.
The application for an original license shall include two complete
sets of fingerprints to be forwarded to the Washington state patrol.
The license and application shall contain a warning substantially
as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal
law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you
are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you
may be prosecuted in federal court. A state license is not a
defense to a federal prosecution.

The license shall contain a description of the major differences
between state and federal law and an explanation of the fact that local
laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be
consistent with state law. The application shall contain questions
about the applicant's eligibility under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a
pistol, the applicant's place of birth, and whether the applicant is a
United States citizen. The applicant shall not be required to produce
a birth certificate or other evidence of citizenship. A person who is
not a citizen of the United States shall meet the additional
requirements of RCW 9.41.170 and produce proof of compliance with RCW
9.41.170 upon application. The license shall be in triplicate and in
a form to be prescribed by the department of licensing.
The original thereof shall be delivered to the licensee, the
duplicate shall within seven days be sent to the director of licensing
and the triplicate shall be preserved for six years, by the authority
issuing the license.
The department of licensing shall make available to law enforcement
and corrections agencies, in an on-line format, all information
received under this subsection.
(5) The nonrefundable fee, paid upon application, for the original
five-year license shall be thirty-six dollars plus additional charges
imposed by the Federal Bureau of Investigation that are passed on to
the applicant. No other state or local branch or unit of government
may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the issuance of
the license.
The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;
(b) Four dollars shall be paid to the agency taking the
fingerprints of the person licensed;
(c) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the
purpose of enforcing this chapter; and
(d) Three dollars to the firearms range account in the general
fund.
(6) The nonrefundable fee for the renewal of such license shall be
thirty-two dollars. No other branch or unit of government may impose
any additional charges on the applicant for the renewal of the license.
The renewal fee shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;
(b) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the
purpose of enforcing this chapter; and
(c) Three dollars to the firearms range account in the general
fund.
(7) The nonrefundable fee for replacement of lost or damaged
licenses is ten dollars to be paid to the issuing authority.
(8) Payment shall be by cash, check, or money order at the option
of the applicant. Additional methods of payment may be allowed at the
option of the issuing authority.
(9) A licensee may renew a license if the licensee applies for
renewal within ninety days before or after the expiration date of the
license. A license so renewed shall take effect on the expiration date
of the prior license. A licensee renewing after the expiration date of
the license must pay a late renewal penalty of ten dollars in addition
to the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this section. The
fee shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Three dollars shall be deposited in the state wildlife ((fund))
account and used exclusively first for the printing and distribution of
a pamphlet on the legal limits of the use of firearms, firearms safety,
and the preemptive nature of state law, and subsequently the support of
volunteer instructors in the basic firearms safety training program
conducted by the department of fish and wildlife. The pamphlet shall
be given to each applicant for a license; and
(b) Seven dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the
purpose of enforcing this chapter.
(10) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (1) through
(9) of this section, the chief of police of the municipality or the
sheriff of the county of the applicant's residence may issue a
temporary emergency license for good cause pending review under
subsection (1) of this section. However, a temporary emergency license
issued under this subsection shall not exempt the holder of the license
from any records check requirement. Temporary emergency licenses shall
be easily distinguishable from regular licenses.
(11) A political subdivision of the state shall not modify the
requirements of this section or chapter, nor may a political
subdivision ask the applicant to voluntarily submit any information not
required by this section.
(12) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding
citizenship or identity on an application for a concealed pistol
license is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040. In addition
to any other penalty provided for by law, the concealed pistol license
of a person who knowingly makes a false statement shall be revoked, and
the person shall be permanently ineligible for a concealed pistol
license.
(13) A person may apply for a concealed pistol license:
(a) To the municipality or to the county in which the applicant
resides if the applicant resides in a municipality;
(b) To the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant
resides in an unincorporated area; or
(c) Anywhere in the state if the applicant is a nonresident.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.265 and 2005 c 288 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other authority to revoke driving privileges
under this chapter, the department shall revoke all driving privileges
of a juvenile when the department receives notice from a court pursuant
to RCW 9.41.040(((5))) (4), 13.40.265, 66.44.365, 69.41.065, 69.50.420,
69.52.070, or a substantially similar municipal ordinance adopted by a
local legislative authority, or from a diversion unit pursuant to RCW
13.40.265.
(2) The driving privileges of the juvenile revoked under subsection
(1) of this section shall be revoked in the following manner:
(a) Upon receipt of the first notice, the department shall impose
a revocation for one year, or until the juvenile reaches seventeen
years of age, whichever is longer.
(b) Upon receipt of a second or subsequent notice, the department
shall impose a revocation for two years or until the juvenile reaches
eighteen years of age, whichever is longer.
(c) Each offense for which the department receives notice shall
result in a separate period of revocation. All periods of revocation
imposed under this section that could otherwise overlap shall run
consecutively up to the juvenile's twenty-first birthday, and no period
of revocation imposed under this section shall begin before the
expiration of all other periods of revocation imposed under this
section or other law. Periods of revocation imposed consecutively
under this section shall not extend beyond the juvenile's twenty-first
birthday.
(3)(a) If the department receives notice from a court that the
juvenile's privilege to drive should be reinstated, the department
shall immediately reinstate any driving privileges that have been
revoked under this section if the minimum term of revocation as
specified in RCW 13.40.265(1)(c), 66.44.365(3), 69.41.065(3),
69.50.420(3), 69.52.070(3), or similar ordinance has expired, and
subject to subsection (2)(c) of this section.
(b) The juvenile may seek reinstatement of his or her driving
privileges from the department when the juvenile reaches the age of
twenty-one. A notice from the court reinstating the juvenile's driving
privilege shall not be required if reinstatement is pursuant to this
subsection.
(4)(a) If the department receives notice pursuant to RCW
13.40.265(2)(b) from a diversion unit that a juvenile has completed a
diversion agreement for which the juvenile's driving privileges were
revoked, the department shall reinstate any driving privileges revoked
under this section as provided in (b) of this subsection, subject to
subsection (2)(c) of this section.
(b) If the diversion agreement was for the juvenile's first
violation of chapter 66.44, 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW, the department
shall not reinstate the juvenile's privilege to drive until the later
of ninety days after the date the juvenile turns sixteen or ninety days
after the juvenile entered into a diversion agreement for the offense.
If the diversion agreement was for the juvenile's second or subsequent
violation of chapter 66.44, 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW, the department
shall not reinstate the juvenile's privilege to drive until the later
of the date the juvenile turns seventeen or one year after the juvenile
entered into the second or subsequent diversion agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
The administrative office of the courts shall develop and prepare,
in consultation with interested persons, model forms and instructional
brochures required under section 2 of this act.

--- END ---