BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) A developmental disability is a natural part of human life, and
the presence of a developmental disability in the life of a person does
not diminish the person's rights or opportunity to participate fully in
the life of the local community;
(b) Investing in family members who have children and adults living
in the family home preserves a valuable natural support system for the
individual with a developmental disability and is also cost-effective
for the state of Washington;
(c) Providing support services to families can help maintain the
well-being of the family and stabilize the family unit.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature:
(a) To partner with families as care providers for children with
developmental disabilities and adults who choose to live in the family
home;
(b) That individual and family services be centered on the needs of
the person with a developmental disability and the family;
(c) That, to the maximum extent possible, individuals and families
must be given choice of services and exercise control over the
resources available to them.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The individual and family services program for individuals
eligible to receive services under this title is established. This
program replaces family support opportunities, traditional family
support, and the flexible family support pilot program. The department
shall transfer funding associated with these existing family support
programs to the individual and family services program and shall
operate the program within available funding. The services provided
under the individual and family services program shall be funded by
state funding without benefit of federal match.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.
The rules shall include:
(a) That eligibility for families with children under the age of
eighteen to receive services in the individual and family services
program be determined and prioritized by an assessment of individual
need and financial eligibility that is based upon the combined taxable
income of the parents and children with developmental disabilities.
Taxable income must be at or below four hundred percent of the federal
poverty level;
(b) That eligibility for adults with developmental disabilities who
live with their families to receive services in the individual and
family services program be determined and prioritized by an assessment
of individual need and financial eligibility that is based upon the
earned and unearned income of the adult with the developmental
disability. Taxable income must be at or below four hundred percent of
the federal poverty level;
(c) For service priority levels to be developed that specify a
maximum amount of dollars for each person per level per year. When
defining service priority levels the department shall consider the
amount of supervision an individual needs, behavioral challenges, and
caregiver stress;
(d) That the dollar caps for each service priority level be
adjusted by the vendor rate increases authorized by the legislature;
(e) That the following services be available under the program:
(i) Respite care including respite care for a parent who provides
paid personal care to his or her adult son or daughter with
developmental disabilities who resides in the home;
(ii) Therapies;
(iii) Architectural and vehicular modifications;
(iv) Equipment and supplies;
(v) Specialized nutrition and clothing;
(vi) Excess medical costs not covered by another source;
(vii) Copays for medical and therapeutic services;
(viii) Transportation;
(ix) Training;
(x) Counseling;
(xi) Behavior management;
(xii) Parent/sibling education;
(xiii) Recreational opportunities; and
(xiv) Community services grants; and
(f) Other standards or requirements consistent with this section.
(3) Funding, in addition to funding for the service priority
levels, shall be provided for one-time exceptional needs and emergency
needs for eligible individuals and families not receiving individual
and family services annual grants to assist individuals and families
who experience a short-term crisis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 No later than January 1, 2008, the
department of social and health services shall report to the
appropriate policy committees of the legislature on the following:
(1) The number of people receiving services under the individual
and family services program, and the type of services;
(2) The number of respite hours for paid parent providers and the
cost for those services;
(3) Reasons why people were denied for services, including how many
people were denied due to income, and their level of income, if
available;
(4) The service priority levels and income of people receiving
services;
(5) Any recommendations on how to improve the program that would
need additional legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act may be known and cited as the Lance
Morehouse, Jr. memorial individual and family services act.

--- END ---