BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
AUTHORIZING THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE TO PROVIDE ASSESSMENTS,
NOTICES, AND OTHER INFORMATION ELECTRONICALLY
Sec. 101 RCW 82.16.120 and 2005 c 300 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any individual, business, or local governmental entity, not in
the light and power business or in the gas distribution business, may
apply to the light and power business serving the situs of the system,
each fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2005, for an investment cost
recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour from a customer-generated
electricity renewable energy system installed on its property that is
not interconnected to the electric distribution system. No incentive
may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated before July 1, 2005, or after
June 30, 2014.
(2) When light and power businesses serving eighty percent of the
total customer load in the state adopt uniform standards for
interconnection to the electric distribution system, any individual,
business, or local governmental entity, not in the light and power
business or in the gas distribution business, may apply to the light
and power business serving the situs of the system, each fiscal year,
for an investment cost recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour from
a customer-generated electricity renewable energy system installed on
its property that is not interconnected to the electric distribution
system and from a customer-generated electricity renewable energy
system installed on its property that is interconnected to the electric
distribution system. Uniform standards for interconnection to the
electric distribution system means those standards established by light
and power businesses that have ninety percent of total requirements the
same. No incentive may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated before
July 1, 2005, or after June 30, 2014.
(3)(a) Before submitting for the first time the application for the
incentive allowed under this section, the applicant shall submit to the
department of revenue and to the climate and rural energy development
center at the Washington State University, established under RCW
28B.30.642, a certification in a form and manner prescribed by the
department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) That the electricity produced by the applicant meets the
definition of "customer-generated electricity" and that the renewable
energy system produces electricity with:
(A) Any solar inverters and solar modules manufactured in
Washington state;
(B) A wind generator powered by blades manufactured in Washington
state;
(C) A solar inverter manufactured in Washington state;
(D) A solar module manufactured in Washington state; or
(E) Solar or wind equipment manufactured outside of Washington
state;
(iv) That the electricity can be transformed or transmitted for
entry into or operation in parallel with electricity transmission and
distribution systems;
(v) The date that the renewable energy system received its final
electrical permit from the applicable local jurisdiction.
(b) Within thirty days of receipt of the certification the
department of revenue shall ((advise)) notify the applicant ((in
writing)) by mail, or electronically as provided in section 113 of this
act, whether the renewable energy system qualifies for an incentive
under this section. The department may consult with the climate and
rural energy development center to determine eligibility for the
incentive. System certifications and the information contained therein
are subject to disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(4)(a) By August 1st of each year application for the incentive
shall be made to the light and power business serving the situs of the
system by certification in a form and manner prescribed by the
department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) The date of the ((letter)) notification from the department
of revenue stating that the renewable energy system is eligible for the
incentives under this section;
(iv) A statement of the amount of kilowatt-hours generated by the
renewable energy system in the prior fiscal year.
(b) Within sixty days of receipt of the incentive certification the
light and power business serving the situs of the system shall notify
the applicant in writing whether the incentive payment will be
authorized or denied. The business may consult with the climate and
rural energy development center to determine eligibility for the
incentive payment. Incentive certifications and the information
contained therein are subject to disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(c)(i) Persons receiving incentive payments shall keep and
preserve, for a period of five years, suitable records as may be
necessary to determine the amount of incentive applied for and
received. Such records shall be open for examination at any time upon
notice by the light and power business that made the payment or by the
department. If upon examination of any records or from other
information obtained by the business or department it appears that an
incentive has been paid in an amount that exceeds the correct amount of
incentive payable, the business may assess against the person for the
amount found to have been paid in excess of the correct amount of
incentive payable and shall add thereto interest on the amount.
Interest shall be assessed in the manner that the department assesses
interest upon delinquent tax under RCW 82.32.050.
(ii) If it appears that the amount of incentive paid is less than
the correct amount of incentive payable the business may authorize
additional payment.
(5) The investment cost recovery incentive may be paid fifteen
cents per economic development kilowatt-hour unless requests exceed the
amount authorized for credit to the participating light and power
business. For the purposes of this section, the rate paid for the
investment cost recovery incentive may be multiplied by the following
factors:
(a) For customer-generated electricity produced using solar modules
manufactured in Washington state, two and four-tenths;
(b) For customer-generated electricity produced using a solar or a
wind generator equipped with an inverter manufactured in Washington
state, one and two-tenths;
(c) For customer-generated electricity produced using an anaerobic
digester, or by other solar equipment or using a wind generator
equipped with blades manufactured in Washington state, one; and
(d) For all other customer-generated electricity produced by wind,
eight-tenths.
(6) No individual, household, business, or local governmental
entity is eligible for incentives for more than two thousand dollars
per year.
(7) If requests for the investment cost recovery incentive exceed
the amount of funds available for credit to the participating light and
power business, the incentive payments shall be reduced
proportionately.
(8) The climate and rural energy development center at Washington
State University energy program may establish guidelines and standards
for technologies that are identified as Washington manufactured and
therefore most beneficial to the state's environment.
(9) The environmental attributes of the renewable energy system
belong to the applicant, and do not transfer to the state or the light
and power business upon receipt of the investment cost recovery
incentive.

Sec. 102 RCW 82.24.120 and 2006 c 14 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If any person, subject to the provisions of this chapter or any
rules adopted by the department of revenue under authority hereof, is
found to have failed to affix the stamps required, or to have them
affixed as herein provided, or to pay any tax due hereunder, or to have
violated any of the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted by the
department of revenue in the administration hereof, there shall be
assessed and collected from such person, in addition to any tax that
may be found due, a remedial penalty equal to the greater of ten
dollars per package of unstamped cigarettes or two hundred fifty
dollars, plus interest on the amount of the tax at the rate as computed
under RCW 82.32.050(2) from the date the tax became due until the date
of payment, and upon notice mailed to the last known address of the
person or provided electronically as provided in section 113 of this
act. The amount shall become due and payable in thirty days from the
date of the notice. If the amount remains unpaid, the department or
its duly authorized agent may make immediate demand upon such person
for the payment of all such taxes, penalties, and interest.
(2) The department, for good reason shown, may waive or cancel all
or any part of penalties imposed, but the taxpayer must pay all taxes
due and interest thereon, at the rate as computed under RCW
82.32.050(2) from the date the tax became due until the date of
payment.
(3) The keeping of any unstamped articles coming within the
provisions of this chapter shall be prima facie evidence of intent to
violate the provisions of this chapter.
(4) This section does not apply to taxes or tax increases due under
RCW 82.24.280.

Sec. 103 RCW 82.24.135 and 1998 c 53 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In all cases of seizure of any property made subject to forfeiture
under this chapter the department or the board shall proceed as
follows:
(1) Forfeiture shall be deemed to have commenced by the seizure.
Notice of seizure shall be given to the department or the board
immediately if the seizure is made by someone other than an agent of
the department or the board authorized to collect taxes.
(2) Upon notification or seizure by the department or the board or
upon receipt of property subject to forfeiture under this chapter from
any other person, the department or the board shall list and
particularly describe the property seized in duplicate and have the
property appraised by a qualified person not employed by the department
or the board or acting as its agent. Listing and appraisement of the
property shall be properly attested by the department or the board and
the appraiser, who shall be allowed a reasonable appraisal fee. No
appraisal is required if the property seized is judged by the
department or the board to be less than one hundred dollars in value.
(3) The department or the board shall cause notice to be served
within five days following the seizure or notification to the
department or the board of the seizure on the owner of the property
seized, if known, on the person in charge thereof, and on any other
person having any known right or interest therein, of the seizure and
intended forfeiture of the seized property. The notice may be served
by any method authorized by law or court rule including but not limited
to service by mail. The department may also furnish notice
electronically as provided in section 113 of this act. If service is
by mail ((it shall be by both)) or notice is provided electronically as
provided in section 113 of this act, the notice shall also be served by
certified mail with return receipt requested ((and regular mail)).
Electronic notification or service by mail shall be deemed complete
upon mailing the notice, electronically sending the notice, or
electronically notifying the person or persons entitled to the notice
that the notice is available to be accessed by the person or persons,
within the five-day period following the seizure or notification of the
seizure to the department or the board.
(4) If no person notifies the department or the board in writing of
the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of the items
seized within fifteen days of the date of the notice of seizure, the
item seized shall be considered forfeited.
(5) If any person notifies the department or the board, in writing,
of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of the items
seized within fifteen days of the date of the notice of seizure, the
person or persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be
heard as to the claim or right. The hearing shall be before the
director or the director's designee or the board or the board's
designee, except that any person asserting a claim or right may bring
an action for return of the seized items in the superior court of the
county in which such property was seized, if the aggregate value of the
article or articles involved is more than five hundred dollars. A
hearing and any appeal therefrom shall be in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW. The burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence
shall be upon the person claiming to be the lawful owner or the person
claiming to have the lawful right to possession of the items seized.
The department or the board shall promptly return the article or
articles to the claimant upon a determination that the claimant is the
present lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession thereof of
the items seized.

Sec. 104 RCW 82.24.280 and 1996 c 149 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any additional tax liability arising from a tax rate increase
under this chapter shall be paid, along with reports and returns
prescribed by the department, on or before the last day of the month in
which the increase becomes effective.
(2) If not paid by the due date, interest shall apply to any unpaid
tax. Interest shall be calculated at the rate as computed under RCW
82.32.050(2) from the date the tax became due until the date of
payment.
(3) If upon examination of any returns or from other information
obtained by the department it appears that a tax or penalty has been
paid less than that properly due, the department shall assess against
the taxpayer such additional amount found to be due. The department
shall notify the taxpayer by mail, or electronically as provided in
section 113 of this act, of the additional amount due, including any
applicable penalties and interest. The taxpayer shall pay the
additional amount within thirty days from the date of the notice, or
within such further time as the department may provide.
(4) All of chapter 82.32 RCW applies to tax rate increases except:
RCW 82.32.050(1) and 82.32.270.

Sec. 105 RCW 82.32.033 and 2004 c 253 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A promoter of a special event within the state of Washington
shall not permit a vendor to make or solicit retail sales of tangible
personal property or services at the special event unless the promoter
makes a good faith effort to obtain verification that the vendor has
obtained a certificate of registration from the department.
(2) A promoter of a special event shall:
(a) Keep, in addition to the records required under RCW 82.32.070,
a record of the dates and place of each special event, and the name,
address, and registration certificate number of each vendor permitted
to make or solicit retail sales of tangible personal property or
services at the special event. The record of the date and place of a
special event, and the name, address, and registration certificate
number of each vendor at the event shall be preserved for a period of
one year from the date of a special event; and
(b) Provide to the department, within twenty days of receipt of a
written request from the department, a list of vendors permitted to
make or solicit retail sales of tangible personal property or services.
The list shall be in a form and contain such information as the
department may require, and shall include the date and place of the
event, and the name, address, and registration certificate number of
each vendor.
(3) If a promoter fails to make a good faith effort to comply with
the provisions of this section, the promoter is liable for the
penalties provided in this subsection (3).
(a) If a promoter fails to make a good faith effort to comply with
the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the department shall
impose a penalty of one hundred dollars for each vendor permitted to
make or solicit retail sales of tangible personal property or services
at the special event.
(b) If a promoter fails to make a good faith effort to comply with
the provisions of subsection (2)(b) of this section, the department
shall impose a penalty of:
(i) Two hundred fifty dollars if the information requested is not
received by the department within twenty days of the department's
written request; and
(ii) One hundred dollars for each vendor for whom the information
as required by subsection (2)(b) of this section is not provided to the
department.
(4) The aggregate of penalties imposed under subsection (3) of this
section may not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars for a special
event if the promoter has not previously been penalized under this
section. Under no circumstances is a promoter liable for sales tax or
business and occupation tax not remitted to the department by a vendor
at a special event.
(5) The department shall notify a promoter by mail, or
electronically as provided in section 113 of this act, of any penalty
imposed under this section, and the penalty shall be due within thirty
days from the date of the notice. If any penalty imposed under this
section is not received by the department by the due date, there shall
be assessed interest on the unpaid amount beginning the day following
the due date until the penalty is paid in full. The rate of interest
shall be computed on a daily basis on the amount of outstanding penalty
at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate computed
shall be adjusted annually in the same manner as provided in RCW
82.32.050(1)(c).
(6) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Promoter" means a person who organizes, operates, or sponsors
a special event and who contracts with vendors for participation in the
special event.
(b) "Special event" means an entertainment, amusement,
recreational, educational, or marketing event, whether held on a
regular or irregular basis, at which more than one vendor makes or
solicits retail sales of tangible personal property or services. The
term includes, but is not limited to: Auto shows, recreational vehicle
shows, boat shows, home shows, garden shows, hunting and fishing shows,
stamp shows, comic book shows, sports memorabilia shows, craft shows,
art shows, antique shows, flea markets, exhibitions, festivals,
concerts, swap meets, bazaars, carnivals, athletic contests, circuses,
fairs, or other similar activities. "Special event" does not include
an event that is organized for the exclusive benefit of any nonprofit
organization as defined in RCW 82.04.3651. An event is organized for
the exclusive benefit of a nonprofit organization if all of the gross
proceeds of retail sales of all vendors at the event inure to the
benefit of the nonprofit organization on whose behalf the event is
being held. "Special event" does not include athletic contests that
involve competition between teams, when such competition consists of
more than five contests in a calendar year by at least one team at the
same facility or site.
(c) "Vendor" means a person who, at a special event, makes or
solicits retail sales of tangible personal property or services.
(7) "Good faith effort to comply" and "good faith effort to obtain"
may be shown by, but is not limited to, circumstances where a promoter:
(a) Includes a statement on all written contracts with its vendors
that a valid registration certificate number issued by the department
of revenue is required for participation in the special event and
requires vendors to indicate their registration certificate number on
these contracts; and
(b) Provides the department with a list of vendors and their
associated registration certificate numbers as provided in subsection
(2)(b) of this section.
(8) This section does not apply to:
(a) A special event whose promoter does not charge more than two
hundred dollars for a vendor to participate in a special event;
(b) A special event whose promoter charges a percentage of sales
instead of, or in addition to, a flat charge for a vendor to
participate in a special event if the promoter, in good faith, believes
that no vendor will pay more than two hundred dollars to participate in
the special event; or
(c) A person who does not organize, operate, or sponsor a special
event, but only provides a venue, supplies, furnishings, fixtures,
equipment, or services to a promoter of a special event.

Sec. 106 RCW 82.32.050 and 2003 c 73 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If upon examination of any returns or from other information
obtained by the department it appears that a tax or penalty has been
paid less than that properly due, the department shall assess against
the taxpayer such additional amount found to be due and shall add
thereto interest on the tax only. The department shall notify the
taxpayer by mail, or electronically as provided in section 113 of this
act, of the additional amount and the additional amount shall become
due and shall be paid within thirty days from the date of the notice,
or within such further time as the department may provide.
(a) For tax liabilities arising before January 1, 1992, interest
shall be computed at the rate of nine percent per annum from the last
day of the year in which the deficiency is incurred until the earlier
of December 31, 1998, or the date of payment. After December 31, 1998,
the rate of interest shall be variable and computed as provided in
subsection (2) of this section. The rate so computed shall be adjusted
on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest
for that calendar year.
(b) For tax liabilities arising after December 31, 1991, the rate
of interest shall be variable and computed as provided in subsection
(2) of this section from the last day of the year in which the
deficiency is incurred until the date of payment. The rate so computed
shall be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in
computing interest for that calendar year.
(c) Interest imposed after December 31, 1998, shall be computed
from the last day of the month following each calendar year included in
a notice, and the last day of the month following the final month
included in a notice if not the end of a calendar year, until the due
date of the notice. If payment in full is not made by the due date of
the notice, additional interest shall be computed until the date of
payment. The rate of interest shall be variable and computed as
provided in subsection (2) of this section. The rate so computed shall
be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in
computing interest for that calendar year.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the rate of interest to be
charged to the taxpayer shall be an average of the federal short-term
rate as defined in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 1274(d) plus two percentage points.
The rate set for each new year shall be computed by taking an
arithmetical average to the nearest percentage point of the federal
short-term rate, compounded annually. That average shall be calculated
using the rates from four months: January, April, and July of the
calendar year immediately preceding the new year, and October of the
previous preceding year.
(3) No assessment or correction of an assessment for additional
taxes, penalties, or interest due may be made by the department more
than four years after the close of the tax year, except (a) against a
taxpayer who has not registered as required by this chapter, (b) upon
a showing of fraud or of misrepresentation of a material fact by the
taxpayer, or (c) where a taxpayer has executed a written waiver of such
limitation. The execution of a written waiver shall also extend the
period for making a refund or credit as provided in RCW 82.32.060(2).
(4) For the purposes of this section, "return" means any document
a person is required by the state of Washington to file to satisfy or
establish a tax or fee obligation that is administered or collected by
the department of revenue and that has a statutorily defined due date.

Sec. 107 RCW 82.32.100 and 1992 c 169 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If any person fails or refuses to make any return or to make
available for examination the records required by this chapter, the
department shall proceed, in such manner as it may deem best, to obtain
facts and information on which to base its estimate of the tax; and to
this end the department may examine the records of any such person as
provided in RCW 82.32.110.
(2) As soon as the department procures such facts and information
as it is able to obtain upon which to base the assessment of any tax
payable by any person who has failed or refused to make a return, it
shall proceed to determine and assess against such person the tax and
any applicable penalties or interest due, but such action shall not
deprive such person from appealing the assessment as provided in this
chapter. The department shall notify the taxpayer by mail, or
electronically as provided in section 113 of this act, of the total
amount of such tax, penalties, and interest, and the total amount shall
become due and shall be paid within thirty days from the date of such
notice.
(3) No assessment or correction of an assessment may be made by the
department more than four years after the close of the tax year, except
(a) against a taxpayer who has not registered as required by this
chapter, (b) upon a showing of fraud or of misrepresentation of a
material fact by the taxpayer, or (c) where a taxpayer has executed a
written waiver of such limitation. The execution of a written waiver
shall also extend the period for making a refund or credit as provided
in RCW 82.32.060(2).

Sec. 108 RCW 82.32.130 and 1979 ex.s. c 95 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other law, any notice or order required by this
title to be mailed to any taxpayer may be provided electronically as
provided in section 113 of this act, served in the manner prescribed by
law for personal service of summons and complaint in the commencement
of actions in the superior courts of the state((, but)). However if
the notice or order is mailed, it shall be addressed to the address of
the taxpayer as shown by the records of the department ((of revenue)),
or, if no such address is shown, to such address as the department is
able to ascertain by reasonable effort. Failure of the taxpayer to
receive such notice or order whether served ((or)), mailed, or provided
electronically as provided in section 113 of this act shall not release
the taxpayer from any tax or any increases or penalties thereon.

Sec. 109 RCW 82.32.140 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 13 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Whenever any taxpayer quits business, or sells out, exchanges,
or otherwise disposes of more than fifty percent of the fair market
value of either its tangible or intangible assets, any tax payable
hereunder shall become immediately due and payable, and such taxpayer
shall, within ten days thereafter, make a return and pay the tax due.
(2) Any person who becomes a successor shall withhold from the
purchase price a sum sufficient to pay any tax due from the taxpayer
until such time as the taxpayer shall produce a receipt from the
department of revenue showing payment in full of any tax due or a
certificate that no tax is due. If any tax is not paid by the taxpayer
within ten days from the date of such sale, exchange, or disposal, the
successor shall become liable for the payment of the full amount of
tax. If the fair market value of the assets acquired by a successor is
less than fifty thousand dollars, the successor's liability for payment
of the unpaid tax is limited to the fair market value of the assets
acquired from the taxpayer. The burden of establishing the fair market
value of the assets acquired is on the successor.
(3) The payment of any tax by a successor shall, to the extent
thereof, be deemed a payment upon the purchase price; and if such
payment is greater in amount than the purchase price the amount of the
difference shall become a debt due the successor from the taxpayer.
(4) No successor shall be liable for any tax due from the person
from whom the successor has acquired a business or stock of goods if
the successor gives written notice to the department of revenue of such
acquisition and no assessment is issued by the department of revenue
within six months of receipt of such notice against the former operator
of the business and a copy thereof mailed to the successor or provided
electronically to the successor in accordance with section 113 of this
act.

Sec. 110 RCW 82.32.160 and 1989 c 378 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person having been issued a notice of additional taxes,
delinquent taxes, interest, or penalties assessed by the department,
may within thirty days after the issuance of the original notice of the
amount thereof or within the period covered by any extension of the due
date thereof granted by the department petition the department in
writing for a correction of the amount of the assessment, and a
conference for examination and review of the assessment. The petition
shall set forth the reasons why the correction should be granted and
the amount of the tax, interest, or penalties, which the petitioner
believes to be due. The department shall promptly consider the
petition and may grant or deny it. If denied, the petitioner shall be
notified by mail, or electronically as provided in section 113 of this
act, thereof forthwith. If a conference is granted, the department
shall fix the time and place therefor and notify the petitioner thereof
by mail or electronically as provided in section 113 of this act.
After the conference the department may make such determination as may
appear to it to be just and lawful and shall mail a copy of its
determination to the petitioner, or provide a copy of its determination
electronically as provided in section 113 of this act. If no such
petition is filed within the thirty-day period the assessment covered
by the notice shall become final.
The procedures provided for herein shall apply also to a notice
denying, in whole or in part, an application for a pollution control
tax exemption and credit certificate, with such modifications to such
procedures established by departmental rules and regulations as may be
necessary to accommodate a claim for exemption or credit.

Sec. 111 RCW 82.32.170 and 1967 ex.s. c 26 s 50 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any person, having paid any tax, original assessment, additional
assessment, or corrected assessment of any tax, may apply to the
department within the time limitation for refund provided in this
chapter, by petition in writing for a correction of the amount paid,
and a conference for examination and review of the tax liability, in
which petition he shall set forth the reasons why the conference should
be granted, and the amount in which the tax, interest, or penalty,
should be refunded. The department shall promptly consider the
petition, and may grant or deny it. If denied, the petitioner shall be
notified by mail, or electronically as provided in section 113 of this
act, thereof forthwith((;)). If a conference is granted, the
department shall notify the petitioner by mail, or electronically as
provided in section 113 of this act, of the time and place fixed
therefor. After the hearing the department may make such determination
as may appear to it just and lawful, and shall mail a copy of its
determination to the petitioner, or provide a copy of its determination
electronically as provided in section 113 of this act.

Sec. 112 RCW 82.45.100 and 1997 c 157 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Payment of the tax imposed under this chapter is due and
payable immediately at the time of sale, and if not paid within one
month thereafter shall bear interest from the time of sale until the
date of payment.
(a) Interest imposed before January 1, 1999, shall be computed at
the rate of one percent per month.
(b) Interest imposed after December 31, 1998, shall be computed on
a monthly basis at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). The
rate so computed shall be adjusted on the first day of January of each
year for use in computing interest for that calendar year. The
department of revenue shall provide written notification to the county
treasurers of the variable rate on or before December 1st of the year
preceding the calendar year in which the rate applies.
(2) In addition to the interest described in subsection (1) of this
section, if the payment of any tax is not received by the county
treasurer or the department of revenue, as the case may be, within one
month of the date due, there shall be assessed a penalty of five
percent of the amount of the tax; if the tax is not received within two
months of the date due, there shall be assessed a total penalty of ten
percent of the amount of the tax; and if the tax is not received within
three months of the date due, there shall be assessed a total penalty
of twenty percent of the amount of the tax. The payment of the penalty
described in this subsection shall be collectible from the seller only,
and RCW 82.45.070 does not apply to the penalties described in this
subsection.
(3) If the tax imposed under this chapter is not received by the
due date, the transferee shall be personally liable for the tax, along
with any interest as provided in subsection (1) of this section,
unless:
(a) An instrument evidencing the sale is recorded in the official
real property records of the county in which the property conveyed is
located; or
(b) Either the transferor or transferee notifies the department of
revenue in writing of the occurrence of the sale within thirty days
following the date of the sale.
(4) If upon examination of any affidavits or from other information
obtained by the department or its agents it appears that all or a
portion of the tax is unpaid, the department shall assess against the
taxpayer the additional amount found to be due plus interest and
penalties as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The
department shall notify the taxpayer by mail, or electronically as
provided in section 113 of this act, of the additional amount and the
same shall become due and shall be paid within thirty days from the
date of the notice, or within such further time as the department may
provide.
(5) No assessment or refund may be made by the department more than
four years after the date of sale except upon a showing of:
(a) Fraud or misrepresentation of a material fact by the taxpayer;
(b) A failure by the taxpayer to record documentation of a sale or
otherwise report the sale to the county treasurer; or
(c) A failure of the transferor or transferee to report the sale
under RCW 82.45.090(2).
(6) Penalties collected on taxes due under this chapter under
subsection (2) of this section and RCW 82.32.090 (2) through (((6)))
(7) shall be deposited in the housing trust fund as described in
chapter 43.185 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the department is required to send any assessment,
notice, or any other information to persons by regular mail, the
department may instead provide the assessment, notice, or other
information electronically if the following conditions are met:
(a) The person entitled to receive the information has authorized
the department in writing, electronically or otherwise, to provide the
assessment, notice, or other information electronically; and
(b) If the assessment, notice, or other information is subject to
the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330, the department must
use methods reasonably designed to protect the information from
unauthorized disclosure. The provisions of this subsection (1)(b) may
be waived by a taxpayer. The waiver must be in writing and may be
provided to the department electronically. A person may provide a
waiver with respect to a particular item of information or may give a
blanket waiver with respect to any item of information or certain items
of information to be provided electronically. A blanket waiver will
continue until revoked in writing by the taxpayer. Such revocation may
be provided to the department electronically in a manner provided or
approved by the department.
(2) A person may authorize the department under subsection (1)(a)
of this section to provide a particular item of information
electronically or may give blanket authorization to provide any item of
information or certain items of information electronically. Such
blanket authorization will continue until revoked in writing by the
taxpayer. Such revocation may be provided to the department
electronically in a manner provided or approved by the department.
(3) Any assessment, notice, or other information provided by the
department electronically to a person is deemed to be received by the
taxpayer on the date that the department electronically sends the
information to the person or electronically notifies the person that
the information is available to be accessed by the person.
(4) This section also applies to any information that is not
expressly required by statute to be sent by regular mail, but is
customarily sent by the department using regular mail, to persons
entitled to receive the information.

PART 2
PENALTY WAIVERS FOR CENTRALLY ASSESSED UTILITIES
Sec. 201 RCW 84.12.260 and 1984 c 132 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If any company shall fail to materially comply with the
provisions of RCW 84.12.230, the department shall add to the value of
such company, as a penalty for such failure, five percent for every
thirty days or fraction thereof, not to exceed ten percent, that the
company fails to comply.
(2) If any company, or any of its officers or agents shall refuse
or neglect to make any report required by this chapter, or by the
department of revenue, or shall refuse to permit an inspection and
examination of its records, books, accounts, papers or property
requested by the department of revenue, or shall refuse or neglect to
appear before the department of revenue in obedience to a subpoena, the
department of revenue shall inform itself to the best of its ability of
the matters required to be known, in order to discharge its duties with
respect to valuation and assessment of the property of such company,
and the department shall add to the value so ascertained twenty-five
percent as a penalty for such failure or refusal and such company shall
be estopped to question or impeach the assessment of the department in
any hearing or proceeding thereafter. Such penalty shall be in lieu of
the penalty provided for in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The department shall waive or cancel the penalty imposed under
subsection (1) of this section for good cause shown.
(4) The department shall waive or cancel the penalty imposed under
subsection (1) of this section when the circumstances under which the
failure to materially comply with the provisions of RCW 84.12.230 do
not qualify for waiver or cancellation under subsection (3) of this
section if:
(a) The company fully complies with the reporting provisions of RCW
84.12.230 within thirty days of the due date or any extension granted
by the department; and
(b) The company has timely complied with the provisions of RCW
84.12.230 for the previous two calendar years. The requirement that a
company has timely complied with the provisions of RCW 84.12.230 for
the previous two calendar years is waived for any calendar year in
which the company was not required to comply with the provisions of RCW
84.12.230.

Sec. 202 RCW 84.16.036 and 1984 c 132 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If any company shall fail to comply with the provisions of RCW
84.16.020, the department shall add to the value of such company, as a
penalty for such failure, five percent for every thirty days or
fraction thereof, not to exceed ten percent, that the company fails to
comply.
(2) If any company, or its officer or agent, shall refuse or
neglect to make any report required by this chapter, or by the
department of revenue, or shall refuse or neglect to permit an
inspection and examination of its records, books, accounts, papers or
property requested by the department of revenue, or shall refuse or
neglect to appear before the department in obedience to a summons, the
department shall inform itself the best it may of the matters to be
known, in order to discharge its duties with respect to valuation and
assessment of the property of such company; and the department shall
add to the value so ascertained twenty-five percent as a penalty for
the failure or refusal of such company to make its report and such
company shall be estopped to question or impeach the assessment of the
department of revenue in any hearing or proceeding thereafter. Such
penalty shall be in lieu of the penalty provided for in subsection (1)
of this section.
(3) The department shall waive or cancel the penalty imposed under
subsection (1) of this section for good cause shown.
(4) The department shall waive or cancel the penalty imposed under
subsection (1) of this section when the circumstances under which the
failure to materially comply with the provisions of RCW 84.16.020 do
not qualify for waiver or cancellation under subsection (3) of this
section if:
(a) The company fully complies with the reporting provisions of RCW
84.16.020 within thirty days of the due date; and
(b) The company has timely complied with the provisions of RCW
84.16.020 for the previous two calendar years. The requirement that a
company has timely complied with the provisions of RCW 84.16.020 for
the previous two calendar years is waived for any calendar year in
which the company was not required to comply with the provisions of RCW
84.16.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 Sections 201 and 202 of this act apply
with respect to annual reports and annual statements originally due on
or after the effective date of this section.

PART 3
ELECTRONIC FILING OF PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION RENEWAL
DECLARATIONS AND ELIMINATING FEES
Sec. 301 RCW 84.36.815 and 2001 c 126 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to qualify for exempt status for any real or personal
property under this chapter except personal property under RCW
84.36.600, all foreign national governments; cemeteries;
nongovernmental nonprofit corporations, organizations, and
associations; hospitals owned and operated by a public hospital
district for purposes of exemption under RCW 84.36.040(2); and soil and
water conservation districts shall file an initial application on or
before March 31st with the state department of revenue. All
applications shall be filed on forms prescribed by the department and
shall be signed by an authorized agent of the applicant.
(2) In order to requalify for exempt status, all applicants except
nonprofit cemeteries shall file an annual renewal declaration on or
before March 31st each year. The renewal declaration shall be on forms
prescribed by the department of revenue and shall contain ((an
affidavit)) a statement certifying the exempt status of the real or
personal property owned by the exempt organization. This renewal
declaration may be submitted electronically in a format provided or
approved by the department. Information may also be required with the
renewal declaration to assist the department in determining whether the
property tax exemption should continue.
(3) When an organization acquires real property qualified for
exemption or converts real property to exempt status, ((such)) the
organization shall file an initial application for the property within
sixty days following the acquisition or conversion in accordance with
all applicable provisions of subsection (1) of this section. If the
application is filed after the expiration of the sixty-day period, a
late filing penalty shall be imposed ((pursuant to)) under RCW
84.36.825((, as now or hereafter amended)).
(4) When organizations acquire real property qualified for
exemption or convert real property to an exempt use, the property, upon
approval of the application for exemption, is entitled to a property
tax exemption for property taxes due and payable the following year.
If the owner has paid taxes for the year following the year the
property qualified for exemption, the owner is entitled to a refund of
the amount paid on the property so acquired or converted.

Sec. 302 RCW 84.36.820 and 1984 c 220 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
On or before January 1st of each year, the department of revenue
shall ((mail application forms to)) notify the owners of record of
property exempted from property taxation at their last known address
((who must)) about the obligation to file ((annually)) an annual
renewal declaration for continued exemption. When a continued
exemption is not approved, the department ((of revenue)) shall notify
the assessor of the county in which the property is located who, in
turn, shall remove the tax exemption from ((any)) the property ((if an
application has not been approved for exemption: PROVIDED, That)).
The failure to file an annual renewal declaration for continued
exemption and subsequent removal of the exemption shall not be subject
to review as provided in RCW 84.36.850((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
The department of revenue shall review applications received after the
March 31st due date, but ((such)) these applications shall be subject
to late filing penalties provided in RCW 84.36.825 ((as now or
hereafter amended)).

Sec. 303 RCW 84.36.825 and 1998 c 311 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
((An application fee of thirty-five dollars for each initial
application and eight dollars and seventy-five cents for each annual
renewal declaration shall be required and shall be deposited within the
general fund. The department of revenue may waive the application or
declaration fee related to the property of any church or cemetery
applying for exemption under the provisions of RCW 84.36.020 whose
gross receipts related to the use of such property for exempt purposes
did not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars during the calendar
year preceding the application year.)) A late filing penalty of ten
dollars per month for each month an application or annual renewal
declaration is past due shall be required and shall be deposited in the
general fund.

Sec. 304 RCW 84.36.830 and 1998 c 310 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of revenue shall review each application for
exemption and ((make a determination thereon prior to)) approve or deny
the application before August 1st of the assessment year for which
((such)) the application is made((: PROVIDED, That each)). However,
exemption applications received after March 31st shall be reviewed and
determination made thereon within thirty days of the date received or
by August 1st, whichever is later.
(2) The department ((of revenue)) may request ((such)) additional
relevant information as it deems necessary. The department ((of
revenue shall make a physical inspection of)) may also physically
inspect the property and satisfy itself as to the use of all parcels
((prior to)) before approving or denying the application((, and
thereafter)). After approving an application, the department may also
physically inspect the property at regular intervals ((designed)) to
((insure)) ensure compliance with this chapter.
(3) When the department ((of revenue)) has examined the application
and, if applicable, the subject property, it shall either approve or
deny the request and clearly state the reasons for denial in written
notification by mail to the applicant. The department shall also
notify the assessor of the county in which the property is located.
The county assessor shall place ((such)) the property on the assessment
roll for the current year.

Sec. 305 RCW 84.36.840 and 1973 2nd ex.s. c 40 s 14 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In order to determine whether organizations, associations,
corporations, or institutions, except those exempted under RCW
84.36.020 and 84.36.030, are exempt from property taxes ((within the
intent of this chapter)), and before the exemption shall be allowed for
any year, the superintendent or manager or other proper officer of the
organization, association, corporation, or institution claiming
exemption from taxation shall file((,)) with the department of revenue
((on forms furnished by the director,)) a ((signed)) statement ((made
under oath)) certifying that the income and the receipts thereof,
including donations to it, have been applied to the actual expenses of
operating and maintaining it, or for its capital expenditures, and to
no other purpose. ((Such forms)) This report shall also include a
statement of the receipts and disbursements of ((said)) the exempt
organization((: PROVIDED, That)), association, corporation, or
institution.
(2) Educational institutions claiming exemption under RCW 84.36.050
shall also file ((in addition)) a list of all property claimed to be
exempt, the purpose for which it is used, the revenue derived from it
for the preceding year, the use to which ((such)) the revenue was
applied, the number of students ((in attendance at)) who attended the
school or college, the total revenues of the institution with the
source from which they were derived, and the purposes to which ((such))
the revenues were applied, ((giving)) listing the items of such
revenues and expenditures in detail.
((Such)) (3) The reports required under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section may be submitted electronically, in a format provided or
approved by the department, or mailed to the department. The reports
shall be submitted on or before ((April 1st following the close of the
accounting period for the fiscal year ended during the previous
calendar)) March 31st of each year. The department ((of revenue))
shall remove the tax exemption from the property ((and assets)) of any
organization, association, corporation, or institution ((which)) that
does not file ((such)) the required report with the department ((of
revenue)) on or before the due date((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the
department ((of revenue)) shall allow a reasonable extension of time
for filing upon receipt of a written request ((filed)) on or before the
required filing date and for good cause shown therein.

PART 4
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

--- END ---