BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The secretary of the department of
health shall establish a pilot program to provide merit checks of no
more than one hundred dollars to no more than four hundred fifty
couples who complete a family preparation course. Matching funds may
be used to increase the number of participants in the pilot program.
The department of health must ensure that the administrative cost of
the program does not exceed five percent of the total allocation. The
pilot program must begin no later than January 1, 2008, and continue
for no more than five years, in a county with a population between
seven hundred twenty thousand and one million. Under the pilot
program, a man and a woman who intend to apply for a marriage license
may, together or separately, complete a family preparation course of
not less than four hours with a family preparation course provider.
The county auditor shall provide to couples interested in applying for
a marriage license in the county, or to a qualified instructor,
certificate of completion forms for the family preparation course and
information that includes a brief explanation of the course of required
instruction, the required length of time of the course, and an
explanation of the qualified instructor requirements. Within ninety
days of applying for a marriage license, either applicant may verify
completion of a family preparation course by filing with the department
of health a copy of the marriage certificate and a valid certificate of
completion from a registered course provider. Completed forms must
include names and addresses of participants, the name and work address
of the course provider, signatures of participants attesting to the
completion of the required coursework and the required length of
instruction, and the signature of the qualified instructor attesting to
being a qualified instructor and providing the required coursework and
time requirement for the participants.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a family preparation course
must include instruction regarding:
(a) Conflict management;
(b) Communication skills;
(c) Financial responsibilities in a marriage; and
(d) Children and parenting responsibilities.
(3) The family preparation course must be at least four hours in
length and must be taken from a qualified instructor who is a:
(a) Licensed psychologist;
(b) Certified social worker;
(c) Certified marriage and family therapist;
(d) Certified mental health counselor;
(e) Registered counselor with relevant training or coursework;
(f) Provider designated by a family court judge or commissioner; or
(g) Official representative of a religious institution, if the
representative has relevant training in conflict management,
communication skills, financial responsibilities in marriage, and
children and parenting responsibilities.
(4) Any costs of the family preparation course must be paid by the
applicant.
(5) When the department of health receives a copy of a marriage
certificate and a certificate of completion of a family preparation
course issued by a qualified instructor consistent with this section,
the department shall, within sixty days, issue a merit check to the
couple, not to exceed one hundred dollars per married couple.
(6) The department of health's statistics center shall compile
information on divorced or annulled couples who had previously
participated in a family preparation course.
(7) The department of health shall notify county auditors if there
are no available funds for this pilot program.
(8) The department of health shall report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature five years after the completion of the
pilot program. The committees shall make recommendations on whether
the program should be initiated statewide based on the results of the
number of participants who are still married as opposed to the average
divorce rate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of forty-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the department of health
for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---