BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to increase the
number of college and university students mentoring students in grades
eight through twelve. By increasing the number of mentors, the
legislature intends to improve mathematics and science proficiency of
students in grades eight through twelve, increase the likelihood that
those students will attend postsecondary institutions of higher
education, develop and improve workforce skills of students, improve
citizenship skills, attitudes, and behaviors of students, and improve
retention of college and university student mentors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington Campus Compact, a statewide consortium of public
and private higher education institutions hosted at Western Washington
University, shall develop a statewide network of partnerships between
eligible institutions as defined in RCW 28B.12.030 and common schools
serving students in any of grades eight through twelve. The
partnerships shall include programs for postsecondary students to
mentor students in grades eight through twelve.
(2) The Washington Campus Compact shall compile statewide data to
measure the impact of the mentoring program on the success of students
in grades eight through twelve and on the retention rates of
postsecondary students.
(3) Funding for the mentoring program in this section shall be used
for:
(a) Outreach and training of postsecondary students to serve as
mentors to students in grades eight through twelve, and coordination of
service-learning projects;
(b) Training for partnerships between eligible institutions as
defined in RCW 28B.12.030 and common schools serving students in any of
grades eight through twelve;
(c) Improving accountability by developing strong assessment
mechanisms that measure how mentoring impacts: (i) Academic
improvement of youth; (ii) retention of postsecondary students; (iii)
access to institutions of higher education; and (iv) the development of
workforce and citizenship skills, attitudes, and behaviors; and
(d) Disseminating best practices and impacts of mentoring programs
statewide.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The sum of four hundred eighty-five
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the general
fund to the Washington Campus Compact for the purposes of this act.
(2) The sum of four hundred eighty-five thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the Washington Campus
Compact for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---