BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there are
factors unique to the relationship between a manufactured/mobile home
tenant and a manufactured/mobile home community landlord. Once
occupancy has commenced, the difficulty and expense in moving and
relocating a manufactured/mobile home can affect the operation of
market forces and lead to an inequality of the bargaining position of
the parties. Once occupancy has commenced, a tenant may be subject to
violations of the manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act or the
consumer protection act without an adequate remedy at law. This
chapter is created for the purpose of protecting the public, fostering
fair and honest competition, and regulating the factors unique to the
relationship between the manufactured/mobile home tenant and the
manufactured/mobile home community landlord.
(2) The legislature finds that taking legal action against a
manufactured/mobile home community landlord for violations of the
manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act can be a costly and
lengthy process, and that many people cannot afford to pursue a court
process to vindicate statutory rights. Manufactured/mobile home
community landlords will also benefit by having access to a process
that resolves disputes quickly and efficiently.
(3)(a) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to provide an
equitable as well as a less costly and more efficient way for
manufactured/mobile home tenants and manufactured/mobile home community
landlords to resolve disputes, and to provide a mechanism for state
authorities to quickly locate manufactured/mobile home community
landlords.
(b) The legislature intends to authorize the department of
licensing to register manufactured/mobile home communities and collect
a registration fee.
(c) The legislature intends to authorize the attorney general to:
(i) Produce and distribute educational materials regarding the
manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act and the
manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution program created in section
3 of this act;
(ii) Administer the dispute resolution program by taking
complaints, conducting investigations, making determinations, issuing
fines and other penalties, and participating in administrative dispute
resolutions, when necessary, when there are alleged violations of the
manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act or the consumer protection
act; and
(iii) Collect and annually report upon data related to disputes and
violations, and make recommendations on modifying chapter 59.20 RCW, to
the appropriate committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing;
(2) "Director" means the director of licensing;
(3) "Landlord" or "community owner" means the owner of a mobile
home park or a manufactured housing community and includes the agents
of a landlord;
(4) "Manufactured home" means a single-family dwelling built
according to the United States department of housing and urban
development manufactured home construction and safety standards act,
which is a national preemptive building code. A manufactured home
also: (a) Includes plumbing, heating, air conditioning, and electrical
systems; (b) is built on a permanent chassis; and (c) can be
transported in one or more sections with each section at least eight
feet wide and forty feet long when transported, or when installed on
the site is three hundred twenty square feet or greater;
(5) "Mobile home" means a factory-built dwelling built prior to
June 15, 1976, to standards other than the United States department of
housing and urban development code, and acceptable under applicable
state codes in effect at the time of construction or introduction of
the home into the state. Mobile homes have not been built since the
introduction of the United States department of housing and urban
development manufactured home construction and safety act;
(6) "Manufactured/mobile home" means either a manufactured home or
a mobile home;
(7) "Manufactured/mobile home lot" means a portion of a
manufactured/mobile home community designated as the location of one
mobile home, manufactured home, or park model and its accessory
buildings, and intended for the exclusive use as a primary residence by
the occupants of that mobile home, manufactured home, or park model;
(8) "Mobile home park," "manufactured housing community," or
"manufactured/mobile home community" means any real property that is
rented or held out for rent to others for the placement of two or more
mobile homes, manufactured homes, park models, or recreational vehicles
for the primary purpose of production of income, except where the real
property is rented or held out for rent for seasonal recreational
purposes only and is not used for year-round occupancy;
(9) "Owner" means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in
whom is vested:
(a) All or part of the legal title to the real property; or
(b) All or part of the beneficial ownership, and a right to present
use and enjoyment of the real property;
(10) "Park model" means a recreational vehicle intended for
permanent or semi-permanent installation and is used as a permanent
residence;
(11) "Recreational vehicle" means a travel trailer, motor home,
truck camper, or camping trailer that is primarily used as a permanent
residence located in a mobile home park or manufactured housing
community;
(12) "Tenant" means any person, except a transient as defined in
RCW 59.20.030, who rents a mobile home lot;
(13) "Complainant" means a landlord, community owner, or tenant,
who has a complaint alleging a violation of chapter 59.20 or 19.86 RCW;
(15) "Respondent" means a landlord, community owner, or tenant,
alleged to have committed violation of chapter 59.20 or 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The attorney general shall administer a
manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution program.
(2) The purpose of the manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution
program is to provide manufactured/mobile home community landlords and
tenants with a cost-effective and time-efficient process to resolve
disputes regarding alleged violations of the manufactured/mobile home
landlord-tenant act and the consumer protection act.
(3) The attorney general under the manufactured/mobile home dispute
resolution program shall:
(a) Produce educational materials regarding chapter 59.20 RCW and
the manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution program, including a
notice in a format that a landlord can reasonably post in a
manufactured/mobile home community that summarizes tenant rights and
responsibilities, includes information on how to file a complaint with
the attorney general, and includes a toll-free telephone number and web
site address that landlords and tenants can use to seek additional
information and communicate complaints;
(b) Distribute the educational materials described in (a) of this
subsection to all known landlords and information alerting landlords
that:
(i) All landlords must post the notice provided by the attorney
general that summarizes tenant rights and responsibilities and includes
information on how to file complaints, in a clearly visible location in
all common areas of manufactured/mobile home communities, including in
each clubhouse;
(ii) The attorney general may visually confirm that the notice is
appropriately posted; and
(iii) The attorney general may issue a fine or other penalty if the
attorney general discovers that the landlord has not appropriately
posted the notice or that the landlord has not maintained the posted
notice so that it is clearly visible to tenants;
(c) Distribute the educational materials described in (a) of this
subsection to any complainants and respondents, as requested;
(d) Perform dispute resolution activities, including
investigations, negotiations, determinations of violations, and
imposition of fines or other penalties as described in section 4 of
this act;
(e) Create and maintain a database of manufactured/mobile home
communities that have had complaints filed against them. For each
manufactured/mobile home community in the database, the following
information must be contained, at a minimum:
(i) The number of complaints received;
(ii) The nature and extent of the complaints received;
(iii) The violation of law complained of; and
(iv) The manufactured/mobile home complaint resolution program
outcomes for each complaint;
(f) Provide an annual report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on the data collected under this section, including program
performance measures, by December 31st, beginning in 2007.
(4) The manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution program,
including all of the duties of the attorney general under the program
as described in this section, shall be funded by the collection of
fines, other penalties, and fees deposited into the manufactured/mobile
home dispute resolution program account created in section 8 of this
act, and all other sources directed to the manufactured/mobile home
dispute resolution program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A complainant has the right to file a
complaint with the attorney general alleging a violation of chapter
59.20 or 19.86 RCW.
(2) Upon receiving a complaint under this act, the attorney
general must:
(a) Inform the complainant of any notification requirements under
RCW 59.20.080 for tenant violations or RCW 59.20.200 for landlord
violations and encourage the complainant to appropriately notify the
respondent of the complaint; and
(b) If a statutory time period is applicable, inform the
complainant of the time frame that the respondent has to remedy the
complaint under RCW 59.20.080 for tenant violations or RCW 59.20.200
for landlord violations.
(3) After receiving a complaint under this act, the attorney
general shall initiate the manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution
program by investigating the alleged violations at its discretion and,
if appropriate, facilitating negotiations between the complainant and
the respondent.
(4)(a) Complainants and respondents shall cooperate with the
attorney general in the course of an investigation by (i) responding to
subpoenas issued by the attorney general, which may consist of
providing access to papers or other documents, and (ii) providing
access to the manufactured/mobile home facilities relevant to the
investigation. Complainants and respondents must respond to attorney
general subpoenas within thirty days.
(b) Failure to cooperate with the attorney general in the course of
an investigation is a violation of this chapter and a per se violation
of chapter 19.86 RCW.
(5) If after an investigation the attorney general determines that
an agreement cannot be negotiated between the parties, the attorney
general shall make a written determination on whether a violation of
chapter 59.20 or 19.86 RCW has occurred.
(a) If the attorney general finds by a written determination that
a violation of chapter 59.20 or 19.86 RCW has occurred, the attorney
general shall deliver a written notice of violation to the respondent
who committed the violation by certified mail. The notice of violation
must specify the violation, the corrective action required, the time
within which the corrective action must be taken, the penalties
including fines, other penalties, and actions that will result if
corrective action is not taken within the specified time period, and
the process for contesting the determination, fines, penalties, and
other actions included in the notice of violation through an
administrative hearing. The attorney general must deliver to the
complainant a copy of the notice of violation by certified mail.
(b) If the attorney general finds by a written determination that
a violation of chapter 59.20 or 19.86 RCW has not occurred, the
attorney general shall deliver a written notice of nonviolation to both
the complainant and the respondent by certified mail. The notice of
nonviolation must include the process for contesting the determination
included in the notice of nonviolation through an administrative
hearing.
(6) Corrective action must take place within fifteen days of the
respondent's receipt of a notice of violation, except as required
otherwise by the attorney general, unless the respondent has submitted
a timely request for an administrative hearing to contest the notice of
violation as required under subsection (8) of this section. If a
respondent fails to take corrective action within the required time
period and the attorney general has not received a timely request for
an administrative hearing, the attorney general may impose a fine, up
to a maximum of five hundred dollars per violation per day, for each
day that a violation remains uncorrected. The attorney general may
consider the severity and duration of the violation when issuing fines
and other penalties. If the respondent shows upon timely application
to the attorney general that a good faith effort to comply with the
corrective action requirements of the notice of violation has been made
and that the corrective action has not been completed because of
mitigating factors beyond the respondent's control, the attorney
general may delay the imposition of a fine or penalty.
(7) The attorney general may issue an order requiring the
respondent, or its assignee or agent, to cease and desist from an
unlawful practice and take affirmative actions that in the judgment of
the attorney general will carry out the purposes of this chapter. The
affirmative actions may include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) Refunds of rent increases, improper fees, charges, and
assessments collected in violation of this chapter;
(b) Filing and utilization of documents that correct a statutory or
rule violation; and
(c) Reasonable action necessary to correct a statutory or rule
violation.
(8) A complainant or respondent may request an administrative
hearing before an administrative law judge under chapter 34.05 RCW to
contest:
(a) A notice of violation issued under subsection (5)(a) of this
section or a notice of nonviolation issued under subsection (5)(b) of
this section;
(b) A fine or other penalty imposed under subsection (6) of this
section; or
(c) An order to cease and desist or an order to take affirmative
actions under subsection (7) of this section.
The complainant or respondent must request an administrative
hearing within fifteen days of receipt of a notice of violation, notice
of nonviolation, fine, other penalty, order, or action. If an
administrative hearing is not requested within this time period, the
notice of violation, notice of nonviolation, fine, other penalty,
order, or action constitutes a final order of the attorney general and
is not subject to review by any court or agency.
(9) If an administrative hearing is initiated, the respondent and
complainant shall each bear the cost of his or her own legal expenses.
(10) The administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW
shall:
(a) Hear and receive pertinent evidence and testimony;
(b) Decide whether the evidence supports the attorney general
finding by a preponderance of the evidence; and
(c) Enter an appropriate order within thirty days after the close
of the hearing and immediately mail copies of the order to the affected
parties.
The order of the administrative law judge constitutes the final
agency order of the attorney general and may be appealed to the
superior court under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(11) When the attorney general imposes a fine, refund, or other
penalty against a respondent, the respondent may not seek any recovery
or reimbursement of the fine, refund, or other penalty from a
complainant or from other manufactured/mobile home tenants.
(12) All receipts from the imposition of fines or other penalties
collected under this section other than those due to a complainant must
be deposited into the manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution
program account created in section 8 of this act.
(13) This section is not exclusive and does not limit the right of
landlords or tenants to take legal action against another party as
provided in chapter 59.20 RCW or otherwise. Exhaustion of the
administrative remedy provided in this chapter is not required before
a landlord or tenants may bring a legal action. This section does not
apply to unlawful detainer actions initiated under RCW 59.20.080 prior
to the filing and service of an unlawful detainer court action;
however, a tenant is not precluded from seeking relief under this
chapter if the complaint claims the notice of termination violates RCW
59.20.080 prior to the filing and service of an unlawful detainer
action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The attorney general, director, or
individuals acting on behalf of the attorney general or director are
immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based upon any
disciplinary actions or other official acts performed in the course of
their duties under this chapter, except their intentional or willful
misconduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department shall annually register
all manufactured/mobile home communities. Each community must be
registered separately. The department must deliver by mail
registration notifications to all known manufactured/mobile home
community landlords. Registration information packets must include:
(a) Registration forms; and
(b) Registration assessment information, including registration due
dates and late fees, and the collections procedures, liens, and
charging costs to tenants.
(2) To apply for registration, the landlord of a
manufactured/mobile home community must file with the department an
application for registration on a form provided by the department and
must pay a registration fee as described in subsection (3) of this
section. The department may require the submission of information
necessary to assist in identifying and locating a manufactured/mobile
home community and other information that may be useful to the state,
which must include, at a minimum:
(a) The names and addresses of the owners of the
manufactured/mobile home community;
(b) The name and address of the manufactured/mobile home community;
(c) The name and address of the landlord and manager of the
manufactured/mobile home community;
(d) The number of lots within the manufactured/mobile home
community that are subject to chapter 59.20 RCW; and
(e) The addresses of each manufactured/mobile home lot within the
manufactured/mobile home community that is subject to chapter 59.20
RCW.
(3) Each manufactured/mobile home community landlord shall pay to
the department:
(a) A one-time master application fee for the first year of
registration and, in subsequent years, an annual master renewal
application fee, as provided in RCW 19.02.075; and
(b) An annual registration assessment of ten dollars for each
manufactured/mobile home that is subject to chapter 59.20 RCW within a
manufactured/mobile home community. Manufactured/mobile home community
landlords may charge a maximum of five dollars of this assessment to
tenants. Nine dollars of the registration assessment for each
manufactured/mobile home shall be deposited into the
manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution program account created in
section 8 of this act to fund the costs associated with the
manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution program. The remaining one
dollar shall be deposited into the master license fund created in RCW
19.02.210. The annual registration assessment must be reviewed once
each biennium by the department and the attorney general and may be
adjusted to reasonably relate to the cost of administering this
chapter. The registration assessment may not exceed ten dollars, but
if the assessment is reduced, the portion allocated to the
manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution program account and the
master license fund shall be adjusted proportionately.
(4) Registrations not filed by the due date are subject to a
delinquency fee of twenty dollars for each day the registration is
late. Registrations not renewed by the expiration date are subject to
the delinquency fees under RCW 19.02.085.
(5) Thirty days after sending late fee notices to a noncomplying
landlord, the department may refer the past due account to a collection
agency. If there is no response from a noncomplying landlord after
sixty days in collections, the department may file an action to enforce
payment of unpaid registration assessments and late fees in the
superior court for Thurston county or in the county in which the
manufactured/mobile home community is located. If the department
prevails, the manufactured/mobile home community landlord shall pay the
department's costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees, for the
enforcement proceedings.
(6) Registration is effective on the date determined by the
department, and the department shall issue a registration number to
each registered manufactured/mobile home community. The department
must provide an expiration date, assigned by the department, to each
manufactured/mobile home community who registers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department must have the capability to
compile, update, and maintain the most accurate database possible of
all the manufactured/mobile home communities in the state, which must
include all of the information collected under section 6 of this act,
except for the addresses of each manufactured/mobile home lot within
the manufactured/mobile home community that is subject to chapter 59.20
RCW, which must be made available to the attorney general and the
department of community, trade, and economic development in a format to
be determined by a collaborative agreement between the department of
licensing and the attorney general.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The manufactured/mobile home dispute
resolution program account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from sources directed to the
manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution program must be deposited
in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
costs associated with administering the manufactured/mobile home
dispute resolution program. Only the attorney general or the attorney
general's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for purposes of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 34.12 RCW
to read as follows:
When requested by the attorney general, the chief administrative
law judge shall assign an administrative law judge to conduct
proceedings under Title 59 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 59 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The attorney general may take the necessary
steps to ensure that this act is implemented on its effective date.

--- END ---