BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that global
competition requires local areas within the state to develop new tools
to enhance their competitiveness and that local and regional economic
development is served through the formation of locally controlled port
districts. The legislature further finds that the state has a history
of forming countywide and less than countywide port districts and that
both countywide and less than countywide port districts have been
successful. Because less than countywide port districts can address
specific local economic development goals and increase local
prosperity, it is the purpose of this act to give the opportunity to
local areas to form less than countywide port districts over the next
four years.

Sec. 2 RCW 53.04.023 and 1997 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A less than countywide port district with an assessed valuation of
at least one hundred fifty million dollars may be created in a county
((that already has a less than countywide port district located within
its boundaries)). Except as provided in this section, such a port
district shall be created in accordance with the procedure to create a
countywide port district.
The effort to create such a port district is initiated by the
filing of a petition with the county auditor calling for the creation
of such a port district, describing the boundaries of the proposed port
district, designating either three or five commissioner positions,
describing commissioner districts if the petitioners propose that the
commissioners represent districts, and providing a name for the
proposed port district. The petition must be signed by voters residing
within the proposed port district equal in number to at least ten
percent of such voters who voted at the last county general election.
A public hearing on creation of the proposed port district shall be
held by the county legislative authority if the county auditor
certifies that the petition contained sufficient valid signatures.
Notice of the public hearing must be published in the county's official
newspaper at least ten days prior to the date of the public hearing.
After taking testimony, the county legislative authority may make
changes in the boundaries of the proposed port district if it finds
that such changes are in the public interest and shall determine if the
creation of the port district is in the public interest. No area may
be added to the boundaries unless a subsequent public hearing is held
on the proposed port district.
The county legislative authority shall submit a ballot proposition
authorizing the creation of the proposed port district to the voters of
the proposed port district, at any special election date provided in
RCW ((29.13.020)) 29A.04.330, if it finds the creation of the port
district to be in the public interest.
The port district shall be created if a majority of the voters
voting on the ballot proposition favor the creation of the port
district. The initial port commissioners shall be elected at the same
election, from districts or at large, as provided in the petition
initiating the creation of the port district. The election shall be
otherwise conducted as provided in RCW 53.12.172, but the election of
commissioners shall be null and void if the port district is not
created.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act expires four years
after the effective date of this act.

--- END ---