BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall establish a
voluntary adult family home certification program through the
University of Washington geriatric education center. In addition to
the minimum qualifications required under RCW 70.128.120, individuals
participating in the voluntary adult family home certification program
shall complete fifty-two hours of class requirements as established by
the department. Subjects covered by the class requirements shall
include: Specific age-related physical or mental health conditions
that can be prevented, postponed, or alleviated by a health promotion
intervention, how to establish health promotion programs in residential
settings and communities, preventing falls, addressing health issues of
aging families, and issues and health concerns of ethnic older adults
and those with developmental disabilities.
(2) Individuals completing the requirements of RCW 70.128.120 and
the voluntary adult family home certification program shall be issued
a certified adult family home license by the department of social and
health services.
(3) The department shall adopt rules implementing the provisions of
this section.

--- END ---