BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.35A.010 and 1985 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) Conserving energy and water in publicly owned buildings will
have a beneficial effect on our overall supply of energy and water;
(2) Conserving energy and water in publicly owned buildings can
result in cost savings for taxpayers; and
(3) Performance-based energy contracts are a means by which
municipalities can achieve energy and water conservation without
capital outlay.
Therefore, the legislature declares that it is the policy that a
municipality may, after a competitive selection process, negotiate a
performance-based energy contract with a firm that offers the best
proposal.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.35A.020 and 2001 c 214 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Energy equipment and services" means energy management systems
and any equipment, materials, or supplies that are expected, upon
installation, to reduce the energy use or energy cost of an existing
building or facility, and the services associated with the equipment,
materials, or supplies, including but not limited to design,
engineering, financing, installation, project management, guarantees,
operations, and maintenance. Reduction in energy use or energy cost
may also include reductions in the use or cost of water, wastewater, or
solid waste.
(2) "Energy management system" has the definition provided in RCW
39.35.030.
(3) "Municipality" has the definition provided in RCW 39.04.010.
(4) "Performance-based contract" means one or more contracts for
water conservation services, solid waste reduction services, or energy
equipment and services between a municipality and any other persons or
entities, if the payment obligation for each year under the contract,
including the year of installation, is either: (a) Set as a percentage
of the annual energy cost savings, water cost savings, or solid waste
cost savings attributable under the contract ((to the energy equipment
and services)); or (b) guaranteed by the other persons or entities to
be less than the annual energy cost savings, water cost savings, or
solid waste cost savings attributable under the contract ((to the
energy equipment and services)). Such guarantee shall be, at the
option of the municipality, a bond or insurance policy, or some other
guarantee determined sufficient by the municipality to provide a level
of assurance similar to the level provided by a bond or insurance
policy.
(5) "Water conservation" means reductions in the use of water or
wastewater.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.35A.030 and 1985 c 169 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each municipality shall publish in advance its requirements to
procure water conservation services, solid waste reduction services, or
energy equipment and services under a performance-based contract. The
announcement shall state concisely the scope and nature of the
equipment and services for which a performance-based contract is
required, and shall encourage firms to submit proposals to meet these
requirements.
(2) The municipality may negotiate a fair and reasonable
performance-based contract with the firm that is identified, based on
the criteria that is established by the municipality, to be the firm
that submits the best proposal.
(3) If the municipality is unable to negotiate a satisfactory
contract with the firm that submits the best proposal, negotiations
with that firm shall be formally terminated and the municipality may
select another firm in accordance with this section and continue
negotiation until a performance-based contract is reached or the
selection process is terminated.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.35C.010 and 2001 c 214 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Cogeneration" means the sequential generation of two or more
forms of energy from a common fuel or energy source. If these forms
are electricity and thermal energy, then the operating and efficiency
standards established by 18 C.F.R. Sec. 292.205 and the definitions
established by 18 C.F.R. Sec. 292.202 (c) through (m) apply.
(2) "Conservation" means reduced energy consumption or energy cost,
or increased efficiency in the use of energy, and activities, measures,
or equipment designed to achieve such results, but does not include
thermal or electric energy production from cogeneration.
"Conservation" also means reductions in the use or cost of water,
wastewater, or solid waste.
(3) "Cost-effective" means that the present value to a state agency
or school district of the energy reasonably expected to be saved or
produced by a facility, activity, measure, or piece of equipment over
its useful life, including any compensation received from a utility or
the Bonneville power administration, is greater than the net present
value of the costs of implementing, maintaining, and operating such
facility, activity, measure, or piece of equipment over its useful
life, when discounted at the cost of public borrowing.
(4) "Energy" means energy as defined in RCW 43.21F.025(1).
(5) "Energy audit" has the definition provided in RCW 43.19.670,
and may include a determination of the water or solid waste consumption
characteristics of a facility.
(6) "Energy efficiency project" means a conservation or
cogeneration project.
(7) "Energy efficiency services" means assistance furnished by the
department to state agencies and school districts in identifying,
evaluating, and implementing energy efficiency projects.
(8) "Department" means the state department of general
administration.
(9) "Performance-based contracting" means contracts for which
payment is conditional on achieving contractually specified energy
savings.
(10) "Public agency" means every state office, officer, board,
commission, committee, bureau, department, and all political
subdivisions of the state.
(11) "Public facility" means a building or structure, or a group of
buildings or structures at a single site, owned by a state agency or
school district.
(12) "State agency" means every state office or department, whether
elective or appointive, state institutions of higher education, and all
boards, commissions, or divisions of state government, however
designated.
(13) "State facility" means a building or structure, or a group of
buildings or structures at a single site, owned by a state agency.
(14) "Utility" means privately or publicly owned electric and gas
utilities, electric cooperatives and mutuals, whether located within or
without Washington state.
(15) "Local utility" means the utility or utilities in whose
service territory a public facility is located.

--- END ---