BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 62A.3-515 and 2000 c 215 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(a) If a check as defined in RCW 62A.3-104 is dishonored by
nonacceptance or nonpayment, the payee or person entitled to enforce
the check under RCW 62A.3-301 may collect a reasonable handling fee for
each instrument. If the check is not paid within fifteen days and
after the person entitled to enforce the check or the person's agent
sends a notice of dishonor as provided by RCW 62A.3-520 to the drawer
at the drawer's last known address, and if the instrument does not
provide for the payment of interest or collection costs and attorneys'
fees, the drawer of the instrument is liable for payment of interest at
the rate of twelve percent per annum from the date of dishonor, and
cost of collection not to exceed forty dollars or the face amount of
the check, whichever is less, payable to the person entitled to enforce
the check. In addition, in the event of court action on the check, the
court, after notice and the expiration of the fifteen days, shall award
reasonable attorneys' fees, and three times the face amount of the
check or three hundred dollars, whichever is less, as part of the
damages payable to the person enforcing the check. This section does
not apply to an instrument that is dishonored by reason of a
justifiable stop payment order.
(b)(1) Subsequent to the commencement of an action on the check
(subsection (a)) but prior to the hearing, the defendant may tender to
the plaintiff as satisfaction of the claim, an amount of money equal to
the face amount of the check, a reasonable handling fee, accrued
interest, collection costs equal to the face amount of the check not to
exceed forty dollars, and the incurred court costs, service costs, and
statutory attorneys' fees.
(2) If a plaintiff does not accept the amount tendered and the
plaintiff fails to recover at the court hearing more than the amount
tendered, then the plaintiff shall not be awarded the lesser of three
times the face amount of the check or three hundred dollars, nor
reasonable attorneys' fees.
(c) In any action where statutory attorneys' fees are tendered by
the defendant or awarded by the court, there need be only one statutory
fee tendered and there shall be only one statutory attorneys' fee
awarded regardless of the number of dishonored checks included in the
action.
(d) Nothing in this section precludes the right to commence action
in a court under chapter 12.40 RCW for small claims.

Sec. 2 RCW 62A.3-530 and 2005 c 277 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a check as defined in RCW 62A.3-104 is dishonored by
nonacceptance or nonpayment and the check is assigned or written to a
collection agency as defined in RCW 19.16.100, the collection agency
may collect a reasonable handling fee for each instrument. If the
collection agency or its agent provides a notice of dishonor in the
form provided in RCW 62A.3-540 to the drawer and the check amount plus
the reasonable handling fee are not paid within thirty-three days after
providing the notice of dishonor, then, unless the instrument otherwise
provides, the drawer of the instrument is liable for payment of
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum from the date of
dishonor, and a cost of collection of forty dollars or the face amount
of the check, whichever is less, payable to the collection agency. In
addition, in the event of court action on the check and after notice
and the expiration of the thirty-three days, the court shall award
reasonable attorneys' fees, and three times the face amount of the
check or three hundred dollars, whichever is less, as part of the
damages payable to the collection agency. This section does not apply
to an instrument that is dishonored by reason of a justifiable stop
payment order.
(2)(a) Subsequent to the commencement of an action on the check
under subsection (1) of this section but prior to the hearing, the
defendant may tender to the plaintiff as satisfaction of the claim, an
amount of money equal to the face amount of the check, a reasonable
handling fee, accrued interest, collection costs equal to the face
amount of the check not to exceed forty dollars, and the incurred court
costs, service costs, and statutory attorneys' fees.
(b) If a plaintiff does not accept the amount tendered and the
plaintiff fails to recover at the court hearing more than the amount
tendered, then the plaintiff shall not be awarded the lesser of three
times the face amount of the check or three hundred dollars, nor
reasonable attorneys' fees.
(3) In any action where statutory attorneys' fees are tendered by
the defendant or awarded by the court, there need be only one statutory
fee tendered and there shall be only one statutory attorneys' fee
awarded regardless of the number of dishonored checks included in the
action.
(4) Nothing in this section precludes the right to commence action
in a court under chapter 12.40 RCW for small claims.

--- END ---