BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.68.110 and 2005 c 314 s 106 and 2005 c 89 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Funds credited to the incorporated cities and towns of the state as
set forth in RCW 46.68.090 shall be subject to deduction and
distribution as follows:
(1) One and one-half percent of such sums distributed under RCW
46.68.090 shall be deducted monthly as such sums are credited and set
aside for the use of the department of transportation for the
supervision of work and expenditures of such incorporated cities and
towns on the city and town streets thereof, including the supervision
and administration of federal-aid programs for which the department of
transportation has responsibility: PROVIDED, That any moneys so
retained and not expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium
to the incorporated cities and towns in proportion to deductions herein
made;
(2) Thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent of such funds
distributed under RCW 46.68.090 shall be deducted monthly, as such
funds accrue, and set aside for the use of the department of
transportation for the purpose of funding the cities' share of the
costs of highway jurisdiction studies and other studies. Any funds so
retained and not expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium
to the cities in proportion to the deductions made;
(3) One percent of such funds distributed under RCW 46.68.090 shall
be deducted monthly, as such funds accrue, to be deposited in the
((urban arterial trust)) small city pavement and sidewalk account, to
implement the city hardship assistance program, as provided in RCW
47.26.164. However, any moneys so retained and not required to carry
out the program under this subsection as of July 1st of each odd-numbered year thereafter, shall be ((provided within sixty days to the
treasurer and distributed in the manner prescribed in subsection (4) of
this section;
(4) After making the deductions under subsections (1) through (3)
of this section and RCW 35.76.050, the balance remaining to the credit
of incorporated cities and towns after such deduction shall be
apportioned monthly as such funds accrue among the several cities and
towns within the state ratably on the basis of the population last
determined by the office of financial management)) retained in the
account and used for maintenance, repair, and resurfacing of city and
town streets for cities and towns with a population of less than five
thousand.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.26.080 and 1999 c 94 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created in the motor vehicle fund the urban
arterial trust account. The intent of the urban arterial trust account
program is to improve the arterial street system of the state by
improving mobility and safety while supporting an environment essential
to the quality of life of the citizens of the state of Washington. The
((city hardship assistance program, as provided in RCW 47.26.164, and
the)) small city program, as provided for in RCW 47.26.115, ((are)) is
implemented within the urban arterial trust account.
The board shall not allocate funds, nor make payments of the funds
under RCW 47.26.260, to any county, city, or town identified by the
governor under RCW 36.70A.340.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.26.164 and 1999 c 94 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall adopt reasonable rules necessary to implement the
city hardship assistance program as recommended by the road
jurisdiction study.
The following criteria shall be used to implement the program:
(1) ((Only those)) Cities with a population of twenty thousand or
less and a net gain in cost responsibility due to jurisdictional
transfers in chapter 342, Laws of 1991, ((as determined by the board,
may participate)) and thereafter under RCW 47.26.167, are eligible to
receive money from the small city pavement and sidewalk account created
in RCW 47.26.340;
(2) ((Cities with populations of fifteen thousand or less, as
determined by the office of financial management, may participate;
(3))) The board shall develop criteria and procedures under which
eligible cities may ((request)) receive funding for rehabilitation
projects on transferred city streets ((acquired under chapter 342, Laws
of 1991)); and
(((4) The board shall also be authorized to allocate funds from the
city hardship assistance program to cities with a population under
twenty thousand to offset extraordinary costs associated with the
transfer of roadways other than pursuant to chapter 342, Laws of 1991,
that occur after January 1, 1991.))
(3) The amount spent for the city hardship assistance program shall
not exceed the amount deposited under RCW 46.68.110(3).

Sec. 4 RCW 47.26.340 and 2005 c 83 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The small city pavement and sidewalk account is created in the
state treasury. All state money allocated to the small city pavement
and sidewalk account for the ongoing support of cities and towns must
be deposited into the account. Money in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used for
small city pavement and sidewalk projects or improvements selected by
the board in accordance with RCW 47.26.164 or 47.26.345, to pay
principal and interest on bonds authorized for these projects or
improvements, to make grants or loans in accordance with this chapter,
or to pay for engineering feasibility studies selected by the board.

--- END ---