BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits in this section, a credit is authorized
against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for persons that
employ one or more students enrolled in a qualified technical program
at an institution of higher education.
(2) To qualify for the credit, the following additional conditions
must be met:
(a) The student employee must be a junior, senior, or graduate
student, in the qualified technical program.
(b) The qualified technical program must be a program that provides
academic training that relates to the person's business employment
needs.
(c) The student employee must be receiving educational credit by
the institution of higher education for the employment.
(3) The amount of authorized tax credit for persons receiving
credit under this section must be equal to one hundred percent of the
gross wages paid to the student employee.
(4) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section, including enrollment documentation that clearly
indicates that the student is enrolled as a junior, senior, or graduate
student in a qualified technical program at an institution of higher
education and is receiving educational credit by the institution for
the employment.
(5) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been used is immediately due. The department shall
assess interest, but not penalties, on the credited taxes for which the
person is not eligible. The interest must be assessed at the rate
provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, must be
assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken, and must
accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.
(6) The credit under this section may be used against any tax due
under this chapter, and credit earned during one calendar year may be
carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent
calendar year. No refunds may be granted for credits under this
section that are in excess of taxes due and payable for the reporting
period. A person shall not take credit under this section in excess of
one thousand dollars per qualifying student during any calendar year.
A credit is not earned for the purposes of the carry-over provisions of
this subsection for wages that would otherwise qualify for the credit,
but exceed this one thousand dollar limitation.
(7) A person taking credit under this section shall not take credit
under section 2 of this act.
(8) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Institution of higher education" means the state universities,
the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, community
colleges, technical colleges, and private postsecondary institutions
located in the state of Washington, that provide undergraduate or
graduate programs of study.
(b) "Qualified technical program" means a program of study that
will provide the student employee with an undergraduate or graduate
degree in mathematics, science, health science, engineering, or
computer technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A credit is authorized against the tax otherwise due under this
chapter for persons that employ one or more students enrolled in a
qualified technical program at an institution of higher education.
(2) The provisions for the credit authorized in section 1 of this
act apply to this section.
(3) A person taking credit under this section may not take credit
under section 1 of this act.

--- END ---