BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 83.100.020 and 2005 c 516 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Decedent" means a deceased individual;
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue, the director of
that department, or any employee of the department exercising authority
lawfully delegated to him by the director;
(3) "Federal return" means any tax return required by chapter 11 of
the Internal Revenue Code;
(4) "Federal tax" means a tax under chapter 11 of the Internal
Revenue Code;
(5) "Gross estate" means "gross estate" as defined and used in
section 2031 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(6) "Person" means any individual, estate, trust, receiver,
cooperative association, club, corporation, company, firm, partnership,
joint venture, syndicate, or other entity and, to the extent permitted
by law, any federal, state, or other governmental unit or subdivision
or agency, department, or instrumentality thereof;
(7) "Person required to file the federal return" means any person
required to file a return required by chapter 11 of the Internal
Revenue Code, such as the personal representative of an estate;
(8) "Property" means property included in the gross estate;
(9) "Resident" means a decedent who was domiciled in Washington at
time of death;
(10) "Taxpayer" means a person upon whom tax is imposed under this
chapter, including an estate or a person liable for tax under RCW
83.100.120;
(11) "Transfer" means "transfer" as used in section 2001 of the
Internal Revenue Code. However, "transfer" does not include a
qualified heir disposing of an interest in property qualifying for a
deduction under RCW 83.100.046 or ceasing to use the property for
farming purposes;
(12) "Internal Revenue Code" means, for the purposes of this
chapter and RCW ((83.110.010)) 83.110A.010, the United States internal
revenue code of 1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2005;
(13) "Washington taxable estate" means the federal taxable estate,
less: (a) One million five hundred thousand dollars for decedents
dying before January 1, 2006; and (b) two million dollars for decedents
dying on or after January 1, 2006; and (c) the amount of any deduction
allowed under RCW 83.100.046. The amounts referenced in (a) and (b) of
this subsection must be increased by the growth factor for decedents
dying on or after January 1, 2008, and subsequently increased by the
growth factor each January 1st thereafter; ((and))
(14) "Federal taxable estate" means the taxable estate as
determined under chapter 11 of the internal revenue code without regard
to: (a) The termination of the federal estate tax under section 2210
of the Internal Revenue Code or any other provision of law, and (b) the
deduction for state estate, inheritance, legacy, or succession taxes
allowable under section 2058 of the internal revenue code; and
(15) "Growth factor" means the previous fiscal year's average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the growth factor.

Sec. 2 RCW 83.100.050 and 2005 c 516 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A Washington return must be filed if: (a) A federal return is
required to be filed; or (b) for decedents dying prior to January 1,
2006, the gross estate exceeds one million five hundred thousand
dollars; or (c) for decedents dying on or after January 1, 2006, the
gross estate exceeds two million dollars. The amounts referenced in
(b) and (c) of this subsection shall be increased by the growth factor
for decedents dying on or after January 1, 2008, and subsequently
increased by the growth factor each January 1st thereafter.
(2)(a) A person required to file a federal return shall file with
the department on or before the date the federal return is required to
be filed, including any extension of time for filing under subsection
(4) of this section, a Washington return for the tax due under this
chapter.
(b) If no federal return is required to be filed, a taxpayer shall
file with the department on or before the date a federal return would
have been required to be filed, including any extension of time for
filing under subsection (5) of this section, a Washington return for
the tax due under this chapter.
(3) A Washington return delivered to the department by United
States mail shall be considered to have been received by the department
on the date of the United States postmark stamped on the cover in which
the return is mailed, if the postmark date is within the time allowed
for filing the Washington return, including extensions.
(4) In addition to the Washington return required to be filed in
subsection (2) of this section, a person, if required to file a federal
return, shall file with the department on or before the date the
federal return((,)) is required to be filed a copy of the federal
return along with all supporting documentation. If the person required
to file the federal return has obtained an extension of time for filing
the federal return, the person shall file the Washington return within
the same time period and in the same manner as provided for the federal
return. A copy of the federal extension shall be filed with the
department on or before the date the Washington return is due, not
including any extension of time for filing, or within thirty days of
issuance, whichever is later.
(5) A person who is required to file a Washington return under
subsection (2) of this section, but is not required to file a federal
return, may obtain an extension of time for filing the Washington
return as provided by rule of the department.

--- END ---