BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.128.225 and 2002 c 223 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In an effort to ensure a cooperative process among the
department, adult family home provider representatives, and resident
and family representatives on matters pertaining to the adult family
home program, the secretary, or his or her designee, shall designate an
advisory committee. The advisory committee must include:
Representatives from the industry including four adult family home
providers, at least two of whom are affiliated with recognized adult
family home associations; one representative from the state long-term
care ombudsman program; one representative from the statewide resident
council program; one representative from a general authority Washington
law enforcement agency as defined in RCW 10.93.020; and two
representatives of families and other consumers. The secretary shall
appoint a chairperson for the committee from the committee membership
for a term of one year. In appointing the chairperson, the secretary
shall consult with members of the committee. Depending on the topic to
be discussed, the department may invite other representatives in
addition to the named members of the advisory committee. The
secretary, or his or her designee, shall periodically, but not less
than quarterly, convene a meeting of the advisory committee to
encourage open dialogue on matters affecting the adult family home
program. It is, minimally, expected that the department will discuss
with the advisory committee the department's inspection, enforcement,
and quality improvement activities, in addition to seeking their
comments and recommendations on matters described under subsection (2)
of this section.
(2) The secretary, or his or her designee, shall seek comments and
recommendations from the advisory committee prior to the adoption of
rules and standards, implementation of adult family home provider
programs, or development of methods and rates of payment.
(3) Establishment of the advisory committee shall not prohibit the
department of social and health services from utilizing other advisory
activities that the department of social and health services deems
necessary for program development.
(4) Members of the advisory committee shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 from license
fees collected under chapter 70.128 RCW.

--- END ---