BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.28.020 and 2005 c 108 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Where a worker is entitled to compensation under this title
he or she shall file with the department or his or her self-insured
employer, as the case may be, his or her application for such, together
with the certificate of the physician who attended him or her. An
application form developed by the department shall include a notice
specifying the worker's right to receive health services from a
physician of the worker's choice under RCW 51.36.010, including
chiropractic services under RCW 51.36.015, and listing the types of
providers authorized to provide these services.
(b) The physician who attended the injured worker shall inform the
injured worker of his or her rights under this title and lend all
necessary assistance in making this application for compensation and
such proof of other matters as required by the rules of the department
without charge to the worker. The department shall provide physicians
with a manual which outlines the procedures to be followed in
applications for compensation involving occupational diseases, and
which describes claimants' rights and responsibilities related to
occupational disease claims.
(2) If the application required by this section is:
(a) Filed on behalf of the worker by the physician who attended the
worker, the physician may transmit the application to the department
electronically using facsimile mail;
(b) Made to the department and the employer has not received a copy
of the application, the department shall immediately send a copy of the
application to the employer; or
(c) Made to a self-insured employer, the employer shall forthwith
send a copy of the application to the department.
(3) When the application required by this section is filed on
behalf of the worker by the health services provider who attended the
worker, the worker shall provide written notice of the claim to his or
her employer within ten days after the date the worker received medical
treatment. The department shall develop forms to assist the worker in
expediently notifying his or her employer of a claim.

--- END ---