BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in this section, a credit is allowed
against the tax imposed under this chapter for contributions made by a
person to the state treasurer for deposit in the economic development
strategic reserve account created in RCW 43.330.250.
(2) The person must make the contribution before claiming a credit
authorized under this section. Credits earned under this section may
be claimed against taxes due for the calendar year in which the
contribution is made. The amount of credit claimed for a reporting
period shall not exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
that reporting period. No person may claim more than two hundred fifty
dollars of credit in any calendar year, including credit carried over
from a previous calendar year. No refunds may be granted for any
unused credits.
(3) Any amount of tax credit otherwise allowable under this section
not claimed by the person in any calendar year may be carried over and
claimed against the person's tax liability for the next succeeding
calendar year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding
calendar year may be carried forward and claimed against the person's
tax liability for the second succeeding calendar year; and any credit
not used in that second succeeding calendar year may be carried over
and claimed against the person's tax liability for the third succeeding
calendar year, but may not be carried over for any calendar year
thereafter.
(4) Credits are available on a first in-time basis. The department
shall disallow any credits, or portions thereof, that would cause the
total amount of credits claimed under this section during any calendar
year to exceed two million dollars. If this limitation is reached, the
department shall notify any person who has claimed tax credits in
excess of the two million dollar limitation in this subsection. The
notice shall indicate the amount of tax due and shall provide that the
tax be paid within thirty days from the date of such notice. The
department shall not assess penalties and interest as provided in
chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount due in the initial notice, if the
amount due is paid by the due date specified in the notice, or any
extension thereof.
(5) To claim a credit under this section, a person must
electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and any
other information required by the department, in an electronic format
as provided or approved by the department. Any return, form, or
information required to be filed in an electronic format under this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format. As used in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(6) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section.
(7) The state treasurer and any person making contributions under
the provisions of this section shall provide to the department, upon
request, such information needed to verify eligibility for credit under
this section, including information regarding contributions received by
the treasurer for deposit into the economic development strategic
reserve account.
(8) The department shall not allow any credit under this section
before July 1, 2007.
(9) No credit may be earned for contributions made on or after July
1, 2017.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.330.250 and 2005 c 427 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The economic development strategic reserve account is created
in the state treasury to be used only for the purposes of this section.
(2) Only the governor, with the recommendation of the director of
the department of community, trade, and economic development and the
economic development commission, may authorize expenditures from the
account.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall be made in an amount
sufficient to fund ((a minimum of one)) the executive director and such
other staff positions for the economic development commission, as the
commission determines are necessary, and to cover any other operational
costs of the commission.
(4) Expenditures from the account may be made to prevent closure of
a business or facility, to prevent relocation of a business or facility
in the state to a location outside the state, or to recruit a business
or facility to the state. Expenditures may be authorized for:
(a) Workforce development;
(b) Public infrastructure needed to support or sustain the
operations of the business or facility; and
(c) Other lawfully provided assistance((,)) including, but not
limited to, technical assistance, environmental analysis, relocation
assistance, and planning assistance. Funding may be provided for such
assistance only when it is in the public interest and may only be
provided under a contractual arrangement ensuring that the state will
receive appropriate consideration, such as an assurance of job creation
or retention.
(5) The funds shall not be expended from the account unless:
(a) The circumstances are such that time does not permit the
director of the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the business or facility to secure funding from other
state sources;
(b) The business or facility produces or will produce significant
long-term economic benefits to the state, a region of the state, or a
particular community in the state;
(c) The business or facility does not require continuing state
support;
(d) The expenditure will result in new jobs, job retention, or
higher incomes for citizens of the state;
(e) The expenditure will not supplant private investment; and
(f) The expenditure is accompanied by private investment.
(6) No more than three million dollars per year may be expended
from the account for the purpose of assisting an individual business or
facility pursuant to the authority specified in this section.
(7) If the account balance in the strategic reserve account exceeds
((fifteen)) twenty million dollars at any time, the amount in excess of
((fifteen)) twenty million dollars shall be transferred to the
education construction account.

--- END ---