BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that
increasing academic success and increasing graduation rates be dual
goals for the K-12 system. The legislature finds that only seventy-four percent of the class of 2005 graduated on time. Students of
color, students living in poverty, students in foster care, students in
the juvenile justice system, students who are homeless, students for
whom English is not their primary language, and students with
disabilities have lower graduation rates than the average. The
legislature further finds that students who drop out experience more
frequent occurrences of early pregnancy, delinquency, substance abuse,
and mental health issues, and have greater need of publicly funded
health and social services. The legislature further finds that helping
all students be successful in school requires active participation in
coordinating services from schools, parents, and other stakeholders and
agencies in the local community. The legislature finds that existing
resources to vulnerable youth are used more efficiently and effectively
when there is significant coordination across local and state entities.
The legislature further finds that efficiency and accountability of the
K-12 system would be improved by creating a dropout prevention and
intervention grant program that implements research-based and emerging
best practices and evaluates results.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Subject to the availability of funds
appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall create a grant program to local partnerships
of schools, families, and communities to begin the phase in of a
statewide comprehensive dropout prevention, intervention, and retrieval
system. This program shall be known as the building bridges program.
For purposes of sections 2 through 7 of this act, a "building bridges
program" means a local partnership of schools, families, and
communities that provides all of the following programs or activities:
(1) A system that identifies individual students at risk of
dropping out from middle through high school based on local predictive
data, including state assessment data starting in the fourth grade, and
provides timely interventions for such students and for dropouts,
including a plan for educational success as already required by the
student learning plan as defined under RCW 28A.655.061. Students
identified shall include students in special education, foster care
youth, and youth involved in the juvenile justice system;
(2) Coaches or mentors for students as necessary;
(3) Staff responsible for coordination of community partners that
provide a seamless continuum of academic and nonacademic support in
schools and communities;
(4) Retrieval or reentry activities; and
(5) Alternative educational programming, including, but not limited
to, career and technical education preparatory programs and online
learning opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall:
(1) Identify criteria for grants and evaluate proposals for funding
in consultation with the workforce training and education coordinating
board;
(2) Develop and monitor requirements for grant recipients to:
(a) Identify eligible students, including students who both fail
the Washington assessment of student learning and drop out of school;
(b) Identify their own strengths and gaps in services provided to
youth;
(c) Set their own local goals for program outcomes;
(d) Use research-based and emerging best practices that lead to
positive outcomes in implementing the building bridges program; and
(e) Coordinate an outreach campaign to bring public and private
organizations together and to provide information about the building
bridges program to the local community;
(3) In setting the requirements under subsection (2) of this
section, encourage creativity and provide for flexibility in
implementing the local building bridges program;
(4) Identify and disseminate successful practices;
(5) Develop requirements for grant recipients to collect and report
data, including, but not limited to:
(a) The number of and demographics of students served including,
but not limited to, information regarding a student's race and
ethnicity, a student's household income, a student's housing status,
whether a student is a foster or youth involved in the juvenile justice
system, whether a student is disabled, and the primary language spoken
at a student's home;
(b) Washington assessment of student learning scores;
(c) Dropout rates;
(d) On-time graduation rates;
(e) Extended graduation rates;
(f) Credentials obtained;
(g) Absenteeism rates;
(h) Truancy rates; and
(i) Credit retrieval;
(6) Contract with a third party to evaluate the infrastructure and
implementation of the partnership including the leveraging of outside
resources that relate to the goal of the partnership; and
(7) Report to the legislature by December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In awarding the grants under section 3 of
this act, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
prioritize schools or districts with dropout rates and truancy rates
above the statewide average and shall attempt to award building bridges
program grants to different geographic regions of the state. Eligible
recipients shall be one of the following entities acting as a lead
agency for the local partnership: A school district, a tribal school,
an area workforce development council, an educational service district,
an accredited institution of higher education, a vocational skills
center, a federally recognized tribe, a community organization, or a
nonprofit 501(c)(3) corporation. If the recipient is not a school
district, at least one school district must be identified within the
partnership.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 To be eligible for a grant under section 3
of this act, grant applicants shall:
(1) Build or demonstrate a commitment to building a broad-based
partnership of schools, families, and community members to provide an
effective and efficient building bridges program. The partnership
shall consider an effective model for school-community partnerships and
include local membership from, but not limited to, school districts,
tribal schools, secondary career and technical education programs,
skill centers that serve the local community, an educational service
district, the area workforce development council, accredited
institutions of higher education, tribes or other cultural
organizations, the parent teacher association, the juvenile court,
prosecutors and defenders, the local health department, health care
agencies, public transportation agencies, local division
representatives of the department of social and health services,
businesses, city or county government agencies, civic organizations,
and appropriate youth-serving community-based organizations.
Interested parents and students shall be actively included whenever
possible;
(2) Demonstrate how the grant will enhance any dropout prevention
and intervention programs and services already in place in the
district;
(3) Provide a twenty-five percent match that may include in-kind
resources from within the partnership;
(4) Track and report data required by the grant; and
(5) Describe how the dropout prevention, intervention, and
retrieval system will be sustained after initial funding, including
roles of each of the partners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Educational service districts, in
collaboration with area workforce development councils, shall:
(1) Provide training to local partnerships established under a
grant awarded under section 3 of this act on subjects such as cultural
competency, identifying diverse learning styles, and collecting and
using performance data;
(2) Assist school districts and their partners in identifying
effective intervention strategies for students at risk for dropping
out; and
(3) Provide training to assist in the design of functional
sustainability plans including the identification of potential funding
sources for future operation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall establish a state-level work group that
includes K-12 and state agencies that work with youth who have dropped
out or are at risk of dropping out of school. The state-level
leadership group shall consist of one representative from each of the
following agencies and organizations: The workforce training and
education coordinating board; career and technical education including
skill centers; relevant divisions of the department of social and
health services; the juvenile courts; the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys; the Washington state office of public defense;
the employment security department; accredited institutions of higher
education; the educational service districts; the area workforce
development councils; parent and educator associations; associations
representing students in special education; the department of health;
local school districts; community organizations serving youth;
federally recognized tribes and urban tribal centers; and the minority
commissions.
(2) To assist and enhance the work of the building bridges programs
established in section 5 of this act, the state-level work group shall:
(a) Identify and make recommendations to the legislature for the
reduction of fiscal, legal, and regulatory barriers that prevent
coordination of program resources across agencies at the state and
local level;
(b) Develop and track performance measures and benchmarks for each
partner agency or organization across the state; and
(c) Identify research-based and emerging best practices regarding
prevention, intervention, and retrieval programs.
(3) The work group shall report to the legislature and the governor
on an annual basis beginning December 1, 2007, with recommendations for
implementing emerging best practices, needed additional resources, and
eliminating barriers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2 through 7 of this act are each
added to chapter 28A.175 RCW.

--- END ---