BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.450 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 24 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may submit an authorizing
proposition to the county voters at a primary or general election and,
if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which
the proposed sales and use tax will be used. Funds raised under this
tax shall not supplant existing funds used for these purposes. For
purposes of this subsection, existing funds means the actual operating
expenditures for the calendar year in which the ballot measure is
approved by voters. Actual operating expenditures excludes lost
federal funds, lost or expired state grants or loans, extraordinary
events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions beyond the
control of the county or city receiving the services, and major
nonrecurring capital expenditures. The rate of tax under this section
shall not exceed three-tenths of one percent of the selling price in
the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of
a use tax.
(2) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county.
(3) The retail sale or use of motor vehicles, and the lease of
motor vehicles for up to the first thirty-six months of the lease, are
exempt from tax imposed under this section.
(4) One-third of all money received under this section shall be
used solely for criminal justice purposes. For the purposes of this
subsection, "criminal justice purposes" means additional police
protection, mitigation of congested court systems, or relief of
overcrowded jails or other local correctional facilities.
(5) Money received under this section shall be shared between the
county and the cities as follows: Sixty percent shall be retained by
the county and forty percent shall be distributed on a per capita basis
to cities in the county.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.55.050 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 24 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to any otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate
limitations, regular property taxes may be levied by or for a taxing
district in an amount exceeding the limitations provided for in this
chapter if such levy is authorized by a proposition approved by a
majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition
at a general election held within the district or at a special election
within the taxing district called by the district for the purpose of
submitting such proposition to the voters. Any election held pursuant
to this section shall be held not more than twelve months prior to the
date on which the proposed levy is to be made, except as provided in
subsection (((3)(b))) (2) of this section. The ballot of the
proposition shall state the dollar rate proposed and shall clearly
state ((any)) the conditions, if any, which are applicable under
subsection (((3))) (4) of this section.
(2) Subject to statutory dollar limitations, a proposition placed
before the voters under this section may authorize annual increases in
levies for multiple consecutive years, up to six consecutive years,
during which period each year's authorized maximum legal levy shall be
used as the base upon which an increased levy limit for the succeeding
year is computed, but the ballot proposition must state the dollar rate
proposed only for the first year of the consecutive years and must
state the limit factor, or a specified index to be used for determining
a limit factor, such as the consumer price index, which need not be the
same for all years, by which the regular tax levy for the district may
be increased in each of the subsequent consecutive years. Elections
for this purpose must be held at a primary or general election. The
title of each ballot measure must state the specific purposes for which
the proposed annual increases during the specified period of up to six
consecutive years shall be used, and funds raised under the levy shall
not supplant existing funds used for these purposes. For purposes of
this subsection, existing funds means the actual operating expenditures
for the calendar year in which the ballot measure is approved by
voters. Actual operating expenditures excludes lost federal funds,
lost or expired state grants or loans, extraordinary events not likely
to reoccur, changes in contract provisions beyond the control of the
taxing district receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital
expenditures.
(3) After a levy authorized pursuant to this section is made, the
dollar amount of such levy shall be used for the purpose of computing
the limitations for subsequent levies provided for in this chapter,
except as provided in subsection((s (3) and (4))) (5) of this section.
(((3))) (4) If expressly stated, a proposition placed before the
voters under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may:
(a) Limit the period for which the increased levy is to be made;
(b) ((Subject to statutory dollar limitations in RCW 84.52.043,
authorize annual increases in levies for any county, city, or town for
multiple consecutive years, up to six consecutive years, during which
period each year's authorized maximum legal levy shall be used as the
base upon which an increased levy limit for the succeeding year is
computed, but the ballot proposition must state the dollar rate
proposed only for the first year of the consecutive years and must
state the limit factor, or a specified index to be used for determining
a limit factor, such as the consumer price index, which need not be the
same for all years, by which the regular tax levy for the district may
be increased in each of the subsequent consecutive years. Elections
for this purpose must be held at a primary or general election. The
title of each ballot measure must state the specific purposes for which
the proposed levy increase shall be used, and funds raised under this
levy shall not supplant existing funds used for these purposes;
(c))) Limit the purpose for which the increased levy is to be made,
but if the limited purpose includes making redemption payments on
bonds, the period for which the increased levies are made shall not
exceed nine years;
(((d))) (c) Set the levy at a rate less than the maximum rate
allowed for the district; or
(((e) Provide that the maximum allowable dollar amount of the final
annual levy of the period specified in the measure shall be used to
compute the limitations provided for in this chapter on levy increases
occurring after the expiration of the period; or
(f))) (d) Include any combination of the conditions in this
subsection.
(((4))) (5) Except as otherwise provided in an approved ballot
measure under this section, after the expiration of a limited period
under subsection (4)(a) of this section or the satisfaction of a
limited purpose under subsection (4)(b) of this section, whichever
comes first, subsequent levies shall be computed as if:
(a) The limited proposition under subsection (((3))) (4) of this
section had not been approved; and
(b) The taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which
would otherwise have been allowed under this chapter during the years
levies were made under the limited proposition.

--- END ---