BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.010 and 2004 c 236 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) All property belonging exclusively to the United States,
the state, or any county or municipal corporation; all property
belonging exclusively to any federally recognized Indian tribe located
in the state((, if that property is used exclusively for essential
government services)); all state route number 16 corridor
transportation systems and facilities constructed under chapter 47.46
RCW; and all property under a financing contract pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW or recorded agreement granting immediate possession and use
to the public bodies listed in this section or under an order of
immediate possession and use pursuant to RCW 8.04.090; is exempt from
taxation. All property belonging exclusively to a foreign national
government is exempt from taxation if that property is used exclusively
as an office or residence for a consul or other official representative
of the foreign national government, and if the consul or other official
representative is a citizen of that foreign nation.
(((2) For the purposes of this section, "essential government
services" means services such as tribal administration, public
facilities, fire, police, public health, education, sewer, water,
environmental and land use, transportation, and utility services.))

--- END ---