BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that education is the
single most effective investment that can be made in children, the
state, the economy, and the future. A well-educated citizenry is
essential both for the preservation of democracy and for enhancing the
state's ability to compete in the knowledge-based global economy.
As recommended by Washington learns, the legislature declares that
the overarching goal for education in the state is to have a world-class, learner-focused, seamless education system that educates more
Washingtonians to the highest levels of educational attainment.

EARLY LEARNINGPART 1
STATE AND LOCAL PARTNERSHIPS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 43.215
RCW to read as follows:
EARLY LEARNING ADVISORY COUNCIL. (1) The early learning advisory
council is established to advise the department on statewide early
learning community needs and progress.
(2) The council shall work in conjunction with the department to
develop a statewide early learning plan that crosses systems and
sectors to promote alignment of private and public sector actions,
objectives, and resources, and to ensure school readiness.
(3) The council shall include diverse, statewide representation
from public, nonprofit, and for-profit entities. Its membership shall
reflect regional, racial, and cultural diversity to adequately
represent the needs of all children and families in the state.
(4) Council members shall serve two-year terms. However, to
stagger the terms of the council, the initial appointments for twelve
of the members shall be for one year. Once the initial one-year to
two-year terms expire, all subsequent terms shall be for two years,
with the terms expiring on June 30th of the applicable year. The terms
shall be staggered in such a way that, where possible, the terms of
members representing a specific group do not expire simultaneously.
(5) The council shall consist of not more than twenty-five members,
as follows:
(a) The governor shall appoint at least one representative from
each of the following: The department, the office of financial
management, the department of social and health services, the
department of health, the higher education coordinating board, and the
state board for community and technical colleges;
(b) One representative from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, to be appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction;
(c) At least six leaders in early childhood education, to be
appointed by the governor;
(d) Two members of the house of representatives and two members of
the senate, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives and the president of the senate, respectively;
(e) Two parents, one of whom serves on the department's parent
advisory council, to be appointed by the governor;
(f) Two representatives of the private-public partnership created
in RCW 43.215.070, to be appointed by the partnership board; and
(g) The executive director of the governor's office of Indian
affairs.
(6) The council shall be cochaired by one representative of a state
agency and one nongovernmental member, to be elected by the council for
two-year terms;
(7) Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.240 and reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in
carrying out the duties of the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.
(8) The department shall provide staff support to the council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 43.215
RCW to read as follows:
FIVE-STAR VOLUNTARY RATING SYSTEM. Subject to the availability of
amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department, in
collaboration with community and statewide partners, shall implement a
five-star voluntary rating system applicable to licensed or certified
child care centers and homes and early education programs. The purpose
of the rating system is to give parents better information about the
quality of child care and early education programs, and to increase the
quality of early learning programs throughout the state. Nothing in
this section changes the department's responsibility to collectively
bargain over mandatory subjects.

Sec. 103 RCW 43.215.020 and 2006 c 265 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of early learning is created as an executive
branch agency. The department is vested with all powers and duties
transferred to it under this chapter and such other powers and duties
as may be authorized by law.
(2) The primary duties of the department are to implement state
early learning policy and to coordinate, consolidate, and integrate
child care and early learning programs in order to administer programs
and funding as efficiently as possible. The department's duties
include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To support both public and private sectors toward a
comprehensive and collaborative system of early learning that serves
parents, children, and providers and to encourage best practices in
child care and early learning programs;
(b) To improve parent education and support;
(c) To carry out activities to improve the quality of early
learning opportunities for young children including activities in
cooperation with the private-public partnership;
(d) To administer child care and early learning programs;
(e) To standardize internal financial audits, oversight visits,
performance benchmarks, and licensing criteria, so that programs can
function in an integrated fashion;
(f) To assist in the implementation of the private-public
partnership and cooperate with that partnership in pursuing its goals
including providing data and support necessary for the successful work
of the partnership;
(g) To work cooperatively and in coordination with the early
learning council; ((and))
(h) To collaborate with the K-12 school system at the state and
local levels to ensure appropriate connections and smooth transitions
between early learning and K-12 programs; and
(i) Upon the development of an early learning information system,
to make available to parents timely inspection and complaint
information through the internet and other means.
(3) The department's programs shall be designed in a way that
respects and preserves the ability of parents and legal guardians to
direct the education, development, and upbringing of their children.
The department shall include parents and legal guardians in the
development of policies and program decisions affecting their children.

Sec. 104 RCW 43.215.070 and 2006 c 265 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to other duties under this chapter, the director
shall actively participate in a nongovernmental private-public
partnership focused on supporting government's investments in early
learning and ensuring that every child in the state is prepared to
succeed in school and in life. Except for licensing as required by
Washington state law and to the extent permitted by federal law, the
director of the department of early learning shall grant waivers from
the rules of state agencies for the operation of early learning
programs requested by the nongovernmental private-public partnership to
allow for flexibility to pursue market-based approaches to achieving
the best outcomes for children and families.
(2) In addition to other powers granted to the director, the
director may:
(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the department to carry out
the purposes of this chapter;
(b) Accept gifts, grants, or other funds for the purposes of this
chapter; and
(c) Adopt, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, rules necessary to
implement this chapter, including rules governing child day care and
early learning programs under this chapter. This section does not
expand the rule-making authority of the director beyond that necessary
to implement and administer programs and services existing July 1,
2006, as transferred to the department of early learning under section
501, chapter 265, Laws of 2006. The rule-making authority does not
include any authority to set mandatory curriculum or establish what
must be taught in child day care centers or by family day care
providers.
(3) In order to meet its partnership responsibilities, the
department shall:
(a) Work collaboratively with the nongovernmental private-public
partnership; and
(b) Actively seek public and private money for distribution as
grants to the private-public partnership.
(4) In order to meet its partnership responsibilities, the
nongovernmental private-public partnership shall:
(a) Work with and complement existing statewide efforts by
enhancing parent education and support, child care, preschool, and
other early learning environments;
(b) Accept and expend funds to be used for quality improvement
initiatives, including but not limited to parent education and support,
and support the alignment of existing funding streams and coordination
of efforts across sectors;
(c) In conjunction with the department, provide leadership to early
learning private-public partnerships forming in communities across the
state. These local partnerships shall be encouraged to seek local
funding and develop strategies to improve coordination and exchange
information between the community, early care and education programs,
and the K-12 system; and
(d) Assist the statewide movement to high quality early learning
and the support of parents as a child's first and best teacher.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 A new section is added to chapter 43.215
RCW to read as follows:
RULES REVIEW. In conjunction with child care providers and other
early learning leaders, the department shall review and revise child
care provider rules in order to emphasize the need for mutual respect
among parents, providers, and state staff who enforce rules. Revised
rules shall clearly focus on keeping children safe and improving early
learning outcomes for children. The department shall develop a plan by
July 2007 that outlines the process and timelines to complete the rules
review. Nothing in this section changes the department's
responsibility to collectively bargain over mandatory subjects.

K-12PART 2
BASIC EDUCATION GOALS
Sec. 201 RCW 28A.150.210 and 1993 c 336 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
The goal of the basic education act for the schools of the state of
Washington set forth in this chapter shall be to provide students with
the opportunity to become responsible citizens, to contribute to their
own economic well-being and to that of their families and communities,
and to enjoy productive and satisfying lives, and to develop a public
school system that focuses more on the educational performance of
students and includes high expectations for all students. To these
ends, the goals of each school district, with the involvement of
parents and community members, shall be to provide opportunities for
all students to develop the knowledge and skills essential to:
(1) Read with comprehension, write with skill, and communicate
effectively and responsibly in a variety of ways and settings;
(2) Know and apply the core concepts and principles of mathematics;
social, physical, and life sciences; civics and history; geography;
arts; and health and fitness;
(3) Think analytically, logically, and creatively, and to integrate
experience and knowledge to form reasoned judgments and solve problems;
and
(4) Understand the importance of work and how performance, effort,
and decisions directly affect future career and educational
opportunities.

PART 3
ALL-DAY KINDERGARTEN
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
ALL-DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS--FUNDING. Beginning with the 2007-08
school year, funding for voluntary all-day kindergarten programs shall
be phased-in beginning with schools with the highest poverty levels,
defined as those schools with the highest percentages of students
qualifying for free and reduced-price lunch support in the prior school
year. Once a school receives funding for the all-day kindergarten
program, that school shall remain eligible for funding in subsequent
school years regardless of changes in the school's percentage of
students eligible for free and reduced-price lunches as long as other
program requirements are fulfilled. Resources for all-day kindergarten
shall support students who qualify for free and reduced-price lunch
program support. Additionally, schools receiving all-day kindergarten
program support shall agree to the following conditions:
(1) Providing at least a one thousand-hour instructional program;
(2) Providing a curriculum that offers a rich, varied set of
experiences that assist students in:
(a) Developing initial skills in the academic areas of reading,
mathematics, and writing;
(b) Developing a variety of communication skills;
(c) Providing experiences in science, social studies, arts, health
and physical education, and a world language other than English;
(d) Acquiring large and small motor skills;
(e) Acquiring social and emotional skills including successful
participation in learning activities as an individual and as part of a
group;
(f) Establishing learning environments that are developmentally
appropriate and promote creativity; and
(g) Learning through hands-on experiences;
(3) Demonstrating strong connections and communication with early
learning community providers; and
(4) Participating in kindergarten program readiness activities with
early learning providers and parents.

PART 4
DEMONSTRATION PROJECTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
PRIMARY LEVEL EDUCATION PROJECTS. (1) Ten demonstration projects
are authorized for schools serving kindergarten through third grade
students to develop, implement, and document the effects of a
comprehensive K-3 foundations program. At least two demonstration
projects shall be in schools that are participating in the public-private early learning partnerships in the Highline and Yakima school
districts.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall select project
participants based on the criteria in this section, the commitment to
a school-wide program, and the degree to which applicants articulate an
understanding of development and implementation of a comprehensive K-3
foundations program.
(3) Successful school applicants shall:
(a) Demonstrate that there is engaged and committed school and
district leadership and support for the project;
(b) Demonstrate that school staff is engaged and committed and
believes in high expectations for all students;
(c) Have a history of successfully using data to guide decision
making for students and the program;
(d) Plan for the use of staff learning improvement days to support
project implementation;
(e) Demonstrate successful linkages with the early learning
providers in their communities;
(f) Outline the steps taken to develop this application and the
general plan for implementation of a comprehensive K-3 foundations
program; and
(g) Commit to individualized learning opportunities in early grades
by using district resources, such as funding under RCW 28A.505.210, to
reduce class sizes in grades kindergarten through three.
(4) Program resources provided to demonstration projects are:
(a) Support to implement a full-day kindergarten program;
(b) Support for class sizes at a ratio of one teacher to eighteen
students, and the additional resources for materials generated by that
ratio through associated nonemployee-related costs;
(c) Support for a one-half full-time equivalent instructional
coach; and
(d) Support for professional development time related to program
implementation.
(5) Demonstration projects shall provide:
(a) A program that implements an educational philosophy that
supports child-centered learning;
(b) Learning opportunities through personal exploration and
discovery, hands-on experiences, and by working independently, in small
groups and in large groups;
(c) Rich and varied subject matter that includes: Reading,
writing, mathematics, science, a world language other than English, the
arts, and health and physical education;
(d) Opportunities to learn and feel accomplishment, diligence,
creativity, and confidence;
(e) Social and emotional development opportunities;
(f) Personalized assessment for each student that addresses
academic knowledge and skill development, social and emotional skill
development, critical thinking and decision-making skills, large and
fine motor skill development, and knowledge of personal interests,
strengths, and goals;
(g) For students to progress to the upper elementary grades when a
solid foundation is in place and reading and mathematics primary skills
have been mastered; and
(h) Class sizes that do not exceed one certificated instructional
staff to eighteen students.
(6) The Washington state institute for public policy shall conduct
an evaluation of the demonstration projects under this section.
Student, staff, program, and parent data shall be collected using
various instruments including surveys, program and activity
descriptions, student performance measures, observations, and other
processes.
(7) Findings from the evaluation under this section shall include
conclusions regarding the degree to which students thrive in the
education environment; student progress in academic, social, and
emotional areas; the program components that have been most important
to student success; the degree to which educational staff feel
accomplished in their work and satisfied with student progress; and
recommendations for continued implementation and expansion of the
program.
(8) The institute for public policy shall report its findings to
the governor, the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
and the appropriate early learning, education, and fiscal committees of
the legislature. An interim report is due November 1, 2008. The final
report is due December 1, 2009.
(9) This section expires September 1, 2010.

Sec. 402 RCW 28A.505.210 and 2005 c 497 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
School districts shall have the authority to decide the best use of
student achievement funds to assist students in meeting and exceeding
the new, higher academic standards in each district consistent with the
provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2001. In making this determination
beginning with the 2007-08 school year, each school district shall
consider using increases in these funds for reducing primary grade
class sizes as provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(1) Student achievement funds shall be allocated for the following
uses:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators,
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school;
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection.
(2) Annually on or before May 1st, the school district board of
directors shall meet at the time and place designated for the purpose
of a public hearing on the proposed use of these funds to improve
student achievement for the coming year. Any person may appear or by
written submission have the opportunity to comment on the proposed plan
for the use of these funds. No later than August 31st, as a part of
the process under RCW 28A.505.060, each school district shall adopt a
plan for the use of these funds for the upcoming school year.
Annually, each school district shall provide to the citizens of their
district a public accounting of the funds made available to the
district during the previous school year under chapter 3, Laws of 2001,
how the funds were used, and the progress the district has made in
increasing student achievement, as measured by required state
assessments and other assessments deemed appropriate by the district.
Copies of this report shall be provided to the superintendent of public
instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
ENGLISH AS A SECOND LANGUAGE PROJECTS. (1) The goals of the
English as a second language demonstration project are to develop
recommendations:
(a) Identifying foundational competencies for developing academic
English skills in English language learner students that all teachers
should acquire in initial teacher preparation programs;
(b) Identifying components of a professional development program
that builds classroom teacher competence for developing academic
English skills in English language learner students; and
(c) Identifying job-embedded practices that connect the English
language learner teacher and classroom teachers to coordinate
instruction to support the work of the student.
(2) The English as a second language demonstration project shall
use two field strategies in the development of recommendations.
(a) The first strategy is to conduct a field study of an ongoing
project in a number of schools and school districts in which Spanish is
the predominate language other than English.
(b) The second strategy is to conduct a project that provides
professional development and planning time resources to approximately
three large schools in which there are many first languages among the
students. The participants of this project shall partner with an
institution of higher education or a professional development provider
with expertise in support student acquisition of academic English. The
superintendent of public instruction shall select the participants in
the project under this subsection (2)(b).
(3)(a) The Washington state institute for public policy shall
conduct the field study work and collect additional information from
the project schools. In conducting its work, the institute shall
review current literature regarding best practices and consult with
state and national experts as appropriate.
(b) The institute for public policy shall report its findings to
the governor, the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
and the education and fiscal committees of the legislature. An interim
report is due November 1, 2008. The final report is due December 1,
2009.
(4) This section expires September 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
HEALTH-RELATED CAREER ACADEMIES. (1) A health-related career
academies grant program is established to provide students with
opportunities to prepare for a health-related career. The pathways
offered shall result in students acquiring preparation and
certification to enter the workforce or to enroll in postsecondary
education and training programs upon high school graduation. The grant
program shall use a public-private partnership to bring the resources
of the state and the private sector together to create the pathways.
To the extent possible, grants shall be distributed geographically
throughout the state. The grant program is competitive and shall be
administered by an experienced nonprofit health organization.
(2) The grant program shall:
(a) Require participation in each academy to include high school
and school district instructional and administrative staff, public and
private institutions of higher education, employers, industry and labor
associations, and philanthropic organizations;
(b) Provide resources for first year, start-up activities only;
(c) Require matching funds and services from program partners; and
(d) Require applicants to describe community interest, the content
and proposed outcomes of the program, steps needed to implement the
program, the role each partner will play in the program, general
proposed budget, and a plan for sustaining the program after the first
year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
AFTER-SCHOOL MATHEMATICS SUPPORT PROGRAM. (1) The after-school
mathematics support program is created to study the effects of
intentional, skilled mathematics support included as part of an
existing after-school activity program.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide grants to selected community-based, nonprofit organizations
that provide after-school programs and include support for students to
learn mathematics.
(3) Grant applicants must demonstrate the capacity to provide
assistance in mathematics learning in the following ways:
(a) Identifying the mathematics content and instructional skill of
the staff or volunteers assisting students;
(b) Identifying proposed learning strategies to be used, which
could include computer-based instructional and skill practice programs
and tutoring by adults or other students;
(c) Articulating the plan for connection with school mathematics
teachers to coordinate student assistance; and
(d) Articulating the plan for assessing student and program
success.
(4) Priority will be given to applicants that propose programs to
serve middle school and junior high school students.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
evaluate program outcomes and report to the governor and the education
committees of the legislature on the outcomes of the grants and make
recommendations related to program continuation, program modification,
and issues related to program sustainability and possible program
expansion. An interim report is due November 1, 2008. The final
report is due December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 MATHEMATICS AND SCIENCE INSTRUCTIONAL
COACH PROJECT. (1) A mathematics and science instructional coach
demonstration project is authorized to develop, pilot, and refine
program elements as a first step in the creation of a new instructional
staff professional development program. The mathematics and science
instructional coach demonstration project coaching program shall
consist of a coach development institute, coaching seminars, coaching
activities in schools, and program evaluation.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop a mathematics and science instructional coach program that
includes an initial coach development experience for new coaches
provided through an institute setting, coaching support seminars, and
additional coach development services. The office shall draw upon the
experiences of coaches in federally supported elementary literacy
programs and other successful programs, research and policy briefs on
adult professional development, and research that specifically
addresses the instructional environments of middle, junior high, and
high schools as well as the unique aspects of the fields of mathematics
and science.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
design the application process and select the demonstration project
participants.
(4) Schools and school districts participating in the demonstration
project shall carefully select the individuals to perform the role of
mathematics or science instructional coach. Characteristics to be
considered for a successful coach include:
(a) Expertise in content area;
(b) Expertise in various instructional methodologies and
personalizing learning;
(c) Personal skills that include skilled listening, questioning,
trust-building, and problem-solving;
(d) Understanding and appreciation for the differences in adult
learners and student learners; and
(e) Capacity for strategic planning and quality program
implementation.
(5) The role of the mathematics or science instructional coach is
focused on supporting teachers as they apply knowledge, develop skills,
polish techniques, and deepen their understanding of content and
instructional practices. This work takes a number of forms including:
Individualized professional development, department-wide and school-wide professional development, guidance in student data interpretation,
and using assessment to guide instruction. Each coach shall be
assigned to two schools as part of this project.
(6) Project participants have the following responsibilities:
(a) Mathematics and science coaches shall participate in the coach
development institute as well as in coaching support seminars that take
place throughout the school year, practice coaching activities as
guided by those articulated in the role of the coach in subsection (5)
of this section, collect data, and participate in program evaluation
activities as requested by the institute pursuant to subsection (7) of
this section.
(b) School and district administrators in districts in which the
mathematics and science coaches are practicing shall participate in
program evaluation activities.
(7)(a) The Washington state institute for public policy shall
conduct an evaluation of the mathematics and science instructional
coach demonstration project in this section. Data shall be collected
through various instruments including surveys, program and activity
reports, student performance measures, observations, interviews, and
other processes. Findings shall include an evaluation of the coach
development institute, coaching support seminars, and other coach
support activities; recommendations with regard to changes in the
characteristics required of the coaches; identification of changes in
teacher instruction related to coaching activities; and identification
of the satisfaction level with coaching activities as experienced by
classroom teachers and administrators.
(b) The institute for public policy shall report its findings to
the governor, the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
and the education and fiscal committees of the legislature. An interim
report is due November 1, 2008. The final report is due December 1,
2009.
(8) This section expires September 1, 2010.

PART 5
MATHEMATICS AND SCIENCE STANDARDS AND CURRICULUM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 MATHEMATICS AND SCIENCE REVIEW. (1) The
activities in this section strengthen the learning standards that
implement the goals of RCW 28A.150.210, improve alignment of school
district curriculum to the state standards, and provide assessment
tools that link directly to the state's learning standards and
curriculum. As the state board of education and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction implement the activities in this
section, each agency shall provide a status report of activities and
progress at the beginning of each calendar quarter, beginning with July
1, 2007, to the governor and the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives and senate education committees.
(2) By December 2007, the state board of education, in cooperation
with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall
complete the process by which an independent review of the K-12
mathematics and science standards and essential academic learning
requirements is conducted.
(a) The results of each review shall provide findings and
recommendations to the superintendent of public instruction regarding
changes to the K-12 mathematics and science standards and the essential
academic learning requirements. The findings and recommendations shall
address the incorporation of international performance standards as may
be benchmarked to the content of the trends in international
mathematics and science study (TIMSS) and the programme for
international student assessment (PISA).
(b) The review in this section shall satisfy the requirement in RCW
28A.655.070(2) for a periodic revision of the essential academic
learning requirements.
(3) By December 2007, the state board of education shall:
(a) Incorporate into the state accountability plan the conditions
under which school districts are required to use one of the state
identified curricula in mathematics or science, or both. The plan
shall also describe the conditions for exception to the curriculum
requirement. These conditions shall address student performance
criteria;
(b) Under RCW 28A.230.090, amend the high school graduation
requirement in mathematics to include a minimum of three credits of
mathematics. The state board of education shall describe the
mathematics content required within the three credits and shall
consider requiring content to include that commonly contained in
algebra 2. The state board of education shall also consider:
(i) An additional requirement to include requiring mathematics to
be included in the student's senior year class schedule;
(ii) Ways to demonstrate mathematics competencies; and
(iii) Conditions for exceptions to a senior year mathematics
requirement.
(4) By July 2008, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall:
(a) Identify no more than three mathematics basic curricula for
elementary, middle, junior high, and high school, that align with the
new standards resulting from the independent review activities
described in this section. Diagnostic and supplemental materials shall
also be identified;
(b) Identify no more than three science basic curricula for
elementary, middle, junior high, and high school, that align with the
new standards resulting from the independent review activities
described in this section. Diagnostic and supplemental materials shall
also be identified; and
(c) Begin the process revising the Washington assessment of student
learning mathematics and science assessments at grade levels four
through ten as appropriate to align assessment content with the new
standards and essential academic learning requirements resulting from
the independent reviews provided in subsection (1) of this section.

PART 6
EDUCATOR PREPARATION AND PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
MATHEMATICS AND SCIENCE TEACHER PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT. (1)
Several targeted professional development programs are authorized to
further the development of outstanding mathematics and science teaching
and learning opportunities in the state of Washington.
(2) The expected outcomes of this program are:
(a) Provision of meaningful, targeted professional development for
all middle, junior high, and high school teachers of mathematics and
science;
(b) Increased knowledge and instructional skill for mathematics and
science teachers;
(c) Increased use of curriculum materials with supporting
diagnostic and supplemental materials that align with state standards;
(d) Skillful guidance for students participating in alternative
assessment activities;
(e) Increased rigor of mathematics and science course offerings;
(f) Increased student opportunities for focused, applied
mathematics and science classes;
(g) Increased student success on state achievement measures; and
(h) Increased student appreciation of the value and uses of
mathematics and science knowledge and exploration of mathematics and
science-related careers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT LEARNING OPPORTUNITIES. (1) The
superintendent of public instruction and the educational service
districts shall create a partnership to develop and deliver
professional development learning opportunities for educators that
fulfill the goals and address the specific targeted activities
described in this section. The partnership shall:
(a) Support school districts by providing professional development
leadership, courses, and consultation services to school districts in
their implementation of the professional development activities
described in this section; and
(b) Support one another in the delivery of state-level and
regional-level professional development activities such as state
conferences and regional accountability institutes.
(2) Each educational service district shall enter into a
performance agreement with the superintendent of public instruction to
clearly articulate partner responsibilities and to assure fidelity for
the delivery of professional development initiatives including job-embedded practices. Components of such performance agreement shall
include:
(a) Participation in the development of various professional
development workshops, programs, and activities;
(b) Characteristics and qualifications of professional development
staff supported by the program;
(c) Methods to ensure consistent delivery of professional
development services; and
(d) Reporting responsibilities related to services provided,
program participation, outcomes, and recommendations for service
improvement.
(3) For the 2007-08 and 2008-09 school years, school districts
receiving professional development resources are directed to the
following activities:
(a) For middle school and junior high school mathematics teachers:
(i) During the 2007-08 school year the focus shall be on
development of basic mathematics knowledge and instructional skills;
and
(ii) During the 2008-09 school year the focus shall be on
implementing new international mathematics standards;
(b) For middle school and junior high school science teachers:
(i) During the 2007-08 school year the focus shall be on
examination of student science assessment data and identification of
science knowledge and skill areas in need of additional instructional
attention; and
(ii) During the 2008-09 school year the focus is on implementing
new international science standards;
(c) For high school mathematics teachers:
(i) During the 2007-08 school year the focus shall be on
implementing state mathematics learning modules, the segmented
mathematics class and assessment program, the collection of evidence
alternative assessment and basic mathematics knowledge, and
instructional skills; and
(ii) During the 2008-09 school year the focus shall be on
implementing new international mathematics standards;
(d) For high school science teachers:
(i) During the 2007-08 school year the focus shall be on
examination of student science assessment data and identification of
science knowledge and skill areas in need of additional instructional
attention; and
(ii) During the 2008-09 school year the focus shall be on
implementing new international science standards;
(e) For the 2007-08 and 2008-09 school years, one mathematics
teacher and one science teacher in each middle or junior high school
and high school shall be provided specialized professional development
to bring new rigor to mathematics and science offerings and/or expand
the opportunities for students to take applied mathematics and science
courses;
(f) For the 2007-08 and 2008-09 school years, twenty teachers, from
middle, junior high, and high schools, each year shall be provided
professional development to implement a specialized science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics curriculum in their school.
Schools shall apply to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction for this program; and
(g) For fourth and fifth grade mathematics and science teachers:
(i) During the 2007-08 school year the focus shall be on
development of basic mathematics knowledge and instructional skill and
improving instruction in science; and
(ii) During the 2008-09 school year the focus shall be on
implementing new international mathematics and science standards.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop the
methodology for determining the number of mathematics and science
teachers in middle, junior high, and high schools within each district
for the purposes of providing formula-driven resources for the purposes
of implementing subsection (3) of this section.
(5) School districts receiving resources under this section shall
submit reports to the superintendent of public instruction regarding
the use of the funds. The superintendent of public instruction and the
office of financial management shall collaborate on required report
content and format. Information in the report shall include the
professional development offered and the number of teachers
participating.
(6) Beginning with the 2009-10 school year, the focus for
professional development resources and activities may be adjusted.

Sec. 603 RCW 28A.310.350 and 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 10 are each
amended to read as follows:
The basic core services and cost upon which educational service
districts are budgeted shall include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(1) Educational service district administration and facilities such
as office space, maintenance and utilities;
(2) Cooperative administrative services such as assistance in
carrying out procedures to abolish sex and race bias in school
programs, fiscal services, grants management services, special
education services and transportation services;
(3) Personnel services such as certification/registration services;
(4) Learning resource services such as audio visual aids;
(5) Cooperative curriculum services such as health promotion and
health education services, in-service training, workshops and
assessment; ((and))
(6) Professional development services identified by statute or the
omnibus appropriations act; and
(7) Special needs of local education agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
SCHOOL DISTRICT LEADERSHIP ACADEMY. (1) Research supports the
value of quality school and school district leadership. Effective
leadership is critical to improving student learning and transforming
underperforming schools and school districts into world-class learning
centers.
(2) A public-private partnership is established to develop, pilot,
and implement the Washington state leadership academy to focus on the
development and enhancement of personal leadership characteristics and
the teaching of effective practices and skills demonstrated by school
and district administrators who are successful managers and
instructional leaders. It is the goal of the academy to provide state-of-the-art programs and services across the state.
(3) Academy partners include the state superintendent and principal
professional associations, private nonprofit foundations, institutions
of higher education, the professional educator standards board, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, educational service
districts, and other entities identified by the partners. The partners
shall designate an independent organization to act as the fiscal agent
for the academy and shall establish a board of directors to oversee and
direct the academy's finances, services, and programs. The academy
shall be supported by a national research institution with demonstrated
expertise in educational leadership.
(4) Initial development of academy course content and activities
shall be supported by private funds. Initial tasks of the academy are
to:
(a) Finalize a comprehensive design of the academy and the
development of the curriculum frameworks for a comprehensive leadership
development program that includes coursework, practicum, mentoring, and
evaluation components;
(b) Develop curriculum for individual leadership topics;
(c) Pilot the curriculum and all program components; and
(d) Modify the comprehensive design, curriculum coursework,
practicum, and mentoring programs based on the research results gained
from pilot activities.
(5) The board of directors shall report semiannually to the
superintendent of public instruction on the financial contributions
provided by foundations and other organizations to support the work of
the academy. The board of directors shall report by December 31st each
year to the superintendent of public instruction on the programs and
services provided, numbers of participants in the various academy
activities, evaluation activities regarding program and participant
outcomes, and plans for the academy's future development.
(6) The board of directors shall identify possible areas to better
coordinate with and make recommendations for changes in superintendent
and principal preparation programs, the administrator licensure system,
and continuing education requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR STANDARDS BOARD
DUTIES. (1) The purpose of the duties in this section for the
professional educator standards board is to take the next steps in
developing quality teaching knowledge and skill in the state's teaching
ranks. The duties build upon the current teacher development
foundation that requires demonstrated teaching competency, requires
evidence of positive impact on student learning, and focuses on
furthering state kindergarten through twelfth grade learning goals
through instructional skill alignment.
(2) The professional educator standards board shall:
(a) By December 2007:
(i) Adopt new knowledge and skill standards that prepare all
individuals seeking residency teacher certification to integrate
mathematics across all content areas; and
(ii) Adopt new certification requirements for individuals seeking
residency teacher certification as elementary education or middle level
and secondary mathematics teachers to assure adequate content and
instructional strategy preparation to teach to the kindergarten through
twelfth grades state mathematics and science standards;
(b) By June 2009:
(i) Set performance standards and develop, pilot, and implement a
uniform and external professional-level certification assessment based
on demonstrated teaching skill. In the development of this assessment,
consideration shall be given to changes in professional certification
program components such as the culminating seminar;
(ii) Summarize its work in the development of the assessment in
(b)(i) of this subsection in the annual reports required by RCW
28A.410.240; and
(iii) Review and revise the standards for higher education teacher
preparation programs to incorporate updated practices to enhance
teacher success in a knowledge and skill-based performance system that
emphasizes strong content, applied learning, and personal, meaningful
connections with students; and
(c) By December 2009, review and revise as needed teacher
preparation standards and requirements to focus on diversity in
cultural knowledge and respect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 FINDINGS--NATIONAL BOARD FOR PROFESSIONAL
TEACHING STANDARDS CERTIFICATION. The legislature finds and declares:
(1) The national board for professional teaching standards has
established high and rigorous standards for what highly accomplished
teachers should know and be able to do in order to increase student
learning results;
(2) The national board for professional teaching standards
certifies teachers who meet these standards through a rigorous,
performance-based assessment process;
(3) A certificate awarded by the national board attests that a
teacher has met high and rigorous standards and has demonstrated the
ability to make sound professional judgments about how to best meet
students' learning needs and effectively help students meet challenging
academic standards;
(4) The process of national board assessment is the most rigorous
advanced certification process in the teaching profession; and
(5) Teachers who attain national board certification should be
acknowledged and rewarded in order to encourage more teachers to pursue
certification for the benefit of Washington students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
NATIONAL BOARD FOR PROFESSIONAL TEACHING STANDARDS CERTIFICATION--BONUSES. (1) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall receive a bonus each year in which they maintain
certification from the national board. The bonus for national board
certification is provided in addition to compensation received under a
district's salary schedule adopted in accordance with RCW 28A.405.200
and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average
salary and associated salary limitations under RCW 28A.400.200.
(a) The bonus shall be calculated as ten percent of the salary that
would be allocated for that teacher under the state salary allocation
model published in the omnibus appropriations act; and
(b) The bonus amount for an individual shall not be less than the
bonus amount received by that individual in the 2006-07 school year.
(2) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall be eligible for one or more bonuses in addition to that
provided by subsection (1) of this section if the individual:
(a) Is in an instructional assignment in a school in which at least
seventy percent of the students qualify for the free and reduced-price
lunch program; and
(b) Has attained certification from the national board for
professional teaching standards in middle level and/or high school
level mathematics and/or science and is in a mathematics and/or science
instructional assignment in a school in which at least seventy percent
of the students qualify for the free and reduced-price lunch program.
(3) The amount of the additional bonus under subsection (2) of this
section for those meeting the qualifications of subsection (2)(a) of
this section is five thousand dollars. The amount of the additional
bonus for those meeting the qualifications of subsection (2)(a) and (b)
of this section is ten thousand dollars.

Sec. 608 RCW 28A.660.005 and 2001 c 158 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds and declares:
(((1))) (a) Teacher qualifications and effectiveness are the most
important influences on student learning in schools((.));
(((2))) (b) Preparation of individuals to become well-qualified,
effective teachers must be high quality((.));
(((3))) (c) Teachers who complete high-quality alternative route
programs with intensive field-based experience, adequate coursework,
and strong mentorship do as well or better than teachers who complete
traditional preparation programs((.));
(((4))) (d) High-quality alternative route programs can provide
more flexibility and expedience for individuals to transition from
their current career to teaching((.));
(((5))) (e) High-quality alternative route programs can help school
districts fill subject matter shortage areas and areas with shortages
due to geographic location((.));
(((6))) (f) Regardless of route, all candidates for residency
teacher certification must meet the high standards required by the
state; and
(g) Teachers need an adequate background in subject matter content
if they are to teach it well, and should hold full, appropriate
credentials in those subject areas.
(2) The legislature recognizes widespread concerns about the
potential for teacher shortages and finds that classified instructional
staff in public schools, current certificated staff, and unemployed
certificate holders represent a great untapped resource for recruiting
((the)) more teachers ((of the future)) in critical shortage areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 A new section is added to chapter 28A.660
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program
is created. Participation is limited to paraeducators without a
college degree who have at least three years of classroom experience.
It is anticipated that candidates enrolled in this program will
complete their associate of arts degree in a direct transfer agreement
mathematics education program at a community and technical college in
two years or less and become eligible for a mathematics endorsement and
special education endorsement or a mathematics endorsement and an
English as a second language endorsement via route one in the
alternative routes to teacher certification program provided in this
chapter.
(2) Entry requirements for candidates include:
(a) District or building validation of qualifications, including
three years of successful student interaction and leadership as a
classified instructional employee; and
(b) Acceptance into a direct transfer agreement mathematics
education program at a community and technical college.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 A new section is added to chapter 28A.660
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The retooling to teach mathematics and science conditional
scholarship program is created. Participation is limited to current K-12 teachers and individuals having an elementary education certificate
but who are not employed in positions requiring an elementary education
certificate. It is anticipated that candidates enrolled in this
program will complete the requirements for a mathematics or science
endorsement, or both, in two years or less.
(2) Entry requirements for candidates include:
(a) Current K-12 teachers shall pursue a middle level mathematics
or science, or secondary mathematics or science endorsement.
(b) Individuals having an elementary education certificate but who
are not employed in positions requiring an elementary education
certificate shall pursue an endorsement in middle level mathematics or
science only.

Sec. 611 RCW 28A.660.050 and 2004 c 23 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((alternative route)) conditional scholarship programs ((is))
in this chapter are created under the following guidelines:
(1) The programs shall be administered by the higher education
coordinating board. In administering the programs, the higher
education coordinating board has the following powers and duties:
(a) To adopt necessary rules and develop guidelines to administer
the programs;
(b) To collect and manage repayments from participants who do not
meet their service obligations; and
(c) To accept grants and donations from public and private sources
for the programs.
(2) Requirements for participation in the ((alternative route))
conditional scholarship programs are as provided in this subsection
(2).
(a) The alternative route conditional scholarship program is
limited to interns of the partnership grant programs under RCW
28A.660.040. In order to receive conditional scholarship awards,
recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment in alternative
certification routes through the partnership grant program;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of
the alternative route certification program and receipt of a residency
teaching certificate; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed eight thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees,
and educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation
for the alternative route certification program in which the recipient
is enrolled. The board may adjust the annual award by the average rate
of resident undergraduate tuition and fee increases at the state
universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(b) The pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program
is limited to qualified paraeducators as provided by section 609 of
this act. In order to receive conditional scholarship awards,
recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment in a direct transfer
agreement mathematics education program at a community and technical
college for no more than two years and attain an associate of arts
degree;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of an
associate of arts degree. This progress requirement is a condition for
eligibility into a route one program of the alternative routes to
teacher certification program for a mathematics endorsement and special
education endorsement or a mathematics endorsement and an English as a
second language endorsement; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed four thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees, and
educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation for
the alternative route certification program in which the recipient is
enrolled. The board may adjust the annual award by the average rate of
tuition and fee increases at the state community and technical
colleges.
(c) The retooling to teach mathematics and science conditional
scholarship program is limited to current K-12 teachers and individuals
having an elementary education certificate but who are not employed in
positions requiring an elementary education certificate as provided by
section 610 of this act. In order to receive conditional scholarship
awards:
(i) Individuals currently employed as teachers shall pursue a
middle level mathematics or science, or secondary mathematics or
science endorsement; or
(ii) Individuals who are certificated with an elementary education
endorsement, but not employed in positions requiring an elementary
education certificate, shall pursue an endorsement in middle level
mathematics or science, or both; and
(iii) Individuals shall use one of the pathways to endorsement
processes to receive a mathematics or science endorsement, or both,
which shall include passing a mathematics or science endorsement test,
or both tests, plus observation and completing applicable coursework to
attain the proper endorsement; and
(iv) Individuals shall receive no more than the annual amount of
the scholarship, not to exceed three thousand dollars, for the cost of
tuition, test fees, and educational expenses, including books,
supplies, and transportation for the endorsement pathway being pursued.
(3) The Washington professional educator standards board shall
select ((interns)) individuals to receive conditional scholarships.
(((3) In order to receive conditional scholarship awards,
recipients shall be accepted and maintain enrollment in alternative
certification routes through the partnership grant program, as provided
in RCW 28A.660.040. Recipients must continue to make satisfactory
progress towards completion of the alternative route certification
program and receipt of a residency teaching certificate.))
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, a conditional scholarship is
a loan that is forgiven in whole or in part in exchange for service as
a certificated teacher employed in a Washington state K-12 public
school. The state shall forgive one year of loan obligation for every
two years a recipient teaches in a public school. Recipients ((that))
who fail to continue a course of study leading to residency teacher
certification or cease to teach in a public school in the state of
Washington in their endorsement area are required to repay the
remaining loan principal with interest.
(5) Recipients who fail to fulfill the required teaching obligation
are required to repay the remaining loan principal with interest and
any other applicable fees. The higher education coordinating board
shall adopt rules to define the terms for repayment, including
applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.
(6) ((To the extent funds are appropriated for this specific
purpose, the annual amount of the scholarship is the annual cost of
tuition; fees; and educational expenses, including books, supplies, and
transportation for the alternative route certification program in which
the recipient is enrolled, not to exceed eight thousand dollars. The
board may adjust the annual award by the average rate of resident
undergraduate tuition and fee increases at the state universities as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(7))) The higher education coordinating board may deposit all
appropriations, collections, and any other funds received for the
program in this chapter in the ((student loan)) future teachers
conditional scholarship account authorized in RCW ((28B.102.060))
28B.102.080.

Sec. 612 RCW 28B.102.080 and 2004 c 58 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The future teachers conditional scholarship account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures of funds from the account. The account is
not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW except for
moneys used for program administration.
(2) The board shall deposit in the account all moneys received for
the future teachers conditional scholarship and loan repayment program
and for conditional loan programs under chapter 28A.660 RCW. The
account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds appropriated by
the legislature for the future teachers conditional scholarship and
loan repayment program, private contributions to the program, ((and))
receipts from participant repayments from the future teachers
conditional scholarship and loan repayment program, and conditional
loan programs established under chapter 28A.660 RCW. Beginning July 1,
2004, the board shall also deposit into the account: (a) All funds
from the institution of higher education loan account that are
traceable to any conditional scholarship program for teachers or
prospective teachers established by the legislature before June 10,
2004; and (b) all amounts repaid by individuals under any such program.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for
conditional loans and loan repayments to participants in the future
teachers conditional scholarship and loan repayment program established
by this chapter, conditional scholarships for participants in programs
established in chapter 28A.660 RCW, and costs associated with program
administration by the board.
(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the
authorization of the board.

PART 7
SCHOOL FINANCE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF PAY
STRUCTURE. (1) The legislature finds that the current pay structure
for certificated instructional staff must be updated to address and
acknowledge the depth of content knowledge, range of instructional
skill, and intensity of practice experienced by teachers and other
instructional staff in our state.
(2) The office of financial management shall lead a committee to
develop recommendations for a new comprehensive expertise and incentive
pay structure for K-12 staff. The director of the office of financial
management or the director's designee shall serve as chair of the
committee. Committee members shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Four legislators, with one appointed by each of the major
caucuses in the house of representatives and senate;
(b) The superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee;
(c) A member of the professional educator standards board;
(d) A member from each statewide education organization
representing teachers, principals, superintendents, school directors,
human resource professionals, and parents; and
(e) Business organizations.
(3) The recommendations shall include a proposed expertise and
incentive pay structure that includes:
(a) Changes to the certificated instructional staff salary
allocation model to include pay for performance, knowledge, and skills;
(b) Elements to recognize assignments that are difficult; and
(c) Recognition for the professional teaching level certificate in
the salary allocation model.
(4) The committee's recommendations shall also include a plan to
implement the expertise and incentive pay structure for K-12 staff.
The plan shall include necessary support elements to implement the pay
structure, such as a professional development delivery system that
focuses on identified areas of teacher knowledge and skill and
addresses the transition from the current salary allocation model to
the expertise and incentive pay structure.
(5) The committee may create ad hoc subgroups as needed to complete
specified tasks or to compile research and expertise on selected
subjects.
(6) The office of financial management shall submit the committee's
final recommendations, including the expertise and incentive pay
structure, to the governor and fiscal committees of the legislature by
December 15, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
FINANCIAL HEALTH AND MONITORING--BUDGET REVIEW AND APPROVAL
PROCESS. (1) The legislature finds that the existing school district
budget review system focuses on current school year budget
implementation and preparation of the ensuing school year budget and
does not provide a systematic look of longer-range budget issues,
including any indication of impending financial problems in school
districts and the financial impact of long-term contractual agreements.
Parents, students, taxpayers, school employees, and school
administrators need a financial monitoring system that considers long-
term budgeting issues and commitments, and provides early warning of
school district financial health concerns. Once financial concerns and
issues are identified, districts should receive early, practical
assistance.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
office of financial management shall jointly develop and implement a
school district financial health and monitoring system.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
office of financial management shall identify up to six system measures
that shall be established for a public financial reporting system,
including related data collection content and processes. In addition,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the office
of financial management shall jointly develop a financial health
outlook rating system that places school districts in one of three
financial health categories based on their ratings on the financial
measures.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
office of financial management shall present proposed system measures
and a financial health outlook rating system to the governor by
November 1, 2007. Subject to agreement between the governor and the
superintendent of public instruction on the measures and the rating
system, the financial health and monitoring system shall be implemented
during the 2008-09 school year.
(5) The financial health outlook rating category of each school
district shall be published annually. In addition, updates shall be
published throughout the year if subsequent data to the school
district's financial reporting measures cause a change in the
district's financial health categorization.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, with
regional financial specialists contracted through educational service
districts, shall provide progressive levels of technical assistance to
school districts in the lowest two categories on the financial health
outlook rating system.
(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
office of financial management shall jointly review the current school
district budget submittal and approval process and develop
recommendations for changes to the budget approval and financial
oversight system. The recommendations shall include a system of
progressive state assistance and potential interventions and oversight
in school districts identified in the lowest two categories on the
financial health outlook rating system.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a report
summarizing the review and reporting recommendations in subsection (7)
of this section to the governor and the education and fiscal committees
of the legislature by November 15, 2007.

HIGHER EDUCATIONPART 8
WASHINGTON LEARNS SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 WASHINGTON LEARNS SCHOLARSHIP. (1) The
Washington learns scholarship program is established to encourage high
school graduation and college completion among low-income students and
students from families in which neither parent attained a baccalaureate
degree.
(2) Maximum scholarship award amounts shall be as provided in this
section.
(a) For students attending two or four-year institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the value of the award may not
exceed the difference between the student's tuition, fees, books, and
materials, less the value of any state or institutional financial aid
the student receives for tuition, fees, books, and materials.
(b) For students attending private four-year institutions of higher
education in Washington, the award amount may not exceed the
representative average of awards granted to students in public research
universities in Washington.
(c) For students attending private vocational schools in
Washington, the award amount may not exceed the representative average
of awards granted to students in public community and technical
colleges in Washington.
(d) Recipients may receive no more than four full-time years' worth
of scholarship awards. All eligibility for the scholarship expires
upon receipt of a baccalaureate degree or five calendar years after
college enrollment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 ELIGIBILITY. (1) To be eligible to apply
for a Washington learns scholarship established in section 801 of this
act, a student must be enrolled in the Washington learns scholarship
program.
(a) To be enrolled, a student must sign a pledge during seventh or
eighth grade that includes a commitment to graduate from high school
with at least a "C" average and no felony convictions. The pledge must
be witnessed by a parent or guardian and forwarded to the higher
education coordinating board by mail or electronically, as indicated on
the pledge form.
(b) At the time the pledge is signed, the student must be eligible
for free or reduced-price lunches, or will be a first generation
college student, meaning that neither parent has attained a
baccalaureate degree.
(c) The student must be a member of the high school graduating
class of 2012 or later.
(d) The student must complete the application for the scholarship
while in high school.
(2) To receive and maintain scholarship eligibility, a student
must:
(a) Be eligible for resident tuition and fee rates as defined in
RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013;
(b) Have fulfilled the terms and conditions of the pledge described
in this section;
(c) Have a family income that is at or below the state median
family income in the calendar year preceding college attendance;
(d) Enter a public or private institution of higher education in
Washington that is accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by
rule of the higher education coordinating board. The student must
enroll in an institution of higher education within one calendar year
of high school graduation, with exceptions made for illness, military
service, or other extenuating circumstances;
(e) Maintain satisfactory academic progress as defined by the
institution of higher education in which the student is enrolled; and
(f) File for state and federal financial aid by completing and
submitting the free application for federal student aid (FAFSA) in a
timely manner. The higher education coordinating board shall set and
publicize annual deadlines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 ADMINISTRATION. (1) The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Notify elementary, middle, and junior high school students,
parents, teachers, counselors, and principals about the Washington
learns scholarship program; and
(b) Work with the higher education coordinating board to develop
application collection and student tracking procedures.
(2) The higher education coordinating board shall:
(a) Establish administrative rules and policies to carry out the
Washington learns scholarship program;
(b) Develop and distribute, to all schools with students enrolled
in grade seven or eight, a pledge form that can be completed and
returned electronically or by mail by the student or the school to the
higher education coordinating board;
(c) Provide information to all middle and junior high schools to
inform them about the program and the eligibility and application
requirements;
(d) Develop and implement a student application, selection, and
notification process for scholarships;
(e) Track scholarship recipients to ensure continued eligibility
and determine student compliance for awarding of scholarships;
(f) Subject to appropriation, deposit funds into the state
educational trust fund;
(g) Purchase tuition units under the advanced college tuition
payment program in chapter 28B.95 RCW to be owned and held in trust by
the board, for the purpose of scholarship awards as provided for in
this subsection (2); and
(h) Distribute scholarship funds, in the form of tuition units
purchased under the advanced college tuition payment program in chapter
28B.95 RCW or through direct payments from the state educational trust
fund, to institutions of higher education on behalf of scholarship
recipients identified by the board, as long as recipients maintain
satisfactory academic progress.

PART 9
GET READY FOR MATH AND SCIENCE SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 GET READY FOR MATH AND SCIENCE
SCHOLARSHIP--PUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP. (1) The GET ready for math
and science scholarship program is established. Scholarship recipients
may enroll in any public or private institution of higher education in
Washington that is accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by
rule of the board. The scholarship may be awarded to eligible students
who achieve level four on the mathematics or science Washington
assessment of student learning in the tenth grade and who enter
qualified programs at a qualified institution of higher education as
defined in section 902 of this act. The scholarship award amount may
not exceed the cost of tuition and mandatory fees for up to one hundred
eighty quarter credits, or the semester equivalent, in a public
research university in Washington.
(2) A public-private partnership shall be developed to administer
the scholarship, with the private partner being a private nonprofit
foundation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(2) "GET units" means tuition units under the advanced college
tuition payment program in chapter 28B.95 RCW.
(3) "Program administrator" means the private nonprofit foundation
that is the private partner in the public-private partnership under
this chapter.
(4) "Qualified program" means the qualified mathematics or science-related degree program determined by the board and the program
administrator under section 907 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 ELIGIBILITY. (1) To be eligible to apply
for a GET ready for math and science scholarship under this chapter, a
student must:
(a) Be eligible for resident tuition and fee rates as defined in
RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013;
(b) Have achieved level four on the mathematics or science
Washington assessment of student learning in the tenth grade;
(c) Declare the intent to enter a qualified program at an
institution of higher education in Washington;
(d) Declare the intent to work in Washington state for at least
three years after graduation from college in an occupation related to
the college program from which the student will graduate; and
(e) Have a family income that is at or below one hundred twenty-five percent of the state median family income at the time the
application is submitted and for up to the previous two years.
(2) In order to receive and maintain scholarship eligibility, a
student must:
(a) Enter a qualified institution of higher education in Washington
state within one calendar year of high school graduation;
(b) Maintain satisfactory academic progress as defined by the
institution of higher education in which the student is enrolled;
(c) Take at least one college-level mathematics or science course
each term before being accepted into a qualified program; and
(d) Enter a qualified program as soon as practicable after program
admission prerequisites are fulfilled but not later than the first
semester of the junior year in college.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 OFFICE OF THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION--DUTIES. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall:
(1) Notify elementary, middle, junior high, and high school
students, parents, teachers, counselors, and principals about the GET
ready for math and science scholarship program;
(2) Notify students who achieve level four of the mathematics or
science Washington assessment of student learning in tenth grade that
they may be eligible to apply for a GET ready for math and science
scholarship and provide them with contact information for the program
administrator; and
(3) Notify the program administrator and the board, as early as
possible during the fall of the students' junior year in high school,
of the names and contact information of all students who achieved level
four on the mathematics or science Washington assessment of student
learning during tenth grade so that the program administrator may
provide them with scholarship information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD--DUTIES. The board shall:
(1) Purchase GET units to be owned and held in trust by the board,
for the purpose of scholarship awards as provided for in this section;
(2) Distribute scholarship funds, in the form of GET units or
through direct payments from the GET ready for math and science
scholarship account, to institutions of higher education on behalf of
scholarship recipients identified by the program administrator, as long
as recipients continue to meet the requirements of section 903(2) of
this act;
(3) Provide the program administrator with annual reports of
enrollment, contact, and graduation information of scholars, provided
they have given permission for the board to do so;
(4) Track program graduates to ensure that they work in Washington
state in a mathematics or science-related occupation for at least three
years after college graduation, or pay back the scholarship, prorated
based on the length of time worked in a mathematics or science-related
occupation in Washington. Students may postpone their in-state work
requirement in order to attend graduate school in a qualified program
for up to three years after completion of an undergraduate qualified
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR--DUTIES. The
program administrator shall:
(1) Raise funds from the private and nonprofit sectors to match
state funds appropriated for the GET ready for math and science
scholarship program;
(2) Develop and implement a student application, selection, and
notification process for scholarships;
(3) Notify institutions of higher education of scholarship
recipients who will attend their institutions and inform them of the
terms of the students' eligibility; and
(4) Report to private donors on the program outcomes and facilitate
contact between students and donors, if students have given the
foundation permission to do so, in order for donors to offer summer
employment opportunities, internships, career information and job
opportunities after graduation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 QUALIFIED PROGRAMS. The board and the
program administrator shall determine qualified mathematics and
science-related college degree programs for this scholarship program.
The list of eligible programs shall be updated biennially. However,
once a student has been accepted into an eligible mathematics or
science degree program, the student may continue in that program, even
if it is subsequently removed from the list of qualified programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 GET READY FOR MATH AND SCIENCE SCHOLARSHIP
ACCOUNT. (1) The GET ready for math and science scholarship account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer.
(2) The board shall deposit into the account all money received for
the GET ready for math and science scholarship program from
appropriations and private sources. The account shall be
self-sustaining.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall be used for scholarships to
eligible students and for purchases of GET units. Purchased GET units
shall be owned and held in trust by the board. Expenditures from the
account shall be an equal match of state appropriations and private
funds raised by the program administrator.
(4) With the exception of the operating costs associated with the
management of the account by the treasurer's office as authorized in
chapter 43.79A RCW, the account shall be credited with all investment
income earned by the account.
(5) Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations
and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.
(6) Disbursements from the account shall be made only on the
authorization of the board.

Sec. 909 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2006 c 311 s 21 and 2006 c 120 s 2
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers
conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the
GET ready for math and science scholarship account, the grain
inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing commission
class C purse fund account, the individual development account program
account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account
(earnings from the Washington horse racing commission operating account
must be credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account), the life sciences discovery fund, and the reading
achievement account. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

PART 10
REGIONAL OPPORTUNITY GRANT PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 REGIONAL OPPORTUNITY GRANT PROGRAM--INTENT. The legislature finds that:
(1) The economic trends of globalization and technological change
are increasing the demand for higher and differently skilled workers
than in the past;
(2) Increasing Washington's economic competitiveness requires
increasing the supply of skilled workers in the state;
(3) Improving the labor market competitiveness of all Washington
residents requires that all residents have access to postsecondary
education; and
(4) Community and technical college workforce training programs and
Washington state apprenticeship and training council-approved
apprenticeship programs provide effective and efficient pathways for
people to enter high-wage, high-skilled careers while also meeting the
needs of the economy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50
RCW to read as follows:
REGIONAL OPPORTUNITY GRANT PROGRAM. (1) The college board shall
develop and implement a workforce education program known as the
regional opportunity grant program to provide funding for students
enrolled at public community and technical colleges in regional
opportunity grant-eligible programs of study determined through the
process described in section 1003 of this act. Students enrolled in
the regional opportunity grant program are eligible for:
(a) Funding for tuition and mandatory fees at the public community
and technical college rate, prorated if the credit load is less than
full time, paid directly to the educational institution; and
(b) An additional allowance for books, tools, and supplies.
(2) Funding under this section is limited to a maximum forty-five
credits in a regional opportunity grant-eligible program of study,
including required related courses. No student may receive regional
opportunity grant funding for more than forty-five credits or for more
than three years from initial receipt of grant funds in one or a
combination of programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50
RCW to read as follows:
REGIONAL OPPORTUNITY GRANT PROGRAM--ELIGIBILITY--GOALS--COLLABORATION WITH THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD. (1) To be
eligible for participation in the regional opportunity grant program
established in section 1002 of this act, a student must be eligible for
resident tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 and
28B.15.013, be enrolled in a vocational program of study, and have a
family income that is at or below the state median family income using
the state need grant schedule for the same academic year.
(2) The college board shall develop goals for student retention and
completion. It shall set annual performance measures and targets and
monitor the performance at all public community and technical colleges.
(3) The college board and the higher education coordinating board
shall work together to ensure that students participating in the
regional opportunity grant program receive all other state and federal
financial aid to which they are entitled while receiving a regional
opportunity grant.
(4) The college board and the higher education coordinating board
shall document the amount of regional opportunity grant assistance and
the types and amounts of other sources of financial aid received by
participating students. Annually, they shall produce a summary of the
data.
(5) The college board shall:
(a) Develop the program and begin enrolling students no later than
January 2008; and
(b) Submit a progress report to appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50
RCW to read as follows:
REGIONAL OPPORTUNITY GRANT PROGRAM--COLLEGE BOARD DUTIES. The
college board, in partnership with business, labor, and the workforce
training and education coordinating board, shall:
(1) Identify job specific training programs offered by qualified
postsecondary institutions that lead to a credential, certificate, or
degree in high-demand occupations, which are occupations where employer
demand for workers exceeds the supply of qualified job applicants
throughout the state or in a specific region;
(2) Designate recognized credentials, certificates, and degrees as
"regional opportunity grant-eligible programs of study"; and
(3) Market the credentials, certificates, and degrees to potential
students, businesses, and apprenticeship programs as a way for
individuals to advance in their careers and to better meet the needs of
industry.

PART 11
EXPANDING ELIGIBILITY FOR THE STATE NEED GRANT PROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101 The legislature finds that many adults
who wish to improve their skills or complete a college degree also have
to work full time to support a family or are single parents, and are
able to attend only one class per term. This should not disqualify
them from the state's primary financial aid program if they would
otherwise be eligible based on their income.

Sec. 1102 RCW 28B.15.820 and 2004 c 275 s 66 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each institution of higher education, including technical
colleges, shall deposit a minimum of three and one-half percent of
revenues collected from tuition and services and activities fees in an
institutional financial aid fund that is hereby created and which shall
be held locally. Moneys in the fund shall be used only for the
following purposes: (a) To make guaranteed long-term loans to eligible
students as provided in subsections (3) through (8) of this section;
(b) to make short-term loans as provided in subsection (9) of this
section; or (c) to provide financial aid to needy students as provided
in subsection (10) of this section.
(2) An "eligible student" for the purposes of subsections (3)
through (8) and (10) of this section is a student registered for at
least ((six)) three credit hours or the equivalent, who is eligible for
resident tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 and
28B.15.013, and who is a "needy student" as defined in RCW 28B.92.030.
(3) The amount of the guaranteed long-term loans made under this
section shall not exceed the demonstrated financial need of the
student. Each institution shall establish loan terms and conditions
which shall be consistent with the terms of the guaranteed loan program
established by 20 U.S. Code Section 1071 et seq., as now or hereafter
amended. All loans made shall be guaranteed by the Washington student
loan guaranty association or its successor agency. Institutions are
hereby granted full authority to operate as an eligible lender under
the guaranteed loan program.
(4) Before approving a guaranteed long-term loan, each institution
shall analyze the ability of the student to repay the loan based on
factors which include, but are not limited to, the student's
accumulated total education loan burdens and the employment
opportunities and average starting salary characteristics of the
student's chosen fields of study. The institution shall counsel the
student on the advisability of acquiring additional debt, and on the
availability of other forms of financial aid.
(5) Each institution is responsible for collection of guaranteed
long-term loans made under this section and shall exercise due
diligence in such collection, maintaining all necessary records to
insure that maximum repayments are made. Institutions shall cooperate
with other lenders and the Washington student loan guaranty
association, or its successor agency, in the coordinated collection of
guaranteed loans, and shall assure that the guarantability of the loans
is not violated. Collection and servicing of guaranteed long-term
loans under this section shall be performed by entities approved for
such servicing by the Washington student loan guaranty association or
its successor agency: PROVIDED, That institutions be permitted to
perform such servicing if specifically recognized to do so by the
Washington student loan guaranty association or its successor agency.
Collection and servicing of guaranteed long-term loans made by
community colleges under subsection (1) of this section shall be
coordinated by the state board for community and technical colleges and
shall be conducted under procedures adopted by the state board.
(6) Receipts from payment of interest or principal or any other
subsidies to which institutions as lenders are entitled, that are paid
by or on behalf of borrowers of funds under subsections (3) through (8)
of this section, shall be deposited in each institution's financial aid
fund and shall be used to cover the costs of making the guaranteed
long-term loans under this section and maintaining necessary records
and making collections under subsection (5) of this section: PROVIDED,
That such costs shall not exceed five percent of aggregate outstanding
loan principal. Institutions shall maintain accurate records of such
costs, and all receipts beyond those necessary to pay such costs, shall
be deposited in the institution's financial aid fund.
(7) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College, and the state board for
community and technical colleges, on behalf of the community colleges
and technical colleges, shall each adopt necessary rules and
regulations to implement this section.
(8) First priority for any guaranteed long-term loans made under
this section shall be directed toward students who would not normally
have access to educational loans from private financial institutions in
Washington state, and maximum use shall be made of secondary markets in
the support of loan consolidation.
(9) Short-term loans, not to exceed one year, may be made from the
institutional financial aid fund to students enrolled in the
institution. No such loan shall be made to any student who is known by
the institution to be in default or delinquent in the payment of any
outstanding student loan. A short-term loan may be made only if the
institution has ample evidence that the student has the capability of
repaying the loan within the time frame specified by the institution
for repayment.
(10) Any moneys deposited in the institutional financial aid fund
that are not used in making long-term or short-term loans may be used
by the institution for locally-administered financial aid programs for
needy students, such as need-based institutional employment programs or
need-based tuition and fee scholarship or grant programs. These funds
shall be used in addition to and not to replace institutional funds
that would otherwise support these locally-administered financial aid
programs. First priority in the use of these funds shall be given to
needy students who have accumulated excessive educational loan burdens.
An excessive educational loan burden is a burden that will be difficult
to repay given employment opportunities and average starting salaries
in the student's chosen fields of study. Second priority in the use of
these funds shall be given to needy single parents, to assist these
students with their educational expenses, including expenses associated
with child care and transportation.

Sec. 1103 RCW 28B.92.080 and 2004 c 275 s 39 are each amended to
read as follows:
For a student to be eligible for a state need grant a student must:
(1) Be a "needy student" or "disadvantaged student" as determined
by the board in accordance with RCW 28B.92.030 (3) and (4).
(2) Have been domiciled within the state of Washington for at least
one year.
(3) Be enrolled or accepted for enrollment ((on at least a half-time basis)) in at least three credits at an institution of higher
education in Washington as defined in RCW 28B.92.030(1).
(4) Have complied with all the rules ((and regulations)) adopted by
the board for the administration of this chapter.

PART 12
STATEWIDE TUITION POLICY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1201 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15
RCW to read as follows:
TUITION--FUNDING LEVELS--LIMITATIONS. (1) Beginning with the
2007-08 academic year and ending with the 2016-17 academic year,
tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate students may
increase no greater than seven percent over the previous academic year
in any institution of higher education. Annual reductions or increases
in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students shall be
as provided in the omnibus appropriations act, within the seven percent
increase limit established in this section. To the extent that state
appropriations combined with tuition and fee revenues are insufficient
to achieve the total per-student funding goals established in
subsection (2) of this section, the legislature may revisit state
appropriations, authorized enrollment levels, and changes in tuition
fees for any given fiscal year.
(2) The state shall adopt as its goal total per-student funding
levels, from state appropriations plus tuition and fees, of at least
the sixtieth percentile of total per-student funding at similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states. The
office of financial management shall develop a funding trajectory for
each four-year institution of higher education and for the community
and technical college system as a whole that when combined with tuition
and fees revenue allows the state to achieve its funding goal for each
four-year institution and the community and technical college system as
a whole no later than fiscal year 2017. The state shall not reduce
enrollment levels below fiscal year 2007 budgeted levels in order to
improve or alter the per-student funding amount at any four-year
institution of higher education or the community and technical college
system as a whole. The state recognizes that each four-year
institution of higher education and the community and technical college
system as a whole have different funding requirements to achieve
desired performance levels, and that increases to the total per-student
funding amount may need to exceed the minimum funding goal.
(3) By September 1st of each year beginning 2008, the office of
financial management shall report to the governor, the higher education
coordinating board, and appropriate committees of the legislature with
updated estimates of the total per-student funding level that
represents the sixtieth percentile of funding for comparable
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states, and
the progress toward that goal that was made for each of the public
institutions of higher education.
(4) As used in this section, "global challenge states" has the
meaning in section 1402 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1202 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15
RCW to read as follows:
BILLING DISCLOSURES TO STUDENTS. In addition to the requirement in
RCW 28B.76.300(4), institutions of higher education shall disclose to
their undergraduate resident students on the tuition billing statement,
in dollar figures for a full-time equivalent student: (1) The full
cost of instruction, (2) the amount collected from student tuition and
fees, and (3) the difference between the amounts for the full cost of
instruction and the student tuition and fees, noting that the
difference between the cost and tuition was paid by state tax funds and
other moneys.

PART 13
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
Sec. 1301 RCW 28B.76.050 and 2004 c 275 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The members of the board, except ((the chair serving on June 13,
2002, and)) the student member, shall serve for terms of four years,
the terms expiring on June 30th of the fourth year of the term ((except
that in the case of initial members, two shall be appointed to two-year
terms, three shall be appointed to three-year terms, and three shall be
appointed to four-year terms)). The student member shall hold his or
her office for a term of one year ((from)) starting on the first day of
July. ((The chair serving on June 13, 2002, shall serve at the
pleasure of the governor.))

Sec. 1302 RCW 28B.76.090 and 2004 c 275 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The board shall employ a director and may delegate agency
management to the director.)) Effective July 1, 2007, an executive
director shall be appointed by the governor from a list of three names
submitted by the board to the governor. If requested by the governor,
the board shall submit additional names for the governor's
consideration until an appointment is made. The executive director
shall serve at the pleasure of the ((board)) governor, shall be the
executive officer of the board, and shall, under the board's
supervision, administer the provisions of this chapter. The executive
director shall, with the approval of the board: (1) Employ necessary
deputy and assistant directors and other exempt staff under chapter
41.06 RCW who shall serve at his or her pleasure on such terms and
conditions as he or she determines and (2) subject to the provisions of
chapter 41.06 RCW, appoint and employ such other employees as may be
required for the proper discharge of the functions of the board. The
executive director shall exercise such additional powers, other than
rule making, as may be delegated by the board by resolution. In
fulfilling the duties under this chapter, the board shall make
extensive use of those state agencies with responsibility for
implementing and supporting postsecondary education plans and policies
including but not limited to appropriate legislative groups, the
postsecondary education institutions, the office of financial
management, the work force training and education coordinating board,
and the state board for community and technical colleges. Outside
consulting and service agencies may also be employed. The board may
compensate these groups and consultants in appropriate ways.

Sec. 1303 RCW 28B.76.210 and 2004 c 275 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall collaborate with the four-year institutions
including the council of presidents, the community and technical
college system, and when appropriate the work force training and
education coordinating board, the superintendent of public instruction,
and the independent higher educational institutions to identify budget
priorities and levels of funding for higher education, including the
two and four-year institutions of higher education and state financial
aid programs. It is the intent of the legislature that recommendations
from the board reflect not merely the sum of budget requests from
multiple institutions, but prioritized funding needs for the overall
system of higher education.
(2) By December of each odd-numbered year, the board shall
distribute guidelines which outline the board's fiscal priorities to
the institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges. The institutions and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall submit an outline of their proposed budgets,
identifying major components, to the board no later than ((August))
July 1st of each even-numbered year.
(3) The board shall review and evaluate the operating and capital
budget requests from four-year institutions and the community and
technical college system based on how the requests align with the
board's budget priorities, the missions of the institutions, and the
statewide strategic master plan for higher education under RCW
28B.76.200.
(4) The board shall submit recommendations on the proposed budgets
and on the board's budget priorities to the office of financial
management before ((November)) October 1st of each even-numbered year,
and to the legislature by January 1st of each odd-numbered year.
(5) Institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall submit any supplemental budget requests and revisions to
the board at the same time they are submitted to the office of
financial management. The board shall submit recommendations on the
proposed supplemental budget requests to the office of financial
management by November 1st and to the legislature by January 1st.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1304 RCW 28B.76.100 (Advisory council) and
2004 c 275 s 2 & 1985 c 370 s 9 are each repealed.

P-20 DATA PART 14
EDUCATION RESEARCH
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1401 A new section is added to chapter 43.41
RCW to read as follows:
EDUCATION DATA CENTER. (1) The education data center shall be
established in the office of financial management. The education data
center shall conduct collaborative analyses of education issues across
the P-20 system, which system includes the department of early
learning, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional
educator standards board, the state board of education, the state board
for community and technical colleges, the workforce training and
education coordinating board, the higher education coordinating board,
public baccalaureate institutions of higher education, and the
employment security department in their collaborative analysis of early
learning, K-12, and higher education programs. The education data
center shall be considered an education research agency under
applicable federal and state statutes for purposes of receiving and
processing student record data for research purposes.
(2) The education data center shall:
(a) Coordinate with other state education agencies to compile
education data and complete P-20 research projects;
(b) Track enrollment and outcomes through the public centralized
higher education enrollment system;
(c) Assist other state educational agencies' collaborative efforts
to establish benchmarks for Washington compared to the global challenge
states as defined in section 1402 of this act;
(d) Assist other state educational agencies' collaborative efforts
to develop a long-range enrollment plan for higher education including
estimates to meet demographic and workforce needs; and
(e) Provide research support that focuses on student transitions
within and among the early learning, K-12, and higher education sectors
in the P-20 system.
(3) The department of early learning, superintendent of public
instruction, professional educator standards board, state board of
education, state board for community and technical colleges, workforce
training and education coordinating board, higher education
coordinating board, public baccalaureate institutions, and employment
security department shall work with the education data center to
develop data sharing and research agreements, consistent with
applicable security and confidentiality requirements, to facilitate the
work of the center. The education data center shall make data from
collaborative analyses available to the education agencies and
institutions that contribute data to the education data center to the
extent allowed by federal and state security and confidentiality
requirements applicable to the data of each contributing agency or
institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1402 A new section is added to chapter 43.41
RCW to read as follows:
GLOBAL CHALLENGE STATES. The global challenge states are the top
performing states on the new economy index published by the progressive
policy institute as of the effective date of this section. The new
economy index ranks states on indicators of their potential to compete
in the new economy. At least once every five years, the office of
financial management shall determine if changes to the list of global
challenge states are appropriate. The office of financial management
shall report its findings to the governor and the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1403 TEACHER PAY SYSTEM REVIEW. The office of
financial management and the superintendent of public instruction shall
jointly conduct a review of teacher pay systems in the global challenge
states as defined in section 1402 of this act. The office of financial
management and the superintendent of public instruction shall develop
a methodology for comparing teacher salaries among the global challenge
states. The office of financial management shall report to the
governor and the legislature on the findings from this review and the
initial set of teacher salary comparisons among the global challenge
states by January 10, 2008.

PART 15
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1501 SUBHEADINGS, PART HEADINGS, AND CAPTIONS
NOT LAW. Subheadings, part headings, and captions used in this act are
not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1502 Sections 801 through 803 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1503 Sections 901 through 908 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1504 Sections 501 and 1302 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---