BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the purpose of this chapter to provide
for the licensure of persons offering athletic training services to the
public and to ensure standards of competence and professional conduct
on the part of athletic trainers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Athlete" means a person who participates in exercise,
recreation, sport, or games requiring physical strength,
range-of-motion, flexibility, body awareness and control, speed,
stamina, or agility, and the exercise, recreation, sports, or games are
of a type conducted in association with an educational institution or
professional, amateur, or recreational sports club or organization.
(2) "Athletic injury" means an injury or condition sustained by an
athlete that affects the person's participation or performance in
exercise, recreation, sport, or games and the injury or condition is
within the professional preparation and education of an athletic
trainer.
(3) "Athletic trainer" means a person who is licensed under this
chapter. An athletic trainer can practice athletic training through
the consultation, referral, or service plan of a licensed health care
provider working within their scope of practice.
(4)(a) "Athletic training" means the application of the following
principles and methods as provided by a licensed athletic trainer:
(i) Risk management and prevention of athletic injuries through
preactivity screening and evaluation, educational programs, physical
conditioning and reconditioning programs, application of commercial
products, use of protective equipment, and reduction of environmental
risks;
(ii) Recognition, evaluation, and assessment of athletic injuries
by obtaining a history of the athletic injury, inspection and palpation
of the injured part and associated structures, and performance of
specific testing techniques related to stability and function to
determine the extent of an injury;
(iii) Immediate care of athletic injuries, including emergency
medical situations through the application of first-aid and emergency
procedures and techniques for nonlife-threatening or life-threatening
athletic injuries;
(iv) Treatment, rehabilitation, and reconditioning of athletic
injuries through the application of physical agents and modalities,
therapeutic activities and exercise, standard reassessment techniques
and procedures, commercial products, and educational programs;
(v) Administration and organization of services provided by an
athletic trainer to establish and implement policies and procedures for
the delivery of health care services, management of health care
facilities, complying with governmental and institutional standards,
and maintaining records to document services rendered;
(vi) Education of athletes regarding the roles and standards of the
practice of athletic training; and
(vii) Referral of an athlete to an appropriately licensed health
care provider if the athletic injury requires further definitive care
or the injury or condition is outside an athletic trainer's scope of
practice.
(b) "Athletic training" does not include:
(i) The use of spinal adjustment or manipulative mobilization of
the spine and its immediate articulations;
(ii) Orthotic or prosthetic services with the exception of
evaluation, measurement, fitting, and adjustment of temporary,
prefabricated or direct-formed orthosis as defined in chapter 18.200
RCW;
(iii) The practice of occupational therapy as defined in chapter
18.59 RCW;
(iv) The practice of acupuncture as defined in chapter 18.06 RCW;
and
(v) Prescribing legend drugs or controlled substances, or surgery.
(5) "Committee" means the athletic training advisory committee.
(6) "Department" means the department of health.
(7) "Licensed health care provider" means a physician, physician
assistant, osteopathic physician, osteopathic physician assistant,
advanced registered nurse practitioner, naturopath, physical therapist,
chiropractor, dentist, massage practitioner, acupuncturist,
occupational therapist, or podiatric physician and surgeon.
(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(9) "Service plan" means a written course of action developed in
collaboration with an athletic trainer and a licensed health care
provider working within their scope of practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) In addition to any other authority
provided by law, the secretary may:
(a) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to
implement this chapter;
(b) Establish all license, examination, and renewal fees in
accordance with RCW 43.70.250;
(c) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(d) Establish administrative procedures, administrative
requirements, and fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
All fees collected under this section must be credited to the health
professions account as required under RCW 43.70.320;
(e) Develop and administer, or approve, or both, examinations to
applicants for a license under this chapter;
(f) Issue a license to any applicant who has met the education,
training, and examination requirements for licensure and deny a license
to applicants who do not meet the minimum qualifications for licensure.
However, denial of licenses based on unprofessional conduct or impaired
practice is governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130
RCW;
(g) Determine which states have credentialing requirements
substantially equivalent to those of this state, and issue licenses to
individuals credentialed in those states that have successfully
fulfilled the requirements of section 8 of this act;
(h) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as
needed to implement and administer this chapter;
(i) Maintain the official department record of all applicants and
licensees; and
(j) Establish requirements and procedures for an inactive license.
(2) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the
discipline of licensees under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The athletic training advisory committee
is formed to further the purposes of this chapter.
(2) The committee consists of five members. Four members of the
committee must be athletic trainers licensed under this chapter and
residing in this state, must have not less than five years' experience
in the practice of athletic training, and must be actively engaged in
practice within two years of appointment. The fifth member must be
appointed from the public at large, and have an interest in the rights
of consumers of health services.
(3) The committee may provide advice on matters specifically
identified and requested by the secretary, such as applications for
licenses.
(4) The committee may be requested by the secretary to approve an
examination required for licensure under this chapter.
(5) The committee, at the request of the secretary, may recommend
rules in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter
34.05 RCW, relating to standards for appropriateness of athletic
training care.
(6) The committee must meet during the year as necessary to provide
advice to the secretary. The committee may elect a chair and a
vice-chair. A majority of the members currently serving constitute a
quorum.
(7) Each member of the committee must be reimbursed for travel
expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. In addition,
members of the committee must be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.240 when engaged in the authorized business of the committee.
(8) The secretary, members of the committee, or individuals acting
on their behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal,
based on any credentialing or disciplinary proceedings or other
official acts performed in the course of their duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 It is unlawful for any person to practice or
offer to practice as an athletic trainer, or to represent themselves or
other persons to be legally able to provide services as an athletic
trainer, unless the person is licensed under the provisions of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Nothing in this chapter may prohibit,
restrict, or require licensure of:
(1) Any person licensed, certified, or registered in this state and
performing services within the authorized scope of practice;
(2) The practice by an individual employed by the government of the
United States as an athletic trainer while engaged in the performance
of duties prescribed by the laws of the United States;
(3) Any person pursuing a supervised course of study in an
accredited athletic training educational program, if the person is
designated by a title that clearly indicates a student or trainee
status;
(4) An athletic trainer from another state for purposes of
continuing education, consulting, or performing athletic training
services while accompanying his or her group, individual, or
representatives into Washington state on a temporary basis for no more
than ninety days in a calendar year;
(5) Any elementary, secondary, or postsecondary school teacher,
educator, coach, or authorized volunteer who does not represent
themselves to the public as an athletic trainer; or
(6) A personal trainer employed by an athletic club or fitness
center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 An applicant for an athletic trainer license
must:
(1) Have received a bachelor's or advanced degree from an
accredited four-year college or university that meets the academic
standards of athletic training, accepted by the secretary, as advised
by the committee;
(2) Have earned a credential as an athletic trainer from the
national athletic trainers' association board of certification or its
successor organization, accepted by the secretary, as advised by the
committee;
(3) Be in good standing with and provide documentation of current
certification by the national athletic trainers' association board of
certification or its successor organization, accepted by the secretary,
as advised by the committee; and
(4) Submit an application on forms prescribed by the secretary and
pay the licensure fee required under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Each applicant and license holder must
comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and
fees under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The secretary shall furnish a
license to any person who applies and who has qualified under the
provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Nothing in this chapter restricts the
ability of athletic trainers to work in the practice setting of his or
her choice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Nothing in this chapter may be construed to
require that individual or group policies or contracts of an insurance
carrier, health care service contractor, or health maintenance
organization provide benefits or coverage for services and supplies
provided by a person licensed under this chapter.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.130.040 and 2004 c 38 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(iii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iv) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(v) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(vi) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vii) Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
(viii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(ix) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(x) Persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(xi) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, marriage and
family therapists, and social workers under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xii) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xiii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiv) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xvi) Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter
18.205 RCW;
(xvii) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex
offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;
(xviii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xix) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xx) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;
(xxi) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
((and))
(xxii) Recreational therapists; and
(xxiii) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 10 of this act).
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW; and
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses
based on the conditions and criteria established in this chapter and
the chapters specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter
also governs any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to
denial of licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the
applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW 18.130.160
by the disciplining authority.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act takes effect September 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The secretary of health may take the
necessary steps to ensure that this act is implemented on its effective
date.

--- END ---