BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds it is necessary to
realign Washington's child welfare system over time. The legislature
finds that although it is the stated mission of the children's
administration in the department of social and health services to
protect children, help families care for and parent their children, and
find safe homes for children, the mission may be compromised by the
goals, objectives, size, and complexity of the larger agency of which
it is a part.
The legislature intends for there to be accountability for the
safety and protection of children in the system. The legislature
believes that the children's administration is unable to implement its
own policies because it is distracted from its goals by its location in
the department of social and health services, a large umbrella agency.
The legislature believes that an independent agency will be more
efficient and more effective than under the current umbrella agency and
that a small operational and administrative structure will improve
employee morale.
The legislature intends that it be the mission of the new
department of family and children's services to first protect abused
and neglected children, support the efforts of families to care for and
parent their own children safely, and provide quality care and
permanent families for children, in partnership with tribes, foster
parents, and communities. The legislature intends that the new
department of family and children's services will be responsible to and
accountable for the stable placement of children, the obtaining of
mental health services for families and their children, the improvement
of foster parent training and support, identifying and correcting
unsafe and inappropriate placements, ensuring that siblings are not
separated from each other when placed in out-of-home care, increasing
the quality and frequency of contact and visitation between siblings in
out-of-home placement, and ensuring services to adolescents.
The legislature intends that the separate agency focus on timely
recruitment and retention of high quality permanent families for
children and the provision of adequate support for foster parents. A
single state agency can develop a true partnership with tribes, foster
parents, and communities around the need for permanent homes for
children in a more effective way than as part of a large umbrella
agency.
The legislature also expects the new department to collaborate with
and when possible to work with tribes, foster parents, and communities
to anticipate problems and prevent child abuse and neglect, and to
provide effective services to protect children and strengthen families
when child abuse and neglect have occurred. The legislature finds that
to learn how to prevent abuse and neglect of children, and to gain a
greater understanding of the prevalence and location of this abuse,
valid research data and program statistics must be shared. The
legislature finds that high quality services will be provided when
accountability is expected and there is motivation for higher quality
strategies for protecting children.
The legislature finds that the public does not have confidence in
the department of social and health services' ability to fulfill the
mission of protecting children, helping their parents, and finding
families for children, in a cost-effective manner. The legislature
finds that confidence in government is critical to achieving the goals
of the mission. The legislature finds that this confidence is built by
the willingness to take responsibility. The current children's
administration does not adequately take responsibility and the umbrella
agency does not hold it accountable for meeting its goals and
objectives.
The legislature intends that there will be more accountability for
the safety, well-being, and permanence for children in a separate
department of family and children's services.
The legislature intends that adequate attention paid to families
and children with regard to preventing and reducing the incidences of
abuse and neglect will help reduce delinquency and juvenile crime.
The legislature intends that families will be better supported in
their efforts to care for and parent their own children if the services
are located in a single accountable agency. The current children's
administration has many methods set in guidelines but does not produce
the results needed to ensure the mission is accomplished. The
legislature intends that the separate state agency leadership be held
accountable to produce results.

PART 1
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY AND CHILDREN'S SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility that receives children, expectant mothers, or
persons with developmental disabilities for control, care, or
maintenance outside their own homes, or that places, arranges the
placement of, or assists in the placement of children, expectant
mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities for foster care or
placement of children for adoption, and includes the following
irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency or to the
children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities
for services rendered:
(a) "Child-placing agency" means an agency which places a child or
children for temporary care, continued care, or for adoption;
(b) "Community facility" means a group care facility operated for
the care of juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185.
A county detention facility that houses juveniles committed to the
department under RCW 13.40.185 pursuant to a contract with the
department is not a community facility;
(c) "Crisis residential center" means an agency that is a temporary
protective residential facility operated to perform the duties
specified in chapter 13.32A RCW, in the manner provided in RCW
74.13.032 through 74.13.036;
(d) "Emergency respite center" is an agency that may be commonly
known as a crisis nursery, that provides emergency and crisis care for
up to seventy-two hours to children who have been admitted by their
parents or guardians to prevent abuse or neglect. Emergency respite
centers may operate for up to twenty-four hours a day, and for up to
seven days a week. Emergency respite centers may provide care for
children ages birth through seventeen, and for persons eighteen through
twenty with developmental disabilities who are admitted with a sibling
or siblings through age seventeen. Emergency respite centers may not
substitute for crisis residential centers or HOPE centers, or any other
services defined under this section, and may not substitute for
services that are required under chapter 13.32A or 13.34 RCW;
(e) "Foster family home" means an agency that regularly provides
care on a twenty-four hour basis to one or more children, expectant
mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities in the family abode
of the person or persons under whose direct care and supervision the
child, expectant mother, or person with a developmental disability is
placed;
(f) "Group care facility" means an agency, other than a foster
family home, that is maintained and operated for the care of a group of
children on a twenty-four hour basis;
(g) "HOPE center" means an agency licensed by the director to
provide temporary residential placement and other services to street
youth. A street youth may remain in a HOPE center for thirty days
while services are arranged and permanent placement is coordinated. No
street youth may stay longer than thirty days unless approved by the
department and any additional days approved by the department must be
based on the unavailability of a long-term placement option. A street
youth whose parent wants him or her returned to home may remain in a
HOPE center until his or her parent arranges return of the youth, not
longer. All other street youth must have court approval under chapter
13.34 or 13.32A RCW to remain in a HOPE center up to thirty days;
(h) "Maternity service" means an agency that provides or arranges
for care or services to expectant mothers, before or during
confinement, or that provides care as needed to mothers and their
infants after confinement;
(i) "Responsible living skills program" means an agency licensed by
the department that provides residential and transitional living
services to persons ages sixteen to eighteen who are dependent under
chapter 13.34 RCW and who have been unable to live in his or her
legally authorized residence and, as a result, the minor lived outdoors
or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy by the minor.
Dependent minors ages fourteen and fifteen may be eligible if no other
placement alternative is available and the department approves the
placement;
(j) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community
facility.
(2) "Agency" shall not include the following:
(a) Persons related to the child, expectant mother, or person with
a developmental disability in the following ways:
(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and
including first cousins, nephews, or nieces, and persons of preceding
generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;
(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;
(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as
well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons,
and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state
law;
(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (2), even after the marriage is terminated; or
(v) Extended family members, as defined by the law or custom of the
Indian child's tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, a person
who has reached the age of eighteen and who is the Indian child's
grandparent, aunt or uncle, brother or sister, brother-in-law or
sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin, or stepparent
who provides care in the family abode on a twenty-four hour basis to an
Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4);
(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child, expectant mother,
or persons with developmental disabilities;
(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or
children, with or without compensation, where the parent and person
providing care on a twenty-four hour basis have agreed to the placement
in writing and the state is not providing any payment for the care;
(d) A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that
provides placement or similar services to exchange students or
international student exchange visitors or persons who have the care of
an exchange student in their home;
(e) A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that
provides placement or similar services to international children who
have entered the country by obtaining visas that meet the criteria for
medical care as established by the United States immigration and
naturalization service, or persons who have the care of such an
international child in their home;
(f) Schools, including boarding schools, that are engaged primarily
in education, operate on a definite school year schedule, follow a
stated academic curriculum, accept only school-age children, and do not
accept custody of children;
(g) Hospitals licensed pursuant to chapter 70.41 RCW when
performing functions defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, nursing homes
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, and boarding homes licensed under
chapter 18.20 RCW;
(h) Licensed physicians or lawyers;
(i) Facilities approved and certified under chapter 71A.22 RCW;
(j) Any agency having been in operation in this state ten years
before June 8, 1967, and not seeking or accepting moneys or assistance
from any state or federal agency, and is supported in part by an
endowment or trust fund;
(k) Persons who have a child in their home for purposes of
adoption, if the child was placed in such home by a licensed child-placing agency, an authorized public or tribal agency, or court or if
a replacement report has been filed under chapter 26.33 RCW and the
placement has been approved by the court;
(l) An agency operated by any unit of local, state, or federal
government or an agency licensed by an Indian tribe pursuant to RCW
74.15.190;
(m) A maximum or medium security program for juvenile offenders
operated by or under contract with the juvenile rehabilitation
administration;
(n) An agency located on a federal military reservation, except
where the military authorities request that such agency be subject to
the licensing requirements of this chapter.
(3) "Department" means the department of family and children's
services.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The director shall have the power and it
shall be the director's duty to:
(1) In consultation with the children's services advisory
committee, and with the advice and assistance of persons representative
of the various type agencies to be licensed, designate categories of
facilities for which separate or different requirements shall be
developed as may be appropriate whether because of variations in the
ages, sex, and other characteristics of persons served, variations in
the purposes and services offered, or size or structure of the agencies
to be licensed under this chapter, or because of any other factor
relevant thereto;
(2) In consultation with the children's services advisory
committee, and with the advice and assistance of persons representative
of the various type agencies to be licensed, adopt and publish minimum
requirements for licensing applicable to each of the various categories
of agencies to be licensed. The minimum requirements shall be limited
to:
(a) The size and suitability of a facility and the plan of
operation for carrying out the purpose for which an applicant seeks a
license;
(b) The character, suitability, and competence of an agency and
other persons associated with an agency directly responsible for the
care and treatment of children, expectant mothers, or persons with
developmental disabilities. In consultation with law enforcement
personnel, the director shall investigate the conviction record or
pending charges and dependency record information under chapter 43.43
RCW of each agency and its staff seeking licensure or relicensure. No
unfounded allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020 may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption
agency, or any other provider licensed under this chapter. In order to
determine the suitability of applicants for an agency license,
licensees, their employees, and other persons who have unsupervised
access to children in care, and who have not resided in the state of
Washington during the three-year period before being authorized to care
for children shall be fingerprinted. The fingerprints shall be
forwarded to the Washington state patrol and federal bureau of
investigation for a criminal history record investigation. The
fingerprint criminal history record information shall be at the expense
of the licensee except that in the case of a foster family home, if
this expense would work a hardship on the licensee, the department
shall pay the expense. The licensee may not pass this cost on to the
employee or prospective employee, unless the employee is determined to
be unsuitable due to his or her criminal history record. The director
shall use the information solely for the purpose of determining
eligibility for a license and for determining the character,
suitability, and competence of those persons or agencies, excluding
parents, not required to be licensed who are authorized to care for
children, expectant mothers, and persons with developmental
disabilities. Criminal justice agencies shall provide the director
such information as they may have and that the director may require for
such purpose;
(c) The number of qualified persons required to render the type of
care and treatment for which an agency seeks a license;
(d) The safety, cleanliness, and general adequacy of the premises
to provide for the comfort, care, and well-being of children, expectant
mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities;
(e) The provision of necessary care, including food, clothing,
supervision, and discipline; physical, mental, and social well-being;
and educational, recreational, and spiritual opportunities for those
served;
(f) The financial ability of an agency to comply with minimum
requirements established under chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031; and
(g) The maintenance of records pertaining to the admission,
progress, health, and discharge of persons served;
(3) Investigate any person, including relatives by blood or
marriage except for parents, for character, suitability, and competence
in the care and treatment of children, expectant mothers, and persons
with developmental disabilities before authorizing that person to care
for children, expectant mothers, and persons with developmental
disabilities. However, if a child is placed with a relative under RCW
13.34.065 or 13.34.130, and if such relative appears otherwise suitable
and competent to provide care and treatment, the criminal history
record information required by this section need not be completed
before placement, but shall be completed as soon as possible after
placement;
(4) On reports of alleged child abuse and neglect, investigate
agencies in accordance with chapter 26.44 RCW, including child day care
centers and family day care homes, to determine whether the alleged
abuse or neglect has occurred, and whether child protective services or
referral to a law enforcement agency is appropriate;
(5) Issue, revoke, or deny licenses to agencies under chapter 74.15
RCW and RCW 74.13.031. Licenses shall specify the category of care
that an agency is authorized to render and the ages, sex, and number of
persons to be served;
(6) Prescribe the procedures and the form and contents of reports
necessary for the administration of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031
and to require regular reports from each licensee;
(7) Inspect agencies periodically to determine whether or not there
is compliance with chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 and the
requirements adopted under this chapter;
(8) Review requirements adopted under this chapter at least every
two years and adopt appropriate changes after consultation with the
children's services advisory committee for requirements for other
agencies;
(9) Engage in negotiated rule making under RCW 34.05.310(2)(a) with
the exclusive representative of the family child care licensees
selected in accordance with RCW 74.15.035 and with other affected
interests before adopting requirements that affect family child care
licensees; and
(10) Consult with public and private agencies in order to help them
improve their methods and facilities for the care of children,
expectant mothers, and persons with developmental disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 (1) The executive head and appointing
authority of the department is the director. The director shall be
appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate, and shall
serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall be paid a
salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.
If a vacancy occurs in the position of director while the senate is not
in session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the
next meeting of the senate when the governor's nomination for the
office of director shall be presented.
(2) The director may employ staff members, who shall be exempt from
chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are necessary to
administer this chapter. The director may delegate any power or duty
vested in him or her by this chapter, including authority to make final
decisions and enter final orders in hearings conducted under chapter
34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 It is the intent of the legislature
wherever possible to place the internal affairs of the department under
the control of the director in order that the director may institute
therein the flexible, alert, and intelligent management of its business
that changing contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever
the director's authority is not specifically limited by law, the
director has complete charge and supervisory powers over the
department. The director may create such administrative structures as
the director considers appropriate, except as otherwise specified by
law. The director may employ such assistants and personnel as
necessary for the general administration of the department. This
employment shall be in accordance with the state civil service law,
chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 The director may appoint such advisory
committees or councils as may be required by any federal legislation as
a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the department. The
director may also appoint statewide committees or councils on such
subject matters as are or come within the department's
responsibilities. The committees or councils shall be constituted as
required by federal law or as the director may determine.
Members of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid
their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 In furtherance of the policy of the state
to cooperate with the federal government in all of the programs under
the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as may become necessary
to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may be adopted,
unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal
funds. Any section or provision of law dealing with the department
that may be susceptible to more than one construction shall be
interpreted in favor of the construction most likely to comply with
federal laws entitling this state to receive federal funds for the
various programs of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 A new section is added to chapter 41.06
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply in the department of family and
children's services to the director and the director's personal
secretary.

Sec. 108 RCW 43.17.010 and 2006 c 265 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be departments of the state government which shall be
known as (1) the department of social and health services, (2) the
department of ecology, (3) the department of labor and industries, (4)
the department of agriculture, (5) the department of fish and wildlife,
(6) the department of transportation, (7) the department of licensing,
(8) the department of general administration, (9) the department of
community, trade, and economic development, (10) the department of
veterans affairs, (11) the department of revenue, (12) the department
of retirement systems, (13) the department of corrections, (14) the
department of health, (15) the department of financial institutions,
(16) the department of archaeology and historic preservation, ((and))
(17) the department of early learning, and (18) the department of
family and children's services, which shall be charged with the
execution, enforcement, and administration of such laws, and invested
with such powers and required to perform such duties, as the
legislature may provide.

Sec. 109 RCW 43.17.020 and 2006 c 265 s 112 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the
director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the
director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the
secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the
director of general administration, (9) the director of community,
trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans affairs,
(11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems,
(13) the secretary of corrections, (14) the secretary of health, (15)
the director of financial institutions, (16) the director of the
department of archaeology and historic preservation, ((and)) (17) the
director of early learning, and (18) the director of the department of
family and children's services.
Such officers, except the director of fish and wildlife, shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold
office at the pleasure of the governor. The director of fish and
wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as
prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 110 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2006 c 265 s 113 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the director of
the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of
community, trade, and economic development, the secretary of
corrections, the director of early learning, the director of ecology,
the commissioner of employment security, the chair of the energy
facility site evaluation council, the director of family and children's
services, the secretary of the state finance committee, the director of
financial management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive
secretary of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the
gambling commission, the director of general administration, the
secretary of health, the administrator of the Washington state health
care authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the
executive secretary of the human rights commission, the executive
secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of
the department of information services, the director of the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation, the executive director of the state
investment board, the director of labor and industries, the director of
licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the director of the
office of minority and women's business enterprises, the director of
parks and recreation, the director of personnel, the executive director
of the public disclosure commission, the director of retirement
systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health
services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive
secretary of the board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation,
the secretary of the utilities and transportation commission, the
director of veterans affairs, the president of each of the regional and
state universities and the president of The Evergreen State College,
and each district and each campus president of each state community
college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, board of
trustees of each community college, each member of the state board for
community and technical colleges, state convention and trade center
board of directors, committee for deferred compensation, Eastern
Washington University board of trustees, Washington economic
development finance authority, The Evergreen State College board of
trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices appeals board,
forest practices board, gambling commission, life sciences discovery
fund authority board of trustees, Washington health care facilities
authority, each member of the Washington health services commission,
higher education coordinating board, higher education facilities
authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance commission,
human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review board, board of
industrial insurance appeals, information services board, interagency
committee for outdoor recreation, state investment board, commission on
judicial conduct, legislative ethics board, liquor control board,
lottery commission, marine oversight board, Pacific Northwest electric
power and conservation planning council, parks and recreation
commission, ((personnel appeals board,)) board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure
commission, public pension commission, shorelines hearing board, public
employees' benefits board, salmon recovery funding board, board of tax
appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington board of
regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington state
maritime commission, Washington personnel resources board, Washington
public power supply system executive board, Washington State University
board of regents, Western Washington University board of trustees, and
fish and wildlife commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of
the department of social and health services pertaining to children and
family services are transferred to the department of family and
children's services. All references to the secretary or the department
of social and health services in the Revised Code of Washington shall
be construed to mean the director or the department of family and
children's services when referring to the functions transferred in this
section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
social and health services pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department
of family and children's services. All cabinets, furniture, office
equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the
department of social and health services in carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the
department of family and children's services. All funds, credits, or
other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be assigned to the department of family and
children's services.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health
services for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and
credited to the department of family and children's services.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of social and health services
engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of family and
children's services. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW,
the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of family
and children's services to perform their usual duties upon the same
terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action
that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and
rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
social and health services pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department
of family and children's services. All existing contracts and
obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the
department of family and children's services.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of social and health services shall not affect the
validity of any act performed before the effective date of this
section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public
employment relations commission as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 (1) The director of financial management
and the secretary of social and health services shall jointly develop
a reorganization implementation plan to implement this act. The plan
shall take into account recommendations from interested individuals.
(2) The plan shall detail the implementation steps to effectuate
the transfer of the:
(a) Children's administration relating to children to the
department of family and children's services; and
(b) Juvenile rehabilitation administration to the department of
family and children's services.
(3) In developing the recommendations required under this section,
the director and the secretary shall consult with the directors of the
departments of general administration and personnel to ensure that no
duplication of functions occurs between the departments of general
administration and personnel, and other departments.
(4) The completed reorganization implementation plan shall be
submitted to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature
by November 1, 2007.
(5) The plan shall include details addressing the following areas
of legislative, public, and departmental concerns:
(a) Assessment and increased accountability measures over all
transferred functions;
(b) Quantifiable outcomes for all transferred functions;
(c) Equitable cost-effective coordinated service delivery and
continuity of care enhancements, including coordination with all
relevant service delivery components at the state, local, and private
level for the family and individuals in need;
(d) Staffing support and caseload management enhancements;
(e) Federal requirements, including but not limited to federal
reforms and the ability to continue participating to the maximum extent
possible in the receipt of federal funds and grants;
(f) Promotion of public and private partnerships; and
(g) Retention of centralized core administrative services such as
payment, financial, and information systems, until at least the year
2008.
(6) By November 1, 2007, the director of financial management and
the secretary of the department of social and health services shall
jointly submit to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature any proposed legislation necessary to implement the
reorganization implementation plan.
(7) This section expires June 30, 2008.

PART 2
STATUTORY REFERENCES
Sec. 201 RCW 26.44.020 and 2006 c 339 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington,
juvenile department.
(2) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department, the
prosecuting attorney, the state patrol, the director of public safety,
or the office of the sheriff.
(3) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a
person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine and
surgery, optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic
medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery or to provide other
health services. The term "practitioner" includes a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a person who
is being furnished Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner will not be considered, for that reason
alone, a neglected person for the purposes of this chapter.
(4) "Institution" means a private or public hospital or any other
facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment or care.
(5) "Department" means the ((state)) department of ((social and
health)) family and children's services.
(6) "Child" or "children" means any person under the age of
eighteen years of age.
(7) "Professional school personnel" include, but are not limited
to, teachers, counselors, administrators, child care facility
personnel, and school nurses.
(8) "Social service counselor" means anyone engaged in a
professional capacity during the regular course of employment in
encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support or education of
children, or providing social services to adults or families, including
mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and domestic violence
programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an employee or agent
of any public or private organization or institution.
(9) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology
under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as
an employee or agent of any public or private organization or
institution.
(10) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter
18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee
or agent of any public or private organization or institution.
(11) "Clergy" means any regularly licensed or ordained minister,
priest, or rabbi of any church or religious denomination, whether
acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any
public or private organization or institution.
(12) "Abuse or neglect" means sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or
injury of a child by any person under circumstances which cause harm to
the child's health, welfare, or safety, excluding conduct permitted
under RCW 9A.16.100; or the negligent treatment or maltreatment of a
child by a person responsible for or providing care to the child. An
abused child is a child who has been subjected to child abuse or
neglect as defined in this section.
(13) "Child protective services section" means the child protective
services section of the department.
(14) "Sexual exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing, permitting, or
encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any person; or (b)
allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in the obscene or
pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of a child by any
person.
(15) "Negligent treatment or maltreatment" means an act or a
failure to act, or the cumulative effects of a pattern of conduct,
behavior, or inaction, that evidences a serious disregard of
consequences of such magnitude as to constitute a clear and present
danger to a child's health, welfare, or safety, including but not
limited to conduct prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100. When considering
whether a clear and present danger exists, evidence of a parent's
substance abuse as a contributing factor to negligent treatment or
maltreatment shall be given great weight. The fact that siblings share
a bedroom is not, in and of itself, negligent treatment or
maltreatment. Poverty, homelessness, or exposure to domestic violence
as defined in RCW 26.50.010 that is perpetrated against someone other
than the child does not constitute negligent treatment or maltreatment
in and of itself.
(16) "Child protective services" means those services provided by
the department designed to protect children from child abuse and
neglect and safeguard such children from future abuse and neglect, and
conduct investigations of child abuse and neglect reports.
Investigations may be conducted regardless of the location of the
alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes referral
to services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of
children, the coordination of necessary programs and services relevant
to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse and
neglect, and services to children to ensure that each child has a
permanent home. In determining whether protective services should be
provided, the department shall not decline to provide such services
solely because of the child's unwillingness or developmental inability
to describe the nature and severity of the abuse or neglect.
(17) "Malice" or "maliciously" means an evil intent, wish, or
design to vex, annoy, or injure another person. Such malice may be
inferred from an act done in willful disregard of the rights of
another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an
act or omission of duty betraying a willful disregard of social duty.
(18) "Sexually aggressive youth" means a child who is defined in
RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive youth.
(19) "Unfounded" means available information indicates that, more
likely than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur. No unfounded
allegation of child abuse or neglect may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any other provider licensed
under chapter 74.15 RCW.

Sec. 202 RCW 13.34.025 and 2002 c 52 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of ((social and health)) family and children's
services shall develop methods for coordination of services to parents
and children in child dependency cases. To the maximum extent possible
under current funding levels, the department must:
(1) Coordinate and integrate services to children and families,
using service plans and activities that address the children's and
families' multiple needs, including ensuring that siblings have regular
visits with each other, as appropriate. Assessment criteria should
screen for multiple needs;
(2) Develop treatment plans for the individual needs of the client
in a manner that minimizes the number of contacts the client is
required to make; and
(3) Access training for department staff to increase skills across
disciplines to assess needs for mental health, substance abuse,
developmental disabilities, and other areas.

Sec. 203 RCW 13.34.050 and 2005 c 512 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The court may enter an order directing a law enforcement
officer, probation counselor, or child protective services official to
take a child into custody if: (a) A petition is filed with the
juvenile court alleging that the child is dependent and that the
child's health, safety, and welfare will be seriously endangered if not
taken into custody; (b) an affidavit or declaration is filed by the
department of family and children's services in support of the petition
setting forth specific factual information evidencing reasonable
grounds that the child's health, safety, and welfare will be seriously
endangered if not taken into custody and at least one of the grounds
set forth demonstrates a risk of imminent harm to the child. "Imminent
harm" for purposes of this section shall include, but not be limited
to, circumstances of sexual abuse, sexual exploitation as defined in
RCW 26.44.020, and a parent's failure to perform basic parental
functions, obligations, and duties as the result of substance abuse;
and (c) the court finds reasonable grounds to believe the child is
dependent and that the child's health, safety, and welfare will be
seriously endangered if not taken into custody.
(2) Any petition that does not have the necessary affidavit or
declaration demonstrating a risk of imminent harm requires that the
parents are provided notice and an opportunity to be heard before the
order may be entered.
(3) The petition and supporting documentation must be served on the
parent, and if the child is in custody at the time the child is
removed, on the entity with custody other than the parent. Failure to
effect service does not invalidate the petition if service was
attempted and the parent could not be found.

Sec. 204 RCW 13.70.010 and 1991 c 127 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the local citizen review board established
pursuant to this chapter.
(2) "Child" means a person less than eighteen years of age.
(3) "Committee" means a local Indian child welfare advisory
committee established pursuant to WAC 388-70-610, as now existing or
hereafter amended by the department.
(4) "Conflict of interest" means that a person appointed to a board
has a personal or pecuniary interest in a case being reviewed by that
board.
(5) "Court" means the juvenile court.
(6) "Custodian" means that person who has legal custody of the
child.
(7) "Department" means the department of ((social and health))
family and children's services.
(8) "Mature child" means a child who is able to understand and
participate in the decision-making process without excessive anxiety or
fear. A child twelve years old or over shall be rebuttably presumed to
be a mature child.
(9) "Parent" or "parents" means the biological or adoptive parents
of a child unless the legal rights of that person have been terminated
by judicial proceedings.
(10) "Placement episode" means the period of time that begins with
the date the child was removed from the home of the parent or legal
custodian for the purposes of placement in substitute care and
continues until the child returns home or an adoption decree or
guardianship order is entered.
(11) "Records" means any information in written form, pictures,
photographs, charts, graphs, recordings, or documents pertaining to a
case.
(12) "Resides" or "residence," when used in reference to the
residence of a child, means the place where the child is actually
living and not the legal residence or domicile of the parent or
guardian.
(13) "Substitute care" means an out-of-home placement of a child
for purposes related to the provision of child welfare services in
accordance with chapter 74.13 RCW where the child is in the care,
custody, and control of the department pursuant to a proceeding under
chapter 13.34 RCW or pursuant to the written consent of the child's
parent or parents or custodian.

Sec. 205 RCW 74.13.640 and 2004 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of ((social and health)) family and children's
services shall conduct a child fatality review in the event of an
unexpected death of a minor in the state who is in the care of or
receiving services described in chapter 74.13 RCW from the department
or who has been in the care of or received services described in
chapter 74.13 RCW from the department within one year preceding the
minor's death.
(2) Upon conclusion of a child fatality review required pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section, the department shall issue a report on
the results of the review to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and shall make copies of the report available to the public
upon request.
(3) The department shall develop and implement procedures to carry
out the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

PART 3
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 Sections 1, 101 through 106, and 111 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 Section 112 of this act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---