BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that permit
programs have been legislatively established to protect the health,
welfare, economy, and environment of Washington's citizens and to
provide a fair, competitive opportunity for business innovation and
consumer confidence. The legislature also finds that uncertainty in
government processes to permit an activity by a citizen of Washington
state is undesirable and erodes confidence in government. The
legislature further finds that in the case of projects that would
further economic development in the state, information about the
permitting process is critical for an applicant's planning and
financial assessment of the proposed project. The legislature also
finds that applicants have a responsibility to provide complete and
accurate information.
(2) The legislature recommends that applicants be provided with the
following information when applying for a development permit from a
city, county, or state agency:
(a) The minimum and maximum time an agency will need to make a
decision on a permit, including public comment requirements;
(b) The minimum amount of information required for an agency to
make a decision on a permit;
(c) When an agency considers an application complete for
processing;
(d) The minimum and maximum costs in agency fees that will be
incurred by the permit applicant; and
(e) The reasons for a denial of a permit in writing.
(3) In providing this information to applicants, an agency should
base estimates on the best information available about the permitting
program and prior applications for similar permits, as well as on the
information provided by the applicant. New information provided by the
applicant subsequent to the agency estimates may change the information
provided by an agency per subsection (2) of this section. Project
modifications by an applicant may result in more time, more
information, or higher fees being required for permit processing.
(4) This section does not create an independent cause of action,
affect any existing cause of action, or establish time limits for
purposes of RCW 64.40.020.
(5) City, county, and state agencies issuing development permits
are encouraged to track the progress in providing the information to
applicants per subsection (2) of this section by preparing an annual
report of its performance for the preceding fiscal year. The report
should be posted on its web site made available and provided to the
appropriate standing committees of the senate and house of
representatives.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.155.070 and 2001 c 131 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To qualify for loans or pledges under this chapter the board
must determine that a local government meets all of the following
conditions:
(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46
RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;
(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility
plan; and
(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources
which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into
consideration local employment and economic factors.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 must have adopted a comprehensive plan, including
a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a
comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or
receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if such request
is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW
36.70A.040. A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040
which has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations
within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited
from receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if the
comprehensive plan and development regulations are adopted as required
by RCW 36.70A.040 before submitting a request for a loan or loan
guarantee.
(3) In considering awarding loans for public facilities to special
districts requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board shall
consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is
located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) The board shall develop a priority process for public works
projects as provided in this section. The intent of the priority
process is to maximize the value of public works projects accomplished
with assistance under this chapter. The board shall attempt to assure
a geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects. The board
shall consider at least the following factors in assigning a priority
to a project:
(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency public works needs;
(b) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(c) Whether the applicant has a good record of providing
information to those applying for development permits consistent with
section 1(2) of this act;
(d) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local
government and amount of loan money available;
(((d))) (e) The number of communities served by or funding the
project;
(((e))) (f) Whether the project is located in an area of high
unemployment, compared to the average state unemployment;
(((f))) (g) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion,
improvement, or renovation by a local government of a public water
system that is in violation of health and safety standards, including
the cost of extending existing service to such a system;
(((g))) (h) The relative benefit of the project to the community,
considering the present level of economic activity in the community and
the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in
communities that have low economic growth; and
(((h))) (i) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(5) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments
shall not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government
applicant shall provide documentation of attempts to secure additional
local or other sources of funding for each public works project for
which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.
(6) Before November 1 of each year, the board shall develop and
submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives a description of the loans made under RCW 43.155.065,
43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section during the preceding
fiscal year and a prioritized list of projects which are recommended
for funding by the legislature, including one copy to the staff of each
of the committees. The list shall include, but not be limited to, a
description of each project and recommended financing, the terms and
conditions of the loan or financial guarantee, the local government
jurisdiction and unemployment rate, demonstration of the jurisdiction's
critical need for the project and documentation of local funds being
used to finance the public works project. The list shall also include
measures of fiscal capacity for each jurisdiction recommended for
financial assistance, compared to authorized limits and state averages,
including local government sales taxes; real estate excise taxes;
property taxes; and charges for or taxes on sewerage, water, garbage,
and other utilities.
(7) The board shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially
obligate funds from the public works assistance account before the
legislature has appropriated funds for a specific list of public works
projects. The legislature may remove projects from the list
recommended by the board. The legislature shall not change the order
of the priorities recommended for funding by the board.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section does not apply to loans made
under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section.
(9) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans shall be
exempted from subsection (7) of this section.
(10) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or recycling
facilities under this chapter, a city or county must demonstrate that
the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent with and necessary
to implement the comprehensive solid waste management plan adopted by
the city or county under chapter 70.95 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.160.060 and 2004 c 252 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board is authorized to make direct loans to political
subdivisions of the state and to federally recognized Indian tribes for
the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions and federally
recognized Indian tribes in financing the cost of public facilities,
including development of land and improvements for public facilities,
project-specific environmental, capital facilities, land use,
permitting, feasibility, and marketing studies and plans; project
design, site planning, and analysis; project debt and revenue impact
analysis; as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration,
expansion, or improvement of the facilities. A grant may also be
authorized for purposes designated in this chapter, but only when, and
to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the
limited resources of the political subdivision or the federally
recognized Indian tribe and the finding by the board that financial
circumstances require grant assistance to enable the project to move
forward. However, at least ten percent of all financial assistance
provided by the board in any biennium shall consist of grants to
political subdivisions and federally recognized Indian tribes.
Application for funds shall be made in the form and manner as the
board may prescribe. In making grants or loans the board shall conform
to the following requirements:
(1) The board shall not provide financial assistance:
(a) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or
promote a retail shopping development or expansion.
(b) For any project that evidence exists would result in a
development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other
community in the state.
(c) For the acquisition of real property, including buildings and
other fixtures which are a part of real property.
(d) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or
promote gambling.
(2) The board shall only provide financial assistance:
(a) For those projects which would result in specific private
developments or expansions (i) in manufacturing, production, food
processing, assembly, warehousing, advanced technology, research and
development, and industrial distribution; (ii) for processing
recyclable materials or for facilities that support recycling,
including processes not currently provided in the state, including but
not limited to, de-inking facilities, mixed waste paper, plastics, yard
waste, and problem-waste processing; (iii) for manufacturing facilities
that rely significantly on recyclable materials, including but not
limited to waste tires and mixed waste paper; (iv) which support the
relocation of businesses from nondistressed urban areas to rural
counties or rural natural resources impact areas; or (v) which
substantially support the trading of goods or services outside of the
state's borders.
(b) For projects which it finds will improve the opportunities for
the successful maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial
or commercial plants or will otherwise assist in the creation or
retention of long-term economic opportunities.
(c) When the application includes convincing evidence that a
specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will
occur only if the public facility improvement is made.
(3) The board shall prioritize each proposed project according to:
(a) The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs the
project would create, not just the total number of jobs it would create
after the project is completed and according to the unemployment rate
in the area in which the jobs would be located; ((and))
(b) The rate of return of the state's investment, that includes the
expected increase in state and local tax revenues associated with the
project; and
(c) Whether the applicant has a good record of providing
information to those applying for development permits consistent with
section 1(2) of this act.
(4) A responsible official of the political subdivision or the
federally recognized Indian tribe shall be present during board
deliberations and provide information that the board requests.
Before any financial assistance application is approved, the
political subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking
the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic
revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is
available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from
the community economic revitalization board.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.102.040 and 2006 c 181 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Prior to applying to the board to use local infrastructure
financing, a sponsoring local government shall:
(a) Designate a revenue development area within the limitations in
RCW 39.102.060;
(b) Certify that the conditions in RCW 39.102.070 are met;
(c) Complete the process in RCW 39.102.080;
(d) Provide public notice as required in RCW 39.102.100; and
(e) Pass an ordinance adopting the revenue development area as
required in RCW 39.102.090.
(2) Any local government that has created an increment area under
chapter 39.89 RCW that has not issued bonds to finance any public
improvement shall be considered a revenue development area under this
chapter without creating a new increment area under RCW 39.102.090 and
39.102.100 if it amends its ordinance to comply with RCW 39.102.090(1)
and otherwise meets the conditions and limitations under this chapter.
(3) As a condition to imposing a sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.475, a sponsoring local government, including any cosponsoring
local government seeking authority to impose a sales and use tax under
RCW 82.14.475, must apply to the board and be approved for a project
award amount. The application shall be in a form and manner prescribed
by the board and include but not be limited to information establishing
that the applicant is an eligible candidate to impose the local sales
and use tax under RCW 82.14.475, the anticipated effective date for
imposing the tax, the estimated number of years that the tax will be
imposed, and the estimated amount of tax revenue to be received in each
fiscal year that the tax will be imposed. The board shall make
available forms to be used for this purpose. As part of the
application, each applicant must provide to the board a copy of the
ordinance or ordinances creating the revenue development area as
required in RCW 39.102.090. A notice of approval to use local
infrastructure financing shall contain a project award that represents
the maximum amount of state contribution that the applicant, including
any cosponsoring local governments, can earn each year that local
infrastructure financing is used. The total of all project awards
shall not exceed the annual state contribution limit. The
determination of a project award shall be made based on information
contained in the application and the remaining amount of annual state
contribution limit to be awarded. Determination of a project award by
the board is final.
(4) Sponsoring local governments, and any cosponsoring local
governments, must submit completed applications to the board no later
than July 1, 2007. By September 15, 2007, in consultation with the
department of revenue and the department of community, trade, and
economic development, the board shall approve qualified projects, up to
the annual state contribution limit. Except as provided in RCW
39.102.050, approvals shall be based on the following criteria:
(a) The project potential to enhance the sponsoring local
government's regional and/or international competitiveness;
(b) The project's ability to encourage mixed use development and
the redevelopment of a geographic area;
(c) Whether the applicant has a good record of providing
information to those applying for development permits consistent with
section 1(2) of this act;
(d) Achieving an overall distribution of projects statewide that
reflect geographic diversity;
(((d))) (e) The estimated wages and benefits for the project is
greater than the average labor market area;
(((e))) (f) The estimated state and local net employment change
over the life of the project;
(((f))) (g) The estimated state and local net property tax change
over the life of the project; and
(((g))) (h) The estimated state and local sales and use tax
increase over the life of the project.
(5) A revenue development area is considered created when the
sponsoring local government, including any cosponsoring local
government, has adopted an ordinance creating the revenue development
area and the board has approved the sponsoring local government to use
local infrastructure financing. If a sponsoring local government
receives approval from the board after the fifteenth day of October to
use local infrastructure financing, the revenue development area is
considered created in the calendar year following the approval. Once
the board has approved the sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local governments, to use local infrastructure financing,
notification shall be sent to the sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local governments, authorizing the sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local governments, to impose the local
sales and use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.475, subject to the
conditions in RCW 82.14.475.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.160.230 and 2005 c 425 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The job development fund program is created to provide grants
for public infrastructure projects that will stimulate job creation or
assist in job retention. The program is to be administered by the
board. The board shall establish a competitive process to request and
prioritize proposals and make grant awards.
(2) For the purposes of chapter 425, Laws of 2005, "public
infrastructure projects" has the same meaning as "public facilities" as
defined in RCW 43.160.020(11).
(3) The board shall conduct a statewide request for project
applications. The board shall apply the following criteria for
evaluation and ranking of applications:
(a) The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs the
project would create, including, but not limited to: (i) The total
number of jobs; (ii) the total number of full-time, family wage jobs;
(iii) the unemployment rate in the area; and (iv) the increase in
employment in comparison to total community population;
(b) The present level of economic activity in the community and the
existing local financial capacity to increase economic activity in the
community;
(c) Whether the applicant has a good record of providing
information to those applying for development permits consistent with
section 1(2) of this act;
(d) The rate of return of the state's investment, that includes the
expected increase in state and local tax revenues associated with the
project;
(((d))) (e) The lack of another timely source of funding available
to finance the project which would likely prevent the proposed
community or economic development, absent the financing available under
chapter 425, Laws of 2005;
(((e))) (f) The ability of the project to improve the viability of
existing business entities in the project area;
(((f))) (g) Whether or not the project is a partnership of multiple
jurisdictions;
(((g))) (h) Demonstration that the requested assistance will
directly stimulate community and economic development by facilitating
the creation of new jobs or the retention of existing jobs; and
(((h))) (i) The availability of existing assets that applicants may
apply to projects.
(4) Job development fund program grants may only be awarded to
those applicants that have entered into or expect to enter into a
contract with a private developer relating to private investment that
will result in the creation or retention of jobs upon completion of the
project. Job development fund program grants shall not be provided for
any project where:
(a) The funds will not be used within the jurisdiction or
jurisdictions of the applicants; or
(b) Evidence exists that the project would result in a development
or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other community
in the state.
(5) The board shall, with the joint legislative audit and review
committee, develop performance criteria for each grant and evaluation
criteria to be used to evaluate both how well successful applicants met
the community and economic development objectives stated in their
applications, and how well the job development fund program performed
in creating and retaining jobs.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.42.010 and 2003 c 71 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office of regulatory assistance is created in the office of
financial management and shall be administered by the office of the
governor to assist citizens, businesses, and project applicants.
(2) The office shall:
(a) Maintain and furnish information as provided in RCW 43.42.040;
(b) Furnish facilitation as provided in RCW 43.42.050;
(c) Furnish coordination as provided in RCW 43.42.060;
(d) Coordinate cost reimbursement as provided in RCW 43.42.070;
(e) Work with state agencies and local governments to continue to
develop a range of permit assistance options for project applicants;
(f) ((Review initiatives developed by the transportation permit
efficiency and accountability committee established in chapter 47.06C
RCW and determine if any would be beneficial if implemented for other
types of projects)) Help local jurisdictions comply with the
requirements of RCW 36.70B.080 by:
(i) Providing information about best practices and compliance with
the requirements of RCW 36.70B.080; and
(ii) Providing technical assistance in reducing the turnaround time
between submittal of an application for a development permit and the
issuance of the permit;
(g) Work to develop informal processes for dispute resolution
between agencies and permit applicants;
(h) Conduct customer surveys to evaluate its effectiveness; and
(i) Provide the following biennial reports to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature:
(i) A performance report, based on the customer surveys required in
(h) of this subsection;
(ii) A report on any statutory or regulatory conflicts identified
by the office in the course of its duties that arise from differing
legal authorities and roles of agencies and how these were resolved.
The report may include recommendations to the legislature and to
agencies; and
(iii) A report regarding use of outside independent consultants
under RCW 43.42.070, including the nature and amount of work performed
and implementation of requirements relating to costs.
(3) A director of the office shall be hired no later than June 1,
2003.
(4) The office shall give priority to furnishing assistance to
small projects when expending general fund moneys allocated to it.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.131.401 and 2003 c 71 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of regulatory assistance established in RCW 43.42.010
and its powers and duties shall be terminated June 30, ((2007)) 2011,
as provided in RCW 43.131.402.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.131.402 and 2003 c 71 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, ((2008)) 2012:
(1) RCW 43.42.005 and 2003 c 71 s 1 & 2002 c 153 s 1;
(2) RCW 43.42.010 and section 6 of this act, 2003 c 71 s 2, & 2002
c 153 s 2;
(3) RCW 43.42.020 and 2002 c 153 s 3;
(4) RCW 43.42.030 and 2003 c 71 s 3 & 2002 c 153 s 4;
(5) RCW 43.42.040 and 2003 c 71 s 4 & 2002 c 153 s 5;
(6) RCW 43.42.050 and 2002 c 153 s 6;
(7) RCW 43.42.060 and 2002 c 153 s 7;
(8) RCW 43.42.070 and 2002 c 153 s 8;
(9) RCW 43.42.905 and 2002 c 153 s 10;
(10) RCW 43.42.900 and 2002 c 153 s 11; and
(11) RCW 43.42.901 and 2002 c 153 s 12.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The sum of forty-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the office of
regulatory assistance, created within the office of financial
management under RCW 43.42.010, for the purposes of section 6 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 4 of this act expires June 30,
2039.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 5 of this act expires June 30,
2011.

--- END ---