BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that Washington
citizens desire and receive health care and treatment from a variety of
professional providers. The legislature further recognizes that some
health care providers have used the professional disciplinary process
as a means of attacking other health care providers. In order to
prevent unwarranted attacks on other health care providers where the
health of the patient is not at risk, the legislature is making changes
in the uniform disciplinary act to ensure that all complaints against
health care providers are grounded in real harm to the patient rather
than mere disagreement about the type of procedure provided.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.130.080 and 2006 c 99 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person, including but not limited to consumers, licensees,
corporations, organizations, health care facilities, impaired
practitioner programs, or voluntary substance abuse monitoring programs
approved by disciplining authorities, and state and local governmental
agencies, may submit a written complaint to the disciplining authority
charging a license holder or applicant with unprofessional conduct and
specifying the grounds therefor or to report information to the
disciplining authority, or voluntary substance abuse monitoring
program, or an impaired practitioner program approved by the
disciplining authority, which indicates that the license holder may not
be able to practice his or her profession with reasonable skill and
safety to consumers as a result of a mental or physical condition. The
complainant or the complainant's guardian or legal representative must
sign the written complaint to the disciplining authority. The members
of the disciplining authority must determine as to each complaint that
there is probable cause to merit an investigation of the allegations in
the complaint by the disciplining authority. If the disciplining
authority determines that the complaint merits an investigation, or if
the disciplining authority has reason to believe, without a formal
complaint, that a license holder or applicant may have engaged in
unprofessional conduct, the disciplining authority shall investigate to
determine whether there has been unprofessional conduct. In conducting
the investigation, the disciplining authority may consult with a
practitioner or practitioners who utilize the procedure in question in
the complaint in their practices to determine whether the license
holder or applicant against whom the complaint has been filed is guilty
of unprofessional conduct. In determining whether or not to
investigate, the disciplining authority shall consider any prior
complaints received by the disciplining authority, any prior findings
of fact under RCW 18.130.110, any stipulations to informal disposition
under RCW 18.130.172, and any comparable action taken by other state
disciplining authorities.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the
disciplining authority shall initiate an investigation in every
instance where the disciplining authority receives information that a
health care provider has been disqualified from participating in the
federal medicare program, under Title XVIII of the federal social
security act, or the federal medicaid program, under Title XIX of the
federal social security act.
(3) A person who files a complaint or reports information under
this section in good faith is immune from suit in any civil action
related to the filing or contents of the complaint. A complaint
against a license holder or applicant based solely on the use of a
procedure, in the absence of any proof of harm to a patient, shall not
be in good faith.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
In order to sustain a complaint against a license holder or
applicant, the disciplining authority must provide the testimony of at
least one practitioner who utilizes the procedure that is the subject
of the complaint in question in his or her practice, or when there is
no practitioner who utilizes the procedure in question that is readily
available, a practitioner who practices complementary alternative
medicine may be used, to establish the license holder or applicant is
guilty of unprofessional conduct.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.130.180 and 1995 c 336 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute
unprofessional conduct for any license holder or applicant under the
jurisdiction of this chapter:
(1) The commission of any act involving moral turpitude,
dishonesty, or corruption relating to the practice of the person's
profession, whether the act constitutes a crime or not. If the act
constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is not a
condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction,
however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the
ensuing disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license holder or
applicant of the crime described in the indictment or information, and
of the person's violation of the statute on which it is based. For the
purposes of this section, conviction includes all instances in which a
plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for the conviction and
all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended.
Nothing in this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A
RCW;
(2) Misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in
obtaining a license or in reinstatement thereof;
(3) All advertising which is false, fraudulent, or misleading;
(4) Incompetence, negligence, or malpractice which results in
injury to a patient or which creates an unreasonable risk that a
patient may be harmed. The use of a ((nontraditional treatment))
procedure by itself shall not constitute unprofessional conduct,
provided that it does not result in injury to a patient ((or create an
unreasonable risk that a patient may be harmed)) and the patient has
signed a writing that complies with the requirements set forth in RCW
7.70.060. The writing shall constitute prima facie evidence that the
patient gave his or her consent to the treatment that is the subject of
the complaint;
(5) Suspension, revocation, or restriction of the individual's
license to practice any health care profession by competent authority
in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, a certified copy of the
order, stipulation, or agreement being conclusive evidence of the
revocation, suspension, or restriction;
(6) The possession, use, prescription for use, or distribution of
controlled substances or legend drugs in any way other than for
legitimate or therapeutic purposes, diversion of controlled substances
or legend drugs, the violation of any drug law, or prescribing
controlled substances for oneself;
(7) Violation of any state or federal statute or administrative
rule regulating the profession in question, including any statute or
rule defining or establishing standards of patient care or professional
conduct or practice;
(8) Failure to cooperate with the disciplining authority by:
(a) Not furnishing any papers or documents;
(b) Not furnishing in writing a full and complete explanation
covering the matter contained in the complaint filed with the
disciplining authority;
(c) Not responding to subpoenas issued by the disciplining
authority, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena is the accused
in the proceeding; or
(d) Not providing reasonable and timely access for authorized
representatives of the disciplining authority seeking to perform
practice reviews at facilities utilized by the license holder;
(9) Failure to comply with an order issued by the disciplining
authority or a stipulation for informal disposition entered into with
the disciplining authority;
(10) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to practice when a
license is required;
(11) Violations of rules established by any health agency;
(12) Practice beyond the scope of practice as defined by law or
rule;
(13) Misrepresentation or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of the
business or profession;
(14) Failure to adequately supervise auxiliary staff to the extent
that the consumer's health or safety is at risk;
(15) Engaging in a profession involving contact with the public
while suffering from a contagious or infectious disease involving
serious risk to public health;
(16) Promotion for personal gain of any unnecessary or
inefficacious drug, device, treatment, procedure, or service;
(17) Conviction of any gross misdemeanor or felony relating to the
practice of the person's profession. For the purposes of this
subsection, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere is the basis for conviction and all proceedings in
which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this
section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;
(18) The procuring, or aiding or abetting in procuring, a criminal
abortion;
(19) The offering, undertaking, or agreeing to cure or treat
disease by a secret method, procedure, treatment, or medicine, or the
treating, operating, or prescribing for any health condition by a
method, means, or procedure which the licensee refuses to divulge upon
demand of the disciplining authority;
(20) The willful betrayal of a practitioner-patient privilege as
recognized by law;
(21) Violation of chapter 19.68 RCW;
(22) Interference with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding
by willful misrepresentation of facts before the disciplining authority
or its authorized representative, or by the use of threats or
harassment against any patient or witness to prevent them from
providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any other legal
action, or by the use of financial inducements to any patient or
witness to prevent or attempt to prevent him or her from providing
evidence in a disciplinary proceeding;
(23) Current misuse of:
(a) Alcohol;
(b) Controlled substances; or
(c) Legend drugs;
(24) Abuse of a client or patient or sexual contact with a client
or patient;
(25) Acceptance of more than a nominal gratuity, hospitality, or
subsidy offered by a representative or vendor of medical or health-related products or services intended for patients, in contemplation of
a sale or for use in research publishable in professional journals,
where a conflict of interest is presented, as defined by rules of the
disciplining authority, in consultation with the department, based on
recognized professional ethical standards.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.130.020 and 1995 c 336 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Disciplining authority" means the agency, board, or commission
having the authority to take disciplinary action against a holder of,
or applicant for, a professional or business license upon a finding of
a violation of this chapter or a chapter specified under RCW
18.130.040.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(4) "Board" means any of those boards specified in RCW 18.130.040.
(5) "Commission" means any of the commissions specified in RCW
18.130.040.
(6) "Unlicensed practice" means:
(a) Practicing a profession or operating a business identified in
RCW 18.130.040 without holding a valid, unexpired, unrevoked, and
unsuspended license to do so; or
(b) Representing to a consumer, through offerings, advertisements,
or use of a professional title or designation, that the individual is
qualified to practice a profession or operate a business identified in
RCW 18.130.040, without holding a valid, unexpired, unrevoked, and
unsuspended license to do so.
(7) "Disciplinary action" means sanctions identified in RCW
18.130.160.
(8) "Practice review" means an investigative audit of records
related to the complaint, without prior identification of specific
patient or consumer names, or an assessment of the conditions,
circumstances, and methods of the professional's practice related to
the complaint, to determine whether unprofessional conduct may have
been committed.
(9) "Health agency" means city and county health departments and
the department of health.
(10) "License," "licensing," and "licensure" shall be deemed
equivalent to the terms "license," "licensing," "licensure,"
"certificate," "certification," and "registration" as those terms are
defined in RCW 18.120.020.
(11) "False, fraudulent, or misleading advertising" means a
statement that includes a misrepresentation of fact that is likely to
mislead or deceive because of a failure to disclose material facts,
that is intended or likely to create false or unjustified expectations
of favorable results, or that includes representations or implications
that in reasonable probability will cause an ordinarily prudent person
to misunderstand or to be deceived.

--- END ---