BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
An agency must allow an employee who is a volunteer firefighter to
respond, without pay, to a fire, natural disaster, or medical emergency
when called to duty. The agency may choose to grant leave with pay.

--- END ---