BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that local governments
need flexible financing for public improvements that do not increase
the combined state and local sales tax rate.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.100.010 and 2006 c 111 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Benefit zone" means the geographic zone from which taxes are
to be appropriated to finance public improvements authorized under this
chapter and in which a hospital that has received a certificate of need
is to be constructed.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Local government" means any city, town, county, or any
combination thereof.
(4) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government.
(5) "Participating taxing authority" means a taxing authority that
has entered into a written agreement with a local government for the
use of hospital benefit zone financing to the extent of allocating
excess local excise taxes to the local government for the purpose of
financing all or a portion of the costs of designated public
improvements.
(6) "Public improvements" means infrastructure improvements within
the benefit zone that include:
(a) Street and road construction and maintenance;
(b) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;
(c) Sidewalks and streetlights;
(d) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(e) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(f) Park facilities and recreational areas; and
(g) Storm water and drainage management systems.
(7) "Public improvement costs" means the costs of: (a) Design,
planning, acquisition including land acquisition, site preparation
including land clearing, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation,
improvement, and installation of public improvements; (b) demolishing,
relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending construction of
public improvements; (c) relocating utilities as a result of public
improvements; and (d) financing public improvements, including interest
during construction, legal and other professional services, taxes,
insurance, principal and interest costs on indebtedness issued to
finance public improvements, and any necessary reserves for
indebtedness; and administrative expenses and feasibility studies
reasonably necessary and related to these costs, including related
costs that may have been incurred before adoption of the ordinance
authorizing the public improvements and the use of hospital benefit
zone financing to fund the costs of the public improvements.
(8) "Tax allocation revenues" means those tax revenues derived from
the receipt of excess local excise taxes under RCW 39.100.050 and
distributed by a local government, participating taxing authority, or
both, to finance public improvements.
(9) "Taxing authority" means a governmental entity that imposes a
sales or use tax under chapter 82.14 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within a proposed or approved benefit zone.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.100.020 and 2006 c 111 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A local government may finance public improvements using hospital
benefit zone financing subject to the following conditions:
(1) The local government adopts an ordinance designating a benefit
zone within its boundaries and specifying the public improvements
proposed to be financed in whole or in part with the use of hospital
benefit zone financing;
(2) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in
part using hospital benefit zone financing are expected both to
encourage private development within the benefit zone and to support
the development of a hospital that has received a certificate of need;
(3) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the
benefit zone, as a result of the public improvements, will be
consistent with the county-wide planning policy adopted by the county
under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's comprehensive plan and
development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW; ((and))
(4) The governing body of the local government finds that the
public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using
hospital benefit zone financing are reasonably likely to:
(a) Increase private investment within the benefit zone;
(b) Increase employment within the benefit zone; and
(c) Generate, over the period of time that the local sales and use
tax will be imposed under RCW 82.14.465, excess state ((and local sales
and use tax revenues)) excise taxes that are equal to or greater than
the ((respective)) state ((and local)) contributions made under this
chapter;
(5) The boundaries of a hospital benefit zone may not overlap any
part of the boundaries of another hospital benefit zone or a revenue
development area defined in chapter 39.102 RCW; and
(6) The boundaries of a hospital benefit zone may not change once
the hospital benefit zone is established and approved by the
department.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.100.030 and 2006 c 111 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before adopting an ordinance creating the benefit zone, a local
government must:
(a) Obtain written agreement for the use of hospital benefit zone
financing to finance all or a portion of the costs of the designated
public improvements from any taxing authority that imposes a sales or
use tax under chapter 82.14 RCW within the benefit zone if the taxing
authority chooses to participate in the public improvements to the
extent of providing limited funding under hospital benefit zone
financing authorized under this chapter. The agreement must be
authorized by the governing body of such participating taxing
authorities; and
(b) Hold a public hearing on the proposed financing of the public
improvement in whole or in part with hospital benefit zone financing.
(i) Notice of the public hearing must be published in a legal
newspaper of general circulation within the proposed benefit zone at
least ten days before the public hearing and posted in at least six
conspicuous public places located in the proposed benefit zone.
(ii) Notices must describe the contemplated public improvements,
estimate the costs of the public improvements, describe the portion of
the costs of the public improvements to be borne by hospital benefit
zone financing, describe any other sources of revenue to finance the
public improvements, describe the boundaries of the proposed benefit
zone, and estimate the period during which hospital benefit zone
financing is contemplated to be used. The public hearing may be held
by either the governing body of the local government, or a committee of
the governing body that includes at least a majority of the whole
governing body.
(2) In order to create a benefit zone, a local government must
adopt an ordinance establishing the benefit zone that:
(a) Describes the public improvements;
(b) Describes the boundaries of the benefit zone;
(c) Estimates the cost of the public improvements and the portion
of these costs to be financed by hospital benefit zone financing;
(d) Estimates the time during which excess local excise taxes are
to be used to finance public improvement costs associated with the
public improvements financed in whole or in part by hospital benefit
zone financing;
(e) Estimates the average amount of tax revenue to be received in
all fiscal years through the imposition of a sales and use tax under
RCW 82.14.465;
(f) Provides the date when the use of excess local excise taxes
will commence; and
(g) Finds that the conditions of RCW 39.100.020 are met.
(3) For purposes of this section, "fiscal year" means the year
beginning July 1st and ending the following June 30th.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.100.040 and 2006 c 111 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A local government that adopts an ordinance creating a benefit
zone under this chapter shall, within ninety days of adopting the
ordinance:
(((1))) (a) Publish notice in a legal newspaper of general
circulation within the benefit zone that describes the public
improvement, describes the boundaries of the benefit zone, and
identifies the location and times where the ordinance and other public
information concerning the public improvement may be inspected; and
(((2))) (b) Deliver a certified copy of the ordinance to the county
treasurer, the county assessor, the department of revenue, and the
governing body of each participating taxing authority within which the
benefit zone is located.
(2) Any challenge to the formation shall be brought within sixty
days of its formation. All parties, including the holders of bonds
payable from tax revenue under this act, may rely upon the presumption
of validity of formation of the benefit zone following the expiration
of the sixty-day period following formation.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.100.050 and 2006 c 111 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A local government that creates a benefit zone and has received
approval from the department under RCW 82.32.700 to impose the local
option sales and use tax authorized in RCW 82.14.465 may use annually
any excess local excise taxes received by it from taxable activity
within the benefit zone to finance public improvement costs associated
with the public improvements financed in whole or in part by hospital
benefit zone financing. The use of excess local excise taxes must
cease when tax allocation revenues are no longer necessary or obligated
to pay the costs of the public improvements. Any participating taxing
authority is authorized to allocate excess local excise taxes to the
local government as long as the local government has received approval
from the department under RCW 82.32.700 to impose the local option
sales and use tax authorized in RCW 82.14.465. The legislature
declares that it is a proper purpose of a local government or
participating taxing authority to allocate excess local excise taxes
for purposes of financing public improvements under this chapter.
(2) A local government shall provide the department accurate
information describing the geographical boundaries of the benefit zone
at least seventy-five days before the effective date of the ordinance
creating the benefit zone. The local government shall ensure that the
boundary information provided to the department is kept current.
(3) The department shall provide the necessary information to
calculate excess local excise taxes to each local government that has
provided boundary information to the department as provided in this
section and that has received approval from the department under RCW
82.32.700 to impose the local option sales and use tax authorized in
RCW 82.14.465.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Base year" means the calendar year immediately following the
creation of a benefit zone.
(b) "Excess local excise taxes" means the amount of local excise
taxes received by the local government during the measurement year from
taxable activity within the benefit zone over and above the amount of
local excise taxes received by the local government during the base
year from taxable activity within the benefit zone. However, if a
local government creates the benefit zone and reasonably determines
that no activity subject to tax under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
occurred in the twelve months immediately preceding the creation of the
benefit zone within the boundaries of the area that became the benefit
zone, "excess local excise taxes" means the entire amount of local
excise taxes received by the local government during a calendar year
period beginning with the calendar year immediately following the
creation of the benefit zone and continuing with each measurement year
thereafter.
(c) "Local excise taxes" means local ((retail)) revenues derived
from the imposition of sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030
at the tax rate that was in effect at the time the hospital benefit
zone is approved by the department, except that if a local government
reduces the rate of such tax after the revenue development area was
approved, "local excise taxes" means the local revenues derived from
the imposition of the sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030
at the lower tax rate.
(d) "Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure the amount of excess state
excise taxes and excess local excise taxes required to be used to
finance public improvement costs associated with public improvements
financed in whole or in part by hospital benefit zone financing.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.14.465 and 2006 c 111 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city, town, or county that creates a benefit zone and
finances public improvements pursuant to chapter 39.100 RCW may impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter and
subject to the criteria set forth in this section. Except as provided
in this section, the tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by
law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the
state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within the taxing jurisdiction of the city, town, or
county. The rate of tax shall not exceed the rate provided in RCW
82.08.020(1) in the case of a sales tax or the rate provided in RCW
82.12.020(5) in the case of a use tax, less the aggregate rates of any
other taxes imposed on the same events that are credited against the
state taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The tax rate
shall be no higher than what is reasonably necessary for the local
government to receive its entire annual state contribution in a ten-month period of time.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The
department shall perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the
city, town, or county at no cost to the city, town, or county.
(3) No tax may be imposed under this section before July 1, 2007.
Before imposing a tax under this section, the city, town, or county
shall first have received tax allocation revenues ((derived from excess
excise taxes)) during the preceding calendar year. The tax imposed
under this section shall expire ((when)) on the earlier of the date:
(a) The tax allocation revenues are no longer used for public
improvements and public improvement costs; (b) the bonds issued under
the authority of chapter 39.100 RCW are retired, ((but not more than))
if the bonds are issued; or (c) that is thirty years after the tax is
first imposed.
(4) An ordinance adopted by the legislative authority of a city,
town, or county imposing a tax under this section shall provide that:
(a) The tax shall first be imposed on the first day of a fiscal
year;
(b) The amount of tax received by the local government in any
fiscal year shall not exceed the amount of the state contribution;
(c) The tax shall cease to be ((imposed)) distributed for the
remainder of any fiscal year in which either:
(i) The amount of tax ((receipts)) distributions totals the amount
of the state contribution;
(ii) The amount of tax ((receipts)) distributions totals the amount
of "local public sources," as that term is used in RCW 82.14.470,
dedicated in the previous calendar year to finance public improvements
authorized under chapter 39.100 RCW, expended in the previous year for
public improvement costs within the hospital benefit zone, or used to
pay for other bonds issued to pay for public improvements in the
hospital benefit zone; or
(iii) The amount of revenue from taxes imposed under this section
by all cities, towns, and counties totals the annual state credit limit
as provided in RCW 82.32.700(3);
(d) The tax shall be ((reimposed)) distributed again, should it
cease to be ((imposed)) distributed for any of the reasons provided in
(c) of this subsection, at the beginning of the next fiscal year,
subject to the restrictions in this section; and
(e) Any revenue generated by the tax in excess of the amounts
specified in (((a),)) (b)((,)) and (c) of this subsection shall belong
to the state of Washington.
(5) If both a county and a city or town impose a tax under this
section, the tax imposed by the city, town, or county shall be credited
as follows:
(a) If the county has created a benefit zone before the city or
town, the tax imposed by the county shall be credited against the tax
imposed by the city or town, the purpose of such credit is to give
priority to the county tax; and
(b) If the city or town has created a benefit zone before the
county, the tax imposed by the city or town shall be credited against
the tax imposed by the county, the purpose of such credit is to give
priority to the city or town tax.
(6) The department shall determine the amount of tax ((receipts))
distributions attributable to each city, town, and county imposing a
sales and use tax under this section and shall advise a city, town, or
county when ((it must cease imposing)) the tax will cease to be
distributed for the remainder of the fiscal year as provided in
subsection (4)(c) of this section. Determinations by the department of
the amount of taxes attributable to a city, town, or county are final
and shall not be used to challenge the validity of any tax imposed
under this section. The department shall remit any tax ((receipts))
revenues in excess of the amounts specified in subsection (4)(((a),))
(b)((,)) and (c) of this section to the state treasurer who shall
deposit the moneys in the general fund.
(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Base year" means the calendar year immediately following the
creation of a benefit zone.
(b) "Benefit zone" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
39.100.010.
(c) "Excess local excise taxes" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 39.100.050.
(d) "Excess state excise taxes" means the amount of excise taxes
received by the state during the measurement year from taxable activity
within the benefit zone over and above the amount of excise taxes
received by the state during the base year from taxable activity within
the benefit zone. However, if a local government creates the benefit
zone and reasonably determines that no activity subject to tax under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred in the twelve months immediately
preceding the creation of the benefit zone within the boundaries of the
area that became the benefit zone, "excess state excise taxes" means
the entire amount of state excise taxes ((received by)) the state
receives during a calendar year period beginning with the calendar year
immediately following the creation of the benefit zone and continuing
with each measurement year thereafter.
(e) "State excise taxes" means ((the)) revenues derived from state
retail sales and use taxes ((imposed)) under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW, less the amount of tax distributions from all local retail sales
and use taxes imposed on the same taxable events that are credited
against the state retail sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW except for the local tax authorized in this section.
(f) "Fiscal year" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
39.100.030.
(g) "Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure the amount of excess state
excise taxes and excess local excise taxes ((required to be used to
finance public improvement costs associated with public improvements
financed in whole or in part by hospital benefit zone financing)).
(h) "State contribution" means the lesser of two million dollars or
an amount equal to excess state excise taxes received by the state
during the preceding calendar year.
(i) "Tax allocation revenues" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 39.100.010.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.14.470 and 2006 c 111 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Moneys collected from the taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.465
shall be used only for the purpose of principal and interest payments
on bonds issued under the authority of RCW 39.100.060, other bonds
issued by the local government to finance public improvements within
the hospital benefit zone, or to pay the public improvement costs and
must be matched with an amount from local public sources dedicated
through December 31st of the previous calendar year to finance public
improvements authorized under chapter 39.100 RCW. Such local public
sources include but are not limited to private monetary contributions,
assessments, dedicated local government funds, and tax allocation
revenues. Local public sources are dedicated to finance public
improvements if they are actually expended to pay public improvement
costs ((or are)), debt service on bonds issued for public improvements
within the hospital benefit zone, required by law or an agreement to be
used exclusively to pay public improvement costs, or debt service on
bonds issued for public improvements within the hospital benefit zone.
Such local public sources do not include local government funds derived
from any state loan, state grant, any local tax that is credited
against the state sales and use taxes, and any other state funds.
(2) A local government shall inform the department by the first day
of March of the amount of local public sources dedicated in the
preceding calendar year to finance public improvements authorized under
chapter 39.100 RCW.
(3) If a local government fails to comply with subsection (2) of
this section, no tax may be imposed under RCW 82.14.465 in the
subsequent fiscal year.
(4) A local government shall provide a report to the department by
March 1st of each year. A local government shall make a good faith
effort to provide information required for the report.
The report shall contain the following information:
(a) The amount of tax allocation revenues, taxes under RCW
82.14.465, and local public sources received by the local government
during the preceding calendar year, and a summary of how these revenues
were expended; and
(b) The names of any businesses ((locating)) known to the local
government that have located within the benefit zone as a result of the
public improvements undertaken by the local government and financed in
whole or in part with hospital benefit zone financing((;
(c) The total number of permanent jobs created as a result of the
public improvements undertaken by the local government and financed in
whole or in part with hospital benefit zone financing; and
(d) The average wages and benefits received by all employees of
businesses locating within the benefit zone as a result of the public
improvements undertaken by the local government and financed in whole
or in part with hospital benefit zone financing)).
(5) The department shall make a report available to the public and
the legislature by June 1st of each year. The report shall include a
list of public improvements undertaken by local governments and
financed in whole or in part with hospital benefit zone financing, and
it shall also include a summary of the information provided to the
department by local governments under subsection (4) of this section.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Public improvement costs" has the same meaning as in RCW
39.100.010.
(b) "Tax allocation revenues" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 39.100.010.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.32.700 and 2006 c 111 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As a condition to imposing a sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.465, a city, town, or county must apply to the department at
least seventy-five days before the effective date of any such tax. The
application shall be in a form and manner prescribed by the department
and shall include but is not limited to information establishing that
the applicant is eligible to impose such a tax, the anticipated
effective date for imposing the tax, the estimated number of years that
the tax will be imposed, and the estimated amount of tax revenue to be
received in each fiscal year that the tax will be imposed. For
purposes of this section, "fiscal year" means the year beginning July
1st and ending the following June 30th. The department shall make
available forms to be used for this purpose. As part of the
application, a city, town, or county must provide to the department a
copy of the ordinance creating the benefit zone as required in RCW
39.100.040. The department shall rule on completed applications within
sixty days of receipt. The department may begin accepting and
approving applications August 1, 2006. No new applications shall be
considered by the department after the thirtieth day of September of
the third year following the year in which the first application was
received by the department.
(2) The authority to impose the local option sales and use taxes
under RCW 82.14.465 is on a first-come basis. Priority for collecting
the taxes authorized under RCW 82.14.465 among approved applicants
shall be based on the date that the approved application was received
by the department. As a part of the approval of applications under
this section, the department shall approve the amount of tax under RCW
82.14.465 that an applicant may impose. The amount of tax approved by
the department shall not exceed the lesser of two million dollars or
the average amount of tax revenue that the applicant estimates that it
will receive in all fiscal years through the imposition of a sales and
use tax under RCW 82.14.465. A city, town, or county shall not
receive, in any fiscal year, more revenues from taxes imposed under RCW
82.14.465 than the amount approved by the department. The department
shall not approve the receipt of more credit against the state sales
and use tax than is authorized under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) No more than two million dollars of credit against the state
sales and use tax provided for under RCW 82.14.465(2), may be received
in any fiscal year by all cities, towns, and counties imposing a tax
under RCW 82.14.465.
(4) The credit against the state sales and use tax shall be
available to any city, town, or county imposing a tax under RCW
82.14.465 only as long as the city, town, or county has outstanding
indebtedness under RCW 82.14.465. Local governments may pledge any
receipts from taxes levied and collected under this act to the
repayment of its bonds or bond anticipation notes. A local government
shall notify the department when all outstanding indebtedness secured
in whole or in part from receipts is no longer outstanding, and the
credit provided for under this act shall be terminated.
(5) The department may adopt any rules under chapter 34.05 RCW it
considers necessary for the administration of chapter 39.100 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act applies retroactively to July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---