BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within existing funds, the state auditor must establish a toll-free telephone line that is available to public employees and members
of the public to recommend measures to improve efficiency in state and
local government and to report waste, inefficiency, or abuse, as well
as examples of efficiency or outstanding achievement, by state and
local agencies, public employees, or persons under contract with state
and local agencies.
(2) The state auditor must prepare information that explains the
purpose of the hotline, and the hotline telephone number must be
prominently displayed in the information. Hotline information must be
posted in all government offices in locations where it is most likely
to be seen by the public. The state auditor must publicize the
availability of the toll-free hotline through print and electronic
media and other means of communication with the public.
(3) The state auditor must designate staff to be responsible for
processing recommendations for improving efficiency and reports of
waste, inefficiency, or abuse received through the hotline. The state
auditor must conduct an initial review of each recommendation for
efficiency and report of waste, inefficiency, or abuse made by public
employees and members of the public. Following the initial review, the
state auditor must determine which assertions require further
examination or audit under the auditor's current authority and must
assign qualified staff.
(4) The identity of a person making a report through the hotline,
by e-mail through the state auditor's web site, or other means of
communication is confidential at all times unless the person making a
report consents to disclosure by written waiver, or until the
investigation described in subsection (3) of this section is complete.
All documents related to the report and subsequent investigation are
also confidential until completion of the investigation or audit or
when the documents are otherwise statutorily exempt from public
disclosure.
(5) The state auditor must prepare a written determination of the
results of the investigation performed, including any background
information that the auditor deems necessary. The state auditor must
report publicly the conclusions of each investigation and recommend
ways to correct any deficiency and to improve efficiency. The reports
must be distributed to the affected state agencies.
(6) The state auditor must provide an annual overview and update of
hotline investigations, including the results and efficiencies
achieved, to the legislature and to the appropriate legislative
committees.

--- END ---