BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to limit
the amount of information that is made public in property assessments
in order to protect property owners from being the victims of crime.
Currently, property assessment information has included photographs
that have contained pictures of property owners' children, vehicles
with license plate numbers, and other related personal information. In
order to prevent property owners from being potential victims of crime,
this type of information must not be made public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.21 RCW
to read as follows:
When assessing the value of real property, the county assessor or
agents of the assessor shall not publicize any personal information
related to the property owner that is not in relation to the assessment
of the property. Personal information includes, but is not limited to,
the following:
(1) Pictures of children, automobiles, pets, alarm systems, or
floor plans; and
(2) Information contained in print or picture that may assist a
person in committing a crime.

--- END ---