BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Pursuant to the second amendment to the United States
Constitution and Article I, section 24 of the Washington state
Constitution, nothing under this or any other provision of law shall be
construed to authorize:
(a) The seizure or confiscation of a firearm or ammunition during
an emergency or disaster, except: (i) From a person who is unlawfully
carrying or in unlawful possession of a firearm or ammunition, (ii)
when seized or confiscated as evidence in a criminal investigation, or
(iii) when forfeited in compliance with RCW 9.41.098; or
(b) The governor, any political subdivision, or any other
governmental authority to impose additional restrictions on the lawful
possession, transfer, sale, transport, carrying, storage, display, or
use of a firearm or ammunition during an emergency or disaster.
(2) In addition to any remedy provided by law or in equity, an
individual aggrieved by the seizure or confiscation of a firearm in
violation of this section may bring an action for the return of the
firearm in the jurisdiction in which the individual resides or in which
the firearm may be found. The court may award reasonable attorneys'
fees to the prevailing party.
(3) As used in this section, "firearm" has the meaning ascribed to
it in RCW 9.41.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the
emergency management firearm owners' protection act.

--- END ---