BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that through the
medicaid program, state and federal government fund long-term care,
mental health, and medical services for many elderly persons and people
with disabilities, both in institutions and in community alternatives.
The legislature also finds that a significant portion of these
individuals' social security benefits is retained by the state to
assist with the cost of their care. The legislature intends that these
individuals retain for their own use a reasonable personal needs
allowance which may be used to purchase clothing, postage, barber
services, travel, and other personal items not covered by their care
setting, in order to ensure their autonomy and dignity.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to adjust the personal
needs allowance annually to reflect cost-of-living adjustments to
federal social security benefits for medicaid-eligible residents in
institutions and community-based residential settings receiving long-term care, developmental disabilities, or mental health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Effective July 1, 2008, and each fiscal year thereafter, the
personal needs allowance shall be adjusted for economic trends and
conditions by increasing the allowance by the percentage cost-of-living
adjustment for old-age, survivors, and disability social security
benefits as published by the federal social security administration.
However, in no case shall the personal needs allowance exceed the
maximum personal needs allowance permissible under the federal social
security act.

--- END ---