BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.397 and 1999 c 232 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
shall be applicable:
(a) "Mainstem of the Columbia and Snake rivers" means the mainstem
of the Columbia and Snake rivers from the Bonneville dam to the upper
limits of the pool behind the Chief Joseph dam on the Columbia river,
from the confluence of the Snake river and the Columbia river to the
upper limits of the pool behind the Ice Harbor dam.
(b) "Pool" means any surface water reservoir where water is
collected and stored for subsequent beneficial use.
(2) The department may approve a change of the point of diversion
prescribed in a permit to appropriate water for a beneficial use to a
point of diversion that is located downstream, or in the same pool of
the mainstem of the Columbia and Snake rivers, and is an ((existing))
approved intake structure ((with capacity to transport the additional
diversion,)) if the ownership, purpose of use, season of use, and place
of use of the permit remain the same. The requirement in RCW 90.03.395
that a change in point of diversion of a water right permit must
provide environmental benefits shall not apply for a change of point of
diversion that is located in the same pool of the mainstem of the
Columbia and Snake rivers.
(3) This section may not be construed as limiting in any manner
whatsoever other authorities of the department under RCW 90.03.380 or
other changes that may be approved under RCW 90.03.380 under
authorities existing before July 25, 1999.

--- END ---