BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The office of the superintendent of
public instruction, jointly with the department of licensing, shall
convene an advisory committee of experts and stakeholders to study ways
to make traffic safety education more accessible to students who
receive home-based instruction. The membership of the advisory
committee shall include the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee, commercial driving schools, the Washington
homeschool organization, private providers, and parents.
(2) The study, along with its recommendations, shall be completed
by January 1, 2008, and the results reported to the governor and the
legislature.

--- END ---