BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Whenever a portion of the territory of
a district is included within the corporate boundaries of a city, code
city, or town as a result of the city, code city, or town annexing the
area, the city, code city, or town legislative authority may adopt a
resolution or ordinance to assume jurisdiction over the annexed portion
of the district.
(2) Upon the assumption, all real and personal property, rights,
assets, and taxes levied but not collected for the annexed portion of
the district for other than indebtedness of the district residing in,
or representing the portion of, the annexed area shall become the
property of the city, code city, or town subject to all financial,
statutory, or contractual obligations of the district for the security
or performance of which the property may have been pledged. The city,
code city, or town, in addition to its other powers, shall have the
power to manage, control, maintain, and operate any property or
facilities and equipment residing in the annexed area subject, however,
to any outstanding indebtedness, bonded or otherwise, of the district
payable from taxes, assessments, or revenues of any kind or nature and
to any other contractual obligations relating to the annexed portion of
the district. An assumption shall not be deemed to impair the
obligation of any indebtedness or other contractual obligation.
(3) For purposes of this section, "district" means rural county
library district.
(4) The provisions of this section are only applicable to counties
with a population of one million five hundred thousand persons or more.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this
chapter to the contrary, a city, code city, or town that annexes a
territory within the boundaries of a rural county library district and
the rural county library district, through their legislative
authorities, may authorize a contract with respect to the rights,
powers, duties, and obligations of such city, code city, or town, and
district with regard to the use and ownership of property, the
provision of services, the maintenance and operation of facilities,
allocation of cost, financing, and construction of new facilities,
application and use of assets, disposition of liabilities and debts,
the performance of contractual obligations, and any other matters
arising out of the annexation of the portion of the district within the
annexing city, code city, or town. The contract may provide for the
furnishing of services by any party thereto and the use of city, code
city, town, or district facilities or real estate for such purpose, and
may also provide for the time during which such district may continue
to exercise any rights, privileges, powers, and functions provided by
law for such district as if the district or portions thereof were not
included within the city, code city, or town including, but not limited
to, the right to adopt rules and regulations; to levy and collect
special assessments, rates, and charges; to adopt and carry out the
provisions of a comprehensive plan and amendments thereto; and to issue
general obligation bonds or revenue bonds in the manner provided by
law.
(2) The provisions of this section are only applicable to counties
with a population of one million five hundred thousand persons or more.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Whenever a city annexes a territory that
is within the boundaries of a rural county library district, any
buildings and equipment of the district that are located within the
annexed territory shall be transferred to the city, code city, or town
upon annexation.
(2) Any planned capital improvements to existing facilities or
planned construction of new facilities within the annexed territory
shall either be completed by the rural county library district using
original capital bond revenues, with timing and funding subject to
interlocal agreement between the district and annexing city, code city,
or town, or alternatively, the district shall transfer that part of the
bond proceeds to be used for the capital project, as described on the
ballot proposition authorizing the bond issue, to the city, code city,
or town annexing the territory within which the capital improvements or
new construction were originally planned.
(3) The provisions of this section are only applicable to counties
with a population of one million five hundred thousand persons or more.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) When a city, code city, or town annexes
a portion of the territory of a rural county library district, an
appraisal must be conducted of the value of the library materials and
collections. The appraisal standards shall be agreed upon by the city,
code city, or town and the rural county library district before the
appraisal takes place. The appraisal shall be used to identify the
proportionate share of each branch's library collection to the annexing
city, code city, or town. The rural county library district shall pay
to the city, code city, or town an amount representing the city's, code
city's, or town's proportionate share of the value of the rural county
library district's materials and collections. The city, code city, or
town may use the money received from the rural county library district
only for the purpose of purchasing library assets.
(2) The provisions of this section are only applicable to counties
with a population of one million five hundred thousand persons or more.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A rural county library district that has
a portion of its assets, facilities, or indebtedness assumed by a city,
code city, or town from annexation may subject the action to review
under RCW 36.93.100.
(2) The provisions of this section are only applicable to counties
with a population of one million five hundred thousand persons or more.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) If any portion of a rural county library
district is annexed into a city, code city, or town, any employee of
the rural county library district who (a) was at the time of such
annexation employed exclusively or principally in performing the
powers, duties, and functions that are to be performed by the city,
code city, or town library department, (b) will, as a direct
consequence of annexation, be separated from the employ of the rural
county library district, and (c) can perform the duties and meet the
minimum requirements of the position to be filled, may transfer
employment to the civil service system of the city, code city, or town
library department as provided for in this section.
(2) An eligible employee may transfer into the civil service system
of the city, code city, or town library department by filing a written
request with the city, code city, or town civil service commission and
by giving written notice thereof to the board of commissioners of the
rural county library district. Upon receipt of such request by the
civil service commission, the transfer of employment shall be made.
The employee so transferring shall (a) be on probation for the same
period as are new employees of the city, code city, or town library
department in the position filled, but the transferring employee may
only be terminated during the probationary period for failure to
adequately perform assigned duties, not meeting the minimum
qualifications of the position, or behavior that would otherwise be
subject to disciplinary action; (b) be eligible for promotion no later
than after completion of the probationary period; (c) receive a salary
at least equal to that of other new employees of the city, code city,
or town library department in the position filled; and (d) in all other
matters, such as retirement, sick leave, and vacation, have, within the
city, code city, or town civil service system, all rights, benefits,
and privileges to which he or she would have been entitled as a member
of the city, code city, or town library department from the beginning
of employment with the rural county library district.
(3) As many of the transferring employees shall be placed upon the
payroll of the city, code city, or town library department as the
library department determines are needed to provide services. These
needed employees shall be taken in order of seniority and the remaining
employees who transfer as provided in this section shall head the list
for employment in the civil service system in order of their seniority,
so as to be the first to be reemployed in the city, code city, or town
library department when appropriate positions become available:
PROVIDED, That employees who are not immediately hired by the city,
code city, or town shall be placed on a reemployment list for a period
not to exceed thirty-six months unless a longer period is authorized by
an agreement reached between the rural county library district and the
annexing city, code city, or town.
(4) If any portion of a rural county library district is annexed
into a city, code city, or town, and as a result any employee is laid
off who is eligible to transfer to the city, code city, or town library
department under this section, the rural county library district shall
notify the employee of the right to transfer and the employee shall
have ninety days to transfer employment to the city, code city, or town
library department.
(5) For purposes of this section, "employee" means an individual
whose employment with a rural county library district has been
terminated because a portion of the rural county library district was
annexed by a city, code city, or town.
(6) The provisions of this section are only applicable to counties
with a population of one million five hundred thousand persons or more.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) An agreement on the distribution of
assets from the rural county library district to the city, code city,
or town shall be entered into by the city, code city, or town and the
rural county library district within ninety days of the effective date
of the annexation. A distribution shall be based upon the extent of
the increased library service responsibilities with a corresponding
reduction in library service responsibilities by the rural county
library district, and shall consider the impact of any debt obligation
that may exist on the property that is so annexed. If an agreement is
not entered into after the ninety-day period, arbitration shall proceed
under subsection (2) of this section concerning the distribution of
assets unless both parties have agreed to an extension of this period.
(2) Arbitration shall proceed under this subsection over the issue
of whether a significant increase in the library service
responsibilities will be imposed upon the city, code city, or town as
a result of the annexation with a corresponding reduction in library
service responsibilities by the rural county library district, or over
the distribution of assets from the rural county library district to
the city, code city, or town if such a significant increase in library
service responsibilities will be imposed. A board of arbitrators shall
be established for an arbitration required under this section. The
board of arbitrators shall consist of three persons, one of whom is
appointed by the city, code city, or town within sixty days of the date
when arbitration is required, one of whom is appointed by the rural
county library district within sixty days of the date when arbitration
is required, and one of whom is appointed by agreement of the other two
arbitrators within thirty days of the appointment of the last of these
other two arbitrators who is so appointed. If the two are unable to
agree on the appointment of the third arbitrator within the thirty-day
period, then the third arbitrator shall be appointed by a judge in the
superior court of the county within which all or the greatest portion
of the area that was so annexed lies. The determination by the board
of arbitrators shall be binding on both the city, code city, or town
and the rural county library district.
(3) The provisions of this section are only applicable to counties
with a population of one million five hundred thousand persons or more.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act are each
added to chapter 27.12 RCW.

--- END ---