BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.684 and 2004 c 256 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city or town may not ((enact any statute or)) adopt an
ordinance that has the effect, directly or indirectly, of
discriminating against consumers' choices in the placement or use of a
home in such a manner that is not equally applicable to all homes.
Homes built to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 5401-5403 standards (as amended in 2000)
must be regulated for the purposes of siting in the same manner as site
built homes, factory built homes, or homes built to any other state
construction or local design standard. However, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, any city or town may require that:
(a) A manufactured home be a new manufactured home;
(b) The manufactured home be set upon a permanent foundation, as
specified by the manufacturer, and that the space from the bottom of
the home to the ground be enclosed by concrete or an approved concrete
product which can be either load bearing or decorative;
(c) The manufactured home comply with all local design standards
applicable to all other homes within the neighborhood in which the
manufactured home is to be located;
(d) The home is thermally equivalent to the state energy code; and
(e) The manufactured home otherwise meets all other requirements
for a designated manufactured home as defined in RCW 35.63.160.
A city with a population of one hundred thirty-five thousand or
more may choose to designate its building official as the person
responsible for issuing all permits, including department of labor and
industries permits issued under chapter 43.22 RCW in accordance with an
interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW, for alterations,
remodeling, or expansion of manufactured housing located within the
city limits under this section.
(2) A city or town may not adopt an ordinance that has the effect,
directly or indirectly, of restricting the location of mobile homes or
manufactured homes in mobile home parks or manufactured housing
communities, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, which were legally in
existence before the effective date of this section, based exclusively
on the age or dimensions of the mobile home or manufactured home. This
does not preclude a city or town from restricting the location of a
mobile home or manufactured home in mobile home parks or manufactured
housing communities for any other reason including, but not limited to,
failure to comply with fire, safety, or other local ordinances or state
laws related to mobile homes and manufactured homes.
(3) This section does not override any legally recorded covenants
or deed restrictions of record.
(((3))) (4) This section does not affect the authority granted
under chapter 43.22 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 35A.21.312 and 2004 c 256 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A code city may not ((enact any statute or)) adopt an ordinance
that has the effect, directly or indirectly, of discriminating against
consumers' choices in the placement or use of a home in such a manner
that is not equally applicable to all homes. Homes built to 42 U.S.C.
Sec. 5401-5403 standards (as amended in 2000) must be regulated for the
purposes of siting in the same manner as site built homes, factory
built homes, or homes built to any other state construction or local
design standard. However, except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, any code city may require that:
(a) A manufactured home be a new manufactured home;
(b) The manufactured home be set upon a permanent foundation, as
specified by the manufacturer, and that the space from the bottom of
the home to the ground be enclosed by concrete or an approved concrete
product which can be either load bearing or decorative;
(c) The manufactured home comply with all local design standards
applicable to all other homes within the neighborhood in which the
manufactured home is to be located;
(d) The home is thermally equivalent to the state energy code; and
(e) The manufactured home otherwise meets all other requirements
for a designated manufactured home as defined in RCW 35.63.160.
A code city with a population of one hundred thirty-five thousand
or more may choose to designate its building official as the person
responsible for issuing all permits, including department of labor and
industries permits issued under chapter 43.22 RCW in accordance with an
interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW, for alterations,
remodeling, or expansion of manufactured housing located within the
city limits under this section.
(2) A code city may not adopt an ordinance that has the effect,
directly or indirectly, of restricting the location of mobile homes or
manufactured homes in mobile home parks or manufactured housing
communities, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, which were legally in
existence before the effective date of this section, based exclusively
on the age or dimensions of the mobile home or manufactured home. This
does not preclude a code city from restricting the location of a mobile
home or manufactured home in mobile home parks or manufactured housing
communities for any other reason including, but not limited to, failure
to comply with fire, safety, or other local ordinances or state laws
related to mobile homes and manufactured homes.
(3) This section does not override any legally recorded covenants
or deed restrictions of record.
(((3))) (4) This section does not affect the authority granted
under chapter 43.22 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.01.225 and 2004 c 256 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county may not ((enact any statute or)) adopt an ordinance
that has the effect, directly or indirectly, of discriminating against
consumers' choices in the placement or use of a home in such a manner
that is not equally applicable to all homes. Homes built to 42 U.S.C.
Sec. 5401-5403 standards (as amended in 2000) must be regulated for the
purposes of siting in the same manner as site built homes, factory
built homes, or homes built to any other state construction or local
design standard. However, except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, any county may require that:
(a) A manufactured home be a new manufactured home;
(b) The manufactured home be set upon a permanent foundation, as
specified by the manufacturer, and that the space from the bottom of
the home to the ground be enclosed by concrete or an approved concrete
product which can be either load bearing or decorative;
(c) The manufactured home comply with all local design standards
applicable to all other homes within the neighborhood in which the
manufactured home is to be located;
(d) The home is thermally equivalent to the state energy code; and
(e) The manufactured home otherwise meets all other requirements
for a designated manufactured home as defined in RCW 35.63.160.
(2) A county may not adopt an ordinance that has the effect,
directly or indirectly, of restricting the location of mobile homes or
manufactured homes in mobile home parks or manufactured housing
communities, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, which were legally in
existence before the effective date of this section, based exclusively
on the age or dimensions of the mobile home or manufactured home. This
does not preclude a county from restricting the location of a mobile
home or manufactured home in mobile home parks or manufactured housing
communities for any other reason including, but not limited to, failure
to comply with fire, safety, or other local ordinances or state laws
related to mobile homes and manufactured homes.
(3) This section does not override any legally recorded covenants
or deed restrictions of record.
(((3))) (4) This section does not affect the authority granted
under chapter 43.22 RCW.

--- END ---