BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.190 and 1996 c 230 s 1610 are each amended to
read as follows:
The cost of a policy or plan to a public agency or body is not
additional compensation to the employees or elected officials covered
thereby. The elected officials to whom this section applies include
but are not limited to commissioners elected under chapters 28A.315,
52.14, 53.12, 54.12, 57.12, 70.44, and 87.03 RCW, as well as any county
elected officials who are provided insurance coverage under RCW
41.04.180, and city officials elected under chapters 35.17, 35.22,
35.23, 35.27, 35A.12, and 35A.13 RCW. Any officer authorized to
disburse such funds may pay in whole or in part to an insurance carrier
or health care service contractor the amount of the premiums due under
the contract.

--- END ---