BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.33.035 and 2004 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agricultural methods" means the cultivation of trees that are
grown on land prepared by intensive cultivation and tilling, such as
irrigating, plowing, or turning over the soil, and on which all
unwanted plant growth is controlled continuously for the exclusive
purpose of raising trees such as Christmas trees and short-rotation
hardwoods.
(2) "Average rate of inflation" means the annual rate of inflation
as determined by the department averaged over the period of time as
provided in RCW 84.33.220 (1) and (2). This rate shall be published in
the state register by the department not later than January 1st of each
year for use in that assessment year.
(3) "Commercial purposes" means the use of the forest land on a
continuous and regular basis after application for designation that
demonstrates the owner will engage in and intends to obtain, through
lawful means, monetary profit from cash income by growing and
harvesting timber, including timber grown using the methods described
in subsection (1) of this section. However, this requirement does not
apply if there is a governmental restriction that prohibits, in whole
or in part, the owner from harvesting timber from the parcel.
(4) "Composite property tax rate" for a county means the total
amount of property taxes levied upon forest lands by all taxing
districts in the county other than the state, divided by the total
assessed value of all forest land in the county.
(((4))) (5) "Forest land" is synonymous with "designated forest
land" and means any parcel of land that is ((twenty)) five or more
acres or multiple parcels of land that are contiguous and total
((twenty)) five or more acres that is or are devoted primarily to
growing and harvesting timber for commercial purposes as defined in
this section. Designated forest land means the land only and does not
include a residential homesite. The term includes land used for
incidental uses that are compatible with the growing and harvesting of
timber but no more than ten percent of the land may be used for such
incidental uses. It also includes the land on which appurtenances
necessary for the production, preparation, or sale of the timber
products exist in conjunction with land producing these products.
(((5))) (6) "Harvested" means the time when in the ordinary course
of business the quantity of timber by species is first definitely
determined. The amount harvested shall be determined by the Scribner
Decimal C Scale or other prevalent measuring practice adjusted to
arrive at substantially equivalent measurements, as approved by the
department.
(((6))) (7) "Harvester" means every person who from the person's
own land or from the land of another under a right or license granted
by lease or contract, either directly or by contracting with others for
the necessary labor or mechanical services, fells, cuts, or takes
timber for sale or for commercial or industrial use. When the United
States or any instrumentality thereof, the state, including its
departments and institutions and political subdivisions, or any
municipal corporation therein so fells, cuts, or takes timber for sale
or for commercial or industrial use, the harvester is the first person
other than the United States or any instrumentality thereof, the state,
including its departments and institutions and political subdivisions,
or any municipal corporation therein, who acquires title to or a
possessory interest in the timber. The term "harvester" does not
include persons performing under contract the necessary labor or
mechanical services for a harvester.
(((7))) (8) "Harvesting and marketing costs" means only those costs
directly associated with harvesting the timber from the land and
delivering it to the buyer and may include the costs of disposing of
logging residues. Any other costs that are not directly and
exclusively related to harvesting and marketing of the timber, such as
costs of permanent roads or costs of reforesting the land following
harvest, are not harvesting and marketing costs.
(((8))) (9) "Incidental use" means a use of designated forest land
that is compatible with its purpose for growing and harvesting timber.
An incidental use may include a gravel pit, a shed or land used to
store machinery or equipment used in conjunction with the timber
enterprise, and any other use that does not interfere with or indicate
that the forest land is no longer primarily being used to grow and
harvest timber.
(((9))) (10) "Local government" means any city, town, county,
water-sewer district, public utility district, port district,
irrigation district, flood control district, or any other municipal
corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or other political
subdivision authorized to levy special benefit assessments for sanitary
or storm sewerage systems, domestic water supply or distribution
systems, or road construction or improvement purposes.
(((10))) (11) "Local improvement district" means any local
improvement district, utility local improvement district, local utility
district, road improvement district, or any similar unit created by a
local government for the purpose of levying special benefit assessments
against property specially benefited by improvements relating to the
districts.
(((11))) (12) "Owner" means the party or parties having the fee
interest in land, except where land is subject to a real estate
contract "owner" means the contract vendee.
(((12))) (13) "Primarily" or "primary use" means the existing use
of the land is so prevalent that when the characteristic use of the
land is evaluated any other use appears to be conflicting or
nonrelated.
(((13))) (14) "Short-rotation hardwoods" means hardwood trees, such
as but not limited to hybrid cottonwoods, cultivated by agricultural
methods in growing cycles shorter than fifteen years.
(((14))) (15) "Small harvester" means every person who from his or
her own land or from the land of another under a right or license
granted by lease or contract, either directly or by contracting with
others for the necessary labor or mechanical services, fells, cuts, or
takes timber for sale or for commercial or industrial use in an amount
not exceeding two million board feet in a calendar year. When the
United States or any instrumentality thereof, the state, including its
departments and institutions and political subdivisions, or any
municipal corporation therein so fells, cuts, or takes timber for sale
or for commercial or industrial use, not exceeding these amounts, the
small harvester is the first person other than the United States or any
instrumentality thereof, the state, including its departments and
institutions and political subdivisions, or any municipal corporation
therein, who acquires title to or a possessory interest in the timber.
Small harvester does not include persons performing under contract the
necessary labor or mechanical services for a harvester, and it does not
include the harvesters of Christmas trees or short-rotation hardwoods.
(((15))) (16) "Special benefit assessments" means special
assessments levied or capable of being levied in any local improvement
district or otherwise levied or capable of being levied by a local
government to pay for all or part of the costs of a local improvement
and which may be levied only for the special benefits to be realized by
property by reason of that local improvement.
(((16))) (17) "Stumpage value of timber" means the appropriate
stumpage value shown on tables prepared by the department under RCW
84.33.091, provided that for timber harvested from public land and sold
under a competitive bidding process, stumpage value shall mean the
actual amount paid to the seller in cash or other consideration. The
stumpage value of timber from public land does not include harvesting
and marketing costs if the timber from public land is harvested by, or
under contract for, the United States or any instrumentality of the
United States, the state, including its departments and institutions
and political subdivisions, or any municipal corporation therein.
Whenever payment for the stumpage includes considerations other than
cash, the value shall be the fair market value of the other
consideration. If the other consideration is permanent roads, the
value of the roads shall be the appraised value as appraised by the
seller.
(((17))) (18) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on
privately or publicly owned land, and except as provided in RCW
84.33.170 includes Christmas trees and short-rotation hardwoods.
(((18))) (19) "Timber assessed value" for a county means the sum
of: (a) The total stumpage value of timber harvested from publicly
owned land in the county multiplied by the public timber ratio, plus;
(b) the total stumpage value of timber harvested from privately owned
land in the county multiplied by the private timber ratio. The
numerator of the public timber ratio is the rate of tax imposed by the
county under RCW 84.33.051 on public timber harvests for the year of
the calculation. The numerator of the private timber ratio is the rate
of tax imposed by the county under RCW 84.33.051 on private timber
harvests for the year of the calculation. The denominator of the
private timber ratio and the public timber ratio is the composite
property tax rate for the county for taxes due in the year of the
calculation, expressed as a percentage of assessed value. The
department shall use the stumpage value of timber harvested during the
most recent four calendar quarters for which the information is
available. The department shall calculate the timber assessed value
for each county before October 1st of each year.
(((19))) (20) "Timber assessed value" for a taxing district means
the timber assessed value for the county multiplied by a ratio. The
numerator of the ratio is the total assessed value of forest land in
the taxing district. The denominator is the total assessed value of
forest land in the county. As used in this section, "assessed value of
forest land" means the assessed value of forest land for taxes due in
the year the timber assessed value for the county is calculated plus an
additional value for public forest land. The additional value for
public forest land is the product of the number of acres of public
forest land that are available for timber harvesting determined under
RCW 84.33.089 and the average assessed value per acre of private forest
land in the county.
(((20))) (21) "Timber management plan" means a plan prepared by a
trained forester, or any other person with adequate knowledge of timber
management practices, concerning the use of the land to grow and
harvest timber. Such a plan ((includes)) may include:
(a) A legal description of the forest land;
(b) A statement that the forest land is held in contiguous
ownership of ((twenty)) five or more acres and is primarily devoted to
and used to grow and harvest timber;
(c) A brief description of the timber on the forest land or, if the
timber on the land has been harvested, the owner's plan to restock the
land with timber;
(d) A statement about whether the forest land is also used to graze
livestock;
(e) A statement about whether the land has been used in compliance
with the restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect and
disease control, and forest debris provisions of Title 76 RCW; and
(f) If the land has been recently harvested or supports a growth of
brush and noncommercial type timber, a description of the owner's plan
to restock the forest land within three years.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.33.130 and 2003 c 170 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, lands that were
assessed as classified forest land before July 22, 2001, or open space
timber land under chapter 84.34 RCW before the effective date of this
section, shall be designated forest land for the purposes of this
chapter. The date the property was classified as open space timber
shall be considered the date the property was designated as forest land
under this chapter. The assessor shall notify each owner of open space
timber land of the transfer by certified mail. For any forest land
removed from designation after the merger of designated forest land and
open space timber land on the effective date of this section, only
compensating tax shall be collected as a result of the removal in
accordance with RCW 84.33.140(12), unless otherwise provided by law.
The owners of previously classified forest land shall not be required
to apply for designation under this chapter. As of ((July 22, 2001))
the effective date of this section, the land and timber on such land
shall be assessed and taxed in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter.
Any open space taxation agreement recorded with a county
legislative authority by an owner of classified open space timber land
before the effective date of this section, becomes null and void when
the subject land becomes designated as forest land under this chapter.
(2) An owner of land desiring that it be designated as forest land
and valued under RCW 84.33.140 as of January 1st of any year shall
submit an application to the assessor of the county in which the land
is located before January 1st of that year. The application shall be
accompanied by a reasonable processing fee when the county legislative
authority has established the requirement for such a fee.
(3) No application of designation is required when publicly owned
forest land is exchanged for privately owned forest land designated
under this chapter. The land exchanged and received by an owner
subject to ad valorem taxation shall be automatically granted
designation under this chapter if the following conditions are met:
(a) The land will be used to grow and harvest timber; and
(b) The owner of the land submits a document to the assessor's
office that explains the details of the forest land exchange within
sixty days of the closing date of the exchange. However, if the owner
fails to submit information regarding the exchange by the end of this
sixty-day period, the owner must file an application for designation as
forest land under this chapter and the regular application process will
be followed.
(4) The application shall be made upon forms prepared by the
department and supplied by the assessor, and shall include the
following:
(a) A legal description of, or assessor's parcel numbers for, all
land the applicant desires to be designated as forest land;
(b) The date or dates of acquisition of the land;
(c) A brief description of the timber on the land, or if the timber
has been harvested, the owner's plan for restocking;
(d) A copy of the timber management plan, if one exists, for the
land prepared by a trained forester or any other person with adequate
knowledge of timber management practices;
(e) If a timber management plan exists, an explanation of the
nature and extent to which the management plan has been implemented;
(f) Whether the land is used for grazing;
(g) Whether the land has been subdivided or a plat has been filed
with respect to the land;
(h) Whether the land and the applicant are in compliance with the
restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect and disease
control, and forest debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable
rules under Title 76 RCW;
(i) Whether the land is subject to forest fire protection
assessments under RCW 76.04.610;
(j) Whether the land is subject to a lease, option, or other right
that permits it to be used for any purpose other than growing and
harvesting timber;
(k) A summary of the past experience and activity of the applicant
in growing and harvesting timber;
(l) A summary of current and continuing activity of the applicant
in growing and harvesting timber;
(m) A statement that the applicant is aware of the potential tax
liability involved when the land ceases to be designated as forest
land;
(n) An affirmation that the statements contained in the application
are true and that the land described in the application meets the
definition of forest land in RCW 84.33.035; and
(o) A description and/or drawing showing what areas of land for
which designation is sought are used for incidental uses compatible
with the definition of forest land in RCW 84.33.035.
(5) The assessor shall afford the applicant an opportunity to be
heard if the applicant so requests.
(6) The assessor shall act upon the application with due regard to
all relevant evidence and without any one or more items of evidence
necessarily being determinative, except that the application may be
denied for one of the following reasons, without regard to other items:
(a) The land does not contain a "merchantable stand of timber" as
defined in chapter 76.09 RCW and applicable rules. This reason shall
not alone be sufficient to deny the application (i) if the land has
been recently harvested or supports a growth of brush or noncommercial
type timber, and the application includes a plan for restocking within
three years or a longer period necessitated by unavailability of seed
or seedlings, or (ii) if only isolated areas within the land do not
meet the minimum standards due to rock outcroppings, swamps,
unproductive soil or other natural conditions;
(b) The applicant, with respect to the land, has failed to comply
with a final administrative or judicial order with respect to a
violation of the restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect
and disease control, and forest debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or
any applicable rules under Title 76 RCW; or
(c) The land abuts a body of salt water and lies between the line
of ordinary high tide and a line paralleling the ordinary high tide
line and two hundred feet horizontally landward from the high tide
line. However, if the assessor determines that a higher and better use
exists for the land but this use would not be permitted or economically
feasible by virtue of any federal, state, or local law or regulation,
the land shall be assessed and valued under RCW 84.33.140 without being
designated as forest land.
(7) The application shall be deemed to have been approved unless,
prior to ((May)) July 1st of the year after the application was mailed
or delivered to the assessor, the assessor notifies the applicant in
writing of the extent to which the application is denied.
(8) An owner who receives notice that his or her application has
been denied, in whole or in part, may appeal the denial to the county
board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW
84.40.038.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.33.140 and 2005 c 303 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When land has been designated as forest land under RCW
84.33.130, a notation of the designation shall be made each year upon
the assessment and tax rolls. A copy of the notice of approval
together with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for
the land shall, at the expense of the applicant, be filed by the
assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded.
(2) In preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002, for
taxes payable in 2003 and each January 1st thereafter, the assessor
shall list each parcel of designated forest land at a value with
respect to the grade and class provided in this subsection and adjusted
as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The assessor shall
compute the assessed value of the land using the same assessment ratio
applied generally in computing the assessed value of other property in
the county. Values for the several grades of bare forest land shall be
as follows:

LAND
GRADE OPERABILITY
CLASS VALUES
PER ACRE

1 $234

1 2 229

3 217

4 157

1 198

2 2 190

3 183

4 132

1 154

3 2 149

3 148

4 113

1 117

4 2 114

3 113

4 86

1 85

5 2 78

3 77

4 52

1 43

6 2 39

3 39

4 37

1 21

7 2 21

3 20

4 20

8 1

(3) On or before December 31, 2001, the department shall adjust by
rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, the forest land values contained in
subsection (2) of this section in accordance with this subsection, and
shall certify the adjusted values to the assessor who will use these
values in preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002. For the
adjustment to be made on or before December 31, 2001, for use in the
2002 assessment year, the department shall:
(a) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1996, and June 30, 2001, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(b) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1995, and June 30, 2000, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(c) Adjust the forest land values contained in subsection (2) of
this section by a percentage equal to one-half of the percentage change
in the average values of harvested timber reflected by comparing the
resultant values calculated under (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(4) For the adjustments to be made on or before December 31, 2002,
and each succeeding year thereafter, the same procedure described in
subsection (3) of this section shall be followed using harvester excise
tax returns filed under RCW 84.33.074. However, this adjustment shall
be made to the prior year's adjusted value, and the five-year periods
for calculating average harvested timber values shall be successively
one year more recent.
(5) Land graded, assessed, and valued as forest land shall continue
to be so graded, assessed, and valued until removal of designation by
the assessor upon the occurrence of any of the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove the designation;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership making the land exempt from ad
valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of forest land
designation continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or
devisee of a deceased owner, shall not, by itself, result in removal of
designation. The signed notice of continuance shall be attached to the
real estate excise tax affidavit provided for in RCW 82.45.150. The
notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared by the department.
If the notice of continuance is not signed by the new owner and
attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all compensating
taxes calculated under subsection (11) of this section shall become due
and payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The auditor
shall not accept an instrument of conveyance regarding designated
forest land for filing or recording unless the new owner has signed the
notice of continuance or the compensating tax has been paid, as
evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the
treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the new
assessed valuation calculated under subsection (11) of this section to
the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of
RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of
equalization to hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that:
(i) The land is no longer primarily devoted to and used for growing
and harvesting timber. However, land shall not be removed from
designation if a governmental agency, organization, or other recipient
identified in subsection (13) or (14) of this section as exempt from
the payment of compensating tax has manifested its intent in writing or
by other official action to acquire a property interest in the
designated forest land by means of a transaction that qualifies for an
exemption under subsection (13) or (14) of this section. The
governmental agency, organization, or recipient shall annually provide
the assessor of the county in which the land is located reasonable
evidence in writing of the intent to acquire the designated land as
long as the intent continues or within sixty days of a request by the
assessor. The assessor may not request this evidence more than once in
a calendar year;
(ii) The owner has failed to comply with a final administrative or
judicial order with respect to a violation of the restocking, forest
management, fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest
debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable rules under Title
76 RCW; or
(iii) Restocking has not occurred to the extent or within the time
specified in the application for designation of such land.
(6) Land shall not be removed from designation if there is a
governmental restriction that prohibits, in whole or in part, the owner
from harvesting timber from the owner's designated forest land. If
only a portion of the parcel is impacted by governmental restrictions
of this nature, the restrictions cannot be used as a basis to remove
the remainder of the forest land from designation under this chapter.
For the purposes of this section, "governmental restrictions" includes:
(a) Any law, regulation, rule, ordinance, program, or other action
adopted or taken by a federal, state, county, city, or other
governmental entity; or (b) the land's zoning or its presence within an
urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110.
(7) The assessor shall have the option of requiring an owner of
forest land to file a timber management plan with the assessor upon the
occurrence of one of the following:
(a) An application for designation as forest land is submitted;
((or))
(b) Designated forest land is sold or transferred and a notice of
continuance, described in subsection (5)(c) of this section, is signed;
or
(c) The assessor has reason to believe that the land is no longer
being used as designated forest land. In this case, the assessor can
require such a plan to determine whether the land can continue as
designated forest land.
(8) If land is removed from designation because of any of the
circumstances listed in subsection (5)(a) through (c) of this section,
the removal shall apply only to the land affected. If land is removed
from designation because of subsection (5)(d) of this section, the
removal shall apply only to the actual area of land that is no longer
primarily devoted to the growing and harvesting of timber, without
regard to any other land that may have been included in the application
and approved for designation, as long as the remaining designated
forest land meets the definition of forest land contained in RCW
84.33.035.
(9) Within thirty days after the removal of designation as forest
land, the assessor shall notify the owner in writing, setting forth the
reasons for the removal. The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal
the removal to the county board of equalization in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(10) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal a copy of the notice
of removal with a notation of the action, if any, upon appeal, together
with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for the land
removed from designation shall, at the expense of the applicant, be
filed by the assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded and a
notation of removal from designation shall immediately be made upon the
assessment and tax rolls. The assessor shall revalue the land to be
removed with reference to its true and fair value as of January 1st of
the year of removal from designation. Both the assessed value before
and after the removal of designation shall be listed. Taxes based on
the value of the land as forest land shall be assessed and payable up
until the date of removal and taxes based on the true and fair value of
the land shall be assessed and payable from the date of removal from
designation.
(11) Except as provided in subsection (5)(c), (13), or (14) of this
section, a compensating tax shall be imposed on land removed from
designation as forest land. The compensating tax shall be due and
payable to the treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the
amount of this tax. As soon as possible after the land is removed from
designation, the assessor shall compute the amount of compensating tax
and mail a notice to the owner of the amount of compensating tax owed
and the date on which payment of this tax is due. The amount of
compensating tax shall be equal to the difference between the amount of
tax last levied on the land as designated forest land and an amount
equal to the new assessed value of the land multiplied by the dollar
rate of the last levy extended against the land, multiplied by a
number, in no event greater than nine, equal to the number of years for
which the land was designated as forest land, plus compensating taxes
on the land at forest land values up until the date of removal and the
prorated taxes on the land at true and fair value from the date of
removal to the end of the current tax year.
(12) Compensating tax, together with applicable interest thereon,
shall become a lien on the land which shall attach at the time the land
is removed from designation as forest land and shall have priority to
and shall be fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance,
mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with
which the land may become charged or liable. The lien may be
foreclosed upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in
the same manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent
real property taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any compensating tax
unpaid on its due date shall thereupon become delinquent. From the
date of delinquency until paid, interest shall be charged at the same
rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.
(13) The compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section shall not be imposed if the removal of designation under
subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other forest
land located within the state of Washington;
(b) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain,
or sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in
anticipation of the exercise of such power;
(c) A donation of fee title, development rights, or the right to
harvest timber, to a government agency or organization qualified under
RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those
sections, or the sale or transfer of fee title to a governmental entity
or a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW
64.04.130, exclusively for the protection and conservation of lands
recommended for state natural area preserve purposes by the natural
heritage council and natural heritage plan as defined in chapter 79.70
RCW or approved for state natural resources conservation area purposes
as defined in chapter 79.71 RCW. At such time as the land is not used
for the purposes enumerated, the compensating tax specified in
subsection (11) of this section shall be imposed upon the current
owner;
(d) The sale or transfer of fee title to the parks and recreation
commission for park and recreation purposes;
(e) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located that disallows the
present use of the land;
(f) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(g) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040; or
(h) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34
RCW continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(((13)(h); or
(i) The sale or transfer of land after the death of the owner of at
least a fifty percent interest in the land if the land has been
assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated as forest
land under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34 RCW
continuously since 1993 and the sale or transfer takes place after July
22, 2001, and on or before July 22, 2003, and the death of the owner
occurred after January 1, 1991. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(13)(i))).
(14) In a county with a population of more than one million
inhabitants, the compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section shall not be imposed if the removal of designation as forest
land under subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) An action described in subsection (13) of this section; or
(b) A transfer of a property interest to a government entity, or to
a nonprofit historic preservation corporation or nonprofit nature
conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW 64.04.130, to protect or
enhance public resources, or to preserve, maintain, improve, restore,
limit the future use of, or otherwise to conserve for public use or
enjoyment, the property interest being transferred. At such time as
the property interest is not used for the purposes enumerated, the
compensating tax shall be imposed upon the current owner.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.33.145 and 2001 c 249 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If no later than thirty days after removal of designation under
this chapter the owner applies for classification under RCW 84.34.020
(1)((,)) or (2), ((or (3),)) then the designated forest land shall not
be considered removed from designation for purposes of the compensating
tax under RCW 84.33.140 until the application for current use
classification under chapter 84.34 RCW is denied or the property is
removed from classification under RCW 84.34.108. Upon removal of
classification under RCW 84.34.108, the amount of compensating tax due
under this chapter shall be equal to:
(a) The difference, if any, between the amount of tax last levied
on the land as designated forest land and an amount equal to the new
assessed valuation of the land when removed from classification under
RCW 84.34.108 multiplied by the dollar rate of the last levy extended
against the land, multiplied by
(b) A number equal to:
(i) The number of years the land was designated under this chapter,
if the total number of years the land was designated under this chapter
and classified under chapter 84.34 RCW is less than ten; or
(ii) Ten minus the number of years the land was classified under
chapter 84.34 RCW, if the total number of years the land was designated
under this chapter and classified under chapter 84.34 RCW is at least
ten.
(2) Nothing in this section authorizes the continued designation
under this chapter or defers or reduces the compensating tax imposed
upon forest land not transferred to classification under subsection (1)
of this section ((which)) that does not meet the definition of forest
land under RCW 84.33.035. Nothing in this section affects the
additional tax imposed under RCW 84.34.108.
(3) In a county with a population of more than one million
inhabitants, no amount of compensating tax is due under this section if
the removal from classification under RCW 84.34.108 results from a
transfer of property described in RCW 84.34.108(6).

Sec. 5 RCW 84.33.170 and 2001 c 249 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, this
chapter shall not exempt from the ad valorem tax nor subject to the
excise tax imposed by this chapter, Christmas trees and short-rotation
hardwoods, which are cultivated by agricultural methods, and the land
on which the Christmas trees and short-rotation hardwoods stand shall
not be taxed as provided in RCW 84.33.140. ((However, short-rotation
hardwoods, which are cultivated by agricultural methods, on land
classified as timber land under chapter 84.34 RCW, shall be subject to
the excise tax imposed under this chapter.))

Sec. 6 RCW 84.34.020 and 2005 c 57 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is required by
the context:
(1) "Open space land" means (a) any land area so designated by an
official comprehensive land use plan adopted by any city or county and
zoned accordingly, or (b) any land area, the preservation of which in
its present use would (i) conserve and enhance natural or scenic
resources, or (ii) protect streams or water supply, or (iii) promote
conservation of soils, wetlands, beaches or tidal marshes, or (iv)
enhance the value to the public of abutting or neighboring parks,
forests, wildlife preserves, nature reservations or sanctuaries or
other open space, or (v) enhance recreation opportunities, or (vi)
preserve historic sites, or (vii) preserve visual quality along
highway, road, and street corridors or scenic vistas, or (viii) retain
in its natural state tracts of land not less than one acre situated in
an urban area and open to public use on such conditions as may be
reasonably required by the legislative body granting the open space
classification, or (c) any land meeting the definition of farm and
agricultural conservation land under subsection (8) of this section.
As a condition of granting open space classification, the legislative
body may not require public access on land classified under (b)(iii) of
this subsection for the purpose of promoting conservation of wetlands.
(2) "Farm and agricultural land" means:
(a) Any parcel of land that is twenty or more acres or multiple
parcels of land that are contiguous and total twenty or more acres:
(i) Devoted primarily to the production of livestock or
agricultural commodities for commercial purposes;
(ii) Enrolled in the federal conservation reserve program or its
successor administered by the United States department of agriculture;
or
(iii) Other similar commercial activities as may be established by
rule;
(b)(i) Any parcel of land that is five acres or more but less than
twenty acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses, which has produced
a gross income from agricultural uses equivalent to, as of January 1,
1993:
(A) One hundred dollars or more per acre per year for three of the
five calendar years preceding the date of application for
classification under this chapter for all parcels of land that are
classified under this subsection or all parcels of land for which an
application for classification under this subsection is made with the
granting authority prior to January 1, 1993; and
(B) On or after January 1, 1993, two hundred dollars or more per
acre per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date
of application for classification under this chapter;
(ii) For the purposes of (b)(i) of this subsection, "gross income
from agricultural uses" includes, but is not limited to, the wholesale
value of agricultural products donated to nonprofit food banks or
feeding programs;
(c) Any parcel of land of less than five acres devoted primarily to
agricultural uses which has produced a gross income as of January 1,
1993, of:
(i) One thousand dollars or more per year for three of the five
calendar years preceding the date of application for classification
under this chapter for all parcels of land that are classified under
this subsection or all parcels of land for which an application for
classification under this subsection is made with the granting
authority prior to January 1, 1993; and
(ii) On or after January 1, 1993, fifteen hundred dollars or more
per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date of
application for classification under this chapter.
Parcels of land described in (b)(i)(A) and (c)(i) of this subsection
shall, upon any transfer of the property excluding a transfer to a
surviving spouse, be subject to the limits of (b)(i)(B) and (c)(ii) of
this subsection;
(d) Any lands including incidental uses as are compatible with
agricultural purposes, including wetlands preservation, provided such
incidental use does not exceed twenty percent of the classified land
and the land on which appurtenances necessary to the production,
preparation, or sale of the agricultural products exist in conjunction
with the lands producing such products. Agricultural lands shall also
include any parcel of land of one to five acres, which is not
contiguous, but which otherwise constitutes an integral part of farming
operations being conducted on land qualifying under this section as
"farm and agricultural lands"; or
(e) The land on which housing for employees and the principal place
of residence of the farm operator or owner of land classified pursuant
to (a) of this subsection is sited if: The housing or residence is on
or contiguous to the classified parcel; and the use of the housing or
the residence is integral to the use of the classified land for
agricultural purposes.
(3) (("Timber land" means any parcel of land that is five or more
acres or multiple parcels of land that are contiguous and total five or
more acres which is or are devoted primarily to the growth and harvest
of timber for commercial purposes. Timber land means the land only and
does not include a residential homesite. The term includes land used
for incidental uses that are compatible with the growing and harvesting
of timber but no more than ten percent of the land may be used for such
incidental uses. It also includes the land on which appurtenances
necessary for the production, preparation, or sale of the timber
products exist in conjunction with land producing these products.
(4))) "Current" or "currently" means as of the date on which
property is to be listed and valued by the assessor.
(((5))) (4) "Owner" means the party or parties having the fee
interest in land, except that where land is subject to real estate
contract "owner" shall mean the contract vendee.
(((6))) (5) "Contiguous" means land adjoining and touching other
property held by the same ownership. Land divided by a public road,
but otherwise an integral part of a farming operation, shall be
considered contiguous.
(((7))) (6) "Granting authority" means the appropriate agency or
official who acts on an application for classification of land pursuant
to this chapter.
(((8))) (7) "Farm and agricultural conservation land" means either:
(a) Land that was previously classified under subsection (2) of
this section, that no longer meets the criteria of subsection (2) of
this section, and that is reclassified under subsection (1) of this
section; or
(b) Land that is traditional farmland that is not classified under
chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW, that has not been irrevocably devoted to a
use inconsistent with agricultural uses, and that has a high potential
for returning to commercial agriculture.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.34.030 and 1989 c 378 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
An owner of agricultural land desiring current use classification
under ((subsection (2) of)) RCW 84.34.020(2) shall make application to
the county assessor upon forms prepared by the state department of
revenue and supplied by the county assessor. An owner of open space
((or timber)) land desiring current use classification under
((subsections (1) and (3) of)) RCW 84.34.020(1) shall make application
to the county legislative authority upon forms prepared by the state
department of revenue and supplied by the county assessor. The
application shall be accompanied by a reasonable processing fee if
((such)) a processing fee is established by the city or county
legislative authority. Said application shall require only such
information reasonably necessary to properly classify an area of land
under this chapter with a notarized verification of the truth thereof
and shall include a statement that the applicant is aware of the
potential tax liability involved when ((such)) the land ceases to be
designated as open space((,)) or farm and agricultural ((or timber))
land. Applications must be made during the calendar year preceding
that in which ((such)) classification is to begin. The assessor shall
make necessary information, including copies of this chapter and
applicable regulations, readily available to interested parties, and
shall render reasonable assistance to such parties upon request.

Sec. 8 RCW 84.34.060 and 1997 c 429 s 32 are each amended to read
as follows:
In determining the true and fair value of open space land ((and
timber land)), which has been classified as such under the provisions
of this chapter, the assessor shall consider only the use to which such
property and improvements is currently applied and shall not consider
potential uses of such property. The assessed valuation of open space
land shall not be less than the minimum value per acre of classified
farm and agricultural land except that the assessed valuation of open
space land may be valued based on the public benefit rating system
adopted under RCW 84.34.055((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That timber land
shall be valued according to chapter 84.33 RCW)). In valuing any tract
or parcel of real property designated and zoned under a comprehensive
plan adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW as agricultural((, forest,)) or
open space land, the appraisal shall not be based on similar sales of
parcels that have been converted to nonagricultural((, nonforest,)) or
nonopen-space uses within five years after the sale.

Sec. 9 RCW 84.34.070 and 1992 c 69 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When land has once been classified under this chapter, it shall
remain under such classification and shall not be applied to other use
except as provided by subsection (2) of this section for at least ten
years from the date of classification ((and)). It shall continue under
such classification until and unless withdrawn from classification
after notice of request for withdrawal shall be made by the owner.
During any year after eight years of the initial ten-year
classification period have elapsed, notice of request for withdrawal of
all or a portion of the land may be given by the owner to the assessor
or assessors of the county or counties in which ((such)) the land is
situated. In the event that a portion of a parcel is removed from
classification, the remaining portion must meet the same requirements
as did the entire parcel when ((such)) the land was originally granted
classification ((pursuant to)) under this chapter unless the remaining
parcel has different income criteria. Within seven days the assessor
shall transmit one copy of ((such)) the notice to the legislative body
((which)) that originally approved the application. The assessor or
assessors, as the case may be, shall, when two assessment years have
elapsed following the date of receipt of ((such)) the notice, withdraw
((such)) the land from ((such)) the classification and the land shall
be subject to the additional tax and applicable interest due under RCW
84.34.108. The open space taxation agreement to tax according to use
shall not be considered to be a contract and can be abrogated at any
time by the legislature in which event no additional tax or penalty
shall be imposed.
(2) The following reclassifications are not considered withdrawals
or removals and are not subject to additional tax under RCW 84.34.108:
(a) ((Reclassification between lands under RCW 84.34.020 (2) and
(3);
(b))) Reclassification of land classified under RCW 84.34.020(2)
((or (3))) or chapter 84.33 RCW to open space land under RCW
84.34.020(1);
(((c))) (b) Reclassification of land classified under RCW
84.34.020(2) ((or (3))) to forest land ((classified)) designated under
chapter 84.33 RCW; and
(((d))) (c) Reclassification of land classified as open space land
under RCW 84.34.020(1)(c) and reclassified to farm and agricultural
land under RCW 84.34.020(2) if the land had been previously classified
as farm and agricultural land under RCW 84.34.020(2).
(3) Applications for reclassification shall be subject to
applicable provisions of RCW 84.34.037, 84.34.035, ((84.34.041,)) and
chapter 84.33 RCW.
(4) The income criteria for land classified under RCW 84.34.020(2)
(b) and (c) may be deferred for land being reclassified from land
classified under RCW 84.34.020(1)(c) ((or (3))), or chapter 84.33 RCW
into RCW 84.34.020(2) (b) or (c) for a period of up to five years from
the date of reclassification.

Sec. 10 RCW 84.34.080 and 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 705 are each amended
to read as follows:
When land which has been classified under this chapter as open
space land((,)) or farm and agricultural land((, or timber land)) is
applied to some other use, except through compliance with RCW
84.34.070, or except as a result solely from any one of the conditions
listed in RCW 84.34.108(6), the owner shall within sixty days notify
the county assessor of ((such)) the change in use and additional real
property tax shall be imposed upon ((such)) the land in an amount equal
to the sum of the following:
(1) The total amount of the additional tax and applicable interest
due under RCW 84.34.108; plus
(2) A penalty amounting to twenty percent of the amount determined
in subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 11 RCW 84.34.108 and 2003 c 170 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When land has once been classified under this chapter, a
notation of the classification shall be made each year upon the
assessment and tax rolls and the land shall be valued pursuant to RCW
84.34.060 or 84.34.065 until removal of all or a portion of the
classification by the assessor upon occurrence of any of the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove all or a portion of
the classification;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership, except a transfer that
resulted from a default in loan payments made to or secured by a
governmental agency that intends to or is required by law or regulation
to resell the property for the same use as before, making all or a
portion of the land exempt from ad valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of classification
continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or devisee of
a deceased owner shall not, by itself, result in removal of
classification. The notice of continuance shall be on a form prepared
by the department. If the notice of continuance is not signed by the
new owner and attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all
additional taxes calculated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section
shall become due and payable by the seller or transferor at time of
sale. The auditor shall not accept an instrument of conveyance
regarding classified land for filing or recording unless the new owner
has signed the notice of continuance or the additional tax has been
paid, as evidenced by the real estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto
by the treasurer. The seller, transferor, or new owner may appeal the
new assessed valuation calculated under subsection (4) of this section
to the county board of equalization in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 84.40.038. Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board
of equalization to hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that all or a portion of the
land no longer meets the criteria for classification under this
chapter. The criteria for classification pursuant to this chapter
continue to apply after classification has been granted.
The granting authority, upon request of an assessor, shall provide
reasonable assistance to the assessor in making a determination whether
the land continues to meet the qualifications of RCW 84.34.020(1) ((or
(3))). The assistance shall be provided within thirty days of receipt
of the request.
(2) Land may not be removed from classification because of:
(a) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120; or
(b) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040.
(3) Within thirty days after ((such)) the removal of all or a
portion of the land from current use classification, the assessor shall
notify the owner in writing, setting forth the reasons for the removal.
The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal the removal to the county
board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW
84.40.038.
(4) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal, the assessor shall
revalue the affected land with reference to its true and fair value on
January 1st of the year of removal from classification. Both the
assessed valuation before and after the removal of classification shall
be listed and taxes shall be allocated according to that part of the
year to which each assessed valuation applies. Except as provided in
subsection (6) of this section, an additional tax, applicable interest,
and penalty shall be imposed which shall be due and payable to the
treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the amount of the
additional tax. As soon as possible, the assessor shall compute the
amount of additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty and the
treasurer shall mail notice to the owner of the amount thereof and the
date on which payment is due. The amount of the additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty shall be determined as follows:
(a) The amount of additional tax shall be equal to the difference
between the property tax paid as "open space land"((,)) or "farm and
agricultural land"((, or "timber land")) and the amount of property tax
otherwise due and payable for the seven years last past had the land
not been so classified;
(b) The amount of applicable interest shall be equal to the
interest upon the amounts of the additional tax paid at the same
statutory rate charged on delinquent property taxes from the dates on
which the additional tax could have been paid without penalty if the
land had been assessed at a value without regard to this chapter;
(c) The amount of the penalty shall be as provided in RCW
84.34.080. The penalty shall not be imposed if the removal satisfies
the conditions of RCW 84.34.070.
(5) Additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty, shall become
a lien on the land ((which)) that shall attach at the time the land is
removed from classification under this chapter and shall have priority
to and shall be fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance,
mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation or responsibility to or with which
the land may become charged or liable. This lien may be foreclosed
upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same
manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real
property taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050 now or as hereafter
amended. Any additional tax unpaid on its due date shall thereupon
become delinquent. From the date of delinquency until paid, interest
shall be charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent ad
valorem property taxes.
(6) The additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty specified
in subsection (4) of this section shall not be imposed if the removal
of classification ((pursuant to)) under subsection (1) of this section
resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other land
located within the state of Washington;
(b)(i) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent
domain, or (ii) sale or transfer to an entity having the power of
eminent domain in anticipation of the exercise of such power, said
entity having manifested its intent in writing or by other official
action;
(c) A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or
other such calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the landowner
changing the use of the property;
(d) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located which disallows the
present use of the land;
(e) Transfer of land to a church when the land would qualify for
exemption ((pursuant to)) under RCW 84.36.020;
(f) Acquisition of property interests by state agencies or agencies
or organizations qualified under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the
purposes enumerated in those sections. At such time as these property
interests are not used for the purposes enumerated in RCW 84.34.210 and
64.04.130 the additional tax specified in subsection (4) of this
section shall be imposed;
(g) Removal of land classified as farm and agricultural land under
RCW 84.34.020(2)(e);
(h) Removal of land from classification after enactment of a
statutory exemption that qualifies the land for exemption and receipt
of notice from the owner to remove the land from classification;
(i) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(j) The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a
conservation easement for the riparian open space program under RCW
76.09.040;
(k) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or classified under this
chapter continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(((6)(k); or
(l) The sale or transfer of land after the death of the owner of at
least a fifty percent interest in the land if the land has been
assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated as forest
land under chapter 84.33 RCW, or classified under this chapter
continuously since 1993 and the sale or transfer takes place after July
22, 2001, and on or before July 22, 2003, and the death of the owner
occurred after January 1, 1991. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purpose of this subsection
(6)(l))).

Sec. 12 RCW 84.34.145 and 1998 c 311 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county legislative authority shall appoint a five member
committee representing the active farming community within the county
to serve in an advisory capacity to the assessor in implementing
assessment guidelines as established by the department of revenue for
the assessment of open space((,)) and farm((s)) and agricultural
land((s, and timber lands)) classified under ((this)) chapter 84.34
RCW.

Sec. 13 RCW 84.34.155 and 1992 c 69 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
Land classified under the provisions of RCW 84.34.020(2) ((or (3)
which)) that meets the definition of forest land under the provisions
of chapter 84.33 RCW, upon request for ((such change)) reclassification
made by the owner to the granting authority, shall be reclassified by
the assessor under the provisions of chapter 84.33 RCW. This change in
classification shall be made without additional tax, applicable
interest, penalty, or other requirements set forth in chapter 84.34
RCW((: PROVIDED, That subsequent to such)). After reclassification,
the land shall be fully subject to the provisions of chapter 84.33
RCW((, as now or hereafter amended)).

Sec. 14 RCW 84.34.210 and 1993 c 248 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any county, city, town, metropolitan park district, metropolitan
municipal corporation, nonprofit historic preservation corporation as
defined in RCW 64.04.130, or nonprofit nature conservancy corporation
or association, as such are defined in RCW 84.34.250, may acquire by
purchase, gift, grant, bequest, devise, lease, or otherwise, except by
eminent domain, the fee simple or any lesser interest, development
right, easement, covenant, or other contractual right necessary to
protect, preserve, maintain, improve, restore, limit the future use of,
or otherwise conserve, selected open space land((,)) and farm and
agricultural land((, and timber land as such)) as these are defined in
chapter 84.34 RCW for public use or enjoyment. Among interests that
may be so acquired are mineral rights. Any county, city, town,
metropolitan park district, metropolitan municipal corporation,
nonprofit historic preservation corporation as defined in RCW
64.04.130, or nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or association,
as ((such are)) defined in RCW 84.34.250, may acquire ((such)) the
property for the purpose of conveying or leasing the property back to
its original owner or other person under such covenants or other
contractual arrangements as will limit the future use of the property
in accordance with the purposes of chapter 243, Laws of 1971 ex. sess.;
i.e., conservation futures.

Sec. 15 RCW 84.34.220 and 1993 c 248 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In accordance with the authority granted in RCW 84.34.210, a
county, city, town, metropolitan park district, metropolitan municipal
corporation, nonprofit historic preservation corporation as defined in
RCW 64.04.130, or nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or
association, as ((such are)) defined in RCW 84.34.250, may specifically
purchase or otherwise acquire, except by eminent domain, rights in
perpetuity to future development of any open space land((,)) and farm
and agricultural land((, and timber land which are so designated under
the provisions of chapter 84.34 RCW)) that are classified and taxed at
current use assessment ((as provided by that chapter)) under the
provisions of chapter 84.34 RCW. For the purposes of chapter 243, Laws
of 1971 ex. sess., ((such)) the developmental rights shall be termed
"conservation futures". The private owner may retain the right to
continue any existing open space use of the land, and to develop any
other open space use, but, under the terms of purchase of conservation
futures, the county, city, town, metropolitan park district,
metropolitan municipal corporation, nonprofit historic preservation
corporation as defined in RCW 64.04.130, or nonprofit nature
conservancy corporation or association, as ((such are)) defined in RCW
84.34.250, may forbid or restrict building thereon, or may require that
improvements cannot be made without county, city, town, metropolitan
park district, metropolitan municipal corporation, nonprofit historic
preservation corporation as defined in RCW 64.04.130, or nonprofit
nature conservancy corporation or association, as ((such are)) defined
in RCW 84.34.250, permission. The land may be alienated or sold and
used as formerly by the new owner, subject to the terms of the
agreement made by the county, city, town, metropolitan park district,
metropolitan municipal corporation, nonprofit historic preservation
corporation as defined in RCW 64.04.130, or nonprofit nature
conservancy corporation or association, as ((such are)) defined in RCW
84.34.250, with the original owner.

Sec. 16 RCW 84.34.300 and 1992 c 52 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that farming((, timber production,)) and the
related agricultural ((and forest)) industries have historically been
and currently are central factors in the economic and social lifeblood
of the state; that it is a fundamental policy of the state to protect
agricultural ((and timber)) lands as a major natural resource in order
to maintain a source to supply a wide range of agricultural ((and
forest)) products; and that the public interest in the protection and
stimulation of farming((, timber production,)) and the agricultural
((and forest)) industries is a basic element of enhancing the economic
viability of this state. The legislature further finds that farm land
((and timber land)) in urbanizing areas ((are)) is often subjected to
high levels of property taxation and benefit assessment, and that
((such)) the levels of taxation and assessment encourage and even force
the removal of such lands from agricultural ((and forest)) uses. The
legislature further finds that because of this level of taxation and
assessment, ((such)) the farm land ((and timber land)) in urbanizing
areas ((are)) is either converted to nonagricultural ((and nonforest))
uses when significant amounts of nearby nonagricultural ((and
nonforest)) area could be suitably used for ((such)) nonagricultural
((and nonforest)) uses, or, much of this farm land ((and timber land))
is left in an unused state. The legislature further finds that with
the approval by the voters of the Fifty-third Amendment to the state
Constitution, and with the enactment of chapter 84.34 RCW, the owners
of farm lands ((and timber lands)) were provided with an opportunity to
have ((such)) the land valued on the basis of its current use and not
its "highest and best use" and that such current use valuation is one
mechanism to protect agricultural ((and timber)) lands. The
legislature further finds that despite this potential property tax
reduction, farm lands ((and timber lands)) in urbanized areas are still
subject to high levels of benefit assessments and continue to be
removed from farm ((and forest)) uses.
It is therefore the purpose of the legislature to establish, with
the enactment of RCW 84.34.300 through 84.34.380, another mechanism to
protect agricultural ((and timber)) land ((which)) that creates an
analogous system of relief from certain benefit assessments for farm
and agricultural land ((and timber land)). It is the intent of the
legislature that special benefit assessments not be imposed for the
availability of sanitary and/or storm sewerage service, or domestic
water service, or for road construction and/or improvement purposes on
farm and agricultural lands ((and timber lands which)) that have been
((designated for)) granted current use classification as farm and
agricultural lands ((or timber lands)) until ((such)) the lands are
withdrawn or removed from ((such)) classification or unless ((such))
the lands benefit from or cause the need for the local improvement
district.
The legislature finds, and it is the intent of RCW 84.34.300
through 84.34.380 and 84.34.922, that special benefit assessments for
the improvement or construction of sanitary and/or storm sewerage
service, or domestic water service, or certain road construction do not
generally benefit land ((which)) that has been classified as open space
farm and agricultural land ((or timber land)) under the open space act,
chapter 84.34 RCW, until ((such)) the land is withdrawn or removed from
((such)) classification or ((such)) the land is used for a more intense
and nonagricultural use((, or the land is no longer used as timber
land)). The purpose of RCW 84.34.300 through 84.34.380 and 84.34.922
is to provide an exemption from certain special benefit assessments
((which)) that do not benefit ((timber land or)) open space farm and
agricultural land, and to provide the means for local governmental
entities to recover ((such)) the assessments in current dollar value in
the event ((such)) the land is no longer devoted to farming ((or
timber)) production under chapter 84.34 RCW. ((Where)) When the owner
of such land chooses to make limited use of improvements related to
special benefit assessments, RCW 84.34.300 through 84.34.380 provides
the means for the partial assessment on open space ((timber and)) farm
land to the extent the land is directly benefited by the improvement.

Sec. 17 RCW 84.34.310 and 1999 c 153 s 71 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in RCW 84.34.300 through 84.34.380, unless a different
meaning is required, the words defined in this section shall have the
meanings indicated.
(1) "Farm and agricultural land" shall mean the same as defined in
RCW 84.34.020(2).
(2) (("Timber land" shall mean the same as defined in RCW
84.34.020(3).
(3))) "Local government" shall mean any city, town, county, water-sewer district, public utility district, port district, irrigation
district, flood control district, or any other municipal corporation,
quasi-municipal corporation, or other political subdivision authorized
to levy special benefit assessments for sanitary and/or storm sewerage
systems, domestic water supply and/or distribution systems, or road
construction or improvement purposes.
(((4))) (3) "Local improvement district" shall mean any local
improvement district, utility local improvement district, local utility
district, road improvement district, or any similar unit created by a
local government for the purpose of levying special benefit assessments
against property specially benefited by improvements relating to such
districts.
(((5))) (4) "Owner" shall mean the same as defined in RCW
84.34.020(((5))) (4) or the applicable statutes relating to special
benefit assessments.
(((6))) (5) The term "average rate of inflation" shall mean the
annual rate of inflation as determined by the department of revenue
averaged over the period of time as provided in RCW 84.34.330 (1) and
(2). ((Such)) This determination shall be published in the form of a
rule not later than January 1 of each year for use in that assessment
year.
(((7))) (6) "Special benefit assessments" shall mean special
assessments levied or capable of being levied in any local improvement
district or otherwise levied or capable of being levied by a local
government to pay for all or part of the costs of a local improvement
and which may be levied only for the special benefits to be realized by
property by reason of that local improvement.

Sec. 18 RCW 84.34.320 and 1992 c 69 s 17 and 1992 c 52 s 16 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Any land classified as farm and agricultural land ((or timber land
pursuant to)) under chapter 84.34 RCW at the earlier of the times the
legislative authority of a local government adopts a resolution,
ordinance, or legislative act (1) to create a local improvement
district, in which such land is included or would have been included
but for ((such)) its classification, or (2) to approve or confirm a
final special benefit assessment roll relating to a sanitary and/or
storm sewerage system, domestic water supply and/or distribution
system, or road construction and/or improvement, which roll would have
included ((such)) the land but for ((such)) its classification, shall
be exempt from special benefit assessments or charges in lieu of
assessment for such purposes as long as that land remains in ((such))
classification, except as otherwise provided in RCW 84.34.360.
Whenever a local government creates a local improvement district,
the levying, collection and enforcement of assessments shall be in the
manner and subject to the same procedures and limitations as are
provided ((pursuant to)) under the law concerning the initiation and
formation of local improvement districts for the particular local
government. Notice of the creation of a local improvement district
that includes farm and agricultural land ((or timber land)) shall be
filed with the county assessor and the legislative authority of the
county in which ((such)) the land is located. The assessor, upon
receiving notice of the creation of ((such)) a local improvement
district, shall send a notice to the owner of the farm and agricultural
land ((or timber land)) listed on the tax rolls of the applicable
county treasurer of: (1) The creation of the local improvement
district; (2) the exemption of that land from special benefit
assessments; (3) the fact that the farm and agricultural land ((or
timber land)) may become subject to the special benefit assessments if
the owner waives the exemption by filing a notarized document with the
governing body of the local government creating the local improvement
district before the confirmation of the final special benefit
assessment roll; and (4) the potential liability, ((pursuant to)) under
RCW 84.34.330, if the exemption is not waived and the land is
subsequently withdrawn or removed from the farm and agricultural land
((or timber land status)) classification. When a local government
approves and confirms a special benefit assessment roll, from which
farm and agricultural land ((or timber land)) has been exempted
((pursuant to)) under this section, it shall file a notice of ((such))
this action with the assessor and the legislative authority of the
county in which ((such)) the land is located and with the treasurer of
that local government((, which)). The notice shall describe the action
taken, the type of improvement involved, the land exempted, and the
amount of the special benefit assessment ((which)) that would have been
levied against the land if it had not been exempted. The filing of
((such)) this notice with the assessor and the treasurer of that local
government shall constitute constructive notice to a purchaser or
encumbrancer of the affected land, and every person whose conveyance or
encumbrance is subsequently executed or subsequently recorded, that
((such)) the exempt land is subject to the charges provided in RCW
84.34.330 and 84.34.340 if ((such)) the land is withdrawn or removed
from its current use classification as farm and agricultural land ((or
timber land)).
The owner of the land exempted from special benefit assessments
((pursuant to)) under this section may waive that exemption by filing
a notarized document to that effect with the legislative authority of
the local government upon receiving notice from said local government
concerning the assessment roll hearing and before the local government
confirms the final special benefit assessment roll. A copy of that
waiver shall be filed by the local government with the assessor, but
the failure of such filing shall not affect the waiver.
Except to the extent provided in RCW 84.34.360, the local
government shall have no duty to furnish service from the improvement
financed by the special benefit assessment to ((such)) the exempted
land.

Sec. 19 RCW 84.34.330 and 1992 c 52 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever farm and agricultural land ((or timber land)) has once
been exempted from special benefit assessments ((pursuant to)) under
RCW 84.34.320, any withdrawal or removal from classification or change
in use from farm and agricultural land ((or timber land)) under chapter
84.34 RCW shall result in the following:
(1) If the bonds used to fund the improvement in the local
improvement district have not been completely retired, ((such)) the
land shall immediately become liable for: (a) The amount of the
special benefit assessment listed in the notice provided for in RCW
84.34.320; plus (b) interest on the amount determined in (1)(a) of this
section, compounded annually at a rate equal to the average rate of
inflation from the time the initial notice is filed by the governmental
entity ((which)) that created the local improvement district as
provided in RCW 84.34.320 to the time the owner withdraws ((such)) or
removes the land from the exemption category provided by this chapter;
or
(2) If the bonds used to fund the improvement in the local
improvement district have been completely retired, ((such)) the land
shall immediately become liable for: (a) The amount of the special
benefit assessment listed in the notice provided for in RCW 84.34.320;
plus (b) interest on the amount determined in (2)(a) of this section
compounded annually at a rate equal to the average rate of inflation
from the time the initial notice is filed by the governmental entity
((which)) that created the local improvement district as provided in
RCW 84.34.320, to the time the bonds used to fund the improvement have
been retired; plus (c) interest on the total amount determined in
(2)(a) and (b) of this section at a simple per annum rate equal to the
average rate of inflation from the time the bonds used to fund the
improvement have been retired to the time the owner withdraws ((such))
or removes the lands from the exemption category provided by this
chapter.
(3) The amount payable ((pursuant to)) under this section shall
become due on the date ((such)) the land is withdrawn or removed from
its current use ((or timber land)) classification and shall be a lien
on the land prior and superior to any other lien whatsoever except for
the lien for general taxes, and shall be enforceable in the same manner
as the collection of special benefit assessments are enforced by that
local government.

Sec. 20 RCW 84.34.340 and 1992 c 52 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever farm and agricultural land ((or timber land)) is withdrawn
or removed from its current use classification as farm and agricultural
land ((or timber land)), the county assessor of the county in which
((such)) the land is located shall forthwith give written notice of
((such)) the withdrawal or removal to the local government or its
successor ((which had)) that filed with the assessor the notice
required by RCW 84.34.320. Upon receipt of the notice from the
assessor, the local government shall mail a written statement to the
owner of ((such)) the land for the amounts payable as provided in RCW
84.34.330. ((Such)) The amounts due shall be delinquent if not paid
within one hundred and eighty days after the date of mailing of the
statement, and shall be subject to the same interest, penalties, lien
priority, and enforcement procedures that are applicable to delinquent
assessments on the assessment roll from which that land had been
exempted, except that the rate of interest charged shall not exceed the
rate provided in RCW 84.34.330.

Sec. 21 RCW 84.34.360 and 1992 c 69 s 18 and 1992 c 52 s 19 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The department of revenue shall adopt rules it shall deem necessary
to implement RCW 84.34.300 through 84.34.380 ((which)) that shall
include, but not be limited to, procedures to determine the extent to
which a portion of the land otherwise exempt may be subject to a
special benefit assessment for the actual connection to the domestic
water system or sewerage facilities, and further to determine the
extent to which all or a portion of ((such)) the land may be subject to
a special benefit assessment for access to the road improvement in
relation to its value as farm and agricultural land ((or timber land))
as distinguished from its value under more intensive uses. The
provision for limited special benefit assessments shall not relieve
((such)) the land from liability for the amounts provided in RCW
84.34.330 and 84.34.340 when ((such)) the land is withdrawn or removed
from its current use classification as farm and agricultural land ((or
timber land)).

Sec. 22 RCW 84.34.370 and 1992 c 52 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever a portion of a parcel of land ((which)) that was
classified as farm and agricultural ((or timber land pursuant to)) land
under this chapter is withdrawn or removed from classification or there
is a change in use, and ((such)) the land has been exempted from any
benefit assessments ((pursuant to)) under RCW 84.34.320, the previously
exempt benefit assessments shall become due on only that portion of the
land ((which)) that is withdrawn or changed.

Sec. 23 RCW 84.34.380 and 1992 c 52 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
Farm and agricultural land ((or timber land)) on which the right to
future development has been acquired by any local government, the state
of Washington, or the United States government shall be exempt from
special benefit assessments in lieu of assessment for ((such)) the
purposes in the same manner, and under the same liabilities for payment
and interest, as land classified under this chapter as farm and
agricultural land ((or timber land)), for as long as ((such)) the
classification applies.
Any interest, development right, easement, covenant, or other
contractual right ((which)) that effectively protects, preserves,
maintains, improves, restores, prevents the future nonagricultural ((or
nonforest)) use of, or otherwise conserves farm and agricultural land
((or timber land)) shall be exempt from special benefit assessments as
long as ((such)) the development right or other such interest
effectively serves to prevent nonagricultural ((or nonforest))
development of ((such)) the land.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 84.33.077 (Credit for property taxes paid on timber on
public land) and 1984 c 204 s 21 & 1983 1st ex.s. c 62 s 8;
(2) RCW 84.34.041 (Application for current use classification--Forms -- Public hearing -- Approval or denial) and 2002 c 315 s 2 & 1992 c
69 s 20; and
(3) RCW 84.34.131 (Valuation of timber not affected) and 1998 c 311
s 15 & 1973 1st ex.s. c 212 s 16.

--- END ---