BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
MATHEMATICS STANDARDS AND CURRICULUM. (1) The activities in this
section are to evaluate the state learning standards, known as the
essential academic learning requirements, that implement the goals of
RCW 28A.150.210, and improve alignment of school district curriculum to
the standards.
(2)(a) By September 2007, the state board of education shall
recommend to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
revised essential academic learning requirements and grade level
expectations in mathematics. These recommendations shall be based on:
(i) Considerations of clarity, rigor, content, depth, coherence
from grade-to-grade, specificity, accessibility, and measurability;
(ii) A study of: (A) Standards used by countries that score well
on trends in international mathematics and science study (TIMSS) and/or
the program for international student assessment (PISA); (B) college
readiness standards; (C) the national council of teachers of
mathematics focal points and national assessment of educational
progress content frameworks; and (D) standards used by three to five
other states and including California green dot standards; and
(iii) Consideration of information presented during public comment
periods.
(b) The state board of education shall be aided in its work by an
expert national consultant who is retained by the state board of
education and a mathematics advisory panel as described in section 2 of
this act.
(3) By January 2008, the superintendent of public instruction shall
revise the essential academic learning requirements and grade level
expectations for mathematics in accordance with the recommendations
developed under subsection (2) of this section and present them to the
state board of education and the education committees of the house of
representatives and senate as required by RCW 28A.655.070(4). The
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt the revised essential
academic learning requirements unless otherwise advised by the
legislature during the 2008 legislative session.
(4)(a) By May 2008, the superintendent of public instruction shall
present to the state board of education recommendations for no more
than three basic mathematics curricula each for elementary, middle, and
high school grade spans. The recommended curricula shall align with
the revised essential academic learning requirements and grade level
expectations.
(b) In selecting the recommended curricula, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide information to the
mathematics panel and seek its advice regarding curricula for inclusion
in the recommendations.
(c) The state-identified curricula shall align as closely as
possible with the revised essential academic learning requirements and
grade level expectations. In addition to the identification of the
basic curricula, appropriate diagnostic and supplemental materials
shall be identified, as necessary, to support each basic curricula.
Subject to appropriation and availability, at least one of the
curricula in each grade span must be available to schools and parents
online at no cost to the school or parent.
(5) By June 2008, the state board of education shall provide
official comments to the superintendent of public instruction regarding
the recommended mathematics curricula. The superintendent of public
instruction shall make any appropriate changes to recommendations and
adopt the state-identified curricula.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
MATHEMATICS ADVISORY PANEL. (1) By May 23, 2007, the legislature
shall appoint a mathematics advisory panel, with a minimum of thirteen
members, as specified in this section to: (a) Advise the state board
of education regarding essential academic learning requirements,
learning standards, state-identified curricula in mathematics, and (b)
monitor implementation of these activities. In conducting its work,
the panel shall provide objective reviews of expert consultant material
and provide a public and transparent forum for consideration of
mathematics learning standards and curricula.
(2) Each of the two major caucuses of the senate and of the house
of representatives shall submit, as appropriate, to the speaker of the
house and the president of the senate the names of persons to serve on
the panel. Each list of names shall include at least two different
persons representing each of the groups identified in subsection (3) of
this section.
(3) The speaker of the house and the president of the senate shall
each appoint from each of the lists submitted by the caucuses a panel
that includes:
(a) At least one person from each caucus list representing
individuals from academia in mathematics or science-related fields;
(b) At least one person from each caucus list representing business
and industry in mathematics or science-related fields;
(c) At least one person from each caucus list representing
mathematics or science educators;
(d) At least one parent from each caucus list; and
(e) At most two persons as could contribute to the work due to
their specialized experiences.
(4) Each member of the panel shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.240 and reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. School districts shall be reimbursed
for the cost of substitutes for the mathematics educators on the panel
as required under RCW 28A.300.035. Members of the panel who are
employed by a public institution of higher education shall be provided
sufficient time away from their regular duties, without loss of
benefits or privileges, to fulfill the responsibilities of being a
panel member.
(5) Panel members shall not have conflicts of interest with regard
to association with any publisher, distributor, or provider of
curriculum, assessment, or test materials and services purchased by or
contracted through the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, educational service districts, or school districts.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---