BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.079 and 2003 c 111 s 114 are each amended to
read as follows:
An "infamous crime" is a crime punishable by death in the state
penitentiary or imprisonment in a state correctional facility. The
definition of "infamous crime" does not include juvenile adjudications
pursuant to chapter 13.40 RCW or adult convictions for misdemeanors and
gross misdemeanors.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.08.520 and 2005 c 246 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Upon receiving official notice of a person's conviction of a
felony in either state or federal court, if the convicted person is a
registered voter in the county, the county auditor shall cancel the
defendant's voter registration. Additionally, the secretary of state
in conjunction with the department of corrections, the Washington state
patrol, the office of the administrator for the courts, and other
appropriate state agencies shall arrange for a quarterly comparison of
a list of known felons with the statewide voter registration list. If
a person is found on a felon list and the statewide voter registration
list)) The right to vote is restored following a felony conviction as
long as the person is not under the authority of the department of
corrections.
(2) At least twice a year, the secretary of state shall compare the
list of registered voters to a list of felons who are under the
authority of the department of corrections. If a registered voter is
under the authority of the department of corrections, the secretary of
state or county auditor shall confirm the match through a date of birth
comparison and suspend the voter registration from the official state
voter registration list. The canceling authority shall send to the
person at his or her last known voter registration address and at the
department of corrections a notice of the proposed cancellation and an
explanation of the requirements for restoring the right to vote ((once
all terms of sentencing have been completed)) and reregistering. If
the person does not respond within thirty days, the registration must
be canceled.
(((2) The right to vote may be restored by, for each felony
conviction, one of the following:
(a) A certificate of discharge issued by the sentencing court, as
provided in RCW 9.94A.637;
(b) A court order restoring the right, as provided in RCW 9.92.066;
(c) A final order of discharge issued by the indeterminate sentence
review board, as provided in RCW 9.96.050; or
(d) A certificate of restoration issued by the governor, as
provided in RCW 9.96.020.))

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.68.020 and 2003 c 111 s 1702 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any registered voter may contest the right of any person declared
elected to an office to be issued a certificate of election for any of
the following causes:
(1) For misconduct on the part of any member of any precinct
election board involved therein;
(2) Because the person whose right is being contested was not, at
the time the person was declared elected, eligible to hold that office;
(3) ((Because the person whose right is being contested was
previous to the election convicted of a felony by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the conviction not having been reversed nor the person's
civil rights restored after the conviction;
(4))) Because the person whose right is being contested gave a
bribe or reward to a voter or to an inspector or judge of election for
the purpose of procuring the election, or offered to do so;
(((5))) (4) On account of illegal votes.
(a) Illegal votes include but are not limited to the following:
(i) More than one vote cast by a single voter;
(ii) A vote cast by a person disqualified under Article VI, section
3 of the state Constitution.
(b) Illegal votes do not include votes cast by improperly
registered voters who were not properly challenged under RCW 29A.08.810
and 29A.08.820.
All election contests must proceed under RCW ((29A.68.010))
29A.68.011.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.92.066 and 2003 c 66 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Upon termination of any suspended sentence under RCW 9.92.060
or 9.95.210, such person may apply to the court for restoration of his
or her civil rights not already restored by RCW 29A.08.520. Thereupon
the court may in its discretion enter an order directing that such
defendant shall thereafter be released from all penalties and
disabilities resulting from the offense or crime of which he or she has
been convicted.
(2)(a) Upon termination of a suspended sentence under RCW 9.92.060
or 9.95.210, the person may apply to the sentencing court for a
vacation of the person's record of conviction under RCW 9.94A.640. The
court may, in its discretion, clear the record of conviction if it
finds the person has met the equivalent of the tests in RCW
9.94A.640(2) as those tests would be applied to a person convicted of
a crime committed before July 1, 1984.
(b) The clerk of the court in which the vacation order is entered
shall immediately transmit the order vacating the conviction to the
Washington state patrol identification section and to the local police
agency, if any, which holds criminal history information for the person
who is the subject of the conviction. The Washington state patrol and
any such local police agency shall immediately update their records to
reflect the vacation of the conviction, and shall transmit the order
vacating the conviction to the federal bureau of investigation. A
conviction that has been vacated under this section may not be
disseminated or disclosed by the state patrol or local law enforcement
agency to any person, except other criminal justice enforcement
agencies.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.637 and 2004 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When an offender has completed all requirements of the
sentence, including any and all legal financial obligations, and while
under the custody and supervision of the department, the secretary or
the secretary's designee shall notify the sentencing court, which shall
discharge the offender and provide the offender with a certificate of
discharge by issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by
mailing the certificate to the offender's last known address.
(b)(i) When an offender has reached the end of his or her
supervision with the department and has completed all the requirements
of the sentence except his or her legal financial obligations, the
secretary's designee shall provide the county clerk with a notice that
the offender has completed all nonfinancial requirements of the
sentence.
(ii) When the department has provided the county clerk with notice
that an offender has completed all the requirements of the sentence and
the offender subsequently satisfies all legal financial obligations
under the sentence, the county clerk shall notify the sentencing court,
including the notice from the department, which shall discharge the
offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge by
issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the
certificate to the offender's last known address.
(c) When an offender who is subject to requirements of the sentence
in addition to the payment of legal financial obligations either is not
subject to supervision by the department or does not complete the
requirements while under supervision of the department, it is the
offender's responsibility to provide the court with verification of the
completion of the sentence conditions other than the payment of legal
financial obligations. When the offender satisfies all legal financial
obligations under the sentence, the county clerk shall notify the
sentencing court that the legal financial obligations have been
satisfied. When the court has received both notification from the
clerk and adequate verification from the offender that the sentence
requirements have been completed, the court shall discharge the
offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge by
issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the
certificate to the offender's last known address.
(2) The court shall send a copy of every signed certificate of
discharge to the auditor for the county in which the court resides and
to the department. The department shall create and maintain a data
base containing the names of all felons who have been issued
certificates of discharge, the date of discharge, and the date of
conviction and offense.
(3) An offender who is not convicted of a violent offense or a sex
offense and is sentenced to a term involving community supervision may
be considered for a discharge of sentence by the sentencing court prior
to the completion of community supervision, provided that the offender
has completed at least one-half of the term of community supervision
and has met all other sentence requirements.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the
discharge shall have the effect of restoring all civil rights ((lost by
operation of law upon conviction)) not already restored by RCW
29A.08.520, and the certificate of discharge shall so state. Nothing
in this section prohibits the use of an offender's prior record for
purposes of determining sentences for later offenses as provided in
this chapter. Nothing in this section affects or prevents use of the
offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution either as
an element of an offense or for impeachment purposes. A certificate of
discharge is not based on a finding of rehabilitation.
(5) Unless otherwise ordered by the sentencing court, a certificate
of discharge shall not terminate the offender's obligation to comply
with an order issued under chapter 10.99 RCW that excludes or prohibits
the offender from having contact with a specified person or coming
within a set distance of any specified location that was contained in
the judgment and sentence. An offender who violates such an order
after a certificate of discharge has been issued shall be subject to
prosecution according to the chapter under which the order was
originally issued.
(6) Upon release from custody, the offender may apply to the
department for counseling and help in adjusting to the community. This
voluntary help may be provided for up to one year following the release
from custody.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.96.050 and 2002 c 16 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
When a prisoner on parole has performed all obligations of his or
her release, including any and all legal financial obligations, for
such time as shall satisfy the indeterminate sentence review board that
his or her final release is not incompatible with the best interests of
society and the welfare of the paroled individual, the board may make
a final order of discharge and issue a certificate of discharge to the
prisoner. The certificate of discharge shall be issued to the offender
in person or by mail to the prisoner's last known address.
The board shall send a copy of every signed certificate of
discharge ((to the auditor for the county in which the offender was
sentenced and)) to the department of corrections. The department shall
create and maintain a data base containing the names of all felons who
have been issued certificates of discharge, the date of discharge, and
the date of conviction and offense.
The board retains the jurisdiction to issue a certificate of
discharge after the expiration of the prisoner's or parolee's maximum
statutory sentence. If not earlier granted, the board shall make a
final order of discharge three years from the date of parole unless the
parolee is on suspended or revoked status at the expiration of the
three years. Such discharge, regardless of when issued, shall have the
effect of restoring all civil rights ((lost by operation of law upon
conviction)) not already restored by RCW 29A.08.520, and the
certification of discharge shall so state. This restoration of civil
rights shall not restore the right to receive, possess, own, or
transport firearms.
The discharge provided for in this section shall be considered as
a part of the sentence of the convicted person and shall not in any
manner be construed as affecting the powers of the governor to pardon
any such person.

Sec. 7 RCW 10.64.140 and 2005 c 246 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall require the
defendant to sign a statement acknowledging that:
(1) The defendant's right to vote has been lost due to the felony
conviction and the right is restored as long as the defendant is not
under the authority of the department of corrections; and
(2) ((If the defendant is registered to vote, the voter
registration will be canceled;
(3) The right to vote may be restored by:
(a) A certificate of discharge issued by the sentencing court, as
provided in RCW 9.94A.637;
(b) A court order issued by the sentencing court restoring the
right, as provided in RCW 9.92.066;
(c) A final order of discharge issued by the indeterminate sentence
review board, as provided in RCW 9.96.050; or
(d) A certificate of restoration issued by the governor, as
provided in RCW 9.96.020; and
(4))) Voting before the right is restored is a class C felony under
RCW 29A.84.660.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 10.64.021 (Notice of conviction) and 1994 c 57 s 1; and
(2) RCW 29A.08.660 (Felony offender--Completion of sentence) and
2005 c 246 s 12.

--- END ---