BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that RCW 10.77.090
contains laws relating to three discrete subjects. Therefore, one
purpose of this act is to reorganize some of those laws by creating new
sections in the Revised Code of Washington that clarify and identify
these discrete subjects.
The legislature further finds that there are disproportionate
numbers of individuals with mental illness in jail. The needs of
individuals with mental illness and the public safety needs of society
at large are better served when individuals with mental illness are
provided an opportunity to obtain treatment and support.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 10.31 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a police officer has reasonable cause to believe that the
individual has committed acts constituting a nonfelony crime that is
not a serious offense as identified in RCW 10.77.092 and the individual
is known by history or consultation with the regional support network
to suffer from a mental disorder, the arresting officer may:
(a) Take the individual to a crisis stabilization unit;
(b) Refer the individual to a mental health professional for
evaluation for initial detention and proceeding under chapter 71.05
RCW; or
(c) Release the individual upon agreement to voluntary
participation in outpatient treatment.
(2) In deciding whether to refer the individual to treatment under
this section, the police officer shall be guided by standards mutually
agreed upon with the prosecuting authority, which address, at a
minimum, the length, seriousness, and recency of the known criminal
history of the individual, the mental health history of the individual,
where available, and the circumstances surrounding the commission of
the alleged offense.
(3) Any agreement to participate in treatment shall not require
individuals to stipulate to any of the alleged facts regarding the
criminal activity as a prerequisite to participation in a mental health
treatment alternative. The agreement is inadmissible in any criminal
or civil proceeding. The agreement does not create immunity from
prosecution for the alleged criminal activity.
(4) If an individual violates such agreement and the mental health
treatment alternative is no longer appropriate:
(a) The mental health provider shall inform the referring law
enforcement agency of the violation; and
(b) The original charges may be filed or referred to the
prosecutor, as appropriate, and the matter may proceed accordingly.
(5) The police officer is immune from liability for any good faith
conduct under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW
to read as follows:
GENERAL STAY PROVISIONS. (1)(a) If at any time during the pendency
of an action and prior to judgment the court finds, following a report
as provided in RCW 10.77.060, a defendant is incompetent, the court
shall order the proceedings against the defendant be stayed except as
provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(b) A defendant found incompetent shall be evaluated at the
direction of the secretary and a determination made whether the
defendant is an individual with a developmental disability. Such
evaluation and determination shall be accomplished as soon as possible
following the court's placement of the defendant in the custody of the
secretary.
(i) When appropriate, and subject to available funds, if the
defendant is determined to be an individual with a developmental
disability, he or she may be placed in a program specifically reserved
for the treatment and training of persons with developmental
disabilities where the defendant shall have the right to habilitation
according to an individualized service plan specifically developed for
the particular needs of the defendant. A copy of the evaluation shall
be sent to the program.
(A) The program shall be separate from programs serving persons
involved in any other treatment or habilitation program.
(B) The program shall be appropriately secure under the
circumstances and shall be administered by developmental disabilities
professionals who shall direct the habilitation efforts.
(C) The program shall provide an environment affording security
appropriate with the charged criminal behavior and necessary to protect
the public safety.
(ii) The department may limit admissions of such persons to this
specialized program in order to ensure that expenditures for services
do not exceed amounts appropriated by the legislature and allocated by
the department for such services.
(iii) The department may establish admission priorities in the
event that the number of eligible persons exceeds the limits set by the
department.
(c) At the end of the mental health treatment and restoration
period, or at any time a professional person determines competency has
been, or is unlikely to be, restored, the defendant shall be returned
to court for a hearing. If, after notice and hearing, competency has
been restored, the stay entered under (a) of this subsection shall be
lifted. If competency has not been restored, the proceedings shall be
dismissed. If the court concludes that competency has not been
restored, but that further treatment within the time limits established
by sections 4 and 5 of this act is likely to restore competency, the
court may order that treatment for purposes of competency restoration
be continued. Such treatment may not extend beyond the combination of
time provided for in sections 4 and 5 of this act.
(d) If at any time during the proceeding the court finds, following
notice and hearing, a defendant is not likely to regain competency, the
proceedings shall be dismissed and the defendant shall be evaluated as
provided in (c) of this subsection.
(2) If the defendant is referred to the designated mental health
professional for consideration of initial detention proceedings under
chapter 71.05 RCW pursuant to this chapter, the designated mental
health professional shall provide prompt written notification of the
results of the determination whether to commence initial detention
proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW and whether the person was
detained. The notification shall be provided to the court in which the
criminal action was pending, the prosecutor, the defense attorney in
the criminal action, and the facility that evaluated the defendant for
competency.
(3) The fact that the defendant is unfit to proceed does not
preclude any pretrial proceedings which do not require the personal
participation of the defendant.
(4) A defendant receiving medication for either physical or mental
problems shall not be prohibited from standing trial, if the medication
either enables the defendant to understand the proceedings against him
or her and to assist in his or her own defense, or does not disable him
or her from so understanding and assisting in his or her own defense.
(5) At or before the conclusion of any commitment period provided
for by this section, the facility providing evaluation and treatment
shall provide to the court a written report of examination which meets
the requirements of RCW 10.77.060(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW
to read as follows:
FELONY PROCEDURE. (1) If the defendant is charged with a felony
and determined to be incompetent, until he or she has regained the
competency necessary to understand the proceedings against him or her
and assist in his or her own defense, or has been determined unlikely
to regain competency pursuant to section 3(1)(c) of this act, the
court:
(a) Shall commit the defendant to the custody of the secretary who
shall place such defendant in an appropriate facility of the department
for evaluation and treatment; or
(b) May alternatively order the defendant to undergo evaluation and
treatment at some other facility as determined by the department, or
under the guidance and control of a professional person.
(2) On or before expiration of the initial ninety-day period of
commitment under subsection (1) of this section the court shall conduct
a hearing, at which it shall determine whether or not the defendant is
incompetent.
(3) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a
defendant charged with a felony is incompetent, the court shall have
the option of extending the order of commitment or alternative
treatment for an additional ninety-day period, but the court must at
the time of extension set a date for a prompt hearing to determine the
defendant's competency before the expiration of the second ninety-day
period. The defendant, the defendant's attorney, or the prosecutor has
the right to demand that the hearing be before a jury. No extension
shall be ordered for a second ninety-day period, nor for any subsequent
period as provided in subsection (4) of this section, if the
defendant's incompetence has been determined by the secretary to be
solely the result of a developmental disability which is such that
competence is not reasonably likely to be regained during an extension.
(4) For persons charged with a felony, at the hearing upon the
expiration of the second ninety-day period or at the end of the first
ninety-day period, in the case of a defendant with a developmental
disability, if the jury or court finds that the defendant is
incompetent, the charges shall be dismissed without prejudice, and
either civil commitment proceedings shall be instituted or the court
shall order the release of the defendant. The criminal charges shall
not be dismissed if the court or jury finds that: (a) The defendant
(i) is a substantial danger to other persons; or (ii) presents a
substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public
safety or security; and (b) there is a substantial probability that the
defendant will regain competency within a reasonable period of time.
In the event that the court or jury makes such a finding, the court may
extend the period of commitment for up to an additional six months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW
to read as follows:
MISDEMEANOR PROCEDURE. (1)(a) If the defendant is charged with a
nonfelony crime which is a serious offense as identified in RCW
10.77.092 and found by the court to be not competent, then the court
shall order the secretary to place the defendant:
(i) At a secure mental health facility in the custody of the
department or an agency designated by the department for mental health
treatment and restoration of competency. The placement shall not
exceed fourteen days in addition to any unused time of the evaluation
under RCW 10.77.060. The court shall compute this total period and
include its computation in the order. The fourteen-day period plus any
unused time of the evaluation under RCW 10.77.060 shall be considered
to include only the time the defendant is actually at the facility and
shall be in addition to reasonable time for transport to or from the
facility;
(ii) On conditional release for up to ninety days for mental health
treatment and restoration of competency; or
(iii) Any combination of this subsection.
(b)(i) If the proceedings are dismissed under section 3 of this act
and the defendant was on conditional release at the time of dismissal,
the court shall order the designated mental health professional within
that county to evaluate the defendant pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW.
The evaluation may be conducted in any location chosen by the
professional.
(ii) If the defendant was in custody and not on conditional release
at the time of dismissal, the defendant shall be detained and sent to
an evaluation and treatment facility for up to seventy-two hours,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, for evaluation for purposes
of filing a petition under chapter 71.05 RCW. The seventy-two-hour
period shall commence upon the next nonholiday weekday following the
court order and shall run to the end of the last nonholiday weekday
within the seventy-two-hour period.
(2) If the defendant is charged with a nonfelony crime that is not
a serious offense as defined in RCW 10.77.092:
The court may stay or dismiss proceedings and detain the defendant
for sufficient time to allow the designated mental health professional
to evaluate the defendant and consider initial detention proceedings
under chapter 71.05 RCW. The court must give notice to all parties at
least twenty-four hours before the dismissal of any proceeding under
this subsection, and provide an opportunity for a hearing on whether to
dismiss the proceedings.

Sec. 6 RCW 71.05.020 and 2005 c 504 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician that a
person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;
(2) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily
used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with
thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical
antipsychotic medications;
(3) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or
private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a
patient;
(4) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person
should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or
both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;
(5) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a
commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;
(6) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a
portion of a facility licensed by the department of health and
certified by the department of social and health services under RCW
71.24.035, such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital,
which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals
experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term
hospitalization;
(7) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of
this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of
unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing
involuntary care and treatment;
(((7))) (8) "Department" means the department of social and health
services;
(((8))) (9) "Designated chemical dependency specialist" means a
person designated by the county alcoholism and other drug addiction
program coordinator designated under RCW 70.96A.310 to perform the
commitment duties described in chapters 70.96A and 70.96B RCW;
(((9))) (10) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health
professional appointed by the county or the regional support network to
perform the duties specified in this chapter;
(((10))) (11) "Designated mental health professional" means a
mental health professional designated by the county or other authority
authorized in rule to perform the duties specified in this chapter;
(((11))) (12) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement
of a person, under the provisions of this chapter;
(((12))) (13) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a
person who has specialized training and three years of experience in
directly treating or working with persons with developmental
disabilities and is a psychiatrist, psychologist, or social worker, and
such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined
by rules adopted by the secretary;
(((13))) (14) "Developmental disability" means that condition
defined in RCW 71A.10.020(3);
(((14))) (15) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical
authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be
amended by court order;
(((15))) (16) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any
facility which can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with
other public or private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment,
outpatient care, and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons
suffering from a mental disorder, and which is certified as such by the
department. A physically separate and separately operated portion of
a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment
facility. A facility which is part of, or operated by, the department
or any federal agency will not require certification. No correctional
institution or facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment
facility within the meaning of this chapter;
(((16))) (17) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a
person, as a result of a mental disorder: (a) Is in danger of serious
physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her
essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe
deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and
escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her
actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her
health or safety;
(((17))) (18) "Habilitative services" means those services provided
by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining
life skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social,
and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education,
training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall
be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety
presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged
criminal conduct;
(((18))) (19) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the
period of time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this
chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed,
in a mental health facility or in confinement as a result of a criminal
conviction;
(((19))) (20) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being
likely to occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or
remote;
(21) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a
developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a
team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:
(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged
criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;
(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes
of habilitation;
(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation
program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;
(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve
those intermediate and long-range goals;
(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;
(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due
consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to
less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or
release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and
(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person
and possible future types of residences;
(((20))) (22) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
(((21))) (23) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:
(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted
by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or
attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii)
physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced
by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person
or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii)
physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of
others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or
damage to the property of others; or
(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and
has a history of one or more violent acts;
(((22))) (24) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or
emotional impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a
person's cognitive or volitional functions;
(((23))) (25) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist,
psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other
mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the
secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
(((24))) (26) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of
a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically
given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or
judicial order of appointment;
(((25))) (27) "Private agency" means any person, partnership,
corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not
financed in whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an
evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital,
which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for,
the care and treatment of persons who are mentally ill;
(((26))) (28) "Professional person" means a mental health
professional and shall also mean a physician, registered nurse, and
such others as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
(((27))) (29) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a
physician and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three
years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the
American medical association or the American osteopathic association
and is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of
psychiatry and neurology;
(((28))) (30) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed
as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;
(((29))) (31) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment
facility or institution, or hospital which is conducted for, or
includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of
persons ((who are mentally ill)) with mental illness, if the agency is
operated directly by, federal, state, county, or municipal government,
or a combination of such governments;
(((30))) (32) "Registration records" include all the records of the
department, regional support networks, treatment facilities, and other
persons providing services to the department, county departments, or
facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness;
(((31))) (33) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment
under the provisions of this chapter;
(((32))) (34) "Resource management services" has the meaning given
in chapter 71.24 RCW;
(((33))) (35) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of
social and health services, or his or her designee;
(((34))) (36) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or
further advanced degree from an accredited school of social work or a
degree deemed equivalent under rules adopted by the secretary;
(((35))) (37) "Treatment records" include registration and all
other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the
department, by regional support networks and their staffs, and by
treatment facilities. Treatment records do not include notes or
records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment
services for the department, regional support networks, or a treatment
facility if the notes or records are not available to others;
(((36))) (38) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in
homicide, attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage
to property.

Sec. 7 RCW 71.05.150 and 1998 c 297 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
NONEMERGENT DETENTION. (1)(((a))) When a ((county)) designated
mental health professional receives information alleging that a person,
as a result of a mental disorder: (i) Presents a likelihood of serious
harm; or (ii) is gravely disabled; the ((county)) designated mental
health professional may, after investigation and evaluation of the
specific facts alleged and of the reliability and credibility of any
person providing information to initiate detention, if satisfied that
the allegations are true and that the person will not voluntarily seek
appropriate treatment, file a petition for initial detention. Before
filing the petition, the ((county)) designated mental health
professional must personally interview the person, unless the person
refuses an interview, and determine whether the person will voluntarily
receive appropriate evaluation and treatment at an evaluation and
treatment facility or in a crisis stabilization unit.
(((b) Whenever it appears, by petition for initial detention, to
the satisfaction of a judge of the superior court that a person
presents, as a result of a mental disorder, a likelihood of serious
harm, or is gravely disabled, and that the person has refused or failed
to accept appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily, the judge
may issue an order requiring the person to appear within twenty-four
hours after service of the order at a designated evaluation and
treatment facility for not more than a seventy-two hour evaluation and
treatment period. The order shall state the address of the evaluation
and treatment facility to which the person is to report and whether the
required seventy-two hour evaluation and treatment services may be
delivered on an outpatient or inpatient basis and that if the person
named in the order fails to appear at the evaluation and treatment
facility at or before the date and time stated in the order, such
person may be involuntarily taken into custody for evaluation and
treatment. The order shall also designate retained counsel or, if
counsel is appointed from a list provided by the court, the name,
business address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to
represent the person.
(c))) (2)(a) An order to detain to a designated evaluation and
treatment facility for not more than a seventy-two-hour evaluation and
treatment period may be issued by a judge of the superior court upon
request of a designated mental health professional, whenever it appears
to the satisfaction of a judge of the superior court:
(i) That there is probable cause to support the petition; and
(ii) That the person has refused or failed to accept appropriate
evaluation and treatment voluntarily.
(b) The petition for initial detention, signed under penalty of
perjury, or sworn telephonic testimony may be considered by the court
in determining whether there are sufficient grounds for issuing the
order.
(c) The order shall designate retained counsel or, if counsel is
appointed from a list provided by the court, the name, business
address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent
the person.
(3) The ((county)) designated mental health professional shall then
serve or cause to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and
conservator, if any, a copy of the order ((to appear)) together with a
notice of rights, and a petition for initial detention. After service
on such person the ((county)) designated mental health professional
shall file the return of service in court and provide copies of all
papers in the court file to the evaluation and treatment facility and
the designated attorney. The ((county)) designated mental health
professional shall notify the court and the prosecuting attorney that
a probable cause hearing will be held within seventy-two hours of the
date and time of outpatient evaluation or admission to the evaluation
and treatment facility. The person shall be permitted ((to remain in
his or her home or other place of his or her choosing prior to the time
of evaluation and shall be permitted)) to be accompanied by one or more
of his or her relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or
other professional or religious advisor to the place of evaluation. An
attorney accompanying the person to the place of evaluation shall be
permitted to be present during the admission evaluation. Any other
individual accompanying the person may be present during the admission
evaluation. The facility may exclude the individual if his or her
presence would present a safety risk, delay the proceedings, or
otherwise interfere with the evaluation.
(((d) If the person ordered to appear does appear on or before the
date and time specified, the evaluation and treatment facility may
admit such person as required by RCW 71.05.170 or may provide treatment
on an outpatient basis. If the person ordered to appear fails to
appear on or before the date and time specified, the evaluation and
treatment facility shall immediately notify))
(4) The ((county)) designated mental health professional ((who))
may notify a peace officer to take such person or cause such person to
be taken into custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment
facility. ((Should the county designated mental health professional
notify a peace officer authorizing him or her to take a person into
custody under the provisions of this subsection, he or she shall file
with the court a copy of such authorization and a notice of
detention.)) At the time such person is taken into custody there shall
commence to be served on such person, his or her guardian, and
conservator, if any, a copy of the original order together with a
((notice of detention, a)) notice of rights((,)) and a petition for
initial detention.
(((2) When a county designated mental health professional receives
information alleging that a person, as the result of a mental disorder,
presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is in imminent
danger because of being gravely disabled, after investigation and
evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and
credibility of the person or persons providing the information if any,
the county designated mental health professional may take such person,
or cause by oral or written order such person to be taken into
emergency custody in an evaluation and treatment facility for not more
than seventy-two hours as described in RCW 71.05.180.
(3) A peace officer may take such person or cause such person to be
taken into custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment facility
pursuant to subsection (1)(d) of this section.
(4) A peace officer may, without prior notice of the proceedings
provided for in subsection (1) of this section, take or cause such
person to be taken into custody and immediately delivered to an
evaluation and treatment facility or the emergency department of a
local hospital:
(a) Only pursuant to subsections (1)(d) and (2) of this section; or
(b) When he or she has reasonable cause to believe that such person
is suffering from a mental disorder and presents an imminent likelihood
of serious harm or is in imminent danger because of being gravely
disabled.
(5) Persons delivered to evaluation and treatment facilities by
peace officers pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section may be
held by the facility for a period of up to twelve hours: PROVIDED,
That they are examined by a mental health professional within three
hours of their arrival. Within twelve hours of their arrival, the
county designated mental health professional must file a supplemental
petition for detention, and commence service on the designated attorney
for the detained person.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW
to read as follows:
EMERGENT DETENTION. (1) When a designated mental health
professional receives information alleging that a person, as the result
of a mental disorder, presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm,
or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after
investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the
reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the
information if any, the designated mental health professional may take
such person, or cause by oral or written order such person to be taken
into emergency custody in an evaluation and treatment facility for not
more than seventy-two hours as described in RCW 71.05.180.
(2) A peace officer may take or cause such person to be taken into
custody and immediately delivered to a crisis stabilization unit, an
evaluation and treatment facility, or the emergency department of a
local hospital under the following circumstances:
(a) Pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) When he or she has reasonable cause to believe that such person
is suffering from a mental disorder and presents an imminent likelihood
of serious harm or is in imminent danger because of being gravely
disabled.
(3) Persons delivered to a crisis stabilization unit, evaluation
and treatment facility, or the emergency department of a local hospital
by peace officers pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may be
held by the facility for a period of up to twelve hours: PROVIDED,
That they are examined by a mental health professional within three
hours of their arrival. Within twelve hours of their arrival, the
designated mental health professional must determine whether the
individual meets detention criteria. If the individual is detained,
the designated mental health professional shall file a petition for
detention or a supplemental petition as appropriate and commence
service on the designated attorney for the detained person.

Sec. 9 RCW 71.05.157 and 2005 c 504 s 507 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When a designated mental health professional is notified by a
jail that a defendant or offender who was subject to a discharge review
under RCW 71.05.232 is to be released to the community, the designated
mental health professional shall evaluate the person within seventy-two
hours of release.
(2) When an offender is under court-ordered treatment in the
community and the supervision of the department of corrections, and the
treatment provider becomes aware that the person is in violation of the
terms of the court order, the treatment provider shall notify the
designated mental health professional and the department of corrections
of the violation and request an evaluation for purposes of revocation
of the less restrictive alternative.
(3) When a designated mental health professional becomes aware that
an offender who is under court-ordered treatment in the community and
the supervision of the department of corrections is in violation of a
treatment order or a condition of supervision that relates to public
safety, or the designated mental health professional detains a person
under this chapter, the designated mental health professional shall
notify the person's treatment provider and the department of
corrections.
(4) When an offender who is confined in a state correctional
facility or is under supervision of the department of corrections in
the community is subject to a petition for involuntary treatment under
this chapter, the petitioner shall notify the department of corrections
and the department of corrections shall provide documentation of its
risk assessment or other concerns to the petitioner and the court if
the department of corrections classified the offender as a high risk or
high needs offender.
(5) Nothing in this section creates a duty on any treatment
provider or designated mental health professional to provide offender
supervision.
(6) No jail or state correctional facility may be considered a less
restrictive alternative to an evaluation and treatment facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) A joint task force on decreasing the
number of individuals with mental illness entering the criminal justice
system is created. The joint task force shall consist of the following
members:
(a) Two judicial officers, appointed by the board for judicial
administration, one representing the superior court judges and the
other representing district court judges;
(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(d) The secretary of the department of social and health services
or the secretary's designee;
(e) The secretary of the department of corrections or the
secretary's designee;
(f) An elected sheriff or police chief, selected by the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs; and
(g) The following twelve members, jointly appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives and the president of the senate:
(i) A representative from the community mental health council;
(ii) A representative from the Washington state affiliate of the
national alliance on mental illness;
(iii) A representative from one of the regional support networks;
(iv) A representative of Washington protection and advocacy;
(v) A city or county prosecutor with experience in involuntary
civil commitments or criminal cases involving questions of competency;
(vi) An assistant attorney general with experience in involuntary
civil commitments or criminal cases involving questions of competency;
(vii) A public defender with experience in involuntary civil
commitments or criminal cases involving questions of competency;
(viii) A representative of the Washington association of counties;
(ix) A representative of the association of Washington cities;
(x) A representative selected from amongst the mental health
ombudsmen required by RCW 71.24.350;
(xi) A representative of the Washington association of designated
mental health professionals; and
(xii) A representative from amongst the Washington state jail
administrators.
(2) The task force shall choose two cochairs from among its
membership.
(3) The task force shall review and make recommendations to the
legislature and the governor regarding increased access to mental
health services for those within the criminal justice system and
strategies that will decrease the number of people with mental health
illness entering and reentering the criminal justice system.
(4) The task force, where feasible, may consult with individuals
from the public and private sector.
(5) The task force shall use legislative facilities and staff from
senate committee services and the house office of program research.
(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the legislature by July 1, 2008.

Sec. 11 RCW 49.19.010 and 2000 c 94 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Health care setting" means:
(a) Hospitals as defined in RCW 70.41.020;
(b) Home health, hospice, and home care agencies under chapter
70.127 RCW, subject to RCW 49.19.070;
(c) Evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in RCW
71.05.020(((12))); and
(d) Community mental health programs as defined in RCW
71.24.025(5).
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Employee" means an employee as defined in RCW 49.17.020.
(4) "Violence" or "violent act" means any physical assault or
verbal threat of physical assault against an employee of a health care
setting.

Sec. 12 RCW 71.34.600 and 2005 c 371 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A parent may bring, or authorize the bringing of, his or her
minor child to an evaluation and treatment facility or an inpatient
facility licensed under chapter 70.41, 71.12, or 72.23 RCW and request
that the professional person ((as defined in RCW 71.05.020(24)))
examine the minor to determine whether the minor has a mental disorder
and is in need of inpatient treatment.
(2) The consent of the minor is not required for admission,
evaluation, and treatment if the parent brings the minor to the
facility.
(3) An appropriately trained professional person may evaluate
whether the minor has a mental disorder. The evaluation shall be
completed within twenty-four hours of the time the minor was brought to
the facility, unless the professional person determines that the
condition of the minor necessitates additional time for evaluation. In
no event shall a minor be held longer than seventy-two hours for
evaluation. If, in the judgment of the professional person, it is
determined it is a medical necessity for the minor to receive inpatient
treatment, the minor may be held for treatment. The facility shall
limit treatment to that which the professional person determines is
medically necessary to stabilize the minor's condition until the
evaluation has been completed. Within twenty-four hours of completion
of the evaluation, the professional person shall notify the department
if the child is held for treatment and of the date of admission.
(4) No provider is obligated to provide treatment to a minor under
the provisions of this section except that no provider may refuse to
treat a minor under the provisions of this section solely on the basis
that the minor has not consented to the treatment. No provider may
admit a minor to treatment under this section unless it is medically
necessary.
(5) No minor receiving inpatient treatment under this section may
be discharged from the facility based solely on his or her request.
(6) Prior to the review conducted under RCW 71.34.610, the
professional person shall notify the minor of his or her right to
petition superior court for release from the facility.
(7) For the purposes of this section "professional person" means
"professional person" as defined in RCW 71.05.020.

Sec. 13 RCW 71.24.035 and 2006 c 333 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department is designated as the state mental health
authority.
(2) The secretary shall provide for public, client, and licensed
service provider participation in developing the state mental health
program, developing contracts with regional support networks, and any
waiver request to the federal government under medicaid.
(3) The secretary shall provide for participation in developing the
state mental health program for children and other underserved
populations, by including representatives on any committee established
to provide oversight to the state mental health program.
(4) The secretary shall be designated as the regional support
network if the regional support network fails to meet state minimum
standards or refuses to exercise responsibilities under RCW 71.24.045.
(5) The secretary shall:
(a) Develop a biennial state mental health program that
incorporates regional biennial needs assessments and regional mental
health service plans and state services for ((mentally ill)) adults and
children with mental illness. The secretary shall also develop a six-year state mental health plan;
(b) Assure that any regional or county community mental health
program provides access to treatment for the region's residents in the
following order of priority: (i) ((The acutely mentally ill)) Persons
with acute mental illness; (ii) ((chronically mentally ill)) adults
with chronic mental illness and children who are severely emotionally
disturbed ((children)); and (iii) ((the)) persons who are seriously
disturbed. Such programs shall provide:
(A) Outpatient services;
(B) Emergency care services for twenty-four hours per day;
(C) Day treatment for ((mentally ill)) persons with mental illness
which includes training in basic living and social skills, supported
work, vocational rehabilitation, and day activities. Such services may
include therapeutic treatment. In the case of a child, day treatment
includes age-appropriate basic living and social skills, educational
and prevocational services, day activities, and therapeutic treatment;
(D) Screening for patients being considered for admission to state
mental health facilities to determine the appropriateness of admission;
(E) Employment services, which may include supported employment,
transitional work, placement in competitive employment, and other work-related services, that result in ((mentally ill)) persons with mental
illness becoming engaged in meaningful and gainful full or part-time
work. Other sources of funding such as the division of vocational
rehabilitation may be utilized by the secretary to maximize federal
funding and provide for integration of services;
(F) Consultation and education services; and
(G) Community support services;
(c) Develop and adopt rules establishing state minimum standards
for the delivery of mental health services pursuant to RCW 71.24.037
including, but not limited to:
(i) Licensed service providers. These rules shall permit a county-operated mental health program to be licensed as a service provider
subject to compliance with applicable statutes and rules. The
secretary shall provide for deeming of compliance with state minimum
standards for those entities accredited by recognized behavioral health
accrediting bodies recognized and having a current agreement with the
department;
(ii) Regional support networks; and
(iii) Inpatient services, evaluation and treatment services and
facilities under chapter 71.05 RCW, resource management services, and
community support services;
(d) Assure that the special needs of persons who are minorities,
((the)) elderly, disabled, children, and low-income ((persons)) are met
within the priorities established in this section;
(e) Establish a standard contract or contracts, consistent with
state minimum standards and RCW 71.24.320, 71.24.330, and 71.24.3201,
which shall be used in contracting with regional support networks. The
standard contract shall include a maximum fund balance, which shall be
consistent with that required by federal regulations or waiver
stipulations;
(f) Establish, to the extent possible, a standardized auditing
procedure which minimizes paperwork requirements of regional support
networks and licensed service providers. The audit procedure shall
focus on the outcomes of service and not the processes for
accomplishing them;
(g) Develop and maintain an information system to be used by the
state and regional support networks that includes a tracking method
which allows the department and regional support networks to identify
mental health clients' participation in any mental health service or
public program on an immediate basis. The information system shall not
include individual patient's case history files. Confidentiality of
client information and records shall be maintained as provided in this
chapter and in RCW 71.05.390, 71.05.420, and 71.05.440;
(h) License service providers who meet state minimum standards;
(i) Certify regional support networks that meet state minimum
standards;
(j) Periodically monitor the compliance of certified regional
support networks and their network of licensed service providers for
compliance with the contract between the department, the regional
support network, and federal and state rules at reasonable times and in
a reasonable manner;
(k) Fix fees to be paid by evaluation and treatment centers to the
secretary for the required inspections;
(l) Monitor and audit regional support networks and licensed
service providers as needed to assure compliance with contractual
agreements authorized by this chapter;
(m) Adopt such rules as are necessary to implement the department's
responsibilities under this chapter; ((and))
(n) Assure the availability of an appropriate amount, as determined
by the legislature in the operating budget by amounts appropriated for
this specific purpose, of community-based, geographically distributed
residential services; and
(o) Certify crisis stabilization units that meet state minimum
standards.
(6) The secretary shall use available resources only for regional
support networks, except to the extent authorized, and in accordance
with any priorities or conditions specified, in the biennial
appropriations act.
(7) Each certified regional support network and licensed service
provider shall file with the secretary, on request, such data,
statistics, schedules, and information as the secretary reasonably
requires. A certified regional support network or licensed service
provider which, without good cause, fails to furnish any data,
statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent
reports thereof, may have its certification or license revoked or
suspended.
(8) The secretary may suspend, revoke, limit, or restrict a
certification or license, or refuse to grant a certification or license
for failure to conform to: (a) The law; (b) applicable rules and
regulations; (c) applicable standards; or (d) state minimum standards.
(9) The superior court may restrain any regional support network or
service provider from operating without certification or a license or
any other violation of this section. The court may also review,
pursuant to procedures contained in chapter 34.05 RCW, any denial,
suspension, limitation, restriction, or revocation of certification or
license, and grant other relief required to enforce the provisions of
this chapter.
(10) Upon petition by the secretary, and after hearing held upon
reasonable notice to the facility, the superior court may issue a
warrant to an officer or employee of the secretary authorizing him or
her to enter at reasonable times, and examine the records, books, and
accounts of any regional support network or service provider refusing
to consent to inspection or examination by the authority.
(11) Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy,
the secretary may file an action for an injunction or other process
against any person or governmental unit to restrain or prevent the
establishment, conduct, or operation of a regional support network or
service provider without certification or a license under this chapter.
(12) The standards for certification of evaluation and treatment
facilities shall include standards relating to maintenance of good
physical and mental health and other services to be afforded persons
pursuant to this chapter and chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW, and shall
otherwise assure the effectuation of the purposes of these chapters.
(13) The standards for certification of crisis stabilization units
shall include standards that:
(a) Permit location of the units at a jail facility if the unit is
physically separate from the general population of the jail;
(b) Require administration of the unit by mental health
professionals who direct the stabilization and rehabilitation efforts;
and
(c) Provide an environment affording security appropriate with the
alleged criminal behavior and necessary to protect the public safety.
(14) The department shall distribute appropriated state and federal
funds in accordance with any priorities, terms, or conditions specified
in the appropriations act.
(((14))) (15) The secretary shall assume all duties assigned to the
nonparticipating regional support networks under chapters 71.05, 71.34,
and 71.24 RCW. Such responsibilities shall include those which would
have been assigned to the nonparticipating counties in regions where
there are not participating regional support networks.
The regional support networks, or the secretary's assumption of all
responsibilities under chapters 71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW, shall be
included in all state and federal plans affecting the state mental
health program including at least those required by this chapter, the
medicaid program, and P.L. 99-660. Nothing in these plans shall be
inconsistent with the intent and requirements of this chapter.
(((15))) (16) The secretary shall:
(a) Disburse funds for the regional support networks within sixty
days of approval of the biennial contract. The department must either
approve or reject the biennial contract within sixty days of receipt.
(b) Enter into biennial contracts with regional support networks.
The contracts shall be consistent with available resources. No
contract shall be approved that does not include progress toward
meeting the goals of this chapter by taking responsibility for: (i)
Short-term commitments; (ii) residential care; and (iii) emergency
response systems.
(c) Notify regional support networks of their allocation of
available resources at least sixty days prior to the start of a new
biennial contract period.
(d) Deny all or part of the funding allocations to regional support
networks based solely upon formal findings of noncompliance with the
terms of the regional support network's contract with the department.
Regional support networks disputing the decision of the secretary to
withhold funding allocations are limited to the remedies provided in
the department's contracts with the regional support networks.
(((16))) (17) The department, in cooperation with the state
congressional delegation, shall actively seek waivers of federal
requirements and such modifications of federal regulations as are
necessary to allow federal medicaid reimbursement for services provided
by free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities certified under
chapter 71.05 RCW. The department shall periodically report its
efforts to the appropriate committees of the senate and the house of
representatives.

Sec. 14 RCW 71.05.160 and 1998 c 297 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any facility receiving a person pursuant to RCW 71.05.150 or
section 8 of this act shall require the designated mental health
professional to prepare a petition for initial detention stating the
circumstances under which the person's condition was made known and
stating that ((such officer or person has)) there is evidence, as a
result of his or her personal observation or investigation, that the
actions of the person for which application is made constitute a
likelihood of serious harm, or that he or she is gravely disabled, and
stating the specific facts known to him or her as a result of his or
her personal observation or investigation, upon which he or she bases
the belief that such person should be detained for the purposes and
under the authority of this chapter.
If a person is involuntarily placed in an evaluation and treatment
facility pursuant to RCW 71.05.150 or section 8 of this act, on the
next judicial day following the initial detention, the ((county))
designated mental health professional shall file with the court and
serve the designated attorney of the detained person the petition or
supplemental petition for initial detention, proof of service of
notice, and a copy of a notice of emergency detention.

Sec. 15 RCW 71.05.360 and 2005 c 504 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Every person involuntarily detained or committed under the
provisions of this chapter shall be entitled to all the rights set
forth in this chapter, which shall be prominently posted in the
facility, and shall retain all rights not denied him or her under this
chapter except as chapter 9.41 RCW may limit the right of a person to
purchase or possess a firearm or to qualify for a concealed pistol
license.
(b) No person shall be presumed incompetent as a consequence of
receiving an evaluation or voluntary or involuntary treatment for a
mental disorder, under this chapter or any prior laws of this state
dealing with mental illness. Competency shall not be determined or
withdrawn except under the provisions of chapter 10.97 or 11.88 RCW.
(c) Any person who leaves a public or private agency following
evaluation or treatment for mental disorder shall be given a written
statement setting forth the substance of this section.
(2) Each person involuntarily detained or committed pursuant to
this chapter shall have the right to adequate care and individualized
treatment.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to deny
to any person treatment by spiritual means through prayer in accordance
with the tenets and practices of a church or religious denomination.
(4) Persons receiving evaluation or treatment under this chapter
shall be given a reasonable choice of an available physician or other
professional person qualified to provide such services.
(5) Whenever any person is detained for evaluation and treatment
pursuant to this chapter, both the person and, if possible, a
responsible member of his or her immediate family, personal
representative, guardian, or conservator, if any, shall be advised as
soon as possible in writing or orally, by the officer or person taking
him or her into custody or by personnel of the evaluation and treatment
facility where the person is detained that unless the person is
released or voluntarily admits himself or herself for treatment within
seventy-two hours of the initial detention:
(a) A judicial hearing in a superior court, either by a judge or
court commissioner thereof, shall be held not more than seventy-two
hours after the initial detention to determine whether there is
probable cause to detain the person after the seventy-two hours have
expired for up to an additional fourteen days without further automatic
hearing for the reason that the person is a person whose mental
disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm or that the person is
gravely disabled;
(b) The person has a right to communicate immediately with an
attorney; has a right to have an attorney appointed to represent him or
her before and at the probable cause hearing if he or she is indigent;
and has the right to be told the name and address of the attorney that
the mental health professional has designated pursuant to this chapter;
(c) The person has the right to remain silent and that any
statement he or she makes may be used against him or her;
(d) The person has the right to present evidence and to cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her at the probable cause
hearing; and
(e) The person has the right to refuse psychiatric medications,
including antipsychotic medication beginning twenty-four hours prior to
the probable cause hearing.
(6) When proceedings are initiated under ((RCW 71.05.150 (2), (3),
or (4)(b))) section 8 of this act, no later than twelve hours after
such person is admitted to the evaluation and treatment facility the
personnel of the evaluation and treatment facility or the designated
mental health professional shall serve on such person a copy of the
petition for initial detention and the name, business address, and
phone number of the designated attorney and shall forthwith commence
service of a copy of the petition for initial detention on the
designated attorney.
(7) The judicial hearing described in subsection (5) of this
section is hereby authorized, and shall be held according to the
provisions of subsection (5) of this section and rules promulgated by
the supreme court.
(8) At the probable cause hearing the detained person shall have
the following rights in addition to the rights previously specified:
(a) To present evidence on his or her behalf;
(b) To cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her;
(c) To be proceeded against by the rules of evidence;
(d) To remain silent;
(e) To view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file.
(9) The physician-patient privilege or the psychologist-client
privilege shall be deemed waived in proceedings under this chapter
relating to the administration of antipsychotic medications. As to
other proceedings under this chapter, the privileges shall be waived
when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion determines
that such waiver is necessary to protect either the detained person or
the public.
The waiver of a privilege under this section is limited to records
or testimony relevant to evaluation of the detained person for purposes
of a proceeding under this chapter. Upon motion by the detained person
or on its own motion, the court shall examine a record or testimony
sought by a petitioner to determine whether it is within the scope of
the waiver.
The record maker shall not be required to testify in order to
introduce medical or psychological records of the detained person so
long as the requirements of RCW 5.45.020 are met except that portions
of the record which contain opinions as to the detained person's mental
state must be deleted from such records unless the person making such
conclusions is available for cross-examination.
(10) Insofar as danger to the person or others is not created, each
person involuntarily detained, treated in a less restrictive
alternative course of treatment, or committed for treatment and
evaluation pursuant to this chapter shall have, in addition to other
rights not specifically withheld by law, the following rights:
(a) To wear his or her own clothes and to keep and use his or her
own personal possessions, except when deprivation of same is essential
to protect the safety of the resident or other persons;
(b) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of his or her
own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;
(c) To have access to individual storage space for his or her
private use;
(d) To have visitors at reasonable times;
(e) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and
receive confidential calls, consistent with an effective treatment
program;
(f) To have ready access to letter writing materials, including
stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the
mails;
(g) To discuss treatment plans and decisions with professional
persons;
(h) Not to consent to the administration of antipsychotic
medications and not to thereafter be administered antipsychotic
medications unless ordered by a court under RCW 71.05.217 or pursuant
to an administrative hearing under RCW 71.05.215;
(i) Not to consent to the performance of electroconvulsant therapy
or surgery, except emergency life-saving surgery, unless ordered by a
court under RCW 71.05.217;
(j) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any
circumstances;
(k) To dispose of property and sign contracts unless such person
has been adjudicated an incompetent in a court proceeding directed to
that particular issue.
(11) Every person involuntarily detained shall immediately be
informed of his or her right to a hearing to review the legality of his
or her detention and of his or her right to counsel, by the
professional person in charge of the facility providing evaluation and
treatment, or his or her designee, and, when appropriate, by the court.
If the person so elects, the court shall immediately appoint an
attorney to assist him or her.
(12) A person challenging his or her detention or his or her
attorney((,)) shall have the right to designate and have the court
appoint a reasonably available independent physician or licensed mental
health professional to examine the person detained, the results of
which examination may be used in the proceeding. The person shall, if
he or she is financially able, bear the cost of such expert
((information [examination])) examination, otherwise such expert
examination shall be at public expense.
(13) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the patient
from petitioning by writ of habeas corpus for release.
(14) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a person committed on
or prior to January 1, 1974, from exercising a right available to him
or her at or prior to January 1, 1974, for obtaining release from
confinement.
(15) Nothing in this section permits any person to knowingly
violate a no-contact order or a condition of an active judgment and
sentence or an active condition of supervision by the department of
corrections.

Sec. 16 RCW 71.05.390 and 2005 c 504 s 109, 2005 c 453 s 5, and
2005 c 274 s 346 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Except as provided in this section, RCW 71.05.445, 71.05.630,
70.96A.150, or pursuant to a valid release under RCW 70.02.030, the
fact of admission and all information and records compiled, obtained,
or maintained in the course of providing services to either voluntary
or involuntary recipients of services at public or private agencies
shall be confidential.
Information and records may be disclosed only:
(1) In communications between qualified professional persons to
meet the requirements of this chapter, in the provision of services or
appropriate referrals, or in the course of guardianship proceedings.
The consent of the person, or his or her personal representative or
guardian, shall be obtained before information or records may be
disclosed by a professional person employed by a facility unless
provided to a professional person:
(a) Employed by the facility;
(b) Who has medical responsibility for the patient's care;
(c) Who is a designated mental health professional;
(d) Who is providing services under chapter 71.24 RCW;
(e) Who is employed by a state or local correctional facility where
the person is confined or supervised; or
(f) Who is providing evaluation, treatment, or follow-up services
under chapter 10.77 RCW.
(2) When the communications regard the special needs of a patient
and the necessary circumstances giving rise to such needs and the
disclosure is made by a facility providing services to the operator of
a facility in which the patient resides or will reside.
(3)(a) When the person receiving services, or his or her guardian,
designates persons to whom information or records may be released, or
if the person is a minor, when his or her parents make such
designation.
(b) A public or private agency shall release to a person's next of
kin, attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if
any:
(i) The information that the person is presently a patient in the
facility or that the person is seriously physically ill;
(ii) A statement evaluating the mental and physical condition of
the patient, and a statement of the probable duration of the patient's
confinement, if such information is requested by the next of kin,
attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator; and
(iii) Such other information requested by the next of kin or
attorney as may be necessary to decide whether or not proceedings
should be instituted to appoint a guardian or conservator.
(4) To the extent necessary for a recipient to make a claim, or for
a claim to be made on behalf of a recipient for aid, insurance, or
medical assistance to which he or she may be entitled.
(5)(a) For either program evaluation or research, or both:
PROVIDED, That the secretary adopts rules for the conduct of the
evaluation or research, or both. Such rules shall include, but need
not be limited to, the requirement that all evaluators and researchers
must sign an oath of confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning
persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency,
or person) I, . . . . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or
otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any
information obtained in the course of such evaluation or research
regarding persons who have received services such that the person who
received such services is identifiable.
I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information
may subject me to civil liability under the provisions of state law.

/s/ . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the
compilation and publication of statistical data for use by government
or researchers under standards, including standards to assure
maintenance of confidentiality, set forth by the secretary.
(6)(a) To the courts as necessary to the administration of this
chapter or to a court ordering an evaluation or treatment under chapter
10.77 RCW solely for the purpose of preventing the entry of any
evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any order
entered under this chapter.
(b) To a court or its designee in which a motion under chapter
10.77 RCW has been made for involuntary medication of a defendant for
the purpose of competency restoration.
(c) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purpose
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(7)(a) When a mental health professional is requested by a
representative of a law enforcement or corrections agency, including a
police officer, sheriff, community corrections officer, a municipal
attorney, or prosecuting attorney to undertake an investigation or
provide treatment under RCW 71.05.150 or section 2 or 8 of this act,
the mental health professional shall, if requested to do so, advise the
representative in writing of the results of the investigation including
a statement of reasons for the decision to detain or release the person
investigated. Such written report shall be submitted within seventy-two hours of the completion of the investigation or the request from
the law enforcement or corrections representative, whichever occurs
later.
(b) To law enforcement officers, public health officers, or
personnel of the department of corrections or the indeterminate
sentence review board for persons who are the subject of the records
and who are committed to the custody or supervision of the department
of corrections or indeterminate sentence review board which information
or records are necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their
office. Except for dissemination of information released pursuant to
RCW 71.05.425 and 4.24.550, regarding persons committed under this
chapter under RCW 71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(((2))) (3)(c) after
dismissal of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the extent of
information that may be released is limited as follows:
(i) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, the
fact and date of discharge or release, and the last known address shall
be disclosed upon request;
(ii) The law enforcement and public health officers or personnel of
the department of corrections or indeterminate sentence review board
shall be obligated to keep such information confidential in accordance
with this chapter;
(iii) Additional information shall be disclosed only after giving
notice to said person and his or her counsel and upon a showing of
clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that such information is
necessary and that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality
are and will be maintained. However, in the event the said person has
escaped from custody, said notice prior to disclosure is not necessary
and that the facility from which the person escaped shall include an
evaluation as to whether the person is of danger to persons or property
and has a propensity toward violence;
(iv) Information and records shall be disclosed to the department
of corrections pursuant to and in compliance with the provisions of RCW
71.05.445 for the purposes of completing presentence investigations or
risk assessment reports, supervision of an incarcerated offender or
offender under supervision in the community, planning for and provision
of supervision of an offender, or assessment of an offender's risk to
the community; and
(v) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(8) To the attorney of the detained person.
(9) To the prosecuting attorney as necessary to carry out the
responsibilities of the office under RCW 71.05.330(2) and
71.05.340(1)(b) and 71.05.335. The prosecutor shall be provided access
to records regarding the committed person's treatment and prognosis,
medication, behavior problems, and other records relevant to the issue
of whether treatment less restrictive than inpatient treatment is in
the best interest of the committed person or others. Information shall
be disclosed only after giving notice to the committed person and the
person's counsel.
(10) To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person, when
the identity of the person is known to the public or private agency,
whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is known to have
been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may designate a
representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure shall be made
by the professional person in charge of the public or private agency or
his or her designee and shall include the dates of commitment,
admission, discharge, or release, authorized or unauthorized absence
from the agency's facility, and only such other information that is
pertinent to the threat or harassment. The decision to disclose or not
shall not result in civil liability for the agency or its employees so
long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross
negligence.
(11) To appropriate corrections and law enforcement agencies all
necessary and relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent
situation that poses a significant and imminent risk to the public.
The decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for
the mental health service provider or its employees so long as the
decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence.
(12) To the persons designated in RCW 71.05.425 for the purposes
described in that section.
(13) Civil liability and immunity for the release of information
about a particular person who is committed to the department under RCW
71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(((2))) (3)(c) after dismissal of a sex
offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, is governed by RCW 4.24.550.
(14) Upon the death of a person, his or her next of kin, personal
representative, guardian, or conservator, if any, shall be notified.
Next of kin who are of legal age and competent shall be notified
under this section in the following order: Spouse, parents, children,
brothers and sisters, and other relatives according to the degree of
relation. Access to all records and information compiled, obtained, or
maintained in the course of providing services to a deceased patient
shall be governed by RCW 70.02.140.
(15) To the department of health for the purposes of determining
compliance with state or federal licensure, certification, or
registration rules or laws. However, the information and records
obtained under this subsection are exempt from public inspection and
copying pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW.
(16) To mark headstones or otherwise memorialize patients interred
at state hospital cemeteries. The department of social and health
services shall make available the name, date of birth, and date of
death of patients buried in state hospital cemeteries fifty years after
the death of a patient.
(17) To law enforcement officers and to prosecuting attorneys as
are necessary to enforce RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(ii). The extent of
information that may be released is limited as follows:
(a) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, an
official copy of any order or orders of commitment, and an official
copy of any written or oral notice of ineligibility to possess a
firearm that was provided to the person pursuant to RCW 9.41.047(1),
shall be disclosed upon request;
(b) The law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may only release
the information obtained to the person's attorney as required by court
rule and to a jury or judge, if a jury is waived, that presides over
any trial at which the person is charged with violating RCW
9.41.040(2)(a)(ii);
(c) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(18) When a patient would otherwise be subject to the provisions of
RCW 71.05.390 and disclosure is necessary for the protection of the
patient or others due to his or her unauthorized disappearance from the
facility, and his or her whereabouts is unknown, notice of such
disappearance, along with relevant information, may be made to
relatives, the department of corrections when the person is under the
supervision of the department, and governmental law enforcement
agencies designated by the physician in charge of the patient or the
professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her
professional designee.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the uniform health
care information act, chapter 70.02 RCW, applies to all records and
information compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of
providing services.
(19) The fact of admission, as well as all records, files,
evidence, findings, or orders made, prepared, collected, or maintained
pursuant to this chapter shall not be admissible as evidence in any
legal proceeding outside this chapter without the written consent of
the person who was the subject of the proceeding except in a subsequent
criminal prosecution of a person committed pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3)
or 71.05.320(((2))) (3)(c) on charges that were dismissed pursuant to
chapter 10.77 RCW due to incompetency to stand trial, in a civil
commitment proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW, or, in the case of
a minor, a guardianship or dependency proceeding. The records and
files maintained in any court proceeding pursuant to this chapter shall
be confidential and available subsequent to such proceedings only to
the person who was the subject of the proceeding or his or her
attorney. In addition, the court may order the subsequent release or
use of such records or files only upon good cause shown if the court
finds that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality are and
will be maintained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Nothing in this act shall be construed to
alter or diminish a prosecutor's inherent authority to divert or pursue
the prosecution of criminal offenders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 RCW 10.77.090 (Stay of proceedings--Commitment -- Findings -- Evaluation, treatment -- Extensions of commitment--Alternative procedures -- Procedure in nonfelony charge) and 2000 c 74 s
3, 1998 c 297 s 38, 1989 c 420 s 5, 1979 ex.s. c 215 s 3, 1974 ex.s. c
198 s 8, & 1973 1st ex.s. c 117 s 9 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

--- END ---