BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The term "employment" does not include any person engaged in
activities related to a performance sponsored by an employer with North
American industry classification system code 711110, 711120, or 712110,
who receives no remuneration for these activities other than a nominal
stipend. The stipend is presumed to defray the individual's incidental
expenses involved in performing including, but not limited to, meals,
transportation, lodging, costumes, supplies, child care, and related
expenses. This section does not apply to employers with more than
three individuals in their employ during any portion of a day during
the calendar year.
For purposes of this section, "stipend" means a fixed sum of money
paid periodically to defray expenses.

--- END ---