BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is
increased focus on student academic performance and school
accountability, but attention is seldom paid to the role of the school
boards in meeting the state and federal demands in these areas. The
legislature further finds that there needs to be a clear understanding
of the purpose, role, structure, appropriate functions, training, and
compensation of school boards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct a broad performance audit of school boards of
directors in Washington and analyze the roles, responsibilities, costs,
and compensation of school boards of directors. In addition to the
standard items reviewed in a performance audit, the committee shall
examine the efficiency and effectiveness of school district boards of
directors, including the following:
(a) In light of state and federal demands for student achievement
and school reform, what is the appropriate role for school boards to
assist in improving student and school's performance?
(b) Should school boards primarily authorize and monitor the
operations of schools or should they be involved more directly with
school operations?
(c) Should a new system be considered with most of the decision-making authority vested in a different entity?
(d) What is the appropriate compensation for school boards in light
of their duties and under any recommendations for revised duties?
(2) In conducting the performance audit, the committee may also use
performance measures or standards used by other states or school
districts in developing its findings. The committee shall report the
findings to the legislature by December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The office of school director training and instruction is
established within the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. The sole purpose of the office of school director
training and instruction is to develop an initial core training program
for first-time directors and to annually provide the initial core
training and annual ongoing professional development, training, and
instruction for school directors. The office shall work
collaboratively with the Washington state school directors' association
in developing the content of the courses. The office may contract with
the Washington state school director's association or other providers
to provide the courses. There is no charge to the individual directors
to take a course offered. The initial core training for first-time
directors shall consist of fourteen hours and must be obtained within
the first two years of serving on the board. After the initial core
training has been obtained, each school district director shall
annually obtain a minimum of seven hours of professional development,
training, or instruction courses. Hours obtained in excess of the
minimum requirements each year may accumulate and be carried forward
from year to year. A statement of each school director's hours
obtained in the preceding year must be included on the web site of the
school district. Additionally, the office of school director training
and instruction shall maintain a record of hours of training and
instruction taken by each director and shall post the record on the web
site of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.343
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A proposed change in the structure of a school district board
of directors from an elected board to an appointed board or back to an
elected board, may be initiated by a petition proposing such a change
filed with the appropriate county auditor by any legal voter residing
within the school district, either individually or on behalf of an
organization. The appropriate county auditor is the auditor of the
county in which a majority of the registered voters of the school
district reside.
(2) The petition submitted to the auditor must be submitted at
least sixty or more days prior to the next general election and be
signed by registered voters of the school district equal to at least
ten percent of the registered voters in a given district. The petition
must designate who will appoint the school district board of directors.
The size of the appointed board and the terms of the appointed
directors shall comply with the requirements of RCW 28A.343.300.
(3) The county auditor shall review the signatures and certify
sufficiency of the petition if there is a sufficient number of valid
signatures. If the auditor certifies the petition, then a ballot
proposition authorizing the change in the structure of the school
district board of directors shall be submitted to the voters in the
school district at the next district general election.
(4) If the ballot proposition is approved by a simple majority vote
of the registered voters within the school district, then the change in
the structure of the board shall take effect January 1st of the
following year.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.343.300 and 1991 c 363 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
The governing board of a school district shall be known as the
board of directors of the district.
((Unless otherwise specifically provided, as in RCW 29.13.060,))
Each member of a board of directors ((shall be elected by ballot by the
registered voters of the school district and)) shall hold office for a
term of four years and until a successor is elected and qualified.
Terms of school directors shall be staggered((, and insofar as
possible,)). Not more than a majority of one shall be elected to full
terms at any regular election. In case a member or members of a board
of directors are to be elected to fill an unexpired term or terms, the
ballot shall specify the term for which each such member is to be
elected.
Except for a school district of the first class having within its
boundaries a city with a population of four hundred thousand people or
more which shall have a board of directors of seven members, the board
of directors of every school district of the first class or school
district of the second class shall consist of five members.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.343.400 and 1987 c 307 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each member of the board of directors of a school district may
receive compensation ((of fifty dollars)) per day or portion thereof
for attending board meetings and for performing other services on
behalf of the school district((, not to exceed four thousand eight
hundred dollars per year)) equal to the regular federal per diem rate,
with fifty percent of the cost covered by the state, if the district
board of directors has authorized by board resolution, at a regularly
scheduled meeting, the provision of such compensation. A board of
directors of a school district may authorize such compensation only
from locally collected excess levy funds available for that purpose,
and compensation for board members shall not cause the state to incur
any present or future funding obligation.
Any director may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation under this section as to any month or months during his or
her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the district as
provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective, must be filed
any time after the director's election and before the date on which the
compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall specify the
month or period of months for which it is made.
The compensation provided in this section shall be in addition to
any reimbursement for expenses paid to such directors by the school
district.

--- END ---