BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.730 and 1990 c 60 s 304 are each amended to read
as follows:
Individual employees' participation in the employee assistance
program and all individually identifiable information gathered in the
process of conducting the program shall be held in strict confidence;
except that agency management may be provided with the following
information about employees referred by that agency management due to
poor job performance:
(1) Whether or not the referred employee made an appointment;
(2) The date and time the employee arrived and departed;
(3) Whether the employee agreed to follow the advice of counselors;
and
(4) Whether further appointments were scheduled.
Participation or nonparticipation by any employee in the employee
assistance program shall not be ((a)) the sole factor in any decision
affecting an employee's job security, promotional opportunities,
corrective or disciplinary action, or other employment rights.

--- END ---