BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.170.010 and 2004 c 50 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Armed private security guard" means a private security guard
who has a current firearms certificate issued by the commission and is
licensed as an armed private security guard under this chapter.
(2) "Armored vehicle guard" means a person who transports in an
armored vehicle under armed guard, from one place to another place,
valuables, jewelry, currency, documents, or any other item that
requires secure delivery.
(3) "Bouncer" means an individual who is employed by a business
with a license to sell beer, wine, or liquor, as defined by RCW
66.04.010, for the purpose of maintaining order in such establishments
and to eject disorderly persons as required to fulfill that
responsibility.
(4) "Burglar alarm response runner" means a person employed by a
private security company to respond to burglar alarm system signals.
(((4))) (5) "Burglar alarm system" means a device or an assembly of
equipment and devices used to detect or signal unauthorized intrusion,
movement, or exit at a protected premises, other than in a vehicle, to
which police or private security guards are expected to respond.
(((5))) (6) "Chief law enforcement officer" means the elected or
appointed police administrator of a municipal, county, or state police
or sheriff's department that has full law enforcement powers in its
jurisdiction.
(((6))) (7) "Classroom instruction" means instruction that takes
place in a setting where individuals receiving training are assembled
together and learn through lectures, study papers, class discussion,
textbook study, or other means of organized formal education
techniques, such as video, closed circuit, or other forms of electronic
means, and as distinguished from on-the-job education or training.
(((7))) (8) "Commission" means the criminal justice training
commission established in chapter 43.101 RCW.
(((8))) (9) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(((9))) (10) "Director" means the director of the department of
licensing.
(((10))) (11) "Employer" includes any individual, firm,
corporation, partnership, association, company, society, manager,
contractor, subcontractor, bureau, agency, service, office, or an agent
of any of the foregoing that employs or seeks to enter into an
arrangement to employ any person as a private security guard.
(((11))) (12) "Firearms certificate" means the certificate issued
by the commission.
(((12))) (13) "Licensee" means a person granted a license required
by this chapter.
(((13))) (14) "Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation,
partnership, association, company, society, manager, contractor,
subcontractor, bureau, agency, service, office, or an agent or employee
of any of the foregoing.
(((14))) (15) "Postassignment or on-the-job training" means
training that occurs in either an assisted field environment or in a
classroom instruction setting, or both.
(((15))) (16) "Preassignment training" means the classroom training
completed prior to being assigned to work independently.
(((16))) (17) "Principal corporate officer" means the president,
vice-president, treasurer, secretary, comptroller, or any other person
who performs the same functions for the corporation as performed by
these officers.
(((17))) (18) "Private security company" means a person or entity
licensed under this chapter and engaged in the business of providing
the services of private security guards on a contractual basis.
(((18))) (19) "Private security guard" means an individual who is
licensed under this chapter and principally employed as or typically
referred to as one of the following:
(a) Security officer or guard;
(b) Patrol or merchant patrol service officer or guard;
(c) Armed escort or bodyguard;
(d) Armored vehicle guard;
(e) Burglar alarm response runner; ((or))
(f) Crowd control officer or guard; or
(g) Bouncers at establishments that serve alcohol.
(((19))) (20) "Qualifying agent" means an officer or manager of a
corporation who meets the requirements set forth in this chapter for
obtaining a license to own or operate a private security company.
(((20))) (21) "Sworn peace officer" means a person who is an
employee of the federal government, the state, a political subdivision,
agency, or department branch of a municipality, or other unit of local
government, and has law enforcement powers.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.170.020 and 2006 c 173 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The requirements of this chapter do not apply to:
(1) A person who is employed exclusively or regularly by one
employer and performs the functions of a private security guard solely
in connection with the affairs of that employer((,)) if: (a) The
employer is not a private security company, or (b) the employee is not
a bouncer as defined in RCW 18.170.010(3);
(2) A sworn peace officer while engaged in the performance of the
officer's official duties;
(3) A sworn peace officer while employed by any person to engage in
off-duty employment as a private security guard, but only if the
employment is approved by the chief law enforcement officer of the
jurisdiction where the employment takes place and the sworn peace
officer does not employ, contract with, or broker for profit other
persons to assist him or her in performing the duties related to his or
her private employer; or
(4) Guest services or crowd management employees who do not perform
the duties of a private security guard.

--- END ---