BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that historic barns
are essential symbols of Washington's heritage representing a
pioneering spirit of industriousness. Important for their association
with broad patterns of agricultural history and community development
and as examples of distinct architectural styles and methods of
construction, historic barns serve as highly visible icons for local
residents and visitors alike. The legislature acknowledges that
factors such as changes in the agricultural economy and farming
technologies, prohibitive rehabilitation costs, development pressures,
and regulations restricting new uses, collectively work to endanger
historic barns statewide and contribute to their falling into decay or
being demolished altogether.
As historic barns represent irreplaceable resources, and
recognizing that barn preservation will work to retain these structures
as functional and economically viable elements of working lands, the
purpose of this act is to create a system acknowledging heritage barns
statewide that provides emergency assistance to heritage barn owners
through matching grants, assesses the need for long-term barn
preservation, and considers additional incentives and regulatory
revisions that work toward the preservation of heritage barns as
integral components of Washington's historic landscapes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington state heritage barn
preservation program is created in the department.
(2) The director, in consultation with the heritage barn
preservation advisory board, shall conduct a thematic study of
Washington state's barns. The study shall include a determination of
types, an assessment of the most unique and significant barns in the
state, and a condition and needs assessment of historic barns in the
state.
(3)(a) The department, in consultation with the heritage barn
preservation advisory board, shall establish a heritage barn
recognition program. To apply for recognition as a heritage barn, the
barn owner shall supply to the department photos of the barn, photos of
the farm and surrounding landscape, a brief history of the farm, and a
construction date for the barn.
(b) Three times a year, the governor's advisory council on historic
places shall review the list of barns submitted by the department for
formal recognition as a heritage barn.
(4) Eligible applicants for heritage barn preservation fund awards
include property owners, nonprofit organizations, and local
governments.
(5) To apply for support from the heritage barn preservation fund,
an applicant must submit an application to the department in a form
prescribed by the department. Applicants must provide at least fifty
percent of the cost of the project through in-kind labor, the
applicant's own moneys, or other funding sources.
(6) The following types of projects are eligible for funding:
(a) Stabilization of endangered heritage barns and related
agricultural buildings, including but not limited to repairs to
foundations, sills, windows, walls, structural framework, and the
repair and replacement of roofs; and
(b) Work that preserves the historic character, features, and
materials of a historic barn.
(7) In making awards, the advisory board shall consider the
following criteria:
(a) Relative historical and cultural significance of the barn;
(b) Urgency of the threat and need for repair;
(c) Extent to which the project preserves historic character and
extends the useful life of the barn or associated agricultural
building;
(d) Visibility of the barn from a state designated scenic byway or
other publicly traveled way;
(e) Extent to which the project leverages other sources of
financial assistance;
(f) Provision for long-term preservation;
(g) Readiness of the applicant to initiate and complete the
project; and
(h) Extent to which the project contributes to the equitable
geographic distribution of heritage barn preservation fund awards
across the state.
(8) In awarding funds, special consideration shall be given to
barns that are:
(a) Still in agricultural use;
(b) Listed on the national register of historic places; or
(c) Outstanding examples of their type or era.
(9) The conditions in this subsection must be met by recipients of
funding in order to satisfy the public benefit requirements of the
heritage barn preservation program.
(a) Recipients must execute a contract with the department before
commencing work. The contract must include a historic preservation
easement for between five to fifteen years depending on the amount of
the award. The contract must specify public benefit and minimum
maintenance requirements.
(b) Recipients must proactively maintain their historic barn for a
minimum of ten years.
(c) Public access to the exterior of properties that are not
visible from a public right-of-way must be provided under reasonable
terms and circumstances, including the requirement that visits by
nonprofit organizations or school groups must be offered at least one
day per year.
(10) All work must comply with the United States secretary of the
interior's standards for the rehabilitation of historic properties;
however, exceptions may be made for the retention or installation of
metal roofs on a case-by-case basis.
(11) The heritage barn preservation fund shall be acknowledged on
any materials produced and in publicity for the project. A sign
acknowledging the fund shall be posted at the worksite for the duration
of the preservation agreement.
(12) Projects must be initiated within one year of funding approval
and completed within two years, unless an extension is provided by the
department in writing.
(13) If a recipient of a heritage barn preservation fund award, or
subsequent owner of a property that was assisted by the fund, takes any
action within ten years of the funding award with respect to the
assisted property such as dismantlement, removal, or substantial
alteration, which causes it to be no longer eligible for listing in the
Washington heritage register, the fund shall be repaid in full within
one year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The director shall establish a
Washington state heritage barn preservation advisory board that
includes:
(a) Two members representing owners of heritage barns nominated by
recognized agricultural organizations;
(b) The chair of the advisory council, or the chair's designee;
(c) A representative of a statewide historic preservation
organization;
(d) A representative of a county heritage commission that is
recognized by the department as a certified local government;
(e) Two elected county officials, one appointed by the Washington
state association of counties and one appointed by the Washington
association of county officials;
(f) A representative of a private foundation with an interest in
the preservation of barns;
(g) A representative of a land trust that is experienced with
easements; and
(h) At least one at-large member with appropriate expertise in barn
architecture, architectural history, construction, engineering, or a
related field.
(2) The director may invite representatives of federal agencies
that have barn preservation programs or expertise to participate on the
advisory board, who shall serve as ex-officio members.
(3) The director shall work to assure that the advisory board
members are from diverse geographic regions of the state. The director
may serve as chair, or appoint a person to serve as chair.
(4) The advisory board shall provide advice to the director
regarding:
(a) The criteria for designation of heritage barns;
(b) The criteria for determining eligibility for grant funds
including contracting provisions between the department and grant
recipients. In developing this criteria, the department and the
advisory board shall consult with the state attorney general; and
(c) The criteria for awarding grants for barn rehabilitation.
(5) The advisory board shall examine regulatory issues that impose
constraints on the ability to use heritage barns for contemporary
economically productive purposes including building and land use codes.
(6)(a) In consultation with the department of revenue, the advisory
board shall review state tax incentives that would serve to provide
incentives for rehabilitation and maintenance of heritage barns.
(b) Based on the recommendations of the advisory board, the
department shall report to appropriate committees of the legislature,
by December 1, 2007, regarding recommendations to adapt existing state
tax incentives available to heritage barns under chapter 84.26 RCW.
(7) By December 1, 2010, the department shall provide a final
report to appropriate committees of the legislature that summarizes the
accomplishments of the program, addresses regulatory issues examined
under subsection (5) of this section, and makes final recommendations.
(8) This section expires December 31, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The heritage barn preservation fund is
created as an account in the state treasury. All receipts from
appropriations and private sources must be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only to provide assistance to
owners of heritage barns in Washington state in the stabilization and
restoration of their barns so that these historic properties may
continue to serve the community.
(2) No more than two percent of the expenditures from the fund may
be used for administrative purposes by the department.
(3) The primary public benefit of funding through the heritage barn
preservation program is the preservation and enhancement of significant
historic properties that provide economic benefit to the state's
citizens and enrich communities throughout the state.

Sec. 5 RCW 27.34.020 and 2005 c 333 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Advisory council" means the advisory council on historic
preservation.
(2) "Department" means the department of archaeology and historic
preservation.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of archaeology
and historic preservation.
(4) "Federal act" means the national historic preservation act of
1966 (Public Law 89-655; 80 Stat. 915).
(5) "Heritage barn" means any large agricultural outbuilding used
to house animals, crops, or farm equipment, that is over fifty years
old and has been determined by the department to: (a) Be eligible for
listing on the Washington heritage register or the national register of
historic places; or (b) have been listed on a local historic register
and approved by the advisory council. In addition to barns, "heritage
barn" includes agricultural resources such as milk houses, sheds,
silos, or other outbuildings, that are historically associated with the
working life of the farm or ranch, if these outbuildings are on the
same property as a heritage barn.
(6) "Heritage council" means the Washington state heritage council.
(((6))) (7) "Historic preservation" includes the protection,
rehabilitation, restoration, identification, scientific excavation, and
reconstruction of districts, sites, buildings, structures, and objects
significant in American and Washington state history, architecture,
archaeology, or culture.
(((7))) (8) "Preservation officer" means the state historic
preservation officer as provided for in RCW 43.334.020.
(((8))) (9) "Project" means programs leading to the preservation
for public benefit of historical properties, whether by state and local
governments or other public bodies, or private organizations or
individuals, including the acquisition of title or interests in, and
the development of, any district, site, building, structure, or object
that is significant in American and Washington state history,
architecture, archaeology, or culture, and property used in connection
therewith, or for its development.
(((9))) (10) "State historical agencies" means the state historical
societies and the department.
(((10))) (11) "State historical societies" means the Washington
state historical society and the eastern Washington state historical
society.
(((11))) (12) "Cultural resource management plan" means a
comprehensive plan which identifies and organizes information on the
state of Washington's historic, archaeological, and architectural
resources into a set of management criteria, and which is to be used
for producing reliable decisions, recommendations, and advice relative
to the identification, evaluation, and protection of these resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 27.34 RCW.

--- END ---