BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
The operator of a street legal motorcycle approaching an
intersection that is controlled by a triggered traffic control signal
using a vehicle detection device that is inoperative due to the size of
the street legal motorcycle shall come to a full and complete stop at
the intersection. If the traffic control signal fails to operate after
one cycle of the signal, the operator may, after exercising due care,
proceed through the intersection. It is not a defense to a violation
of RCW 46.61.050 that the driver of a motorcycle proceeded through the
intersection under the belief that the traffic control signal used a
vehicle detection device or was inoperative due to the size of the
motorcycle when the signal did not use a vehicle detection device or
that a vehicle detection device was not inoperative due to the size of
the motorcycle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2007.

--- END ---