BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.305 and 1997 c 291 s 6 and 1997 c 241 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The department shall continue to issue the categories of special
plates issued by the department under the sections repealed under
section 12 (1) through (7), chapter 250, Laws of 1990. Special license
plates issued under those repealed sections before January 1, 1991, are
valid to the extent and under the conditions provided in those repealed
sections. The following conditions, limitations, or requirements apply
to certain special license plates issued after January 1, 1991:
(1) A horseless carriage plate and a plate or plates issued for
collectors' vehicles more than thirty years old, upon payment of the
initial fees required by law and the additional special license plate
fee established by the department, are valid for the life of the
vehicle for which application is approved by the department. When a
single plate is issued, it shall be displayed on the rear of the
vehicle. A horseless carriage plate shall be issued for any trailer
more than thirty years old, if the trailer, at the time it was
manufactured, was designed to be pulled by a vehicle eligible to
receive a horseless carriage plate under this section and is, while
traveling on public roads, pulled by a vehicle eligible to receive a
horseless carriage plate.
(2) The department may issue special license plates denoting
amateur radio operator status only to persons having a valid official
radio operator license issued by the federal communications commission.
(3) The department shall issue one set of special license plates to
each resident of this state who has been awarded the Congressional
Medal of Honor for use on a passenger vehicle registered to that
person. The department shall issue the plate without the payment of
licensing fees and motor vehicle excise tax.
(4) The department may issue for use on only one motor vehicle
owned by the qualified applicant special license plates denoting that
the recipient of the plate is a survivor of the attack on Pearl Harbor
on December 7, 1941, to persons meeting all of the following criteria:
(a) Is a resident of this state;
(b) Was a member of the United States Armed Forces on December 7,
1941;
(c) Was on station on December 7, 1941, during the hours of 7:55
a.m. to 9:45 a.m. Hawaii time at Pearl Harbor, the island of Oahu, or
offshore at a distance not to exceed three miles;
(d) Received an honorable discharge from the United States Armed
Forces; and
(e) Is certified by a Washington state chapter of the Pearl Harbor
survivors association as satisfying the qualifications in (c) of this
subsection.
The department may issue such plates to the surviving spouse of any
deceased Pearl Harbor survivor who met the requirements of this
subsection. If the surviving spouse remarries, he or she shall return
the special plates to the department within fifteen days and apply for
regular plates. The surviving spouse must be a resident of this state.
The department shall issue these plates upon payment by the
applicant of all other license fees, but the department may not set or
charge an additional fee for these special license plates.
(5) The department shall replace, free of charge, special license
plates issued under subsections (3) and (4) of this section if they are
lost, stolen, damaged, defaced, or destroyed. Such plates shall remain
with the persons upon transfer or other disposition of the vehicle for
which they were initially issued, and may be used on another vehicle
registered to the recipient in accordance with the provisions of RCW
46.16.316(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---