BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advisory committee" means the developmental disabilities
ombudsman consumer advisory committee established in section 4 of this
act.
(2) "Council" means the developmental disabilities council.
(3) "Office" means the office of the ombudsman for persons with
developmental disabilities.
(4) "Ombudsman" means the ombudsman for persons with developmental
disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 An office of the ombudsman for persons with
developmental disabilities is created for the purpose of promoting
public awareness and understanding of developmental disabilities,
identifying system issues, and monitoring and ensuring compliance with
administrative acts, relevant statutes, rules, and policies pertaining
to services for persons with developmental disabilities and to ensure
that services and supports are of good quality and improve a person's
quality of life. The ombudsman shall be an independent function within
state government and shall exercise his or her powers and duties
without interference from either public or private agencies or
organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The council shall select the ombudsman
and contract with a nonprofit agency to house the office. The
ombudsman shall be a person of recognized judgment, independence,
objectivity, and integrity, and shall be qualified by training or
experience, or both, in developmental disability services law, policy,
and advocacy within the system of developmental disabilities services.
Prior to selecting the ombudsman, the council shall consult with, and
may receive recommendations from, the appropriate committees of the
legislature and developmental disabilities stakeholders regarding
candidates for consideration as the ombudsman. The nonprofit agency
housing the office shall: (a) Not be a provider of supports or
services to persons with developmental disabilities; (b) agree to
assume fiduciary responsibility for the office; and (c) agree not to
interfere with the independence of the ombudsman in his or her
performance of the duties set forth in section 4 of this act.
(2) The person selected to be the ombudsman shall hold the position
for a term of five years and shall continue to hold the position until
reappointed or until his or her successor is appointed. The council
may remove the ombudsman only for neglect of duty, misconduct, or
inability to perform duties. Any vacancy shall be filled by similar
selection for the remainder of the unexpired term. The council shall
solicit recommendations from the developmental disabilities ombudsman
advisory committee, established in section 5 of this act, as to whether
or not to reappoint the ombudsman to another five-year term. If the
council decides not to reappoint the ombudsman, the process set forth
in subsection (1) of this section will be used to select a new
ombudsman.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The ombudsman shall perform the following
duties:
(1) Provide information as appropriate on the rights and
responsibilities of individuals with developmental disabilities
receiving services, and on the procedures for providing these services;
(2) Impartially investigate, upon his or her own initiative, or
upon receipt of a complaint, an administrative act alleged to be
contrary to law, rule, or policy, imposed without an adequate statement
of reason, or based on irrelevant, immaterial, or erroneous grounds,
including acts related to the administration of trust funds for special
needs that result from a medical malpractice or personal injury
settlement; develop findings in each case; and, to the extent the
findings favor the complainant with a developmental disability, follow
through on behalf of the complainant to the resolution of the
complaint. However, the ombudsman may decline to investigate any
complaint as provided by rules adopted under this chapter;
(3) Submit a written progress report in formats accessible to
advisory committee members at least two weeks prior to each of four
quarterly meetings of the advisory committee;
(4) Submit an annual report to the governor and the legislature
describing issues and concerns regarding the policies, procedures, and
practices within the developmental disabilities service delivery system
that may need to be addressed through system reform. The developmental
disabilities service delivery system includes but is not limited to
programs or individuals under contract to provide services, state
licensed facilities, and state institutions serving persons with
developmental disabilities.
(5) Grant the appropriate committees of the legislature access to
all relevant records in the possession of the ombudsman unless
prohibited by law; and
(6) Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A developmental disabilities ombudsman
consumer advisory committee of nine people shall be established with a
majority of the composition being individuals with developmental
disabilities or family members of individuals with developmental
disabilities. Five of the members shall be appointed by the governor;
at least one of the governor's appointees shall be an immediate family
member of a person with a developmental disability living in an
institution and at least one of the governor's appointees shall be an
immediate family member of a person with a developmental disability in
a noninstitutional setting. Two of the members shall be appointed by
the council, and two of the members shall be appointed by the
Washington protection and advocacy system. At least one each of the
appointees of the council and the Washington protection and advocacy
system shall be individuals with developmental disabilities. The
advisory committee shall produce an annual written evaluation of the
ombudsman program which shall be approved by a majority of the advisory
committee and submitted to the council no later than August 31st of
each year. Three months prior to the end of the ombudsman term, the
advisory committee shall submit a recommendation to the council as to
whether or not they believe the ombudsman should be reappointed with an
explanation as to why they reached this conclusion. Advisory committee
members shall serve for three-year terms with a limit of two
consecutive terms. Initial members shall be appointed to term lengths
necessary to assure that the terms of three members expire each year.
Members appointed to a vacancy that came about prior to the expiration
of a three-year term shall be appointed to complete that term. Members
who serve less than one-half of their predecessor's term may be
appointed to two more terms. Advisory council meetings shall be open
and allow time for public comment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The ombudsman shall treat all matters under
investigation, including the identities of service recipients,
complainants, and individuals from whom information is acquired, as
confidential, except as far as disclosures may be necessary to enable
the ombudsman to perform the duties of the office and to support any
recommendations resulting from an investigation. Upon receipt of
information that by law is confidential or privileged, the ombudsman
shall maintain the confidentiality of the information and shall not
further disclose or disseminate the information, except as provided by
applicable state or federal law. Investigative records of the office
are confidential and are exempt from public disclosure under chapter
42.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Neither the ombudsman nor the ombudsman's
staff may be compelled, in any judicial or administrative proceeding,
to testify or to produce evidence regarding the exercise of the
official duties of the ombudsman or of the ombudsman's staff. All
related memoranda, work product, notes, and case files of the
ombudsman's office are confidential, are not subject to discovery,
judicial or administrative subpoena, or other method of legal
compulsion, and are not admissible in evidence in a judicial or
administrative proceeding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Identifying information about
complainants or witnesses shall not be subject to any method of legal
compulsion, nor shall such information be revealed to the governor
except under the following circumstances:
(a) The complainant or witness waives confidentiality;
(b) Under a legislative subpoena when there is a legislative
investigation for neglect of duty or misconduct by the ombudsman or
ombudsman's office when the identifying information is necessary to the
investigation of the ombudsman's acts;
(c) Under an investigation or inquiry by the governor as to neglect
of duty or misconduct by the ombudsman or ombudsman's office when the
identifying information is necessary to the investigation of the
ombudsman's acts.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "identifying information"
includes the complainant's or witness's name, location, telephone
number, likeness, social security number or other identification
number, or identification of immediate family members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The privilege described in section 7 of this
act does not apply when:
(1) The ombudsman or ombudsman's staff member has direct knowledge
of an alleged crime, and the testimony, evidence, or discovery sought
is relevant to that allegation;
(2) The ombudsman or a member of the ombudsman's staff has received
a threat of, or becomes aware of a risk of, imminent serious harm to
any person, and the testimony, evidence, or discovery sought is
relevant to that threat or risk; or
(3) The ombudsman has been asked to provide general information
regarding the general operation of, or the general processes employed
at, the ombudsman's office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) An employee of the office is not liable
for good faith performance of responsibilities under this chapter.
(2) No discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory action may be
taken against an employee of the department of social and health
services, an employee of a contracting agency of the department of
social and health services, or a family member or recipient of
developmental disabilities services for any communication made, or
information given or disclosed, to aid the office in carrying out its
responsibilities, unless the communication or information is made,
given, or disclosed maliciously or without good faith. This subsection
is not intended to infringe on the rights of the employer to supervise,
discipline, or terminate an employee for other reasons.
(3) All communications by an ombudsman, if reasonably related to
the requirements of that individual's responsibilities under this
chapter and done in good faith, are privileged under RCW 9.58.070 and
that privilege shall serve as a defense in any action in libel or
slander.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 When the ombudsman or ombudsman's staff
member has reasonable cause to believe that any public official,
employee, or other person has acted in a manner warranting criminal or
disciplinary proceedings, the ombudsman or ombudsman's staff member
shall report the matter, or cause a report to be made, to the
appropriate authorities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The department of social and health
services shall:
(1) Allow the ombudsman or the ombudsman's designee to communicate
privately with any person with developmental disabilities who is
receiving services through the department for the purposes of carrying
out its duties under this chapter;
(2) Permit the ombudsman or the ombudsman's designee physical
access to state institutions serving persons with developmental
disabilities, and state-licensed facilities or residences for the
purposes of carrying out its duties under this chapter; and
(3) Upon the ombudsman's request, grant the ombudsman or the
ombudsman's designee the right to access, inspect, and copy all
relevant information, records, or documents in the possession or
control of the department that the ombudsman considers necessary in an
investigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The ombudsman shall collaborate and have
memoranda of agreement with the long-term care ombudsman, the family
and children ombudsman, the Washington protection and advocacy system,
the mental health ombudsmen, and the special education ombudsman to
clarify authority in those situations where their mandates overlap.
The ombudsman shall report to the legislature on the content of the
memoranda of agreement and how overlapping authority has been clarified
by January 1, 2008.
The ombudsman may recommend changes in the procedures for
addressing the needs of persons with developmental disabilities and
share them with the council and the Washington protection and advocacy
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The ombudsman shall give priority for its
services to clients of the department of social and health services
division of developmental disabilities who are receiving, are eligible
for, or have applied for services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 14 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---