BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a need
to consider statewide standards for adult and juvenile probation
officers supervising adult misdemeanant and juvenile offenders.
While probation officers are required to complete training and
educational requirements provided by the criminal justice and training
commission, currently there are no statewide standards for probation
and no accreditation program in use. The adoption of statewide
standards or an accreditation program for adult and juvenile probation
officers may help to provide improved staff training and development,
better defense against lawsuits through improved documentation,
improved staff morale and professionalism, a safer environment for
staff and offenders, and potentially reduced liability insurance costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington administrative office of
the courts is requested to convene and staff a work group to review
alternatives and recommend statewide standards or an accreditation
program for probation officers who supervise adult misdemeanant
offenders.
(2) The work group should be composed of representatives from:
(a) The district and municipal court judges' association;
(b) The Washington state association of counties;
(c) The association of Washington cities;
(d) The misdemeanant corrections association;
(e) The criminal justice training commission; and
(f) Liability insurance providers for local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Washington administrative office of
the courts is requested to convene and staff a work group to review
alternatives and recommend statewide standards or an accreditation
program for probation officers who supervise juvenile offenders.
(2) The work group should be composed of representatives from:
(a) The Washington association of juvenile court administrators;
(b) The superior court judges' association;
(c) The Washington state association of counties;
(d) The criminal justice training commission; and
(e) Liability insurance providers for local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In reviewing standards or accreditation
options, the work groups should consider:
(1) Defining caseload levels appropriate for each level of
probation officer;
(2) Defining case management and probation services to offenders
referred by a municipal court, district court, or juvenile court;
(3) Defining the types of probation services that are to be
covered, including alternative sentencing programs, such as electronic
home monitoring, community service, day reporting, and other types of
programs as implemented to effectively manage jail or juvenile
detention population;
(4) Specifying appropriate supervisory work responsibilities for
each level of probation officer, including distribution of caseload
functions and court referrals, workload organization and assignment,
monitoring of work completion, recommendations of work procedures,
assisting with hiring and evaluation processes, recommendations for
corrective action, and formulating and making recommendations to the
court on the dispensation of referred cases based on judgment of
individual circumstances;
(5) Defining appropriate case management responsibilities of adult
and juvenile probation officers, including meeting with offenders,
attorneys, and other interested parties; developing individual
treatment plans; performing skills assessment; identifying problems;
performing counseling; assisting probationers with participation in
positive activities; assessing social and psychological dysfunctions;
providing referrals to community services where appropriate; monitoring
compliance and investigating potential or actual violations; conducting
presentencing and postsentencing investigations and reports for the
court; testifying in court regarding probationer status as necessary;
and maintaining records and documentation required by the court or
statutes;
(6) Accreditation standards developed by the American correctional
association and any other appropriate standards in other states; and
(7) Curricula and training needs of adult and juvenile probation
officers to meet proposed standards or accreditation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The work groups are requested to report
their findings and recommendations to the governor and the relevant
committees of the legislature that deal with judiciary issues by
December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act expires December 30, 2008.

--- END ---