BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The liquor control board may issue subpoenas in connection with
any investigation, hearing, or proceeding for the production of books,
records, and documents held under this chapter or chapters 70.155,
70.158, 82.24, and 82.26 RCW, and books and records of common carriers
as defined in RCW 81.80.010, or vehicle rental agencies relating to the
transportation or possession of cigarettes or other tobacco products.
(2) The liquor control board may designate individuals authorized
to sign subpoenas.
(3) If any person is served a subpoena from the board for the
production of records, documents, and books, and fails or refuses to
obey the subpoena for the production of records, documents, and books
when required to do so, the person is subject to proceedings for
contempt, and the board may institute contempt of court proceedings in
the superior court of Thurston county or in the county in which the
person resides.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of obtaining information concerning any matter
relating to the administration or enforcement of this chapter, the
department, the board, or any of its agents may inspect the books,
documents, or records of any person transporting cigarettes for sale to
any person or entity in the state, and books, documents, or records
containing any information relating to the transportation or possession
of cigarettes for sale in the possession of a specific common carrier
as defined in RCW 81.80.010 doing business in this state, or books,
documents, and records of vehicle rental agencies whose vehicles are
being rented for the purpose of transporting contraband cigarettes.
(2) If a person neglects or refuses to produce and submit for
inspection any book, record, or document as required by this section
when requested to do so by the department, the board, or its agent,
then the department or the board may seek an order in superior court
compelling production of the books, records, or documents.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.26.105 and 2005 c 180 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of obtaining information concerning any matter
relating to the administration or enforcement of this chapter, the
department, the board, or any of its agents((,)) may inspect the books,
documents, or records of any person transporting tobacco products for
sale to any person or entity in the state, and books, documents, or
records containing any information relating to the transportation or
possession of tobacco products for sale in the possession of a specific
common carrier as defined in RCW 81.80.010 doing business in this
state, or books, documents, and records of vehicle rental agencies
whose vehicles are being rented for the purpose of transporting
contraband tobacco products.
(2) If a person neglects or refuses to produce and submit for
inspection any book, record, or document as required by this section
when requested to do so by the department, the board, or its agent,
then the department or the board may seek an order in superior court
compelling production of the books, records, or documents.

--- END ---