BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.48.366 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 855 are each amended to
read as follows:
By July 1, 1991, the department, in consultation with the
departments of ((fisheries,)) fish and wildlife((,)) and natural
resources, and the parks and recreation commission, shall adopt rules
establishing a compensation schedule for the discharge of oil in
violation of this chapter and chapter 90.56 RCW. The amount of
compensation assessed under this schedule shall be no less than one
dollar per gallon of oil spilled and no greater than ((fifty)) one
hundred dollars per gallon of oil spilled. The compensation schedule
shall reflect adequate compensation for unquantifiable damages or for
damages not quantifiable at reasonable cost for any adverse
environmental, recreational, aesthetic, or other effects caused by the
spill and shall take into account:
(1) Characteristics of any oil spilled, such as toxicity,
dispersibility, solubility, and persistence, that may affect the
severity of the effects on the receiving environment, living organisms,
and recreational and aesthetic resources;
(2) The sensitivity of the affected area as determined by such
factors as: (a) The location of the spill; (b) habitat and living
resource sensitivity; (c) seasonal distribution or sensitivity of
living resources; (d) areas of recreational use or aesthetic
importance; (e) the proximity of the spill to important habitats for
birds, aquatic mammals, fish, or to species listed as threatened or
endangered under state or federal law; (f) significant archaeological
resources as determined by the ((office)) department of archaeology and
historic preservation; and (g) other areas of special ecological or
recreational importance, as determined by the department((. If the
department has adopted rules for a compensation table prior to July 1,
1992, the sensitivity of significant archaeological resources shall
only be included among factors to be used in the compensation table
when the department revises the rules for the compensation table after
July 1, 1992)); and
(3) Actions taken by the party who spilled oil or any party liable
for the spill that: (a) Demonstrate a recognition and affirmative
acceptance of responsibility for the spill, such as the immediate
removal of oil and the amount of oil removed from the environment; or
(b) enhance or impede the detection of the spill, the determination of
the quantity of oil spilled, or the extent of damage, including the
unauthorized removal of evidence such as injured fish or wildlife.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.48.368 and 1994 c 264 s 92 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules establishing a formal process
for preassessment screening of damages resulting from spills to the
waters of the state causing the death of, or injury to, fish, animals,
vegetation, or other resources of the state. The rules shall specify
the conditions under which the department shall convene a preassessment
screening committee. The preassessment screening process shall occur
concurrently with reconnaissance activities. The committee shall use
information obtained from reconnaissance activities as well as any
other relevant resource and resource use information. For each
incident, the committee shall determine whether a damage assessment
investigation should be conducted, or, whether the compensation
schedule authorized under RCW 90.48.366 and 90.48.367 should be used to
assess damages. The committee may accept restoration or enhancement
projects or studies proposed by the liable parties in lieu of some or
all of: (a) The compensation schedule authorized under RCW 90.48.366
and 90.48.367; or (b) the claims from damage assessment studies
authorized under RCW 90.48.142.
(2) A preassessment screening committee may consist of
representatives of the departments of ecology, archaeology and historic
preservation, fish and wildlife, health, and natural resources,
((social and health services, and emergency management,)) and the parks
and recreation commission, ((the office of archaeology and historic
preservation,)) as well as other federal, state, and local agencies,
and tribal and local governments whose presence would enhance the
reconnaissance or damage assessment aspects of spill response. The
department shall chair the committee and determine which
representatives will be needed on a spill-by-spill basis.
(3) The committee shall consider the following factors when
determining whether a damage assessment study authorized under RCW
90.48.367 should be conducted: (a) Whether evidence from
reconnaissance investigations suggests that injury has occurred or is
likely to occur to publicly owned resources; (b) the potential loss in
services provided by resources injured or likely to be injured and the
expected value of the potential loss; (c) whether a restoration project
to return lost services is technically feasible; (d) the accuracy of
damage quantification methods that could be used and the anticipated
cost-effectiveness of applying each method; (e) the extent to which
likely injury to resources can be verified with available
quantification methods; and (f) whether the injury, once quantified,
can be translated into monetary values with sufficient precision or
accuracy.
(4) When a resource damage assessment is required for an oil spill
in the navigable waters of the state, as defined in RCW 90.56.010, the
state trustee agency responsible for the resource and habitat damaged
shall conduct the damage assessment and pursue all appropriate remedies
with the responsible party.
(5) Oil spill damage assessment studies authorized under RCW
90.48.367 may only be conducted if the committee, after considering the
factors enumerated in subsection (3) of this section, determines that
the damages to be investigated are quantifiable at a reasonable cost
and that proposed assessment studies are clearly linked to
quantification of the damages incurred.
(6) As new information becomes available, the committee may
reevaluate the scope of damage assessment using the factors listed in
subsection (3) of this section and may reduce or expand the scope of
damage assessment as appropriate.
(7) The preassessment screening process shall provide for the
ongoing involvement of persons who may be liable for damages resulting
from an oil spill. The department may negotiate with a potentially
liable party to perform restoration and enhancement projects or studies
which may substitute for all or part of the compensation authorized
under RCW 90.48.366 and 90.48.367 or the damage assessment studies
authorized under RCW 90.48.367.
(8) For the purposes of this section and RCW 90.48.367, the cost of
a damage assessment shall be considered "reasonable" when the
anticipated cost of the damage assessment is expected to be less than
the anticipated damage that may have occurred or may occur.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.56.330 and 1992 c 73 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in RCW 90.56.390, any person who
negligently discharges oil, or causes or permits the entry of the same,
shall incur, in addition to any other penalty as provided by law, a
penalty in an amount of up to ((twenty)) one hundred thousand dollars
for every such violation, and for each day the spill poses risks to the
environment as determined by the director. Any person who
intentionally or recklessly discharges or causes or permits the entry
of oil into the waters of the state shall incur, in addition to any
other penalty authorized by law, a penalty of up to ((one)) five
hundred thousand dollars for every such violation and for each day the
spill poses risks to the environment as determined by the director.
The amount of the penalty shall be determined by the director after
taking into consideration the size of the business of the violator, the
gravity of the violation, the previous record of the violator in
complying, or failing to comply, with the provisions of chapter 90.48
RCW, the speed and thoroughness of the collection and removal of the
oil, and such other considerations as the director deems appropriate.
Every act of commission or omission which procures, aids or abets in
the violation shall be considered a violation under the provisions of
this section and subject to the penalty herein provided for. The
penalty herein provided for shall be imposed pursuant to RCW
43.21B.300.

--- END ---