BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the oil spill
advisory council was created by an act of the legislature in 2005.
(2) The legislature further finds that the oil spill advisory
council has successfully fulfilled its initial charge to deliver to the
governor and the legislature recommendations for the long-term funding
of the council's activities and for sustainable funding for oil spill
prevention, preparedness, and response activities.
(3) The intent of this act is to enact those recommendations of the
oil spill advisory council that require legislative action so that
Washington is in the best possible position to prevent and respond to
oil spills in all of Washington's waters, including the Columbia river,
the Pacific Ocean, the Strait of Juan de Fuca, and the Puget Sound.
Fully enacting the recommendations of the oil spill advisory council
requires the identification of revenue to support the state's oil spill
programs, which includes consistent and continued funding for a
contingency tug program, a permanent rescue tug at Neah Bay, the
activities of the permanent oil spill advisory council, and
contributions to the ongoing efforts to remove leaking derelict vessels
from Washington's treasured and valued waterways.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.23B.020 and 2006 c 256 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An oil spill response tax is imposed on the privilege of
receiving crude oil or petroleum products at a marine terminal within
this state from a waterborne vessel or barge operating on the navigable
waters of this state, regardless of whether the petroleum products are
subsequently exported from or sold for export from the state. The tax
imposed in this section is levied upon the owner of the crude oil or
petroleum products immediately after receipt of the same into the
storage tanks of a marine terminal from a waterborne vessel or barge
((at)). Except as provided in section 4 of this act, the tax imposed
in this subsection shall be at the rate of one cent per barrel of crude
oil or petroleum product received.
(2) In addition to the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this
section, an oil spill administration tax is imposed on the privilege of
receiving crude oil or petroleum products at a marine terminal within
this state from a waterborne vessel or barge operating on the navigable
waters of this state, regardless of whether the petroleum products are
subsequently exported from or sold for export from the state. The tax
imposed in this section is levied upon the owner of the crude oil or
petroleum products immediately after receipt of the same into the
storage tanks of a marine terminal from a waterborne vessel or barge
((at)). Except as provided in section 4 of this act, the tax imposed
in this subsection shall be at the rate of four cents per barrel of
crude oil or petroleum product received.
(3) The taxes imposed by this chapter shall be collected by the
marine terminal operator from the taxpayer. If any person charged with
collecting the taxes fails to bill the taxpayer for the taxes, or in
the alternative has not notified the taxpayer in writing of the
imposition of the taxes, or having collected the taxes, fails to pay
them to the department in the manner prescribed by this chapter,
whether such failure is the result of the person's own acts or the
result of acts or conditions beyond the person's control, he or she
shall, nevertheless, be personally liable to the state for the amount
of the taxes. Payment of the taxes by the owner to a marine terminal
operator shall relieve the owner from further liability for the taxes.
(4) Taxes collected under this chapter shall be held in trust until
paid to the department. Any person collecting the taxes who
appropriates or converts the taxes collected shall be guilty of a gross
misdemeanor if the money required to be collected is not available for
payment on the date payment is due. The taxes required by this chapter
to be collected shall be stated separately from other charges made by
the marine terminal operator in any invoice or other statement of
account provided to the taxpayer.
(5) If a taxpayer fails to pay the taxes imposed by this chapter to
the person charged with collection of the taxes and the person charged
with collection fails to pay the taxes to the department, the
department may, in its discretion, proceed directly against the
taxpayer for collection of the taxes.
(6) The taxes shall be due from the marine terminal operator, along
with reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department, within
twenty-five days after the end of the month in which the taxable
activity occurs.
(7) The amount of taxes, until paid by the taxpayer to the marine
terminal operator or to the department, shall constitute a debt from
the taxpayer to the marine terminal operator. Any person required to
collect the taxes under this chapter who, with intent to violate the
provisions of this chapter, fails or refuses to do so as required and
any taxpayer who refuses to pay any taxes due under this chapter, shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(8) Upon prior approval of the department, the taxpayer may pay the
taxes imposed by this chapter directly to the department. The
department shall give its approval for direct payment under this
section whenever it appears, in the department's judgment, that direct
payment will enhance the administration of the taxes imposed under this
chapter. The department shall provide by rule for the issuance of a
direct payment certificate to any taxpayer qualifying for direct
payment of the taxes. Good faith acceptance of a direct payment
certificate by a terminal operator shall relieve the marine terminal
operator from any liability for the collection or payment of the taxes
imposed under this chapter.
(9)(a) All receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this
section shall be deposited into the state oil spill response account
created in RCW 90.56.500.
(b) All receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (2) of this
section shall be deposited into the oil spill prevention account
created in RCW 90.56.510.
(((10) Within forty-five days after the end of each calendar
quarter, the office of financial management shall determine the balance
of the oil spill response account as of the last day of that calendar
quarter. Balance determinations by the office of financial management
under this section are final and shall not be used to challenge the
validity of any tax imposed under this chapter. The office of
financial management shall promptly notify the departments of revenue
and ecology of the account balance once a determination is made. For
each subsequent calendar quarter, the tax imposed by subsection (1) of
this section shall be imposed during the entire calendar quarter
unless:
(a) Tax was imposed under subsection (1) of this section during the
immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent quarterly
balance is more than nine million dollars; or
(b) Tax was not imposed under subsection (1) of this section during
the immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent
quarterly balance is more than eight million dollars.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.23B RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall collect a risk-based oil spill prevention
and response service transfer tax each time any refined oil product is
transferred from or to a vessel on, over, or near the waters of the
state.
(2) The risk-based oil spill prevention and response service
transfer tax shall be collected from the transferor based on the volume
of refined oil product transferred by the transferor over an identified
reporting period established by the department.
(3)(a) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, the risk-based
oil spill prevention and response service transfer tax is to be
collected at a rate of five cents per barrel of refined oil product
transferred.
(b) The department may assess the risk-based oil spill prevention
and response service transfer tax on a per gallon basis if the director
of the department concludes that a per gallon collection creates
administrative streamlining for the department or for the transferor.
If the department collects the fee on a per gallon basis, then the per
gallon amount collected must be forty-two one-hundredths of the per
barrel amount established in (a) of this subsection.
(4) The risk-based oil spill prevention and response service
transfer tax collected under this section must be deposited into the
state oil spill prevention account created in RCW 90.56.510.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.23B RCW
to read as follows:
On July 1, 2009, and at the end of each fiscal biennium thereafter,
the following taxes shall increase by the fiscal growth factor
identified in chapter 43.135 RCW:
(1) The risk-based oil spill prevention and response service
transfer tax created in section 3 of this act;
(2) The oil spill response tax created in RCW 82.23B.020; and
(3) The oil spill administration tax created in RCW 82.23B.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.56 RCW
to read as follows:
If funding from the oil spill prevention account created in RCW
90.56.510 or from another source allows, the department shall enter
into a contract or contracts that allow it to manage a continency tug
program. The program must enable the department to periodically
authorize the placement of rescue or response tugs in strategic
locations as needed to protect Washington's waters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If funding from the oil spill prevention account created in RCW
90.56.510 or from another source allows, the department shall enter
into a contract or contracts to provide for a permanently stationed,
year-round rescue tug located in the western Strait of Juan de Fuca.
The tug shall have the primary mission to stand by and, when needed,
respond and provide towing services to disabled or drifting vessels in
order to prevent pollution events.
(2) The department shall give contracting preference to vessels of
sufficient power, maneuverability, and deck configuration to enable it
to respond in a timely manner to any vessel located within the response
area in sea-state conditions up to and including extreme weather.
Additional contracting preference must be given to vessels that have
the capability to provide spill response, firefighting, and early
salvage activities.

Sec. 7 RCW 90.56.500 and 1991 c 200 s 805 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state oil spill response account is created in the state
treasury. The following must be deposited into the account:
(a) All receipts from the oil spill response tax created in RCW
82.23B.020(1) ((shall be deposited in the account.));
(b) All costs reimbursed to the state by a responsible party or any
other person for responding to a spill of oil ((shall also be deposited
in the account)).
(2) Moneys in the account shall be spent only after appropriation.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(3)(a) The account shall be used exclusively to pay for the costs
associated with the response to spills of crude oil or petroleum
products into the navigable waters of the state. Payment of response
costs under this section shall be limited to spills which the director
has determined are likely to exceed fifty thousand dollars. Before
expending moneys from the account, the director shall make reasonable
efforts to obtain funding for response costs from the person
responsible for the spill and from other sources, including the federal
government.
(b) Reimbursement for response costs shall be allowed only for
costs which are not covered by funds appropriated to the agencies
responsible for response activities. Costs associated with the
response to spills of crude oil or petroleum products shall include:
(((1))) (i) Natural resource damage assessment and related
activities;
(((2))) (ii) Spill related response, containment, wildlife rescue,
cleanup, disposal, and associated costs;
(((3))) (iii) Interagency coordination and public information
related to a response; and
(((4))) (iv) Appropriate travel, goods and services, contracts, and
equipment.
(4) Any funds available in the account above nine million dollars
at the end of any fiscal year must be transferred to the oil spill
prevention account created in RCW 90.56.510.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.56.510 and 2000 c 69 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The oil spill prevention account is created in the state
treasury. The following must be deposited into the account:
(a) All receipts from the oil spill administration tax created in
RCW 82.23B.020(2) ((shall be deposited in the account.));
(b) All receipts from the risk-based oil spill prevention and
response service transfer tax created in section 3 of this act;
(c) Transfers by the state treasurer from the oil spill response
account under RCW 90.56.500; and
(d) All direct legislative appropriations intended to fund
Washington's oil spill prevention, preparedness, and response program.
(2) Moneys from the account may be spent only after appropriation.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
((If, on the first day of any calendar month, the balance of the oil
spill response account is greater than nine million dollars and the
balance of the oil spill prevention account exceeds the unexpended
appropriation for the current biennium, then the tax under RCW
82.23B.020(2) shall be suspended on the first day of the next calendar
month until the beginning of the following biennium, provided that the
tax shall not be suspended during the last six months of the biennium.
If the tax imposed under RCW 82.23B.020(2) is suspended during two
consecutive biennia, the department shall by November 1st after the end
of the second biennium, recommend to the appropriate standing
committees an adjustment in the tax rate. For the biennium ending June
30, 1999, and the biennium ending June 30, 2001, the state treasurer
may transfer a total of up to one million dollars from the oil spill
response account to the oil spill prevention account to support
appropriations made from the oil spill prevention account in the
omnibus appropriations act adopted not later than June 30, 1999.
(2))) (3) Expenditures from the oil spill prevention account shall
be used exclusively for the following:
(a) To pay for the contingency tug requirements of section 5 of
this act;
(b) To pay for the rescue tug requirements of section 6 of this
act;
(c) To pay for the administration and operations of the oil spill
advisory council created in RCW 90.56.120;
(d) To pay for the removal of abandoned or derelict vessels
consistent with chapter 79.100 RCW through fund transfers to the
derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100;
(e) To pay for the administrative costs related to the purposes of
this chapter, and chapters 90.48, 88.40, and 88.46 RCW((. Starting
with the 1995-1997 biennium, the legislature shall give activities of
state agencies related to prevention of oil spills priority in funding
from the oil spill prevention account.)); and
(f) To pay for the costs of other oil spill prevention ((include))
activities, including the costs of:
(((a))) (i) Routine responses not covered under RCW 90.56.500;
(((b))) (ii) Management and staff development activities;
(((c))) (iii) Development of rules and policies and the statewide
plan provided for in RCW 90.56.060;
(((d))) (iv) Facility and vessel plan review and approval, drills,
inspections, investigations, enforcement, and litigation;
(((e))) (v) Interagency coordination and public outreach and
education;
(((f))) (vi) Collection and administration of the tax provided for
in chapter 82.23B RCW; and
(((g))) (vii) Appropriate travel, goods and services, contracts,
and equipment.
(4) The first one million dollars available in the oil spill
prevention account each biennium must be used for the purposes
authorized in subsection (3)(a) of this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 79.100.100 and 2006 c 153 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The derelict vessel removal account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from RCW 79.100.050 and 79.100.060 and those
moneys specified in RCW 88.02.030 and 88.02.050 must be deposited into
the account. The account is authorized to receive fund transfers from
the general fund or the oil spill response account created in RCW
90.56.500 as well as gifts, grants, and endowments from public or
private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of this chapter and
expend the same or any income according to the terms of the gifts,
grants, or endowments provided those terms do not conflict with any
provisions of this section or any guidelines developed to prioritize
reimbursement of removal projects associated with this chapter.
(b) Moneys in the account may only be spent after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account shall be used by the department to
reimburse authorized public entities for up to ninety percent of the
total reasonable and auditable administrative, removal, disposal, and
environmental damage costs of abandoned or derelict vessels when the
previous owner is either unknown after a reasonable search effort or
insolvent. Costs associated with removal and disposal of an abandoned
or derelict vessel under the authority granted in RCW 53.08.320 also
qualify for reimbursement from the derelict vessel removal account.
(c) In each biennium, up to twenty percent of the expenditures from
the account may be used for administrative expenses of the department
of licensing and department of natural resources in implementing this
chapter.
(2) If the balance of the account reaches one million dollars as of
March 1st of any year, exclusive of any fund transfers from the general
fund or the oil spill prevention account, the department must notify
the department of licensing and the collection of any fees associated
with this account must be suspended for the following fiscal year.
(3) Priority for use of this account is for the removal of derelict
and abandoned vessels that are in danger of sinking, breaking up, or
blocking navigation channels, or that present environmental risks such
as leaking fuel or other hazardous substances. The department must
develop criteria, in the form of informal guidelines, to prioritize
removal projects associated with this chapter, but may not consider
whether the applicant is a state or local entity when prioritizing.
The guidelines must also include guidance to the authorized public
entities as to what removal activities and associated costs are
reasonable and eligible for reimbursement.
(4) The department must keep all authorized public entities
apprized of the balance of the derelict vessel removal account and the
funds available for reimbursement. The guidelines developed by the
department must also be made available to the other authorized public
entities. This subsection (4) must be satisfied by utilizing the least
costly method, including maintaining the information on the
department's internet web site, or any other cost-effective method.
(5) An authorized public entity may contribute its ten percent of
costs that are not eligible for reimbursement by using in-kind
services, including the use of existing staff, equipment, and
volunteers.
(6) This chapter does not guarantee reimbursement for an authorized
public entity. Authorized public entities seeking certainty in
reimbursement prior to taking action under this chapter may first
notify the department of their proposed action and the estimated total
costs. Upon notification by an authorized public entity, the
department must make the authorized public entity aware of the status
of the fund and the likelihood of reimbursement being available. The
department may offer technical assistance and assure reimbursement for
up to two years following the removal action if an assurance is
appropriate given the balance of the fund and the details of the
proposed action.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.23B.010 and 1992 c 73 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Barrel" means a unit of measurement of volume equal to forty-two United States gallons of crude oil or petroleum product.
(2) "Crude oil" means any naturally occurring liquid hydrocarbons
at atmospheric temperature and pressure coming from the earth,
including condensate and natural gasoline.
(3) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(4) "Marine terminal" means a facility of any kind, other than a
waterborne vessel, that is used for transferring crude oil or petroleum
products to or from a waterborne vessel or barge.
(5) "Navigable waters" means those waters of the state and their
adjoining shorelines that are subject to the ebb and flow of the tide,
including the Columbia and Snake rivers.
(6) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(7) "Petroleum product" means any liquid hydrocarbons at
atmospheric temperature and pressure that are the product of the
fractionation, distillation, or other refining or processing of crude
oil, and that are used as, useable as, or may be refined as a fuel or
fuel blendstock, including but not limited to, gasoline, diesel fuel,
aviation fuel, bunker fuel, and fuels containing a blend of alcohol and
petroleum.
(8) "Refined oil product" has the same meaning given to the term
"oil" in RCW 90.56.010, except that the term refined oil product does
not include crude oil that has not been subject to any processing or
refining.
(9) "Taxpayer" means the person owning crude oil or petroleum
products immediately after receipt of the same into the storage tanks
of a marine terminal in this state from a waterborne vessel or barge
and who is liable for the taxes imposed by this chapter.
(((9))) (10) "Waterborne vessel or barge" means any ship, barge, or
other watercraft capable of travelling on the navigable waters of this
state and capable of transporting any crude oil or petroleum product in
quantities of ten thousand gallons or more for purposes other than
providing fuel for its motor or engine.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.23B.030 and 1992 c 73 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The taxes imposed under ((this chapter)) RCW 82.23B.020 shall only
apply to the first receipt of crude oil or petroleum products at a
marine terminal in this state and not to the later transporting and
subsequent receipt of the same oil or petroleum product, whether in the
form originally received at a marine terminal in this state or after
refining or other processing.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.23B.045 and 1992 c 73 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person having paid the tax imposed by ((this chapter)) RCW
82.23B.020 who uses petroleum products as a consumer, as that term is
defined in RCW 82.04.190, for a purpose other than as a fuel may claim
refund or credit against the tax imposed under ((this chapter)) RCW
82.23B.020. ((For this purpose, the term consumer shall be defined as
provided in RCW 82.04.190.))
(2) Any person having paid the tax imposed by ((this chapter)) RCW
82.23B.020 who uses petroleum products as a component or ingredient in
the manufacture of an item which is not a fuel may claim a refund or
credit against the tax imposed by ((this chapter)) RCW 82.23B.020.
(3) The amount of refund or credit claimed under this section may
not exceed the amount of tax paid by the person making such claim on
the petroleum products so consumed or used. The refund or credit
allowed by this section shall be claimed on such forms and subject to
such requirements as the department may prescribe by rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 90.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of ecology and the department of revenue may adopt
rules necessary for its implementation of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 RCW 82.23B.040 (Credit -- Crude oil or
petroleum exported or sold for export) and 1992 c 73 s 10 & 1991 c 200
s 804 are each repealed.

--- END ---