BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.150.010 and 1988 c 240 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have
the following meanings:)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Self-service storage facility" means any real property
designed and used for the purpose of renting or leasing individual
storage space to occupants who are to have access to the space for the
purpose of storing and removing personal property on a self-service
basis, but does not include a garage or other storage area in a private
residence. No occupant may use a self-service storage facility for
residential purposes.
(2) "Owner" means the owner, operator, lessor, or sublessor of a
self-service storage facility, his or her agent, or any other person
authorized by him or her to manage the facility, or to receive rent
from an occupant under a rental agreement.
(3) "Occupant" means a person, or his or her sublessee, successor,
or assign, who is entitled to the use of the storage space at a self-service storage facility under a rental agreement, to the exclusion of
others.
(4) "Rental agreement" means any written agreement or lease which
establishes or modifies the terms, conditions, rules or any other
provision concerning the use and occupancy of a self-service storage
facility.
(5) "Personal property" means movable property not affixed to land,
and includes, but is not limited to, goods, merchandise, furniture, and
household items.
(6) "Last known address" means that address provided by the
occupant in the latest rental agreement, or the address provided by the
occupant in a subsequent written notice of a change of address.
(7) "Reasonable manner" means to dispose of personal property by
donation to a not-for-profit charitable organization, removal of the
personal property from the self-service storage facility by a trash
hauler or recycler, or any other method that in the discretion of the
owner is reasonable under the circumstances.
(8) "Commercially reasonable manner" means a public sale of the
personal property in the self-storage space. The personal property may
be sold in the owner's discretion on or off the self-service storage
facility site as a single lot or in parcels. If five or more bidders
are in attendance at a public sale of the personal property, the
proceeds received are deemed to be commercially reasonable.
(9) "Costs of the sale" means reasonable costs directly incurred by
the delivering or sending of notices, advertising, accessing,
inventorying, auctioning, conducting a public sale, removing, and
disposing of property stored in a self-service storage facility.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.150.040 and 1988 c 240 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
When any part of the rent or other charges due from an occupant
remains unpaid for fourteen consecutive days, an owner may terminate
the right of the occupant to the use of the storage space at a self-service storage facility by sending a preliminary lien notice to the
occupant's last known address, and to the alternative address specified
in RCW 19.150.120(2), by first class mail, postage prepaid, containing
all of the following:
(1) An itemized statement of the owner's claim showing the sums due
at the time of the notice and the date when the sums become due.
(2) A statement that the occupant's right to use the storage space
will terminate on a specified date (not less than fourteen days after
the mailing of the notice) unless all sums due and to become due by
that date are paid by the occupant prior to the specified date.
(3) A notice that the occupant may be denied or continue to be
denied, as the case may be, access to the storage space after the
termination date if the sums are not paid, and that an owner's lien, as
provided for in RCW 19.150.020 may be imposed thereafter.
(4) The name, street address, and telephone number of the owner, or
his or her designated agent, whom the occupant may contact to respond
to the notice.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.150.060 and 1996 c 220 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a notice has been sent, as required by RCW 19.150.040, and the
total sum due has not been paid as of the date specified in the
preliminary lien notice, the lien proposed by this notice attaches as
of that date and the owner may deny an occupant access to the space,
enter the space, inventory the goods therein, and remove any property
found therein to a place of safe keeping. The owner shall then serve
by personal service or send to the occupant, addressed to the
occupant's last known address and to the alternative address specified
in RCW 19.150.120(2) by certified mail, postage prepaid, a notice of
final lien sale or final notice of ((disposal)) disposition which shall
state all of the following:
(1) That the occupant's right to use the storage space has
terminated and that the occupant no longer has access to the stored
property.
(2) That the stored property is subject to a lien, and the amount
of the lien accrued and to accrue prior to the date required to be
specified in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) That all the property, other than personal papers and personal
((effects)) photographs, may be sold to satisfy the lien after a
specified date which is not less than fourteen days from the date of
mailing the final lien sale notice, or a minimum of forty-two days
after the date when any part of the rent or other charges due from the
occupants remain unpaid, whichever is later, unless the amount of the
lien is paid. The owner is not required to sell the personal property
within a maximum number of days of when the rent or other charges first
became due. If the total value of property in the storage space is
less than three hundred dollars, the owner may, instead of sale,
dispose of the property in any reasonable manner, subject to the
restrictions of RCW 19.150.080(4). After the sale or other disposition
pursuant to this section has been completed, the owner shall provide an
accounting of the disposition of the proceeds of the sale or other
disposition to the occupant at the occupant's last known address and at
the alternative address.
(4) That any excess proceeds of the sale or other disposition under
RCW 19.150.080(2) over the lien amount and reasonable costs of sale
will be retained by the owner and may be reclaimed by the occupant, or
claimed by another person, at any time for a period of six months from
the sale and that thereafter the proceeds will be turned over to the
state as abandoned property as provided in RCW 63.29.165.
(5) That any personal papers and personal ((effects)) photographs
will be retained by the owner and may be reclaimed by the occupant at
any time for a period of six months from the sale or other disposition
of property and that thereafter the owner may dispose of the personal
papers and ((effects)) photographs in a reasonable manner, subject to
the restrictions of RCW 19.150.080(3).
(6) That the occupant has no right to repurchase any property sold
at the lien sale.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.150.070 and 1988 c 240 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The owner, subject to RCW 19.150.090 and 19.150.100, may sell the
property, other than personal papers and personal ((effects))
photographs, upon complying with the requirements set forth in RCW
19.150.080.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.150.080 and 1996 c 220 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After the expiration of the time given in the final notice of
lien sale pursuant to RCW 19.150.060, the property, other than personal
papers and personal ((effects)) photographs, may be sold or disposed of
in a reasonable manner as provided in this section.
(2)(a) If the property has a value of three hundred dollars or
more, the sale shall be conducted in a commercially reasonable manner,
and, after ((deducting the amount of the lien and costs of sale))
applying the proceeds to costs of the sale and then to the amount of
the lien, the owner shall retain any excess proceeds of the sale on the
occupant's behalf. The occupant, or any other person having a court
order or other judicial process against the property, may claim the
excess proceeds, or a portion thereof sufficient to satisfy the
particular claim, at any time within six months of the date of sale.
(b) If the property has a value of less than three hundred dollars,
the property may be disposed of in a reasonable manner.
(3) Personal papers and personal ((effects)) photographs that are
not reclaimed by the occupant within six months of a sale under
subsection (2)(a) of this section or other disposition under subsection
(2)(b) of this section may be disposed of in a reasonable manner.
(4) No employee or owner, or family member of an employee or owner,
may acquire, directly or indirectly, the property sold pursuant to
subsection (2)(a) of this section or disposed of pursuant to subsection
(2)(b) of this section, or personal papers and personal ((effects))
photographs disposed of under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The owner is entitled to retain any interest earned on the
excess proceeds until the excess proceeds are claimed by another person
or are turned over to the state as abandoned property pursuant to RCW
63.29.165.
(((6) After the sale or other disposition pursuant to this section
has been completed, the owner shall provide an accounting of the
disposition of the proceeds of the sale or other disposition to the
occupant at the occupant's last known address and at the alternative
address.))

Sec. 6 RCW 19.150.100 and 1988 c 240 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Prior to any sale pursuant to RCW 19.150.080, any person claiming
a right to the ((goods)) personal property may pay the amount necessary
to satisfy the lien ((and the reasonable expenses incurred for
particular actions taken pursuant to this chapter)) and one month's
rent in advance. In that event, the ((goods shall)) personal property
may not be sold, but ((shall)) must be retained by the owner ((subject
to the terms of this chapter)) pending a court order directing ((a
particular)) the disposition of the personal property. If such an
order is not obtained within thirty days of the original payment, the
claimant must pay the monthly rental charge for the space where the
personal property is stored. If rent is not paid, the owner may sell
or dispose of the personal property in accordance with RCW 19.150.080.
The owner has no liability to a claimant who fails to secure a court
order in a timely manner or pay the required rental charge for any sale
or other disposition of the personal property.

--- END ---