BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.24 RCW
to read as follows:
When, in the judgment of the filing officer, two or more candidates
have filed for the same office whose names are so similar as to be
confusing to voters, he or she shall differentiate all candidates for
that office, including the candidates that do not have the same or
similar names, by the inclusion of additional information in connection
with each name that will appear on the ballot. Such differentiation
may be made by the inclusion of each candidate's occupation, status as
incumbent or challenger, or by any other means which, in the judgment
of the filing officer, fairly and impartially distinguishes the
candidates. The filing officer may solicit suggestions and input from
the candidates to resolve the situation.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.04.611 and 2006 c 207 s 1 and 2006 c 206 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The secretary of state as chief election officer shall make
reasonable rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW not inconsistent
with the federal and state election laws to effectuate any provision of
this title and to facilitate the execution of its provisions in an
orderly, timely, and uniform manner relating to any federal, state,
county, city, town, and district elections. To that end the secretary
shall assist local election officers by devising uniform forms and
procedures.
In addition to the rule-making authority granted otherwise by this
section, the secretary of state shall make rules governing the
following provisions:
(1) The maintenance of voter registration records;
(2) The preparation, maintenance, distribution, review, and filing
of precinct maps;
(3) Standards for the design, layout, and production of ballots;
(4) The examination and testing of voting systems for
certification;
(5) The source and scope of independent evaluations of voting
systems that may be relied upon in certifying voting systems for use in
this state;
(6) Standards and procedures for the acceptance testing of voting
systems by counties;
(7) Standards and procedures for testing the programming of vote
tallying software for specific primaries and elections;
(8) Standards and procedures for the preparation and use of each
type of certified voting system including procedures for the operation
of counting centers where vote tallying systems are used;
(9) Standards and procedures to ensure the accurate tabulation and
canvassing of ballots;
(10) Consistency among the counties of the state in the preparation
of ballots, the operation of vote tallying systems, and the canvassing
of primaries and elections;
(11) Procedures to ensure the secrecy of a voter's ballot when a
small number of ballots are counted at the polls or at a counting
center;
(12) The use of substitute devices or means of voting when a voting
device at the polling place is found to be defective, the counting of
votes cast on the defective device, the counting of votes cast on the
substitute device, and the documentation that must be submitted to the
county auditor regarding such circumstances;
(13) Procedures for the transportation of sealed containers of
voted ballots or sealed voting devices;
(14) The acceptance and filing of documents via electronic
facsimile;
(15) Voter registration applications and records;
(16) The use of voter registration information in the conduct of
elections;
(17) The coordination, delivery, and processing of voter
registration records accepted by driver licensing agents or the
department of licensing;
(18) The coordination, delivery, and processing of voter
registration records accepted by agencies designated by the governor to
provide voter registration services;
(19) Procedures to receive and distribute voter registration
applications by mail;
(20) Procedures for a voter to change his or her voter registration
address within a county by telephone;
(21) Procedures for a voter to change the name under which he or
she is registered to vote;
(22) Procedures for canceling dual voter registration records and
for maintaining records of persons whose voter registrations have been
canceled;
(23) Procedures for the electronic transfer of voter registration
records between county auditors and the office of the secretary of
state;
(24) Procedures and forms for declarations of candidacy;
(25) Procedures and requirements for the acceptance and filing of
declarations of candidacy by electronic means;
(26) ((Procedures for the circumstance in which two or more
candidates have a name similar in sound or spelling so as to cause
confusion for the voter;
(27))) Filing for office;
(((28))) (27) The order of positions and offices on a ballot;
(((29))) (28) Sample ballots;
(((30))) (29) Independent evaluations of voting systems;
(((31))) (30) The testing, approval, and certification of voting
systems;
(((32))) (31) The testing of vote tallying software programming;
(((33))) (32) Standards and procedures to prevent fraud and to
facilitate the accurate processing and canvassing of absentee ballots
and mail ballots, including standards for the approval and
implementation of hardware and software for automated signature
verification systems;
(((34))) (33) Standards and procedures to guarantee the secrecy of
absentee ballots and mail ballots;
(((35))) (34) Uniformity among the counties of the state in the
conduct of absentee voting and mail ballot elections;
(((36))) (35) Standards and procedures to accommodate out-of-state
voters, overseas voters, and service voters;
(((37))) (36) The tabulation of paper ballots before the close of
the polls;
(((38))) (37) The accessibility of polling places and registration
facilities that are accessible to elderly and disabled persons;
(((39))) (38) The aggregation of precinct results if reporting the
results of a single precinct could jeopardize the secrecy of a person's
ballot;
(((40))) (39) Procedures for conducting a statutory recount;
(((41))) (40) Procedures for filling vacancies in congressional
offices if the general statutory time requirements for availability of
absentee ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures
cannot be met;
(((42))) (41) Procedures for the statistical sampling of signatures
for purposes of verifying and canvassing signatures on initiative,
referendum, and recall election petitions;
(((43))) (42) Standards and deadlines for submitting material to
the office of the secretary of state for the voters' pamphlet;
(((44))) (43) Deadlines for the filing of ballot titles for
referendum bills and constitutional amendments if none have been
provided by the legislature;
(((45))) (44) Procedures for the publication of a state voters'
pamphlet;
(((46))) (45) Procedures for conducting special elections regarding
nuclear waste sites if the general statutory time requirements for
availability of absentee ballots, certification, canvassing, and
related procedures cannot be met;
(((47))) (46) Procedures for conducting partisan primary elections;
(((48))) (47) Standards and procedures for the proper conduct of
voting during the early voting period to provide accessability for the
blind or visually impaired;
(((49))) (48) Standards for voting technology and systems used by
the state or any political subdivision to be accessible for individuals
with disabilities, including nonvisual accessibility for the blind and
visually impaired, in a manner that provides the same opportunity for
access and participation, including privacy and independence, as other
voters;
(((50))) (49) All data formats for transferring voter registration
data on electronic or machine-readable media for the purpose of
administering the statewide voter registration list required by the
Help America Vote Act (P.L. 107-252);
(((51))) (50) Defining the interaction of electronic voter
registration election management systems employed by each county
auditor to maintain a local copy of each county's portion of the
official state list of registered voters;
(((52))) (51) Provisions and procedures to implement the state-based administrative complaint procedure as required by the Help
America Vote Act (P.L. 107-252);
(((53))) (52) Facilitating the payment of local government grants
to local government election officers or vendors; and
(((54))) (53) Standards for the verification of signatures on
absentee, mail, and provisional ballot envelopes.

--- END ---