BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The salmon and watershed planning
integration work group is established. The work group consists of:
(a) One member of each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate; (b) one member of each of the
two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives; (c) two elected officials from
watershed planning groups, one appointed by the president of the senate
and one appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and
(d) two elected officials from salmon recovery entities, one appointed
by the president of the senate and one appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives.
(2) The work group shall:
(a) Review the current status of salmon recovery and watershed
entities, plans, and projects, including but not limited to plans and
projects developed under chapters 77.85 and 90.82 RCW;
(b) Review the organizational structure and governance of entities
preparing or implementing salmon recovery or watershed plans or
projects;
(c) Make recommendations, if any, regarding salmon recovery and
watershed entities, plans, and projects in order to integrate such
plans and projects or to otherwise improve planning and project
administration;
(d) Make recommendations, if any, for state incentives to achieve
greater integration of salmon recovery and watershed entities, plans,
and projects.
(3) The work group may:
(a) Review the current sources and uses of funding for
administration, operations, planning, and project implementation;
(b) Work with the Puget Sound partnership if reviewing the Puget
Sound watersheds and jointly develop recommendations specific to Puget
Sound, to coincide with timelines and requirements for the Puget Sound
partnership, created by chapter . . ., (Senate Bill No. 5372), Laws of
2007;
(c) If appropriate, recommend changes to the current organizational
structures, to improve administration of these entities and to foster
integration of plans and projects into a comprehensive approach to
watershed health and salmon recovery at the watershed level; or
(d) Recommend actions to improve the utilization and the allocation
of mitigation funding on a watershed basis, consistent with the state's
policies and programs for optimizing mitigation projects.
(4) The work group shall report its recommendations, if any, in the
form of draft legislation to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by November 1, 2008.
(5)(a) Senate committee services and the office of program research
must provide staff to the work group.
(b) Legislative members of the work group will be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2009.

--- END ---