BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A public school or private school that has paid the tax levied
by RCW 82.08.020 on heating oil used as the only fuel for heating
purposes is eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance. The
amount of the remittance is computed under subsection (3) of this
section and is based on the state share of sales tax.
(2) For the purposes of this section and section 2 of this act, the
following definitions apply:
(a) "Public school" means public schools as defined in RCW
28A.150.010.
(b) "Private school" means nonpublic schools, including parochial
or independent schools or school districts, carrying out a program for
any or all of the grades one through twelve, which have been approved
by the Washington state board of education.
(3)(a) A public school or private school claiming an exemption from
state tax in the form of a remittance under this section must pay the
tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020. The school may then apply to the
department for remittance of all of the tax paid under RCW 82.08.020.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the public school or private school
and through audit and other administrative records.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying public schools or private schools that submitted
applications during the previous quarter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A public school or private school that has paid the tax levied
by RCW 82.12.020 on heating oil used as the only fuel for heating
purposes is eligible for an exemption on tax paid in the form of a
remittance. The amount of the remittance is computed under subsection
(2) of this section and is based on the state share of use tax.
(2)(a) A public school or private school claiming an exemption from
state tax in the form of a remittance under this section must pay the
tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 to the department. The school may then
apply to the department for remittance of all of the tax paid under RCW
82.12.020.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the public school or private school
and through audit and other administrative records.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying public schools or private schools that submitted
applications during the previous quarter.
(3) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

--- END ---