BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to public corporations, commissions, or
authorities created under RCW 35.21.660 or 35.21.730 for amounts
derived from providing services to:
(1) A limited liability company in which the corporation,
commission, or authority is the managing member;
(2) A limited partnership in which the corporation, commission, or
authority is the general partner; or
(3) A single asset entity required under any federal, state, or
local governmental housing assistance program, which is controlled
directly or indirectly by the corporation, commission, or authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales by a public
corporation, commission, or authority created under RCW 35.21.660 or
35.21.730 if the gross proceeds of sales are exempt from tax under
section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of tangible personal property and labor and services provided by a
public corporation, commission, or authority created under RCW
35.21.660 or 35.21.730 if the gross proceeds of sales for the tangible
personal property and labor and services are exempt from tax under
section 1 of this act.

--- END ---