BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.62.010 and 2001 c 320 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax credit under this
chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means an area as defined in RCW 82.60.020.
(4)(a) "Eligible business project" means manufacturing or research
and development activities which are conducted by an applicant in an
eligible area at a specific facility, provided the applicant's average
((full-time)) qualified employment positions at the specific facility
will be at least fifteen percent greater in the ((year for which the
credit is being sought)) four consecutive full calendar quarters after
the calendar quarter during which the first qualified employment
position is filled than the applicant's average ((full-time)) qualified
employment positions at the same facility in the four consecutive full
calendar quarters immediately preceding ((year)) the calendar quarter
during which the first qualified employment position is filled.
(b) "Eligible business project" does not include any portion of a
business project undertaken by a light and power business as defined in
RCW 82.16.010(5) or that portion of a business project creating
qualified full-time employment positions outside an eligible area.
(5) "First qualified employment position" means the first qualified
employment position filled for which a credit under this chapter is
sought.
(6) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, and the
activities performed by research and development laboratories and
commercial testing laboratories.
(((6))) (7) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(((7))) (8)(a)(i) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent
full-time employee employed in the eligible business project during
((the entire tax year)) four consecutive full calendar quarters.
(((8) "Tax year" means the calendar year in which taxes are due.))
(ii) For seasonal employers, "qualified employment position" also
includes the equivalent of a full-time employee in work hours for four
consecutive full calendar quarters.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "full time" means a normal
work week of at least thirty-five hours.
(c) Once a permanent, full-time employee has been employed, a
position does not cease to be a qualified employment position solely
due to periods in which the position goes vacant, as long as:
(i) The cumulative period of any vacancies in that position is not
more than one hundred twenty days in the four-quarter period; and
(ii) During a vacancy, the employer is training or actively
recruiting a replacement permanent, full-time employee for the
position.
(9) "Recipient" means a person receiving tax credits under this
chapter.
(10) "Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process before commercial sales have begun. As used in this
subsection, "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales
for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the
product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.
(11) "Seasonal employee" means an employee of a seasonal employer
who works on a seasonal basis. For the purposes of this subsection and
subsection (12) of this section, "seasonal basis" means a continuous
employment period of less than twelve consecutive months.
(12) "Seasonal employer" means a person who regularly hires more
than fifty percent of its employees to work on a seasonal basis.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.62.020 and 1986 c 116 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
Application for tax credits under this chapter must be made
((before)) within ninety consecutive days after the ((actual hiring
of)) first qualified employment position((s)) is filled. The
application shall be made to the department in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The application shall contain
information regarding the location of the business project, the
applicant's average employment, if any, at the facility for the prior
((year)) four consecutive full calendar quarters immediately preceding
the earlier of the calendar quarter during which the application
required by this section is submitted to the department or the first
qualified employment position is filled, estimated or actual new
employment related to the project, estimated or actual wages of
employees related to the project, estimated or actual costs, time
schedules for completion and operation, and other information required
by the department. The department shall prescribe a method for
calculating a seasonal employer's average employment levels. The
department shall rule on the application within sixty days.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.62.030 and 2001 c 320 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person shall be allowed a credit against the tax due under
chapter 82.04 RCW as provided in this section. The credit shall equal:
(((a))) (i) Four thousand dollars for each qualified employment
position with wages and benefits greater than forty thousand dollars
annually that is directly created in an eligible business project and
(((b))) (ii) two thousand dollars for each qualified employment
position with wages and benefits less than or equal to forty thousand
dollars annually that is directly created in an eligible business
project.
(b) For purposes of calculating the amount of credit under (a) of
this subsection with respect to qualified employment positions as
defined in RCW 82.62.010(8)(a)(ii):
(i) In determining the number of qualified employment positions, a
fractional amount is rounded down to the nearest whole number; and
(ii) Wages and benefits for each qualified employment position
shall be equal to the quotient derived by dividing: (A) The sum of the
wages and benefits earned for the four consecutive full calendar
quarter period for which a credit under this chapter is earned by all
of the person's new seasonal employees hired during that period; by (B)
the number of qualified employment positions plus any fractional amount
subject to rounding as provided under (b)(i) of this subsection. For
purposes of this chapter, a credit is earned for the four consecutive
full calendar quarters after the calendar quarter during which the
first qualified employment position is filled.
(2) The department shall keep a running total of all credits
allowed under this chapter during each fiscal year. The department
shall not allow any credits which would cause the total to exceed seven
million five hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal year. If all or
part of an application for credit is disallowed under this subsection,
the disallowed portion shall be carried over to the next fiscal year.
However, the carryover into the next fiscal year is only permitted to
the extent that the cap for the next fiscal year is not exceeded.
(3) No recipient may use the tax credits to decertify a union or to
displace existing jobs in any community in the state.
(4) The credit may be used against any tax due under chapter 82.04
RCW, and may be carried over until used. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.62.045 and 1999 c 164 s 307 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section "eligible area" also means a
designated community empowerment zone approved under RCW ((43.63A.700))
43.31C.020.
(2) An eligible business project located within an eligible area as
defined in this section qualifies for a credit under this chapter for
those employees who at the time of hire are residents of the community
empowerment zone in which the project is located, if the fifteen
percent threshold is met. As used in this subsection, "resident" means
the person makes his or her home in the community empowerment zone. A
mailing address alone is insufficient to establish that a person is a
resident for the purposes of this section.
(3) All other provisions and eligibility requirements of this
chapter apply to applicants eligible under this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.62.050 and 2001 c 320 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each recipient shall submit a report to the department ((on
January 31st following the year the application for credit was
allowed)) by the last day of the month immediately following the end of
the four consecutive full calendar quarter period for which a credit
under this chapter is earned. The report shall contain information, as
required by the department, from which the department may determine
whether the recipient is meeting the requirements of this chapter. If
the recipient fails to submit a report or submits an inadequate report,
the department may declare the amount of taxes for which a credit has
been used to be immediately assessed and payable. The recipient must
keep records, such as payroll records showing the date of hire and
employment security reports, to verify eligibility under this section.
(2) If, on the basis of a report under this section or other
information, the department finds that a business project is not
eligible for tax credit under this chapter for reasons other than
failure to create the required number of qualified employment
positions, the amount of taxes for which a credit has been used for the
project shall be immediately due.
(3) If, on the basis of a report under this section or other
information, the department finds that a business project has failed to
create the specified number of qualified employment positions, the
department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the credited
taxes for which a credit has been used for the project. The interest
shall be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes,
shall be assessed retroactively to the date of the tax credit, and
shall accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are
repaid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act applies prospectively only, except
that section 4 of this act applies both prospectively and
retroactively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 3 and 5 of this act apply
with respect to applications for credit under chapter 82.62 RCW
received by the department of revenue on or after January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---