BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.19.020 and 2001 c 251 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means an agency or facility operated, licensed, or
certified by the state of Washington.
(2) "Agency affiliated counselor" means a person registered under
this chapter who is engaged in therapeutic counseling and employed by
an agency.
(3) "Client" means an individual who receives or participates in
counseling or group counseling.
(((2) "Counseling" means employing any therapeutic techniques,
including but not limited to social work, mental health counseling,
marriage and family therapy, and hypnotherapy, for a fee that offer,
assist or attempt to assist an individual or individuals in the
amelioration or adjustment of mental, emotional, or behavioral
problems, and includes therapeutic techniques to achieve sensitivity
and awareness of self and others and the development of human
potential. For the purposes of this chapter, nothing may be construed
to imply that the practice of hypnotherapy is necessarily limited to
counseling.
(3))) (4) "Counseling associate" means a person registered under
this chapter who is engaged in therapeutic counseling in private or
group practices.
(5) "Counselor" means ((an individual, practitioner, therapist, or
analyst)) a person who engages in the practice of therapeutic
counseling to the public for a fee((, including for the purposes of
this chapter, hypnotherapists)).
(((4))) (6) "Department" means the department of health.
(((5))) (7) "Hypnotherapist" means a person registered under this
chapter who is practicing hypnosis as a modality.
(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or the
secretary's designee.
(9) "Therapeutic counseling" means employing a recognized theory
with a deliberate and defined therapeutic technique, for a fee, that
assists, or attempts to assist, an individual or individuals in the
amelioration or adjustment of mental, emotional, or behavioral
problems. Therapeutic counseling also includes using such techniques
to improve a client's mental health, achieve sensitivity and awareness
of self and others, and develop human potential. For the purposes of
this chapter, "therapeutic counseling" does not include:
(a) Counseling done by vocational counselors related to employment,
career development, or vocational rehabilitation; school counselors
employed or contracted with a school or college who work to promote the
academic career and personal and social development of students; peer
counselors and student peer counselors who use their own experience to
help people in similar situations; domestic violence treatment
providers; crime victim advocates; or camp counselors; or
(b) Supportive services such as case management activities, human
services, residential support, or administration of tests unless these
services are provided in conjunction with therapeutic counseling.
"Therapeutic counseling" does not imply proficiency in the practice or
competencies of licensed marriage and family therapy, mental health
counselor, social work, chemical dependency professional, psychiatric
nurse practice, psychology, or psychiatry that are regulated under
other laws.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.19.030 and 2001 c 251 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
((No)) A person may not, ((for a fee or)) as a part of his or her
position as an employee of a state agency, practice therapeutic
counseling without being registered to practice as an agency affiliated
counselor or counseling associate by the department under this chapter
unless exempt under RCW 18.19.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.19 RCW
to read as follows:
A person may not, for a fee or as a part of his or her position as
an employee of a state agency, practice hypnotherapy without being
registered to practice as a hypnotherapist by the department under this
chapter unless exempt under RCW 18.19.040.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.19.040 and 2001 c 251 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice of a profession by a person who is either
registered, certified, licensed, or similarly regulated under the laws
of this state and who is performing services within the person's
authorized scope of practice, including any attorney admitted to
practice law in this state when providing counseling incidental to and
in the course of providing legal counsel;
(2) The practice of therapeutic counseling by an employee or
trainee of any federal agency, or the practice of counseling by a
student of a college or university, if the employee, trainee, or
student is practicing solely under the supervision of and accountable
to the agency, college, or university, through which he or she performs
such functions as part of his or her position for no additional fee
other than ordinary compensation;
(3) The practice of therapeutic counseling by a person ((without a
mandatory charge)) for no compensation;
(4) The practice of therapeutic counseling by persons offering
services for public and private nonprofit organizations or charities
not primarily engaged in therapeutic counseling for a fee when approved
by the organizations or agencies for whom they render their services;
(5) Evaluation, consultation, planning, policy-making, research, or
related services conducted by social scientists for private
corporations or public agencies;
(6) The practice of therapeutic counseling by a person under the
auspices of a religious denomination, church, or organization, or the
practice of religion itself;
(7) Counselors ((whose residency is not)) who reside outside
Washington state from providing up to ten days per quarter of training
or workshops in the state, as long as they ((don't)) do not hold
themselves out to be registered in Washington state.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.19.050 and 2001 c 251 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the
secretary has the following authority:
(a) To adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary
to implement this chapter;
(b) To set all registration and renewal fees in accordance with RCW
43.70.250 and to collect and deposit all such fees in the health
professions account established under RCW 43.70.320;
(c) To establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(d) To hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as
needed to implement this chapter; and
(e) To issue a registration to any applicant who has met the
requirements for registration((; and
(f) To develop a dictionary of recognized professions and
occupations providing counseling services to the public included under
this chapter)).
(2) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the
issuance and denial of registrations and the discipline of registrants
under this chapter. The secretary shall be the disciplining authority
under this chapter. ((The absence of educational or training
requirements for counselors registered under this chapter or the
counselor's use of nontraditional nonabusive therapeutic techniques
shall not, in and of itself, give the secretary authority to
unilaterally determine the training and competence or to define or
restrict the scope of practice of such individuals.))
(3) The department shall publish and disseminate information ((in
order)) to educate the public about the responsibilities of therapeutic
counselors, the types of therapeutic counselors, and the rights and
responsibilities of clients established under this chapter. ((Solely
for the purposes of administering this education requirement,)) The
secretary ((shall)) may assess an additional fee for each application
and renewal((, equal to five percent of the fee. The revenue collected
from the assessment fee may be appropriated by the legislature for the
department's use in educating consumers pursuant to this section. The
authority to charge the assessment fee shall terminate on June 30,
1994)) to fund public education efforts under this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.19.060 and 2001 c 251 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
Persons registered under this chapter shall provide clients at the
commencement of any program of treatment with accurate disclosure
information concerning their practice, in accordance with guidelines
developed by the department, that will inform clients of the purposes
of and resources available under this chapter, including the right of
clients to refuse treatment, the responsibility of clients for choosing
the provider and treatment modality which best suits their needs, and
the extent of confidentiality provided by this chapter. The disclosure
information provided by the counselor, the receipt of which shall be
acknowledged in writing by the counselor and client, shall include any
relevant education and training, the therapeutic orientation of the
practice, the proposed course of treatment where known, any financial
requirements, referral resources, and such other information as the
department may require by rule. The disclosure statement must inform
the client of any disciplinary action taken against the registrant by
the department, other agency, or other jurisdiction. The disclosure
information shall also include a statement that registration of an
individual under this chapter does not include a recognition of any
practice standards, nor necessarily imply the effectiveness of any
treatment. The client is not liable for any fees or charges for
services rendered prior to receipt of the disclosure.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.19.090 and 1991 c 3 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The secretary shall issue a registration to any applicant who
submits, on forms provided by the secretary, the applicant's name,
address, occupational title, name and location of business, and other
information as determined by the secretary, including information
necessary to determine whether there are grounds for denial of
registration or issuance of a conditional registration under this
chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW.
Applicants)) (1) Applications for registration ((shall register as
counselors or may register as hypnotherapists if employing hypnosis as
a modality. Applicants shall, in addition, provide in their titles a
description of their therapeutic orientation, discipline, theory, or
technique. Each applicant shall pay a fee determined by the secretary
as provided in RCW 43.70.250, which shall accompany the application.))
as agency affiliated counselors, counseling associates, or
hypnotherapists must be made on forms approved by the secretary. The
secretary may require information necessary to determine whether
applicants meet the qualifications for the registration and whether
there are any grounds for denial of registration or issuance of a
conditional registration under this chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW. An
application for registration as an agency affiliated counselor or
counseling associate shall include a description of their therapeutic
orientation, discipline, theory, or technique to the department.
(2) Applicants for registration as agency affiliated counselors
must provide satisfactory documentation that they are employed by an
agency or have an offer of employment from an agency.
(3) Applicants for registration as counseling associates are
required to:
(a) Have a minimum of a four-year postsecondary degree in
psychology or another area of mental health counseling from an
accredited college or university. Coursework must include counseling
ethics, privacy, confidentiality, and recordkeeping; counseling theory;
human growth and development; abnormal psychology; and assessing risk
for suicide and homicide, the duty to warn, and the duty to report
abuse; and
(b) Have a written supervision agreement with a licensed mental
health care provider. The licensed mental health care provider must be
a licensed mental health counselor, marriage and family therapist,
clinical social worker, psychologist, psychiatrist, physician, or
psychiatric nurse. The department must develop rules defining
supervisory requirements and a model supervision agreement.
(4) Each applicant shall include payment of the fee determined by
the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 18.19 RCW
to read as follows:
Agency affiliated counselors shall notify the department if they
are either no longer employed by the agency identified on their
application or are now employed with another agency, or both. Agency
affiliated counselors may not engage in the practice of therapeutic
counseling unless they are currently affiliated with an agency.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.19.100 and 1996 c 191 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary shall establish administrative procedures,
administrative requirements, continuing education, and fees for renewal
of registrations as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.225.010 and 2001 c 251 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advanced social work" means the application of social work
theory and methods including emotional and biopsychosocial assessment,
psychotherapy under the supervision of a licensed independent clinical
social worker, case management, consultation, advocacy, counseling, and
community organization.
(2) "Applicant" means a person who completes the required
application, pays the required fee, is at least eighteen years of age,
and meets any background check requirements and uniform disciplinary
act requirements.
(3) "Committee" means the Washington state mental health
counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers advisory
committee.
(4) "Department" means the department of health.
(5) "Disciplining authority" means the department.
(6) "Independent clinical social work" means the diagnosis and
treatment of emotional and mental disorders based on knowledge of human
development, the causation and treatment of psychopathology,
psychotherapeutic treatment practices, and social work practice as
defined in advanced social work. Treatment modalities include but are
not limited to diagnosis and treatment of individuals, couples,
families, groups, or organizations.
(7) "Intern" means a prelicensure candidate who has a graduate
degree in a mental health field under RCW 18.225.090 and is gaining the
required supervised experience to become a licensed social worker,
mental health counselor, or marriage and family therapist.
(8) "Marriage and family therapy" means the diagnosis and treatment
of mental and emotional disorders, whether cognitive, affective, or
behavioral, within the context of relationships, including marriage and
family systems. Marriage and family therapy involves the professional
application of psychotherapeutic and family systems theories and
techniques in the delivery of services to individuals, couples, and
families for the purpose of treating such diagnosed nervous and mental
disorders. The practice of marriage and family therapy means the
rendering of professional marriage and family therapy services to
individuals, couples, and families, singly or in groups, whether such
services are offered directly to the general public or through
organizations, either public or private, for a fee, monetary or
otherwise.
(((8))) (9) "Mental health counseling" means the application of
principles of human development, learning theory, psychotherapy, group
dynamics, and etiology of mental illness and dysfunctional behavior to
individuals, couples, families, groups, and organizations, for the
purpose of treatment of mental disorders and promoting optimal mental
health and functionality. Mental health counseling also includes, but
is not limited to, the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of mental
and emotional disorders, as well as the application of a wellness model
of mental health.
(((9))) (10) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.225.020 and 2001 c 251 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person must not represent himself or herself as a licensed
advanced social worker, licensed independent clinical social worker,
licensed mental health counselor, ((or)) licensed marriage and family
therapist, social work intern, mental health counselor intern, or
marriage and family therapy intern, without being licensed by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 18.225
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue an intern license to any applicant
who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that the
applicant meets the following requirements for the applicant's practice
area and submits a declaration that the applicant is working toward
full licensure in that category:
(a) Licensed social worker - advanced or licensed social worker -clinical: Graduation from a master's or doctorate social work
educational program accredited by the council on social work education
and approved by the secretary based upon nationally recognized
standards;
(b) Licensed mental health counselor: Graduation from a master's
or doctoral level educational program in mental health counseling or a
related discipline from a college or university approved by the
secretary based upon nationally recognized standards;
(c) Licensed marriage and family therapist: Graduation from a
master's degree or doctoral degree educational program in marriage and
family therapy or graduation from an educational program in an allied
field equivalent to a master's degree or doctoral degree in marriage
and family therapy approved by the secretary based upon nationally
recognized standards.
(2) Interns may not provide independent social work, mental health
counseling, or marriage and family therapy for a fee, monetary or
otherwise. Interns must work under the supervision of an approved
supervisor.
(3) Interns shall provide each client or patient, during the first
professional contact, with a disclosure form according to RCW
18.225.100, disclosing that he or she is an intern under the
supervision of an approved supervisor.
(4) The department shall establish by rule what constitutes
adequate proof of compliance with the requirements of this section.
(5) Applicants are subject to the denial of a license or issuance
of a conditional license for the reasons set forth in chapter 18.130
RCW.
(6) An intern license may be renewed no more than four times.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.225.150 and 2001 c 251 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary shall establish by rule the procedural requirements
and fees for renewal of a license or intern license. Failure to renew
shall invalidate the license or intern license and all privileges
granted by the license. If an intern license has lapsed, the person
shall submit an updated declaration, in accordance with rules adopted
by the department, that the person is working toward full licensure.
If a license has lapsed for a period longer than three years, the
person shall demonstrate competence to the satisfaction of the
secretary by taking continuing education courses, or meeting other
standards determined by the secretary. If an intern license has
lapsed, the person shall submit an updated declaration, in accordance
with rules adopted by the department, that the person is working toward
full licensure.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.205.020 and 1998 c 243 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Certification" means a voluntary process recognizing an
individual who qualifies by examination and meets established
educational prerequisites, and which protects the title of practice.
(2) "Certified chemical dependency professional" means an
individual certified in chemical dependency counseling, under this
chapter.
(3) "Certified chemical dependency professional trainee" means an
individual working toward the education and experience requirements for
certification as a chemical dependency professional.
(4) "Chemical dependency counseling" means employing the core
competencies of chemical dependency counseling to assist or attempt to
assist an alcohol or drug addicted person to develop and maintain
abstinence from alcohol and other mood-altering drugs.
(((4))) (5) "Committee" means the chemical dependency certification
advisory committee established under this chapter.
(((5))) (6) "Core competencies of chemical dependency counseling"
means competency in the nationally recognized knowledge, skills, and
attitudes of professional practice, including assessment and diagnosis
of chemical dependency, chemical dependency treatment planning and
referral, patient and family education in the disease of chemical
dependency, individual and group counseling with alcoholic and drug
addicted individuals, relapse prevention counseling, and case
management, all oriented to assist alcoholic and drug addicted patients
to achieve and maintain abstinence from mood-altering substances and
develop independent support systems.
(((6))) (7) "Department" means the department of health.
(((7))) (8) "Health profession" means a profession providing health
services regulated under the laws of this state.
(((8))) (9) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.

Sec. 15 RCW 18.205.030 and 2000 c 171 s 41 are each amended to
read as follows:
No person may represent oneself as a certified chemical dependency
professional or certified chemical dependency professional trainee or
use any title or description of services of a certified chemical
dependency professional or certified chemical dependency professional
trainee without applying for certification, meeting the required
qualifications, and being certified by the department of health, unless
otherwise exempted by this chapter.

Sec. 16 RCW 18.205.040 and 1998 c 243 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the use of
the title "certified chemical dependency professional" or "certified
chemical dependency professional trainee" when treating patients in
settings other than programs approved under chapter 70.96A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 18.205
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue a trainee certificate to any
applicant who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that he
or she is working toward the education and experience requirements in
RCW 18.205.090.
(2) A trainee certified under this section shall submit to the
secretary for approval a declaration, in accordance with rules adopted
by the department, that he or she is enrolled in an approved education
program and actively pursuing the experience requirements in RCW
18.205.090. This declaration must be updated with the trainee's annual
renewal.
(3) A trainee certified under this section may practice only under
the supervision of a certified chemical dependency professional. The
first fifty hours of any face-to-face client contact must be under
direct observation. All remaining experience must be under supervision
in accordance with rules adopted by the department.
(4) A chemical dependency professional trainee provides chemical
dependency assessments, counseling, and case management with a state
regulated agency and can provide clinical services to patients
consistent with his or her education, training, and experience as
approved by his or her supervisor.
(5) A trainee certification may only be renewed four times.
(6) Applicants are subject to denial of a certificate or issuance
of a conditional certificate for the reasons set forth in chapter
18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 To practice counseling, all registered
counselors must obtain another health profession credential by July 1,
2009. The registered counselor credential shall be abolished July 1,
2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---