BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that many
health care providers, medical associations and organizations, and
scientists now warn that the risk of skin cancer associated with
suntanning are greater when tanning with artificial ultraviolet light.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Tanning facility" means any location, place, area, structure,
or business that provides persons access to any tanning device.
(2) "Tanning device" means any equipment that emits electromagnetic
radiation with wavelengths in the air between two hundred and four
hundred nanometers used for tanning of the skin including, but not
limited to, a sunlamp, tanning booth, or tanning bed. "Tanning device"
does not include equipment that emits ultraviolet radiation used by a
health care professional in the treatment of a medical or mental health
condition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A tanning facility shall post a warning sign in any area where
a tanning device is used. The sign shall read as follows:

DANGER: ULTRAVIOLET RADIATION
Repeated exposure may cause skin cancer.
(2) The sign required by subsection (1) of this section shall be of
a size and in a location on the premises that allows it to be easily
read by users before being exposed to the tanning device.

--- END ---