BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the 2005
legislature created Washington learns to conduct a comprehensive review
of the state's entire education system and to issue recommendations.
The legislature further finds that Washington learns determined that
Washington students are falling behind international standards in
mathematics and science and that when high school students are not
well-prepared in mathematics and science, they are unlikely to pursue
the careers or college degrees that require those skills. The
legislature further finds that the Washington learns report includes a
strategy to increase the level of achievement of the state's students
by increasing high school graduation requirements; and a strategy to
expand incentives and opportunities for students seeking high-demand
mathematics- and science-related certificates and degrees. The
legislature further finds that the intent of this act is to implement
both of these strategies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) To qualify for a mathematics/science high school scholar
scholarship, students must complete the following requirements:
(a) Successfully earn the following high school credits:
(i) Four mathematics credits, including calculus;
(ii) At least three science credits, including chemistry and
physics; and
(iii) At least three credits of world language other than English;
(b) Receive advanced placement scores of three or higher on at
least two advance placement tests or graduate from an international
baccalaureate program; and
(c) Earn a high school grade point average of 3.5 or above.
(2) As used in this section, "high school credits" means a full
school year of study or one hundred fifty hours of planned
instructional activities, whichever is greater, or an equivalent as
defined by the state board of education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Beginning with the 2008-09 academic
year, the higher education coordinating board shall award full tuition
scholarships to students graduating from public and approved private
high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW who meet the requirements of
section 2 of this act, if the student pursues an undergraduate degree
in a mathematics or science-related field and who qualify for a
scholarship under the ranking system developed by the board.
(2) The scholarships may only be used for undergraduate coursework
beginning in the student's second year at accredited institutions of
higher education in the state of Washington, except that the
scholarships may be used for undergraduate coursework at Oregon
institutions of higher education that are located in counties bordering
Washington state.
(3) The higher education coordinating board shall develop a ranking
system to determine priority of the award of the mathematics/science
scholarship. The ranking system shall consider the following factors:
(a) The first year of course selection at institutions of higher
education by the applicant. Applications shall be ranked higher based
on the number of mathematics and science classes that the applicant
enrolled and completed;
(b) The grade point average of the applicant in the first year at
an institution of higher education; and
(c) Other criteria that the higher education coordinating board
deems appropriate.
(4) The higher education coordinating board shall award
scholarships to as many eligible students as possible using the ranking
system.
(5) The scholarships may not be awarded to any student who is
pursuing a degree in theology.
(6) The higher education coordinating board may establish
satisfactory progress standards for the continued receipt of the
scholarship.
(7) The higher education coordinating board shall establish the
time frame within which the student must use the scholarship.
(8) The higher education coordinating board may adopt rules to
implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The mathematics/science high school
scholar scholarship account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. The account shall be a nontreasury account retaining its
interest earnings in accordance with RCW 43.79A.040.
(2) The higher education coordinating board shall deposit in the
account all money received for the program. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds appropriated by the legislature for the
mathematics/science high school scholar scholarship program, private
contributions to the program, and refunds of scholarships under this
chapter.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall be used for scholarships to
eligible students.
(4) With the exception of the operating costs associated with the
management of the account by the treasurer's office as authorized in
chapter 43.79A RCW, the account shall be credited with all investment
income earned by the account.
(5) Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations
and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.
(6) Disbursements from the account shall be made only on the
authorization of the higher education coordinating board.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2006 c 311 s 21 and 2006 c 120 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers
conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the
grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the
mathematics/science high school scholar scholarship account, the
produce railcar pool account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and
exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the
self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account,
the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission
Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing
commission class C purse fund account, the individual development
account program account, the Washington horse racing commission
operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing commission
operating account must be credited to the Washington horse racing
commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences discovery
fund, and the reading achievement account. However, the earnings to be
distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 3 and 4 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---