BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.080 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 201 are each
amended to read as follows:
The powers and duties of the department of social and health
services and the secretary of social and health services under the
following statutes are hereby transferred to the department of health
and the secretary of health: Chapters 16.70, 18.20, 18.46, 18.71,
18.73, 18.76, 69.30, 70.28, 70.30, 70.32, 70.33, 70.50, 70.58, 70.62,
70.83, 70.83B, 70.90, 70.98, 70.104, 70.116, 70.118, 70.119, 70.119A,
70.121, 70.127, 70.142, and 80.50 RCW. More specifically, the
following programs and services presently administered by the
department of social and health services are hereby transferred to the
department of health:
(1) Personal health and protection programs and related management
and support services, including, but not limited to: Immunizations;
tuberculosis; sexually transmitted diseases; AIDS; diabetes control;
primary health care; cardiovascular risk reduction; kidney disease;
regional genetic services; newborn metabolic screening; sentinel birth
defects; cytogenetics; communicable disease epidemiology; and chronic
disease epidemiology;
(2) Environmental health protection services and related management
and support services, including, but not limited to: Radiation,
including X-ray control, radioactive materials, uranium mills, low-level waste, emergency response and reactor safety, and environmental
radiation protection; drinking water; toxic substances; on-site sewage;
recreational water contact facilities; food services sanitation;
shellfish; and general environmental health services, including
schools, vectors, parks, and camps;
(3) Public health laboratory;
(4) Public health support services, including, but not limited to:
Vital records; health data; local public health services support; and
health education and information;
(5) Licensing and certification services including, but not limited
to: Health and personal care facility survey, construction review,
emergency medical services, laboratory quality assurance, and
accommodations surveys; and
(6) Effective January 1, 1991, parent and child health services and
related management support services, including, but not limited to:
Maternal and infant health; child health; parental health; nutrition;
handicapped children's services; family planning including screening,
testing, and treatment of sexually transmitted diseases; adolescent
pregnancy services; high priority infant tracking; early intervention;
parenting education; prenatal regionalization; and power and duties
under RCW 43.20A.635. The director of the office of financial
management may recommend to the legislature a delay in this transfer,
if it is determined that this time frame is not adequate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to promote healthy birth outcomes and reduce the
number of unintended pregnancies, Washington state reaffirms its
commitment to encourage health plan coverage of family planning as an
essential component of the health care system and to provide public
health funding for preventive family planning services for women and
men with family incomes up to two hundred fifty percent of the federal
poverty level.
(2) Within funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, the
department of health shall provide, through its contracted local family
planning agencies, family planning services to women and men in
accordance with eligibility requirements established by the department.
Funds appropriated to the department for this purpose shall be used to
provide family planning services to men and women not otherwise
eligible for family planning services under the medicaid program
administered under chapter 74.09 RCW, and for family planning services
not otherwise covered by the medicaid program under chapter 74.09 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.70.010 and 1995 c 269 s 2201 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:
(1) "Assessment" means the regular collection, analysis, and
sharing of information about health conditions, risks, and resources in
a community. Assessment activities identify trends in illness, injury,
and death and the factors that may cause these events. They also
identify environmental risk factors, community concerns, community
health resources, and the use of health services. Assessment includes
gathering statistical data as well as conducting epidemiologic and
other investigations and evaluations of health emergencies and specific
ongoing health problems;
(2) "Board" means the state board of health;
(3) "Department" means the department of health;
(4) "Family planning services" means the provision of effective
risk reduction education and counseling; preventive medical exams and
testing; screening, testing, and treatment of sexually transmitted
diseases; cancer screening; contraceptive supplies and devices; and
sterilization counseling and services;
(5) "Policy development" means the establishment of social norms,
organizational guidelines, operational procedures, rules, ordinances,
or statutes that promote health or prevent injury, illness, or death;
and
(((5))) (6) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

--- END ---