BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that excessive
dependence on fossil fuels jeopardizes Washington's economic security,
environmental integrity, and public health. Accelerated development
and use of clean fuels and clean vehicle technologies will reduce the
drain on Washington's economy from importing fossil fuels. As fossil
fuel prices rise, clean fuels and vehicles can save money for consumers
while promoting the development of a major, sustainable industry that
provides good jobs and a new source of rural prosperity.
(2) Clean fuels and vehicles will protect public health by reducing
toxic air pollution and reduce our largest source of global warming
pollution. The state must better understand and prepare for the
effects of global warming and the challenges and opportunities
associated with evolving climate policies and carbon markets.
(3) To reduce fossil fuel dependence and build our clean energy
economy, the state should develop policies and incentives that help
businesses, consumers, and farmers gain greater access to affordable
clean fuels and vehicles and to produce clean fuels in the state.
These policies and incentives should include: Incentives for
replacement of the most polluting diesel engines, especially in school
buses; transitional incentives for development of the most promising
in-state clean fuels and fuel feedstocks, including biodiesel crops and
ethanol from plant waste; reduced fossil fuel consumption by state
fleets; development of promising new technologies for displacing
petroleum with electricity, such as "plug-in hybrids"; and impact
analysis and emission accounting procedures that prepare Washington to
respond and prosper as global warming impacts occur and as policies and
markets to reduce global warming pollution are developed.

PART 1
CLEAN DIESEL INITIATIVE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The legislature finds that fine
particle air pollution attributable to diesel fuel is a significant
health hazard to school children and other residents in our state.
Sources of diesel emissions include diesel-powered trucks, buses and
cars, diesel-powered marine vessels, construction equipment, trains,
aircraft support equipment, cargo handling equipment, and a variety of
other on and off-road engines. Reducing fine particles and toxic
emissions from diesel emissions and other sources of pollution reduces
the adverse health impacts on children, reduces cancer risk, and
reduces the incidence and severity of asthma attacks and chronic
bronchitis. Reducing diesel emissions, in addition to strategies to
reduce wood smoke, will also aid areas of the state facing potential
nonattainment of new fine particle standards established by the United
States environmental protection agency and help avoid the adverse
health and economic impacts of nonattainment.
(2) Under the current Washington state clean school bus program,
approximately seven thousand five hundred diesel school buses, over
three-quarters of the existing fleet statewide, will be retrofitted by
2008. Reduced exhaust emissions from these retrofitted buses provide
cleaner air to breathe for the children riding the buses and the
citizens in the communities served by the buses.
(3) The legislature finds that it is not cost-effective to retrofit
much older buses because of their mechanical condition and very high
emissions. Replacement with new, ultra-low emission buses, beginning
with the model year 2007, is the most effective means to nearly
eliminate the toxic emissions generated by the use of these older
buses. In addition, newer buses are safer, more reliable, provide
significantly higher fuel economy, and have lower overall operating
costs. An incentive program to accelerate purchase of newer buses and
replacement of older buses will more quickly achieve these gains and
result in a lower health risk to children.
(4) Even with new federal diesel fuel and engine standards going
into effect in 2006 and 2007, and due to the long life of diesel
engines, diesel emissions will continue to be an air pollution concern
for many years.
(5) Many public and private fleets continue to use diesel equipment
that has not been retrofitted to reduce emissions. Therefore, the
legislature finds that it is important to continue to take measures to
reduce diesel emissions in our state so we protect the health of our
citizens and create healthier communities. Reducing diesel emissions
will also allow continued growth in major ports in the state by
maintaining air quality within federal standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
implement a school bus replacement incentive program. As part of the
program, the office shall fund up to ten percent of the cost of a new
2007 or later model year school bus purchased by a school district by
no later than June 30, 2009, provided that the new bus is replacing a
1994 or older school bus in the school district's fleet. Replacement
of the oldest buses must be given highest priority.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
ensure that buses being replaced through this program are surplused
under RCW 28A.335.180. As part of the surplus process, school
districts must provide written documentation to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction demonstrating that buses being
replaced are scrapped and not purchased for road use. The
documentation must include bus make, model, year, vehicle
identification number, engine make, engine serial number, and salvage
yard receipts; and must demonstrate that the engine and body of the bus
being replaced has been rendered unusable.

Sec. 103 RCW 53.08.040 and 1989 c 298 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A district may improve its lands by dredging, filling,
bulkheading, providing waterways or otherwise developing such lands for
industrial and commercial purposes. A district may also acquire,
construct, install, improve, and operate sewer and water utilities to
serve its own property and other property owners under terms,
conditions, and rates to be fixed and approved by the port commission.
A district may also acquire, by purchase, construction, lease, or in
any other manner, and may maintain and operate other facilities for the
control or elimination of air, water, or other pollution, including,
but not limited to, facilities for the treatment and/or disposal of
industrial wastes, and may make such facilities available to others
under terms, conditions and rates to be fixed and approved by the port
commission. Such conditions and rates shall be sufficient to reimburse
the port for all costs, including reasonable amortization of capital
outlays caused by or incidental to providing such other pollution
control facilities((: PROVIDED, That)). However, no part of such
costs of providing any pollution control facility to others shall be
paid out of any tax revenues of the port((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER,
That)) and no port shall enter into an agreement or contract to provide
sewer and/or water utilities or pollution control facilities if
substantially similar utilities or facilities are available from
another source (or sources) which is able and willing to provide such
utilities or facilities on a reasonable and nondiscriminatory basis
unless such other source (or sources) consents thereto.
(2) In the event that a port elects to make such other pollution
control facilities available to others, it shall do so by lease, lease
purchase agreement, or other agreement binding such user to pay for the
use of said facilities for the full term of the revenue bonds issued by
the port for the acquisition of said facilities, and said payments
shall at least fully reimburse the port for all principal and interest
paid by it on said bonds and for all operating or other costs, if any,
incurred by the port in connection with said facilities((:
PROVIDED,)). However, ((That)) where there is more than one user of
any such facilities, each user shall be responsible for its pro rata
share of such costs and payment of principal and interest. Any port
intending to provide pollution control facilities to others shall first
survey the port district to ascertain the potential users of such
facilities and the extent of their needs. The port shall conduct a
public hearing upon the proposal and shall give each potential user an
opportunity to participate in the use of such facilities upon equal
terms and conditions.
(3) "Pollution control facility," as used in this section and RCW
53.08.041, does not include air quality improvement equipment that
provides emission reductions for engines, vehicles, and vessels.

Sec. 104 RCW 70.94.017 and 2005 c 295 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Money deposited in the segregated subaccount of the air
pollution control account under RCW 46.68.020(2) shall be distributed
as follows:
(a) Eighty-five percent shall be distributed to air pollution
control authorities created under this chapter. The money must be
distributed in direct proportion with the amount of fees imposed under
RCW 46.12.080, 46.12.170, and 46.12.181 that are collected within the
boundaries of each authority. However, an amount in direct proportion
with those fees collected in counties for which no air pollution
control authority exists must be distributed to the department.
(b) The remaining fifteen percent shall be distributed to the
department.
(2) Money distributed to air pollution control authorities and the
department under subsection (1) of this section must be used as
follows:
(a) Eighty-five percent of the money received by an air pollution
control authority or the department is available on a priority basis to
retrofit school buses with exhaust emission control devices or to
provide funding for fueling infrastructure necessary to allow school
bus fleets to use alternative, cleaner fuels. In addition, the
director of ecology or the air pollution control officer may direct
funding under this section for other publicly or privately owned diesel
equipment if the director of ecology or the air pollution control
officer finds that funding for other publicly or privately owned diesel
equipment will provide public health benefits and further the purposes
of this chapter.
(b) The remaining fifteen percent may be used by the air pollution
control authority or department to reduce transportation-related air
contaminant emissions and clean up air pollution, or reduce and monitor
toxic air contaminants.
(3) Money in the air pollution control account may be spent by the
department only after appropriation.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2020.

PART 2
CLEAN FUELS INITIATIVE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 (1) The legislature finds that the
development of a Washington-based feedstock agricultural and forest
products market is highly desirable for producing biodiesel and
ethanol. Research and incentive programs are needed to develop a
market in Washington to produce cellulosic ethanol from wood waste and
other organic materials. Cellulosic ethanol is a preferred biofuel
because it provides much greater reductions in petroleum dependence and
carbon emissions as compared to starch-based ethanol.
(2) It is important for the state of Washington to develop a
complete supply chain infrastructure that allows the state government,
including its local government subdivisions, to supply its complete
fuel needs with biofuels produced from feedstocks completely produced
in Washington. The goal of suppling one hundred percent of state and
local government's fuel needs with biofuels should be a reality by
2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 15.110
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Cellulosic ethanol production facilities are eligible for
assistance under the energy freedom program.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cellulosic ethanol" means
ethanol derived from any lignocellulosic or hemicellulosic matter that
is available on a renewable or recurring basis, including dedicated
energy crops and trees, wood and wood residues, plants, grasses,
agricultural residues, fibers, animal wastes and other waste materials,
and municipal solid waste.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 19.112
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law,
conservation districts and public development authorities are
authorized to enter into crop purchase contracts for a dedicated energy
crop for the purposes of producing, selling, and distributing biodiesel
produced from Washington state feedstocks, cellulosic ethanol, and
cellulosic ethanol blend fuels.
(2) In addition to any other authority provided by law, electric
utilities are authorized to produce and distribute biodiesel, ethanol,
and ethanol blend fuels, including entering into crop purchase
contracts for a dedicated energy crop for the purpose of generating
electricity or producing biodiesel produced from Washington feedstocks,
cellulosic ethanol, and cellulosic ethanol blend fuels for use in
internal operations of the electric utility and for sale or
distribution.

Sec. 204 RCW 15.110.040 and 2006 c 171 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the total requested dollar amount of assistance awarded for
projects under RCW 15.110.020(3) exceeds the amount available in the
energy freedom account created in RCW 15.110.050, the applications must
be prioritized based upon the following criteria:
(((1))) (a) The extent to which the project will help reduce
dependence on petroleum fuels and imported energy either directly or
indirectly;
(((2))) (b) The extent to which the project will reduce air and
water pollution either directly or indirectly;
(((3))) (c) The extent to which the project will establish a viable
bioenergy production capacity in Washington;
(((4))) (d) The benefits to Washington's agricultural producers;
((and
(5))) (e) The benefits to the health of Washington's forests; and
(f) The number and quality of jobs and economic benefits created by
the project.
(2) This section does not apply to assistance awarded for refueling
projects under RCW 15.110.020(4).

Sec. 205 RCW 15.110.020 and 2006 c 171 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The energy freedom program is established within the
department. The director may establish policies and procedures
necessary for processing, reviewing, and approving applications made
under this chapter.
(2) When reviewing applications submitted under this program, the
director shall consult with those agencies having expertise and
knowledge to assess the technical and business feasibility of the
project and probability of success. These agencies may include, but
are not limited to, Washington State University, the University of
Washington, the department of ecology, the department of community,
trade, and economic development, the department of natural resources,
and the Washington state conservation commission.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
director, in cooperation with the department of community, trade, and
economic development, may approve an application only if the director
finds:
(a) The project will convert landfill methane gas, wastewater
treatment gas, or farm products or wastes directly into electricity or
into gaseous or liquid fuels or other coproducts associated with such
conversion;
(b) The project demonstrates technical feasibility and directly
assists in moving a commercially viable project into the marketplace
for use by Washington state citizens;
(c) The facility will produce long-term economic benefits to the
state, a region of the state, or a particular community in the state;
(d) The project does not require continuing state support;
(e) The assistance will result in new jobs, job retention, or
higher incomes for citizens of the state;
(f) The state is provided an option under the assistance agreement
to purchase a portion of the fuel or feedstock to be produced by the
project, exercisable by the department of general administration;
(g) The project will increase energy independence or diversity for
the state;
(h) The project will use landfill methane gas, wastewater treatment
gas, or feedstocks produced in the state, if feasible, except this
criterion does not apply to the construction of facilities used to
distribute and store fuels that are produced from landfill methane gas,
wastewater treatment gas, or farm products or wastes;
(i) Any product produced by the project will be suitable for its
intended use, will meet accepted national or state standards, and will
be stored and distributed in a safe and environmentally sound manner;
(j) The application provides for adequate reporting or disclosure
of financial and employment data to the director, and permits the
director to require an annual or other periodic audit of the project
books; and
(k) For research and development projects, the application has been
independently reviewed by a peer review committee as defined in RCW
15.110.010 and the findings delivered to the director.
(4) When reviewing an application for a refueling project, the
director may award assistance to an applicant if the director finds:
(a) The project will offer biofuels or alternative fuels to the
motoring public;
(b) The project does not require continued state support;
(c) The project is located within a green highway zone as defined
in RCW 15.110.010;
(d) The project will contribute towards an efficient and adequately
spaced biofuel or alternative fuel refueling network along the green
highways; and
(e) The project will result in increased access to a biofueling
infrastructure or an alternative fueling infrastructure for the
motoring public along the green highways.
(5) The director may approve ((an)) a project application for
assistance under subsection (3) of this section up to five million
dollars. In no circumstances shall this assistance constitute more
than fifty percent of the total project cost.
(((5))) (6) The director may approve a refueling project
application for assistance under subsection (4) of this section up to
fifty thousand dollars. In no circumstances shall assistance awarded
constitute more than fifty percent of the total project cost.
(7) The director shall enter into agreements with approved
applicants to fix the terms and rates of the assistance to minimize the
costs to the applicants, and to encourage establishment of a viable
bioenergy industry. The agreement shall include provisions to protect
the state's investment, including a requirement that a successful
applicant enter into contracts with any partners that may be involved
in the use of any assistance provided under this program, including
services, facilities, infrastructure, or equipment. Contracts with any
partners shall become part of the application record.
(((6))) (8) The director may defer any payments for up to twenty-four months or until the project starts to receive revenue from
operations, whichever is sooner.

PART 3
ESTABLISH GOALS FOR EMISSION REDUCTION
OF THE STATE'S MOTOR VEHICLE FLEETS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 The legislature finds that there is a
compelling public interest in reducing fossil fuel dependence and
emissions of global warming pollution. It is important for the state
of Washington to demonstrate leadership in this regard and achieve
reductions in the use of fossil fuels by state fleets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 43.19
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By no later than January 1, 2020, the annual fossil fuel usage
by the state's motor vehicle fleets must be at least twenty-five
percent below the annual usage for the year 2006.
(2) Except for cars owned or operated by the Washington state
patrol, when tires on vehicles in the state's motor vehicle fleet are
replaced, they must be replaced with tires that have the same or better
rolling resistance as the original tires.
(3) The governor shall report to the legislature at the beginning
of each biennium until January 1, 2020, on progress towards meeting the
goals in this section and any barriers to achieving the goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to chapter 43.01
RCW to read as follows:
It is in the state's interest and to the benefit of the people of
the state to encourage the use of electrical vehicles in order to
reduce emissions and provide the public with cleaner air. This section
expressly authorizes the purchase of power at state expense to recharge
privately and publicly owned plug-in electrical vehicles at state
office locations where the vehicles are used for state business, are
commute vehicles, or where the vehicles are at the state location for
the purpose of conducting business with the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 A new section is added to chapter 43.19
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In order to allow the motor vehicle fuel needs of state and
local government to be satisfied by Washington-produced biofuels, the
department of general administration shall contract in advance and
execute contracts with public or private producers, suppliers, or other
parties, for the purchase of biofuels, including but not limited to
biodiesel, ethanol, and ethanol blend fuels that are made from recycled
products or Washington feedstocks. Contract provisions may address
items including, but not limited to, fuel standards, price, and
delivery date.
(2) The department of general administration may combine the needs
of local government agencies, including ports, special districts,
school districts, and municipal corporations, for the purposes of
executing biodiesel, ethanol, and ethanol blend fuels contracts and to
secure a sufficient and stable supply of alternative fuels.

PART 4
VEHICLE ELECTRIFICATION WORK GROUP
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 (1) The legislature finds that it is in
the state's interest and to the benefit of the people of the state to
encourage the use of electrical vehicle technology that will reduce
fossil fuel dependence and toxic air pollution. Displacing petroleum
with electricity will keep more energy expenditures and jobs in
Washington's economy instead of being lost to fossil fuel imports.
(2) Motor vehicles produce more than half of the global warming
pollution in the state of Washington. Reducing the use of fossil fuels
through alternatives such as electrification is one of the most
practical, beneficial climate solutions available to the state and its
citizens.
(3) The legislature finds that cleaner fuels and vehicles,
including vehicles that use electricity, can help the state achieve
better public health, increased energy security, and substantial
economic benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 (1) The vehicle electrification work group
is established. Members of the group must be appointed by the governor
or the governor's designee and must include representatives of state
and local government agencies, ports, private and public electrical
power utilities, automobile manufacturers, trucking industry interests,
environmental interests, regional air quality agencies, and other
stakeholder groups. Staff for the work group must be provided by the
department of community, trade, and economic development, with
additional staff to be provided by other state agencies, as may be
required or requested.
(2) The vehicle electrification work group shall review, study,
evaluate, and make recommendations on at least the following items:
(a) Use by the state of plug-in hybrid vehicles and developing
plug-in availability at state locations. The use of hybrid vehicles
shall include an economic analysis of the total life-cycle cost to the
state over the vehicle's estimated useful life, including energy inputs
into the production of the vehicle, fuel usage, and all related costs
of selection, acquisition, operation, maintenance, and disposal, as far
as these costs can reasonably be determined, minus the salvage value at
the end of the vehicle's estimated useful life;
(b) Incentives to encourage the use of plug-in truck auxiliary
power units and truck stop electrification;
(c) Use of plug-in shore power for cargo and cruise ship terminals,
shipside technology, and use of electric power alternatives for port-related operations and equipment such as switching locomotives, vessels
and harborcraft, and cargo-handling equipment;
(d) Potential uses for and availability of plug-in hybrid school
buses;
(e) Potential environmental and electrical grid impacts on
electrical power consumption of the conversion of a meaningful portion
of the state's private and public fleet to plug-in electrical power;
(f) Tax and fee incentives to encourage individual and fleet
purchases of plug-in hybrid vehicles;
(g) State laws, rules, tariffs, and policies that impact
transportation electrification and plug-in adoption, including pricing
with incentives for off-peak charging;
(h) Measures to encourage the use of plug-in vehicles by public
fleets, and resulting cost savings, and whether state and local fleets
should be required to purchase plug-in hybrid vehicles if it is
determined that plug-in hybrid vehicles are commercially available at
a reasonably comparable life-cycle cost;
(i) Explore the potential for the use of electrification of fixed
transit routes for magnetic levitation propulsion systems;
(j) Actions by the state to help industries located in the state
participate in developing and manufacturing plug-in vehicles and
vehicle-to-grid technologies;
(k) Additional ways the state can promote transportation
electrification in the private and public sectors, including cars and
light-duty vehicles, and truck stop and port electrification; and
(l) Potential partners for vehicle-to-grid pilot projects that test
the use of parked plug-in vehicles for power grid energy storage and
support.
(3) The vehicle electrification work group must complete its work
by December 1, 2008. The work group must submit an interim report to
the governor stating its findings, conclusions, and interim
recommendations by December 1, 2007. The group must submit a final
report to the governor stating its findings, conclusions, and final
recommendations by December 1, 2008.
(4) This section expires July 31, 2009.

PART 5
PLANNING FOR THE FUTURE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 (1) The legislature finds that climate
change is expected to have significant impacts in the Pacific Northwest
region in the near and long-term future. These impacts include, among
other things, increased temperatures, declining snowpack, more frequent
heavy rainfall and flooding, receding glaciers, rising sea levels,
increased risks to public health due to insect and rodent-borne
diseases, declining salmon populations, and increased drought and risk
of forest fires.
(2) The legislature recognizes the need at this time to continue to
gather and analyze information related to climate protection. This
will allow prudent steps to be taken to avoid, mitigate, or respond to
climate impacts and protect our communities.
(3) The analysis of the health impacts of climate protection is
needed to help prepare the state for and avoid health impacts such as
West Nile virus and respiratory disease. At the same time, this
analysis will contribute to our strategic thinking and planning for the
impacts of climate change.
(4) The legislature finds that it is important for the state of
Washington to participate in emerging regional, national, and
international markets to mitigate climate change. The state has a
strong interest in ensuring that climate policies and emission markets
are designed to appropriately recognize our unique energy assets.
Further, the legislature recognizes that any market system related to
climate protection must be based on credible and durable accounting
principles and have equally applicable rules across sectors in order to
promote economically and environmentally effective trading.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 (1) The department of community, trade,
and economic development shall develop and recommend a framework for
the state of Washington to participate in emerging regional, national,
and global markets to mitigate climate change, on a multisector basis,
including the forest sector. This framework must include, but not be
limited to, credible, verifiable, replicable inventory and accounting
methodologies for each sector involved.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall work closely with the department of natural resources on any
elements of this section's administration that studies or makes
recommendations on the role and opportunities of the forest sector.
(3) The stakeholder process identified in Executive Order No. 07-02
shall be utilized for this section.

PART 6
THE ENERGY FREEDOM PROGRAM
Sec. 601 RCW 15.110.005 and 2006 c 171 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington's dependence on energy supplied from outside the
state and volatile global energy markets makes its economy and citizens
vulnerable to unpredictable and high energy prices;
(2) Washington's dependence on petroleum-based fuels increases
energy costs for citizens and businesses;
(3) Diesel soot from diesel engines ranks as the highest toxic air
pollutant in Washington, leading to hundreds of premature deaths and
increasing rates of asthma and other lung diseases;
(4) The use of biodiesel results in significantly less air
pollution than traditional diesel fuels;
(5) Improper disposal and treatment of organic waste from farms and
livestock operations can have a significant negative impact on water
quality;
(6) Landfill gas and wastewater treatment gas, if vented into the
atmosphere, poses a great risk to Washington's climate;
(7) Washington has abundant supplies of landfill methane and
wastewater treatment gas and organic wastes from farms ((that)), which
can be used for energy production, and abundant farmland where crops
could be grown to supplement or supplant petroleum-based fuels;
(((7))) (8) The use of energy and fuel derived from these sources
can help citizens and businesses conserve energy and reduce the use of
petroleum-based fuels, would improve air and water quality in
Washington, reduce environmental risks from landfills, wastewater
treatment plants, and farm wastes, create new markets for farm
products, and provide new industries and jobs for Washington citizens;
(((8))) (9) The bioenergy industry is a new and developing industry
that is, in part, limited by the availability of capital for the
construction of facilities for converting farm and forest products and
waste gases into energy and fuels and the availability of
infrastructure necessary to allow motorists in Washington to refuel
their biofueled or alternative fueled vehicles while traveling along
major state highways;
(((9))) (10) The 2010 Olympic and Paralympic Winter Games present
an opportunity to further Washington's energy independence by working
with Vancouver, British Columbia, Oregon, and California to develop a
hydrogen highway to showcase sustainable transportation and all of
Washington state's biofuels and alternative fuels, and to accelerate
the commercialization of hydrogen and fuel cell technologies;
(11) Instead of leaving our economy at the mercy of global events,
and the policies of foreign nations, Washington state should adopt a
policy of energy independence; and
(((10))) (12) The energy freedom program is meant to lead
Washington state towards energy independence.
Therefore, the legislature finds that it is in the public interest
to encourage the rapid adoption and use of bioenergy, to develop a
viable bioenergy industry within Washington state, to promote public
research and development in bioenergy sources and markets, ((and)) to
support a viable agriculture industry to grow bioenergy crops, and to
develop infrastructure for the use of alternative fuels and biofuels by
the motorists of Washington state. To accomplish this, the energy
freedom program is established to promote public research and
development in bioenergy, ((and)) to stimulate the construction of
facilities in Washington to generate energy from farm sources or
convert organic matter, landfill gas, or wastewater treatment gas into
fuels, and to develop refueling infrastructure in Washington state to
ensure that alternative fuels and biofuels are readily accessible to
the motorists of Washington state.

Sec. 602 RCW 15.110.010 and 2006 c 171 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Alternative fuel" means electricity, hydrogen, or liquid
natural gas produced from landfill methane gas or wastewater treatment
gas.
(2) "Applicant" means any political subdivision of the state,
including port districts, counties, cities, towns, special purpose
districts, and other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal
corporations. "Applicant" may also include federally recognized tribes
and state institutions of higher education with appropriate research
capabilities.
(((2))) (3) "Assistance" includes loans, leases, product purchases,
or other forms of financial or technical assistance.
(((3))) (4) "Department" means the department of agriculture.
(((4))) (5) "Director" means the director of the department of
agriculture.
(((5))) (6) "Green highway zone" means an area in the state
designated by the department that is within reasonable proximity of
state route number 5, state route number 90, and state route number 82.
(7) "Peer review committee" means a board, appointed by the
director, that includes bioenergy specialists, energy conservation
specialists, scientists, and individuals with specific recognized
expertise.
(((6))) (8) "Project" means the construction of facilities,
including the purchase of equipment, to convert landfill methane gas,
wastewater treatment gas, or farm products or wastes into electricity
or gaseous or liquid fuels or other coproducts associated with such
conversion. These specifically include fixed or mobile facilities to
generate electricity or methane from the anaerobic digestion of organic
matter, and fixed or mobile facilities for extracting oils from canola,
rape, mustard, and other oilseeds. "Project" may also include the
construction of facilities associated with such conversion for the
distribution and storage of such feedstocks and fuels.
(((7))) (9) "Refueling project" means the construction of new
biofuel and alternative fuel refueling facilities, as well as upgrades
and expansion of existing refueling facilities, that will enable these
facilities to offer alternative fuels to the motoring public.
(10) "Research and development project" means research and
development, by an institution of higher education as defined in
subsection (((1))) (2) of this section, relating to:
(a) Bioenergy sources including but not limited to biomass and
associated gases, landfill gas, and wastewater treatment gas; or
(b) The development of markets for bioenergy coproducts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 A new section is added to chapter 15.110
RCW to read as follows:
(1) If the total requested dollar amount of funds for refueling
projects under RCW 15.110.020(4) exceeds the amount available in the
green energy incentive subaccount created in section 604 of this act,
the applications must be prioritized based upon the following criteria:
(a) The extent to which the project will help reduce dependence on
petroleum fuels and imported energy either directly or indirectly;
(b) The extent to which the project will reduce air and water
pollution either directly or indirectly;
(c) The extent to which the project will establish a viable biofuel
or alternative fuel production capacity in Washington;
(d) The extent to which the project will make biofuels and
alternative fuels more accessible to the motoring public;
(e) The benefits to Washington's agricultural or alternative fuel
producers; and
(f) The number and quality of jobs and economic benefits created by
the project.
(2) This section does not apply to assistance awarded for projects
under RCW 15.110.020(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 A new section is added to chapter 15.110
RCW to read as follows:
The green energy incentive subaccount is created as a subaccount of
the energy freedom account. All receipts from appropriations made to
the green energy incentive subaccount shall be deposited into the
subaccount and shall be appropriated only for:
(1) Refueling projects awarded under this chapter;
(2) Pilot projects for plug-in hybrids;
(3) Programs to reduce truck stop idling;
(4) Demonstration projects developed with a science museum for the
purpose of bringing science education to children by way of a mobile
learning vehicle; and
(5) Demonstration projects developed with the University of
Washington that result in the design and building of a hydrogen vehicle
fueling station.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 Moneys deposited in the green energy
incentive subaccount created in section 604 of this act shall not
exceed one million dollars.

Sec. 606 RCW 15.110.060 and 2006 c 171 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall report to the legislature and governor on the
status of the energy freedom program created under this chapter, on or
before December 1, 2006, and annually thereafter. This report must
include information on the projects that have been funded, the status
of these projects, and their environmental, energy savings, and job
creation benefits, as well as an assessment of the availability of
biofuels and alternative fuels in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 Sections 202, 204, 205, 601 through 604,
and 606 of this act expire June 30, 2016.

PART 7
CLEAN ENERGY INCENTIVE ACCOUNT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 A new section is added to chapter 43.31
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The clean energy incentive account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from appropriations made to the account must be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only
for the purposes of this act.
(2) Any state agency receiving funding from the clean energy
incentive account is prohibited from retaining greater than three
percent of any funding provided from the clean energy incentive account
for administrative overhead or other deductions not directly associated
with conducting the research, projects, or other end products that the
funding is designed to produce.
(3) Any university, institute, or other entity that is not a state
agency receiving funding from the clean energy incentive account is
prohibited from retaining greater than three percent of any funding
provided from the clean energy incentive account for administrative
overhead or other deductions not directly associated with conducting
the research, projects, or other end products that the funding is
designed to produce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 A new section is added to chapter 43.135
RCW to read as follows:
RCW 43.135.035(4) does not apply to the transfers established in
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 A new section is added to chapter 43.19
RCW to read as follows:
The department of general administration, in conjunction with
private sector suppliers, shall develop a pilot program for providing
E85 fueling capacity at appropriate intervals and locations along at
least interstate routes 5, 82, and 90 throughout the state for the use
of public and private vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 A new section is added to chapter 28B.30
RCW to read as follows:
Washington State University is directed to analyze and recommend
models for possible implementation by the legislature or the executive
office for at least the following potential biofuels incentive
programs:
(1) Market incentives to encourage instate production of brassica-based biodiesel, and cellulosic ethanol, including such market methods
as direct grants, production tax credits, and the issuance by the state
of advance guaranteed purchase contracts;
(2) Possible preferred research programs, grants, or other forms of
assistance for accelerating the development of instate production of
cellulosic ethanol and in-state biodiesel crops and their coproducts;
(3) Coordinate with the Western Washington University alternative
automobile program for opportunities to support new Washington state
technology for conversion of fossil fuel fleets to biofuel, hybrid, or
alternative fuel propulsion;
(4) Coordinate with the University of Washington's college of
forest management and the Olympic natural resources center for the
identification of barriers to using the state's forest resources for
fuel production, including the economic and transportation barriers of
physically bringing forest biomass to the market;
(5) Developing, coordinating, and overseeing the implementation of
a plan, or series of plans, for the development of a complete supply
chain that allows for the production, transport, distribution, and
delivery to public sector end-users of biofuels produced exclusively
from recycled products or Washington feedstocks;
(6) Coordinate with the department of agriculture for the
identification of other barriers for future biofuels development; and
(7) Strategies for furthering the penetration of the Washington
state fossil fuel market with Washington produced biofuels,
particularly among public entities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 A new section is added to chapter 43.31
RCW to read as follows:
The following goals and criteria should be considered in evaluating
potential biofuel incentives to be offered by the state in conjunction
with this act: To assist Washington farmers and businesses in the
development of economically viable, sustained instate biofuel and
biofuel feedstock production; to leverage and encourage private
investment in biofuel and biofuel feedstock production; and to assist
in the development of biofuel feedstocks and production techniques that
deliver the greatest net reductions in petroleum dependence and carbon
emissions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 A new section is added to chapter 82.16
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in this section, an eligible light
and power business may claim a credit against the tax imposed under
this chapter.
(2) The amount of credit is equal to two percent annually, for a
period of at least seven but not more than thirty years after the
investment commences, of the cost of investments in distributed
generation, and in measures that improve, as measured in kilowatt-hour
savings, the overall efficiency of transmission, distribution, and
end-use consumption of electricity through energy efficiency
technologies, including any device, instrument, machine, appliance, or
process related to the transmission, distribution, and consumption of
electricity to increase energy efficiency, including but not limited to
smart grid technology, smart meters, and demand response technologies.
(3) Measures or projects encouraged under this section are those
for which construction or installation is begun after July 1, 2007, and
before January 1, 2017, and which, at the time they are placed in the
rate base, are reasonably expected to save, produce, or generate energy
at a total incremental system cost per unit of energy delivered to end
use that is less than or equal to the incremental system cost per unit
of energy delivered to end use from new baseload or peaking electric
generation and that the eligible light and power business could acquire
to meet energy demand in the same time period.
(4) The amount of credit taken under this section may not exceed
one million dollars in total for all light and power businesses in a
calendar year. If the department receives applications for credit that
exceed one million dollars prior to the end of the calendar year, the
department shall apportion the credit on a method determined by the
department.
(5) For purposes of this section, "eligible light and power
business" means a municipal utility formed under Title 35 RCW, a public
utility district formed under Title 54 RCW, an irrigation district
formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a cooperative formed under chapter
23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or association formed under chapter
24.06 RCW, or port district within which an industrial district has
been established as authorized by Title 53 RCW, that is engaged in the
business of distributing electricity to more than one retail electric
customer in the state.

PART 8
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction may adopt any rules necessary for the implementation of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---