BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.64.030 and 1981 c 268 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Commission membership shall terminate if a member ceases to
hold the position that qualified him or her for appointment. Vacancies
caused by disqualification or resignation shall be filled by the
appointing authority for the remainder of the term. No person may
serve more than two consecutive four-year terms. A person may be
reappointed after a lapse of one year. A member, rather than his or
her successor, shall continue to participate in any hearing in progress
at the end of his or her term, or when the member ceases to hold the
position that qualified him or her for appointment. The appointing
authority shall appoint an alternate to serve during a member's
temporary disability, disqualification, or inability to serve. No
member may otherwise be removed from the commission before the end of
his or her term except upon good cause found by the appointing
authority.
(2) No commission member or alternate who participates in an
investigation or initial proceeding leading to a finding of probable
cause may participate in any further proceedings, including a public
hearing on that cause.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.64.060 and 1981 c 268 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each member of the commission, and any special master appointed by
the commission, may administer oaths. The commission may summon and
examine witnesses and compel the production and examination of papers,
books, accounts, documents, records, certificates, and other evidence
for the determination of any issue before or the discharge of any duty
of the commission. The commission shall also issue subpoenas at the
request and on behalf of any judge or justice under inquiry. All
subpoenas shall be signed by a member of the commission or a special
master appointed by the commission. Subpoenas shall be served and
witnesses reimbursed in the manner provided in civil cases in superior
court. All discovery prior to a public hearing shall be conducted
pursuant to the rules of civil procedure promulgated by the Washington
state supreme court. Any jurist subject to proceedings before the
commission shall be entitled to obtain discovery pursuant to these
rules from the commission, its staff, and other persons involved in the
investigation or analysis leading to a determination of probable cause.

Sec. 3 RCW 2.64.111 and 2005 c 274 s 201 are each amended to read
as follows:
All pleadings, papers, evidence records, and files of the
commission, including complaints and the identity of complainants,
compiled or obtained during the course of an investigation or initial
proceeding involving the discipline or retirement of a judge or
justice, are exempt from the public disclosure requirements of chapter
42.56 RCW during such investigation or initial proceeding, provided any
respondent jurist shall at all times be entitled to disclosure of the
information unless a superior court of competent jurisdiction shall
order otherwise upon a finding based on a preponderance of the evidence
that the public interest requires preventing such disclosure. As of
the date ((of a public hearing)) the commission makes a finding of
probable cause, all those records of the initial investigation and
initial commission proceeding ((that were the basis of a finding of
probable cause)) are subject to the public disclosure requirements of
chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 2.64.115 and 1989 c 367 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission is subject to the open public meetings act, chapter
42.30 RCW. However, investigations, initial proceedings, public
hearings, and executive sessions involving the discipline or retirement
of a judge or justice are governed by this chapter and Article IV,
section 31 of the state Constitution and to the extent required by the
state Constitution are exempt from the provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 2.64.120 and 1981 c 268 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall for all purposes be considered an independent
part of the judicial branch of government and all members and
alternates shall be subject to the code of judicial conduct as
promulgated by the Washington state supreme court. For purposes of the
application of the code of judicial conduct, members and alternates of
the commission shall be subject to the exceptions pertaining to judges
pro tempore in the code of judicial conduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---