BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.26.715 and 2003 c 2 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) An eleven member board of trustees is hereby created.
(a) Three of the board members shall be active law enforcement
officers who are participants in the plan. Beginning with the first
vacancy on or after January 1, 2007, one board member shall be either
an active or a retired law enforcement officer who is a ((member))
participant of the plan. The law enforcement officer board members
shall be appointed by the governor from a list provided by a recognized
statewide council whose membership consists exclusively of guilds,
associations, and unions representing state and local government police
officers, deputies, and sheriffs and excludes federal law enforcement
officers.
(b) Three of the board members shall be active firefighters who are
participants in the plan. Beginning with the first vacancy on or after
January 1, 2007, one board member shall be either an active or a
retired firefighter who is a ((member)) participant of the plan. The
firefighter board member shall be appointed by the governor from a list
provided by a recognized statewide council, affiliated with an
international association representing the interests of firefighters.
(c) Three of the board members shall be representatives of
employers and shall be appointed by the governor.
(d) One board member shall be a member of the house of
representatives who is appointed by the governor based on the
recommendation of the speaker of the house of representatives.
(e) One board member shall be a member of the senate who is
appointed by the governor based on the recommendation of the majority
leader of the senate.
(2) The initial law enforcement officer and firefighter board
members shall serve terms of six, four, and two years, respectively.
Thereafter, law enforcement officer and firefighter board members serve
terms of six years. ((The remaining board members serve terms of four
years.)) The initial employer representative board members shall serve
terms of four, five, and six years, respectively. Thereafter, employer
representative board members serve terms of four years. The initial
legislative board members shall serve terms of four years and six
months. Thereafter, legislative board members serve terms of two
years, which begin on January 1st of odd-numbered years. Board members
may be reappointed to succeeding terms without limitation. Board
members shall serve until their successors are appointed and seated.
(3) In the event of a vacancy on the board, the vacancy shall be
filled in the same manner as prescribed for an initial appointment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislative board members appointed under RCW 41.26.715 must
include one member from the two largest political parties. The speaker
of the house of representatives shall request a recommendation from the
minority leader of the house of representatives if a member from the
opposite party must be recommended for appointment. The majority
leader of the senate shall request a recommendation from the minority
leader of the senate if a member from the opposite party must be
recommended for appointment.

--- END ---