BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.26.547 and 2005 c 459 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member of plan 2 who was a member of the public employees'
retirement system while employed providing emergency medical services
for a city, town, county, or district and whose job was relocated from
another department of a city, town, county, or district to a fire
department, or a member of the public employees' retirement system who
is eligible for membership in plan 2 under RCW 41.26.030(4)(h), has the
following options:
(a) Remain a member of the public employees' retirement system; or
(b) Leave any service credit earned as a member of the public
employees' retirement system in the public employees' retirement
system, and have all future service earned in the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2, becoming a dual
member under the provisions of chapter 41.54 RCW; or
(c) Make an election no later than June 30, 2013, filed in writing
with the department of retirement systems, to transfer service credit
previously earned as an emergency medical technician for a city, town,
county, or district in the public employees' retirement system plan 1
or plan 2 to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement
system plan 2 as defined in RCW 41.26.030. Service credit that a
member elects to transfer from the public employees' retirement system
to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system
under this section shall be transferred no earlier than five years
after the effective date the member elects to transfer except under
subsection (3) of this section, and only after the member earns five
years of service credit as a firefighter following the effective date
the member elects to transfer except under subsection (3) of this
section.
(2) A member of plan 1 who was a member of the public employees'
retirement system while employed providing emergency medical services
for a city, town, county, or district and whose job was relocated from
another department of a city, town, county, or district to a fire
department has the following options:
(a) Remain a member of the public employees' retirement system; or
(b) Leave any service credit earned as a member of the public
employees' retirement system in the public employees' retirement
system, and have all future service earned in the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1.
(3)(a) A member who elects to transfer service credit under
subsection (1)(c) of this section shall make the payments required by
this subsection prior to having service credit earned as an emergency
medical technician for a city, town, county, or district under the
public employees' retirement system plan 1 or plan 2 transferred to the
law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2.
However, in no event shall service credit be transferred earlier than
five years after the effective date the member elects to transfer, or
prior to the member earning five years of service credit as a
firefighter following the effective date the member elects to transfer,
except under (e) of this subsection.
(b) A member who elects to transfer service credit under this
subsection shall pay, for the applicable period of service, the
difference between the contributions the employee paid to the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 or plan 2 and the contributions
that would have been paid by the employee had the employee been a
member of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement
system plan 2, plus interest on this difference as determined by the
director. This payment must be made no later than five years from the
effective date of the election made under subsection (1)(c) of this
section and must be made prior to retirement, except under (e) of this
subsection.
(c) For a period of service transferred by a member eligible for
membership in plan 2 under RCW 41.26.030(4)(h), the employer shall pay
an amount sufficient to ensure that the contribution level to the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system will not
increase due to this transfer. This payment must be made within five
years of the completion of the employee payment in (b) of this
subsection.
(d) No earlier than five years after the effective date the member
elects to transfer service credit under this section and upon
completion of the payment required in (b) of this subsection except
under (e) of this subsection, the department shall transfer from the
public employees' retirement system plan 1 or plan 2 to the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2: (i)
All of the employee's applicable accumulated contributions plus
interest and an equal amount of employer contributions; and (ii) all
applicable months of service, as defined in RCW 41.26.030(14)(b),
credited to the employee under this chapter for service as an emergency
services provider for a city, town, county, or district as though that
service was rendered as a member of the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system plan 2.
(e) If a member who elected to transfer pursuant to this section
dies or retires for disability prior to five years from their election
date, the member's benefit is calculated as follows:
(i) All of the applicable service credit, accumulated
contributions, and interest is transferred to the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 and used in the
calculation of a benefit.
(ii) If a member's obligation under (b) of this subsection has not
been paid in full at the time of death or disability retirement, the
member, or in the case of death the surviving spouse or eligible minor
children, have the following options:
(A) Pay the bill in full;
(B) If a continuing monthly benefit is chosen, have the benefit
actuarially reduced to reflect the amount of the unpaid obligation
under (b) of this subsection; or
(C) Continue to make payment against the obligation under (b) of
this subsection, provided that payment in full is made no later than
five years from the member's original election date.
(f) Upon transfer of service credit, contributions, and interest
under this subsection, the employee is permanently excluded from
membership in the public employees' retirement system for all service
transfers related to their time served as an emergency medical
technician for a city, town, county, or district under the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 or plan 2.

Sec. 2 2005 c 459 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
Section 2 of this act expires July 1, ((2013)) 2023.

Sec. 3 2003 c 293 s 2 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
This act expires July 1, ((2013)) 2023.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires July 1, 2023.

--- END ---