BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds as follows:
(a) The competitiveness of the telecommunications marketplace has
created consumer choice and strengthened the state's position as a
national leader in the area of technology services and infrastructure;
(b) Traditional regulated intrastate wireline telecommunications
services are part of a larger and broadening market and industry that
includes voice, data, video, and other services that use fixed and
mobile wireless, satellite, coaxial cable, fiber optic, internet, power
line, and other converging technologies largely provided by a variety
of unregulated or minimally regulated private and public entities;
(c) New telecommunications technologies and service providers
continue to emerge;
(d) Encouraging investment in such technologies and services is
vital to the economic future of the state and to family wage jobs for
its citizens;
(e) Unlike competing companies, traditional wireline
telecommunications companies are subject to legacy regulations that
were created a century ago to regulate in a monopoly environment.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to review the
state's statutes and rules and make recommendations that level the
competitive playing field, encourage investment in new technologies and
services, and enhance consumer choice, economic development, and job
preservation and creation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A joint task force on the reform of
telecommunications regulation is created.
(2) The membership of the joint task force consists of the
following five persons:
(a) The chairs and ranking members of the respective
telecommunications committees within the senate and house of
representatives;
(b) A representative of the governor's office.
(3) The task force shall appoint an advisory committee consisting
of a representative of the Washington utilities and transportation
commission, industry representatives, and a consumer representative.
(4) The staff of the telecommunications committees of the senate
and house of representatives will provide clerical, administrative,
research, and other services to the joint task force as directed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The joint task force shall make
recommendations to reform telecommunications laws in the state of
Washington, and shall, at a minimum, review the following:
(a) The obsolescence of legacy rate of return regulation in a new
era of increasing wireline and intermodal competition;
(b) The impact of disparate regulatory treatment on consumer choice
in telecommunications services;
(c) Means of achieving regulatory parity among competitors in the
telecommunications marketplace; and
(d) The reform of the regulatory oversight of video and
telecommunications franchising.
(2) The joint task force shall deliver its report and
recommendations to the legislature and the governor by December 15,
2007.

--- END ---