BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.24.250 and 1999 c 148 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state board for volunteer firefighters and reserve officers is
created to consist of ((three members of a fire department covered by))
five members who are participants under this chapter, at least three of
whom are not receiving relief or retirement pension payments under this
chapter, no two of whom shall be from the same congressional
district((, to be)). The members are appointed by the governor to
serve overlapping terms of six years. Of members first appointed, one
shall be appointed for a term of six years, one for five years, one for
four years, one for three years, and one for two years. The governor
may consider participants who are recommended for appointment by the
appropriate state associations. Upon the expiration of a term, a
successor shall be appointed by the governor for a term of six years.
Any vacancy shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired term.
Each member of the state board, before entering on the performance of
his or her duties, shall take an oath that he or she will not knowingly
violate or willingly permit the violation of any provision of law
applicable to this chapter, which oath shall be filed with the
secretary of state.
The state board ((shall not be deemed to be)) is not unlawfully
constituted and a member of the board ((shall not be deemed)) is not
ineligible to serve the remainder of the member's unexpired term on the
board solely by reason of the establishment of new or revised
boundaries for congressional districts.

--- END ---