BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A health carrier may not develop and use provider and benefit
payment methodologies that pay for chiropractic services in a lesser
amount than the carrier pays for substantially similar health care
services provided by a different profession. The carrier may not use
a payment methodology that would pay chiropractors less than any other
type of provider for the same billing and payment code.
(2) This section applies only to payment methodologies developed or
used on and after January 1, 2009.

--- END ---