BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Health carriers may not directly or indirectly, through
contract or otherwise, refuse to reimburse for the health care services
legally provided by employees of a contracted chiropractor working at
the same location as the contracted chiropractor if the service would
be a reimbursable benefit but for the contractor's refusal to recognize
or reimburse the services performed by employees of the contracted
chiropractor.
(2) Health carriers may not require directly or indirectly, by
contract, reimbursement requirements, utilization review methods, or
otherwise, that a chiropractor comply with health care delivery
standards that conflict with those standards and practices authorized
or adopted by the Washington state chiropractic quality assurance
commission. A contract may not prohibit a chiropractor from delegating
duties in accordance with rules governing the chiropractic profession,
nor may a contractor refuse to reimburse the contracted chiropractor
for such delegated services if those services would be reimbursed if
not delegated. A carrier may require all contracted health care
providers to participate in a quality assurance program that relies
upon evidence-based health care delivery standards.
(3) Any term or condition of any contract between a chiropractor
and a carrier that violates a provision of this section and any attempt
to waive, modify, or shift responsibility for compliance with this
section is invalid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act does not affect any existing right
acquired or liability or obligation incurred prior to the effective
date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Every provider contract executed or renewed
on or after January 1, 2008, shall conform to the provisions of this
act.

--- END ---