BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The legislature affirms
the state's long-standing policy of promoting informed public
discussion and understanding of statewide ballot measures and declares
that it is in the best interests of the state to provide for an
independent and impartial analysis of those measures to be made
available to voters so that they may thoughtfully evaluate the
measures. In support of these declarations, the legislature makes the
following findings:
(1) In Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution, the people
of the state of Washington reserved the right to initiate and vote on
legislation through the initiative and referendum processes;
(2) It is the long-standing policy of the state and an underlying
premise of democratic government that informed public discussion will
enhance the direct legislation process. This is supported by recent
studies and surveys, presented to the legislature, suggesting that
review by an impartial and independent panel of Washington voters would
lead to better, more informed public discussion and would thus enhance
the direct legislation process;
(3) The most effective way to make available this type of
independent and impartial information is for the state to convene
panels of voters, demographically representative of the state as a
whole, who will study and evaluate ballot measures through a quasi-legislative hearing process, and to make the panels' findings public by
inclusion in the voters' pamphlet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 CITIZENS INITIATIVE REVIEW COMMISSION
CREATED; GOVERNING BOARD. The citizens initiative review commission is
created as an independent commission within the legislative branch of
government. The commission's purpose is to ensure that citizens panels
are convened as specified in this chapter; that the activities of these
panels are conducted in a fair and impartial manner; that the funds of
the commission are spent efficiently and effectively; and that
appropriate training is provided to the panels, the panel moderators,
and commission staff. The board of commissioners shall consist of
twelve commissioners appointed to serve as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, each
commissioner's term shall be three years. The governor, the attorney
general, and the secretary of state shall each appoint one
commissioner. Six commissioners shall be chosen by the evaluation
panels from among the former citizen panelists, in accordance with
section 7(2)(d) of this act. Three commissioners shall be chosen by
the panel of moderators from among former moderators in accordance with
section 7(3)(d) of this act. The terms of the commissioners shall be
staggered so that four commissioner terms expire each year.
(b) The commissioners appointed to the initial board shall be
appointed and serve in accordance with section 12 of this act.
(2) Commissioners must be registered voters of the state of
Washington and may not serve in any publicly elected office while
serving on the commission.
(3) Commissioners shall take office on January 1st of each year,
except in the case of the initial board appointed in accordance with
subsection (1)(b) of this section. Each commissioner shall serve until
a successor is appointed and takes office. Vacancies shall be filled
by appointment in the same manner as for the commissioner so vacating.
If a vacancy results other than from expiration of a term, the vacancy
shall be filled for the unexpired term. Commissioners may not be
appointed to successive terms, except that if a commissioner is
appointed to fill an unexpired term of two years or less, or if an
initial commissioner is appointed to a one or two-year term, he or she
may also fill the next successive term.
(4) No commissioner may permit his or her name to be used or make
any campaign contribution in support of or opposition to any statewide
ballot measure.
(5) The commission shall meet at least three times per year and may
appoint its own chair, vice-chair, and other officers and committees as
it deems appropriate and make rules for orderly procedure.
(6) Commissioners shall be compensated for their attendance at
commission meetings and reimbursed for their travel expenses related to
attendance at those meetings, in the same manner as citizen panelists
under section 4(3) of this act.
(7) The commission shall make all rules facilitating the conduct of
the commission and its activities under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 CITIZENS INITIATIVE REVIEW COMMISSION
POWERS. The citizens initiative review commission has the following
powers:
(1) To select and employ an executive director and such research,
technical, and clerical personnel and consultants as the commission
deems necessary, whose salaries shall be fixed by the commission, and
who are exempt from the provisions of the state civil service law,
chapter 41.06 RCW;
(2) To make any contracts necessary or incidental to the
performance of its duties and the execution of its powers, including
contracts with public and private agencies, organizations,
corporations, and individuals, and to pay for services rendered or
furnished;
(3) To make such rules as are necessary to carry out its
responsibilities, including, without limitation, rules to ensure that
each panel and its panelists are able to carry out their
responsibilities under this chapter in a manner that is fair and
impartial and is reasonably perceived to be fair and impartial;
(4) To lease, purchase or otherwise contract for the use of real or
personal property or any interest therein, as it finds necessary to
carry out the activities conducted under this chapter; and
(5) To do other acts and things necessary or convenient to execute
the authority expressly granted to it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 CITIZENS PANELS. Beginning in 2008, a
citizens panel shall be convened not more than forty-five days after
the citizens initiative review commission receives a certificate of
sufficiency from the secretary of state regarding a statewide ballot
measure. One panel shall be convened for each measure so certified.
(1) Each citizens panel shall consist of twenty-four registered
Washington voters. The commission shall provide for alternate
panelists as it deems appropriate. The commission shall adopt rules
for selection of panelists that: (a) Provide for the anonymous
selection of panelists from a representative sample of Washington
voters, using survey sampling methods that, to the extent practicable,
give every Washington voter a similar chance of being selected; and (b)
ensure, to the extent practicable and legally permissible, that the
demographic makeup of each panel fairly reflects the population of the
state as a whole, with respect to characteristics including but not
limited to age, education, and geographic location.
(2) The commission shall adopt such uniform rules regarding service
on a citizens panel as the commission deems appropriate in order to
keep the citizens panel process from being unduly influenced by persons
having special knowledge of or a special interest in the ballot measure
being evaluated. These rules shall provide, as an example and not by
way of limitation, that: (a) Persons who have made a contribution in
support of or in opposition to a ballot measure, or who receive
compensation for their efforts in support of or opposition to a ballot
measure, may not serve on a panel evaluating that measure; and (b)
persons who hold a statewide elective office or serve as a commissioner
on a state board or head of a state agency may not serve on any
citizens panel.
(3) Compensation shall be paid to each panelist per day served.
This per diem payment shall be calculated based on an eight-hour day
paid at the mean hourly wage for all occupations as published in the
most recent Washington state occupational employment and wage estimates
using the occupational employment statistics data collected by the
United States department of labor's bureau of labor statistics. Each
panelist shall also be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with reimbursement policies established by the commission.
(4) From the time of his or her appointment through the conclusion
of the citizens panel's activities, no panelist may at any time permit
his or her name to be used, or make any contribution, in support of or
opposition to any ballot measure reviewed by that panelist. Persons
serving on a citizens panel shall comply with the appearance of
fairness doctrine provisions as described in RCW 42.36.060, 42.36.080,
and 42.36.090 as if the panelists were members of a decision-making
body in proceedings subject to that statute. However, neither the
appearance of fairness doctrine nor chapter 42.36 RCW may form the
basis of any challenge to any report submitted by a citizens panel. A
citizens panel is not an agency of the state, the commission, or any
other governmental body and is exempt from chapters 42.30 and 42.56
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 CITIZENS PANEL PROCESS; DISTRIBUTION OF
REPORTS. (1) Each citizens panel shall meet for five days, during
which time its activities shall be moderated by two moderators, chosen
in accordance with section 8 of this act, and supported by citizens
initiative review commission staff. Each panel shall conduct its
activities as follows:
(a)(i) Each panel shall hold open public hearings, which may be
interspersed with the small group work sessions described under (b) of
this subsection. During these public hearings, a team of proponents
and a team of opponents, each identified pursuant to section 6(3) of
this act, shall be given equal time within which to present its
arguments and supporting information, including but not limited to
presentations given by persons of its choosing. The public hearings
shall also provide time for discussion among panelists and shall
provide the panelists with time to question the proponents' team, the
opponents' team, and any other person who has provided a presentation
to the panel.
(ii) The office of financial management shall provide, at the
public hearings, an analysis of the fiscal impact of the measure
prepared pursuant to RCW 29A.72.025.
(iii) The commission shall adopt rules to permit the panelists, by
majority vote of the citizens panel, to request additional background
information or presentations to be provided in the public hearings.
Panelists shall be permitted to choose from sources identified by
commission staff, which include each person who has registered with the
commission as interested in providing information or a presentation,
and such additional persons or sources as may meet the criteria
established by the commission.
(b)(i) The panelists shall meet in small group work sessions, which
may be interspersed with the public hearings described under(a) of this
subsection. The work sessions shall be attended only by the panelists,
moderators, and commission staff.
(ii) A final report on the measure, as described in subsection (2)
of this section, shall be prepared in small group work sessions. A
report is final once each component has been submitted by its authors
as described in subsection (2) of this section. No final report or any
component is subject to revision by the panel as a whole, the
commission, or any other governmental body. No person has any right to
appeal or challenge a report or any component of a report except as
described in RCW 29A.32.090.
(c) The panel shall adjourn once the citizens panel report is final
and the panelists have chosen members to participate on an evaluation
panel as described in section 7 of this act.
(2) The report shall be prepared in a form provided by commission
staff, which includes the following:
(a) The ballot title and full text of the ballot measure;
(b) Position statements of not more than two hundred fifty words,
explaining the reasoning and position taken by the group of panelists
in favor of the measure, by those opposed to the measure, and by those
undecided on the measure. Each group shall author one position
statement representing the consensus of that group. The position
statement shall identify the number of panelists taking that position,
and no position statement is required for a position if no panelists
take that position.
(c) A panel consensus statement of not more than one hundred fifty
words explaining the points, if any, upon which all panelists agree;
(d) The following disclaimer: "The statements and opinions
expressed are those of the panel members, developed through the
citizens panel process. These are NOT official opinions or positions
endorsed by the state, the citizens initiative review commission, or
any government agency. The state is prohibited from editing or
redacting the content of these statements. A citizens panel is not a
judge of the constitutionality or legality of any ballot measure, and
any statements about such matters are not binding on any court of law."
(3) After each citizens panel report is final, the commission staff
shall:
(a) Within two business days, transmit to the secretary of state
for inclusion in the voters' pamphlet, in accordance with RCW
29A.32.070, the serial number identifying the ballot measure evaluated
and the information described in subsection (2)(b) through (d) of this
section; and
(b) Within fifteen business days, make available on a commission
web site the final report and such other information as the commission
may by general rule require.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 PROCEDURES FOR CITIZENS PANELS. (1) The
citizens initiative review commission shall adopt rules to ensure that
citizens panels are conducted in a fair and impartial manner,
including, at a minimum, provisions for the release of citizens panel
reports and media relations. To facilitate the process of convening
citizens panels in a timely manner, the rules may provide for panelist
selection and notification to begin before ballot measures are
certified. The rules must provide for instruction to panelists
regarding use of information gathered outside of the panel proceedings.
(2) No more than one week after receiving a certification under RCW
29A.72.250 or 29A.72.260, the commission must provide notice to the
sponsor of the ballot measure, to every person who has requested
notification of ballot title language under RCW 29A.72.070, to the
persons chosen to write arguments for the voters' pamphlet pursuant to
RCW 29A.32.060, and to any other person who makes written request to
the commission for such notification. This notice must include the
dates, time, and place of the hearings and must explain how to register
to provide information or a presentation to the panel. Information
regarding the persons who so register will be provided to the citizens
panel, and those persons may be called by the panel during the open
public hearings at the discretion of the panel. The notice shall
establish a deadline for registration that is two weeks prior to the
date the citizens panel is scheduled to convene.
(3)(a) The sponsor of a ballot measure, as registered with the
secretary of state, shall serve as the leader of a proponent team, who
shall be charged with providing to the citizens panel information and
presentations in favor of the ballot measure. In the case of a measure
referred or proposed by the legislature, the proponent team leader
shall be chosen from among those writing the voters' pamphlet statement
in favor of the measure in the same manner as the opponent team leader
is chosen in (b) of this subsection.
(b) The members of the committee chosen pursuant to RCW 29A.32.060
to prepare a statement for the voters' pamphlet in opposition to the
measure shall be notified of the opportunity to serve as leader of the
opponent team. If no individual from this group volunteers to serve,
or if more than one individual volunteers to serve, the commission
staff shall attempt to facilitate an agreement among those individuals
as to who should lead the team. If no decision can be reached among
the individuals, commission staff shall choose a team leader. No
person has the right to appeal or challenge the choice of team leader.
(4) Prior to the date that the citizens panel convenes, commission
staff must prepare an agenda for the citizens panel proceedings,
including the agendas or outlines submitted by each team, and send that
schedule to each panelist and to each person to whom notice was sent
under subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 EVALUATION PROCEDURES. (1) The citizens
initiative review commission shall annually evaluate the conduct of the
citizens panels. To facilitate this evaluation, the commission shall,
after the statewide general election each year that a citizens panel
was convened:
(a) Conduct a statewide study of Washington voters and collect
other data to determine the usefulness of the citizens panels and their
reports, the results of which must be made public; and
(b) Convene no later than February 1st of the following year, an
evaluation panel in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, and
a moderator panel in accordance with subsection (3) of this section.
(2)(a) Prior to convening the first citizens panel in a calendar
year, the executive director, or in the absence of an executive
director the commission, shall choose the number of citizen panelists
that comprise the evaluation panel. The number chosen must be between
eight and eighteen and must be based on the number of expected ballot
measures, so that each citizens panel elects, pursuant to section
5(1)(c) of this act, an equal number of its members to serve on the
evaluation panel.
(b) The evaluation panel shall meet for not more than three days to
conduct its review. The evaluation panel shall submit a report and may
make recommendations to the commission on all procedural aspects of the
citizens panel proceedings.
(c) Panelists serving on the evaluation panel shall be compensated
for their attendance at evaluation panel meetings and reimbursed for
their travel expenses in the same manner as citizen panelists under
section 4(3) of this act.
(d) The evaluation panel shall choose two of its members to serve
on the commission for a three-year term, in accordance with section 2
of this act.
(3) In each year in which a citizens panel is convened, the
commission shall convene a panel of moderators to meet no later than
February 1st of the following year.
(a) The panel of moderators shall consist of all those who served
as moderators of the citizens panels for the most recent election
cycle.
(b) The panel of moderators shall meet for one or two days to
conduct its review. They shall submit a report and may make
recommendations to the commission on all procedural aspects of the
citizens panel proceedings.
(c) Panelists shall be compensated for their attendance at
moderator panel meetings at the same daily rate they were paid as
moderators of the citizens panels, and reimbursed for their travel
expenses in the same manner as citizen panelists under section 4(3) of
this act.
(d) The panel of moderators shall choose one of its members to
serve on the commission for a three-year term, in accordance with
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 CITIZENS' PANEL MODERATORS. (1) The
citizens initiative review commission shall establish minimum
qualifications for citizens panel moderators, including but not limited
to: (a) Minimum levels of experience in facilitation or mediation and
completion of at least two days of training specifically designed for
moderators of citizens panels under this chapter; and (b) such
additional qualifications as the commission deems appropriate in order
to ensure that the citizens panel process is conducted in a fair and
impartial manner.
(2) The commission shall request the qualifications of potential
moderators and shall designate a pool of moderators. The commission
shall contract with two moderators for each citizens panel to be
convened. The contract for services shall cover compensation for the
moderators for their services in preparation for a citizens panel,
moderating a citizens panel, and participating on the subsequent panel
of moderators.
(3) No moderator may at any time permit his or her name to be used,
or make any contribution, in support of or opposition to the ballot
measure reviewed by the citizens panel he or she is involved with
moderating.

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.32.070 and 2003 c 111 s 807 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall determine the format and layout of the
voters' pamphlet. The secretary of state shall print the pamphlet in
clear, readable type on a size, quality, and weight of paper that in
the judgment of the secretary of state best serves the voters. The
pamphlet must contain a table of contents. Federal and state offices
must appear in the pamphlet in the same sequence as they appear on the
ballot. Measures and arguments must be printed in the order specified
by RCW 29A.72.290.
The voters' pamphlet must provide the following information for
each statewide issue on the ballot:
(1) The legal identification of the measure by serial designation
or number;
(2) The official ballot title of the measure;
(3) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the law
as it presently exists;
(4) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the
effect of the proposed measure if it becomes law;
(5) The fiscal impact statement prepared under RCW ((29.79.075))
29A.72.025;
(6) The total number of votes cast for and against the measure in
the senate and house of representatives, if the measure has been passed
by the legislature;
(7) An argument advocating the voters' approval of the measure
together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;
(8) An argument advocating the voters' rejection of the measure
together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;
(9) Each argument or rebuttal statement must be followed by the
names of the committee members who submitted them, and may be followed
by a telephone number that citizens may call to obtain information on
the ballot measure;
(10) The information received from the citizens initiative review
commission under section 5(3)(a) of this act; and
(11) The full text of each measure.

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.72.250 and 2003 c 111 s 1825 are each amended to
read as follows:
If a referendum or initiative petition for submission of a measure
to the people is found sufficient, the secretary of state shall:
(1) Immediately upon each such finding of sufficiency, provide to
the citizens initiative review commission, created under section 2 of
this act, the serial number and ballot title of that ballot measure;
and
(2) At the time and in the manner that he or she certifies to the
county auditors of the various counties the names of candidates for
state and district officers certify to each county auditor the serial
numbers and ballot titles of the several initiative and referendum
measures to be voted upon at the next ensuing general election or
special election ordered by the legislature.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.72.260 and 2003 c 111 s 1826 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever any measure proposed by initiative petition for submission
to the legislature is rejected by the legislature or the legislature
takes no action thereon before the end of the regular session at which
it is submitted, the secretary of state shall certify the serial number
and ballot title thereof to the citizens initiative review commission
created under section 2 of this act and to the county auditors for
printing on the ballots at the next ensuing general election in like
manner as initiative measures for submission to the people are
certified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 APPOINTMENT OF INITIAL BOARD OF
COMMISSIONERS. The initial commissioners shall be appointed and serve
as follows:
(1) The governor, the secretary of state, and the attorney general
shall each appoint one commissioner. These commissioners shall be
randomly assigned to a one, two, or three-year term.
(2) The three initial commissioners occupying the moderators' seats
shall be appointed by the governor, the secretary of state, and the
attorney general, choosing from a list of trained moderators that has
been provided by a nonprofit organization registered under section
501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code that has conducted pilot
projects in Washington state using methods similar to the citizens
panel review process, which pilot projects have drawn together
microcosms of the public for meetings lasting for more than one full
day. If more than one organization meeting these criteria provides a
list, the first three commissioners shall choose which list to use.
The commissioners appointed pursuant to this subsection shall be
randomly assigned to a one, two, or three-year term.
(3) Of the six citizen panelist seats, only four shall be filled
initially. The majority and minority leaders of the house of
representatives and senate shall each appoint one of the commissioners
from a list of persons provided by the nonprofit organization described
in subsection (2) of this section. Each of these initial commissioners
shall be assigned to a two or three-year term, so that two seats expire
in each year. The remaining two citizen panelist seats shall be filled
by individuals chosen by the first evaluation panel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 CODIFICATION. Sections 1 through 8 and 12
of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 29A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are
not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---