BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.0273 and 2003 c 53 s 399 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales to))
Nonresidents of this state are eligible for an exemption in the form of
a remittance of state and local sales tax paid on purchases of tangible
personal property for use outside this state when the purchaser (a) is
a bona fide resident of a state or possession or Province of Canada
other than the state of Washington and such state, possession, or
Province of Canada does not impose a retail sales tax or use tax of
three percent or more or, if imposing such a tax, permits Washington
residents exemption from otherwise taxable sales by reason of their
residence, and (b) ((agrees, when requested,)) applies to the
department for remittance of the tax paid. In the application, the
purchaser must agree to grant the department of revenue access to such
records and other forms of verification at his or her place of
residence to assure that such purchases are not first used
substantially in the state of Washington.
(2)(((a) Any person claiming exemption from retail sales tax under
the provisions of this section must display proof of his or her current
nonresident status as herein provided.
(b) Acceptable proof of a nonresident person's status shall include
one piece of identification such as a valid driver's license from the
jurisdiction in which the out-of-state residency is claimed or a valid
identification card which has a photograph of the holder and is issued
by the out-of-state jurisdiction. Identification under this subsection
(2)(b) must show the holder's residential address and have as one of
its legal purposes the establishment of residency in that out-of-state
jurisdiction.
(3) Nothing in this section requires the vendor to make tax exempt
retail sales to nonresidents. A vendor may choose to make sales to
nonresidents, collect the sales tax, and remit the amount of sales tax
collected to the state as otherwise provided by law. If the vendor
chooses to make a sale to a nonresident without collecting the sales
tax, the vendor shall, in good faith, examine the proof of
nonresidence, determine whether the proof is acceptable under
subsection (2)(b) of this section, and maintain records for each
nontaxable sale which shall show the type of proof accepted, including
any identification numbers where appropriate, and the expiration date,
if any.
(4)(a))) Any person making fraudulent statements((, which includes
the offer of fraudulent identification or fraudulently procured
identification to a vendor, in order to purchase goods without paying
retail sales tax)) is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.
(((b))) Any person ((making tax exempt purchases under this section by
displaying proof of identification not his or her own, or counterfeit
identification, with intent to violate the provisions of this
section,)) obtaining a remittance of tax in violation of this section
is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, shall be liable for the
tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one hundred
dollars or the tax due on such purchases.
(((5)(a) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the tax to
a person who does not hold valid identification establishing out-of-
state residency, and any vendor who fails to maintain records of sales
to nonresidents as provided in this section, shall be personally liable
for the amount of tax due.
(b) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the retail sales
tax under this section and who has actual knowledge that the
purchaser's proof of identification establishing out-of-state residency
is fraudulent is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, shall be
liable for the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one
thousand dollars or the tax due on such sales. In addition, both the
purchaser and the vendor shall be liable for any penalties and interest
assessable under chapter 82.32 RCW.))
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, an
individual may not qualify for remittance of local sales tax under this
section when the local jurisdiction has passed an ordinance or
resolution which specifies no remittance is permissible.

--- END ---