BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.56.040 and 2003 c 111 s 1404 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except where necessary to accommodate the national or state
rules of a major political party or where this chapter specifically
provides otherwise, the presidential primary must be conducted in
substantially the same manner as a state partisan primary under this
title.
(2) Except as provided under this chapter or by rule of the
secretary of state adopted under RCW 29A.04.620, the arrangement and
form of presidential primary ballots must be ((substantially as
provided for a partisan primary under this title. Whenever requested
by a major political party, a separate ballot containing)) consistent
with RCW 29A.52.151. Only the candidates ((of that party)) who have
qualified under RCW 29A.56.030 ((must be provided for a voter who
requests a ballot of that party. A primary ballot, containing the
names of all the candidates who have qualified for a place on the
ballot under RCW 29A.56.030, must be provided for nonaffiliated
voters)) may appear on the ballots.
(3) ((The)) Each party's ballot or portion of the ballot must list
alphabetically the names of all candidates for the office of president.
The ballot must clearly indicate the political party of each candidate
((adjacent to the name of that candidate)). Each ballot must include
a blank space to allow the voter to write in the name of any other
candidate.
(4) A presidential primary ballot with votes for more than one
candidate is void, and notice to this effect, stated in clear, simple
language and printed in large type, must appear on the face of each
presidential primary ballot or on or about each voting device.

--- END ---