BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The division of archives and records management is established in
the office of the secretary of state to ensure the proper management
and safeguarding of public records. All public records remain the
property of the state of Washington. Public records must be delivered
by outgoing officials and employees to their successors and must be
retained, preserved, stored, transferred, destroyed, or disposed of in
accordance with this chapter. The state archivist will administer the
division and must have reasonable access to all public records,
wherever kept, for the purposes of information, surveying, or
cataloging.

PART II
DEFINITIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "General retention schedule" means a records retention schedule
applicable to any state or local agency.
(2) "Legislative record" means correspondence, committee bill
files, amendments, reports, and minutes of meetings made by or
submitted to legislative committees or subcommittees and transcripts or
other records of hearings or supplementary written testimony or data
thereof filed with committees or subcommittees in connection with the
exercise of legislative or investigatory functions. "Legislative
record" does not include the records of an official act of the
legislature kept by the secretary of state, bills and their copies,
published materials, digests, or multicopied matter that are routinely
retained and otherwise available at the state library or in a public
repository, or reports or correspondence made or received by or in any
way under the personal control of the individual members of the
legislature.
(3) "Public record" means "public record" as defined in RCW
42.17.020.
(4) "Records retention schedule" means a legal document approved by
the state or local records committee that specifies required retention
periods for a records series and gives agencies ongoing disposition
authority for the records series after its approved retention period
has been satisfied.
(5) "Records series" means a class of public records with a
specific or common function or purpose of state or local agencies as
identified and defined by the state or local records committee.
(6) "Retention period" means the required amount of time, approved
by the state or local records committee, that a state or local
government agency is required to retain records within a records
series.
(7) "Unique retention schedule" means a records retention schedule
applicable to a specific state or local agency.

PART III
STATE ARCHIVIST--DUTIES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The state archivist shall:
(1) Centralize, administer, and manage the archives of the state of
Washington, make them available for reference and scholarship, and
ensure their proper preservation;
(2) Inspect, inventory, catalog, and arrange retention and transfer
schedules on public records of all state agencies;
(3) Ensure the maintenance and security of all state agency public
records and establish safeguards against their unauthorized removal or
destruction;
(4) Approve of the transfer of local agency records of historical
or legal significance as provided by section 7(4) of this act;
(5) Establish and operate such state records centers as may from
time to time be authorized by appropriation, for the purpose of
preserving, servicing, screening, and protecting all state agency
public records which must be preserved temporarily or permanently, but
which need not be retained in office space and equipment;
(6) Gather and disseminate to interested agencies information on
all phases of records management to provide for the efficient and
economical management and preservation of public records;
(7) Operate at cost an imaging service for state or local agency
records;
(8) Approve imaging projects of public records undertaken by state
agencies and, upon request, by local agencies, and develop and maintain
standards for this work;
(9) Maintain facilities necessary to review records approved for
destruction and to cost-efficiently dispose of them by sale or burning.
The destruction of public records as authorized by this chapter must be
supervised by the state archivist;
(10) Assist and train state and local agencies in the proper
methods of creating, maintaining, cataloging, indexing, transmitting,
storing, and reproducing photographic, optical, electronic, or other
images used as public records;
(11) Solicit, accept, and expend donations as provided in RCW
43.07.037 for the purpose of the archive program. These purposes
include, but are not limited to, acquisition, accession,
interpretation, and display of archival materials. Donations that do
not meet the criteria of the archive program may not be accepted;
(12) Upon availability of resources, furnish appropriate
information, suggestions, and guidelines to local government agencies
for their assistance in the preparation of records series and retention
schedules or any other matter relating to the retention, preservation,
disposition, or destruction of records under this chapter; and
(13) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that:
(a) Set standards for the durability and permanence of public
records maintained by state and local agencies;
(b) Govern procedures for the creation, maintenance, transmission,
cataloging, indexing, storage, or reproduction of photographic,
optical, electronic, or other images of public documents or records in
a manner consistent with current standards, policies, and procedures of
the department of information services for the acquisition of
information technology;
(c) Govern the accuracy and durability of, and facilitate access
to, photographic, optical, electronic, or other images used as public
records; or
(d) Carry out any other provision of this chapter.

PART IV
TRANSFER OF RECORDS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) All state agency public records, not required in the current
operation of the office where they are made or kept, and all records of
every agency, commission, committee, or any other activity of state
government which may be abolished or discontinued, shall be transferred
to the state archives so that the valuable historical records of the
state may be centralized, made more widely available, and ensured
permanent preservation. However, this section does not apply to public
records approved for destruction under this chapter.
(b) When transferred, copies of the public records concerned shall
be made and certified by the archivist, which certification shall have
the same force and effect as though made by the officer originally in
charge of them. Fees may be charged to cover the cost of reproduction.
In turning over the archives of his or her office, the officer in
charge of those archives, or his or her successor, retains the rights
of access to them, without charge, whenever necessary.
(2)(a) Records that are confidential, privileged, or exempt from
public disclosure under state or federal law while in the possession of
the originating agency, commission, board, committee, or other entity
of state or local government retain their confidential, privileged, or
exempt status after transfer to the state archives unless the
archivist, with the concurrence of the originating jurisdiction,
determines that the records must be made accessible to the public
according to proper and reasonable rules adopted by the secretary of
state, in which case the records may be open to inspection and
available for copying after the expiration of seventy-five years from
creation of the record. If the originating jurisdiction is no longer
in existence, the archivist shall make the determination of
availability according to the rules. If, while in the possession of
the originating agency, commission, board, committee, or other entity,
any record is determined to be confidential, privileged, or exempt from
public disclosure under state or federal law for a period of less than
seventy-five years, then the record must be made accessible to the
public upon the expiration of the shorter period of time according to
proper and reasonable rules adopted by the secretary of state.
(b) Records of investigative reports prepared by any state, county,
municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex offenders
contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as defined
in RCW 71.09.020 that are not required in the current operation of the
law enforcement agency or for pending judicial proceedings shall,
following the expiration of the applicable schedule of the law
enforcement agency's retention of the records, be transferred to the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent
electronic retention and retrieval. Upon electronic retention of any
document, the association may destroy the paper copy of the document.
(c) Any record transferred to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs under (b) of this subsection is no longer a
public record under RCW 42.17.020 and is exempt from public disclosure.
Such records shall be disseminated only to criminal justice agencies as
defined in RCW 10.97.030 to determine if a sex offender meets the
criteria of a sexually violent predator as defined in chapter 71.09
RCW.

PART V
STATE RECORDS COMMITTEE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state records committee is created. Membership on the
state records committee consists of the state archivist or his or her
designee, a representative appointed by the state auditor, a
representative appointed by the attorney general, and a representative
appointed by the director of the office of financial management. The
appointing authority for each committee member may appoint an alternate
member to serve in the absence of the primary appointee.
(2) The state records committee shall meet at least once every
quarter or more often as business dictates. Action by the committee
shall be by majority vote and records shall be kept of all committee
business. The state records committee may adopt appropriate policies
and procedures to be followed in implementing its authority under this
chapter.
(3) The state records committee must approve, modify, or disapprove
records retention schedules for state agency public records and must
act upon requests to dispose of or to destroy such records. However,
any modification of a request or recommendation must be approved by the
head of the agency originating the request or recommendation.
(4) The state records committee shall establish general retention
schedules for state agency records when practical. Upon a
determination of the state records committee, unique retention
schedules may be approved for a state agency. The committee's
determination shall include consideration of factors justifying the use
of a unique retention schedule in lieu of, or the absence of, a general
retention schedule.
(5) Except as otherwise provided by law, no public records of a
state agency shall be disposed of or destroyed until approved for
disposition or destruction by the state records committee. State
agencies may apply for authority to dispose of or destroy public
records having no further administrative or legal value by submitting
retention schedules for approval to the state records committee.
Submittals shall be made to the state records committee through the
division of archives and records management on forms approved by the
state records committee. The division shall facilitate the state
agency's submittal to the state records committee and provide
administrative support as needed.

PART VI
STATE RECORDS OFFICERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Each department or other agency of the state government shall
designate a records officer to supervise its records management and
retention program under this chapter and to represent the office in all
contacts with the state records committee and the division of archives
and records management. The records officer shall:
(1) Coordinate all aspects of the records management and retention
program;
(2) Inventory, or manage the inventory, of all public records at
least once during a biennium for disposition scheduling and transfer
action, in accordance with procedures prescribed by the state archivist
and state records committee. However, essential records shall be
inventoried and processed in accordance with chapter 40.10 RCW at least
annually;
(3) Consult with any other personnel responsible for maintenance of
specific records within the officer's state organization regarding
records retention and transfer recommendations;
(4) Analyze records inventory data, examine and compare divisional
or unit inventories for duplication of records, and recommend to the
state archivist and state records committee minimal retentions for all
copies commensurate with legal, financial, and administrative needs;
(5) Approve all records inventory and destruction requests which
are submitted to the state records committee;
(6) Review established records retention schedules at least
annually to ensure that they are complete and current;
(7) Exercise internal control over the acquisition of imaging and
records storage equipment.
If a particular agency or department does not wish to transfer
records at a time previously scheduled therefor, the records officer
shall, within thirty days, notify the archivist and request a change in
such previously set schedule, including the officer's reasons therefor.

PART VII
LOCAL RECORDS COMMITTEE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The local records committee is created. Membership on the
committee consists of the state archivist or his or her designee, a
representative appointed by the state auditor, and a representative
appointed by the attorney general. The appointing authority for each
committee member may appoint an alternate member to serve in the
absence of the primary appointee. The committee shall meet at least
once every quarter or more often as business dictates. Records shall
be kept of all committee business.
(b) Approval, amendment, or veto of any retention schedule shall be
by unanimous vote of the local records committee. Upon such approval,
the retention schedule shall constitute authority for the local agency
to dispose of or destroy the records listed thereon consistent with the
conditions of the retention schedule.
(c) The local records committee may adopt appropriate policies and
procedures to be followed in implementing its authority under this
chapter.
(2) No local agency public records shall be disposed of or
destroyed until the expiration of applicable retention periods on
records retention schedules approved by the local records committee.
(3)(a) The local records committee shall establish general
retention schedules for local agency records when practical. Upon a
determination of the local records committee, unique retention
schedules may be approved for a local agency. The committee's
determination shall include consideration of factors justifying the use
of a unique retention schedule in lieu of, or the absence of, a general
retention schedule.
(b) Local government agencies may apply for authority to dispose of
or destroy public records having no further administrative or legal
value by submitting retention schedules for approval to the local
records committee. Submittals shall be made to the local records
committee through the division of archives and records management on
forms approved by the local records committee. The division shall
facilitate the local agency's submittal to the local records committee
and provide administrative support as needed.
(c) Except as otherwise provided by law, local agencies may, as an
alternative to destroying public records having no further
administrative or legal value, donate the public records to the state
library, local library, historical society, genealogical society, or
similar society or organization. Public records may not be donated
under this subsection unless:
(i) The records are seventy years old or older;
(ii) The local records committee has approved the destruction of
the public records; and
(iii) The state archivist has determined that the public records
have no historic or legal significance.
(4) Records of local agencies, designated by the archivist as
having historical or legal significance, may be transferred to a
repository approved by the archivist.

PART VIII
RETENTION REQUIREMENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Public records shall not be disposed of or destroyed until the
expiration of applicable retention periods on records retention
schedules approved by the state or local records committee. Unless
otherwise provided by state or federal law, rule, or regulation,
retention periods approved for records series that serve as primary
documentation of official actions, transactions, contracts, or
agreements must be at least six years. The state or local records
committee may approve retention periods of less than six years for
records series that:
(1) The department of origin of the records has made a satisfactory
showing to the state or local records committee that the retention of
the records for a minimum of six years is unnecessary and that such
records serve only an administrative value; or
(2) The originals of the official public records less than six
years old have been copied or reproduced by any photographic or other
process approved by the state archivist which accurately reproduces or
forms a durable medium for so reproducing the original.

PART IX
LEGISLATIVE RECORDS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter prohibits a legislator or legislative
employee from contributing his or her personal papers to any private
library, public library, or the state archives. The state archivist is
authorized to receive papers of legislators and legislative employees
and is directed to encourage the donation of such personal papers to
the state. The state archivist is authorized to establish such
guidelines and procedures for the collection of personal papers and
correspondence relating to the legislature as the archivist sees fit.
Legislators and legislative employees are encouraged to contribute
their personal papers to the state for preservation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The chief clerk of the house of representatives or the chief
clerk's designee, and the secretary of the senate or the secretary's
designee, shall establish requirements and responsibilities for keeping
committee minutes and records as part of their instructions to
committee chairs and employees.
The chief clerk or the secretary, with the assistance of the state
archivist, shall classify and arrange the legislative records delivered
to the chief clerk or secretary in a manner that he or she considers
best suited to carry out the efficient and economical utilization,
maintenance, preservation, and disposition of the records. The chief
clerk or the secretary may deliver to the state archivist all
legislative records in his or her possession when such records have
been classified and arranged and are no longer needed by either house.
The state archivist shall thereafter be custodian of the records so
delivered, but shall deliver such records back to either the chief
clerk or secretary upon his or her request.
The committee staff person responsible for maintaining the
legislative records of that committee shall, on a scheduled basis
agreed upon by the chief clerk of the house of representatives or the
chief clerk's designee, and the secretary of the senate or the
secretary's designee, deliver to the chief clerk or secretary all
legislative records in his or her possession, as long as such records
are not required for the regular performance of official duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary
of the senate must advise the party caucuses in each house concerning
the necessity to keep legislative records. The state archivist or his
or her representative shall work with the chief clerk and secretary to
provide information and instructions on the best method for keeping
legislative records.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The chief clerk of the house of representatives or the secretary of
the senate shall, with advice of the state archivist, prescribe
policies for access to records when such records have been delivered to
the state archives for preservation and maintenance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Any sound recording of debate in the house of representatives or
senate made by legislative employees shall be preserved by the chief
clerk of the house and by the secretary of the senate, respectively,
for two years from the end of the session at which the recording is
made, and thereafter shall be transmitted to the state archivist. The
chief clerk and the secretary shall catalogue or index the recordings
in their custody according to a uniform system, in order to allow easy
access to the debate on specific questions before either house. The
chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the
senate shall make available upon request, at the cost of reproduction,
portions of the recordings as may be requested.

PART X
FUNDING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is created the archives and records management account in
the state treasury which shall consist of all fees and charges
collected under this section. The account shall be appropriated
exclusively for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the
operation of the division of archives and records management as
specified by law.
(2) The secretary of state and the director of financial management
shall jointly establish a procedure and formula for allocating the
costs of services provided by the division of archives and records
management to state agencies. The total amount allotted for services
to state agencies shall not exceed the appropriation to the archives
and records management account during any allotment period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The local government archives account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts collected under section 16 of this act and RCW
36.22.175 for local government services, such as providing records
scheduling, security microfilm inspection and storage, archival
preservation, cataloging, and indexing for local government records and
digital data and access to those records and data through the regional
branch archives of the division of archives and records management,
must be deposited into the account, and expenditures from the account
may be used only for these purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
State agencies shall collect a surcharge of twenty dollars from the
judgment debtor upon the satisfaction of a warrant filed in superior
court for unpaid taxes or liabilities. The surcharge is imposed on the
judgment debtor in the form of a penalty in addition to the filing fee
provided in RCW 36.18.012(10). The surcharge revenue shall be
transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the local government
archives account under section 15 of this act.
Surcharge revenue shall be expended by the secretary of state
exclusively for disaster recovery, essential records protection
services, and records management training for local government agencies
by the division of archives and records management. The secretary of
state shall, with local government representatives, establish a
committee to advise the state archivist on the local government
archives and records management program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The imaging account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts collected for contract imaging, micrographics,
reproduction, and duplication services provided by the division of
archives and records management must be deposited into the account, and
expenditures from the account may be used only for these purposes.
Only the secretary of state or the secretary's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

Sec. 18 RCW 36.22.175 and 2003 c 163 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other charge authorized by law, the county
auditor shall charge a surcharge of one dollar per instrument for each
document recorded. Revenue generated through this surcharge shall be
transmitted monthly to the state treasurer for deposit in the local
government archives account under ((RCW 40.14.024)) section 15 of this
act. These funds shall be used solely for providing records
scheduling, security microfilm inspection and storage, archival
preservation, cataloging, and indexing for local government records and
digital data and access to those records and data through the regional
branch archives of the division of archives and records management.
The division of archives and records management within the office
of the secretary of state shall provide records management training for
local governments and shall establish a competitive grant program to
solicit and prioritize project proposals from local governments for
potential funding to be paid for by funds from the auditor surcharge
and tax warrant surcharge revenues. Application for specific projects
may be made by local government agencies only. The state archivist in
consultation with the advisory committee established under ((RCW
40.14.027)) section 16 of this act shall adopt rules governing project
eligibility, evaluation, awarding of grants, and other criteria
including requirements for records management training for grant
recipients.
(2) The advisory committee established under ((RCW 40.14.027))
section 16 of this act shall review grant proposals and establish a
prioritized list of projects to be considered for funding by January
1st of each even-numbered year, beginning in 2002. The evaluation of
proposals and development of the prioritized list must be developed
through open public meetings. Funding for projects shall be granted
according to the ranking of each application on the prioritized list
and projects will be funded only to the extent that funds are
available. A grant award may have an effective date other than the
date the project is placed on the prioritized list.
(3) In addition to any other surcharge authorized by law, the
county auditor shall charge a surcharge of one dollar per instrument
for every document recorded after January 1, 2002. Revenue generated
through this surcharge shall be transmitted to the state treasurer
monthly for deposit in the local government archives account under
((RCW 40.14.024)) section 15 of this act to be used exclusively for the
construction and improvement of a specialized regional facility located
in eastern Washington designed to serve the archives, records
management, and digital data management needs of local government.
To the extent the facilities are used for the storage and retrieval
of state agency records and digital data, that portion of the
construction of such facilities used for state government records and
data shall be supported by other charges and fees paid by state
agencies and shall not be supported by the surcharge authorized in this
subsection.
At such time that all debt service from construction on such
facility has been paid, fifty percent of the surcharge authorized by
this subsection shall be reverted to the centennial document
preservation and modernization account as prescribed in RCW 36.22.170
and fifty percent of the surcharge authorized by this section shall be
reverted to the state treasurer for deposit in the archives and records
management account to serve the archives, records management, and
digital data management needs of local government.

PART XI
CONSTRUCTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not repeal or modify any other acts or parts of
acts authorizing the retention or destruction of public records. This
chapter does not affect the provisions of chapter 40.07 RCW requiring
the deposit of all state publications in the state library or the
confidentiality of the bill drafting records of the code reviser's
office.

PART XII
INTERNAL REFERENCES AND REPEALERS
Sec. 20 RCW 42.17.020 and 2005 c 445 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Actual malice" means to act with knowledge of falsity or with
reckless disregard as to truth or falsity.
(2) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(3) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized
by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges
have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf
of the candidate or public official.
(4) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition
proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any municipal
corporation, political subdivision, or other voting constituency from
and after the time when the proposition has been initially filed with
the appropriate election officer of that constituency prior to its
circulation for signatures.
(5) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic,
or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary,
financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(6) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has filed a valid certificate of
nomination with the secretary of state under chapter 29A.20 RCW;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW 29A.04.086, that is the body
authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise authority
on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(7) "Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or
political committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.
(8) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW
42.17.050, to perform the duties specified in that section.
(9) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for
election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination
or election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(10) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee
organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in
the state senate or state house of representatives.
(11) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service
of communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast
or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public
whether through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio
stations, billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies,
printing companies, or otherwise.
(12) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350.
(13) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services
of any kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance with RCW
42.17.241, the term "compensation" shall not include per diem
allowances or other payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse
a public official for expenses incurred while the official is engaged
in the official business of the governmental entity.
(14) "Continuing political committee" means a political committee
that is an organization of continuing existence not established in
anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(15)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising or electioneering communication
prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized
agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for which the
individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(16) "Elected official" means any person elected at a general or
special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill
a vacancy in any such office.
(17) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special election
for public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is
submitted to the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in which the
qualifications for voting include other than those requirements set
forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the Constitution of
the state of Washington shall not be considered an election for
purposes of this chapter.
(18) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in
opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(19) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day
of December after the date of the last previous general election for
the office that the candidate seeks and ending on November 30th after
the next election for the office. In the case of a special election to
fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the period
beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on November 30th
after the special election.
(20) "Electioneering communication" means any broadcast, cable, or
satellite television or radio transmission, United States postal
service mailing, billboard, newspaper, or periodical that:
(a) Clearly identifies a candidate for a state, local, or judicial
office either by specifically naming the candidate, or identifying the
candidate without using the candidate's name;
(b) Is broadcast, transmitted, mailed, erected, distributed, or
otherwise published within sixty days before any election for that
office in the jurisdiction in which the candidate is seeking election;
and
(c) Either alone, or in combination with one or more communications
identifying the candidate by the same sponsor during the sixty days
before an election, has a fair market value of five thousand dollars or
more.
(21) "Electioneering communication" does not include:
(a) Usual and customary advertising of a business owned by a
candidate, even if the candidate is mentioned in the advertising when
the candidate has been regularly mentioned in that advertising
appearing at least twelve months preceding his or her becoming a
candidate;
(b) Advertising for candidate debates or forums when the
advertising is paid for by or on behalf of the debate or forum sponsor,
so long as two or more candidates for the same position have been
invited to participate in the debate or forum;
(c) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is:
(i) Of primary interest to the general public;
(ii) In a news medium controlled by a person whose business is that
news medium; and
(iii) Not a medium controlled by a candidate or a political
committee;
(d) Slate cards and sample ballots;
(e) Advertising for books, films, dissertations, or similar works
(i) written by a candidate when the candidate entered into a contract
for such publications or media at least twelve months before becoming
a candidate, or (ii) written about a candidate;
(f) Public service announcements;
(g) A mailed internal political communication primarily limited to
the members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(h) An expenditure by or contribution to the authorized committee
of a candidate for state, local, or judicial office; or
(i) Any other communication exempted by the commission through rule
consistent with the intent of this chapter.
(22) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of
value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not
legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure"
also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of
value in exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or
anything of value for the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring
any public official or candidate, or assisting in furthering or
opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of this chapter,
agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises to pay may be
reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is made. The
term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete repayment
by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a loan, the
receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(23) "Final report" means the report described as a final report in
RCW 42.17.080(2).
(24) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
election that results in the election of a person to a state office.
It does not include a primary.
(25) "Gift," is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.
(26) "Immediate family" includes the spouse, dependent children,
and other dependent relatives, if living in the household. For the
purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, "immediate family" means
an individual's spouse, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent,
stepparent, grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister
of the individual and the spouse of any such person and a child,
stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half
brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's spouse and the
spouse of any such person.
(27) "Incumbent" means a person who is in present possession of an
elected office.
(28) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that has each
of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of five hundred dollars or
more. A series of expenditures, each of which is under five hundred
dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure if their cumulative
value is five hundred dollars or more.
(29)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a
contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless the
contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family as
defined for purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an
association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(30) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions, amendments,
nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in either house of
the state legislature, and includes any other matter that may be the
subject of action by either house or any committee of the legislature
and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both houses, are
pending approval by the governor.
(31) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to influence the
passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of
Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate,
or other legislative enactment of any state agency under the state
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Neither "lobby" nor
"lobbying" includes an association's or other organization's act of
communicating with the members of that association or organization.
(32) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in his or
her own or another's behalf.
(33) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by whom a
lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is compensated
for acting as a lobbyist.
(34) "Participate" means that, with respect to a particular
election, an entity:
(a) Makes either a monetary or in-kind contribution to a candidate;
(b) Makes an independent expenditure or electioneering
communication in support of or opposition to a candidate;
(c) Endorses a candidate prior to contributions being made by a
subsidiary corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or
that candidate's opponent;
(d) Makes a recommendation regarding whether a candidate should be
supported or opposed prior to a contribution being made by a subsidiary
corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or that
candidate's opponent; or
(e) Directly or indirectly collaborates or consults with a
subsidiary corporation or local unit on matters relating to the support
of or opposition to a candidate, including, but not limited to, the
amount of a contribution, when a contribution should be given, and what
assistance, services or independent expenditures, or electioneering
communications, if any, will be made or should be made in support of or
opposition to a candidate.
(35) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint venture,
public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or local
governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(36) "Person in interest" means the person who is the subject of a
record or any representative designated by that person, except that if
that person is under a legal disability, the term "person in interest"
means and includes the parent or duly appointed legal representative.
(37) "Political advertising" includes any advertising displays,
newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles, tabloids,
flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other means of
mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing, directly or
indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support or opposition
in any election campaign.
(38) "Political committee" means any person (except a candidate or
an individual dealing with his or her own funds or property) having the
expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in
support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any ballot proposition.
(39) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
procedure for nominating a candidate to state office under chapter
29A.52 RCW or any other primary for an election that uses, in large
measure, the procedures established in chapter 29A.52 RCW.
(40) "Public office" means any federal, state, judicial, county,
city, town, school district, port district, special district, or other
state political subdivision elective office.
(41) "Public record" includes any writing containing information
relating to the conduct of government or the performance of any
governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or retained
by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in ((RCW 40.14.100))
section 2 of this act and also means the following: All budget and
financial records; personnel leave, travel, and payroll records;
records of legislative sessions; reports submitted to the legislature;
and any other record designated a public record by any official action
of the senate or the house of representatives.
(42) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning on the
date of the filing of recall charges under RCW 29A.56.120 and ending
thirty days after the recall election.
(43) "Sponsor of an electioneering communications, independent
expenditures, or political advertising" means the person paying for the
electioneering communication, independent expenditure, or political
advertising. If a person acts as an agent for another or is reimbursed
by another for the payment, the original source of the payment is the
sponsor.
(44) "State legislative office" means the office of a member of the
state house of representatives or the office of a member of the state
senate.
(45) "State office" means state legislative office or the office of
governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general,
commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner, superintendent of
public instruction, state auditor, or state treasurer.
(46) "State official" means a person who holds a state office.
(47) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political committee or
candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the possession
or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the election
for which the contributions were received, and that are in excess of
the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the committee
or candidate prior to that election. In the case of a continuing
political committee, "surplus funds" mean those contributions remaining
in the possession or control of the committee that are in excess of the
amount necessary to pay all remaining debts when it makes its final
report under RCW 42.17.065.
(48) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation, including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.
As used in this chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any
gender, the other, as the context requires.

Sec. 21 RCW 10.97.140 and 2005 c 274 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing in ((RCW 40.14.060 or 40.14.070)) section 4 of this act or
chapter 42.56 RCW precludes dissemination of criminal history record
information, including nonconviction data, for the purposes of this
chapter.

Sec. 22 RCW 42.56.240 and 2005 c 274 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following investigative, law enforcement, and crime victim
information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this
chapter:
(1) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy;
(2) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the commission, if
disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical safety, or
property. If at the time a complaint is filed the complainant, victim,
or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure, such
desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with the commission
about any elected official or candidate for public office must be made
in writing and signed by the complainant under oath;
(3) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to ((RCW 40.14.070(2)(b))) section
4(2)(b) of this act;
(4) License applications under RCW 9.41.070; copies of license
applications or information on the applications may be released to law
enforcement or corrections agencies; and
(5) Information revealing the identity of child victims of sexual
assault who are under age eighteen. Identifying information means the
child victim's name, address, location, photograph, and in cases in
which the child victim is a relative or stepchild of the alleged
perpetrator, identification of the relationship between the child and
the alleged perpetrator.

Sec. 23 RCW 42.56.320 and 2005 c 274 s 412 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following educational information is exempt from disclosure
under this chapter:
(1) Financial disclosures filed by private vocational schools under
chapters 28B.85 and 28C.10 RCW;
(2) Financial and commercial information supplied by or on behalf
of a person, firm, corporation, or entity under chapter 28B.95 RCW
relating to the purchase or sale of tuition units and contracts for the
purchase of multiple tuition units;
(3) Individually identifiable information received by the work
force training and education coordinating board for research or
evaluation purposes; and
(4) Except for public records as defined in ((RCW 40.14.040))
section 2 of this act, any records or documents obtained by a state
college, university, library, or archive through or concerning any
gift, grant, conveyance, bequest, or devise, the terms of which
restrict or regulate public access to those records or documents.

Sec. 24 RCW 43.07.380 and 2003 c 164 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The oral history, state library, and archives account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received under RCW
43.07.370 must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account may be made only for the purposes of the oral history program
under RCW 43.07.220, archives program under ((RCW 40.14.020)) chapter
40.14 RCW, and state library program under chapter 27.04 RCW. Only the
secretary of state or the secretary of state's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. An appropriation is not required for
expenditures, but the account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 40.14.010 (Definition and classification of public records)
and 1996 c 71 s 1, 1982 c 36 s 3, 1981 c 32 s 4, 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 1,
& 1957 c 246 s 1;
(2) RCW 40.14.020 (Division of archives and records management--State archivist -- Powers and duties -- Duties of public officials) and
2002 c 358 s 4 & 1995 c 326 s 1;
(3) RCW 40.14.022 (Division of archives and records management--Imaging account) and 2003 c 163 s 2;
(4) RCW 40.14.024 (Division of archives and records management--Local government archives account) and 2003 c 163 s 3;
(5) RCW 40.14.025 (Division of archives and records management--Allocation of costs of services -- Archives and records management
account) and 2003 c 163 s 1, 1996 c 245 s 3, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 5, 1985
c 57 s 22, & 1981 c 115 s 4;
(6) RCW 40.14.027 (Public archives and records management
services -- Judgment debtor surcharge) and 2003 c 163 s 4, 2001 c 146 s
4, 1996 c 245 s 4, 1995 c 292 s 17, & 1994 c 193 s 2;
(7) RCW 40.14.030 (Transfer to state archives -- Certified copies,
cost -- Public disclosure) and 2003 c 305 s 1 & 1957 c 246 s 3;
(8) RCW 40.14.040 (Records officers -- Designation -- Powers and
duties) and 1982 c 36 s 4, 1979 c 151 s 51, 1973 c 54 s 3, & 1957 c 246
s 4;
(9) RCW 40.14.050 (Records committee -- Composition, travel expenses,
meetings, powers and duties -- Retention schedules) and 1985 c 192 s 1,
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 83, & 1957 c 246 s 5;
(10) RCW 40.14.060 (Destruction, disposition of official public
records or office files and memoranda -- Record retention schedules) and
1999 c 326 s 1, 1982 c 36 s 5, 1979 c 151 s 52, 1973 c 54 s 4, & 1957
c 246 s 6;
(11) RCW 40.14.070 (Destruction, disposition, donation of local
government records -- Preservation for historical interest -- Local records
committee, duties -- Record retention schedules -- Sealed records) and 2005
c 227 s 1, 2003 c 240 s 1, 1999 c 326 s 2, 1995 c 301 s 71, 1982 c 36
s 6, 1973 c 54 s 5, 1971 ex.s. c 10 s 1, & 1957 c 246 s 7;
(12) RCW 40.14.080 (Chapter not to affect other laws) and 1983 c 3
s 84 & 1957 c 246 s 8;
(13) RCW 40.14.100 (Legislative records -- Defined) and 1971 ex.s. c
102 s 2;
(14) RCW 40.14.110 (Legislative records -- Contribution of papers by
legislators and employees) and 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 3;
(15) RCW 40.14.120 (Legislative records -- "Clerk," "secretary"
defined) and 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 4;
(16) RCW 40.14.130 (Legislative records -- Duties of legislative
officials, employees and state archivist -- Delivery of records--Custody -- Availability) and 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 5;
(17) RCW 40.14.140 (Legislative records -- Party caucuses to be
advised -- Information and instructions) and 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 6;
(18) RCW 40.14.150 (Legislative records -- Use for research) and 1971
ex.s. c 102 s 7;
(19) RCW 40.14.160 (Legislative records -- Rules for access to
records) and 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 8;
(20) RCW 40.14.170 (Legislative records -- Sound recordings) and 1971
ex.s. c 102 s 9; and
(21) RCW 40.14.180 (Legislative records -- Construction--Confidentiality of bill drafting records) and 1983 c 3 s 85 & 1971
ex.s. c 102 s 10.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

--- END ---