BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.244 and 2006 c 302 s 3 and 2006 c 44 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for microbreweries; fee to be one
hundred dollars for production of less than sixty thousand barrels of
malt liquor, including strong beer, per year.
(2) Any microbrewery license under this section may also act as a
distributor and/or retailer for beer and strong beer of its own
production. Any microbrewery licensed under this section may act as a
distributor for beer of its own production. Strong beer may not be
sold at a farmers market or under any endorsement which may authorize
microbreweries to sell beer at farmers markets. Any microbrewery
operating as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection shall
comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors
and/or retailers. A microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant license may sell beer of its own production for off-premises
consumption from its restaurant premises in kegs or in a sanitary
container brought to the premises by the purchaser or furnished by the
licensee and filled at the tap by the licensee at the time of sale.
(((3))) (a) The board may issue an endorsement to this license
allowing for on-premises consumption of beer, including strong beer,
wine, or both of other manufacture if purchased from a Washington
state-licensed distributor. Each endorsement shall cost two hundred
dollars per year, or four hundred dollars per year allowing the sale
and service of both beer and wine.
(((4))) (b) The microbrewer obtaining such endorsement must
determine, at the time the endorsement is issued, whether the licensed
premises will be operated ((either)) as a tavern with persons under
twenty-one years of age not allowed as provided for in RCW 66.24.330,
or as a beer and/or wine restaurant as described in RCW 66.24.320.
(((5))) (3) A microbrewery may hold a retail license under this
chapter. This retail license is separate from the brewery license.
The licensee may exercise any of the privileges and endorsements
granted under the retail license. If the licensee holds a separate
license for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant or a beer and/or wine
license operated on the brewery premises, the licensee may hold a
second retail license for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license
or a beer and/or wine license at a location separate from the licensed
brewery premises.
(4)(a) A microbrewery licensed under this section may apply to the
board for an endorsement to sell bottled beer of its own production at
retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market.
The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars.
(b) For each month during which a microbrewery will sell beer at a
qualifying farmers market, the microbrewery must provide the board or
its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled
beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board
before the microbrewery may offer beer for sale at a qualifying farmers
market.
(c) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in
Washington.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the microbrewery license for the purpose of this title.
The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this
subsection (((5))) (3) do not constitute the tasting or sampling
privilege of a microbrewery. The microbrewery may not store beer at a
farmers market beyond the hours that the microbrewery offers bottled
beer for sale. The microbrewery may not act as a distributor from a
farmers market location.
(e) Before a microbrewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying
farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for
authorization for any microbrewery with an endorsement approved under
this subsection (((5))) (3) to sell bottled beer at retail at the
farmers market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A
map of the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other
designated locations at which an approved microbrewery may sell bottled
beer; and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market
managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify
the locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a
qualifying farmers market to allow an approved microbrewery to sell
bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board shall
notify the persons or entities of the application for authorization
pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under
this subsection (((5))) (3)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for any
violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and any additional rules necessary
to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection (((5))) (3):
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.244 and 2006 c 44 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for microbreweries; fee to be one
hundred dollars for production of less than sixty thousand barrels of
malt liquor, including strong beer, per year.
(2) Any microbrewery license under this section may also act as a
distributor and/or retailer for beer and strong beer of its own
production. Strong beer may not be sold at a farmers market or under
any endorsement which may authorize microbreweries to sell beer at
farmers markets. Any microbrewery operating as a distributor and/or
retailer under this subsection shall comply with the applicable laws
and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers. A microbrewery
holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license may sell beer of
its own production for off-premises consumption from its restaurant
premises in kegs or in a sanitary container brought to the premises by
the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the
licensee at the time of sale.
(((3))) (a) The board may issue an endorsement to this license
allowing for on-premises consumption of beer, including strong beer,
wine, or both of other manufacture if purchased from a Washington
state-licensed distributor. Each endorsement shall cost two hundred
dollars per year, or four hundred dollars per year allowing the sale
and service of both beer and wine.
(((4))) (b) The microbrewer obtaining such endorsement must
determine, at the time the endorsement is issued, whether the licensed
premises will be operated ((either)) as a tavern with persons under
twenty-one years of age not allowed as provided for in RCW 66.24.330,
or as a beer and/or wine restaurant as described in RCW 66.24.320.
(((5))) (3) A microbrewery may hold a retail license under this
chapter. This retail license is separate from the brewery license.
The licensee may exercise any of the privileges and endorsements
granted under the retail license. If the licensee holds a separate
license for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant or a beer and/or wine
license operated on the brewery premises, the licensee may hold a
second retail license for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license
or a beer and/or wine license at a location separate from the licensed
brewery premises.
(4)(a) A microbrewery licensed under this section may apply to the
board for an endorsement to sell bottled beer of its own production at
retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market.
The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars.
(b) For each month during which a microbrewery will sell beer at a
qualifying farmers market, the microbrewery must provide the board or
its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled
beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board
before the microbrewery may offer beer for sale at a qualifying farmers
market.
(c) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in
Washington.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the microbrewery license for the purpose of this title.
The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this
subsection (((5))) (3) do not constitute the tasting or sampling
privilege of a microbrewery. The microbrewery may not store beer at a
farmers market beyond the hours that the microbrewery offers bottled
beer for sale. The microbrewery may not act as a distributor from a
farmers market location.
(e) Before a microbrewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying
farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for
authorization for any microbrewery with an endorsement approved under
this subsection (((5))) (3) to sell bottled beer at retail at the
farmers market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A
map of the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other
designated locations at which an approved microbrewery may sell bottled
beer; and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market
managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify
the locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a
qualifying farmers market to allow an approved microbrewery to sell
bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board shall
notify the persons or entities of the application for authorization
pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under
this subsection (((5))) (3)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for any
violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and any additional rules necessary
to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection (((5))) (3):
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.24.240 and 2006 c 302 s 2 and 2006 c 44 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for domestic breweries; fee to be two
thousand dollars for production of sixty thousand barrels or more of
malt liquor per year.
(2) Any domestic brewery, except for a brand owner of malt
beverages under RCW 66.04.010(6), licensed under this section may also
act as a retailer for beer of its own production. Any domestic brewery
licensed under this section may act as a distributor for beer of its
own production. Any domestic brewery operating as a distributor and/or
retailer under this subsection shall comply with the applicable laws
and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers. A domestic
brewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license may sell
beer of its own production for off-premises consumption from its
restaurant premises in kegs or in a sanitary container brought to the
premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at
the tap by the licensee at the time of sale.
(3) A domestic brewery may hold a retail license under this
chapter. This retail license is separate from the brewery license.
The licensee may exercise any of the privileges and endorsements
granted under the retail license. If the licensee holds a separate
license for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant or a beer and/or wine
restaurant operated on the brewery premises, the licensee may hold a
second retail license for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license
or a beer and/or wine restaurant license at a location separate from
the brewery premises.
(4) Any domestic brewery licensed under this section may contract-
produce beer for a brand owner of malt beverages defined under RCW
66.04.010(6), and this contract-production is not a sale for the
purposes of RCW 66.28.170 and 66.28.180.
(((4))) (5)(a) A domestic brewery licensed under this section and
qualified for a reduced rate of taxation pursuant to RCW
66.24.290(3)(b) may apply to the board for an endorsement to sell
bottled beer of its own production at retail for off-premises
consumption at a qualifying farmers market. The annual fee for this
endorsement is seventy-five dollars.
(b) For each month during which a domestic brewery will sell beer
at a qualifying farmers market, the domestic brewery must provide the
board or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at
which bottled beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received
by the board before the domestic brewery may offer beer for sale at a
qualifying farmers market.
(c) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in
Washington.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the domestic brewery license for the purpose of this
title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this
subsection do not include the tasting or sampling privilege of a
domestic brewery. The domestic brewery may not store beer at a farmers
market beyond the hours that the domestic brewery offers bottled beer
for sale. The domestic brewery may not act as a distributor from a
farmers market location.
(e) Before a domestic brewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying
farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for
authorization for any domestic brewery with an endorsement approved
under this subsection to sell bottled beer at retail at the farmers
market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of
the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated
locations at which an approved domestic brewery may sell bottled beer;
and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market
managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify
the locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a
qualifying farmers market to allow an approved domestic brewery to sell
bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board shall
notify the persons or entities of such application for authorization
pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under
this subsection (((4))) (5)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for any
violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be
necessary to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.24.240 and 2006 c 44 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for domestic breweries; fee to be two
thousand dollars for production of sixty thousand barrels or more of
malt liquor per year.
(2) Any domestic brewery, except for a brand owner of malt
beverages under RCW 66.04.010(6), licensed under this section may also
act as a distributor and/or retailer for beer of its own production.
Any domestic brewery operating as a distributor and/or retailer under
this subsection shall comply with the applicable laws and rules
relating to distributors and/or retailers. A domestic brewery holding
a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license may sell beer of its own
production for off-premises consumption from its restaurant premises in
kegs or in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the
purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the
licensee at the time of sale.
(3) A domestic brewery may hold a retail license under this
chapter. This retail license is separate from the brewery license.
The licensee may exercise any of the privileges and endorsements
granted under the retail license. If the licensee holds a separate
license for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant or a beer and/or wine
restaurant operated on the brewery premises, the licensee may hold a
second retail license for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license
or a beer and/or wine restaurant license at a location separate from
the brewery premises.
(4) Any domestic brewery licensed under this section may contract-produce beer for a brand owner of malt beverages defined under RCW
66.04.010(6), and this contract-production is not a sale for the
purposes of RCW 66.28.170 and 66.28.180.
(((4))) (5)(a) A domestic brewery licensed under this section and
qualified for a reduced rate of taxation pursuant to RCW
66.24.290(3)(b) may apply to the board for an endorsement to sell
bottled beer of its own production at retail for off-premises
consumption at a qualifying farmers market. The annual fee for this
endorsement is seventy-five dollars.
(b) For each month during which a domestic brewery will sell beer
at a qualifying farmers market, the domestic brewery must provide the
board or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at
which bottled beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received
by the board before the domestic brewery may offer beer for sale at a
qualifying farmers market.
(c) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in
Washington.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the domestic brewery license for the purpose of this
title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this
subsection do not include the tasting or sampling privilege of a
domestic brewery. The domestic brewery may not store beer at a farmers
market beyond the hours that the domestic brewery offers bottled beer
for sale. The domestic brewery may not act as a distributor from a
farmers market location.
(e) Before a domestic brewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying
farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for
authorization for any domestic brewery with an endorsement approved
under this subsection to sell bottled beer at retail at the farmers
market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of
the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated
locations at which an approved domestic brewery may sell bottled beer;
and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market
managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify
the locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a
qualifying farmers market to allow an approved domestic brewery to sell
bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board shall
notify the persons or entities of such application for authorization
pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under
this subsection (((4))) (5)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for any
violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be
necessary to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.28.010 and 2006 c 330 s 28, 2006 c 92 s 1, and 2006
c 43 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) No manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative, or person financially interested, directly or
indirectly, in such business; whether resident or nonresident, shall
have any financial interest, direct or indirect, in any licensed retail
business, unless the retail business is owned by a corporation in which
a manufacturer or importer has no direct stock ownership and there are
no interlocking officers and directors, the retail license is held by
a corporation that is not owned directly or indirectly by a
manufacturer or importer, the sales of liquor are incidental to the
primary activity of operating the property as a hotel, alcoholic
beverages produced by the manufacturer or importer or their
subsidiaries are not sold at the licensed premises, and the board
reviews the ownership and proposed method of operation of all involved
entities and determines that there will not be an unacceptable level of
control or undue influence over the operation or the retail licensee;
nor shall any manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative own any of the property upon which such licensed persons
conduct their business; nor shall any such licensed person, under any
arrangement whatsoever, conduct his or her business upon property in
which any manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative has any interest unless title to that property is owned
by a corporation in which a manufacturer has no direct stock ownership
and there are no interlocking officers or directors, the retail license
is held by a corporation that is not owned directly or indirectly by
the manufacturer, the sales of liquor are incidental to the primary
activity of operating the property either as a hotel or as an
amphitheater offering live musical and similar live entertainment
activities to the public, alcoholic beverages produced by the
manufacturer or any of its subsidiaries are not sold at the licensed
premises, and the board reviews the ownership and proposed method of
operation of all involved entities and determines that there will not
be an unacceptable level of control or undue influence over the
operation of the retail licensee. Except as provided in subsection (3)
of this section, no manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized
representative shall advance moneys or moneys' worth to a licensed
person under an arrangement, nor shall such licensed person receive,
under an arrangement, an advance of moneys or moneys' worth. "Person"
as used in this section only shall not include those state or federally
chartered banks, state or federally chartered savings and loan
associations, state or federally chartered mutual savings banks, or
institutional investors which are not controlled directly or indirectly
by a manufacturer, importer, distributor, or authorized representative
as long as the bank, savings and loan association, or institutional
investor does not influence or attempt to influence the purchasing
practices of the retailer with respect to alcoholic beverages. Except
as otherwise provided in this section, no manufacturer, importer,
distributor, or authorized representative shall be eligible to receive
or hold a retail license under this title, nor shall such manufacturer,
importer, distributor, or authorized representative sell at retail any
liquor as herein defined. A corporation granted an exemption under
this subsection may use debt instruments issued in connection with
financing construction or operations of its facilities.
(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a licensed domestic
brewery or microbrewery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to
chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on
the brewery premises and at one additional off-site retail only
location and nothing in this section shall prohibit a domestic winery
from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the
purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on the winery premises. Such
beer and wine so sold at retail shall be subject to the taxes imposed
by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210 and to reporting and bonding
requirements as prescribed by regulations adopted by the board pursuant
to chapter 34.05 RCW, and beer and wine that is not produced by the
brewery or winery shall be purchased from a licensed beer or wine
distributor.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a licensed distiller,
domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or a lessee of a
licensed domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery, from being
licensed as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant pursuant to chapter
66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling liquor at a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant premises on the property on which the primary
manufacturing facility of the licensed distiller, domestic brewer,
microbrewery, or domestic winery is located or on contiguous property
owned or leased by the licensed distiller, domestic brewer,
microbrewery, or domestic winery as prescribed by rules adopted by the
board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. This section does not prohibit a
brewery or microbrewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license or a beer and/or wine license under chapter 66.24 RCW operated
on the premises of the brewery or microbrewery from holding a second
retail only license at a location separate from the premises of the
brewery or microbrewery.
(d) Nothing in this section prohibits retail licensees with a
caterer's endorsement issued under RCW 66.24.320 or 66.24.420 from
operating on a domestic winery premises.
(e) Nothing in this section prohibits an organization qualifying
under RCW 66.24.375 formed for the purpose of constructing and
operating a facility to promote Washington wines from holding retail
licenses on the facility property or leasing all or any portion of such
facility property to a retail licensee on the facility property if the
members of the board of directors or officers of the board for the
organization include officers, directors, owners, or employees of a
licensed domestic winery. Financing for the construction of the
facility must include both public and private money.
(f) Nothing in this section prohibits a bona fide charitable
nonprofit society or association registered as a 501(c)(3) under the
internal revenue code and having an officer, director, owner, or
employee of a licensed domestic winery or a wine certificate of
approval holder on its board of directors from holding a special
occasion license under RCW 66.24.380.
(g) Nothing in this section prohibits domestic wineries and
retailers licensed under chapter 66.24 RCW from jointly producing
brochures and materials promoting tourism in Washington state which
contain information regarding retail licensees, domestic wineries, and
their products.
(h) Nothing in this section prohibits domestic wineries and retail
licensees from identifying the wineries on private labels authorized
under RCW 66.24.400, 66.24.425, and 66.24.450.
(i) Until July 1, 2007, nothing in this section prohibits a
nonprofit statewide organization of microbreweries formed for the
purpose of promoting Washington's craft beer industry as a trade
association registered as a 501(c) with the internal revenue service
from holding a special occasion license to conduct up to six beer
festivals.
(2) Financial interest, direct or indirect, as used in this
section, shall include any interest, whether by stock ownership,
mortgage, lien, or through interlocking directors, or otherwise.
Pursuant to rules promulgated by the board in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW manufacturers, distributors, and importers may perform, and
retailers may accept the service of building, rotating and restocking
case displays and stock room inventories; rotating and rearranging can
and bottle displays of their own products; provide point of sale
material and brand signs; price case goods of their own brands; and
perform such similar normal business services as the board may by
regulation prescribe.
(3)(a) This section does not prohibit a manufacturer, importer, or
distributor from providing services to a special occasion licensee for:
(i) Installation of draft beer dispensing equipment or advertising,
(ii) advertising, pouring, or dispensing of beer or wine at a beer or
wine tasting exhibition or judging event, or (iii) a special occasion
licensee from receiving any such services as may be provided by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit a retail licensee, or any person financially interested,
directly or indirectly, in such a retail licensee from having a
financial interest, direct or indirect, in a business which provides,
for a compensation commensurate in value to the services provided,
bottling, canning or other services to a manufacturer, so long as the
retail licensee or person interested therein has no direct financial
interest in or control of said manufacturer.
(b) A person holding contractual rights to payment from selling a
liquor distributor's business and transferring the license shall not be
deemed to have a financial interest under this section if the person
(i) lacks any ownership in or control of the distributor, (ii) is not
employed by the distributor, and (iii) does not influence or attempt to
influence liquor purchases by retail liquor licensees from the
distributor.
(c) The board shall adopt such rules as are deemed necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of subsection (3)(a) of this
section in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter
34.05 RCW.
(4) A license issued under RCW 66.24.395 does not constitute a
retail license for the purposes of this section.
(5) A public house license issued under RCW 66.24.580 does not
violate the provisions of this section as to a retailer having an
interest directly or indirectly in a liquor-licensed manufacturer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 and 3 of this act expire June 30,
2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2 and 4 of this act take effect
June 30, 2008.

--- END ---