BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.16.110 and 2005 c 300 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Community-based solar energy project" means a project of local
citizens cooperating with a local governmental entity, which is
voluntarily funded, for the installation of photovoltaic systems of
less than one hundred thirty kilowatts on property owned by the
participating governmental entity.
(2) "Customer-generated electricity" means the alternating current
electricity that is generated from a renewable energy system located on
an individual's, businesses', or local government's real property that
is also provided electricity generated by a light and power business.
Except for a community-based solar energy project, a system located on
a leasehold interest does not qualify under this definition.
"Customer-generated electricity" does not include electricity generated
by a light and power business with greater than one thousand megawatt
hours of annual sales or a gas distribution business.
(((2))) (3) "Economic development kilowatt-hour" means the actual
kilowatt-hour measurement of customer-generated electricity multiplied
by the appropriate economic development factor.
(((3))) (4) "Local governmental entity" means any unit of local
government of this state including, but not limited to, counties,
cities, towns, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations,
special purpose districts, and school districts.
(5) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(((4))) (6) "Renewable energy system" means a solar energy system,
an anaerobic digester as defined in RCW 82.08.900, or a wind generator
used for producing electricity.
(((5))) (7) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination
of devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy
source for use in the generation of electricity.
(((6))) (8) "Solar inverter" means the device used to convert
direct current to alternating current in a photovoltaic cell system.
(((7))) (9) "Solar module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells
and providing a single direct current electrical output.
(((8) "Standards for interconnection to the electric distribution
system" means technical, engineering, operational, safety, and
procedural requirements for interconnection to the electric
distribution system of a light and power business.))

Sec. 2 RCW 82.16.120 and 2005 c 300 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any individual, business, or local governmental entity, not in
the light and power business or in the gas distribution business, may
apply to the light and power business serving the situs of the system,
each fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2005, for an investment cost
recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour from a customer-generated
electricity renewable energy system installed on its property that is
((not)) interconnected to the electric distribution system. No
incentive may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated before July 1, 2005,
or after June 30, 2014.
(2) ((When light and power businesses serving eighty percent of the
total customer load in the state adopt uniform standards for
interconnection to the electric distribution system, any individual,
business, or local governmental entity, not in the light and power
business or in the gas distribution business, may apply to the light
and power business serving the situs of the system, each fiscal year,
for an investment cost recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour from
a customer-generated electricity renewable energy system installed on
its property that is not interconnected to the electric distribution
system and from a customer-generated electricity renewable energy
system installed on its property that is interconnected to the electric
distribution system. Uniform standards for interconnection to the
electric distribution system means those standards established by light
and power businesses that have ninety percent of total requirements the
same. No incentive may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated before
July 1, 2005, or after June 30, 2014.
(3)))(a) Before submitting for the first time the application for
the incentive allowed under this section, the applicant shall submit to
the department of revenue and to the climate and rural energy
development center at the Washington State University, established
under RCW 28B.30.642, a certification in a form and manner prescribed
by the department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) That the electricity produced by the applicant meets the
definition of "customer-generated electricity" and that the renewable
energy system produces electricity with:
(A) Any solar inverters and solar modules manufactured in
Washington state;
(B) A wind generator powered by blades manufactured in Washington
state;
(C) A solar inverter manufactured in Washington state;
(D) A solar module manufactured in Washington state; or
(E) Solar or wind equipment manufactured outside of Washington
state;
(iv) That the electricity can be transformed or transmitted for
entry into or operation in parallel with electricity transmission and
distribution systems;
(v) The date that the renewable energy system received its final
electrical permit from the applicable local jurisdiction.
(b) Within thirty days of receipt of the certification the
department of revenue shall advise the applicant in writing whether the
renewable energy system qualifies for an incentive under this section.
The department may consult with the climate and rural energy
development center to determine eligibility for the incentive. System
certifications and the information contained therein are subject to
disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(((4))) (3)(a) By August 1st of each year application for the
incentive shall be made to the light and power business serving the
situs of the system by certification in a form and manner prescribed by
the department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) The date of the letter from the department of revenue stating
that the renewable energy system is eligible for the incentives under
this section;
(iv) A statement of the amount of kilowatt-hours generated by the
renewable energy system in the prior fiscal year.
(b) Within sixty days of receipt of the incentive certification the
light and power business serving the situs of the system shall notify
the applicant in writing whether the incentive payment will be
authorized or denied. The business may consult with the climate and
rural energy development center to determine eligibility for the
incentive payment. Incentive certifications and the information
contained therein are subject to disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(c)(i) Persons receiving incentive payments shall keep and
preserve, for a period of five years, suitable records as may be
necessary to determine the amount of incentive applied for and
received. Such records shall be open for examination at any time upon
notice by the light and power business that made the payment or by the
department. If upon examination of any records or from other
information obtained by the business or department it appears that an
incentive has been paid in an amount that exceeds the correct amount of
incentive payable, the business may assess against the person for the
amount found to have been paid in excess of the correct amount of
incentive payable and shall add thereto interest on the amount.
Interest shall be assessed in the manner that the department assesses
interest upon delinquent tax under RCW 82.32.050.
(ii) If it appears that the amount of incentive paid is less than
the correct amount of incentive payable the business may authorize
additional payment.
(((5))) (4) The investment cost recovery incentive may be paid
fifteen cents per economic development kilowatt-hour unless requests
exceed the amount authorized for credit to the participating light and
power business. For the purposes of this section, the rate paid for
the investment cost recovery incentive may be multiplied by the
following factors:
(a) For customer-generated electricity produced using solar modules
manufactured in Washington state, two and four-tenths;
(b) For customer-generated electricity produced using a solar or a
wind generator equipped with an inverter manufactured in Washington
state, one and two-tenths;
(c) For customer-generated electricity produced using an anaerobic
digester, or by other solar equipment or using a wind generator
equipped with blades manufactured in Washington state, one; and
(d) For all other customer-generated electricity produced by wind,
eight-tenths.
(((6))) (5) No individual, household, business, or local
governmental entity is eligible for incentives for more than two
thousand dollars per year. For the purpose of calculating the annual
incentive limit under this subsection, community-based solar projects
that are located on separate parcels of property, are not to be
combined, as each project is individually eligible for incentives of up
to two thousand dollars per year per project.
(((7))) (6) If requests for the investment cost recovery incentive
exceed the amount of funds available for credit to the participating
light and power business, the incentive payments shall be reduced
proportionately.
(((8))) (7) The climate and rural energy development center at
Washington State University energy program may establish guidelines and
standards for technologies that are identified as Washington
manufactured and therefore most beneficial to the state's environment.
(((9))) (8) The environmental attributes of the renewable energy
system belong to the applicant, and do not transfer to the state or the
light and power business upon receipt of the investment cost recovery
incentive.

--- END ---