BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature recognizes that chemical
dependency is a public safety problem in Washington state and that
chemical dependency-related motor vehicle incidents have a significant
bearing on overall law enforcement and court caseloads. The
legislature further recognizes the growing costs associated with
chemical dependency treatment and chemical dependency-related motor
vehicle prevention, education, and advocacy programs established by
local governments and by community-based organizations.
(2) It is the legislature's intent to establish a penalty that will
hold convicted motor vehicle offenders accountable, and to offset the
costs of chemical dependency treatment and chemical dependency-related
motor vehicle prevention, education, and advocacy programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All superior courts, and courts organized under Title 3 or 35
RCW, may impose a penalty assessment not to exceed one hundred dollars
on any person who is convicted for violating RCW 46.20.342 (driving
while license invalidated), 46.20.740 (driving without interlock),
46.20.750 (circumventing ignition interlock), 46.61.500 (reckless
driving), 46.61.502 (driving under the influence), 46.61.503 (minor
driving after consuming), 46.61.504 (physical control of vehicle under
the influence), 46.61.520 (vehicular homicide), 46.61.522 (vehicular
assault), 46.61.5249 (negligent driving in the first degree), or
46.61.530 (racing of vehicles on highways). The assessment is in
addition to, and does not supersede, any other penalty, restitution,
fines, or costs provided by law.
(2)(a) Revenue from the penalty assessment shall be used solely for
the purposes of establishing and funding the following programs in the
city or county of the court imposing the assessment:
(i) Law enforcement education, prevention, and enforcement programs
designed to reduce motor vehicle related accidents and deaths;
(ii) Evidence-based or research-based advocacy, education, and
prevention programs related to chemical dependency and motor vehicle
operation; or
(iii) Chemical dependency treatment programs.
(b) If the city or county does not have the programs specified in
(a) of this subsection, cities and counties may use the revenue
collected from the assessment to contract for such programs.
(c) Revenue from the assessment shall not be used for indigent
criminal defense. Revenue from the assessment shall not be used for
indigent criminal defense. If the city or county does not have
advocacy, prevention, and prosecution programs related to chemical
dependency and motor vehicle operation, or programs related to chemical
dependency treatment, cities and counties may use the revenue collected
from the assessment to contract with recognized community-based
chemical dependency motor vehicle program providers or chemical
dependency treatment providers.
(3) When determining whether to impose a penalty assessment under
this section, judges are encouraged to provide opportunities for
victims to provide testimony.
(4) The assessment imposed under this section is not subject to any
state or local remittance requirements under chapter 3.46, 3.50, 3.62,
7.68, 10.82, or 35.20 RCW.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Convicted" includes a plea of guilty, a finding of guilt
regardless of whether the imposition of the sentence is deferred or any
part of the penalty is suspended, or the levying of a fine.
(b) "Evidence-based program" means a program or practice that has
had multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous
populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for
the population.
(c) "Research-based program" means a program or practice that has
some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet
the standard of evidence-based practices.

Sec. 3 RCW 3.50.100 and 2004 c 15 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Costs in civil and criminal actions may be imposed as provided
in district court. All fees, costs, fines, forfeitures and other money
imposed by any municipal court for the violation of any municipal or
town ordinances shall be collected by the court clerk and, together
with any other noninterest revenues received by the clerk, shall be
deposited with the city or town treasurer as a part of the general fund
of the city or town, or deposited in such other fund of the city or
town, or deposited in such other funds as may be designated by the laws
of the state of Washington.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 10.99.080 and section 2 of this act,
the city treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the
noninterest money received under this section, other than for parking
infractions, and certain costs to the state treasurer. "Certain costs"
as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing
parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those
costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions under
RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if
such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court and are
awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state,
county, city, or town in the prosecution of the case, including the
fees of defense counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the
state treasurer shall be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account
as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the city general fund,
and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 4 RCW 3.62.020 and 2004 c 15 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all
costs, fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected in
whole or in part by district courts, except costs, fines, forfeitures
and penalties assessed and collected, in whole or in part, because of
the violation of city ordinances, shall be remitted by the clerk of the
district court to the county treasurer at least monthly, together with
a financial statement as required by the state auditor, noting the
information necessary for crediting of such funds as required by law.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 10.99.080 and section 2 of this act,
the county treasurer shall remit thirty-two percent of the noninterest
money received under subsection (1) of this section except certain
costs to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this
subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil
actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against
convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state or county in the
prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. Money
remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer shall be
deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received by the county
treasurer under subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited in
the county current expense fund.
(4) All money collected for county parking infractions shall be
remitted by the clerk of the district court at least monthly, with the
information required under subsection (1) of this section, to the
county treasurer for deposit in the county current expense fund.
(5) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account
as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the county current
expense fund, and twenty-five percent to the county current expense
fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 5 RCW 3.62.090 and 2004 c 15 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) There shall be assessed and collected in addition to any fines,
forfeitures, or penalties assessed, other than for parking infractions,
by all courts organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW a public safety and
education assessment equal to seventy percent of such fines,
forfeitures, or penalties, which shall be remitted as provided in
chapters 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, and 35.20 RCW. The assessment required by
this section shall not be suspended or waived by the court.
(2) There shall be assessed and collected in addition to any fines,
forfeitures, or penalties assessed, other than for parking infractions
and for fines levied under RCW 46.61.5055, and in addition to the
public safety and education assessment required under subsection (1) of
this section, by all courts organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW, an
additional public safety and education assessment equal to fifty
percent of the public safety and education assessment required under
subsection (1) of this section, which shall be remitted to the state
treasurer and deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250. The additional
assessment required by this subsection shall not be suspended or waived
by the court.
(3) This section does not apply to the fee imposed under RCW
46.63.110(7), the penalty imposed under RCW 46.63.110(8), or the
penalty assessment imposed under RCW 10.99.080 and section 2 of this
act.

Sec. 6 RCW 10.82.070 and 2004 c 15 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All sums of money derived from costs, fines, penalties, and
forfeitures imposed or collected, in whole or in part, by a superior
court for violation of orders of injunction, mandamus and other like
writs, for contempt of court, or for breach of the penal laws shall be
paid in cash by the person collecting the same, within twenty days
after the collection, to the county treasurer of the county in which
the same have accrued.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 10.99.080 and section 2 of this act,
the county treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the
money received under this section except for certain costs to the state
treasurer for deposit as provided under RCW 43.08.250 and shall deposit
the remainder as provided by law. "Certain costs" as used in this
subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil
actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against
convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state or county in the
prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. Costs
or assessments awarded to dedicated accounts, state or local, are not
subject to this state allocation or to RCW 7.68.035.
(3) All fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties collected or
assessed by a district court because of the violation of a state law
shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW as now exists or is
later amended. All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected
or assessed by a superior court in cases on appeal from a lower court
shall be remitted to the municipal or district court from which the
cases were appealed.

Sec. 7 RCW 3.46.120 and 2004 c 15 s 7 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) All money received by the clerk of a municipal department
including penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees and costs shall be
paid by the clerk to the city treasurer.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 10.99.080 and section 2 of this act,
the city treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the
noninterest money received under this section, other than for parking
infractions, and certain costs to the state treasurer. "Certain costs"
as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing
parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those
costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions under
RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if
such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court and are
awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state,
county, city, or town in the prosecution of the case, including the
fees of defense counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the
state treasurer shall be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account
as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the city general fund,
and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 8 RCW 3.62.040 and 2004 c 15 s 8 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all
costs, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected, in
whole or in part, by district courts because of violations of city
ordinances shall be remitted by the clerk of the district court at
least monthly directly to the treasurer of the city wherein the
violation occurred.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 10.99.080 and section 2 of this act,
the city treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the
noninterest money received under this section, other than for parking
infractions and certain costs, to the state treasurer. "Certain costs"
as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing
parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those
costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions under
RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if
such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court and are
awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state,
county, city, or town in the prosecution of the case, including the
fees of defense counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the
state treasurer shall be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) All money collected for city parking infractions shall be
remitted by the clerk of the district court at least monthly to the
city treasurer for deposit in the city's general fund.
(5) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account
as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the city general fund,
and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 9 RCW 35.20.220 and 2004 c 15 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The chief clerk, under the supervision and direction of the
court administrator of the municipal court, shall have the custody and
care of the books, papers and records of said court; he shall be
present by himself or deputy during the session of said court, and
shall have the power to swear all witnesses and jurors, and administer
oaths and affidavits, and take acknowledgments. He shall keep the
records of said court, and shall issue all process under his hand and
the seal of said court, and shall do and perform all things and have
the same powers pertaining to his office as the clerks of the superior
courts have in their office. He shall receive all fines, penalties and
fees of every kind, and keep a full, accurate and detailed account of
the same; and shall on each day pay into the city treasury all money
received for said city during the day previous, with a detailed account
of the same, and taking the treasurer's receipt therefor.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 10.99.080 and section 2 of this act,
the city treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the
noninterest money received under this section, other than for parking
infractions and certain costs to the state treasurer. "Certain costs"
as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing
parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those
costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions under
RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if
such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court and are
awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state,
county, city, or town in the prosecution of the case, including the
fees of defense counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the
state treasurer shall be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account
as provided in RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as
provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the city general fund,
and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.

--- END ---