BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.34 RCW
to read as follows:
A watershed management partnership formed under the authority of
RCW 39.34.210 that is composed entirely of public agencies authorized
to exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by
chapter 8.12 RCW, and a separate legal entity established by such a
partnership to conduct the cooperated undertaking of the partnership
under the same statutory authority, may also exercise the power of
eminent domain as provided in chapter 8.12 RCW; provided that, the
authority granted shall be limited to those purposes for which the
watershed management partnership was formed.

--- END ---