BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.14.050 and 1979 ex.s. c 153 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Immediately after appointment the commission shall organize by
electing one of its members ((chairman)) as chair and shall hold
regular meetings at least once a month, and such additional meetings as
may be required for the proper discharge of its duties.
((It)) The commission shall appoint a chief examiner who shall also
serve as secretary of the commission and such assistants as may be
necessary. The commission has supervisory responsibility over the
chief examiner. The chief examiner shall keep the records for the
commission, preserve all reports made to it, superintend and keep a
record of all examinations held under its direction, and perform such
other duties as the commission may prescribe.
The chief examiner shall be appointed as a result of competitive
examination, which examination must be open to all properly qualified
citizens of the county: PROVIDED, That no appointee of the commission,
either as chief examiner or as an assistant to the chief examiner,
shall be an employee of the sheriff's department. The chief examiner
may be subject to suspension, reduction, or discharge in the same
manner and subject to the same limitations as are provided in the case
of members of the classified service.

--- END ---