BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.48.090 and 2002 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Contracts for jail services may be made between a county and a
city, and among counties and cities. The contracts shall: Be in
writing, give one governing unit the responsibility for the operation
of the jails, specify the responsibilities of each governing unit
involved, and include the applicable charges for custody of the
prisoners as well as the basis for adjustments in the charges. The
contracts may be terminated only by ninety days written notice to the
governing units involved and to the office. The notice shall state the
grounds for termination and the specific plans for accommodating the
affected jail population.
(2) A city or county may contract for jail services with an
adjacent county, or city in an adjacent county, in a neighboring state.
A person convicted in the courts of this state and sentenced to a term
of confinement in a city or county jail may be transported to a jail in
the adjacent county to be confined until: (a) The term of confinement
is completed; or (b) that person is returned to be confined in a city
or county jail in this state.
(3) The contract authorized in subsection (1) of this section shall
be for a minimum term of ten years when state funds are provided to
construct or remodel a jail in one governing unit that will be used to
house prisoners of other governing units. The contract may not be
terminated prior to the end of the term without the office's approval.
If the contract is terminated, or upon the expiration and nonrenewal of
the contract, the governing unit whose jail facility was built or
remodeled to hold the prisoners of other governing units shall pay to
the state treasurer the amount set by the corrections standards board
or office when it authorized disbursal of state funds for the
remodeling or construction under RCW 70.48.120. This amount shall be
deposited in the local jail improvement and construction account and
shall fairly represent the construction costs incurred in order to
house prisoners from other governing units. The office may pay the
funds to the governing units which had previously contracted for jail
services under rules which the office may adopt. The acceptance of
state funds for constructing or remodeling consolidated jail facilities
constitutes agreement to the proportionate amounts set by the office.
Notice of the proportionate amounts shall be given to all governing
units involved.
(((3))) (4) A city or county primarily responsible for the
operation of a jail or jails may create a department of corrections to
be in charge of such jail and of all persons confined therein by law,
subject to the authority of the governing unit. If such department is
created, it shall have charge of jails and persons confined therein.
If no such department of corrections is created, the chief law
enforcement officer of the city or county primarily responsible for the
operation of said jail shall have charge of the jail and of all persons
confined therein.

--- END ---