BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that school directors
provide direction and oversight to public education in a community.
The legislature further finds that historically, school directors have,
among other things, approved budgets and contracts, determined the need
for local levy and bond issues, and dealt with concerns voiced by a
school district's constituents. The legislature further finds that the
roles and responsibilities of school boards seem to be changing because
of the new demands created by state and federal education reform and
school accountability policies. The legislature further finds that
these responsibilities include setting the vision for the school
district, creating successful board and superintendent relations,
understanding school law and finance, accounting for school and school
district improvement, using data to make decisions, and advocating for
public education in the community, regionally, and at the state level.
The legislature further finds that training in these areas will support
school directors to assist students, schools, and school districts be
successful.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.343
RCW to read as follows:
Subject to available funding, each member of a school district
board of directors shall complete a minimum of seven hours of training
annually. The hours of training obtained by each member must be posted
on the school district's web site.

--- END ---