BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state's definition of basic education
and the corresponding funding formulas must be regularly updated in
order to keep pace with evolving educational practices and increasing
state and federal requirements and to ensure that all schools have the
resources they need to help give all students the opportunity to be
fully prepared to compete in a global economy. The work of Washington
learns steering committee and the K-12 advisory committee provides a
valuable starting point from which to evaluate the current educational
system and develop a unique, transparent, and stable educational
funding system for Washington that supports the goals and the vision of
a world-class learner-focused K-12 educational system that were
established in the final Washington learns report.
This act is intended to make provision for some significant steps
towards a new basic education funding system and establishes a
technical work group to address the details and next steps beyond the
2007-2009 biennium that will be necessary to implement a new
comprehensive K-12 finance formula or formulas that will provide
Washington schools with stable and adequate funding as the expectations
for the K-12 system continue to evolve.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall staff a joint task force to review the definition
of basic education and all current basic education funding formulas and
develop a new funding structure and all necessary formulas, and a new
definition of basic education, that is realigned with the new
expectations of the state's education system as established in the
November 2006 final report of the Washington learns steering committee
and the basic education provisions established in chapter 28A.150 RCW.
(2) The joint task force shall consist of thirteen members:
(a) Four members shall be legislators. The president of the senate
shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the
senate. The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives;
(b) The chair, who shall have business experience, experience with
Washington finance issues including knowledge of the K-12 funding
formulas, and who shall be appointed by the governor;
(c) The superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee; and
(d) The governor shall appoint the remaining seven members. Each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate shall submit names to the
president of the senate to submit to the governor. Each of the two
largest caucuses of the house of representatives shall submit names to
the speaker of the house of representatives to submit to the governor.
The governor shall select individuals who have evidence of significant
experience with Washington K-12 finance issues, including the use and
application of the current basic education funding formulas.
(3) The Washington institute of public policy shall consult with
stakeholders and experts in the field to develop information for use by
the joint task force.
(4) In developing the recommendations, the joint task force shall
review and build upon the following:
(a) Reports related to K-12 finance produced at the request of or
as a result of the Washington learns study, including reports completed
for or by the K-12 advisory committee;
(b) High-quality studies that are available; and
(c) Research and evaluation of the cost-benefits of various K-12
programs and services developed by the institute for public policy as
directed by the legislature in section 607(15), chapter 372, Laws of
2006.
(5) The institute for public policy shall provide to the joint task
force the following:
(a) An initial report within sixty days of the effective date of
this section establishing an initial plan of action, reporting
deadlines, a timeline for fulfilling the requirements of section 3 of
this act, and an initial recommended timeline for a phased-in
implementation of a new funding system that does not exceed six years;
(b) A second report by September 15, 2007, that includes
recommendations, including implementing legislation as necessary, for
at least two but no more than four options for allocating school
employee compensation. One of the options must be outcome-based, and
one of the options must be a redirection and prioritization within
existing resources based on research-proven education programs. The
report must also include a projection of the expected effect of the
investment made under the new funding structure. The second report
shall also include a finalized timeline and plan for addressing the
remaining components of a new funding system; and
(c) A final report with recommendations for at least two but no
more than four options for revising the remaining K-12 funding
structure, including implementing legislation as necessary, and a
timeline for phasing in full adoption of the new funding structure.
The final report shall be submitted to the joint task force by January
1, 2008. One of the options must be outcome-based, and one of the
options must be a redirection and prioritization within existing
resources based on research-proven education programs. The final
report must also include a projection of the expected effect of the
investment made under the new funding structure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The funding structure alternatives
developed by the joint task force under section 2 of this act shall
take into consideration the legislative priorities in this section, to
the maximum extent possible and as appropriate to each formula.
(2) The funding structure should reflect the most effective
instructional strategies and service delivery models and be based on
research-proven education programs and activities with demonstrated
cost benefits. In reviewing the possible strategies and models to
include in the funding structure the task force shall, at a minimum,
consider the following issues:
(a) Professional development for all staff;
(b) Whether the compensation system for instructional staff shall
include pay for performance, knowledge, and skills elements; elements
to recognize assignments that are difficult; recognition for the
professional teaching level certificate in the salary allocation model;
and a plan to implement the pay structure;
(c) Voluntary all-day kindergarten;
(d) Optimum class size, including different class sizes based on
grade level and ways to reduce class size;
(e) Focused instructional support for students and schools;
(f) Extended school day and school year options; and
(g) Health and safety requirements.
(3) The recommendations should provide maximum transparency of the
state's educational funding system in order to better help parents,
citizens, and school personnel in Washington understand how their
school system is funded.
(4) The funding structure should be linked to accountability for
student outcomes and performance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---