BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authentication" means to affirmatively verify before any
wholesale distribution of a prescription drug occurs that each
transaction listed on the pedigree has occurred.
(2) "Authorized distributor of record" means a wholesale
distributor with whom a manufacturer has established an ongoing
relationship to distribute the manufacturer's prescription drug. An
ongoing relationship is deemed to exist between such a wholesale
distributor and a manufacturer when the wholesale distributor,
including any affiliated group of the wholesale distributor, as defined
in section 1504 of the internal revenue code, complies with any one of
the following: (a) The wholesale distributor has a written agreement
currently in effect with the manufacturer evidencing such an ongoing
relationship; and (b) the wholesale distributor is listed on the
manufacturer's current list of authorized distributors of record, which
is updated by the manufacturer on no less than a monthly basis.
(3) "Drop shipment" means the sale of a prescription drug to a
wholesale distributor by the manufacturer of the prescription drug, or
that manufacturer's colicensed product partner, that manufacturer's
third-party logistics provider, or that manufacturer's exclusive
distributor, whereby the wholesale distributor or chain pharmacy
warehouse takes title but not physical possession of such a
prescription drug and the wholesale distributor invoices the pharmacy
or chain pharmacy warehouse, or other person authorized by law to
dispense or administer such a drug to a patient, and the pharmacy or
chain pharmacy warehouse or other authorized person receives delivery
of the prescription drug directly from the manufacturer, that
manufacturer's third-party logistics provider, or that manufacturer's
exclusive distributor.
(4) "Chain pharmacy warehouse" means a physical location for
prescription drugs that acts as a central warehouse and performs
intracompany sales or transfers of the drugs to a group of chain
pharmacies that have the same common ownership and control.
(5) "Colicensed product" means a prescription drug in which two or
more parties have the right to engage in the manufacturing or marketing
of such a drug.
(6) "Facility" means a facility of a wholesale distributor where
prescription drugs are stored, handled, repackaged, or offered for
sale.
(7) "Manufacturer" means a person licensed or approved by the
federal food and drug administration to engage in the manufacture of
drugs or devices.
(8) "Manufacturer's exclusive distributor" means anyone who
contracts with a manufacturer to provide or coordinate warehousing,
distribution, or other services on behalf of a manufacturer and who
takes title to that manufacturer's prescription drug, but who does not
have general responsibility to direct the sale or disposition of the
manufacturer's prescription drug. A manufacturer's exclusive
distributor must be licensed as a wholesale distributor under this
chapter, and to be considered part of the normal distribution channel
must also be an authorized distributor of record.
(9) "Normal distribution channel" means a chain of custody for a
prescription drug that goes from a manufacturer of the prescription
drug, from that manufacturer to that manufacturer's colicensed partner,
from that manufacturer to that manufacturer's third-party logistics
provider, or from that manufacturer to that manufacturer's exclusive
distributor to:
(a) A pharmacy to a patient or other designated person authorized
by law to dispense or administer the drug to a patient;
(b) A wholesale distributor to a pharmacy to a patient or other
designated person authorized by law to dispense or administer the drug
to a patient;
(c) A wholesale distributor to a chain pharmacy warehouse to that
chain pharmacy warehouse's intracompany pharmacy to a patient or other
designated person authorized by law to dispense or administer the drug
to a patient; or
(d) A chain pharmacy warehouse to the chain pharmacy warehouse's
intracompany pharmacy to a patient or other designated person
authorized by law to dispense or administer the drug to a patient.
(10) "Pedigree" means a document or electronic file containing
information that records each distribution of any given prescription
drug.
(11) "Prescription drug" means any drug (including any biological
product, except for blood and blood components intended for transfusion
or biological products that are also medical devices) required by
federal law or federal regulation to be dispensed only by a
prescription, including finished dosage forms and bulk drug substances
subject to section 503(b) of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act.
(12) "Repackage" means repackaging or otherwise changing the
container, wrapper, or labeling to further the distribution of a
prescription drug excluding that completed by the pharmacists
responsible for dispensing the product to the patient.
(13) "Repackager" means a person who repackages.
(14) "Third-party logistics provider" means anyone who contracts
with a prescription drug manufacturer to provide or coordinate
warehousing, distribution, or other services on behalf of a
manufacturer, but does not take title to the prescription drug or have
general responsibility to direct the prescription drug's sale or
disposition. The third-party logistics provider must be licensed as a
wholesale distributor under this chapter, and to be considered part of
the normal distribution channel must also be an authorized distributor
of record.
(15) "Wholesale distributor" means anyone engaged in the wholesale
distribution of prescription drugs, including, but not limited to:
Manufacturers; repackagers; own-label distributors; private-label
distributors; jobbers; brokers; warehouses, including manufacturers'
and distributors' warehouses; manufacturer's exclusive distributors;
authorized distributors of record; drug wholesalers or distributors;
independent wholesale drug traders; specialty wholesale distributors;
third-party logistics providers; retail pharmacies that conduct
wholesale distribution; and chain pharmacy warehouses that conduct
wholesale distribution. To be considered part of the normal
distribution channel the wholesale distributor must also be an
authorized distributor of record.
(16) "Wholesale distribution" means distribution of prescription
drugs to persons other than a consumer or patient, but does not
include:
(a) Intracompany sales of prescription drugs, meaning any
transaction or transfer between any division, subsidiary, parent, or
affiliated or related company under common ownership and control of a
corporate entity, or any transaction or transfer between colicensees of
a colicensed product;
(b) The sale, purchase, distribution, trade, or transfer of a
prescription drug or offer to sell, purchase, distribute, trade, or
transfer a prescription drug for emergency medical reasons;
(c) The distribution of prescription drug samples by manufacturers'
representatives;
(d) Drug returns, when conducted by a hospital, health care entity,
or charitable institution in accordance with 21 C.F.R. Sec. 203.23;
(e) The sale of minimal quantities of prescription drugs by retail
pharmacies to licensed practitioners for office use;
(f) The sale, purchase, or trade of a drug, an offer to sell,
purchase, or trade a drug, or the dispensing of a drug pursuant to a
prescription;
(g) The sale, transfer, merger, or consolidation of all or part of
the business of a pharmacy or pharmacies from or with another pharmacy
or pharmacies, whether accomplished as a purchase and sale of stock or
business assets;
(h) The sale, purchase, distribution, trade, or transfer of a
prescription drug from one authorized distributor of record to one
additional authorized distributor of record when the manufacturer has
stated in writing to the receiving authorized distributor of record
that the manufacturer is unable to supply the prescription drug and the
supplying authorized distributor of record states in writing that the
prescription drug being supplied had until that time been exclusively
in the normal distribution channel;
(i) The delivery of, or offer to deliver, a prescription drug by a
common carrier solely in the common carrier's usual course of business
of transporting prescription drugs, and the common carrier does not
store, warehouse, or take legal ownership of the prescription drug;
(j) The sale or transfer from a retail pharmacy or chain pharmacy
warehouse of expired, damaged, returned, or recalled prescription drugs
to the original manufacturer or to a third-party returns processor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Every wholesale distributor who engages
in the wholesale distribution of prescription drugs must be licensed by
the department of licensing, and every nonresident wholesale
distributor must be licensed by the department of licensing if it ships
prescription drugs into this state, in accordance with this chapter
before engaging in wholesale distributions of wholesale prescription
drugs. The department of licensing shall exempt manufacturers
distributing their own United States food and drug
administration-approved drugs and devices from any licensing and other
requirements of this section, to the extent not required by federal law
or regulation, unless particular requirements are deemed necessary and
appropriate by rule.
(2) The department of licensing shall require the following minimum
information from each wholesale distributor applying to get a license
under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The name, full business address, and telephone number of the
licensee;
(b) All trade or business names used by the licensee;
(c) Addresses, telephone numbers, and the names of contact persons
for all facilities used by the licensee for the storage, handling, and
distribution of prescription drugs;
(d) The type of ownership or operation;
(e) The name or names of the owner or operator of the licensee,
including:
(i) If a person, the name of the person;
(ii) If a partnership, the name of each partner, and the name of
the partnership;
(iii) If a corporation, the name and title of each corporate
officer and director, the corporate names, and the name of the state of
incorporation; and
(iv) If a sole proprietorship, the full name of the sole proprietor
and the name of the business entity;
(f) A list of all licenses and permits issued to the applicant by
any other state that authorizes the applicant to purchase or possess
prescription drugs;
(g) The name of the applicant's designated representative for the
facility, together with the personal information statement and
fingerprints required under (h) of this subsection for the person;
(h) Each person required by (g) of this subsection to provide a
personal information statement and fingerprints must provide the
following information to the department of licensing:
(i) The person's places of residence for the past seven years;
(ii) The person's date and place of birth;
(iii) The person's occupations, positions of employment, and
offices held during the past seven years;
(iv) The principal business and address of any business,
corporation, or other organization in which each office of the person
was held or in which each occupation or position of employment was
carried on;
(v) Whether during the past seven years the person has been the
subject of any proceeding for the revocation of any license or any
criminal violation and, if so, the nature of the proceeding and the
disposition of the proceeding;
(vi) Whether during the past seven years the person has been
enjoined, either temporarily or permanently, by a court of competent
jurisdiction from violating any federal or state law regulating the
possession, control, or distribution of prescription drugs or criminal
violations, together with details concerning such an event;
(vii) A description of any involvement by the person with any
business, including any investments, other than the ownership of stock
in a publicly traded company or mutual fund, during the past seven
years, that manufactured, administered, prescribed, distributed, or
stored pharmaceutical products and any lawsuits in which such
businesses were named as a party;
(viii) A description of any misdemeanor or felony criminal offense
of which the person, as an adult, was found guilty, regardless of
whether adjudication of guilt was withheld or whether the person pled
guilty or nolo contendere. If the person indicates that a criminal
conviction is under appeal and submits a copy of the notice of appeal
of that criminal offense, the applicant must, within fifteen days after
the disposition of the appeal, submit to the department of licensing a
copy of the final written order of disposition; and
(ix) A photograph of the person taken in the previous thirty days.
(3) The information required under subsection (2) of this section
must be provided under oath.
(4) The department of licensing shall not issue a wholesale
distributor license to an applicant unless the department of licensing:
(a) Conducts a physical inspection of the facility at the address
provided by the applicant as required in subsection (2)(a) of this
section; and
(b) Determines that the designated representative meets the
following qualifications:
(i) Is at least twenty-one years of age;
(ii) Has been employed full time for at least three years in a
pharmacy or with a wholesale distributor in a capacity related to the
dispensing and distribution of, and recordkeeping relating to,
prescription drugs;
(iii) Is employed by the applicant full time in a managerial level
position;
(iv) Is actively involved in and aware of the actual daily
operation of the wholesale distributor;
(v) Is physically present at the facility of the applicant during
regular business hours, except when the absence of the designated
representative is authorized, including but not limited to, sick leave
and vacation leave;
(vi) Is serving in the capacity of a designated representative for
only one applicant at a time, except where more than one licensed
wholesale distributor is colocated in the same facility and the
wholesale distributors are members of an affiliated group, as defined
in section 1504 of the internal revenue code;
(vii) Does not have any convictions under any federal, state, or
local laws relating to wholesale or retail prescription drug
distribution or distribution of controlled substances; and
(viii) Does not have any felony convictions under federal, state,
or local laws.
(5) The department of licensing shall submit the fingerprints
provided by a person with a license application for a statewide
criminal record check and for forwarding to the federal bureau of
investigation for a national criminal record check of the person.
(6) The department of licensing shall require every wholesale
distributor applying for a license to submit a bond of at least one
hundred thousand dollars, or other equivalent means of security
acceptable to the department, such as an irrevocable letter of credit
or a deposit in a trust account or financial institution, payable to a
fund established by the department of licensing under subsection (7) of
this section. Chain pharmacy warehouses that are engaged only in
intracompany transfers are exempt from the bond requirement. The
purpose of the bond is to secure payment of any fines or penalties
imposed by the department of licensing and any fees and costs incurred
by the department of licensing regarding that license, which are
authorized under state law and which the licensee fails to pay thirty
days after the fines, penalties, or costs become final. The department
of licensing may make a claim against such a bond or security until one
year after the licensee's license ceases to be valid. A single bond
may suffice to cover all facilities operated by the applicant in the
state.
(7) The department of licensing shall establish a fund, separate
from its other accounts, in which to deposit the wholesale distributor
bonds.
(8) If a wholesale distributor distributes prescription drugs from
more than one facility, the wholesale distributor shall obtain a
license for each facility.
(9) In accordance with each licensure renewal, the department of
licensing shall send to each wholesale distributor licensed under this
section a form setting forth the information that the wholesale
distributor provided under subsection (2) of this section. Within
thirty days of receiving such a form, the wholesale distributor must
identify and state under oath to the department of licensing all
changes or corrections to the information that was provided under
subsection (2) of this section. Changes in, or corrections to, any
information in subsection (2) of this section must be submitted to the
department of licensing as required by the department. The department
of licensing may suspend or revoke the license of a wholesale
distributor if the department determines that the wholesale distributor
no longer qualifies for the license issued under this section.
(10) The designated representative identified under subsection
(2)(g) of this section must receive and complete continuing training in
applicable federal and state laws governing wholesale distribution of
prescription drugs.
(11) Information provided under this section may not be disclosed
to any person or entity other than the department of licensing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A wholesale distributor shall receive
prescription drug returns or exchanges from a pharmacy or chain
pharmacy warehouse pursuant to the terms and conditions of the
agreement between the wholesale distributor and the pharmacy or chain
pharmacy warehouse, including the returns of expired, damaged, and
recalled pharmaceutical product to either the original manufacturer or
a third-party returns processor, and such returns or exchanges are not
subject to the pedigree requirement of section 4 of this act, as long
as they are exempt from pedigree under the United States food and drug
administration's currently applicable prescription drug marketing act
guidance. Wholesale distributors and pharmacies shall be held
accountable for administering their returns process and ensuring that
the aspects of this operation are secure and do not permit the entry of
adulterated and counterfeit product.
(2) A manufacturer or wholesale distributor shall furnish
prescription drugs only to a person licensed by the department of
licensing. Before furnishing prescription drugs to a person not known
to the manufacturer or wholesale distributor, the manufacturer or
wholesale distributor shall affirmatively verify that the person is
legally authorized to receive the prescription drugs by contacting the
department of licensing.
(3) Prescription drugs furnished by a manufacturer or wholesale
distributor must be delivered only to the premises listed on the
license. However, the manufacturer or wholesale distributor may
furnish prescription drugs to an authorized person or agent of that
person at the premises of the manufacturer or wholesale distributor if:
(a) The identity and authorization of the recipient is properly
established; and
(b) This method of receipt is employed only to meet the immediate
needs of a particular patient of the authorized person.
(4) Prescription drugs may be furnished to a hospital pharmacy
receiving area provided that a pharmacist or authorized receiving
personnel signs, at the time of delivery, a receipt showing the type
and quantity of the prescription drug so received. Any discrepancy
between receipt and the type and quantity of the prescription drug
actually received must be reported to the delivering manufacturer or
wholesale distributor by the next business day after the delivery to
the pharmacy receiving area.
(5) A manufacturer or wholesale distributor may not accept payment
for, or allow the use of, a person or entity's credit to establish an
account for the purchase of prescription drugs from any person other
than the owner of record, the chief executive officer, or the chief
financial officer listed on the license of a person or entity legally
authorized to receive prescription drugs. Any account established for
the purchase of prescription drugs must bear the name of the licensee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Each person who is engaged in wholesale
distribution of prescription drugs, including repackagers, but
excluding the original manufacturer of the finished form of the
prescription drug, that leaves, or has ever left, the normal
distribution channel shall before each wholesale distribution of the
drug provide a pedigree to the person who receives the drug.
(a) A retail pharmacy or chain pharmacy warehouse must comply with
the requirements of this section only if the pharmacy or chain pharmacy
warehouse engages in wholesale distribution of prescription drugs.
(b) The board of pharmacy created under RCW 18.64.001 shall
determine by July 1, 2009, a targeted implementation date for
electronic track and trace pedigree technology. Such a determination
must be based on consultation with manufacturers, distributors, and
pharmacies responsible for the sale and distribution of prescription
drug products in the state. After consultation with interested
stakeholders and prior to implementation of the electronic pedigree,
the board of pharmacy shall deem that the technology is universally
available across the entire prescription pharmaceutical supply chain.
The implementation date for the mandated electronic track and trace
pedigree technology may be no sooner than July 1, 2010, and may be
extended by the board of pharmacy in one-year increments if it appears
the technology is not universally available across the entire
prescription pharmaceutical supply chain.
(2) Each person who is engaged in the wholesale distribution of a
prescription drug, including repackagers, but excluding the original
manufacturer of the finished form of the prescription drug, who is
provided a pedigree for a prescription drug and attempts to further
distribute that prescription drug, shall affirmatively verify before
any distribution of a prescription drug occurs that each transaction
listed on the pedigree has occurred.
(3)(a) The pedigree must include all necessary identifying
information concerning each sale in the chain of distribution of the
product from the manufacturer, the manufacturer's third-party logistics
provider, colicensed product partner, or manufacturer's exclusive
distributor through acquisition and sale by any wholesale distributor
or repackager, until final sale to a pharmacy or other person
dispensing or administering the drug. At minimum, the necessary chain
of distribution information must include:
(i) The name, address, telephone number, and if available, the
electronic mail address, of each owner of the prescription drug, and
each wholesale distributor of the prescription drug;
(ii) The name and address of each location from which the product
was shipped, if different from the owner's name and address;
(iii) Transaction dates; and
(iv) Certification that each recipient has authenticated the
pedigree.
(b) At minimum, the pedigree must also include the:
(i) Name of the prescription drug;
(ii) Dosage form and strength of the prescription drug;
(iii) Size of the container;
(iv) Number of containers;
(v) Lot number of the prescription drug; and
(vi) Name of the manufacturer of the finished dosage form.
(4) Each pedigree or electronic file must be:
(a) Maintained by the purchaser and the wholesale distributor for
three years from the date of sale or transfer; and
(b) Available for inspection or use within five business days upon
a request of an authorized peace officer.
(5) The department of licensing shall adopt rules and a form
relating to the requirements of this section no later than ninety days
after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1)(a) If the department of licensing finds
that there is a reasonable probability that a wholesale distributor,
other than a manufacturer, has:
(i) Violated a provision in this chapter; or
(ii) Falsified a pedigree, or sold, distributed, transferred,
manufactured, repackaged, handled, or held a counterfeit prescription
drug intended for human use; and
(b)(i) The prescription drug at issue as a result of a violation in
(a) of this subsection could cause serious, adverse health consequences
or death; and
(ii) Other procedures would result in unreasonable delay;
the department of licensing shall issue an order requiring the
appropriate person, including the distributors or retailers of the
drug, to immediately cease distribution of the drug within that state.
(2) An order under subsection (1) of this section shall provide the
person subject to the order with an opportunity for an informal
hearing, to be held not later than ten days after the date of the
issuance of the order, on the actions required by the order. If, after
providing an opportunity for such a hearing, the department of
licensing determines that inadequate grounds exist to support the
actions required by the order, the department of licensing shall vacate
the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) It is unlawful for a person to perform
or cause the performance of or aid and abet any of the following acts:
(a) Failure to obtain a license in accordance with this chapter, or
operating without a valid license when a license is required by this
chapter;
(b) If the requirements of section 3(1) of this act are applicable
and are not met, the purchasing or otherwise receiving a prescription
drug from a pharmacy;
(c) If a license is required under section 3(2) of this act, the
sale, distribution, or transfer of a prescription drug to a person that
is not authorized under the law of the jurisdiction in which the person
receives the prescription drug to receive the prescription drug;
(d) Failure to deliver prescription drugs to specified premises, as
required by section 3(3) of this act;
(e) Accepting payment or credit for the sale of prescription drugs
in violation of section 3(5) of this act;
(f) Failure to maintain or provide pedigrees as required by this
chapter;
(g) Failure to obtain, pass, or authenticate a pedigree, as
required by this chapter;
(h) Providing the department of licensing or any of its
representatives or any federal official with false or fraudulent
records or making false or fraudulent statements regarding any matter
within the provisions of this chapter;
(i) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a prescription drug by fraud,
deceit, or misrepresentation or engaging in misrepresentation or fraud
in the distribution of a prescription drug;
(j) Except for the wholesale distribution by manufacturers of a
prescription drug that has been delivered into commerce pursuant to an
application approved under federal law by the United States food and
drug administration, the manufacture, repacking, sale, transfer,
delivery, holding, or offering for sale of any prescription drug that
is adulterated, misbranded, counterfeit, suspected of being
counterfeit, or has otherwise been rendered unfit for distribution;
(k) Except for the wholesale distribution by manufacturers of a
prescription drug that has been delivered into commerce pursuant to an
application approved under federal law by the United States food and
drug administration, the adulteration, misbranding, or counterfeiting
of any prescription drug;
(l) The receipt of any prescription drug that is adulterated,
misbranded, stolen, obtained by fraud or deceit, counterfeit, or
suspected of being counterfeit, and the delivery or proffered delivery
of such a drug for pay or otherwise; and
(m) The alteration, mutilation, destruction, obliteration, or
removal of all or any part of the labeling of a prescription drug or
the commission of any other act with respect to a prescription drug
that results in the prescription drug being misbranded.
(2) The prohibited acts listed under subsection (1) of this section
do not include a prescription drug manufacturer, or agent of a
prescription drug manufacturer, obtaining or attempting to obtain a
prescription drug for the sole purpose of testing the prescription drug
for authenticity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) If a person engages in the wholesale
distribution of prescription drugs in violation of this chapter, the
person may be either imprisoned for not more than fifteen years or
fined not more than fifty thousand dollars, or both.
(2) If a person knowingly engages in wholesale distribution of
prescription drugs in violation of this chapter, the person shall be
either imprisoned for any term of years or fined not more than five
hundred thousand dollars, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---