BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.101.220 and 1981 c 136 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The corrections personnel of the state and all counties and
municipal corporations initially employed on or after January 1, 1982,
shall engage in basic corrections training which complies with
standards adopted by the commission ((pursuant to RCW 43.101.160)).
The training shall be successfully completed during the first six
months of employment of the personnel, unless otherwise extended or
waived by the commission, and shall be requisite to the continuation of
employment.
(2) ((The corrections personnel of the state and all counties and
municipal corporations transferred or promoted to a supervisory or
management position on or after January 1, 1982, shall engage in
supervisory and/or management training which complies with standards
adopted by the commission pursuant to RCW 43.101.160. The training
shall be successfully completed prior to or within the first six months
of employment, unless otherwise extended or waived by the commission,
and shall be requisite to the continuation of employment.
(3))) The commission shall provide the training required in this
section, together with facilities, supplies, materials, and the room
and board for noncommuting attendees.
(((4))) (3) Nothing in this section shall affect or impair the
employment status of any employee whose employer does not provide him
with the opportunity to engage in the required training.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.101.350 and 1997 c 351 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All law enforcement personnel initially hired to, transferred
to, or promoted to a supervisory or management position on or after
January 1, 1999, and all corrections personnel of the state and all
counties and municipal corporations transferred or promoted to a
supervisory or management position on or after January 1, 1982, shall,
within the first six months of entry into the position, successfully
complete the core training requirements prescribed by rule of the
commission for the position, or obtain a waiver or extension of the
core training requirements from the commission.
(2) Within one year after completion of the core training
requirements of this section, all law enforcement personnel and
corrections personnel shall successfully complete all remaining
requirements for career level certification prescribed by rule of the
commission applicable to their position or rank, or obtain a waiver or
extension of the career level training requirements from the
commission.
(3) The commission shall provide the training required in this
section, together with facilities, supplies, materials, and the room
and board for attendees who do not live within fifty miles of the
training center. The training shall be delivered in the least
disruptive manner to local law enforcement or corrections agencies, and
will include but not be limited to regional on-site training,
interactive training, and credit for training given by the home
department.
(4) Nothing in this section affects or impairs the employment
status of an employee whose employer does not provide the opportunity
to engage in the required training.

--- END ---