BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.72 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person with a duty to register as a sex offender under RCW
9A.44.130 is prohibited from gathering signatures for any initiative or
referendum measure.
(2) Petitions circulated by a person with a duty to register as a
sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130 shall not be counted when determining
whether the initiative measure contains sufficient signatures.
(3) A valid signatory may recover statutory damages of two hundred
dollars and actual damages from the entity or person employing a sex
offender with a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 as a paid or
volunteer signature gatherer. For the purposes of this section, a
valid signatory is a person whose signature on a petition would count
but for the fact that the petition was circulated by a person with a
duty to register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130. In an action
to recover statutory or actual damages under this section, the
prevailing party is entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

--- END ---