BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.24.025 and 2006 c 333 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Acutely mentally ill" means a condition which is limited to a
short-term severe crisis episode of:
(a) A mental disorder as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case
of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020;
(b) Being gravely disabled as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the
case of a child, a gravely disabled minor as defined in RCW 71.34.020;
or
(c) Presenting a likelihood of serious harm as defined in RCW
71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020.
(2) "Available resources" means funds appropriated for the purpose
of providing community mental health programs, federal funds, except
those provided according to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and
state funds appropriated under this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW by the
legislature during any biennium for the purpose of providing
residential services, resource management services, community support
services, and other mental health services. This does not include
funds appropriated for the purpose of operating and administering the
state psychiatric hospitals.
(3) "Child" means a person under the age of eighteen years.
(4) "Chronically mentally ill adult" or "adult who is chronically
mentally ill" means an adult who has a mental disorder and meets at
least one of the following criteria:
(a) Has undergone two or more episodes of hospital care for a
mental disorder within the preceding two years; or
(b) Has experienced a continuous psychiatric hospitalization or
residential treatment exceeding six months' duration within the
preceding year; or
(c) Has been unable to engage in any substantial gainful activity
by reason of any mental disorder which has lasted for a continuous
period of not less than twelve months. "Substantial gainful activity"
shall be defined by the department by rule consistent with Public Law
92-603, as amended.
(5) "Clubhouse" means a community-based program that provides
rehabilitation services and is certified by the department of social
and health services.
(6) "Community mental health program" means all mental health
services, activities, or programs using available resources.
(((6))) (7) "Community mental health service delivery system" means
public or private agencies that provide services specifically to
persons with mental disorders as defined under RCW 71.05.020 and
receive funding from public sources.
(((7))) (8) "Community support services" means services authorized,
planned, and coordinated through resource management services
including, at a minimum, assessment, diagnosis, emergency crisis
intervention available twenty-four hours, seven days a week,
prescreening determinations for persons who are mentally ill
((persons)) being considered for placement in nursing homes as required
by federal law, screening for patients being considered for admission
to residential services, diagnosis and treatment for children who are
acutely mentally ill ((and)) or severely emotionally disturbed
((children)) discovered under screening through the federal Title XIX
early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program,
investigation, legal, and other nonresidential services under chapter
71.05 RCW, case management services, psychiatric treatment including
medication supervision, counseling, psychotherapy, assuring transfer of
relevant patient information between service providers, recovery
services, and other services determined by regional support networks.
(((8))) (9) "Consensus-based" means a program or practice that has
general support among treatment providers and experts, based on
experience or professional literature, and may have anecdotal or case
study support, or that is agreed but not possible to perform studies
with random assignment and controlled groups.
(((9))) (10) "County authority" means the board of county
commissioners, county council, or county executive having authority to
establish a community mental health program, or two or more of the
county authorities specified in this subsection which have entered into
an agreement to provide a community mental health program.
(((10))) (11) "Department" means the department of social and
health services.
(((11))) (12) "Designated mental health professional" means a
mental health professional designated by the county or other authority
authorized in rule to perform the duties specified in this chapter.
(((12))) (13) "Emerging best practice" or "promising practice"
means a practice that presents, based on preliminary information,
potential for becoming a research-based or consensus-based practice.
(((13))) (14) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has
had multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous
populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for
the population.
(((14))) (15) "Licensed service provider" means an entity licensed
according to this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW or an entity deemed to
meet state minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a
recognized behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a
current agreement with the department, that meets state minimum
standards or persons licensed under chapter 18.57, 18.71, 18.83, or
18.79 RCW, as it applies to registered nurses and advanced registered
nurse practitioners.
(((15))) (16) "Long-term inpatient care" means inpatient services
for persons committed for, or voluntarily receiving intensive treatment
for, periods of ninety days or greater under chapter 71.05 RCW. "Long-term inpatient care" as used in this chapter does not include: (a)
Services for individuals committed under chapter 71.05 RCW who are
receiving services pursuant to a conditional release or a court-ordered
less restrictive alternative to detention; or (b) services for
individuals voluntarily receiving less restrictive alternative
treatment on the grounds of the state hospital.
(((16))) (17) "Mental health services" means all services provided
by regional support networks and other services provided by the state
for ((the)) persons who are mentally ill.
(((17))) (18) "Mentally ill persons," "persons who are mentally
ill," and "the mentally ill" mean persons and conditions defined in
subsections (1), (4), (((26))) (27), and (((27))) (28) of this section.
(((18))) (19) "Recovery" means the process in which people are able
to live, work, learn, and participate fully in their communities.
(((19))) (20) "Regional support network" means a county authority
or group of county authorities or other nonprofit entity recognized by
the secretary in contract in a defined region.
(((20))) (21) "Registration records" include all the records of the
department, regional support networks, treatment facilities, and other
persons providing services to the department, county departments, or
facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness.
(((21))) (22) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has
some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet
the standard of evidence-based practices.
(((22))) (23) "Residential services" means a complete range of
residences and supports authorized by resource management services and
which may involve a facility, a distinct part thereof, or services
which support community living, for persons who are acutely mentally
ill ((persons)), adults who are chronically mentally ill ((adults)),
children who are severely emotionally disturbed ((children)), or adults
who are seriously disturbed ((adults)) and determined by the regional
support network to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically
mentally ill. The services shall include at least evaluation and
treatment services as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW, acute crisis
respite care, long-term adaptive and rehabilitative care, and
supervised and supported living services, and shall also include any
residential services developed to service persons who are mentally ill
((persons)) in nursing homes, boarding homes, and adult family homes,
and may include outpatient services provided as an element in a package
of services in a supported housing model. Residential services for
children in out-of-home placements related to their mental disorder
shall not include the costs of food and shelter, except for children's
long-term residential facilities existing prior to January 1, 1991.
(((23))) (24) "Resilience" means the personal and community
qualities that enable individuals to rebound from adversity, trauma,
tragedy, threats, or other stresses, and to live productive lives.
(((24))) (25) "Resource management services" mean the planning,
coordination, and authorization of residential services and community
support services administered pursuant to an individual service plan
for: (a) Adults and children who are acutely mentally ill ((adults and
children)); (b) adults who are chronically mentally ill ((adults)); (c)
children who are severely emotionally disturbed ((children)); or (d)
adults who are seriously disturbed ((adults)) and determined solely by
a regional support network to be at risk of becoming acutely or
chronically mentally ill. Such planning, coordination, and
authorization shall include mental health screening for children
eligible under the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening,
diagnosis, and treatment program. Resource management services include
seven day a week, twenty-four hour a day availability of information
regarding ((mentally ill adults' and children's)) enrollment of adults
and children who are mentally ill in services and their individual
service plan to designated mental health professionals, evaluation and
treatment facilities, and others as determined by the regional support
network.
(((25))) (26) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health
services.
(((26))) (27) "Seriously disturbed person" means a person who:
(a) Is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to
himself or herself or others, or to the property of others, as a result
of a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW;
(b) Has been on conditional release status, or under a less
restrictive alternative order, at some time during the preceding two
years from an evaluation and treatment facility or a state mental
health hospital;
(c) Has a mental disorder which causes major impairment in several
areas of daily living;
(d) Exhibits suicidal preoccupation or attempts; or
(e) Is a child diagnosed by a mental health professional, as
defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, as experiencing a mental disorder which
is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school
or with peers or is clearly interfering with the child's personality
development and learning.
(((27))) (28) "Severely emotionally disturbed child" or "child who
is severely emotionally disturbed" means a child who has been
determined by the regional support network to be experiencing a mental
disorder as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, including those mental
disorders that result in a behavioral or conduct disorder, that is
clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school or
with peers and who meets at least one of the following criteria:
(a) Has undergone inpatient treatment or placement outside of the
home related to a mental disorder within the last two years;
(b) Has undergone involuntary treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW
within the last two years;
(c) Is currently served by at least one of the following child-serving systems: Juvenile justice, child-protection/welfare, special
education, or developmental disabilities;
(d) Is at risk of escalating maladjustment due to:
(i) Chronic family dysfunction involving a caretaker who is
mentally ill or inadequate ((caretaker));
(ii) Changes in custodial adult;
(iii) Going to, residing in, or returning from any placement
outside of the home, for example, psychiatric hospital, short-term
inpatient, residential treatment, group or foster home, or a
correctional facility;
(iv) Subject to repeated physical abuse or neglect;
(v) Drug or alcohol abuse; or
(vi) Homelessness.
(((28))) (29) "State minimum standards" means minimum requirements
established by rules adopted by the secretary and necessary to
implement this chapter for: (a) Delivery of mental health services;
(b) licensed service providers for the provision of mental health
services; (c) residential services; and (d) community support services
and resource management services.
(((29))) (30) "Treatment records" include registration and all
other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the
department, by regional support networks and their staffs, and by
treatment facilities. Treatment records do not include notes or
records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment
services for the department, regional support networks, or a treatment
facility if the notes or records are not available to others.
(((30))) (31) "Tribal authority," for the purposes of this section
and RCW 71.24.300 only, means: The federally recognized Indian tribes
and the major Indian organizations recognized by the secretary insofar
as these organizations do not have a financial relationship with any
regional support network that would present a conflict of interest.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.24.035 and 2006 c 333 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department is designated as the state mental health
authority.
(2) The secretary shall provide for public, client, and licensed
service provider participation in developing the state mental health
program, developing contracts with regional support networks, and any
waiver request to the federal government under medicaid.
(3) The secretary shall provide for participation in developing the
state mental health program for children and other underserved
populations, by including representatives on any committee established
to provide oversight to the state mental health program.
(4) The secretary shall be designated as the regional support
network if the regional support network fails to meet state minimum
standards or refuses to exercise responsibilities under RCW 71.24.045.
(5) The secretary shall:
(a) Develop a biennial state mental health program that
incorporates regional biennial needs assessments and regional mental
health service plans and state services for mentally ill adults and
children. The secretary shall also develop a six-year state mental
health plan;
(b) Assure that any regional or county community mental health
program provides access to treatment for the region's residents in the
following order of priority: (i) The acutely mentally ill; (ii)
chronically mentally ill adults and severely emotionally disturbed
children; and (iii) the seriously disturbed. Such programs shall
provide:
(A) Outpatient services;
(B) Emergency care services for twenty-four hours per day;
(C) Day treatment for mentally ill persons which includes training
in basic living and social skills, supported work, vocational
rehabilitation, and day activities. Such services may include
therapeutic treatment. In the case of a child, day treatment includes
age-appropriate basic living and social skills, educational and
prevocational services, day activities, and therapeutic treatment;
(D) Screening for patients being considered for admission to state
mental health facilities to determine the appropriateness of admission;
(E) Employment services, which may include supported employment,
transitional work, placement in competitive employment, and other work-related services, that result in mentally ill persons becoming engaged
in meaningful and gainful full or part-time work. Other sources of
funding such as the division of vocational rehabilitation may be
utilized by the secretary to maximize federal funding and provide for
integration of services;
(F) Consultation and education services; and
(G) Community support services;
(c) Develop and adopt rules establishing state minimum standards
for the delivery of mental health services pursuant to RCW 71.24.037
including, but not limited to:
(i) Licensed service providers. These rules shall permit a county-operated mental health program to be licensed as a service provider
subject to compliance with applicable statutes and rules. The
secretary shall provide for deeming of compliance with state minimum
standards for those entities accredited by recognized behavioral health
accrediting bodies recognized and having a current agreement with the
department;
(ii) Regional support networks; and
(iii) Inpatient services, evaluation and treatment services and
facilities under chapter 71.05 RCW, resource management services, and
community support services;
(d) Assure that the special needs of minorities, the elderly,
disabled, children, and low-income persons are met within the
priorities established in this section;
(e) Establish a standard contract or contracts, consistent with
state minimum standards and RCW 71.24.320, 71.24.330, and 71.24.3201,
which shall be used in contracting with regional support networks. The
standard contract shall include a maximum fund balance, which shall be
consistent with that required by federal regulations or waiver
stipulations;
(f) Establish, to the extent possible, a standardized auditing
procedure which minimizes paperwork requirements of regional support
networks and licensed service providers. The audit procedure shall
focus on the outcomes of service and not the processes for
accomplishing them;
(g) Develop and maintain an information system to be used by the
state and regional support networks that includes a tracking method
which allows the department and regional support networks to identify
mental health clients' participation in any mental health service or
public program on an immediate basis. The information system shall not
include individual patient's case history files. Confidentiality of
client information and records shall be maintained as provided in this
chapter and in RCW 71.05.390, 71.05.420, and 71.05.440;
(h) License service providers who meet state minimum standards;
(i) Certify regional support networks that meet state minimum
standards;
(j) Periodically monitor the compliance of certified regional
support networks and their network of licensed service providers for
compliance with the contract between the department, the regional
support network, and federal and state rules at reasonable times and in
a reasonable manner;
(k) Fix fees to be paid by evaluation and treatment centers to the
secretary for the required inspections;
(l) Monitor and audit regional support networks and licensed
service providers as needed to assure compliance with contractual
agreements authorized by this chapter;
(m) Adopt such rules as are necessary to implement the department's
responsibilities under this chapter; ((and))
(n) Assure the availability of an appropriate amount, as determined
by the legislature in the operating budget by amounts appropriated for
this specific purpose, of community-based, geographically distributed
residential services; and
(o) Certify clubhouses that meet state minimum standards.
(6) The secretary shall use available resources only for regional
support networks, except to the extent authorized, and in accordance
with any priorities or conditions specified, in the biennial
appropriations act.
(7) Each certified regional support network and licensed service
provider shall file with the secretary, on request, such data,
statistics, schedules, and information as the secretary reasonably
requires. A certified regional support network or licensed service
provider which, without good cause, fails to furnish any data,
statistics, schedules, or information as requested, or files fraudulent
reports thereof, may have its certification or license revoked or
suspended.
(8) The secretary may suspend, revoke, limit, or restrict a
certification or license, or refuse to grant a certification or license
for failure to conform to: (a) The law; (b) applicable rules and
regulations; (c) applicable standards; or (d) state minimum standards.
(9) The superior court may restrain any regional support network or
service provider from operating without certification or a license or
any other violation of this section. The court may also review,
pursuant to procedures contained in chapter 34.05 RCW, any denial,
suspension, limitation, restriction, or revocation of certification or
license, and grant other relief required to enforce the provisions of
this chapter.
(10) Upon petition by the secretary, and after hearing held upon
reasonable notice to the facility, the superior court may issue a
warrant to an officer or employee of the secretary authorizing him or
her to enter at reasonable times, and examine the records, books, and
accounts of any regional support network or service provider refusing
to consent to inspection or examination by the authority.
(11) Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy,
the secretary may file an action for an injunction or other process
against any person or governmental unit to restrain or prevent the
establishment, conduct, or operation of a regional support network or
service provider without certification or a license under this chapter.
(12) The standards for certification of evaluation and treatment
facilities shall include standards relating to maintenance of good
physical and mental health and other services to be afforded persons
pursuant to this chapter and chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW, and shall
otherwise assure the effectuation of the purposes of these chapters.
(13) The standards for certification of a clubhouse shall at a
minimum include:
(a) The facilities may be peer-operated and must be
recovery-focused;
(b) Members and employees must work together;
(c) Members must have the opportunity to participate in all the
work of the clubhouse, including administration, research, intake and
orientation, outreach, hiring, training and evaluation of staff, public
relations, advocacy, and evaluation of clubhouse effectiveness;
(d) Members and staff and ultimately the clubhouse director must be
responsible for the operation of the clubhouse, central to this
responsibility is the engagement of members and staff in all aspects of
clubhouse operations;
(e) Clubhouse programs must be comprised of structured activities
including but not limited to social skills training, vocational
rehabilitation, employment training and job placement, and community
resource development;
(f) Clubhouse programs must provide in-house educational programs
that significantly utilize the teaching and tutoring skills of members
and assist members by helping them to take advantage of adult education
opportunities in the community;
(g) Clubhouse programs must focus on strengths, talents, and
abilities of its members;
(h) The work-ordered day may not include medication clinics, day
treatment, or other therapy programs within the clubhouse.
(14) The department shall distribute appropriated state and federal
funds in accordance with any priorities, terms, or conditions specified
in the appropriations act.
(((14))) (15) The secretary shall assume all duties assigned to the
nonparticipating regional support networks under chapters 71.05, 71.34,
and 71.24 RCW. Such responsibilities shall include those which would
have been assigned to the nonparticipating counties in regions where
there are not participating regional support networks.
The regional support networks, or the secretary's assumption of all
responsibilities under chapters 71.05, 71.34, and 71.24 RCW, shall be
included in all state and federal plans affecting the state mental
health program including at least those required by this chapter, the
medicaid program, and P.L. 99-660. Nothing in these plans shall be
inconsistent with the intent and requirements of this chapter.
(((15))) (16) The secretary shall:
(a) Disburse funds for the regional support networks within sixty
days of approval of the biennial contract. The department must either
approve or reject the biennial contract within sixty days of receipt.
(b) Enter into biennial contracts with regional support networks.
The contracts shall be consistent with available resources. No
contract shall be approved that does not include progress toward
meeting the goals of this chapter by taking responsibility for: (i)
Short-term commitments; (ii) residential care; and (iii) emergency
response systems.
(c) Notify regional support networks of their allocation of
available resources at least sixty days prior to the start of a new
biennial contract period.
(d) Deny all or part of the funding allocations to regional support
networks based solely upon formal findings of noncompliance with the
terms of the regional support network's contract with the department.
Regional support networks disputing the decision of the secretary to
withhold funding allocations are limited to the remedies provided in
the department's contracts with the regional support networks.
(((16))) (17) The department, in cooperation with the state
congressional delegation, shall actively seek waivers of federal
requirements and such modifications of federal regulations as are
necessary to allow federal medicaid reimbursement for services provided
by free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities certified under
chapter 71.05 RCW. The department shall periodically report its
efforts to the appropriate committees of the senate and the house of
representatives.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.19.010 and 2000 c 94 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Health care setting" means:
(a) Hospitals as defined in RCW 70.41.020;
(b) Home health, hospice, and home care agencies under chapter
70.127 RCW, subject to RCW 49.19.070;
(c) Evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in RCW
71.05.020(((12))); and
(d) Community mental health programs as defined in RCW
71.24.025(((5))).
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Employee" means an employee as defined in RCW 49.17.020.
(4) "Violence" or "violent act" means any physical assault or
verbal threat of physical assault against an employee of a health care
setting.

--- END ---