BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LEGISLATIVE INTENT AND FINDINGS. (1) The
legislature declares that shellfish farming is an historic and well-established industry in Washington providing significant environmental
and economic benefits to the state and its inhabitants.
(2) The legislature finds that:
(a) Shellfish farming provides significant environmental benefits
to estuaries in Washington, and estuaries containing shellfish
aquaculture are some of the healthiest in the United States. The
filtering and recycling processes associated with shellfish feeding are
critical in regulating the health of coastal ecosystems. These
processes take on even greater importance as human activities and
related pollution discharges increase in Washington's marine shoreline
areas. These processes help counteract the potentially damaging
effects of excessive nutrient enrichment of coastal waters, a process
known as eutrophication.
(b) Native American tribes have federally protected treaty
shellfishing rights and harvested shellfish in Washington's marine
waters before European settlers arrived in the area, and continue to
harvest and culture shellfish on lands both within and outside of their
reservations. Native American tribes' deep historic familiarity with
Washington's waters and with harvesting shellfish, combined with their
concern for the environment, make them an integral party to any
discussions or decisions relating to shellfish cultivation in the
state.
(c) Shellfish farming has been a vital part of Washington's rural
economy for over a century, and provides increasing opportunities for
year-round family wage employment and economic development in areas
where shellfish are farmed and processed. In addition, further
economic benefits to the state are realized through goods and services
provided to shellfish farmers and through the marketing of shellfish
farm products.
(d) The health and viability of the state's marine waters depends
on the health and viability of the shellfish aquaculture industry.
(e) Despite its historic cultural significance, its environmental
benefits, and its contributions to the economy, viability of the
shellfish farming industry is threatened by overlapping and
inconsistent federal, state, and local government regulation. The
legislature therefore encourages review and possible restructuring of
existing state and local government regulatory programs to encourage
development of shellfish farming within the state.
(f) Shellfish aquaculture activities must be conducted in a manner
that is protective of the environment while maintaining the commercial
viability of shellfish farms.
(g) Additional scientific research on the relationship between
certain shellfish aquaculture activities and the marine environment, in
particular geoduck culture and harvest methods, is necessary to ensure
that shellfish aquaculture activities are conducted in an
environmentally responsible and economically viable manner.
(3) It is the purpose of this chapter to develop and promote a
comprehensive and efficient shellfish aquaculture regulatory process,
informed by research, that protects the state's environment, natural
resources, and recreational opportunities. To optimize limited
available resources, state regulatory, environmental, and natural
resource agencies, the state department of agriculture, Native American
tribes, local governments, and public and private sector interests must
work cooperatively to establish common goals, minimize regulatory
confusion, develop consistency in applying environmental standards,
maximize environmental benefits through coordinated investment
strategies, and eliminate duplicative processes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context indicates
otherwise.
(1) "Aquaculture coordinator" means the position authorized in
section 5 of this act.
(2) "Aquatic farmer" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW
15.85.020.
(3) "Best management practices" means currently available and
generally accepted techniques that seek to reduce negative impacts of
shellfish aquaculture projects and activities.
(4) "Committee" means the shellfish aquaculture regulatory
efficiency committee created in section 3 of this act.
(5) "Shellfish aquaculture activities" means activities involved in
the seeding, cultivating, and harvesting of farmed molluscan shellfish,
including oysters, mussels, scallops, and clams.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 SHELLFISH AQUACULTURE REGULATORY EFFICIENCY
COMMITTEE. (1) The shellfish aquaculture regulatory efficiency
committee is created. The committee consists of the following voting
members: One member representing a coastal Native American tribe; one
member representing a Puget Sound Native American tribe; the
aquaculture coordinator; one member designated by the director of the
department of fish and wildlife; one member designated by the public
lands commissioner; one member designated by the director of the
department of ecology; one member designated by the Washington state
association of counties; one member designated by the Pacific coast
shellfish growers association; and one member designated by state
environmental organizations.
(2) The committee shall work within existing regulatory structures
to integrate current state and local government environmental standards
and regulations into an efficient and consistent regulatory process.
The committee may not create new environmental standards or
regulations.
(3) The committee shall propose an integrated regulatory system for
all current and new shellfish aquaculture projects and activities and
make implementing recommendations to appropriate regulatory agencies.
(4) The committee may create technical subcommittees as needed.
Recommendations made by a technical subcommittee must be approved by a
majority of the voting members of the committee.
(5) Committee members will not be compensated but will receive
reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(6) The department of ecology shall convene all meetings of the
committee and provide administrative and clerical assistance to the
committee. The office of regulatory assistance shall facilitate all
meetings.
(7) The committee is advisory in nature. No vote of the committee
may overrule existing statutes, regulations, or local ordinances.
(8) The committee shall strive to achieve an integrated regulatory
system for shellfish aquaculture activities by December 1, 2007, and
must complete it no later than December 1, 2008.
(9) The committee shall prepare a report to the legislature by
December 1, 2007, summarizing its activities and progress toward
developing an integrated regulatory system for shellfish aquaculture
activities. If the integrated regulatory system for shellfish
aquaculture activities is not completed by December 1, 2007, the
committee shall prepare a second and final report to the legislature by
December 1, 2008, describing the integrated regulatory system.
(10) The participation of any Native American tribe on the
committee shall not, under any circumstances, be viewed as an admission
by the tribe that any of its activities, or those of its members, are
subject to any of the statutes, regulations, ordinances, standards, or
permit systems reviewed, considered, or proposed by the committee.
(11) This section expires December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 COMMITTEE RESPONSIBILITIES. (1) The
committee and its authorized technical subcommittees shall coordinate
state and local regulatory processes and approvals for all current and
new shellfish aquaculture activities. The committee shall identify
existing environmental standards, assess the application of those
standards, and develop an integrated regulatory process based upon
environmental standards and best management practices for shellfish
aquaculture activities.
(2) In developing an integrated regulatory process, the committee
and its authorized technical subcommittees shall consider all state
statutes and regulatory processes that are potentially applicable to
shellfish aquaculture operations including, without limitation, the:
(a) State environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW;
(b) Shoreline management act, chapter 90.58 RCW;
(c) Growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW;
(d) Aquaculture disease control provisions, chapter 77.115 RCW;
(e) Aquaculture marketing act, chapter 15.85 RCW;
(f) Coastal zone management act consistency process (15 U.S.C. Sec.
1456); and
(g) Clean water act water quality certification process (33 U.S.C.
Sec. 1341).
(3) The statutes and regulatory processes listed in subsection (2)
of this section may or may not be applicable to shellfish aquaculture
activities. Nothing in this act shall be construed to amend, repeal,
or otherwise modify the authority of any state or local government
officer, department, or agency to perform any function, responsibility,
or activity authorized under any other provision of law.
(4) The committee shall use the coastal zone management consistency
process (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1456) and clean water act water quality
certification process (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1341) related to the United
States army corps of engineers' permitting of shellfish aquaculture
activities as a vehicle for developing an integrated regulatory system
for shellfish aquaculture activities in Washington.
(5) This section expires December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 AQUACULTURE COORDINATOR. There is
established within the department of agriculture an aquaculture
coordinator. The aquaculture coordinator shall:
(1) Participate in the development of an integrated regulatory
system for aquaculture activities and facilitate its implementation at
the state and local government level;
(2) Provide technical assistance to aquatic farmers regarding
federal, state, and local regulations relating to aquaculture;
(3) Serve as an information clearinghouse for aquaculture
activities and regulations and actively seek federal funding for
aquaculture research and development;
(4) Coordinate development projects to investigate and resolve
biological and technical issues involved in raising selected species
with commercial potential;
(5) Undertake other actions necessary to develop the aquaculture
industry within the state, including but not limited to completing
applications for grant funding for activities related to aquaculture;
and
(6) Perform other functions and activities as may be assigned by
the director of the department of agriculture.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28B.40 RCW
to read as follows:
ADDITIONAL SCIENTIFIC RESEARCH. (1) The Washington sea grant
program shall review existing scientific research studies that have
been completed, are in progress, or have been funded since issuance of
the January 12, 2004, Comprehensive Literature Review And Synopsis Of
Issues Relating To Geoduck (Panopea Abrupta) Ecology And Aquaculture
Production, examining possible effects of currently prevalent geoduck
and other shellfish aquaculture practices on the natural environment.
(2) To satisfy the minimum requirements of subsection (1) of this
section, the Washington sea grant program shall, in consultation with
experts in the field from Washington state academic institutions of
higher learning (including the University of Washington, Washington
State University, Western Washington University, and The Evergreen
State College), the department of ecology, the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of natural resources, Native American tribes,
the northwest Indian fisheries commission, and the shellfish
aquaculture industry, review current research and critical knowledge
gaps regarding the following potential effects of shellfish and, in
particular, geoduck aquaculture:
(a) The environmental effects of structures commonly used in the
aquaculture industry to protect juvenile geoducks from predation. At
a minimum the review shall assess:
(i) Physical and chemical characteristics of the sediment in areas
used for geoduck cultivation;
(ii) Abundance and diversity metrics for infauna, epifauna, and
submerged aquatic vegetation in areas used for geoduck cultivation; and
(iii) Abundance and diversity indices of fouling organisms
associated with hard surface structures.
(b) The effects of harvesting geoducks from intertidal commercial
geoduck beds, given prevalent harvesting techniques. At a minimum the
review shall assess:
(i) The effects of harvest disturbance and document patterns of
postharvest succession in species of benthic plants and animals;
(ii) Physical and chemical characteristics or sediments;
(iii) Abundance and diversity metrics for infauna, epifauna, and
submerged aquatic vegetation in sedimentary habitats;
(iv) The presence, size, and distribution of woody debris or other
large natural materials providing solid substrata; and
(v) The diversity of fouling organisms on solid substrata.
(c) The extent to which geoducks in standard aquaculture tracts
alter the ecological characteristics, including species diversity and
the abundance of other benthic organisms, of overlying waters when the
tracks are submerged. At a minimum the review shall assess:
(i) Removal of suspended phytoplankton and detritus by geoduck
filtration;
(ii) Enhancement of suspended detritus resulting from feces and
pseudofeces and its affect on light penetration; and
(iii) Alteration of concentrations of dissolved inorganic nutrients
and organic matter as a result of geoduck metabolism.
(d) Parasites and diseases in both wild and cultured geoduck
populations.
(e) Genetic interactions between cultured and wild geoduck. At a
minimum the review shall assess:
(i) Age at maturation in cultured intertidal geoducks;
(ii) The proportion of cultured geoducks that spawn during the
course of a culture cycle;
(iii) Characterization of maturation synchrony between wild
subtidal geoduck and cultured intertidal geoduck;
(iv) Genetic variability between cultured geoduck and wild geoduck;
(v) Relative parental contributions to cultured geoduck; and
(vi) Evidence of local adaptation.
(f) The use of sterile triploid geoducks, and whether triploid
animals diminish the genetic interactions between wild and cultured
geoducks. At a minimum the review shall assess:
(i) Maturation dynamics in triploid and diploid geoducks; and
(ii) The rate of reversion to diploidy in triploid geoducks.
(g) The reproductive success of cultured geoducks. At a minimum
the review shall assess:
(i) Fecundity in geoducks aged two to six years;
(ii) The effect of planting density on fertilization success; and
(iii) Larval viability of cultured and wild geoducks.
(3) The Washington sea grant program shall use funding provided
from the shellfish aquaculture research account created in section 7 of
this act to enter into and manage contracts with scientific
organizations or institutions to complete studies to address the
critical knowledge gaps identified during the review specified in
subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Prior to entering into a contract with a scientific
organization or institution, the Washington sea grant program must
analyze the credibility of the proposed party to the contract,
including whether the party has credible experience, knowledge, and
access to facilities necessary to fully execute research required by
the contract.
(5) All research commissioned under this section must be subjected
to a rigorous peer review process prior to being accepted and reported
by the Washington sea grant program.
(6) When appropriate, all research commissioned under this section
should address localized and cumulative effects of geoduck aquaculture.
(7) All research identified, prioritized, and commissioned under
this section shall be completed and the results reported to the
appropriate committees of the legislature no later than December 1,
2013. However, the Washington sea grant program shall prioritize the
studies required by this section and complete and report the results of
studies that require a shorter timeline for completion in advance of
the 2013 deadline. In addition, the Washington sea grant program shall
provide the appropriate committees of the legislature with annual
reports updating the status and progress of the required studies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28B.40 RCW
to read as follows:
The shellfish aquaculture research account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer to receive any legislative
appropriations earmarked for the account. Expenditures from the
account may only be used by the Washington sea grant program for the
research projects identified by section 6 of this act. The account is
subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1, 2, and 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

--- END ---