BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer that imposes an automatic service charge related to
food, beverages, entertainment, or porterage provided to a customer
must disclose in an itemized receipt and in any menu provided to the
customer the percentage of the automatic service charge that is paid or
is payable directly to the employee or employees serving the customer.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Employee" means nonmanagerial, nonsupervisory workers,
including but not limited to servers, busers, banquet houseman, banquet
captains, bartenders, barbacks, and porters.
(b) "Employer" means employers as defined in RCW 49.46.010 that
provide food, beverages, entertainment, or porterage, including but not
limited to restaurants, catering houses, convention centers, and
overnight accommodations.
(c) "Service charge" means a separately designated amount collected
by employers from customers that is for services provided by employees,
or is described in such a way that customers might reasonably believe
that the amounts are for such services. Service charges include but
are not limited to charges designated on receipts as a "service
charge," "gratuity," "delivery charge," or "porterage charge." Service
charges are in addition to hourly wages paid or payable to the employee
or employees serving the customer.

--- END ---