BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Microenterprises are an important portion of Washington's
economy, providing approximately twenty percent of the employment in
Washington and playing a vital role in job creation.
(b) While community-based microenterprise development organizations
have expanded their assistance to their microentrepreneur customers in
recent years, there remains a lack of access to capital, training, and
technical assistance for low-income microentrepreneurs.
(c) Support for microenterprise development offers a means to
expand business and job creation in low-income communities in both
rural and urban areas of the state.
(d) Local and state charitable foundation support, federal program
funding, and private sector support can be leveraged by a statewide
program for development of microenterprises.
(2) It is the purpose of this act to assist microenterprises in job
creation by increasing the training, technical assistance, and
financial resources available to microenterprises. It is the intention
of the legislature to carry out this purpose by enabling the department
of community, trade, and economic development to contract with a
statewide microenterprise association with the potential to provide
organizational support and administer grants to local microenterprise
development organizations, subject to the requirements of this act, and
to leverage additional funds from sources other than moneys
appropriated from the general fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.330.010 and 1993 c 280 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Associate development organization" means a local economic
development nonprofit corporation that is broadly representative of
community interests.
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(4) "Financial institution" means a bank, trust company, mutual
savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union authorized
to do business in this state under state or federal law.
(5) "Microenterprise development organization" means a community
development corporation, a nonprofit development organization, a
nonprofit social services organization or other locally operated
nonprofit entity that provides services to low-income entrepreneurs.
(6) "Statewide microenterprise association" means a nonprofit
entity with microenterprise development organizations as members that
serves as an intermediary between the department of community, trade,
and economic development and local microenterprise development
organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
The microenterprise development program is established in the
department of community, trade, and economic development. In
implementing the program, the department:
(1) Shall provide organizational support to a statewide
microenterprise association and shall contract with the association for
the delivery of services and distribution of grants;
(a) The association shall serve as the department's agent in
carrying out the purpose and service delivery requirements of this
section;
(b) The association's contract with the department shall specify
that in administering the funds provided for under subsection (3) of
this section, the association may use no greater than ten percent of
the funds to cover administrative expenses;
(2) Shall provide funds for capacity building for the statewide
microenterprise association and microenterprise development
organizations throughout the state;
(3) Shall provide grants to microenterprise development
organizations for the delivery of training and technical assistance
services;
(4) Shall identify and facilitate the availability of state,
federal, and private sources of funds which may enhance microenterprise
development in the state;
(5) Shall develop with the statewide microenterprise association
criteria for the distribution of grants to microenterprise development
organizations. Such criteria may include:
(a) The geographic representation of all regions of the state,
including both urban and rural communities;
(b) The ability of the microenterprise development organization to
provide business development services in low-income communities;
(c) The scope of services offered by a microenterprise development
organization and their efficiency in delivery of such services;
(d) The ability of the microenterprise development organization to
monitor the progress of its customers and identify technical and
financial assistance needs;
(e) The ability of the microenterprise development organization to
work with other organizations, public entities, and financial
institutions to meet the technical and financial assistance needs of
its customers;
(f) The sufficiency of operating funds for the microenterprise
development organization; and
(g) Such other criteria as agreed by the department and the
association;
(6) Shall require the statewide microenterprise association and any
microenterprise development organization receiving funds through the
microenterprise development program to raise and contribute to the
effort funded by the microenterprise development program an amount
equal to twenty-five percent of the microenterprise development program
funds received. Such matching funds may come from private foundations,
federal or local sources, financial institutions, or any other source
other than funds appropriated from the legislature;
(7) Shall require an annual accounting and report from the
statewide microenterprise association it contracts with, to include
such outcome measures as the department specifies; and
(8) May adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

--- END ---