BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.96.105 and 2003 c 21 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each manufacturer shall specify in its franchise agreement, or
in a separate written agreement, with each of its dealers licensed in
this state, the dealer's obligation to perform warranty work or service
on the manufacturer's products. Each manufacturer shall provide each
of its dealers with a schedule of compensation to be paid to the dealer
for any warranty work or service, including parts, labor, and
diagnostic work, required of the dealer by the manufacturer in
connection with the manufacturer's products.
(2) The compensation may not be less than the rates reasonably
charged by the dealer for like services and parts to retail customers
of motor homes, as defined in RCW 46.04.305, campers, as defined in RCW
46.04.085, and travel trailers, as defined in RCW 46.04.623. The
compensation may not be reduced by the manufacturer for any reason or
made conditional on an activity outside the performance of warranty
work.
(3) All claims for warranty work for parts and labor made by
dealers under this section shall be submitted to the manufacturer
within one year of the date the work was performed. All claims
submitted must be paid by the manufacturer within thirty days following
receipt, provided the claim has been approved by the manufacturer. The
manufacturer has the right to audit claims for warranty work and to
charge the dealer for any unsubstantiated, incorrect, or false claims
for a period of one year following payment. However, the manufacturer
may audit and charge the dealer for any fraudulent claims during any
period for which an action for fraud may be commenced under applicable
state law.
(((3))) (4) All claims submitted by dealers on the forms and in the
manner specified by the manufacturer shall be either approved or
disapproved within thirty days following their receipt. The
manufacturer shall notify the dealer in writing of any disapproved
claim, and shall set forth the reasons why the claim was not approved.
Any claim not specifically disapproved in writing within thirty days
following receipt is approved, and the manufacturer is required to pay
that claim within thirty days of receipt of the claim.

--- END ---