BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.267 and 2000 c 115 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a person issued an intermediate license is convicted of or found
to have committed a traffic offense described in chapter 46.61 RCW or
violated restrictions placed on an intermediate license under RCW
46.20.075 or subsection (2) of this section:
(1) On the first such conviction or finding, the department shall
mail the parent or guardian of the person a letter warning the person
of the provisions of this section;
(2) On the second such conviction or finding, the ((department
shall suspend the person's)) holder of an intermediate driver's license
may not operate a motor vehicle except when the holder is accompanied
by a licensed driver with at least five years of driving experience who
is occupying the seat beside the driver for a period of six months from
the date of the second conviction or finding or until the person
reaches eighteen years of age, whichever occurs first((, and)). The
department must mail the parent or guardian of the person a
notification of the ((suspension)) restriction;
(3) On the third such conviction or finding, the department shall
suspend the person's intermediate driver's license until the person
reaches eighteen years of age, and mail the parent or guardian of the
person a notification of the suspension.
For the purposes of this section, a single ticket for one or more
traffic offenses constitutes a single traffic offense. It is a traffic
infraction for the holder of an intermediate license to operate a motor
vehicle in violation of the restriction imposed under subsection (2) of
this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.131.398 and 2000 c 115 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2009:
(1) 2000 c 115 s 1 (uncodified);
(2) RCW 42.20.075 and 2000 c 115 s 2;
(3) RCW 46.20.267 and 2007 c ... s 1 (section 1 of this act) and
2000 c 115 s 3;
(4) The amendment of RCW 46.20.105 by 2000 c 115 s 5;
(5) The amendment of RCW 46.20.161 by 2000 c 115 s 6;
(6) The amendment of RCW 46.20.311 by 2000 c 115 s 7;
(7) The amendment of RCW 46.20.342 by 2000 c 115 s 8; and
(8) RCW 28A.220.070 and 2000 c 115 s 11.

--- END ---