BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The people of Washington have expressed strong concerns about
health care costs and access to needed health services. Even if
currently insured, they are not confident that they will continue to
have health insurance coverage in the future and feel that they are
spending more, but getting less.
(2) Many employers, especially small employers, struggle with the
cost of providing employer-sponsored health insurance coverage to their
employees, while others are unable to offer employer-sponsored health
insurance due to its high cost.
(3) Six hundred thousand Washingtonians are uninsured. Three-quarters work or have a working family member; two-thirds are low
income; and one-half are young adults. Many are low-wage workers who
are not offered, or eligible for, employer-sponsored coverage. Others
struggle with the burden of paying their share of the costs of
employer-sponsored health insurance, while still others turn down their
employer's offer of coverage due to its costs. Families that work
hard, pay taxes, and play by the rules deserve access to decent,
affordable health care.
(4) While other industrialized nations have developed their own
systems of health care, Washingtonians deserve their own solution to
the health care crisis. We should use American ingenuity to develop a
fair, common sense plan to make sure that all have access to quality,
affordable health care.
(5) We need to make smart investments in our families' future. By
expanding access to affordable care, we can start investing in a
healthy future for our country and ensure healthier families and a
healthy next generation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature intends to reduce premiums
for small employers by providing reinsurance services. Reinsurance
will reduce the uncertainty that raises premiums across the small group
market to: (1) Help make health insurance coverage more affordable for
small businesses and their employees; (2) stabilize the private health
insurance market for small businesses; and (3) increase the numbers of
people with access to affordable health insurance coverage and improve
health outcomes in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A reinsurance program is hereby established in the office of
the insurance commissioner for the purpose of making health insurance
coverage more affordable for small employers.
(2) The reinsurance program shall reimburse claims for all
carriers, defined in RCW 48.43.005, offering health plans to eligible
small employers as defined in this section, for eligible employees
covered under a health benefit plan.
(3) "Eligible small employers" means those employers with at least
thirty percent of their eligible employees receiving annual wages from
the employer at a level equal to or less than thirty thousand dollars,
adjusted annually for inflation. The commissioner may certify employer
eligibility with the department of employment security or other means
defined by the commissioner. The commissioner may contract out for
these services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning January 1, 2009, the reinsurance program shall reimburse
carriers for ninety percent of covered health plan benefits from ten
thousand dollars up to a maximum of ninety thousand dollars in a
calendar year for eligible small employer groups.
(1) Claims shall be reported and funds shall be distributed from
the reinsurance account on a calendar year basis. Claims are eligible
for reimbursement only for the calendar year in which the claims are
paid. Once claims paid on behalf of an enrollee reach or exceed ninety
thousand dollars in a given calendar year, no further claims paid on
behalf of such person in that calendar year are eligible for
reimbursement from the reinsurance account.
(2) Each carrier shall submit a request for reimbursement from the
reinsurance in a manner prescribed by the insurance commissioner. Each
of the requests for reimbursement shall be submitted no later than
April 1st following the end of the calendar year for which the
reimbursement requests are being made. The commissioner may require
carriers to submit such claims data in connection with the
reimbursement requests as he or she deems necessary to enable
distribution of funds and oversee the operation of the reinsurance
account.
(3) The commissioner shall calculate the total claims reimbursement
amount for all carriers for the calendar year for which claims are
being reported. The commissioner may contract out all administrative
functions related to the reinsurance program.
(a) In the event that the total amount requested for reimbursement
for a calendar year exceeds funds available for distribution for claims
paid during that same calendar year, the commissioner shall provide for
the pro rata distribution of the available funds. Each carrier is
eligible to receive only such proportionate amount of the available
funds as the individual carrier's total eligible claims paid bears to
the total eligible claims paid by all carriers.
(b) In the event that funds available for distribution for claims
paid by all carriers during a calendar year exceeds the total amount
requested for reimbursement by all carriers during that same calendar
year, any excess funds shall be carried forward and made available for
distribution in the next calendar year. Such excess funds shall be in
addition to the funds appropriated for the reinsurance account in the
next calendar year.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.21.045 and 2004 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An insurer offering any health benefit plan to a small
employer, either directly or through an association or member-governed
group formed specifically for the purpose of purchasing health care,
may offer and actively market to the small employer a health benefit
plan featuring a limited schedule of covered health care services.
Nothing in this subsection shall preclude an insurer from offering, or
a small employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may
have more comprehensive benefits than those included in the product
offered under this subsection. An insurer offering a health benefit
plan under this subsection shall clearly disclose all covered benefits
to the small employer in a brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.21.130, 48.21.140, 48.21.141, 48.21.142,
48.21.144, 48.21.146, 48.21.160 through 48.21.197, 48.21.200,
48.21.220, 48.21.225, 48.21.230, 48.21.235, 48.21.240, 48.21.244,
48.21.250, 48.21.300, 48.21.310, or 48.21.320.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from
offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit plans with
benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under subsection
(1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts shall be
submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any plan
offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to the
benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; ((and))
(iv) Wellness activities; and
(v) Reinsurance premium discounts.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network. This subsection does not
restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided in RCW
48.43.015.
(i) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all small groups purchasing coverage.
However, annual rate adjustments for each small group health benefit
plan may vary by up to plus or minus four percentage points from the
overall adjustment of a carrier's entire small group pool, such overall
adjustment to be approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the
carrier, certified by a member of the American academy of actuaries
that: (i) The variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit
design, or provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate
renewal period, the projected weighted average of all small group
benefit plans will have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small
group pool. Variations of greater than four percentage points are
subject to review by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied
within sixty days of submittal. A variation that is not denied within
sixty days shall be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to
the carrier a detailed actuarial justification for any denial within
thirty days of the denial.
(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of employees
to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of
those provided herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
an insurer in determining whether to provide coverage to a small
employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers applying
for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) An insurer shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) An insurer may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(6) An insurer must offer coverage to all eligible employees of a
small employer and their dependents. An insurer may not offer coverage
to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer group or
to only part of the group. An insurer may not modify a health plan
with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or dependent,
through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or exclude
coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions, or
services otherwise covered by the plan.
(7) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "small
employer," "adjusted community rate," and "wellness activities" mean
the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.44.023 and 2004 c 244 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A health care services contractor offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, may offer and actively market to the
small employer a health benefit plan featuring a limited schedule of
covered health care services. Nothing in this subsection shall
preclude a contractor from offering, or a small employer from
purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more comprehensive
benefits than those included in the product offered under this
subsection. A contractor offering a health benefit plan under this
subsection shall clearly disclose all covered benefits to the small
employer in a brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.44.225, 48.44.240, 48.44.245, 48.44.290,
48.44.300, 48.44.310, 48.44.320, 48.44.325, 48.44.330, 48.44.335,
48.44.340, 48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, 48.44.440, 48.44.450, and
48.44.460.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care service
contractor from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts
shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to
the benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The contractor shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; ((and))
(iv) Wellness activities; and
(v) Reinsurance premium discounts.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The contractor shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network. This subsection does not
restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided in RCW
48.43.015.
(i) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all groups purchasing coverage.
However, annual rate adjustments for each small group health benefit
plan may vary by up to plus or minus four percentage points from the
overall adjustment of a carrier's entire small group pool, such overall
adjustment to be approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the
carrier, certified by a member of the American academy of actuaries
that: (i) The variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit
design, or provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate
renewal period, the projected weighted average of all small group
benefit plans will have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small
group pool. Variations of greater than four percentage points are
subject to review by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied
within sixty days of submittal. A variation that is not denied within
sixty days shall be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to
the carrier a detailed actuarial justification for any denial within
thirty days of the denial.
(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of employees
to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of
those provided herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
a contractor in determining whether to provide coverage to a small
employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers applying
for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A contractor shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A contractor may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(6) A contractor must offer coverage to all eligible employees of
a small employer and their dependents. A contractor may not offer
coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer
group or to only part of the group. A contractor may not modify a
health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee
or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.46.066 and 2004 c 244 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A health maintenance organization offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, may offer and actively market to the
small employer a health benefit plan featuring a limited schedule of
covered health care services. Nothing in this subsection shall
preclude a health maintenance organization from offering, or a small
employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more
comprehensive benefits than those included in the product offered under
this subsection. A health maintenance organization offering a health
benefit plan under this subsection shall clearly disclose all the
covered benefits to the small employer in a brochure filed with the
commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.46.275, 48.46.280, 48.46.285, 48.46.290,
48.46.350, 48.46.355, 48.46.375, 48.46.440, 48.46.480, 48.46.510,
48.46.520, and 48.46.530.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health maintenance
organization from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts
shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to
the benefits thereto.
(3) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as
defined in this section shall be subject to the following provisions:
(a) The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; ((and))
(iv) Wellness activities; and
(v) Reinsurance premium discounts.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection (3).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network. This subsection does not
restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as provided in RCW
48.43.015.
(i) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall
pool the medical experience of all groups purchasing coverage.
However, annual rate adjustments for each small group health benefit
plan may vary by up to plus or minus four percentage points from the
overall adjustment of a carrier's entire small group pool, such overall
adjustment to be approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the
carrier, certified by a member of the American academy of actuaries
that: (i) The variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit
design, or provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate
renewal period, the projected weighted average of all small group
benefit plans will have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small
group pool. Variations of greater than four percentage points are
subject to review by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied
within sixty days of submittal. A variation that is not denied within
sixty days shall be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to
the carrier a detailed actuarial justification for any denial within
thirty days of the denial.
(4) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of employees
to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in excess of
those provided herein.
(5)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by
a health maintenance organization in determining whether to provide
coverage to a small employer shall be applied uniformly among all small
employers applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A health maintenance organization shall not require a minimum
participation level greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A health maintenance organization may not increase any
requirement for minimum employee participation or modify any
requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small
employer at any time after the small employer has been accepted for
coverage.
(6) A health maintenance organization must offer coverage to all
eligible employees of a small employer and their dependents. A health
maintenance organization may not offer coverage to only certain
individuals or dependents in a small employer group or to only part of
the group. A health maintenance organization may not modify a health
plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or
dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the tax imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes under other
sections of this chapter, there is imposed a tax in an amount equal to
the rate of twelve and one-half mills per cigarette.
(2) The revenue collected under this section shall be deposited as
follows:
(a) 21.7 percent shall be deposited into the health services
account.
(b) 2.8 percent shall be deposited into the general fund.
(c) 2.3 percent shall be deposited into the violence reduction and
drug enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520.
(d) 1.7 percent shall be deposited into the water quality account
under RCW 70.146.030.
(e) The remainder shall be deposited into the reinsurance account
under section 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The reinsurance account is created in the
state treasury. The account shall consist of revenues deposited into
the account under section 8 of this act. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be
used for the purposes of this act, including the reimbursement paid to
carriers and the associated administrative expenses of operating the
reinsurance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
The insurance commissioner or the administrator of the account, on
behalf of and with the prior approval of the commissioner, may purchase
reinsurance from an insurance company licensed to write such type of
insurance in this state. Such reinsurance may be purchased with funds
appropriated to the reinsurance account established in section 9 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon the request of the insurance commissioner, each carrier shall
furnish such data as the commissioner deems necessary to oversee the
operation of the reinsurance account. The commissioner shall adopt
rules that set forth procedures for the operation of the reinsurance
account and distribution of funds therefrom.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The sum of five million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2009, from the health savings account, previously identified
with small employer insurance assistance, to the reinsurance account
established in section 9 of this act for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---