BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.070 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 18 are each
amended to read as follows:
In the event the commission elects to conduct an election to
ascertain the exclusive bargaining representative, and upon the request
of a prospective bargaining representative showing written proof of at
least thirty percent representation of the public employees within the
unit, the commission shall hold an election by secret ballot to
determine the issue. The ballot shall contain the name of such
bargaining representative and of any other bargaining representative
showing written proof of at least ten percent representation of the
public employees within the unit, together with a choice for any public
employee to designate that he does not desire to be represented by any
bargaining agent. Where more than one organization is on the ballot
and neither of the three or more choices receives a majority vote of
the public employees within the bargaining unit, a run-off election
shall be held. The run-off ballot shall contain the two choices which
received the largest and second-largest number of votes. No question
concerning representation may be raised within one year of a
certification or attempted certification. Where there is a valid
collective bargaining agreement in effect, no question of
representation may be raised except during the period not more than
ninety nor less than sixty days prior to the expiration date of the
agreement. Any agreement which contains a provision for automatic
renewal or extension of the agreement shall not be a valid agreement;
nor shall any agreement be valid if it provides for a term of existence
for more than three years, except that any agreement entered into
between cities, counties, municipal corporations, or school districts,
and their respective employees, may provide for a term of existence of
up to six years.

--- END ---