BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.09.010 and 1986 c 230 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purpose of this chapter is to:
(1) Provide citizens of the state of Washington with information
relating to persons and organizations who solicit funds from the public
for public charitable purposes in order to prevent (((1))) (a)
deceptive and dishonest practices in the conduct of soliciting funds
for or in the name of charity; and (((2))) (b) improper use of
contributions intended for charitable purposes;
(2) Improve the transparency and accountability of organizations
that solicit funds from the public for charitable purposes; and
(3) Develop and operate educational programs or partnerships for
charitable organizations, board members, and the general public that
help build public confidence and trust in organizations that solicit
funds from the public for charitable purposes.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.09.020 and 2002 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) A "bona fide officer or employee" of a charitable organization
is one (a) whose conduct is subject to direct control by such
organization; (b) who does not act in the manner of an independent
contractor in his or her relation with the organization; and (c) whose
compensation is not computed on funds raised or to be raised.
(2) "Charitable organization" means any entity that solicits or
collects contributions from the general public where the contribution
is or is purported to be used to support a charitable ((activity))
purpose, but does not include any commercial fund raiser ((or)),
commercial fund-raising entity, commercial coventurer, or any fund-raising counsel, as defined in this section. (("Charitable" (a) is not
limited to its common law meaning unless the context clearly requires
a narrower meaning; (b) does not include religious or political
activities; and (c) includes, but is not limited to, educational,
recreational, social, patriotic, legal defense, benevolent, and health
causes.)) Churches and their integrated auxiliaries are not charitable
organizations, but are subject to RCW 19.09.100 (12), (15), and (18).
(3) "Charitable purpose" means any religious, charitable,
scientific, testing for public safety, literary, or educational purpose
or any other purpose that is beneficial to the community, including
environmental, humanitarian, patriotic, or civic purposes, the support
of national or international amateur sports competition, the prevention
of cruelty to children or animals, the advancement of social welfare,
or the benefit of law enforcement personnel, firefighters, and other
persons who protect public safety. The term "charitable" is used in
its generally accepted legal sense and includes relief of the poor, the
distressed, or the underprivileged; advancement of religion;
advancement of education or science; erecting or maintaining public
buildings, monuments, or works; lessening the burdens of government;
lessening neighborhood tensions; eliminating prejudice and
discrimination; defending human and civil rights secured by law; and
combating community deterioration and juvenile delinquency.
(4) "Commercial coventurer" means any individual or corporation,
partnership, sole proprietorship, limited liability company, limited
partnership, limited liability partnership, or any other legal entity,
that:
(a) Is regularly and primarily engaged in making sales of goods or
services for profit directly to the general public;
(b) Is not otherwise regularly or primarily engaged in making
charitable solicitations in this state or otherwise raising funds in
this state for one or more charitable organizations;
(c) Represents to prospective purchasers that, if they purchase a
good or service from the commercial coventurer, a portion of the sales
price or a sum of money or some other specified thing of value will be
donated to a named charitable organization; and
(d) Does not ask purchasers to make checks or other instruments
payable to a named charitable organization or any entity other than the
commercial coventurer itself under its regular commercial name.
(5) "Commercial fund raiser" or "commercial fund-raising entity"
means any entity that for compensation or other consideration within
this state directly or indirectly solicits or receives contributions
for or on behalf of any charitable organization or charitable purpose,
or that is engaged in the business of or is held out to persons in this
state as independently engaged in the business of soliciting or
receiving contributions for such purposes. However, a commercial
coventurer, fund-raising counsel, or consultant is not a commercial
fund raiser or commercial fund-raising entity.
(6) "Compensation" means salaries, wages, fees, commissions, or any
other remuneration or valuable consideration.
(((4))) (7) "Contribution" means the payment, donation, promise, or
grant, for consideration or otherwise, of any money or property of any
kind or value which contribution is wholly or partly induced by a
solicitation. Reference to dollar amounts of "contributions" or
"solicitations" in this chapter means in the case of payments or
promises to pay for merchandise or rights of any description, the value
of the total amount paid or promised to be paid for such merchandise or
rights ((less the reasonable purchase price to the charitable
organization of any such tangible merchandise, rights, or services
resold by the organization, and not merely that portion of the purchase
price to be applied to a charitable purpose)).
(((5))) (8) "Cost of solicitation" means and includes all direct
and indirect costs, expenditures, debts, obligations, salaries, wages,
commissions, fees, or other money or thing of value paid or incurred in
making a solicitation. ((Cost of solicitation does not include the
reasonable purchase price to the charitable organization of any
tangible goods or services resold by the organization as a part of its
fund raising activities.
(6))) (9) "Entity" means an individual, organization, group,
association, partnership, corporation, agency or unit of state
government, or any combination thereof.
(((7) "General public" or "public" means any individual located in
Washington state without a membership or other official relationship
with a charitable organization before a solicitation by the charitable
organization.
(8) "Commercial fund raiser" or "commercial fund-raising entity"
means any entity that for compensation or other consideration within
this state directly or indirectly solicits or receives contributions
for or on behalf of any charitable organization or charitable purpose,
or that is engaged in the business of or is held out to persons in this
state as independently engaged in the business of soliciting or
receiving contributions for such purposes. However, the following
shall not be deemed a commercial fund raiser or "commercial fund-raising entity": (a) Any entity that provides fund-raising advice or
consultation to a charitable organization within this state but neither
directly nor indirectly solicits or receives any contribution for or on
behalf of any such charitable organization; and (b) a bona fide officer
or other employee of a charitable organization.
(9))) (10) "Fund-raising counsel" or "consultant" means any entity
or individual who is retained by a charitable organization, for a fixed
fee or rate, that is not computed on a percentage of funds raised, or
to be raised, under a written agreement only to plan, advise, consult,
or prepare materials for a solicitation of contributions in this state,
but who does not manage, conduct, or carry on a fund-raising campaign
and who does not solicit contributions or employ, procure, or engage
any compensated person to solicit contributions, and who does not at
any time have custody or control of contributions. A volunteer,
employee, or salaried officer of a charitable organization maintaining
a permanent establishment or office in this state is not a fund-raising
counsel. An attorney, investment counselor, or banker who advises an
individual, corporation, or association to make a charitable
contribution is not a fund-raising counsel as a result of the advice.
(11) "General public" or "public" means any individual located in
Washington state without a membership or other official relationship
with a charitable organization before a solicitation by the charitable
organization.
(12) "Membership" means that for the payment of fees, dues,
assessments, etc., an organization provides services and confers a bona
fide right, privilege, professional standing, honor, or other direct
benefit, in addition to the right to vote, elect officers, or hold
office. The term "membership" does not include those persons who are
granted a membership upon making a contribution as the result of
solicitation.
(((10))) (13) "Other employee" of a charitable organization means
any person (a) whose conduct is subject to direct control by such
organization; (b) who does not act in the manner of any independent
contractor in his or her relation with the organization; and (c) who is
not engaged in the business of or held out to persons in this state as
independently engaged in the business of soliciting contributions for
charitable purposes or religious ((purposes)) activities.
(((11) "Parent organization" means that part of a charitable
organization that coordinates, supervises, or exercises control over
policy, fund raising, or expenditures, or assists or advises one or
more related foundations, supporting organizations, chapters, branches,
or affiliates of such organization in the state of Washington.
(12))) (14) "Political ((activities)) organization" means those
organizations whose activities are subject to chapter 42.17 RCW or the
Federal Elections Campaign Act of 1971, as amended.
(((13) "Religious activities" means those religious, evangelical,
or missionary activities under the direction of a religious
organization duly organized and operating in good faith that are
entitled to receive a declaration of current tax exempt status for
religious purposes from the United States government and the duly
organized branches or chapters of those organizations.
(14))) (15) "Religious organization" means those entities that are
not churches or integrated auxiliaries and includes nondenominational
ministries, interdenominational and ecumenical organizations, mission
organizations, speakers' organizations, faith-based social agencies,
and other entities whose principal purpose is the study, practice, or
advancement of religion.
(16) "Secretary" means the secretary of state.
(((15))) (17) "Signed" means hand-written, or, if the secretary
adopts rules facilitating electronic filing that pertain to this
chapter, in the manner prescribed by those rules.
(((16))) (18)(a) "Solicitation" means any oral or written request
for a contribution, including the solicitor's offer or attempt to sell
any property, rights, services, or other thing in connection with
which:
(((a))) (i) Any appeal is made for any charitable purpose; ((or
(b))) (ii) The name of any charitable organization is used as an
inducement for consummating the sale; or
(((c))) (iii) Any statement is made that implies that the whole or
any part of the proceeds from the sale will be applied toward any
charitable purpose or donated to any charitable organization.
(b) The solicitation shall be deemed completed when made, whether
or not the person making it receives any contribution or makes any
sale.
(c) "Solicitation" does not include bingo activities, raffles, and
amusement games conducted under chapter 9.46 RCW and applicable rules
of the Washington state gambling commission ((are specifically excluded
and shall not be deemed a solicitation under this chapter)).

Sec. 3 RCW 19.09.075 and 2002 c 74 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
An application for registration as a charitable organization shall
be submitted in the form prescribed by rule by the secretary,
containing, but not limited to, the following:
(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the charitable
organization;
(2) The name(s) under which the organization will solicit
contributions;
(3) The name, address, and telephone number of the officers of or
persons accepting responsibility for the organization;
(4) The names of the three officers or employees receiving the
greatest amount of compensation from the organization;
(5) The purpose of the organization;
(6)(a) Whether the organization is exempt from federal income tax;
and if so the organization shall attach to its application a copy of
the letter by which the internal revenue service granted such status;
and
(b) The name and address of the entity that prepares, reviews, or
audits the financial statement of the organization;
(7) A solicitation report of the organization for the preceding
accounting year including:
(a) The ((number and)) types of solicitations conducted;
(b) The total dollar value of ((support)) contributions received
from solicitations and from all other sources received on behalf of the
charitable purpose of the charitable organization;
(c) The total amount of money applied to charitable purposes, fund
raising costs, and other expenses; and
(d) The name, address, and telephone number of any commercial fund
raiser used by the organization;
(8) An irrevocable appointment of the secretary to receive service
of process in noncriminal proceedings as provided in RCW 19.09.305; and
(9) The total revenue of the preceding fiscal year.
The solicitation report required to be submitted under subsection
(7) of this section shall be in the form prescribed by rule by the
secretary, or as agreed to by the secretary and a charitable
organization ((or a group of charitable organizations. A consolidated
application for registration may, at the option of the charitable
organization, be submitted by a parent organization for itself and any
or all of its related foundations, supporting organizations, chapters,
branches, or affiliates in the state of Washington.
The application shall be signed by)). The president, treasurer, or
comparable officer of the organization must sign and date the
application. The application shall be submitted with a nonrefundable
filing fee which shall be in an amount to be established by the
secretary by rule. In determining the amount of this application fee,
the secretary may consider factors such as the entity's annual budget
and its federal income tax status. If the secretary determines that
the application is complete, the application shall be filed and the
applicant deemed registered.
((The secretary shall notify the director of veterans' affairs upon
receipt of an application for registration as a charitable organization
from an entity that purports to raise funds to benefit veterans of the
United States military services. The director of veterans' affairs may
advise the secretary and the attorney general of any information,
reports, or complaints regarding such an organization.))

Sec. 4 RCW 19.09.076 and 1994 c 287 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The application requirements of RCW 19.09.075 do not apply to
((the following)):
(((1))) (a) Any charitable organization raising less than an amount
as set by rule adopted by the secretary in any accounting year when all
the activities of the organization, including all fund raising
activities, are carried on by persons who are unpaid for their services
and no part of the charitable organization's assets or income inures to
the benefit of or is paid to any officer or member of the organization;
(((2) Any charitable organization located outside of the state of
Washington if the organization files the following with the secretary:
(a) The registration documents required under the charitable
solicitation laws of the state in which the charitable organization is
located;
(b) The registration required under the charitable solicitation
laws of the state of California and the state of New York; and
(c) Such federal income tax forms as may be required by rule of the
secretary.))
(b) Political organizations; or
(c) Appeals for funds on behalf of a specific individual named in
the solicitation, but only if all of the proceeds of the solicitation
are given to or expended for the direct benefit of that individual.
(2) All entities soliciting ((charitable donations)) contributions
for charitable purposes shall comply with the requirements of RCW
19.09.100.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.09.079 and 1993 c 471 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
An application for registration as a commercial fund raiser shall
be submitted in the form prescribed by the secretary, containing, but
not limited to, the following:
(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the commercial fund-raising entity;
(2) The name(s), address(es), and telephone number(s) of the
owner(s) and principal officer(s) of the commercial fund-raising
entity;
(3) The name, address, and telephone number of the individual
responsible for the activities of the commercial fund-raising entity in
Washington;
(4) ((A list of states and Canadian provinces in which fund raising
has been performed;
(5))) The names of the three officers or employees receiving the
greatest amount of compensation from the commercial fund-raising
entity;
(((6))) (5) The name and address of the entity that prepares,
reviews, or audits the financial statement of the organization;
(((7))) (6) A solicitation report of the commercial fund-raising
entity for the preceding accounting year, including:
(a) The ((number and)) types of fund raising services conducted;
(b) The names of charitable organizations required to register
under RCW 19.09.065 for whom fund raising services have been performed;
(c) The total value of contributions received on behalf of
charitable organizations required to register under RCW 19.09.065 by
the commercial fund raiser, affiliate of the commercial fund raiser, or
any entity retained by the commercial fund raiser; and
(d) The amount of money disbursed to charitable organizations for
charitable purposes, net of fund raising costs paid by the charitable
organization as stipulated in any agreement between charitable
organizations and the commercial fund raiser;
(((8))) (7) The name, address, and telephone number of any
commercial fund raiser that was retained in the conduct of providing
fund raising services; and
(((9))) (8) An irrevocable appointment of the secretary to receive
service of process in noncriminal proceedings as provided in RCW
19.09.305.
The application shall be signed by an officer or owner of the
commercial fund raiser and shall be submitted with a nonrefundable fee
in an amount to be established by rule of the secretary. If the
secretary determines that the application is complete, the application
shall be filed and the applicant deemed registered.

Sec. 6 RCW 19.09.085 and 1993 c 471 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Registration under this chapter shall be effective for one year
or longer, as established by the secretary.
(2) Reregistration required under RCW 19.09.075 or 19.09.079 shall
be submitted to the secretary no later than the date established by the
secretary by rule.
(3) Entities required to register under this chapter shall file a
notice of change of information within thirty days of any change in the
information contained in RCW 19.09.075 (1) through (((6))) (9) or
19.09.079 (1) through (((6))) (7).
(4) The secretary shall notify entities registered under this
chapter of the need to reregister upon the expiration of their current
registration. The notification shall be by mail, sent at least sixty
days prior to the expiration of their current registration. Failure to
register shall not be excused by a failure of the secretary to mail the
notice or by an entity's failure to receive the notice.

Sec. 7 RCW 19.09.097 and 1993 c 471 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No charitable organization may contract with a commercial fund
raiser for any fund raising service or activity unless its contract
requires that both parties comply with the law and permits officers of
the charity reasonable access to: (a) The fund raisers' financial
records relating to that charitable organization; ((and)) (b) the fund
raisers' operations including without limitation the right to be
present during any telephone solicitation; and (c) the names of all of
the fund raisers' employees or staff who are conducting fund raising or
charitable solicitations on behalf of the charitable organization. In
addition, the contract shall specify the amount of raised funds that
the charitable organization will receive or the method of computing
that amount, the amount of compensation of the commercial fund raiser
or the method of computing that amount, and whether the compensation is
fixed or contingent.
(2) Before a charitable organization may contract with a commercial
fund raiser for any fund raising service or activity, the charitable
organization and commercial fund raiser shall complete and file a
registration form with the secretary. The registration shall be filed
by the charitable organization ((with the secretary,)) in the form
prescribed by the secretary((, within five working days of the
execution of the contract containing,)). The registration shall
contain, but not be limited to, the following information:
(a) The name and registration number of the commercial fund raiser;
(b) The name of the surety or sureties issuing the bond required by
RCW 19.09.190, the aggregate amount of such bond or bonds, the bond
number(s), original effective date(s), and termination date(s);
(c) The name and registration number of the charitable
organization;
(d) The name of the representative of the commercial fund raiser
who will be responsible for the conduct of the fund raising;
(e) The type(s) of service(s) to be provided by the commercial fund
raiser;
(f) The dates such service(s) will begin and end;
(g) The terms of the agreement between the charitable organization
and commercial fund raiser relating to:
(i) Amount or percentages of amounts to inure to the charitable
organization;
(ii) Limitations placed on the maximum amount to be raised by the
fund raiser, if the amount to inure to the charitable organization is
not stated as a percentage of the amount raised;
(iii) Costs of fund raising that will be the responsibility of the
charitable organization, regardless of whether paid as a direct
expense, deducted from the amounts disbursed, or otherwise; and
(iv) The manner in which contributions received directly by the
charitable organization, not the result of services provided by the
commercial fund raiser, will be identified and used in computing the
fee owed to the commercial fund raiser; and
(h) The names of any entity to which more than ten percent of the
total anticipated fund raising cost is to be paid, and whether any
principal officer or owner of the commercial fund raiser or relative by
blood or marriage thereof is an owner or officer of any such entity.
(3) A correct copy of the contract shall be filed with the
secretary before the commencement of any campaign.
(4) The registration form shall be submitted with a nonrefundable
filing fee in an amount to be established by rule of the secretary and
shall be signed by an owner or principal officer of the commercial fund
raiser and the president, treasurer, or comparable officer of the
charitable organization.

Sec. 8 RCW 19.09.100 and 1994 c 287 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following conditions apply to solicitations as defined by RCW
19.09.020:
(1) A charitable organization, whether or not required to register
pursuant to this chapter, that directly solicits contributions from the
public in this state shall make the following clear and conspicuous
disclosures at the point of solicitation:
(a) The name of the individual making the solicitation;
(b) The identity of the charitable organization and the city of the
principal place of business of the charitable organization;
(c) If requested by the solicitee, the published number in the
office of the secretary for the donor to obtain additional financial
disclosure information on file with the secretary.
(2) A commercial fund raiser shall clearly and conspicuously
disclose at the point of solicitation:
(a) The name of the individual making the solicitation;
(b) The name of the entity for which the fund raiser is an agent or
employee and the name and city of the charitable organization for which
the solicitation is being conducted; and
(c) If requested by the solicitee, the published number in the
office of the secretary for the donor to obtain additional financial
disclosure information on file with the secretary. The disclosure must
be made during an oral solicitation of a contribution, and at the same
time at which a written request for a contribution is made.
(3) A person or organization soliciting charitable contributions by
telephone shall make the disclosures required under subsection (1) or
(2) of this section in the course of the solicitation but prior to
asking for a commitment for a contribution from the solicitee, and in
writing to any solicitee that makes a pledge within five working days
of making the pledge. If the person or organization sends any
materials to the person or organization solicited before the receipt of
any contribution, those materials shall include the disclosures
required in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, whichever is
applicable.
(4) In the case of a solicitation by advertisement or mass
distribution, including posters, leaflets, automatic dialing machines,
publication, and audio or video broadcasts, it shall be clearly and
conspicuously disclosed in the body of the solicitation material that:
(a) The solicitation is conducted by a named commercial fund
raiser, if it is;
(b) The notice of solicitation required by the charitable
solicitation act is on file with the secretary's office; and
(c) The potential donor can obtain additional financial disclosure
information at a published number in the office of the secretary.
(5) A container or vending machine displaying a solicitation must
also display in a clear and conspicuous manner the name of the
charitable organization for which funds are solicited, the name,
business address, and telephone number of the individual and any
commercial fund raiser responsible for collecting funds placed in the
containers or vending machines, and the following statement: "This
charity is currently registered with the secretary's office under the
charitable solicitation act, registration number . . . ."
(6) A commercial fund raiser shall not represent that tickets to
any fund raising event will be donated for use by another person unless
all the following requirements are met:
(a) The commercial fund raiser prior to conducting a solicitation
has written commitments from persons stating that they will accept
donated tickets and specifying the number of tickets they will accept;
(b) The written commitments are kept on file by the commercial fund
raiser for three years and are made available to the secretary,
attorney general, or county prosecutor on demand;
(c) The contributions solicited for donated tickets may not be more
than the amount representing the number of ticket commitments received
from persons and kept on file under (a) of this subsection; and
(d) Not later than seven calendar days prior to the date of the
event for which ticket donations are solicited, the commercial fund
raiser shall give all donated tickets to the persons who made the
written commitments to accept them.
(7) Each person or organization soliciting charitable contributions
shall not represent orally or in writing that:
(a) The charitable contribution is tax deductible unless the
charitable organization for which charitable contributions are being
solicited or to which tickets for fund raising events or other services
or goods will be donated, has applied for and received from the
internal revenue service a letter of determination granting tax
deductible status to the charitable organization;
(b) The person soliciting the charitable contribution is a
volunteer or words of similar meaning or effect that create the
impression that the person soliciting is not a paid solicitor unless
such person is unpaid for his or her services;
(c) The person soliciting the charitable contribution is a member,
staffer, helper, or employee of the charitable organization or words of
similar meaning or effect that create the impression that the person
soliciting is not a paid solicitor if the person soliciting is
employed, contracted, or paid by a commercial fund raiser.
(8) If the charitable organization is associated with, or has a
name that is similar to, any unit of government each person or
organization soliciting contributions shall disclose to each person
solicited whether the charitable organization is or is not part of any
unit of government and the true nature of its relationship to the unit
of government. This subsection does not apply to a foundation or other
charitable organization that is organized, operated, or controlled by
or in connection with a registered public charity, including any
governmental agency or unit, from which it derives its name.
(9) No person may, in conducting any solicitation, use the name
"police," "sheriff," "firefighter," "firemen," or a similar name unless
properly authorized by a bona fide police, sheriff, or firefighter
organization or police, sheriff, or fire department. A proper
authorization shall be in writing and signed by two authorized
officials of the organization or department and shall be filed with the
secretary.
(10) A person may not, in conducting any solicitation, use the name
of a federally chartered or nationally recognized military veterans'
service organization as determined by the United States veterans'
administration unless authorized in writing by the highest ranking
official of that organization in this state.
(11) A charitable organization shall comply with all local
governmental regulations that apply to soliciting for or on behalf of
charitable organizations.
(12) ((The advertising material and the general promotional plan
for a solicitation shall not be false, misleading, or deceptive, and
shall afford full and fair disclosure)) An entity soliciting
contributions for a charitable purpose shall not include in any
solicitation, or in any advertising material for a solicitation, or in
any promotional plan for a solicitation, any statement that is false,
misleading, or deceptive. All solicitations, advertising material, and
promotional plans must fully and fairly disclose the identity of the
entity on whose behalf the solicitation is made.
(13) Solicitations shall not be conducted by a charitable
organization or commercial fund raiser that has, or if a corporation,
its officers, directors, or principals have, been convicted of a crime
involving solicitations for or on behalf of a charitable organization
in this state, the United States, or any other state or foreign country
within the past ten years or has been subject to any permanent
injunction or administrative order or judgment under RCW 19.86.080 or
19.86.090, involving a violation or violations of RCW 19.86.020, within
the past ten years, or of restraining a false or misleading promotional
plan involving solicitations for charitable organizations.
(14) No charitable organization or commercial fund raiser subject
to this chapter may use or exploit the fact of registration under this
chapter so as to lead the public to believe that registration
constitutes an endorsement or approval by the state, but the use of the
following is not deemed prohibited: "Currently registered with the
Washington state secretary of state as required by law. Registration
number . . . ."
(15) No entity may engage in any solicitation for contributions for
or on behalf of any charitable organization or commercial fund raiser
unless the charitable organization or commercial fund raiser is
currently registered with the secretary.
(16) No ((entity)) charitable organization or commercial fundraiser
may engage in any solicitation for contributions unless it complies
with all provisions of this chapter.
(17)(((a))) No entity may place a telephone call to a donor or
potential donor for the purpose of charitable solicitation ((that will
be received by the solicitee)) before eight o'clock a.m. or after nine
o'clock p.m. pacific time.
(((b))) (18) No entity may, ((while placing a telephone call)) when
contacting a donor or potential donor for the purpose of charitable
solicitation, engage in any conduct the natural consequence of which is
to harass, intimidate, or torment any person in connection with the
((telephone call)) contact.
(((18))) (19) Failure to comply with subsections (1) through
(((17))) (18) of this section is a violation of this chapter.

Sec. 9 RCW 19.09.210 and 1993 c 471 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the request of the attorney general or the county prosecutor,
a charitable organization or commercial fund raiser shall submit a
financial statement containing, but not limited to, the following
information:
(1) The gross amount of the contributions pledged and the gross
amount collected.
(2) The amount thereof, given or to be given to charitable purposes
represented together with details as to the manner of distribution as
may be required.
(3) The aggregate amount paid and to be paid for the expenses of
such solicitation.
(4) The amounts paid to and to be paid to commercial fund raisers
or charitable organizations.
(5) Copies of any annual or periodic reports furnished by the
charitable organization((,)) of its activities during or for the same
fiscal period((, to its parent organization, subsidiaries, or
affiliates, if any)).

Sec. 10 RCW 19.09.440 and 1993 c 471 s 42 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Annually, the secretary of state shall publish a report
indicating:
(a) For each charitable organization registered under RCW
((19.09.065)) 19.09.075 the percentage relationship between (i) the
total amount of money applied to charitable purposes; and (ii) the
dollar value of ((support received from solicitations and received from
all other sources on behalf of the charitable purpose of the
organization)) total expenditures, including the total amount of money
applied to charitable purposes, fund raising costs, and administrative
expenses;
(b) For each commercial fund raiser registered under RCW
((19.09.065)) 19.09.079 the percentage relationship between (i) the
amount of money disbursed to charitable organizations for charitable
purposes; and (ii) the total value of contributions received on behalf
of charitable organizations by the commercial fund raiser; and
(c) Such other information as the secretary of state deems
appropriate.
(2) The secretary of state may use the latest information obtained
pursuant to RCW 19.09.075, 19.09.079, or otherwise under chapter 19.09
RCW to prepare the report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 19.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Charitable organizations must ensure that their boards, or a
committee thereof, have reviewed and accepted any financial report that
the organization may be required to file with the office of the
secretary. Charitable organizations must also ensure that the
financial information included in the filing fairly represents, in all
material respects, the financial condition and results of operations of
the organization as of, and for, the periods presented to the secretary
for filing. If the financial information submitted to the secretary is
incorrect in any material way, the charitable organization may be
subject to penalties as provided under RCW 19.09.279.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 19.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary may, in conjunction with the attorney general,
develop and operate an education program for charitable organizations,
their board members, and the general public. To the extent
practicable, the secretary shall consult with the nonprofit and
charitable sector and the charitable advisory council created in
section 16 of this act to develop curriculum and other materials
intended to educate charitable organizations, their board members, and
the general public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 19.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To provide for a charitable organization education program as
authorized in section 12 of this act, the secretary may establish fees
on registrations for entities filing with the secretary as
organizations pursuant to this chapter.
(2) The fees authorized in this section are in addition to the
existing fees established by the secretary in rule for organizations
required to register under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 19.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The charitable organization education account is created in the
state treasury. All receipts from the fees authorized in section 13(1)
of this act must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for the charitable organization education program
authorized in section 12 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 19.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary is authorized to adopt rules, in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW, that establish a set of tiered independent financial
reporting requirements for charitable organizations required to
register with the secretary pursuant to this chapter. Rules adopted
under this section shall include, but not be limited to, substantially
the following:
(1) An initial filing requirement for all charitable organizations
as currently required in this chapter;
(2) A financial reporting requirement for charitable organizations
that have more than one million dollars in annual gross revenue
averaged over the last three fiscal years. The secretary may require
charitable organizations that meet this threshold to have the federal
financial reporting forms the organization normally files to be
completed or reviewed by a third party who normally prepares or reviews
the forms in the ordinary course of their business. These forms must
be submitted to the secretary; and
(3) A financial reporting requirement for charitable organizations
with more than three million dollars in annual gross revenue averaged
over the last three fiscal years. The secretary may require charitable
organizations that meet this threshold to submit to the secretary
audited financial statements prepared by an independent certified
public accountant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 19.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary is authorized to create a charitable advisory
council to consist of at least eleven, but not more than twenty-one,
members. Members of a charitable advisory council shall:
(a) Be appointed by the secretary, with all members serving at the
pleasure of the secretary and all terms expiring no later than the term
of the appointing secretary;
(b) Represent a broad range of charities by size, purpose,
geographic region of the state, and general expertise in the management
and leadership of charitable organizations; and
(c) Annually vote to elect one of its members to serve as
chairperson.
(2) The secretary shall not compensate members of the charitable
advisory council but may provide reimbursement to members for expenses
that are incurred in the conduct of their official duties.
(3) The charitable advisory council shall advise the secretary in
determining training and educational needs of charitable organizations
and model policies related to governance and administration of
charitable organizations in accordance with fiduciary principles,
assist the secretary in identifying emerging issues and trends
affecting charitable organizations, and advise the secretary on other
related issues at the request of the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 19.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary may enter into reciprocal agreements with the
appropriate authority of any other state for the purpose of exchanging
information with respect to charitable organizations and commercial
fund raisers.
(2) Pursuant to such agreements the secretary may:
(a) Accept information filed by a charitable organization or
commercial fund raisers with the appropriate authority of another state
in lieu of the information required to be filed in accordance with this
chapter, if the information is substantially similar to the information
required under this chapter; and
(b) Grant exemptions from the requirements for the filing of annual
registration statements with the office to charitable organizations
organized under the laws of another state having their principal place
of business outside this state whose funds are derived principally from
sources outside this state and that have been exempted from the filing
of registration statements by the statute under whose laws they are
organized if such a state has a statute similar in substance to this
chapter.
(3) The secretary may adopt rules relating to reciprocal agreements
consistent with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 RCW 19.09.095 (Subsidiary organizations--Requirement to register -- Exemptions) and 1986 c 230 s 9 & 1983 c 265 s
6 are each repealed.

--- END ---