BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.540 and 2005 c 360 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The health care authority, in coordination with ((the
department of personnel,)) the department of health, health plans
participating in public employees' benefits board programs, and the
University of Washington's center for health promotion, ((may create a
worksite health promotion program to develop and implement initiatives
designed to increase physical activity and promote improved self-care
and engagement in health care decision-making among state employees.
(2) The health care authority shall report to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2006, on progress in implementing, and
evaluating the results of, the worksite health promotion program))
shall establish and maintain a state employee health program focused on
reducing the health risks of state employees, dependents, and retirees
enrolled in the public employees' benefits board. The program shall
use public and private sector best practices to achieve goals of
measurable health outcomes, measurable productivity improvements,
positive impact on the cost of medical care, and positive return on
investment.
(2) The state employee health program shall:
(a) Provide technical assistance and other services as needed to
wellness staff in all state agencies and institutions of higher
education;
(b) Develop effective communication tools and ongoing training for
wellness staff;
(c) Contract with outside vendors for evaluation of program goals;
(d) Strongly encourage the widespread completion of online health
assessment tools for all state employees, dependents, and retirees.
The health assessment tool must be voluntary and confidential. Health
assessment data and claims data shall be used to:
(i) Engage state agencies and institutions of higher education in
providing evidence-based programs targeted at reducing identified
health risks;
(ii) Guide contracting with third-party vendors to implement
behavior change tools for targeted high-risk populations; and
(iii) Guide the benefit structure for state employees, dependents,
and retirees to include covered services and medications known to
manage and reduce health risks.
(3) The health care authority shall report to the legislature in
December 2008, 2009, and 2010 on outcome goals for the employee health
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The health care authority through the state employee health
program shall create a state employee health demonstration project in
four state agencies: The department of health, department of
personnel, department of natural resources, and department of labor and
industries. Demonstration project agencies shall operate employee
health programs for their employees in collaboration with the state
employee health program. Agency demonstration project employee health
programs:
(a) Shall include but are not limited to the following key
elements: Outreach to all staff with efforts made to reach the largest
percentage of employees possible; awareness-building information that
promotes health; motivational opportunities that encourage employees to
improve their health; behavior change opportunities that demonstrate
and support behavior change; and tools to improve employee health care
decisions;
(b) Must have wellness staff with direct accountability to agency
senior management;
(c) Shall initiate and maintain employee health programs using
current and emerging best practices in the field of health promotion;
(d) May offer employees such incentives as cash for completing
health risk assessments, free preventive screenings, training in
behavior change tools, improved nutritional standards on agency
campuses, bike racks, walking maps, on-site weight reduction programs,
and regular communication to promote personal health awareness.
(2) The state employee health program shall evaluate each of the
four programs separately and compare outcomes for each of them with the
entire state employee population to assess effectiveness of the
programs. Specifically, the program shall measure at least the
following outcomes in the demonstration population: The reduction in
the percent of the population that is overweight or obese, the
reduction in risk factors related to diabetes, the reduction in risk
factors related to absenteeism, the reduction in tobacco consumption,
and the increase in appropriate use of preventive health services. The
state employee health program shall report to the legislature in
December 2008, 2009, and 2010 on the demonstration project.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of one million three hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2009, from the general
fund to the health care authority for the purposes of section 2 of this
act.

--- END ---