BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.86A.030 and 2005 c 302 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Funds held in public depositaries not as demand deposits as
provided in RCW 43.86A.020 and 43.86A.030, shall be available for a
time certificate of deposit investment program according to the
following formula: The state treasurer shall apportion to all
participating depositaries an amount equal to five percent of the three
year average mean of general state revenues as certified in accordance
with Article VIII, section 1(b) of the state Constitution, or fifty
percent of the total surplus treasury investment availability,
whichever is less. Within thirty days after certification, those funds
determined to be available according to this formula for the time
certificate of deposit investment program shall be deposited in
qualified public depositaries. These deposits shall be allocated among
the participating depositaries on a basis to be determined by the state
treasurer.
(2) The state treasurer may use up to ((one)) two hundred million
dollars per year of all funds available under this section for the
purposes of RCW 43.86A.060. The amounts made available to these public
depositaries shall be equal to the amounts of outstanding loans made
under RCW 43.86A.060.
(3) The formula so devised shall be a matter of public record
giving consideration to, but not limited to deposits, assets, loans,
capital structure, investments or some combination of these factors.
However, if in the judgment of the state treasurer the amount of
allocation for certificates of deposit as determined by this section
will impair the cash flow needs of the state treasury, the state
treasurer may adjust the amount of the allocation accordingly.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.86A RCW
to read as follows:
The requirements upon the state treasurer in RCW 43.86A.030 are
contingent upon at least one additional full-time equivalent employee,
which must be dedicated to the deposit investment program, for the
purposes of RCW 43.86A.030 and this section, being funded from the
state treasurer's service fund created in RCW 43.08.190.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding from the state
treasurer's service fund created in RCW 43.08.190 for the purpose of
providing an additional full-time equivalent employee, dedicated to the
deposit investment program, for the purposes of this act, referencing
this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2007,
in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) This act takes effect the first day of
the month immediately following the state treasurer's determination
that the contingency in section 2(1) of this act has occurred.
(2) The state treasurer must provide notice of the effective date
of this act to the legislature, the office of the code reviser, and
others as deemed appropriate by the state treasurer.

--- END ---