BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Lead agencies, and other agencies with jurisdiction, shall
process all applications and decisions relating to infrastructure
improvements or activities necessary to implement renewable fuel
standards under chapter 19.112 RCW and RCW 43.19.642 in a defined and
efficient manner according to specific timelines and practices designed
to minimize processing and review times. Such applications and
decisions may be processed prior to competing applications and
decisions, to the extent appropriate under current law. Application
and permit review requirements, turnaround times, and agency and
applicant performance according to these standards shall be posted and
made easily accessible to the public.
(2) Applications and decisions subject to the provisions of this
section include, but are not limited to, any attendant and nonexempt
license, permit, or approval requirements or state environmental policy
act requirements under RCW 43.21C.030 and chapter 197-11 WAC relating
to the:
(a) Installation of new storage tanks; pumps; any project to allow
for increasing refining and blending capacity; any project to allow for
efficiency improvements for refiners, blenders, or bulk plant
operators; and any modification to off-loading or on-loading racks;
(b) Addition of heating or other equipment to biodiesel storage
tanks or tanks that hold a blended product; and
(c) Replacement of underground fuel storage tanks, aboveground fuel
storage tanks, pumps, and large bulk tanks.
(3) This section does not apply to biodiesel or ethanol production
facilities.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2009.

--- END ---