BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that current funding
formulas used to determine the state allocation for public schools is
confusing and should be more clear. The legislature further finds that
the funding ratios currently aggregate different classifications of
staff so that it is unclear how many teachers the state allocation is
funding. The legislature further finds that the funding formulas
should be changed to separate the different classifications of staff,
including classroom teachers, and that the specific funding ratios
should be determined in the omnibus appropriations act.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2006 c 263 s 322 are each amended to
read as follows:
The basic education allocation for each annual average full-time
equivalent student shall be determined in accordance with the following
procedures:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula based on a ratio of students
to staff for the distribution of a basic education allocation for each
annual average full-time equivalent student enrolled in a common
school. The distribution formula shall have the primary objective of
equalizing educational opportunities and shall provide appropriate
recognition of the following costs among the various districts within
the state:
(a) ((Certificated instructional staff)) Classroom teachers and
their related costs;
(b) Other certificated staff and their related costs;
(c) Certificated administrative staff and their related costs;
(((c))) (d) Classified staff and their related costs;
(((d))) (e) Nonsalary costs;
(((e))) (f) Extraordinary costs, including school facilities, of
remote and necessary schools as judged by the superintendent of public
instruction, with recommendations from the school facilities citizen
advisory panel under RCW 28A.525.025, and small high schools, including
costs of additional certificated and classified staff; and
(((f))) (g) The attendance of students pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160
and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district.
(2)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds shall
be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature. The formula shall be for allocation
purposes only. While the legislature intends that the allocations for
additional instructional staff be used to increase the ratio of such
staff to students, nothing in this section shall require districts to
reduce the number of administrative staff below existing levels.
(b) The formula adopted by the legislature shall be specified in
the omnibus appropriations act and shall reflect the ((following))
ratios ((at a minimum)) for the following: (i) ((Forty-nine))
Classroom teachers to students enrolled in grades kindergarten through
three; (ii) classroom teachers to students enrolled in grades four
through twelve; (iii) other certificated instructional staff to ((one
thousand annual average full time equivalent)) students enrolled in
grades kindergarten through three; (((ii) forty-six)) (iv) other
certificated instructional staff to ((one thousand annual average full
time equivalent)) students in grades four through twelve; (((iii)
four)) (v) certificated administrative staff to ((one thousand annual
average full time equivalent)) students in grades kindergarten through
twelve; and (((iv) sixteen and sixty-seven one-hundredths)) (vi)
classified personnel to ((one thousand annual average full time
equivalent)) students enrolled in grades kindergarten through twelve.
(c) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect: PROVIDED, That the distribution formula developed
pursuant to this section shall be for state apportionment and
equalization purposes only and shall not be construed as mandating
specific operational functions of local school districts other than
those program requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 and
28A.150.100. The enrollment of any district shall be the annual
average number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students
as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of
each month and shall exclude full-time equivalent students with
disabilities recognized for the purposes of allocation of state funds
for programs under RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100. The definition
of full-time equivalent student shall be determined by rules of the
superintendent of public instruction: PROVIDED, That the definition
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That any revision of the present
definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the office of financial management shall make
a monthly review of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent
students in the common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.
(3)(a) Certificated instructional staff shall include those persons
employed by a school district who are nonsupervisory employees within
the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(8): PROVIDED, That in exceptional cases,
people of unusual competence but without certification may teach
students so long as a certificated person exercises general
supervision: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the hiring of such classified
people shall not occur during a labor dispute and such classified
people shall not be hired to replace certificated employees during a
labor dispute.
(b) If certificated administrative staff ((shall include)) includes
all those persons who are chief executive officers, chief
administrative officers, confidential employees, supervisors,
principals, or assistant principals within the meaning of RCW
41.59.020(4), then the different ratios for each of these personnel
classifications shall be specified in the omnibus appropriations act.

--- END ---