BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.38.080 and 1998 c 176 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is exempted from the tax imposed by this chapter, the use
of fuel for:
(a) Street and highway construction and maintenance purposes in
motor vehicles owned and operated by the state of Washington, or any
county or municipality;
(b) Publicly owned fire fighting equipment;
(c) Special mobile equipment as defined in RCW 46.04.552;
(d) Power pumping units or other power take-off equipment of any
motor vehicle which is accurately measured by metering devices that
have been specifically approved by the department or which is
established by any of the following formulae:
(i) Pumping propane, or fuel or heating oils or milk picked up from
a farm or dairy farm storage tank by a power take-off unit on a
delivery truck, at a rate determined by the department: PROVIDED, That
claimant when presenting his or her claim to the department in
accordance with this chapter, shall provide to the claim, invoices of
propane, or fuel or heating oil delivered, or such other appropriate
information as may be required by the department to substantiate his or
her claim;
(ii) Operating a power take-off unit on a cement mixer truck or a
load compactor on a garbage truck at the rate of twenty-five percent of
the total gallons of fuel used in such a truck; or
(iii) The department is authorized to establish by rule additional
formulae for determining fuel usage when operating other types of
equipment by means of power take-off units when direct measurement of
the fuel used is not feasible. The department is also authorized to
adopt rules regarding the usage of on board computers for the
production of records required by this chapter;
(e) Motor vehicles owned and operated by the United States
government;
(f) Heating purposes;
(g) Moving a motor vehicle on a public highway between two pieces
of private property when said moving is incidental to the primary use
of the motor vehicle;
(h) Transportation services for persons with special transportation
needs by a private, nonprofit transportation provider regulated under
chapter 81.66 RCW;
(i) Vehicle refrigeration units, mixing units, or other equipment
powered by separate motors from separate fuel tanks; and
(j) The operation of a motor vehicle as a part of or incidental to
logging operations upon a highway under federal jurisdiction within the
boundaries of a federal area if the federal government requires a fee
for the privilege of operating the motor vehicle upon the highway, the
proceeds of which are reserved for constructing or maintaining roads in
the federal area, or requires maintenance or construction work to be
performed on the highway for the privilege of operating the motor
vehicle on the highway.
(2) There is exempted from the tax imposed by this chapter the
removal or entry of special fuel under the following circumstances and
conditions:
(a) If it is the removal from a terminal or refinery of, or the
entry or sale of, a special fuel if all of the following apply:
(i) The person otherwise liable for the tax is a licensee other
than a dyed special fuel user or international fuel tax agreement
licensee;
(ii) For a removal from a terminal, the terminal is a licensed
terminal; and
(iii) The special fuel satisfies the dyeing and marking
requirements of this chapter;
(b) If it is an entry or removal from a terminal or refinery of
taxable special fuel transferred to a refinery or terminal and the
persons involved, including the terminal operator, are licensed; and
(c)(i) If it is a special fuel that, under contract of sale, is
shipped to a point outside this state by a supplier by means of any of
the following:
(A) Facilities operated by the supplier;
(B) Delivery by the supplier to a carrier, customs broker, or
forwarding agent, whether hired by the purchaser or not, for shipment
to the out-of-state point;
(C) Delivery by the supplier to a vessel clearing from port of this
state for a port outside this state and actually exported from this
state in the vessel.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (2)(c):
(A) "Carrier" means a person or firm engaged in the business of
transporting for compensation property owned by other persons, and
includes both common and contract carriers; and
(B) "Forwarding agent" means a person or firm engaged in the
business of preparing property for shipment or arranging for its
shipment.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, every
urban passenger transportation system and carriers as defined by
chapters 81.68 and 81.70 RCW shall be exempt from the provisions of
this chapter requiring the payment of special fuel taxes. For the
purposes of this section "urban passenger transportation system" means
every transportation system, publicly or privately owned, having as its
principal source of revenue the income from transporting persons for
compensation by means of motor vehicles and/or trackless trolleys, each
having a seating capacity for over fifteen persons over prescribed
routes in such a manner that the routes of such motor vehicles and/or
trackless trolleys, either alone or in conjunction with routes of other
such motor vehicles and/or trackless trolleys subject to routing by the
same transportation system, shall not extend for a distance exceeding
twenty-five road miles beyond the corporate limits of the county in
which the original starting points of such motor vehicles are located:
PROVIDED, That no refunds or credits shall be granted on special fuel
used by any urban transportation vehicle or vehicle operated pursuant
to chapters 81.68 and 81.70 RCW on any trip where any portion of said
trip is more than twenty-five road miles beyond the corporate limits of
the county in which said trip originated.
(4) Blenders and special fuel suppliers are exempted from the tax
imposed by this chapter, if the alternative fuel is produced in
Washington state and the feed stock from which the alternative fuel is
produced is grown in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
alternative fuel, as defined in RCW 82.38.020, if the fuel is exempt
from the special fuel tax under RCW 82.38.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to the use of alternative fuel, as
defined in RCW 82.38.020, if the fuel is exempt from the special fuel
tax under RCW 82.38.080.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.38.020 and 2002 c 183 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Alternative fuel" means alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or
biodiesel feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135.
(2) "Blended special fuel" means a mixture of undyed diesel fuel
and another liquid, other than a de minimis amount of the liquid, that
can be used as a fuel to propel a motor vehicle.
(((2))) (3) "Blender" means a person who produces blended special
fuel outside the bulk transfer-terminal system.
(((3))) (4) "Bond" means a bond duly executed with a corporate
surety qualified under chapter 48.28 RCW, which bond is payable to the
state of Washington conditioned upon faithful performance of all
requirements of this chapter, including the payment of all taxes,
penalties, and other obligations arising out of this chapter.
(((4))) (5) "Bulk transfer-terminal system" means the special fuel
distribution system consisting of refineries, pipelines, vessels, and
terminals. Special fuel in a refinery, pipeline, vessel, or terminal
is in the bulk transfer-terminal system. Special fuel in the fuel tank
of an engine, motor vehicle, or in a railcar, trailer, truck, or other
equipment suitable for ground transportation is not in the bulk
transfer-terminal system.
(((5))) (6) "Bulk transfer" means a transfer of special fuel by
pipeline or vessel.
(((6))) (7) "Bulk storage" means the placing of special fuel into
a receptacle other than the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle.
(((7))) (8) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(((8))) (9) "Dyed special fuel user" means a person authorized by
the internal revenue code to operate a motor vehicle on the highway
using dyed special fuel, in which the use is not exempt from the
special fuel tax.
(((9))) (10) "Evasion" or "evade" means to diminish or avoid the
computation, assessment, or payment of authorized taxes or fees
through:
(a) A knowing: False statement; omission; misrepresentation of
fact; or other act of deception;
(b) An intentional: Failure to file a return or report; or other
act of deception; or
(c) The unlawful use of dyed special fuel.
(((10))) (11) "Export" means to obtain special fuel in this state
for sales or distribution outside the state.
(((11))) (12) "Highway" means every way or place open to the use of
the public, as a matter of right, for the purpose of vehicular travel.
(((12))) (13) "Import" means to bring special fuel into this state
by a means of conveyance other than the fuel supply tank of a motor
vehicle.
(((13))) (14) "International fuel tax agreement licensee" means a
special fuel user operating qualified motor vehicles in interstate
commerce and licensed by the department under the international fuel
tax agreement.
(((14))) (15) "Lessor" means a person: (a) Whose principal
business is the bona fide leasing or renting of motor vehicles without
drivers for compensation to the general public; and (b) who maintains
established places of business and whose lease or rental contracts
require the motor vehicles to be returned to the established places of
business.
(((15))) (16) "Licensee" means a person holding a license issued
under this chapter.
(((16))) (17) "Motor vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle
designed for operation upon land utilizing special fuel as the means of
propulsion.
(((17))) (18) "Natural gas" means naturally occurring mixtures of
hydrocarbon gases and vapors consisting principally of methane, whether
in gaseous or liquid form.
(((18))) (19) "Person" means a natural person, fiduciary,
association, or corporation. The term "person" as applied to an
association means and includes the partners or members thereof, and as
applied to corporations, the officers thereof.
(((19))) (20) "Position holder" means a person who holds the
inventory position in special fuel, as reflected by the records of the
terminal operator. A person holds the inventory position in special
fuel if the person has a contractual agreement with the terminal for
the use of storage facilities and terminating services at a terminal
with respect to special fuel. "Position holder" includes a terminal
operator that owns special fuel in their terminal.
(((20))) (21) "Rack" means a mechanism for delivering special fuel
from a refinery or terminal into a truck, trailer, railcar, or other
means of nonbulk transfer.
(((21))) (22) "Refiner" means a person who owns, operates, or
otherwise controls a refinery.
(((22))) (23) "Removal" means a physical transfer of special fuel
other than by evaporation, loss, or destruction.
(((23))) (24) "Special fuel" means and includes all combustible
gases and liquids suitable for the generation of power for propulsion
of motor vehicles, except that it does not include motor vehicle fuel
as defined in chapter 82.36 RCW, nor does it include dyed special fuel
as defined by federal regulations, unless the use is in violation of
this chapter. If a person holds for sale, sells, purchases, or uses
any dyed special fuel in violation of this chapter, all dyed special
fuel held for sale, sold, purchased, stored, or used by that person is
considered special fuel, and the person is subject to all presumptions,
reporting, and recordkeeping requirements and other obligations which
apply to special fuel, along with payment of any applicable taxes,
penalties, or interest for illegal use.
(((24))) (25) "Special fuel distributor" means a person who
acquires special fuel from a supplier, distributor, or licensee for
subsequent sale and distribution.
(((25))) (26) "Special fuel exporter" means a person who purchases
special fuel in this state and directly exports the fuel by a means
other than the bulk transfer-terminal system to a destination outside
of the state.
(((26))) (27) "Special fuel importer" means a person who imports
special fuel into the state by a means other than the bulk transfer-terminal system. If the importer of record is acting as an agent, the
person for whom the agent is acting is the importer. If there is no
importer of record, the owner of the special fuel at the time of
importation is the importer.
(((27))) (28) "Special fuel supplier" means a person who holds a
federal certificate issued under the internal revenue code and
authorizes the person to tax-free transactions on special fuel in the
bulk transfer-terminal system.
(((28))) (29) "Special fuel user" means a person engaged in uses of
special fuel that are not specifically exempted from the special fuel
tax imposed under this chapter.
(((29))) (30) "Terminal" means a special fuel storage and
distribution facility that has been assigned a terminal control number
by the internal revenue service, is supplied by pipeline or vessel, and
from which reportable special fuel is removed at a rack.
(((30))) (31) "Terminal operator" means a person who owns,
operates, or otherwise controls a terminal.
(((31))) (32) "Two-party exchange" or "buy-sell agreement" means a
transaction in which taxable special fuel is transferred from one
licensed supplier to another licensed supplier under an exchange or
buy-sell agreement whereby the supplier that is the position holder
agrees to deliver taxable special fuel to the other supplier or the
other supplier's customer at the rack of the terminal at which the
delivering supplier is the position holder.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.38.130 and 1998 c 176 s 65 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may revoke the license of any licensee for any of
the grounds constituting cause for denial of a license set forth in RCW
82.38.120 or for other reasonable cause. Before revoking such license
the department shall notify the licensee to show cause within twenty
days of the date of the notice why the license should not be revoked:
PROVIDED, That at any time prior to and pending such hearing the
department may, in the exercise of reasonable discretion, suspend such
license.
The department shall cancel any special fuel license immediately
upon surrender thereof by the holder.
Any surety on a bond furnished by a licensee as provided in this
chapter shall be released and discharged from any and all liability to
the state accruing on such bond after the expiration of forty-five days
from the date which such surety shall have lodged with the department
a written request to be released and discharged, but this provision
shall not operate to relieve, release, or discharge the surety from any
liability already accrued or which shall accrue before the expiration
of the forty-five day period. The department shall promptly, upon
receiving any such request, notify the licensee who furnished the bond,
and unless the licensee, on or before the expiration of the forty-five
day period, files a new bond, in accordance with this section, the
department forthwith shall cancel the special fuel dealer's or special
fuel user's license.
The department may require a new or additional surety bond of the
character specified in RCW 82.38.020(((3))) (4) if, in its opinion, the
security of the surety bond therefor filed by such licensee, shall
become impaired or inadequate. Upon failure of the licensee to give
such new or additional surety bond within forty-five days after being
requested to do so by the department, or after he or she shall fail or
refuse to file reports and remit or pay taxes at the intervals fixed by
the department, the department forthwith shall cancel his or her
license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2015.

--- END ---