BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The agenda of all regular and special meetings of the governing
body of every special purpose district and any municipality that owns
or maintains a web site shall be posted within a reasonable time before
a meeting. The text of any ordinance, rule, or regulation that is
under consideration at the meeting shall be included on the web site at
the same time the agenda is posted. The minutes of all regular and
special meetings of the governing body of every special purpose
district and any municipality that owns or maintains a web site shall
be posted within a reasonable time after a meeting.
(2) Every special purpose district and any municipality that owns
or maintains a public internet web site shall post to it a schedule of
the time and place of all regular meetings of the governing body.
Except in cases of emergency, the special purpose district or
municipality shall promptly post to its web site a notice of the time
and place of all special meetings of the governing body.
(3) This section shall not be construed to affect existing public
agency notice requirements in RCW 42.30.060 or 42.30.075.

--- END ---