BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.36.005 and 1996 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) As the number of people in the state grows and wildlife habitat
is altered, people will encounter wildlife more frequently. As a
result, conflicts between humans and wildlife will also increase.
Wildlife is a public resource of significant value to the people of the
state and the responsibility to minimize and resolve these conflicts is
shared by all citizens of the state.
(2) In particular, the state recognizes the importance of
commercial agricultural and horticultural crop production and the value
of healthy ((deer and elk)) big game populations, which can damage
((such)) crops and other forms of personal property. The legislature
further finds that damage prevention is key to maintaining healthy
((deer and elk)) big game populations, wildlife-related recreational
opportunities, and commercially productive agricultural and
horticultural crops, and that the state, participants in wildlife
recreation, and private landowners and tenants share the responsibility
for damage prevention. Toward this end, the legislature encourages
landowners and tenants to contribute through their land management
practices to healthy wildlife populations and to provide access for
related recreation. It is in the best interests of the state for the
department ((of fish and wildlife)) to respond quickly to wildlife
damage complaints and to work with these landowners and tenants to
minimize and/or prevent damages and conflicts while maintaining ((deer
and elk)) big game wildlife populations for enjoyment by all citizens
of the state.
(3) A timely and simplified process for resolving claims for
damages caused by ((deer and elk for)) big game to commercial
agricultural or horticultural products, or other forms of personal
property, is beneficial to the claimant and the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.36.010 and 1996 c 54 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless otherwise specified,)) The ((following)) definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter((:)) unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Big game" has the same definition as in RCW 77.08.030.
(2) "Crop" means a commercially raised horticultural and/or
agricultural product and includes growing or harvested product but does
not include livestock. For the purposes of this chapter all parts of
horticultural trees shall be considered a crop and shall be eligible
for claims.
(((2))) (3) "Emergency" means an unforeseen circumstance beyond the
control of the landowner or tenant that presents a real and immediate
threat to crops, domestic animals, or fowl.
(((3))) (4) "Immediate family member" means spouse, brother,
sister, grandparent, parent, child, or grandchild.
(5) "Personal property" means tangible personal property that can
be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched, or that is in any other
manner perceptible to the senses, and includes but is not limited to
livestock, plants, vehicles, animals, hay, and attachments to real
property such as fences, pipes, and irrigation systems.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.36.040 and 1996 c 54 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Pursuant to this section, the director or the director's
designee may distribute money appropriated to pay claims for damages to
crops caused by wild ((deer or elk)) big game in an amount of up to ten
thousand dollars per claim. Damages payable under this ((section))
subsection are limited to the value of such commercially raised
horticultural or agricultural crops, whether growing or harvested, and
shall be paid only to the owner of the crop at the time of damage,
without assignment.
(b) Pursuant to this section, the director or the director's
designee may also distribute money appropriated to pay claims in excess
of one thousand dollars for damages to tangible personal property
caused by big game in an amount of up to ten thousand dollars per
claim. Damages payable under this subsection must be based on the fair
market value of the tangible personal property, and shall be paid only
to the owner of the personal property at the time of damage, without
assignment.
(c) These damages shall not include damage to other real ((or
personal)) property ((including other vegetation or animals)), damages
caused by animals other than wild ((deer or elk)) big game, lost
profits, consequential damages, or any other damages whatsoever.
((These damages))
(d) Damage claim payments under this section shall comprise the
exclusive remedy for claims against the state for damages caused by
wildlife.
(2) The director may adopt rules for the form of affidavits or
proof to be provided in claims under this section. The director may
adopt rules to specify the time and method of assessing damage. The
burden of proving damages shall be on the claimant. Payment of claims
shall remain subject to the other conditions and limits of this
chapter.
(3) If funds are limited, payments of claims shall be prioritized
in the order that the claims are received. No claim may be processed
if:
(a) The claimant did not notify the department within ten days of
discovery of the damage. If the claimant intends to take steps that
prevent determination of damages, such as harvest of damaged crops,
then the claimant shall notify the department as soon as reasonably
possible after discovery so that the department has an opportunity to
document the damage and take steps to prevent additional damage; or
(b) The claimant did not present a complete, written claim within
sixty days after the damage, or the last day of damaging if the damage
was of a continuing nature.
(4) The director or the director's designee may examine and assess
the damage upon notice. The department and claimant may agree to an
assessment of damages by a neutral person or persons knowledgeable in
horticultural or agricultural practices. The department and claimant
shall share equally in the costs of such third party examination and
assessment of damage.
(5) There shall be no payment for damages if:
(a) The crops are on lands leased from any public agency;
(b) The landowner or claimant failed to use or maintain applicable
damage prevention materials or methods furnished by the department, or
failed to comply with a wildlife damage prevention agreement under RCW
77.12.260;
(c) The director has expended all funds appropriated for payment of
such claims for the current fiscal year; or
(d) The damages are covered by insurance. The claimant shall
notify the department at the time of claim of insurance coverage in the
manner required by the director. Insurance coverage shall cover all
damages prior to any payment under this chapter.
(6) When there is a determination of claim by the director or the
director's designee pursuant to this section, the claimant has sixty
days to accept the claim or it is deemed rejected.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.36.050 and 1996 c 54 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the claimant does not accept the director's decision under RCW
77.36.040, or if the claim exceeds ten thousand dollars, then the claim
may be filed with the ((office of)) risk management division under RCW
4.92.040(5). The ((office of)) risk management division shall
recommend to the legislature whether the claim should be paid. If the
legislature approves the claim, the director shall pay it from moneys
appropriated for that purpose. No funds shall be expended for damages
under this chapter except as appropriated by the legislature.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.36.080 and 1996 c 54 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may pay no more than ((thirty)) eighty thousand
dollars per fiscal year from the general fund for claims under RCW
77.36.040 and for assessment costs and compromise of claims unless the
legislature declares an emergency. Such money shall be used to pay
animal damage claims only if the claim meets the conditions of RCW
77.36.040 and, for crop claims only, the damage occurred in a place
where the opportunity to hunt was restricted or prohibited by a county,
municipality, or other public entity during the season prior to the
occurrence of the damage.
(2) The legislature may declare an emergency, defined for the
purposes of this section as any happening arising from weather, other
natural conditions, or fire that causes unusually great damage to
commercially raised agricultural or horticultural crops ((by deer or
elk)) or personal property by big game. In an emergency, the
department may pay as much as may be subsequently appropriated, in
addition to the funds authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
for claims under RCW 77.36.040 and for assessment and compromise of
claims. Such money shall be used to pay animal damage claims only if
the claim meets the conditions of RCW 77.36.040 and the department has
expended all funds authorized under RCW 77.36.070 or subsection (1) of
this section.

--- END ---