BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 57.12 RCW
to read as follows:
If the district has fewer than one hundred residents, and if the
filing period is reopened for a district commissioner under RCW
29A.24.171 or 29A.24.181 due to a void in candidacy, any person who is
a qualified elector of the state of Washington and who holds title or
evidence of title to land in the district may file as a candidate for
and serve as a district commissioner.

--- END ---