BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.32.050 and 1995 c 199 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Where death results from the injury the expenses of burial not
to exceed two hundred percent of the average monthly wage in the state
as defined in RCW 51.08.018 shall be paid.
(2)(a) Where death results from the injury, a surviving spouse of
a deceased worker eligible for benefits under this title shall receive
monthly for life or until remarriage payments according to the
following schedule:
(i) If there are no children of the deceased worker, sixty percent
of the wages of the deceased worker ((but not less than one hundred
eighty-five dollars));
(ii) If there is one child of the deceased worker and in the legal
custody of such spouse, sixty-two percent of the wages of the deceased
worker ((but not less than two hundred twenty-two dollars));
(iii) If there are two children of the deceased worker and in the
legal custody of such spouse, sixty-four percent of the wages of the
deceased worker ((but not less than two hundred fifty-three dollars));
(iv) If there are three children of the deceased worker and in the
legal custody of such spouse, sixty-six percent of the wages of the
deceased worker ((but not less than two hundred seventy-six dollars));
(v) If there are four children of the deceased worker and in the
legal custody of such spouse, sixty-eight percent of the wages of the
deceased worker ((but not less than two hundred ninety-nine dollars));
or
(vi) If there are five or more children of the deceased worker and
in the legal custody of such spouse, seventy percent of the wages of
the deceased worker ((but not less than three hundred twenty-two
dollars)).
(b) Where the surviving spouse does not have legal custody of any
child or children of the deceased worker or where after the death of
the worker legal custody of such child or children passes from such
surviving spouse to another, any payment on account of such child or
children not in the legal custody of the surviving spouse shall be made
to the person or persons having legal custody of such child or
children. The amount of such payments shall be five percent of the
monthly benefits payable as a result of the worker's death for each
such child but such payments shall not exceed twenty-five percent.
Such payments on account of such child or children shall be subtracted
from the amount to which such surviving spouse would have been entitled
had such surviving spouse had legal custody of all of the children and
the surviving spouse shall receive the remainder after such payments on
account of such child or children have been subtracted. Such payments
on account of a child or children not in the legal custody of such
surviving spouse shall be apportioned equally among such children.
(c) Payments to the surviving spouse of the deceased worker shall
cease at the end of the month in which remarriage occurs: PROVIDED,
That a monthly payment shall be made to the child or children of the
deceased worker from the month following such remarriage in a sum equal
to five percent of the wages of the deceased worker for one child and
a sum equal to five percent for each additional child up to a maximum
of five such children. Payments to such child or children shall be
apportioned equally among such children. Such sum shall be in place of
any payments theretofore made for the benefit of or on account of any
such child or children. If the surviving spouse does not have legal
custody of any child or children of the deceased worker, or if after
the death of the worker, legal custody of such child or children passes
from such surviving spouse to another, any payment on account of such
child or children not in the legal custody of the surviving spouse
shall be made to the person or persons having legal custody of such
child or children.
(d) In no event shall the monthly payments provided in subsection
(2) of this section:
(i) Exceed the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in
the state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(ii) For dates of injury or disease manifestation after July 1,
2008, be less than fifteen percent of the average monthly wage in the
state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 plus an additional ten dollars
per month for a surviving spouse and an additional ten dollars per
month for each child of the worker up to a maximum of five children.
However, if the monthly payment computed under this subsection
(2)(d)(ii) is greater than one hundred percent of the wages of the
deceased worker as determined under RCW 51.08.178, the monthly payment
due to the surviving spouse shall be equal to the greater of the
monthly wages of the deceased worker or the minimum benefit set forth
in this section on June 30, 2008.
(e) In addition to the monthly payments provided for in subsection
(2)(a) through (c) of this section, a surviving spouse or child or
children of such worker if there is no surviving spouse, or dependent
parent or parents, if there is no surviving spouse or child or children
of any such deceased worker shall be forthwith paid a sum equal to one
hundred percent of the average monthly wage in the state as defined in
RCW 51.08.018, any such children, or parents to share and share alike
in said sum.
(f) Upon remarriage of a surviving spouse the monthly payments for
the child or children shall continue as provided in this section, but
the monthly payments to such surviving spouse shall cease at the end of
the month during which remarriage occurs. However, after September 8,
1975, an otherwise eligible surviving spouse of a worker who died at
any time prior to or after September 8, 1975, shall have an option of:
(i) Receiving, once and for all, a lump sum of twenty-four times
the monthly compensation rate in effect on the date of remarriage
allocable to the spouse for himself or herself pursuant to subsection
(2)(a)(i) of this section and subject to any modifications specified
under subsection (2)(d) of this section and RCW 51.32.075(3) or fifty
percent of the then remaining annuity value of his or her pension,
whichever is the lesser: PROVIDED, That if the injury occurred prior
to July 28, 1991, the remarriage benefit lump sum available shall be as
provided in the remarriage benefit schedules then in effect; or
(ii) If a surviving spouse does not choose the option specified in
subsection (2)(f)(i) of this section to accept the lump sum payment,
the remarriage of the surviving spouse of a worker shall not bar him or
her from claiming the lump sum payment authorized in subsection
(2)(f)(i) of this section during the life of the remarriage, or shall
not prevent subsequent monthly payments to him or to her if the
remarriage has been terminated by death or has been dissolved or
annulled by valid court decree provided he or she has not previously
accepted the lump sum payment.
(g) If the surviving spouse during the remarriage should die
without having previously received the lump sum payment provided in
subsection (2)(f)(i) of this section, his or her estate shall be
entitled to receive the sum specified under subsection (2)(f)(i) of
this section or fifty percent of the then remaining annuity value of
his or her pension whichever is the lesser.
(h) The effective date of resumption of payments under subsection
(2)(f)(ii) of this section to a surviving spouse based upon termination
of a remarriage by death, annulment, or dissolution shall be the date
of the death or the date the judicial decree of annulment or
dissolution becomes final and when application for the payments has
been received.
(i) If it should be necessary to increase the reserves in the
reserve fund or to create a new pension reserve fund as a result of the
amendments in chapter 45, Laws of 1975-'76 2nd ex. sess., the amount of
such increase in pension reserve in any such case shall be transferred
to the reserve fund from the supplemental pension fund.
(3) If there is a child or children and no surviving spouse of the
deceased worker or the surviving spouse is not eligible for benefits
under this title, a sum equal to thirty-five percent of the wages of
the deceased worker shall be paid monthly for one child and a sum
equivalent to fifteen percent of such wage shall be paid monthly for
each additional child, the total of such sum to be divided among such
children, share and share alike: PROVIDED, That benefits under this
subsection or subsection (4) of this section shall not exceed the
lesser of sixty-five percent of the wages of the deceased worker at the
time of his or her death or the applicable percentage of the average
monthly wage in the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018, as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(4) In the event a surviving spouse receiving monthly payments
dies, the child or children of the deceased worker shall receive the
same payment as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) If the worker leaves no surviving spouse or child, but leaves
a dependent or dependents, a monthly payment shall be made to each
dependent equal to fifty percent of the average monthly support
actually received by such dependent from the worker during the twelve
months next preceding the occurrence of the injury, but the total
payment to all dependents in any case shall not exceed the lesser of
sixty-five percent of the wages of the deceased worker at the time of
his or her death or the applicable percentage of the average monthly
wage in the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

If any dependent is under the age of eighteen years at the time of the
occurrence of the injury, the payment to such dependent shall cease
when such dependent reaches the age of eighteen years except such
payments shall continue until the dependent reaches age twenty-three
while permanently enrolled at a full time course in an accredited
school. The payment to any dependent shall cease if and when, under
the same circumstances, the necessity creating the dependency would
have ceased if the injury had not happened.
(6) For claims filed prior to July 1, 1986, if the injured worker
dies during the period of permanent total disability, whatever the
cause of death, leaving a surviving spouse, or child, or children, the
surviving spouse or child or children shall receive benefits as if
death resulted from the injury as provided in subsections (2) through
(4) of this section. Upon remarriage or death of such surviving
spouse, the payments to such child or children shall be made as
provided in subsection (2) of this section when the surviving spouse of
a deceased worker remarries.
(7) For claims filed on or after July 1, 1986, every worker who
becomes eligible for permanent total disability benefits shall elect an
option as provided in RCW 51.32.067.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.32.060 and 1993 c 521 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the supervisor of industrial insurance shall determine
that permanent total disability results from the injury, the worker
shall receive monthly during the period of such disability:
(a) If married at the time of injury, sixty-five percent of his or
her wages ((but not less than two hundred fifteen dollars per month)).
(b) If married with one child at the time of injury, sixty-seven
percent of his or her wages ((but not less than two hundred fifty-two
dollars per month)).
(c) If married with two children at the time of injury, sixty-nine
percent of his or her wages ((but not less than two hundred
eighty-three dollars)).
(d) If married with three children at the time of injury,
seventy-one percent of his or her wages ((but not less than three
hundred six dollars per month)).
(e) If married with four children at the time of injury,
seventy-three percent of his or her wages ((but not less than three
hundred twenty-nine dollars per month)).
(f) If married with five or more children at the time of injury,
seventy-five percent of his or her wages ((but not less than three
hundred fifty-two dollars per month)).
(g) If unmarried at the time of the injury, sixty percent of his or
her wages ((but not less than one hundred eighty-five dollars per
month)).
(h) If unmarried with one child at the time of injury, sixty-two
percent of his or her wages ((but not less than two hundred twenty-two
dollars per month)).
(i) If unmarried with two children at the time of injury,
sixty-four percent of his or her wages ((but not less than two hundred
fifty-three dollars per month)).
(j) If unmarried with three children at the time of injury,
sixty-six percent of his or her wages ((but not less than two hundred
seventy-six dollars per month)).
(k) If unmarried with four children at the time of injury,
sixty-eight percent of his or her wages ((but not less than two hundred
ninety-nine dollars per month)).
(l) If unmarried with five or more children at the time of injury,
seventy percent of his or her wages ((but not less than three hundred
twenty-two dollars per month)).
(2) For any period of time where both husband and wife are entitled
to compensation as temporarily or totally disabled workers, only that
spouse having the higher wages of the two shall be entitled to claim
their child or children for compensation purposes.
(3) In case of permanent total disability, if the character of the
injury is such as to render the worker so physically helpless as to
require the hiring of the services of an attendant, the department
shall make monthly payments to such attendant for such services as long
as such requirement continues, but such payments shall not obtain or be
operative while the worker is receiving care under or pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 51.36 RCW and RCW 51.04.105.
(4) Should any further accident result in the permanent total
disability of an injured worker, he or she shall receive the pension to
which he or she would be entitled, notwithstanding the payment of a
lump sum for his or her prior injury.
(5) In no event shall the monthly payments provided in this
section:
(a) Exceed the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in
the state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(b) For dates of injury or disease manifestation after July 1,
2008, be less than fifteen percent of the average monthly wage in the
state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 plus an additional ten dollars
per month if a worker is married and an additional ten dollars per
month for each child of the worker up to a maximum of five children.
However, if the monthly payment computed under this subsection (5)(b)
is greater than one hundred percent of the wages of the worker as
determined under RCW 51.08.178, the monthly payment due to the worker
shall be equal to the greater of the monthly wages of the worker or the
minimum benefit set forth in this section on June 30, 2008.
The limitations under this subsection shall not apply to the
payments provided for in subsection (3) of this section.
(6) In the case of new or reopened claims, if the supervisor of
industrial insurance determines that, at the time of filing or
reopening, the worker is voluntarily retired and is no longer attached
to the work force, benefits shall not be paid under this section.
(7) The benefits provided by this section are subject to
modification under RCW 51.32.067.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.32.090 and 1993 c 521 s 3, 1993 c 299 s 1, and 1993
c 271 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When the total disability is only temporary, the schedule of
payments contained in RCW 51.32.060 (1) and (2) shall apply, so long as
the total disability continues.
(2) Any compensation payable under this section for children not in
the custody of the injured worker as of the date of injury shall be
payable only to such person as actually is providing the support for
such child or children pursuant to the order of a court of record
providing for support of such child or children.
(3)(a) As soon as recovery is so complete that the present earning
power of the worker, at any kind of work, is restored to that existing
at the time of the occurrence of the injury, the payments shall cease.
If and so long as the present earning power is only partially restored,
the payments shall:
(i) For claims for injuries that occurred before May 7, 1993,
continue in the proportion which the new earning power shall bear to
the old; or
(ii) For claims for injuries occurring on or after May 7, 1993,
equal eighty percent of the actual difference between the worker's
present wages and earning power at the time of injury, but: (A) The
total of these payments and the worker's present wages may not exceed
one hundred fifty percent of the average monthly wage in the state as
computed under RCW 51.08.018; (B) the payments may not exceed one
hundred percent of the entitlement as computed under subsection (1) of
this section; and (C) the payments may not be less than the worker
would have received if (a)(i) of this subsection had been applicable to
the worker's claim.
(b) No compensation shall be payable under this subsection (3)
unless the loss of earning power shall exceed five percent.
(4)(a) Whenever the employer of injury requests that a worker who
is entitled to temporary total disability under this chapter be
certified by a physician as able to perform available work other than
his or her usual work, the employer shall furnish to the physician,
with a copy to the worker, a statement describing the work available
with the employer of injury in terms that will enable the physician to
relate the physical activities of the job to the worker's disability.
The physician shall then determine whether the worker is physically
able to perform the work described. The worker's temporary total
disability payments shall continue until the worker is released by his
or her physician for the work, and begins the work with the employer of
injury. If the work thereafter comes to an end before the worker's
recovery is sufficient in the judgment of his or her physician to
permit him or her to return to his or her usual job, or to perform
other available work offered by the employer of injury, the worker's
temporary total disability payments shall be resumed. Should the
available work described, once undertaken by the worker, impede his or
her recovery to the extent that in the judgment of his or her physician
he or she should not continue to work, the worker's temporary total
disability payments shall be resumed when the worker ceases such work.
(b) Once the worker returns to work under the terms of this
subsection (4), he or she shall not be assigned by the employer to work
other than the available work described without the worker's written
consent, or without prior review and approval by the worker's
physician.
(c) If the worker returns to work under this subsection (4), any
employee health and welfare benefits that the worker was receiving at
the time of injury shall continue or be resumed at the level provided
at the time of injury. Such benefits shall not be continued or resumed
if to do so is inconsistent with the terms of the benefit program, or
with the terms of the collective bargaining agreement currently in
force.
(d) In the event of any dispute as to the worker's ability to
perform the available work offered by the employer, the department
shall make the final determination.
(5) No worker shall receive compensation for or during the day on
which injury was received or the three days following the same, unless
his or her disability shall continue for a period of fourteen
consecutive calendar days from date of injury: PROVIDED, That attempts
to return to work in the first fourteen days following the injury shall
not serve to break the continuity of the period of disability if the
disability continues fourteen days after the injury occurs.
(6) Should a worker suffer a temporary total disability and should
his or her employer at the time of the injury continue to pay him or
her the wages which he or she was earning at the time of such injury,
such injured worker shall not receive any payment provided in
subsection (1) of this section during the period his or her employer
shall so pay such wages.
(7) In no event shall the monthly payments provided in this
section:
(a) Exceed the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in
the state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(b) For dates of injury or disease manifestation after July 1,
2008, be less than fifteen percent of the average monthly wage in the
state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 plus an additional ten dollars
per month if the worker is married and an additional ten dollars per
month for each child of the worker up to a maximum of five children.
However, if the monthly payment computed under this subsection (7)(b)
is greater than one hundred percent of the wages of the worker as
determined under RCW 51.08.178, the monthly payment due to the worker
shall be equal to the greater of the monthly wages of the worker or the
minimum benefit set forth in this section on June 30, 2008.
(8) If the supervisor of industrial insurance determines that the
worker is voluntarily retired and is no longer attached to the work
force, benefits shall not be paid under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---