BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of labor and industries shall
conduct a study of the incidence of total permanent disability pensions
in the state's workers' compensation system. The department shall
contract with an independent researcher with demonstrated expertise in
workers' compensation systems. The department shall consult with the
workers' compensation advisory committee in determining the criteria to
use in selecting a researcher and in selecting the researcher with
which to contract.
In conducting the study, the researcher selected shall consider the
following: (1) Causes of the recent increase in total permanent
disability cases, including changes in injured worker demographics,
policy, and other areas that may be identified; (2) future anticipated
total permanent disability trends; and (3) a comparison of Washington's
permanent disability claims experience and injured workers with other
states and jurisdictions.
The department shall report to the workers' compensation advisory
committee on the results of the study on or before July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---