BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.68.090 and 2005 c 314 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle
fund from the motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax shall be
first expended for purposes enumerated in (a) and (b) of this
subsection. The remaining net tax amount shall be distributed monthly
by the state treasurer in accordance with subsections (2) through (7)
of this section.
(a) For payment of refunds of motor vehicle fuel tax and special
fuel tax that has been paid and is refundable as provided by law;
(b) For payment of amounts to be expended pursuant to
appropriations for the administrative expenses of the offices of state
treasurer, state auditor, and the department of licensing of the state
of Washington in the administration of the motor vehicle fuel tax and
the special fuel tax, which sums shall be distributed monthly.
(2) All of the remaining net tax amount collected under RCW
82.36.025(1) and 82.38.030(1) shall be distributed as set forth in (a)
through (j) of this section.
(a) For distribution to the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
((44.387)) 42.3675 percent to be expended for highway purposes of the
state as defined in RCW 46.68.130;
(b) For distribution to the special category C account, hereby
created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount equal to 3.2609 percent to
be expended for special category C projects. Special category C
projects are category C projects that, due to high cost only, will
require bond financing to complete construction.
The following criteria, listed in order of priority, shall be used
in determining which special category C projects have the highest
priority:
(i) Accident experience;
(ii) Fatal accident experience;
(iii) Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable
speeds without undue congestion; and
(iv) Continuity of development of the highway transportation
network.
Moneys deposited in the special category C account in the motor
vehicle fund may be used for payment of debt service on bonds the
proceeds of which are used to finance special category C projects under
this subsection (2)(b);
(c) For distribution to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to ((2.3283)) 4.3478 percent;
(d) For distribution to the Puget Sound capital construction
account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3726 percent;
(e) For distribution to the urban arterial trust account in the
motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 7.5597 percent;
(f) For distribution to the transportation improvement account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 5.6739 percent and expended
in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;
(g) For distribution to the cities and towns from the motor vehicle
fund an amount equal to 10.6961 percent in accordance with RCW
46.68.110;
(h) For distribution to the counties from the motor vehicle fund an
amount equal to 19.2287 percent: (i) Out of which there shall be
distributed from time to time, as directed by the department of
transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out the
provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to
the county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW
47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed
monthly as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW
46.68.120;
(i) For distribution to the county arterial preservation account,
hereby created in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 1.9565
percent. These funds shall be distributed by the county road
administration board to counties in proportions corresponding to the
number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each
county and shall be used for improvements to sustain the structural,
safety, and operational integrity of county arterials. The county road
administration board shall adopt reasonable rules and develop policies
to implement this program and to assure that a pavement management
system is used;
(j) For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in the
motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.5363 percent and expended in
accordance with RCW 36.79.020.
(3) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(2)
and 82.38.030(2) shall be distributed to the transportation 2003
account (nickel account).
(4) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(3)
and 82.38.030(3) shall be distributed as follows:
(a) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to the incorporated cities
and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;
(b) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to counties of the state in
accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and
(c) The remainder shall be distributed to the transportation
partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.
(5) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(4)
and 82.38.030(4) shall be distributed as follows:
(a) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to the incorporated cities
and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;
(b) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to counties of the state in
accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and
(c) The remainder shall be distributed to the transportation
partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.
(6) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025 (5)
and (6) and 82.38.030 (5) and (6) shall be distributed to the
transportation partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.
(7) Nothing in this section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so
as to violate any terms or conditions contained in any highway
construction bond issues now or hereafter authorized by statute and
whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid from any excise
taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.60.326 and 2005 c 270 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to maintain an adequate, fair, and economically sound
schedule of charges for the transportation of passengers, vehicles, and
commodities on the Washington state ferries, the department of
transportation each year shall conduct a full review of such charges.
(2) Prior to February 1st of each odd-numbered year the department
shall transmit to the transportation commission a report of its review
together with its recommendations for the revision of a schedule of
charges for the ensuing biennium. The commission on or before July 1st
of that year shall adopt as a rule, in the manner provided by the
Washington administrative procedure act, a schedule of charges for the
Washington state ferries for the ensuing biennium commencing July 1st.
The schedule may initially be adopted as an emergency rule if necessary
to take effect on, or as near as possible to, July 1st.
(3) The department in making its review and formulating
recommendations and the commission in adopting a schedule of charges
may consider any of the following factors:
(a) The amount of subsidy available to the ferry system for
maintenance and operation;
(b) The amount of subsidy made available pursuant to this act
solely for the reduction of the charges for transportation of
passengers, vehicles, and commodities;
(c) The time and distance of ferry runs;
(((c))) (d) The maintenance and operation costs for ferry runs with
a proper adjustment for higher costs of operating outmoded or less
efficient equipment;
(((d))) (e) The efficient distribution of traffic between cross-sound routes;
(((e))) (f) The desirability of reasonable rates for persons using
the ferry system to commute daily to work and other frequent users who
live in ferry-dependent communities;
(((f))) (g) The effect of proposed fares in increasing walk-on and
vehicular passenger use;
(((g))) (h) The effect of proposed fares in promoting all types of
ferry use during nonpeak periods;
(((h))) (i) The estimated revenues that are projected to be earned
by the ferry system from commercial advertisements, parking, contracts,
leases, and other sources;
(((i))) (j) The prepurchase of multiple fares, whether for a single
rider or multiple riders;
(((j))) (k) Such other factors as prudent managers of a major ferry
system would consider.
(4) If at any time during the biennium it appears that projected
revenues from the Puget Sound ferry operations account and any other
operating subsidy available to the Washington state ferries will be
less than the projected total cost of maintenance and operation of the
Washington state ferries for the biennium, the department shall
forthwith undertake a review of its schedule of charges to ascertain
whether or not the schedule of charges should be revised. The
department shall, upon completion of its review report, submit its
recommendation to the transportation commission which may in its sound
discretion revise the schedule of charges as required to meet necessary
maintenance and operation expenditures of the ferry system for the
biennium or may defer action until the regular annual review and
revision of ferry charges as provided in subsection (2) of this
section.
(5) The provisions of RCW 47.60.330 relating to public
participation shall apply to the process of revising ferry tolls under
this section.
(6) Under RCW 43.135.055, the transportation commission may
increase ferry tolls included in the schedule of charges adopted under
this section by a percentage that exceeds the fiscal growth factor.
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section and chapter
81.28 RCW, and using sound business judgment, the chief executive
officer of the ferry system may authorize the use of promotional,
discounted, and special event fares to the general public and
commercial enterprises for the purpose of maximizing capacity use and
the revenues collected by the ferry system. The department shall
report to the transportation commission a summary of the promotional,
discounted, and special event fares offered during each fiscal year and
the financial results from these activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---