BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax imposed and collected under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW,
less any credits allowed under chapter 82.14 RCW, on initial
construction of a street, place, road highway, easement, right-of-way,
bridge, tunnel, or trestle in which eighty percent of the cost of the
project must be recovered through tolls, shall be transferred to the
tolling account of the project and used to lower the overall cost of
the project and thereby the corresponding tolls.

--- END ---