BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.04.080 and 1972 ex.s. c 43 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
On all claims under this title, claimants' written notices, orders,
or warrants ((shall not be forwarded to, or in care of, any
representative of the claimant, but shall)) must be forwarded directly
to the claimant until such time as there has been entered an order on
the claim appealable to the board of industrial insurance appeals.
Claimants' written notices, orders, or warrants may be forwarded to the
claimant in care of a representative before an order has been entered
if the claimant sets forth in writing the name and address of the
representative to whom the claimant desires this information to be
forwarded.

--- END ---