BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that it is in the
best interest of the state to find innovative and economically
sustainable ways to conserve and protect productive agricultural lands,
critical wildlife habitat, and other natural resources.
(2) The legislature further finds that the diminishing stock of
productive agricultural lands can be preserved through the creation of
conservation easements that limit the amount of land available for
intensive development.
(3) The legislative further finds that working natural resources
and wildlife habitat areas can be protected by the same conservation
easements that protect existing agricultural lands.
(4) The legislature recognizes the unique interests and knowledge
that private property owners have about their land and about the most
effective means available to protect the wildlife habitat and natural
resources on that land.
(5) The legislature intends to protect the use and value of
productive agricultural property and the wildlife habitat and other
natural resources on that property by encouraging voluntary,
cooperative farmland preservation and environmental enhancement
programs with willing property owners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Conservation easement" or "easement" means an interest in real
property acquired and held by someone other than the owner of that
property that imposes affirmative obligations or limitations on the
parties including:
(a) Retaining or protecting natural resources;
(b) Assuring the availability of the property for agricultural,
forest, recreational, or open-space use;
(c) Protecting the natural, scenic, or open-space values of the
real property; or
(d) Maintaining or enhancing the air or water quality on or around
the property.
(2) "Contract" or "agreement" means a written contract or agreement
containing the terms and conditions of a conservation easement
affecting real property that has been executed by the owner of the real
property and the holder of the easement and recorded in the same manner
that conveyances of real property are recorded under RCW 65.08.070.
(3) "Holder" means:
(a) A governmental body empowered to hold an interest in real
property under the laws of this state or the United States; or
(b) A charitable corporation, charitable association, or charitable
trust, the purposes or powers of which include assuring the
availability of real property for agricultural, forest, recreational,
or open-space use, retaining or protecting natural resources,
protecting the natural, scenic, or open-space values of real property,
or maintaining or enhancing air or water quality on or around the real
property.
(4) "Third-party right of enforcement" means a right provided in an
easement agreement to enforce any of its terms granted to a
governmental body, charitable corporation, charitable association, or
charitable trust that is not a holder of the interests governed by the
agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this
chapter, a conservation easement may be created, conveyed, recorded,
assigned, released, modified, terminated, or otherwise altered or
affected in the same manner as other easements affecting real property.
(2) No right or duty in favor of or against a holder and no right
in favor of a person having a third-party right of enforcement arises
under an easement agreement before it is accepted by the holder and
recorded in the same manner that conveyances of real property are
recorded under RCW 65.08.070.
(3) Except as provided in section 4(2) of this act, an easement is
unlimited in duration unless the agreement creating it provides
otherwise.
(4) An interest in real property that exists at the time an
easement is created is not impaired by the easement agreement unless
the owner of that interest is a party to the easement and specifically
consents to it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) An action affecting a conservation
easement may be brought by:
(a) An owner of an interest in the real property burdened by the
easement;
(b) A holder of the easement;
(c) A person who has a third-party right of enforcement in the
easement agreement; or
(d) Any other person specifically authorized by law.
(2) This chapter does not affect the power of a court of competent
jurisdiction to modify or terminate a conservation easement in
accordance with the principles of law and equity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A conservation easement is valid even
though:
(1) It is not an inheritable interest in the real property;
(2) It can be or has been assigned to another holder under the
terms of the easement agreement;
(3) It contains provisions that have not been recognized
traditionally at common law;
(4) It imposes a negative burden on either party;
(5) It imposes affirmative obligations upon the owner of an
interest in the burdened property or upon the holder;
(6) The benefit does not touch or concern real property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) This chapter applies to any interest
that complies with this chapter and was created after the effective
date of this section, whether designated as a conservation easement,
covenant, equitable servitude, restriction, easement, or otherwise.
(2) This chapter applies to any interest created before the
effective date of this section if it would have been enforceable had it
been created after the effective date of this section, unless
retroactive application contravenes the Constitution or laws of this
state or the United States.
(3) This chapter does not invalidate any interest that is
enforceable under another law of this state, whether designated as a
conservation easement, covenant, equitable servitude, restriction,
easement, or otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) An easement may provide that development
rights acquired by a holder through a conservation easement may be
transferred to another party under any applicable state law or local
ordinance that provides for the transfer of development rights.
(2) Unless or until development rights or other interests acquired
by a holder through a conservation easement are transferred under
subsection (1) of this section, payments for those rights or interests
may be amortized over a period and under such terms as the parties to
that agreement provide.

Sec. 8 RCW 36.70A.060 and 2005 c 423 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) ((Except as provided in RCW 36.70A.1701,)) Each county that
is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, and each city
within such county, shall adopt development regulations on or before
September 1, 1991, to assure the conservation of agricultural, forest,
and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
Regulations adopted under this subsection may not prohibit uses legally
existing on any parcel prior to their adoption and shall remain in
effect until the county or city adopts development regulations pursuant
to RCW 36.70A.040. Such regulations shall assure that the use of lands
adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands shall not
interfere with the continued use, in the accustomed manner and in
accordance with best management practices, of these designated lands
for the production of food, agricultural products, or timber, or for
the extraction of minerals.
(b) Counties and cities shall require that all plats, short plats,
development permits, and building permits issued for development
activities on, or within five hundred feet of, lands designated as
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands, contain a
notice that the subject property is within or near designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands on which a
variety of commercial activities may occur that are not compatible with
residential development for certain periods of limited duration. The
notice for mineral resource lands shall also inform that an application
might be made for mining-related activities, including mining,
extraction, washing, crushing, stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and
recycling of minerals.
(2) Each county and city shall adopt development regulations that
protect critical areas that are required to be designated under RCW
36.70A.170. For counties and cities that are required or choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be
adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the
counties and cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on
or before March 1, 1992. If critical areas designated under RCW
36.70A.170 are subject to a conservation easement agreement under
chapter 64.-- RCW (sections 2 through 7 of this act) and the agreement
contains provisions for habitat protection, restoration, or
maintenance, the provisions of that agreement are presumed to satisfy
the requirements of state law for the protection of critical areas if:
(a) The agreement contains a conservation plan that has been
reviewed by a conservation district and the district has determined
that the applicable provisions of that plan, if implemented, meet or
exceed the standards for conservation contained in the current
applicable field office technical guides of the natural resources
conservation service; or
(b) The applicable provisions of the agreement meet or exceed the
requirements for alternate conservation planning and habitat protection
as provided in or required by local critical areas ordinances.
(3) A county shall not adopt development regulations under this
chapter that directly or indirectly preclude a property owner from
being able to establish a conservation easement on a parcel or portion
of a parcel of land, enter into an agreement to sell or transfer the
development rights associated with a parcel or portion of a parcel of
land, or qualify for or enroll a parcel or a portion of a parcel of
land in any conservation reserve enhancement program or equivalent
program that protects the natural resources and habitat areas and the
future agricultural uses of that parcel.
(4) Such counties and cities shall review these designations and
development regulations when adopting their comprehensive plans under
RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development regulations under RCW
36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and development regulations
to insure consistency.
(((4))) (5) Forest land and agricultural land located within urban
growth areas shall not be designated by a county or city as forest land
or agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW
36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a program authorizing
transfer or purchase of development rights.

Sec. 9 RCW 36.70A.070 and 2005 c 360 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The comprehensive plan of a county or city that is required or
chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall consist of a map or maps,
and descriptive text covering objectives, principles, and standards
used to develop the comprehensive plan. The plan shall be an
internally consistent document and all elements shall be consistent
with the future land use map. A comprehensive plan shall be adopted
and amended with public participation as provided in RCW 36.70A.140.
Each comprehensive plan shall include a plan, scheme, or design for
each of the following:
(1) A land use element designating the proposed general
distribution and general location and extent of the uses of land, where
appropriate, for agriculture, timber production, housing, commerce,
industry, recreation, open spaces, general aviation airports, public
utilities, public facilities, and other land uses. The land use
element shall include population densities, building intensities, and
estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall
provide for protection of the quality and quantity of ground water used
for public water supplies. Wherever possible, the land use element
should consider utilizing urban planning approaches that promote
physical activity. Where applicable, the land use element shall review
drainage, flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby
jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate
or cleanse those discharges that pollute waters of the state, including
Puget Sound or waters entering Puget Sound.
(2) A housing element ensuring the vitality and character of
established residential neighborhoods that: (a) Includes an inventory
and analysis of existing and projected housing needs that identifies
the number of housing units necessary to manage projected growth; (b)
includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory
provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of
housing, including single-family residences; (c) identifies sufficient
land for housing, including, but not limited to, government-assisted
housing, housing for low-income families, manufactured housing,
multifamily housing, and group homes and foster care facilities; and
(d) makes adequate provisions for existing and projected needs of all
economic segments of the community.
(3) A capital facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An
inventory of existing capital facilities owned by public entities,
showing the locations and capacities of the capital facilities; (b) a
forecast of the future needs for such capital facilities; (c) the
proposed locations and capacities of expanded or new capital
facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such capital
facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies
sources of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to
reassess the land use element if probable funding falls short of
meeting existing needs and to ensure that the land use element, capital
facilities plan element, and financing plan within the capital
facilities plan element are coordinated and consistent. Park and
recreation facilities shall be included in the capital facilities plan
element.
(4) A utilities element consisting of the general location,
proposed location, and capacity of all existing and proposed utilities,
including, but not limited to, electrical lines, telecommunication
lines, and natural gas lines.
(5) Rural element. Counties shall include a rural element
including lands that are not designated for urban growth, agriculture,
forest, or mineral resources. The following provisions shall apply to
the rural element:
(a) Growth management act goals and local circumstances. Because
circumstances vary from county to county, in establishing patterns of
rural densities and uses, a county may consider local circumstances,
but shall develop a written record explaining how the rural element
harmonizes the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and meets the
requirements of this chapter.
(b) Rural development. The rural element shall permit rural
development, forestry, and agriculture in rural areas. The rural
element shall provide for a variety of rural densities, uses, essential
public facilities, and rural governmental services needed to serve the
permitted densities and uses. To achieve a variety of rural densities
and uses, counties may provide for clustering, density transfer, design
guidelines, conservation easements, and other innovative techniques
that will accommodate appropriate rural densities and uses that are not
characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with rural
character.
(c) Measures governing rural development. The rural element shall
include measures that apply to rural development and protect the rural
character of the area, as established by the county, by:
(i) Containing or otherwise controlling rural development;
(ii) Assuring visual compatibility of rural development with the
surrounding rural area;
(iii) Reducing the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land
into sprawling, low-density development in the rural area;
(iv) Protecting critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and
surface water and ground water resources through programs that
encourage and facilitate the voluntary use of conservation easements by
property owners and state, county, or other agencies of local
government for the preservation of existing agricultural lands and the
protection of habitat and other natural resources on those lands; and
(v) Protecting against conflicts with the use of agricultural,
forest, and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
(d) Limited areas of more intensive rural development. Subject to
the requirements of this subsection and except as otherwise
specifically provided in this subsection (5)(d), the rural element may
allow for limited areas of more intensive rural development, including
necessary public facilities and public services to serve the limited
area as follows:
(i) Rural development consisting of the infill, development, or
redevelopment of existing commercial, industrial, residential, or
mixed-use areas, whether characterized as shoreline development,
villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or crossroads developments.
(A) A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or mixed-use
area shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this
subsection, but shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and
(iii) of this subsection.
(B) Any development or redevelopment other than an industrial area
or an industrial use within a mixed-use area or an industrial area
under this subsection (5)(d)(i) must be principally designed to serve
the existing and projected rural population.
(C) Any development or redevelopment in terms of building size,
scale, use, or intensity shall be consistent with the character of the
existing areas. Development and redevelopment may include changes in
use from vacant land or a previously existing use so long as the new
use conforms to the requirements of this subsection (5);
(ii) The intensification of development on lots containing, or new
development of, small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including
commercial facilities to serve those recreational or tourist uses, that
rely on a rural location and setting, but that do not include new
residential development. A small-scale recreation or tourist use is
not required to be principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population. Public services and public facilities
shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or tourist
use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density
sprawl;
(iii) The intensification of development on lots containing
isolated nonresidential uses or new development of isolated cottage
industries and isolated small-scale businesses that are not principally
designed to serve the existing and projected rural population and
nonresidential uses, but do provide job opportunities for rural
residents. Rural counties may allow the expansion of small-scale
businesses as long as those small-scale businesses conform with the
rural character of the area as defined by the local government
according to RCW 36.70A.030(((14))) (15). Rural counties may also
allow new small-scale businesses to utilize a site previously occupied
by an existing business as long as the new small-scale business
conforms to the rural character of the area as defined by the local
government according to RCW 36.70A.030(((14))) (15). Public services
and public facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the
isolated nonresidential use and shall be provided in a manner that does
not permit low-density sprawl;
(iv) A county shall adopt measures to minimize and contain the
existing areas or uses of more intensive rural development, as
appropriate, authorized under this subsection. Lands included in such
existing areas or uses shall not extend beyond the logical outer
boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing a new pattern of
low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary
delineated predominately by the built environment, but that may also
include undeveloped lands if limited as provided in this subsection.
The county shall establish the logical outer boundary of an area of
more intensive rural development. In establishing the logical outer
boundary the county shall address (A) the need to preserve the
character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities, (B)
physical boundaries such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and
land forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular
boundaries, and (D) the ability to provide public facilities and public
services in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;
(v) For purposes of (d) of this subsection, an existing area or
existing use is one that was in existence:
(A) On July 1, 1990, in a county that was initially required to
plan under all of the provisions of this chapter;
(B) On the date the county adopted a resolution under RCW
36.70A.040(2), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions
of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.040(2); or
(C) On the date the office of financial management certifies the
county's population as provided in RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that
is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040(5).
(e) Exception. This subsection shall not be interpreted to permit
in the rural area a major industrial development or a master planned
resort unless otherwise specifically permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and
36.70A.365.
(6) A transportation element that implements, and is consistent
with, the land use element.
(a) The transportation element shall include the following
subelements:
(i) Land use assumptions used in estimating travel;
(ii) Estimated traffic impacts to state-owned transportation
facilities resulting from land use assumptions to assist the department
of transportation in monitoring the performance of state facilities, to
plan improvements for the facilities, and to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned transportation facilities;
(iii) Facilities and services needs, including:
(A) An inventory of air, water, and ground transportation
facilities and services, including transit alignments and general
aviation airport facilities, to define existing capital facilities and
travel levels as a basis for future planning. This inventory must
include state-owned transportation facilities within the city or
county's jurisdictional boundaries;
(B) Level of service standards for all locally owned arterials and
transit routes to serve as a gauge to judge performance of the system.
These standards should be regionally coordinated;
(C) For state-owned transportation facilities, level of service
standards for highways, as prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW,
to gauge the performance of the system. The purposes of reflecting
level of service standards for state highways in the local
comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the system, to
evaluate improvement strategies, and to facilitate coordination between
the county's or city's six-year street, road, or transit program and
the department of transportation's six-year investment program. The
concurrency requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply to
transportation facilities and services of statewide significance except
for counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the
mainland are state highways or ferry routes. In these island counties,
state highways and ferry route capacity must be a factor in meeting the
concurrency requirements in (b) of this subsection;
(D) Specific actions and requirements for bringing into compliance
locally owned transportation facilities or services that are below an
established level of service standard;
(E) Forecasts of traffic for at least ten years based on the
adopted land use plan to provide information on the location, timing,
and capacity needs of future growth;
(F) Identification of state and local system needs to meet current
and future demands. Identified needs on state-owned transportation
facilities must be consistent with the statewide multimodal
transportation plan required under chapter 47.06 RCW;
(iv) Finance, including:
(A) An analysis of funding capability to judge needs against
probable funding resources;
(B) A multiyear financing plan based on the needs identified in the
comprehensive plan, the appropriate parts of which shall serve as the
basis for the six-year street, road, or transit program required by RCW
35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795
for public transportation systems. The multiyear financing plan should
be coordinated with the ((six-year)) ten-year improvement program
developed by the department of transportation as required by RCW
47.05.030;
(C) If probable funding falls short of meeting identified needs, a
discussion of how additional funding will be raised, or how land use
assumptions will be reassessed to ensure that level of service
standards will be met;
(v) Intergovernmental coordination efforts, including an assessment
of the impacts of the transportation plan and land use assumptions on
the transportation systems of adjacent jurisdictions;
(vi) Demand-management strategies;
(vii) Pedestrian and bicycle component to include collaborative
efforts to identify and designate planned improvements for pedestrian
and bicycle facilities and corridors that address and encourage
enhanced community access and promote healthy lifestyles.
(b) After adoption of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions
required to plan or who choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local
jurisdictions must adopt and enforce ordinances which prohibit
development approval if the development causes the level of service on
a locally owned transportation facility to decline below the standards
adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan, unless
transportation improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of
development are made concurrent with the development. These strategies
may include increased public transportation service, ride sharing
programs, demand management, and other transportation systems
management strategies. For the purposes of this subsection (6)
"concurrent with the development" shall mean that improvements or
strategies are in place at the time of development, or that a financial
commitment is in place to complete the improvements or strategies
within six years.
(c) The transportation element described in this subsection (6),
and the six-year plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW
36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation
systems, and the ten-year plans required by RCW 47.05.030 for the
state, must be consistent.
(7) An economic development element establishing local goals,
policies, objectives, and provisions for economic growth and vitality
and a high quality of life. The element shall include: (a) A summary
of the local economy such as population, employment, payroll, sectors,
businesses, sales, and other information as appropriate; (b) a summary
of the strengths and weaknesses of the local economy defined as the
commercial and industrial sectors and supporting factors such as land
use, transportation, utilities, education, work force, housing, and
natural/cultural resources; and (c) an identification of policies,
programs, and projects to foster economic growth and development and to
address future needs. A city that has chosen to be a residential
community is exempt from the economic development element requirement
of this subsection.
(8) A park and recreation element that implements, and is
consistent with, the capital facilities plan element as it relates to
park and recreation facilities. The element shall include: (a)
Estimates of park and recreation demand for at least a ten-year period;
(b) an evaluation of facilities and service needs; and (c) an
evaluation of intergovernmental coordination opportunities to provide
regional approaches for meeting park and recreational demand.
(9) It is the intent that new or amended elements required after
January 1, 2002, be adopted concurrent with the scheduled update
provided in RCW 36.70A.130. Requirements to incorporate any such new
or amended elements shall be null and void until funds sufficient to
cover applicable local government costs are appropriated and
distributed by the state at least two years before local government
must update comprehensive plans as required in RCW 36.70A.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 8 and 9 of this act may not be
construed to diminish, modify, or replace any other remedy provided
under the United States or Washington state Constitutions, or federal
or state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 2 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 64 RCW.

--- END ---