BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that research
demonstrates the critical role that registered nurses play in improving
patient safety and quality of care. Greater numbers of registered
nurses available to care for hospitalized patients are key to reducing
errors, complications, and adverse patient care events. Moreover,
higher nurse staffing levels result in improved staff safety and
satisfaction and reduced incidences of workplace injuries. In
addition, health care professional, technical, and support staff
comprise vital components of the patient care team, bringing their
particular skills and services to ensuring quality patient care.
Therefore, in order to protect patients and to support greater
retention of registered nurses, to promote evidence-based nurse
staffing, and to increase transparency of health care data and decision
making, the legislature finds that ensuring sufficient nurse staffing
to meet patient care needs is an urgent public policy priority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this section and sections 3 through 5, 7, and 8 of this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Hospital" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70.41.020,
except that "hospital" also includes the state hospitals as defined in
RCW 72.23.010.
(2) "Intensity" means the level of patient needs in terms of
nursing care as determined by a registered nurse providing direct
patient care, taking into account at least the following factors:
(a) Severity and urgency of the patient's condition;
(b) Complexity of either planning or providing, or both, the care
required by the patient;
(c) Scheduled or anticipated procedures or events, including those
that necessitate increased frequency of assessment or intervention;
(d) Age and cognitive and functional ability of the patient,
including ability to perform self-care activities;
(e) Availability of patient social supports including
institutional, family, or community support;
(f) Level of patient adherence or ability to comply with patient
care;
(g) Patient and family educational needs, including assessment of
learning capabilities of patient and family;
(h) Intactness of family unit, the availability of family to
provide either emotional support or functional support, or both, and
the ability of the family to participate in patient decision-making
processes;
(i) Communications skills of the patient; and
(j) Other needs identified by the patient and by the registered
nurse.
(3) "Nursing personnel" means registered nurses, licensed practical
nurses, and unlicensed assistive nursing personnel providing direct
patient care.
(4) "Patient assignment limits" means the maximum number of
patients that a hospital may assign to a registered nurse at any one
time.
(5) "Patient care unit" means any unit or area of the hospital that
provides patient care.
(6) "Skill mix" means the numbers and relative percentages of
registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, and unlicensed assistive
personnel among the total number nursing personnel.
(7) "Staffing committee" means the committee established by a
hospital under section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) By September 1, 2007, the secretary
shall appoint the advisory committee on nurse staffing. The advisory
committee on nurse staffing consists of fifteen members, who include:
(a) Six representatives from professional and labor organizations
representing nurses involved in direct patient care, to include at
least four registered nurses, three of whom provide direct patient
care;
(b) Two representatives of an organization representing hospitals;
(c) Two registered nurses in managerial or executive roles, who are
representatives of an organization representing nurse executives;
(d) One nursing faculty member of an academic institution preparing
registered nurses;
(e) One consumer representative;
(f) The secretary or the secretary's designee;
(g) One chief executive officer or chief operating officer of a
hospital; and
(h) One human resources director or executive of a health care
facility who is a representative of an organization representing health
care human resources executives.
(2) The advisory committee on nurse staffing shall:
(a) Recommend patient assignment limits to be adopted by the
department;
(b) Recommend quality indicators in addition to those specified in
section 5 of this act; and
(c) Make other recommendations regarding the development and
implementation of hospital staffing plans as the secretary requests.
(3) In making its recommendations, the advisory committee on nurse
staffing shall consider:
(a) Current research findings regarding patient safety, outcomes of
care, nurse staffing, and related areas;
(b) Reports and recommendations issued by authoritative national
and state bodies and agencies, including but not limited to the
institute of medicine, the joint commission on accreditation of
healthcare organizations, the national quality forum, and the agency
for healthcare research and quality;
(c) Guidelines adopted or published by national nursing
professional associations, specialty nursing organizations, and other
health professional organizations;
(d) Relevant information regarding legislation or rules on nurse
staffing considered or adopted in other states;
(e) Different levels of intensity, complexity, or need presented by
patients in different types of patient care units; and
(f) Availability of health care professional, technical, and
support staff whose skills and services are essential to delivering
quality patient care.
(4)(a) By March 1, 2008, the department shall establish patient
assignment limits to apply to all hospitals in the state, based on the
findings and recommendations of the advisory committee on nurse
staffing. These patient assignment limits represent the maximum number
of patients for which any registered nurse may be assigned at any one
time to provide care. This number includes patients for whose care the
registered nurse is responsible, but for whom aspects of care have been
delegated to other nursing personnel. In establishing patient
assignment limits, the department may establish different limits for
different types of patient care units or areas.
(b) Patient assignment limits must serve as a minimum staffing
standard. Actual staffing levels on any hospital unit during any shift
must be determined by the staffing plan developed by the hospital
staffing committee, utilizing the criteria specified in section 4 of
this act. However, compliance with these patient assignment limits
alone is not sufficient to demonstrate compliance with the requirements
for development and implementation of staffing plans under section 4 of
this act.
(c) Patient assignment limits apply:
(i) To individual registered nurse assignments, and may not be
construed as establishing average assignments for a hospital or patient
care unit; and
(ii) At all times that a registered nurse is on duty, including
times when other nurses are away from the unit, on a break, or
otherwise not providing patient care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) By January 1, 2008, each hospital shall
establish a staffing committee, at least one-half of whose members are
registered nurses currently providing direct patient care. However,
the composition of the staffing committee must be consistent with any
applicable provisions of the collective bargaining agreement, if any,
between the hospital and its nursing staff. If registered nurses are
represented by a collective bargaining representative, the committee's
direct-care registered nurse members must be selected by that
collective bargaining representative. Participation in the committee
by a hospital employee shall be considered a part of the employee's
regularly scheduled workweek.
(2)(a) By September 1, 2008, each hospital shall implement a
staffing plan that sets the minimum number and skill mix of nursing
personnel required on each shift in each unit in the hospital in which
patient care is provided. The staffing plans must be developed by the
hospital staffing committee.
(b)(i) Staffing levels set by the staffing plan may not include
patient care assignments that exceed the patient assignment limits
established under section 3(4) of this act.
(ii) Staffing plans must be based on at least the following
additional criteria for each unit:
(A) Census, including total numbers of patients on the unit on each
shift at any one time and activity such as patient discharges,
admissions, and transfers;
(B) Level of intensity of all patients and nature of the care to be
delivered on each shift;
(C) Skill mix;
(D) Level of experience and specialty certification or training of
nursing personnel providing care;
(E) The need for specialized or intensive equipment;
(F) The architecture and geography of the patient care unit,
including but not limited to placement of patient rooms, treatment
areas, nursing station, medication preparation areas, and equipment;
and
(G) Staffing guidelines adopted or published by national nursing
professional associations, specialty nursing organizations, and other
health professional organizations.
(iii) Staffing plans must at least:
(A) Include appropriate limits on the use of agency and traveling
nurses;
(B) Be consistent with the scopes of practice for registered nurses
and licensed practical nurses and the scope of legally permissible
duties of unlicensed assistive personnel;
(C) Include adequate staffing to allow for staff time off,
illnesses, meal and break time, and educational, health, and other
leaves; and
(D) Include a process for review by the staffing committee that
ensures compliance with the staffing plan, provides for the review of
incidents and staff concerns, and tracks staffing patterns, the number
of patients and the patients' conditions, and the intensity of the
patients' nursing care needs. These reviews must be performed at least
semiannually.
(c) The staffing plan must not diminish other standards contained
in law, rules, or the terms of an applicable collective bargaining
agreement, if any, between the hospital and its nursing staff, and must
be consistent with any such agreement.
(d) Each hospital shall submit the staffing plan for review by the
department on at least an annual basis.
(3) Each hospital shall assign nursing personnel to each patient
care unit in accordance with its staffing plan. Shift-to-shift
adjustments in staffing levels required by the plan may be made only if
based upon assessment by a registered nurse providing direct patient
care on the patient care unit, utilizing procedures specified by the
staffing committee.
(4) Each hospital shall post, in a public area on each patient care
unit, the staffing plan for that shift on that unit as required by this
section along with a listing of actual nurse staffing levels, which
shall be updated at least once every eight hours. The staffing plan
and current staffing levels must also be made available to patients and
visitors upon request.
(5) A hospital may not retaliate against or engage in any form of
intimidation of:
(a) An employee for performing any duties or responsibilities in
connection with participation on the staffing committee; or
(b) An employee, patient, or other individual who notifies the
staffing committee, the hospital administration, or the department that
any schedule or nursing personnel assignment fails to comply with the
posted staffing plan, or that the hospital has failed to develop or
implement a staffing plan consistent with sections 2 through 5, 7, and
8 of this act and RCW 70.56.020(4)(a).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Semiannually, hospitals shall collect
and submit to the department information regarding nurse staffing. In
addition to the skill mix of registered nurses, licensed practical
nurses, unlicensed assistive nursing personnel, nurses supplied by
temporary staffing agencies including traveling nurses, and nursing
care hours per patient per day, such information must also include:
(a) Death among surgical inpatients with treatable serious
complications (failure to rescue);
(b) Prevalence of urinary tract infections;
(c) Hospital-acquired pneumonia;
(d) Incidence of patient falls; and
(e) Other measures to be established by the department.
(2) In adopting rules under this section, the department shall
determine effective means for making the information identified in
subsection (1) of this section readily available to the public,
including but not limited to posting it in public areas of the hospital
and making it available through the internet.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.56.020 and 2006 c 8 s 106 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature intends to establish an adverse health events
and incident reporting system that is designed to facilitate quality
improvement in the health care system, improve patient safety and
decrease medical errors in a nonpunitive manner. The reporting system
shall not be designed to punish errors by health care practitioners or
health care facility employees.
(2) Each medical facility shall notify the department of health
regarding the occurrence of any adverse event and file a subsequent
report as provided in this section. Notification must be submitted to
the department within forty-eight hours of confirmation by the medical
facility that an adverse event has occurred. A subsequent report must
be submitted to the department within forty-five days after
confirmation by the medical facility that an adverse event has
occurred. The notification and report shall be submitted to the
department using the internet-based system established under RCW
70.56.040(2).
(3) The notification and report shall be filed in a format
specified by the department after consultation with medical facilities
and the independent entity. The format shall identify the facility,
but shall not include any identifying information for any of the health
care professionals, facility employees, or patients involved. This
provision does not modify the duty of a hospital to make a report to
the department of health or a disciplinary authority if a licensed
practitioner has committed unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW
18.130.180.
(4)(a) As part of the report filed under this section, the medical
facility must:
(i) Include the following information:
(A) The number of patients, registered nurses, licensed practical
nurses, and unlicensed assistive personnel present in the relevant
patient care unit at the time that the reported adverse event occurred;
(B) The number of nursing personnel present at the time of the
adverse event who have been supplied by temporary staffing agencies,
including traveling nurses;
(C) The number of nursing personnel, if any, on the patient care
unit working beyond their regularly scheduled number of hours or shifts
at the time of the event and the number of consecutive hours worked by
each such nursing personnel at the time of the adverse event; and
(ii) Conduct a root cause analysis of the event, describe the
corrective action plan that will be implemented consistent with the
findings of the analysis, or provide an explanation of any reasons for
not taking corrective action.
(b) The department shall adopt rules, in consultation with medical
facilities and the independent entity, related to the form and content
of the root cause analysis and corrective action plan. In developing
the rules, consideration shall be given to existing standards for root
cause analysis or corrective action plans adopted by the joint
commission on accreditation of health facilities and other national or
governmental entities.
(c) For purposes of this subsection (4), "nursing personnel" and
"patient care unit" have the same meaning as defined in section 2 of
this act.
(5) If, in the course of investigating a complaint received from an
employee of a medical facility, the department determines that the
facility has not reported an adverse event or undertaken efforts to
investigate the occurrence of an adverse event, the department shall
direct the facility to report or to undertake an investigation of the
event.
(6) The protections of RCW 43.70.075 apply to reports of adverse
events that are submitted in good faith by employees of medical
facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The department shall investigate
complaints of violations of sections 2 through 5 of this act. For a
violation, the department may take either or both of the following
actions:
(a) Suspend or revoke the license of a hospital; and/or
(b) Impose a civil penalty in the amount of two thousand five
hundred dollars in the event of a hospital's first violation of these
provisions, a civil penalty in the amount of five thousand dollars in
the event of a second violation, and a civil penalty in the amount of
ten thousand dollars for the third and subsequent violations.
(2) The department shall maintain for public inspection records of
any civil penalties, administrative actions, or license suspensions or
revocations imposed on hospitals under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department shall adopt rules as
necessary to implement sections 2 through 5, 7, and 8 of this act and
RCW 70.56.020(4)(a).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington state patient safety act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 2 through 5, 7, and 8 of this act
are each added to chapter 70.41 RCW.

--- END ---