BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds this act necessary to
restore and make clear its intent that a willful violation of a
no-contact provision of a court order is a criminal offense and shall
be enforced accordingly to preserve the integrity and intent of the
domestic violence act. This act is not intended to broaden the scope
of law enforcement power or effectuate any substantive change to any
criminal provision in the Revised Code of Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.50.110 and 2006 c 138 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever an order is granted under this chapter, chapter
7.90, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or there is a valid
foreign protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, and the
respondent or person to be restrained knows of the order, a violation
of any of the following provisions of the order is a gross misdemeanor,
except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section:
(i) The restraint provisions((, or of)) prohibiting contact with a
protected party;
(ii) A provision excluding the person from a residence, workplace,
school, or day care((, or of));
(iii) A provision prohibiting a person from knowingly coming
within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a
location((,)); or ((of))
(iv) A provision of a foreign protection order specifically
indicating that a violation will be a crime((, for which an arrest is
required under RCW 10.31.100(2) (a) or (b), is a gross misdemeanor
except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section)).
(b) Upon conviction, and in addition to any other penalties
provided by law, the court may require that the respondent submit to
electronic monitoring. The court shall specify who shall provide the
electronic monitoring services, and the terms under which the
monitoring shall be performed. The order also may include a
requirement that the respondent pay the costs of the monitoring. The
court shall consider the ability of the convicted person to pay for
electronic monitoring.
(2) A peace officer shall arrest without a warrant and take into
custody a person whom the peace officer has probable cause to believe
has violated an order issued under this chapter, chapter 7.90, 10.99,
26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or a valid foreign protection order
as defined in RCW 26.52.020, that restrains the person or excludes the
person from a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibits
the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within,
a specified distance of a location, if the person restrained knows of
the order. Presence of the order in the law enforcement computer-based
criminal intelligence information system is not the only means of
establishing knowledge of the order.
(3) A violation of an order issued under this chapter, chapter
7.90, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or of a valid foreign
protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, shall also constitute
contempt of court, and is subject to the penalties prescribed by law.
(4) Any assault that is a violation of an order issued under this
chapter, chapter 7.90, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or of
a valid foreign protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, and that
does not amount to assault in the first or second degree under RCW
9A.36.011 or 9A.36.021 is a class C felony, and any conduct in
violation of such an order that is reckless and creates a substantial
risk of death or serious physical injury to another person is a class
C felony.
(5) A violation of a court order issued under this chapter, chapter
7.90, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or of a valid foreign
protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, is a class C felony if
the offender has at least two previous convictions for violating the
provisions of an order issued under this chapter, chapter 7.90, 10.99,
26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or a valid foreign protection order
as defined in RCW 26.52.020. The previous convictions may involve the
same victim or other victims specifically protected by the orders the
offender violated.
(6) Upon the filing of an affidavit by the petitioner or any peace
officer alleging that the respondent has violated an order granted
under this chapter, chapter 7.90, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34
RCW, or a valid foreign protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020,
the court may issue an order to the respondent, requiring the
respondent to appear and show cause within fourteen days why the
respondent should not be found in contempt of court and punished
accordingly. The hearing may be held in the court of any county or
municipality in which the petitioner or respondent temporarily or
permanently resides at the time of the alleged violation.

--- END ---