BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.24.480 and 2002 c 173 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A licensed service provider or regional support network, acting
in the course of the provider's or network's duties under this chapter,
is not liable for civil damages resulting from the injury or death of
another caused by a ((dangerous mentally ill offender who is a)) client
of ((the provider or network)) a reintegration program for offenders
with mental disorders, unless the act or omission of the provider or
network constitutes:
(a) Gross negligence;
(b) Willful or wanton misconduct; or
(c) A breach of the duty to warn of and protect from a client's
threatened violent behavior if the client has communicated a serious
threat of physical violence against a reasonably ascertainable victim
or victims.
(2) In addition to any other requirements to report violations, the
licensed service provider and regional support network shall report an
offender's expressions of intent to harm or other predatory behavior,
regardless of whether there is an ascertainable victim, in progress
reports and other established processes that enable courts and
supervising entities to assess and address the progress and
appropriateness of treatment.
(3) A licensed service provider's or regional support network's
mere act of ((treating a dangerous mentally ill offender)) providing
reintegration services for offenders with mental disorders is not
negligence. Nothing in this subsection alters the licensed service
provider's or regional support network's normal duty of care with
regard to the client.
(4) The limited liability provided by this section applies only to
the conduct of licensed service providers and regional support networks
and does not apply to conduct of the state.
(5) For purposes of this section, "((dangerous mentally ill
offender)) client of a reintegration program for offenders with mental
disorders" means a person who has been identified under RCW 72.09.370
as an offender who: (a) Is reasonably believed to be dangerous to
himself or herself or others; and (b) has a mental disorder.

Sec. 2 RCW 72.09.370 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 362 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall identify offenders in confinement or
partial confinement who: (a) Are reasonably believed to be dangerous
to themselves or others; and (b) have a mental disorder. In
determining an offender's dangerousness, the secretary shall consider
behavior known to the department and factors, based on research, that
are linked to an increased risk for dangerousness of ((mentally ill))
offenders who are mentally ill and shall include consideration of an
offender's chemical dependency or abuse.
(2) Prior to release of an offender identified under this section,
a team consisting of representatives of the department of corrections,
the division of mental health, and, as necessary, the indeterminate
sentence review board, other divisions or administrations within the
department of social and health services, specifically including the
division of alcohol and substance abuse and the division of
developmental disabilities, the appropriate regional support network,
and the providers, as appropriate, shall develop a plan, as determined
necessary by the team, for delivery of treatment and support services
to the offender upon release. The team may include a school district
representative for offenders under the age of twenty-one. The team
shall consult with the offender's counsel, if any, and, as appropriate,
the offender's family and community. The team shall notify the crime
victim/witness program, which shall provide notice to all people
registered to receive notice under RCW 9.94A.612 of the proposed
release plan developed by the team. Victims, witnesses, and other
interested people notified by the department may provide information
and comments to the department on potential safety risk to specific
individuals or classes of individuals posed by the specific offender.
The team may recommend: (a) That the offender be evaluated by the
((county)) designated mental health professional, as defined in chapter
71.05 RCW; (b) department-supervised community treatment; or (c)
voluntary community mental health or chemical dependency or abuse
treatment.
(3) Prior to release of an offender identified under this section,
the team shall determine whether or not an evaluation by a ((county))
designated mental health professional is needed. If an evaluation is
recommended, the supporting documentation shall be immediately
forwarded to the appropriate ((county)) designated mental health
professional. The supporting documentation shall include the
offender's criminal history, history of judicially required or
administratively ordered involuntary antipsychotic medication while in
confinement, and any known history of involuntary civil commitment.
(4) If an evaluation by a ((county)) designated mental health
professional is recommended by the team, such evaluation shall occur
not more than ten days, nor less than five days, prior to release.
(5) A second evaluation by a ((county)) designated mental health
professional shall occur on the day of release if requested by the
team, based upon new information or a change in the offender's mental
condition, and the initial evaluation did not result in an emergency
detention or a summons under chapter 71.05 RCW.
(6) If the ((county)) designated mental health professional
determines an emergency detention under chapter 71.05 RCW is necessary,
the department shall release the offender only to a state hospital or
to a consenting evaluation and treatment facility. The department
shall arrange transportation of the offender to the hospital or
facility.
(7) If the ((county)) designated mental health professional
believes that a less restrictive alternative treatment is appropriate,
((he or she shall seek a summons, pursuant to the provisions of chapter
71.05 RCW, to require the offender to appear at an evaluation and
treatment facility. If a summons is issued)) the designated mental
health professional shall follow the procedure outlined in the
nonemergent provisions of chapter 71.05 RCW, and the offender shall
remain within the corrections facility until completion of his or her
term of confinement and be transported, by corrections personnel on the
day of completion, directly to the identified evaluation and treatment
facility for entry of the less restrictive order and release to the
community.
(8) The secretary shall adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---