BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09A.005 and 1993 c 10 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) Simplification in the administration of payment of health
benefits is important for the state, providers, and ((private)) health
insurers;
(2) The state, providers, and ((private)) health insurers should
take advantage of all opportunities to streamline operations through
automation and the use of common computer standards; ((and))
(3) It is in the best interests of the state, providers, and
((private)) health insurers to identify all third parties that are
obligated to cover the cost of health care coverage of joint
beneficiaries; and
(4) Health insurers, including private insurers, group health
plans, service benefit plans, managed care organizations, pharmacy
benefit managers, or other parties that are, by statute, contract, or
agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care
item or service, as a condition of doing business in Washington, must
increase their effort to share information with the department and
accept the department's timely claims consistent with 42 U.S.C.
1396a(a)(25).
Therefore, the legislature declares that to improve the
coordination of benefits between the department of social and health
services and ((private)) health insurers to ensure that medical
insurance benefits are properly utilized, a transfer of ((uniform
information from the department of social and health services to
Washington state private insurers should be instituted)) information
between the department of social and health services and health
insurers should be instituted, and the process for submitting requests
for information and claims should be simplified.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.09A.010 and 1993 c 10 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Health insurance coverage" includes any coverage under which
medical services are provided by ((an employer or a union whether that
coverage is provided through a self-insurance program, under the
employee retirement income security act of 1974, a commercial insurer
pursuant to chapters 48.20 and 48.21 RCW, a health care service
contractor pursuant to chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health maintenance
organization pursuant to chapter 48.46 RCW,)) health insurers and the
medical assistance administration under chapter 74.09 RCW((, and the
state through this chapter)).
(2) "Health insurer" means a commercial insurance company providing
disability insurance under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care
service contractor providing health care coverage under chapter 48.44
RCW, a health maintenance organization providing comprehensive health
care services under chapter 48.46 RCW, and shall also include any
employer or union that is providing health insurance coverage on a
self-insured basis, as well as any private insurers, group health
plans, service benefit plans, managed care organizations, pharmacy
benefit managers, or other parties that are, by statute, contract, or
agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care
item or service.
(3) "Medical assistance administration" means the division within
the department of social and health services authorized under chapter
74.09 RCW.
(4) "Computerized" means on-line or batch processing with
standardized format via magnetic tape output.
(5) (("Insurance coverage" means subscriber and beneficiary
eligibility and benefit coverage data.
(6))) "Joint beneficiary" is ((a resident of Washington state)) an
individual who has ((private)) health insurance coverage and is a
recipient of public assistance benefits under chapter 74.09 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.09A.020 and 2005 c 274 s 350 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The medical assistance administration shall provide routine and
periodic computerized information to ((private)) health insurers
regarding client eligibility and coverage information. ((Private))
Health insurers shall use this information to identify joint
beneficiaries. Identification of joint beneficiaries shall be
transmitted to the medical assistance administration. The medical
assistance administration shall use this information to improve
accuracy and currency of health insurance coverage and promote improved
coordination of benefits.
(2) To the maximum extent possible, necessary data elements and a
compatible data base shall be developed by affected health insurers and
the medical assistance administration. The medical assistance
administration shall establish a representative group of insurers and
state agency representatives to develop necessary technical and file
specifications to promote a standardized data base. The data base
shall include elements essential to the medical assistance
administration and its population's insurance coverage information.
(3) If the state and ((private)) health insurers enter into other
agreements regarding the use of common computer standards, the data
base identified in this section shall be replaced by the new common
computer standards.
(4) The information provided will be of sufficient detail to
promote reliable and accurate benefit coordination and identification
of individuals who are also eligible for medical assistance
administration programs.
(5) The frequency of updates will be mutually agreed to by each
health insurer and the medical assistance administration based on
frequency of change and operational limitations. In no event shall the
computerized data be provided less than semiannually.
(6) The health insurers and the medical assistance administration
shall safeguard and properly use the information to protect records as
provided by law, including but not limited to chapters 42.48, 74.09,
74.04, 70.02, and 42.56 RCW, and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a and 42 C.F.R.
Sec. 43 et seq. The purpose of this exchange of information is to
improve coordination and administration of benefits and ensure that
medical insurance benefits are properly utilized.
(7) The medical assistance administration shall target
implementation of this ((chapter)) section to those ((private)) health
insurers with the highest probability of joint beneficiaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.09A RCW
to read as follows:
Health insurers, as a condition of doing business in Washington,
must:
(1) Provide, with respect to individuals who are eligible for, or
are provided, medical assistance under chapter 74.09 RCW, upon the
request of the medical assistance administration, information to
determine during what period the individual or their spouses or their
dependants may be, or may have been, covered by a health insurer and
the nature of coverage that is or was provided by the health insurer,
including the name, address, and identifying number of the plan, in a
manner prescribed by the medical assistance administration;
(2) Accept the medical assistance administration's right to
recovery and the assignment to the medical assistance administration of
any right of an individual or other entity to payment from the party
for an item or service for which payment has been made under chapter
74.09 RCW;
(3) Respond to any inquiry by the medical assistance administration
regarding a claim for payment for any health care item or service that
is submitted not later than three years after the date of the provision
of such health care item or service;
(4) Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the medical assistance
administration on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the
type or format of the claim form, or a failure to present proper
documentation at the point-of-sale that is the basis of the claim, if:
(a) The claim is submitted by the medical assistance administration
within the three-year period beginning on the date the item or service
was furnished; and
(b) Any action by the medical assistance administration to enforce
its rights with respect to such claim is commenced within six years of
the medical assistance administration's submission of such claim; and
(5) Agree that the prevailing party in any legal action to enforce
these sections receives attorneys' fees as well as related collection
fees and costs incurred in the enforcement of these sections.

--- END ---