BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.32.050 and 1963 c 4 s 36.32.050 are each amended to
read as follows:
County commissioners shall be elected by:
(1) The qualified voters of the county ((and)); or
(2) The qualified voters of the commissioner district, pursuant to
section 2 of this act.
The person receiving the highest number of votes for the office of
commissioner for the district in which he or she resides shall be
declared duly elected from that district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The board of commissioners of any noncharter county may
cause a ballot proposition to be submitted at a general election to the
voters of the county authorizing the board of commissioners to be
elected by district.
(b) As an alternative procedure, a ballot proposition may be
submitted to the voters of a noncharter county authorizing the board of
commissioners to be elected by district, upon petition of the county
voters equal to at least ten percent of the voters voting at the last
county general election. At least twenty percent of the signatures on
the petition must come from each of the existing commissioner
districts.
Any petition requesting that such an election be held must be
submitted to the county auditor for verification of the signatures on
the petition. Within thirty days after the submission of the petition,
the auditor shall determine if the petition contains the requisite
number of valid signatures. The auditor shall certify whether or not
the petition has been signed by the requisite number of county voters
and forward the petition to the board of county commissioners. If the
petition has been signed by the requisite number of county voters, the
board of county commissioners shall submit the proposition to the
voters for their approval or rejection at the next general election
held at least sixty days after the proposition has been certified by
the auditor.
(2) The board of commissioners of a county, or the voters of a
county, in which the board of county commissioners is elected by
commissioner district under this section, may cause a ballot
proposition to be submitted to the voters authorizing the board of
commissioners to be elected by the qualified voters of the county. The
ballot proposition must be submitted in the same manner as ballot
propositions submitted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) This section applies only to a noncharter county with a
population greater than three hundred thousand that is located west of
the Cascade mountains.

--- END ---