BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Beginning July 1, 2007, the state parks
and recreation commission and the department of fish and wildlife shall
establish a pilot program to evaluate the impacts of small scale
mineral prospecting on ocean beaches. The pilot program must be
conducted from July 1, 2007, through July 1, 2009.
(2) The state parks and recreation commission, in consultation with
the department of fish and wildlife, shall establish at least six
demonstration areas in appropriate beach areas in the seashore
conservation area, which was established for recreational use and
enjoyment of the public by RCW 79A.05.605. The demonstration areas
must be located between the southern border of Cape Disappointment
state park and the southern border of the Quinault Indian reservation,
and must allow small scale mineral prospecting for purposes of the
pilot program. Each demonstration area must be:
(a) Located in separate areas along the coast that are not
geographically close together;
(b) Located in an area suitable for small scale prospecting as
identified by persons interested in small scale mining and prospecting;
and
(c) Located in areas having minimal potential for damage to the
beach ecology and the environment.
(3) The department of fish and wildlife shall use existing
authority under chapter 77.55 RCW to issue hydraulic permits for small
scale prospecting within the demonstration areas established under
subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The department of fish and wildlife shall monitor the impacts
of the small scale prospecting activities on the beach ecology
including, but not limited to, habitat, birds, shellfish, and other
beach marine life.
(5) By October 1, 2009, the department of fish and wildlife shall
report its findings and recommendations regarding the impacts of small
scale prospecting on the beach ecology to the state parks and
recreation commission. The department shall consider public input
prior to finalizing their findings and recommendations.
(6) The state parks and recreation commission and the department of
fish and wildlife shall report their findings and recommendations on
the impacts of small scale prospecting on ocean beaches to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2009.
(7) This section expires December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---