BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.56.200 and 2002 c 85 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of robbery in the first degree if:
(a) In the commission of a robbery or of immediate flight
therefrom, he or she:
(i) Is armed with a deadly weapon; or
(ii) Displays what appears to be a firearm or other deadly weapon;
or
(iii) Inflicts bodily injury; or
(b) He or she commits a robbery within and against a financial
institution as defined in RCW 7.88.010 or 35.38.060. Evidence showing
that the establishment robbed was a financial institution is not
required when "bank," "savings and loan," "trust," "payday," or "credit
union" appears in the name of the establishment.
(2) Robbery in the first degree is a class A felony.

--- END ---