BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.95.020 and 2003 c 53 s 96 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person is guilty of aggravated first degree murder, a class A
felony, if he or she commits first degree murder as defined by RCW
9A.32.030(1)(a), as now or hereafter amended, and one or more of the
following aggravating circumstances exist:
(1) The victim was a law enforcement officer, corrections officer,
or fire fighter who was performing his or her official duties at the
time of the act resulting in death and the victim was known or
reasonably should have been known by the person to be such at the time
of the killing;
(2) At the time of the act resulting in the death, the person was
serving a term of imprisonment, had escaped, or was on authorized or
unauthorized leave in or from a state facility or program for the
incarceration or treatment of persons adjudicated guilty of crimes;
(3) At the time of the act resulting in death, the person was in
custody in a county or county-city jail as a consequence of having been
adjudicated guilty of a felony;
(4) The person committed the murder pursuant to an agreement that
he or she would receive money or any other thing of value for
committing the murder;
(5) The person solicited another person to commit the murder and
had paid or had agreed to pay money or any other thing of value for
committing the murder;
(6) The person committed the murder to obtain or maintain his or
her membership or to advance his or her position in the hierarchy of an
organization, association, or identifiable group;
(7) The murder was committed during the course of or as a result of
a shooting where the discharge of the firearm, as defined in RCW
9.41.010, is either from a motor vehicle or from the immediate area of
a motor vehicle that was used to transport the shooter or the firearm,
or both, to the scene of the discharge;
(8) The victim was:
(a) A judge; juror or former juror; prospective, current, or former
witness in an adjudicative proceeding; prosecuting attorney; deputy
prosecuting attorney; defense attorney; a member of the indeterminate
sentence review board; or a probation or parole officer; and
(b) The murder was related to the exercise of official duties
performed or to be performed by the victim;
(9) The person committed the murder to conceal the commission of a
crime or to protect or conceal the identity of any person committing a
crime, including, but specifically not limited to, any attempt to avoid
prosecution as a persistent offender as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(10) There was more than one victim and the murders were part of a
common scheme or plan or the result of a single act of the person;
(11) The murder was committed in the course of, in furtherance of,
or in immediate flight from one of the following crimes:
(a) Robbery in the first or second degree;
(b) Rape in the first or second degree;
(c) Burglary in the first or second degree or residential burglary;
(d) Kidnapping in the first degree; or
(e) Arson in the first degree;
(12) The victim was regularly employed or self-employed as a
newsreporter and the murder was committed to obstruct or hinder the
investigative, research, or reporting activities of the victim;
(13) At the time the person committed the murder, there existed a
court order, issued in this or any other state, which prohibited the
person from either contacting the victim, molesting the victim, or
disturbing the peace of the victim, and the person had knowledge of the
existence of that order;
(14) At the time the person committed the murder, the person and
the victim were "family or household members" as that term is defined
in RCW 10.99.020(((1))) (3), and the person had previously engaged in
a pattern or practice of three or more of the following crimes
committed upon the victim within a five-year period, regardless of
whether a conviction resulted:
(a) Harassment as defined in RCW 9A.46.020; or
(b) Any criminal assault;
(15) The victim was eight years of age or younger and the person
who committed the murder was twenty-one years of age or older at the
time of the murder.

--- END ---