BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.38.030 and 2006 c 62 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A claimant may defer payment of special assessments and/or real
property taxes on up to eighty percent of the amount of the claimant's
equity value in the claimant's residence if the following conditions
are met:
(1) The claimant must meet all requirements for an exemption for
the residence under RCW 84.36.381, other than the age and income limits
under RCW 84.36.381.
(2) The claimant must be sixty years of age or older on December
31st of the year in which the deferral claim is filed, or must have
been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by
reason of physical disability: PROVIDED, That any surviving spouse of
a person who was receiving a deferral at the time of the person's death
shall qualify if the surviving spouse is fifty-seven years of age or
older and otherwise meets the requirements of this section.
(3) ((The claimant must have a combined disposable income, as
defined in RCW 84.36.383, of forty thousand dollars or less.
(4))) The claimant must have owned, at the time of filing, the
residence on which the special assessment and/or real property taxes
have been imposed. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned
by a marital community or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to be
owned by each spouse or cotenant. A claimant who has only a share
ownership in cooperative housing, a life estate, a lease for life, or
a revocable trust does not satisfy the ownership requirement.
(((5))) (4) The claimant must have and keep in force fire and
casualty insurance in sufficient amount to protect the interest of the
state in the claimant's equity value: PROVIDED, That if the claimant
fails to keep fire and casualty insurance in force to the extent of the
state's interest in the claimant's equity value, the amount deferred
shall not exceed one hundred percent of the claimant's equity value in
the land or lot only.
(((6))) (5) In the case of special assessment deferral, the
claimant must have opted for payment of such special assessments on the
installment method if such method was available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2008 and thereafter.

--- END ---