BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.41.030 and 1996 c 254 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county assessor shall maintain an active and systematic
program of revaluation on a continuous basis, and shall establish a
revaluation schedule which will result in revaluation of all taxable
real property within the county at least once each four years and
physical inspection of all taxable real property within the county at
least once each six years. Each county assessor may disregard any
program of revaluation, if requested by a property owner, and change,
as appropriate, the valuation of real property upon the receipt of a
notice of decision received under RCW 36.70B.130((, 90.60.160,)) or
chapter 35.22, 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW pertaining to the value of
the real property.
(2) Not later than January 1, 2010, all taxable real property
within a county shall be revalued annually and all taxable real
property within a county shall be physically inspected at least once
each six years. The department of revenue shall provide the necessary
guidance and assistance to those counties that are not on an annual
revaluation cycle so that they may convert to an annual revaluation
cycle including, but not limited to, appropriate data collection
methods and coding, neighborhood and market delineation, statistical
analysis, valuation guidelines, and training.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.41.041 and 2001 c 187 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each county assessor shall cause taxable real property to be
physically inspected and valued ((at least once every six years)) in
accordance with RCW 84.41.030, and in accordance with a plan filed with
and approved by the department of revenue. Such revaluation plan shall
provide that a reasonable portion of all taxable real property within
a county shall be revalued and these newly-determined values placed on
the assessment rolls each year. Until January 1, 2010, the department
may approve a plan that provides that all property in the county be
revalued every two years. If the revaluation plan provides for
physical inspection at least once each four years, during the intervals
between each physical inspection of real property, the valuation of
such property may be adjusted to its current true and fair value, such
adjustments to be based upon appropriate statistical data. If the
revaluation plan provides for physical inspection less frequently than
once each four years, during the intervals between each physical
inspection of real property, the valuation of such property shall be
adjusted to its current true and fair value, such adjustments to be
made once each year and to be based upon appropriate statistical data.
The assessor may require property owners to submit pertinent data
respecting taxable property in their control including data respecting
any sale or purchase of said property within the past five years, the
cost and characteristics of any improvement on the property and other
facts necessary for appraisal of the property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of five hundred eight thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the
department of revenue for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of nine million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the department of revenue to
administer a grant program for counties converting to an annual
revaluation system for property tax valuation. The department shall
award the grants to assist in the development and implementation of an
annual revaluation system. The grants may be used for the purchase of
computer hardware or software, or to repair or upgrade existing
computer hardware or software, and for the necessary training needed
for the conversion. No county is eligible for grants under this
section totaling more than one million dollars.

--- END ---