BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.525 and 2006 c 128 s 6 and 2006 c 73 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The offender score is measured on the horizontal axis of the
sentencing grid. The offender score rules are as follows:
The offender score is the sum of points accrued under this section
rounded down to the nearest whole number.
(1) A prior conviction is a conviction which exists before the date
of sentencing for the offense for which the offender score is being
computed. Convictions entered or sentenced on the same date as the
conviction for which the offender score is being computed shall be
deemed "other current offenses" within the meaning of RCW 9.94A.589.
(2)(a) Class A and sex prior felony convictions shall always be
included in the offender score.
(b) Class B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall
not be included in the offender score, if since the last date of
release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment)
pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and
sentence, the offender had spent ten consecutive years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(c) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, class C prior
felony convictions other than sex offenses shall not be included in the
offender score if, since the last date of release from confinement
(including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had
spent five consecutive years in the community without committing any
crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(d) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, serious traffic
convictions shall not be included in the offender score if, since the
last date of release from confinement (including full-time residential
treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of
judgment and sentence, the offender spent five years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
(e) If the present conviction is felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)) or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)), prior convictions
of felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, felony physical control of a vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, and serious traffic
offenses shall be included in the offender score if: (i) The prior
convictions were committed within five years since the last date of
release from confinement (including full-time residential treatment) or
entry of judgment and sentence; or (ii) the prior convictions would be
considered "prior offenses within ten years" as defined in RCW
46.61.5055.
(f) This subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior
convictions.
(3) Out-of-state convictions for offenses shall be classified
according to the comparable offense definitions and sentences provided
by Washington law. Federal convictions for offenses shall be
classified according to the comparable offense definitions and
sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no clearly
comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is
usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the
offense shall be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a
felony under the relevant federal statute.
(4) Score prior convictions for felony anticipatory offenses
(attempts, criminal solicitations, and criminal conspiracies) the same
as if they were convictions for completed offenses.
(5)(a) In the case of multiple prior convictions, for the purpose
of computing the offender score, count all convictions separately,
except:
(i) Prior offenses which were found, under RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), to
encompass the same criminal conduct, shall be counted as one offense,
the offense that yields the highest offender score. The current
sentencing court shall determine with respect to other prior adult
offenses for which sentences were served concurrently or prior juvenile
offenses for which sentences were served consecutively, whether those
offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate offenses using
the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW 9.94A.589(1)(a), and
if the court finds that they shall be counted as one offense, then the
offense that yields the highest offender score shall be used. The
current sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses
were not the same criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate
dates, or in separate counties or jurisdictions, or in separate
complaints, indictments, or informations;
(ii) In the case of multiple prior convictions for offenses
committed before July 1, 1986, for the purpose of computing the
offender score, count all adult convictions served concurrently as one
offense, and count all juvenile convictions entered on the same date as
one offense. Use the conviction for the offense that yields the
highest offender score.
(b) As used in this subsection (5), "served concurrently" means
that: (i) The latter sentence was imposed with specific reference to
the former; (ii) the concurrent relationship of the sentences was
judicially imposed; and (iii) the concurrent timing of the sentences
was not the result of a probation or parole revocation on the former
offense.
(6) If the present conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses
of criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior
conviction as if the present conviction were for a completed offense.
When these convictions are used as criminal history, score them the
same as a completed crime.
(7) If the present conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not
covered by subsection (11) ((or)), (12), or (13) of this section, count
one point for each adult prior felony conviction and one point for each
juvenile prior violent felony conviction and 1/2 point for each
juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.
(8) If the present conviction is for a violent offense and not
covered in subsection (9), (10), (11), ((or)), (12), or (13) of this
section, count two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent
felony conviction, one point for each prior adult nonviolent felony
conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony
conviction.
(9) If the present conviction is for a serious violent offense,
count three points for prior adult and juvenile convictions for crimes
in this category, two points for each prior adult and juvenile violent
conviction (not already counted), one point for each prior adult
nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.
(10) If the present conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior
convictions as in subsection (8) of this section; however count two
points for each prior adult Burglary 2 or residential burglary
conviction, and one point for each prior juvenile Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction.
(11) If the present conviction is for a felony traffic offense
count two points for each adult or juvenile prior conviction for
Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular Assault; for each felony offense count
one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior
conviction; for each serious traffic offense, other than those used for
an enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each
adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction; count one point
for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction for
operation of a vessel while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug.
(12) If the present conviction is for homicide by watercraft or
assault by watercraft count two points for each adult or juvenile prior
conviction for homicide by watercraft or assault by watercraft; for
each felony offense count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for
each juvenile prior conviction; count one point for each adult and 1/2
point for each juvenile prior conviction for driving under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, actual physical control
of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or operation of a vessel while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug.
(13) If the present conviction is for manufacture of
methamphetamine count three points for each adult prior manufacture of
methamphetamine conviction and two points for each juvenile manufacture
of methamphetamine offense. If the present conviction is for a drug
offense and the offender has a criminal history that includes a sex
offense or serious violent offense, count three points for each adult
prior felony drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile
drug offense. All other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in
subsection (8) of this section if the current drug offense is violent,
or as in subsection (7) of this section if the current drug offense is
nonviolent.
(((13))) (14) If the present conviction is for Escape from
Community Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape convictions
in the offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one
point and juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.
(((14))) (15) If the present conviction is for Escape 1, RCW
9A.76.110, or Escape 2, RCW 9A.76.120, count adult prior convictions as
one point and juvenile prior convictions as 1/2 point.
(((15))) (16) If the present conviction is for Burglary 2 or
residential burglary, count priors as in subsection (7) of this
section; however, count two points for each adult and juvenile prior
Burglary 1 conviction, two points for each adult prior Burglary 2 or
residential burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile prior
Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.
(((16))) (17) If the present conviction is for a sex offense, count
priors as in subsections (7) through (((15))) (11) and (13) through
(16) of this section; however count three points for each adult and
juvenile prior sex offense conviction.
(((17))) (18) If the present conviction is for failure to register
as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130(10), count priors as in
subsections (7) through (((15))) (11) and (13) through (16) of this
section; however count three points for each adult and juvenile prior
sex offense conviction, excluding prior convictions for failure to
register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130(10), which shall count
as one point.
(((18))) (19) If the present conviction is for an offense committed
while the offender was under community placement, add one point.
(((19))) (20) The fact that a prior conviction was not included in
an offender's offender score or criminal history at a previous
sentencing shall have no bearing on whether it is included in the
criminal history or offender score for the current offense.
Accordingly, prior convictions that were not counted in the offender
score or included in criminal history under repealed or previous
versions of the sentencing reform act shall be included in criminal
history and shall count in the offender score if the current version of
the sentencing reform act requires including or counting those
convictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---