BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.319 and 1997 c 234 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Veterans discharged under honorable conditions (veterans) and
individuals serving on active duty in the United States armed forces
(active duty military personnel) may purchase a veterans remembrance
emblem, distinguished flying cross emblem, or campaign medal emblem.
The emblem is to be displayed on vehicle license plates in the manner
described by the department, existing vehicular licensing procedures,
and current laws.
(2) Veterans and active duty military personnel who served during
periods of war or armed conflict may purchase a remembrance emblem
depicting campaign ribbons which they were awarded.
(3) The following campaign ribbon remembrance emblems are
available:
(a) World War I victory medal;
(b) World War II Asiatic-Pacific campaign medal;
(c) World War II European-African Middle East campaign medal;
(d) World War II American campaign medal;
(e) Korean service medal;
(f) Vietnam service medal;
(g) Armed forces expeditionary medal awarded after 1958; and
(h) Southwest Asia medal.
The director may issue additional campaign ribbon emblems by rule
as authorized decorations by the United States department of defense.
(4) Veterans or active duty military personnel requesting a veteran
remembrance emblem, distinguished flying cross emblem, or campaign
medal emblem or emblems must:
(a) Pay a prescribed fee set by the department; and
(b) Show proof of eligibility through:
(i) Providing a DD-214 or discharge papers if a veteran;
(ii) Providing a copy of orders awarding a campaign ribbon or the
distinguished flying cross if an individual serving on military active
duty; or
(iii) Attesting in a notarized affidavit of their eligibility as
required under this section.
(5) Veterans or active duty military personnel who purchase a
veteran remembrance emblem or a campaign medal emblem must be the legal
or registered owner of the vehicle on which the emblem is to be
displayed.

--- END ---