BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A majority of students in Washington do not
have the opportunity to study any language other than English until
they are in middle school, or more often, in high school. Educational
systems of other nations, some of which are much less economically
developed than the United States, begin second language study in the
early elementary grades. Washington's economy is tied to world trade.
To enable Washington citizens to more effectively compete in the world
marketplace and develop a greater sense of the world's culture and
geography, we should explore ways for our students, at all levels, to
be provided the opportunity to develop fluency in a second language.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A Spanish and Chinese language
instruction pilot program is created. A maximum of two school
districts may participate. Each school district shall provide a
sequentially, articulated world language program in elementary schools
that provides instruction in Spanish and a Chinese language. Interested
districts shall apply no later than May 15, 2008, to the superintendent
of public instruction to participate in the pilot program established
by this section. The superintendent shall make a decision no later
than June 15, 2008, regarding which school districts may participate in
the pilot program.
(2) School districts participating in the program must agree to:
(a) Assure that parents are informed of the availability of the
language classes offered as a pilot program; and
(b) Participate in an evaluation of the program as determined by
the superintendent of public instruction.
(3) The pilot programs authorized by this section shall constitute
an exceptional case under RCW 28A.150.260 and therefore the
participating school districts shall be permitted to employ people of
unusual competence, but without certification, to provide the language
instruction for the pilot program under the general supervision of a
certificated instructional staff person.
(4) Beginning in June 2009 and continuing for the life of the pilot
program, the superintendent of public instruction shall submit an
annual report to the governor and the legislature that summarizes the
pilot program and its effectiveness. The report shall also include a
recommendation as to whether or not the pilot program should be
continued, expanded, or otherwise modified.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---