BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.44.010 and 1990 c 120 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Health care services" means and includes medical, surgical,
dental, chiropractic, hospital, optometric, podiatric, pharmaceutical,
ambulance, custodial, mental health, and other therapeutic services.
(2) "Provider" means any health professional, hospital, or other
institution, organization, or person that furnishes health care
services and is licensed to furnish such services.
(3) "Health care service contractor" means any corporation,
cooperative group, or association, which is sponsored by or otherwise
intimately connected with a provider or group of providers, who or
which not otherwise being engaged in the insurance business, accepts
prepayment for health care services from or for the benefit of persons
or groups of persons as consideration for providing such persons with
any health care services. "Health care service contractor" does not
include retainer health care practices as defined in section 2 of this
act.
(4) "Participating provider" means a provider, who or which has
contracted in writing with a health care service contractor to accept
payment from and to look solely to such contractor according to the
terms of the subscriber contract for any health care services rendered
to a person who has previously paid, or on whose behalf prepayment has
been made, to such contractor for such services.
(5) "Enrolled participant" means a person or group of persons who
have entered into a contractual arrangement or on whose behalf a
contractual arrangement has been entered into with a health care
service contractor to receive health care services.
(6) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner.
(7) "Uncovered expenditures" means the costs to the health care
service contractor for health care services that are the obligation of
the health care service contractor for which an enrolled participant
would also be liable in the event of the health care service
contractor's insolvency and for which no alternative arrangements have
been made as provided herein. The term does not include expenditures
for covered services when a provider has agreed not to bill the
enrolled participant even though the provider is not paid by the health
care service contractor, or for services that are guaranteed, insured
or assumed by a person or organization other than the health care
service contractor.
(8) "Copayment" means an amount specified in a group or individual
contract which is an obligation of an enrolled participant for a
specific service which is not fully prepaid.
(9) "Deductible" means the amount an enrolled participant is
responsible to pay before the health care service contractor begins to
pay the costs associated with treatment.
(10) "Group contract" means a contract for health care services
which by its terms limits eligibility to members of a specific group.
The group contract may include coverage for dependents.
(11) "Individual contract" means a contract for health care
services issued to and covering an individual. An individual contract
may include dependents.
(12) "Carrier" means a health maintenance organization, an insurer,
a health care service contractor, or other entity responsible for the
payment of benefits or provision of services under a group or
individual contract.
(13) "Replacement coverage" means the benefits provided by a
succeeding carrier.
(14) "Insolvent" or "insolvency" means that the organization has
been declared insolvent and is placed under an order of liquidation by
a court of competent jurisdiction.
(15) "Fully subordinated debt" means those debts that meet the
requirements of RCW 48.44.037(3) and are recorded as equity.
(16) "Net worth" means the excess of total admitted assets as
defined in RCW 48.12.010 over total liabilities but the liabilities
shall not include fully subordinated debt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Retainer health care practice" and "retainer practice" mean a
provider, group, or entity that meets the following criteria in (a) and
(b) of this subsection:
(a)(i) A health care provider who furnishes only primary care
services through a retainer agreement; or
(ii) An entity that sponsors, employs, or is otherwise affiliated
with a group of health care providers who furnish only primary care
services through a retainer agreement, which entity is wholly owned by
the group of health care providers or is a nonprofit corporation exempt
from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code.
Such entity is not prohibited from sponsoring, employing, or being
otherwise affiliated with other types of health care providers not
engaged in a retainer health care practice; and
(b) Enters into retainer agreements with retainer subscribers or
the parents or legal guardians of retainer subscribers.
(2) "Retainer subscriber" means a person who is covered by a
retainer agreement and is entitled to receive primary care services
under the retainer agreement from the retainer practice.
(3) "Retainer fee" means a fee charged by a retainer health care
practice as consideration for being available to provide and providing
primary care services as specified in the retainer agreement. The
retainer fee must represent the total amount due for all health care
services specified in the retainer agreement.
(4) "Retainer agreement" means a written agreement entered into
between a retainer health care practice and an individual retainer
subscriber whereby the retainer practice charges a retainer fee as
consideration for being available to provide and providing primary care
services to the individual retainer subscriber during a specified
service period. A retainer agreement must (a) describe the primary
care services the retainer practice will provide, and (b) be terminable
at will upon written notice by the retainer subscriber. A retainer
agreement may not be sold to a group and may not be entered with a
group of subscribers. It must be an agreement between a retainer
health care practice and an individual subscriber.
(5) "Health care provider" or "provider" means a person regulated
under chapters 18.57, 18.57A, 18.71, and 18.71A RCW and RCW 18.79.050
to practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing
health care services in this state consistent with state law.
(6) "Health carrier" or "carrier" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.43.005.
(7) "Primary care" means routine health care services, including
screening, assessment, diagnosis, and treatment for the purpose of
promotion of health and detection of disease or injury.
(8) "Network" means the group of participating providers and
facilities providing health care services to a particular health
carrier.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, a retainer health care practice may not accept periodic
payment for health care services to retainer subscribers.
(2) A retainer practice may charge a retainer fee as consideration
for being available to provide and providing primary care services to
a retainer subscriber during a specified service period if the retainer
health care practice deposits the fee in one or more identifiable trust
accounts and distributes the fee to the retainer practice at the end of
the specified service period.
(3) The instrument creating the trust and governing the trust
account must provide that:
(a) All retainer fees are held in trust for and remain the property
of the retainer subscriber until the end of the service period for
which they are charged, at which time they become the property of the
retainer health care practice.
(b) All unearned retainer fees will immediately be returned to the
retainer subscriber, upon the occurrence of any event that prevents the
provision of the health care services as contemplated by the retainer
agreement.
(4) A retainer practice must:
(a) Promptly notify a retainer subscriber of the receipt of his or
her retainer fee;
(b) Render appropriate accounts to retainer subscribers regarding
the funds; and
(c) Promptly refund to the retainer subscriber all unearned
retainer fees upon the occurrence of any event that prevents the
provision of the health care services as contemplated by the retainer
agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Retainer health care practices may not:
(a) Enter into a participating provider contract as defined in RCW
48.44.010 or 48.46.020 with any carrier or with any carrier's
contractor or subcontractor to provide health care services through a
retainer agreement except as set forth in subsection (2) of this
section;
(b) Submit a claim for payment to any carrier or any carrier's
contractor or subcontractor for health care services provided to
retainer subscribers as covered by their agreement;
(c) With respect to services provided through a retainer agreement,
be identified by a carrier or any carrier's contractor or subcontractor
as a participant in the carrier's or any carrier's contractor or
subcontractor network;
(d) Pay for health care services covered by a retainer agreement
rendered to retainer practice subscribers by providers other than the
providers in the retainer practice or their employees, except as
described in subsection (2)(b) of this section; or
(e) Decline to accept new retainer patients solely because of the
patient's health status. This does not require a retainer health care
practice to accept new retainer patients, if the practice has reached
its maximum capacity, or if the patient's medical condition is such
that the provider is unable to provide the appropriate level and type
of health care services in the retainer practice. In addition, the
provider may decline any patient for whom the payment of the retainer
fee is paid indirectly or directly by a third party.
(2) Retainer health care practices and providers may:
(a) Enter into a participating provider contract as defined by RCW
48.44.010 and 48.46.020 for purposes other than payment of claims for
services provided to retainer subscribers through a retainer agreement
and such providers shall be subject to all other provisions of the
participating provider contract applicable to participating providers
including but not limited to the right to:
(i) Make referrals to other participating providers;
(ii) Admit the carrier's members to participating hospitals and
other health care facilities;
(iii) Prescribe prescription drugs; and
(iv) Implement other customary provisions of the contract not
dealing with reimbursement of services; and
(b) Pay for charges associated with the provision of routine lab
and imaging services provided in connection with wellness physical
examinations. In aggregate such payments per year per retainer
subscriber are not to exceed fifteen percent of the total annual
retainer subscription fee charged that subscriber.
(c) Retainer practices may charge an additional fee to direct
patients for supplies, medications, and specific vaccines provided to
retainer subscribers that are specifically excluded under the retainer
agreement, provided the retainer provider notifies the retainer
subscriber of the additional charge, prior to their administration or
delivery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The legislature intends by enacting this
chapter to create a safe harbor for compliance with the insurance code
for retainer practices as defined in section 2 of this act who comply
with this chapter, but does not intend by this act to affect the
legality of arrangements not covered by this chapter.
(2) A health care provider may not act as, or hold himself or
herself out to be, a retainer health care practice in this state, nor
may a retainer agreement be entered into with a retainer subscriber in
this state, unless the provider submits annually to the commissioner a
letter certifying compliance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Every retainer health care practice must
maintain the following records for a period of five years, and upon
request must make the following records available to the commissioner
for review:
(1) Forms of contracts between the retainer practice and retainer
subscribers;
(2) Documents relating to the creation and maintenance of any
retainer fee trust accounts. However, any patient's personal
identifying information may be withheld, unless otherwise authorized by
the patient;
(3) All advertising relating to the retainer practice and its
services; and
(4) All records relating to retainer fees received by the retainer
health care practice. However, any patient's personal identifying
information may be withheld, unless otherwise authorized by the
patient.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A person shall not knowingly make, publish,
or disseminate any false, deceptive, or misleading representation or
advertising in the conduct of the business of a retainer practice, or
relative to the business of a retainer practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A person shall not knowingly make, issue, or
circulate, or cause to be made, issued, or circulated, a
misrepresentation of the terms of any retainer agreement, or the
benefits or advantages promised thereby, or use the name or title of
any retainer agreement misrepresenting the nature thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The commissioner shall adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW establishing a standardized
disclosure form to be distributed to all retainer subscribers with
their enrollment forms. Such form will inform the subscriber patient
of their financial rights and responsibilities to the retainer practice
as provided for in this chapter, will encourage that the retainer
patient obtain and maintain insurance for services not provided by the
retainer practice, and that the provider will not bill a carrier for
services covered under the retainer agreement. Such a standardized
disclosure form shall be deemed sufficient disclosure of a retainer
practice's obligations under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If the commissioner has cause to believe
that any person has violated the provisions of this chapter, the
commissioner may issue and enforce a cease and desist order in
accordance with RCW 48.02.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 2 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

--- END ---