BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.68A.001 and 1984 c 262 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the prevention of sexual exploitation
and abuse of children constitutes a government objective of surpassing
importance. The care of children is a sacred trust and should not be
abused by those who seek commercial gain or personal gratification
based on the exploitation of children.
The legislature further finds that the protection of children from
sexual exploitation can be accomplished without infringing on a
constitutionally protected activity. The definition of "sexually
explicit conduct" and other operative definitions demarcate a line
between protected and prohibited conduct and should not inhibit
legitimate scientific, medical, or educational activities.
The legislature further finds that children engaged in sexual
conduct for financial compensation are frequently the victims of sexual
abuse. Approximately eighty to ninety percent of children engaged in
sexual activity for financial compensation have a history of sexual
abuse victimization. It is the intent of the legislature to encourage
these children to engage in prevention and intervention services and to
hold those who pay to engage in the sexual abuse of children
accountable for the trauma they inflict on children.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.68A.100 and 1999 c 327 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of ((patronizing a juvenile prostitute))
commercial sexual abuse of a minor if ((that person engages or agrees
or offers)):
(a) He or she pays a fee to a minor or a third person as
compensation for a minor having engaged in sexual conduct with him or
her;
(b) He or she pays or agrees to pay a fee to a minor or a third
person pursuant to an understanding that in return therefore such minor
will engage in sexual conduct with him or her; or
(c) He or she solicits, offers, or requests to engage in sexual
conduct with a minor in return for a fee((, and is guilty of)).
(2) Commercial sexual abuse of a minor is a class C felony
punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(3) In addition to any other penalty provided under chapter 9A.20
RCW, a person guilty of ((patronizing a juvenile prostitute))
commercial sexual abuse of a minor is subject to the provisions under
RCW 9A.88.130 and 9A.88.140.
(4) For purposes of this section, "sexual conduct" means sexual
intercourse or sexual contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.68A.110 and 1992 c 178 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.040, it is not a defense that
the defendant was involved in activities of law enforcement and
prosecution agencies in the investigation and prosecution of criminal
offenses. Law enforcement and prosecution agencies shall not employ
minors to aid in the investigation of a violation of RCW 9.68A.090 or
9.68A.100. This chapter does not apply to lawful conduct between
spouses.
(2) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, 9.68A.070, or
9.68A.080, it is not a defense that the defendant did not know the age
of the child depicted in the visual or printed matter: PROVIDED, That
it is a defense, which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of
the evidence, that at the time of the offense the defendant was not in
possession of any facts on the basis of which he or she should
reasonably have known that the person depicted was a minor.
(3) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.040 ((or)), 9.68A.090, section
4 of this act, or section 5 of this act, it is not a defense that the
defendant did not know the alleged victim's age: PROVIDED, That it is
a defense, which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the
evidence, that at the time of the offense, the defendant made a
reasonable bona fide attempt to ascertain the true age of the minor by
requiring production of a driver's license, marriage license, birth
certificate, or other governmental or educational identification card
or paper and did not rely solely on the oral allegations or apparent
age of the minor.
(4) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, or 9.68A.070,
it shall be an affirmative defense that the defendant was a law
enforcement officer in the process of conducting an official
investigation of a sex-related crime against a minor, or that the
defendant was providing individual case treatment as a recognized
medical facility or as a psychiatrist or psychologist licensed under
Title 18 RCW.
(5) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, or 9.68A.070,
the state is not required to establish the identity of the alleged
victim.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of promoting commercial sexual abuse of a
minor if he or she knowingly advances commercial sexual abuse of a
minor or profits from a minor engaged in sexual conduct.
(2) Promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor is a class B
felony.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) A person "advances commercial sexual abuse of a minor" if,
acting other than as a minor or as a person engaged in commercial
sexual abuse of a minor, he or she causes or aids a person to commit or
engage in commercial sexual abuse of a minor, procures or solicits
customers for commercial sexual abuse of a minor, provides persons or
premises for the purposes of engaging in commercial sexual abuse of a
minor, operates or assists in the operation of a house or enterprise
for the purposes of engaging in commercial sexual abuse of a minor, or
engages in any other conduct designed to institute, aid, cause, assist,
or facilitate an act or enterprise of commercial sexual abuse of a
minor.
(b) A person "profits from commercial sexual abuse of a minor" if,
acting other than as a minor receiving compensation for personally
rendered sexual conduct, he or she accepts or receives money or other
property pursuant to an agreement or understanding with any person
whereby he or she participates or will participate in the proceeds of
commercial sexual abuse of a minor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person commits the offense of promoting travel for commercial
sexual abuse of a minor if he or she knowingly sells or offers to sell
travel services that include or facilitate travel for the purpose of
engaging in what would be commercial sexual abuse of a minor or
promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor, if occurring in this
state.
(2) Promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of a minor is a
class C felony.
(3) For purposes of this section, "travel services" has the same
meaning as defined in RCW 19.138.021.

Sec. 6 RCW 19.138.340 and 2006 c 250 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No seller of travel shall engage in any of the following:
(a) Promoting travel for prostitution or promoting travel for
commercial sexual abuse of a minor;
(b) Selling, advertising, or otherwise offering to sell travel
services or facilitate travel:
(i) For the purposes of engaging in a commercial sex act;
(ii) That consists of tourism packages or activities using and
offering sexual acts as an enticement for tourism; or
(iii) That provides, purports to provide access to, or facilitates
the availability of sex escorts or sexual services.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Commercial sex act" means any sexual contact, as defined in
chapter 9A.44 RCW, for which anything of value is given to or received
by any person.
(b) "Sexual act" means any sexual contact as defined in chapter
9A.44 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of permitting commercial sexual abuse of a
minor if, having possession or control of premises which he or she
knows are being used for the purpose of commercial sexual abuse of a
minor, he or she fails without lawful excuse to make reasonable effort
to halt or abate such use and to make a reasonable effort to notify law
enforcement of such use.
(2) Permitting commercial sexual abuse of a minor is a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec. 8 RCW 9A.88.140 and 1999 c 327 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon an arrest for a suspected violation of patronizing a
prostitute or ((patronizing a juvenile prostitute)) commercial sexual
abuse of a minor, the arresting law enforcement officer may impound the
person's vehicle if (a) the motor vehicle was used in the commission of
the crime; (b) the person arrested is the owner of the vehicle; and (c)
the person arrested has previously been convicted of patronizing a
prostitute, under RCW 9A.88.110, or ((patronizing a juvenile
prostitute)) commercial sexual abuse of a minor, under RCW 9.68A.100.
(2) Impoundments performed under this section shall be in
accordance with chapter 46.55 RCW.

Sec. 9 RCW 9.94A.533 and 2006 c 339 s 301 and 2006 c 123 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence
ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.
(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the
standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid
sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the
seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by
seventy-five percent.
(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements
based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm
enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is
subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is
being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to
commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to
the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class
C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both,
and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements
under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has
previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July
23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection
(4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm
enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the
enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all
felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed
felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to
the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which
underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of
the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon
enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section
based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c)
of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender
has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after
July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or
subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly
weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of
the enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to
all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense
while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender
is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If
the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in
this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility,
and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under
chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this
subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(a) or (b) or 69.50.410;
(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(c), (d), or (e);
(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.4013.
For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a
state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part
of that facility or county jail.
(6) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter
69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or
9.94A.605. All enhancements under this subsection shall run
consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, for all offenses
sentenced under this chapter.
(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence
range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each
prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.
(8)(a) The following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range for felony crimes committed on or after July 1,
2006, if the offense was committed with sexual motivation, as that term
is defined in RCW 9.94A.030. If the offender is being sentenced for
more than one offense, the sexual motivation enhancement must be added
to the total period of total confinement for all offenses, regardless
of which underlying offense is subject to a sexual motivation
enhancement. If the offender committed the offense with sexual
motivation and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory
offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the following additional times shall
be added to the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2)
of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified
under RCW 9A.28.020:
(i) Two years for any felony defined under the law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both;
(ii) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a
class B felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or
both;
(iii) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both;
(iv) If the offender is being sentenced for any sexual motivation
enhancements under (i), (ii), and/or (iii) of this subsection and the
offender has previously been sentenced for any sexual motivation
enhancements on or after July 1, 2006, under (i), (ii), and/or (iii) of
this subsection, all sexual motivation enhancements under this
subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed;
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all sexual
motivation enhancements under this subsection are mandatory, shall be
served in total confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other
sentencing provisions, including other sexual motivation enhancements,
for all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not
a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(c) The sexual motivation enhancements in this subsection apply to
all felony crimes;
(d) If the standard sentence range under this subsection exceeds
the statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a sexual motivation
enhancement increases the sentence so that it would exceed the
statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the sentence
representing the enhancement may not be reduced;
(e) The portion of the total confinement sentence which the
offender must serve under this subsection shall be calculated before
any earned early release time is credited to the offender;
(f) Nothing in this subsection prevents a sentencing court from
imposing a sentence outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW
9.94A.535.
(9) An additional one-year enhancement shall be added to the
standard sentence range for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073,
9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089 committed on
or after July 1, 2007, if the offender engaged, agreed, or offered to
engage the victim in the sexual conduct in return for a fee. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the one-year
enhancement must be added to the total period of total confinement for
all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to the
enhancement. If the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory
offense for the felony crimes of RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079,
9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, or 9A.44.089, and the offender attempted to
engage, agree, or offer to engage the victim in sexual conduct in
return for a fee, an additional one-year enhancement shall be added to
the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020. For purposes of this subsection, "sexual conduct" means
sexual intercourse or sexual contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44
RCW.

Sec. 10 RCW 9.68A.105 and 1995 c 353 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9.68A.100, a
person who is either convicted or given a deferred sentence or a
deferred prosecution or who has entered into a statutory or
nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for violating
RCW 9.68A.100 or a comparable county or municipal ordinance shall be
assessed a ((two)) five hundred fifty dollar fee.
(b) The court may not suspend payment of all or part of the fee
unless it finds that the person does not have the ability to pay.
(c) When a minor has been adjudicated a juvenile offender or has
entered into a statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement for an
offense which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a violation
of RCW 9.68A.100 or a comparable county or municipal ordinance, the
court shall assess the fee under (a) of this subsection. The court may
not suspend payment of all or part of the fee unless it finds that the
minor does not have the ability to pay the fee.
(2) The fee assessed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
collected by the clerk of the court and distributed each month to the
state treasurer for deposit in the prostitution prevention and
intervention account under RCW 43.63A.740 for the purpose of funding
prostitution prevention and intervention activities.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement" means an
agreement under RCW 13.40.080 or any written agreement between a person
accused of an offense listed in subsection (1) of this section and a
court, county or city prosecutor, or designee thereof, whereby the
person agrees to fulfill certain conditions in lieu of prosecution.
(b) "Deferred sentence" means a sentence that will not be carried
out if the defendant meets certain requirements, such as complying with
the conditions of probation.

Sec. 11 RCW 9A.88.120 and 1995 c 353 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.010,
9A.88.030, and 9A.88.090, a person who is either convicted or given a
deferred sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a
statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest
for violating RCW 9A.88.010, 9A.88.030, 9A.88.090, or comparable county
or municipal ordinances shall be assessed a fifty dollar fee.
(b) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.110, a person
who is either convicted or given a deferred sentence or a deferred
prosecution or who has entered into a statutory or nonstatutory
diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for violating RCW
9A.88.110 or a comparable county or municipal ordinance shall be
assessed a one hundred fifty dollar fee.
(c) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.070 and
9A.88.080, a person who is either convicted or given a deferred
sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a statutory
or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for
violating RCW 9A.88.070, 9A.88.080, or comparable county or municipal
ordinances shall be assessed a three hundred dollar fee.
(2) The court may not suspend payment of all or part of the fee
unless it finds that the person does not have the ability to pay.
(3) When a minor has been adjudicated a juvenile offender or has
entered into a statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement for an
offense which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a violation
under this chapter or comparable county or municipal ordinances, the
court shall assess the fee as specified under subsection (1) of this
section. The court may not suspend payment of all or part of the fee
unless it finds that the minor does not have the ability to pay the
fee.
(4) Any fee assessed under this section shall be collected by the
clerk of the court and distributed each month to the state treasurer
for deposit in the prostitution prevention and intervention account
under RCW 43.63A.740 for the purpose of funding prostitution prevention
and intervention activities.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement" means an
agreement under RCW 13.40.080 or any written agreement between a person
accused of an offense listed in subsection (1) of this section and a
court, county, or city prosecutor, or designee thereof, whereby the
person agrees to fulfill certain conditions in lieu of prosecution.
(b) "Deferred sentence" means a sentence that will not be carried
out if the defendant meets certain requirements, such as complying with
the conditions of probation.

Sec. 12 RCW 9A.88.070 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.88.070 are
each amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of promoting prostitution in the first
degree if he or she knowingly((:
(a))) advances prostitution by compelling a person by threat or
force to engage in prostitution or profits from prostitution which
results from such threat or force((; or
(b) Advances or profits from prostitution of a person less than
eighteen years old)).
(2) Promoting prostitution in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 13 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2006 c 277 s 6, 2006 c 228 s 9, 2006 c
191 s 2, 2006 c 139 s 2, 2006 c 128 s 3, and 2006 c 73 s 12 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Abandonment of Dependent Person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse
of a Minor (section 4 of this act)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless manner
(RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged
in sexually explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a
Signal Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.675)

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct (RCW 9.68A.070)

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of Dependent Person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Driving While Under the Influence
(RCW 46.61.502(6))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW
9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Physical Control of a Vehicle While
Under the Influence (RCW
46.61.504(6))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a
Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW
9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event
(RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW 48.17.063(3))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or
Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace
Officer With a Projectile Stun
Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except
subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily
Harm By Use of a Signal
Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW
9A.56.350(2))

((Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute
(RCW 9.68A.100)))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

(([Retail])) Retail Theft with
Extenuating Circumstances 1
(RCW 9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW
9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender
(second or subsequent offense)
(RCW 9A.44.130(10)(a))

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW
9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

(([Retail])) Retail Theft with
Extenuating Circumstances 2
(RCW 9A.56.360(3))

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW
9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

Voyeurism (RCW 9A.44.115)

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If funds are specifically appropriated to
the prostitution prevention and intervention account as provided in RCW
43.63A.720 for the purposes provided in this section, the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall prioritize such funds
to provide minors who have a history of engaging in sexual conduct for
a fee or are the victims of commercial sexual abuse of a minor with (1)
residential treatment and services; (2) counseling services including
mental health and substance abuse services and intensive case
management; (3) services to engage the minors in school or vocational
training; and (4) health care services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If funds are specifically appropriated to
the prostitution prevention and intervention account as provided in RCW
43.63A.720 for the purposes provided in this section, the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall prioritize such funds
for training of law enforcement and community outreach and education on
minors who have a history of engaging in sexual conduct for a fee or
are the victims of commercial sexual abuse of a minor, including
awareness training regarding the availability of services for minors
under chapter 13.32A RCW.

--- END ---