BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the office of the attorney general.
(2) "Consumer" means an individual residing in this state who is or
may be required to pay for or to exchange consideration for goods and
services offered through direct mail marketing.
(3) "Direct mail marketer" means any person who, for financial
profit or commercial purposes in connection with direct mail marketing,
mails solicitations for the sale of goods or services to a consumer
when the consumer is in this state. It includes any person who
directly controls or supervises the conduct of a direct mail marketer.
For the purposes of this subsection, "commercial purposes" means the
sale or offer for sale of goods or services.
(4) "Direct mail marketing" means any mailing which contains
solicitations for the sale of goods or services and is directed by
personal mail delivery to a consumer at his or her residence within
this state.
(5) "Doing business in this state" means mailing or causing to be
mailed any direct mail marketing solicitation delivered to a residence
by means of personal delivery (a) from a location in this state; or (b)
from a location outside of this state to consumers residing in this
state.
(6) "Goods and services" means any goods and services, and includes
any real property or any tangible personal property or services of any
kind.
(7) "Person" means any natural person, association, partnership,
firm, limited liability company, corporation and its affiliates or
subsidiaries, or other business entity.
(8) "Unsolicited direct mail marketing" means any direct mail
marketing mailing other than a mailing:
(a) In response to an express written or verbal request of the
consumer;
(b) In connection with an established business relationship, which
has not been terminated by either party; or
(c) To an existing consumer, unless the consumer has expressed to
the direct mail marketer that the consumer no longer wishes to receive
any more direct marketing mail from that marketer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The attorney general shall establish and
maintain a do not mail registry. The registry is a list of consumers
who do not wish to receive unsolicited direct mail marketing. The
attorney general may contract with a private vendor to establish and
maintain the registry.
(2) No direct mail marketer shall mail or cause to be mailed any
unsolicited direct mail marketing to any consumer more than thirty days
after the consumer's name and address appears on the then current
quarterly do not mail registry made available by the attorney general
under subsection (4) of this section.
(3) The attorney general shall provide notice to consumers of the
establishment of the do not mail registry and shall specify the methods
by which each resident may be included on the registry. There is no
cost to the resident for joining the registry. A consumer may notify
the attorney general by calling a toll-free number provided by the
attorney general, or providing notification in any other manner allowed
by the attorney general. A consumer on the registry must be deleted
from the registry upon the consumer's written request. The attorney
general must update the registry not less than quarterly.
(4) The attorney general shall make the registry available to
direct mail marketers for a fee. The fee shall be adopted by rule by
the attorney general.
(5) A person shall not be held liable for violating this section
if:
(a) The person has obtained a copy of the current do not mail
registry and has established and implemented written policies and
procedures related to the requirements of this section;
(b) The person has trained his or her personnel in the requirements
of this section;
(c) The person maintains records demonstrating compliance with (a)
and (b) of this subsection and the other requirements of this chapter;
and
(d) Any subsequent unsolicited direct mail marketing is the result
of error.
(6) The attorney general shall adopt rules to implement this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Violations of this chapter are
punishable by a fine of two thousand dollars for each violation.
(2) The attorney general may bring an action to enforce compliance
with this chapter.
(3) The remedies and penalties in this section are in addition to
any other penalties and remedies available to any person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business, and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The do not mail registry account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the fee for
accessing the registry under section 2 of this act must be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account may be made only for
the purposes of this chapter. Only the attorney general or the
attorney general's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---