BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.410 and 2002 c 353 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature shall establish for each school year in the
appropriations act a statewide salary allocation schedule, for
allocation purposes only, to be used to distribute funds for basic
education certificated instructional staff salaries under RCW
28A.150.260.
(2) Salary allocations for state-funded basic education
certificated instructional staff shall be calculated by the
superintendent of public instruction by determining the district's
average salary for certificated instructional staff, using the
statewide salary allocation schedule and related documents, conditions,
and limitations established by the omnibus appropriations act.
(3) Beginning January 1, 1992, no more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate degree
may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state
salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in the omnibus
appropriations act, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(4) Beginning in the 2007-08 school year, the determination of
years of service for occupational therapists, physical therapists,
speech-language pathologists, audiologists, nurses, social workers,
counselors, and psychologists, regulated under Title 18 RCW, may
include experience in schools and other nonschool positions as
occupational therapists, physical therapists, speech-language
pathologists, audiologists, nurses, social workers, counselors, or
psychologists. One year of service in nonschool positions shall be
counted as one year of service for purposes of this chapter. A maximum
of five years of service in nonschool positions may be included in the
determination of years of service.
(5) Beginning in the 2007-08 school year, the determination of
years of service for vocational certified instructors may include
related nonschool experience for vocational certified instructors who
hold a valid vocational certificate acquired as a result of
noneducational work experience rather than college training and who
have a degree earned from a regionally accredited institution of higher
education before the issuance of the initial vocational certificate,
which is a noneducational degree related to the vocational certificate.
Such instructors are defined as "nondegreed." These instructors may
also be determined to qualify for years of service for supervisory
noneducational work experience under existing rules.

--- END ---