BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.24.020 and 2003 c 114 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected as provided in
this chapter, a tax upon the sale, use, consumption, handling,
possession or distribution of all cigarettes, in an amount equal to the
rate of eleven and one-half mills per cigarette. All revenues
collected during any month from this tax must be deposited into the
local public health financing account created in section 3 of this act.
(2) An additional tax is imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of all cigarettes, in an amount
equal to the rate of five and one-fourth mills per cigarette. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(3) An additional tax is imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of all cigarettes, in an amount
equal to the rate of ten mills per cigarette through June 30, 1994,
eleven and one-fourth mills per cigarette for the period July 1, 1994,
through June 30, 1995, twenty mills per cigarette for the period July
1, 1995, through June 30, 1996, and twenty and one-half mills per
cigarette thereafter. All revenues collected during any month from
this additional tax shall be deposited in the health services account
created under RCW 43.72.900 by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month.
(4) Wholesalers subject to the payment of this tax may, if they
wish, absorb one-half mill per cigarette of the tax and not pass it on
to purchasers without being in violation of this section or any other
act relating to the sale or taxation of cigarettes.
(5) For purposes of this chapter, "possession" shall mean both (a)
physical possession by the purchaser and, (b) when cigarettes are being
transported to or held for the purchaser or his or her designee by a
person other than the purchaser, constructive possession by the
purchaser or his or her designee, which constructive possession shall
be deemed to occur at the location of the cigarettes being so
transported or held.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Protecting the public's health across the state is a
fundamental responsibility of the state. With the commitment to state
funding of the public health system as provided in section 3 of this
act, the state expects that measurable benefits will be realized to the
health of the residents of Washington. A transparent process that
shows the impact of increased public health spending on performance
measures related to the health outcomes in subsection (2) of this
section is of great value to the state and its residents. In addition,
a well-funded public health system is expected to become a more
integral part of the state's emergency preparedness system.
(2) This increase in public health funding shall deliver the
following outcomes, subject to available funding:
(a) Create a disease response system capable of responding at all
times;
(b) Stop the increase in, and reduce, sexually transmitted disease
rates;
(c) Reduce vaccine preventable diseases;
(d) Build capacity to quickly contain disease outbreaks;
(e) Decrease childhood and adult obesity and types I and II
diabetes rates, and resulting kidney failure and dialysis;
(f) Increase childhood immunization rates;
(g) Improve birth outcomes and decrease child abuse;
(h) Reduce animal-to-human disease rates; and
(i) Monitor and protect drinking water across jurisdictional
boundaries.
(3) Benchmarks for these outcomes shall be drawn from the national
healthy people 2010 goals, other reliable data sets, and any subsequent
national goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Base year" means the calendar year ending December 31, 2006.
(b) "Core public health functions of statewide significance" or
"public health functions" means health services that:
(i) Address: Communicable disease prevention and response;
preparation for, and response to, public health emergencies caused by
pandemic disease, earthquake, flood, or terrorism; prevention and
management of chronic diseases and disabilities; promotion of healthy
families and the development of children; assessment of local health
conditions, risks, and trends, and evaluation of the effectiveness of
intervention efforts; and environmental health concerns;
(ii) Promote uniformity in the public health activities conducted
by all local health jurisdictions in the public health system, increase
the overall strength of the public health system, or apply to broad
public health efforts; and
(iii) If left neglected or inadequately addressed, are reasonably
likely to have a significant adverse impact on counties beyond the
borders of the local health jurisdiction.
(c) "Local funding" means discretionary local resources for public
health functions, including amounts from general and special revenue
funds, but excluding amounts received from fees and licenses and other
user fee types of payments for service. "Local funding" does not
include payments received from the state or federal government.
(d) "Local health jurisdiction" or "jurisdiction" means a county
board of health organized under chapter 70.05 RCW, a health district
organized under chapter 70.46 RCW, or a combined city and county health
department organized under chapter 70.08 RCW.
(e) "Population" means the most recent population estimates by the
office of financial management for state revenue allocations.
(2) The local public health financing account is created in the
state treasury. All receipts from RCW 82.24.020(1) must be deposited
in the account. Money in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account must be used for the
purposes specified in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2008, and on the first business day of
each January thereafter, the state treasurer shall distribute from the
local public health financing account five million four hundred twenty-five thousand dollars to be shared equally amongst all local health
jurisdictions to address core public health functions of statewide
significance.
(4) Beginning January 1, 2008, and on the first business day of
each fiscal quarter thereafter, the state treasurer, in consultation
with the department of revenue or the department of health, as
necessary, shall distribute money in the local public health financing
account as provided in this subsection. The distributions under this
subsection (4) are subsequent to the distribution under subsection (3)
of this section.
Appropriated funds remaining following the distribution of moneys
under subsection (3) of this section must be apportioned to local
health jurisdictions in the manner provided in this subsection (4).
The apportionment factor for each jurisdiction is the population of the
jurisdiction's county as a percentage of the statewide population for
the prior calendar year. For two or more counties that have jointly
created a health district under chapter 70.46 RCW, the combined
population of all counties comprising the health district must be used.
Money received by a jurisdiction under this subsection (4) must be used
to fund core public health functions of statewide significance, and
until July 1, 2008, money shall be used to fund only known deficiencies
in core public health functions of statewide significance of the
jurisdiction.
(5) To receive distributions under subsections (3) and (4) of this
section in calendar year 2010 and thereafter, total local funding spent
by the jurisdiction on public health functions in the calendar year
prior to the previous calendar year must have equaled or exceeded total
local funding spent by the jurisdiction on public health functions in
the base year. The department of health shall notify the state
treasurer to discontinue distributions if the jurisdiction does not
meet this requirement.
(6) The department may adopt rules necessary to administer this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall accomplish the tasks included in
subsection (2) of this section by utilizing the expertise of varied
interests, as provided in this subsection.
(a) In addition to the perspectives of local health jurisdictions,
the state board of health, the Washington health foundation, and
department staff that are currently engaged in development of the
public health services improvement plan under RCW 43.70.520, the
secretary shall actively engage:
(i) Individuals or entities with expertise in the development of
performance measures, accountability and systems management, such as
the University of Washington school of public health and community
medicine, and experts in the development of evidence-based medical
guidelines or public health practice guidelines; and
(ii) Individuals or entities who will be impacted by performance
measures developed under this section and have relevant expertise, such
as community clinics, public health nurses, large employers, tribal
health providers, family planning providers, and physicians.
(b) In developing the performance measures, consideration shall be
given to levels of performance necessary to promote uniformity in core
public health functions of statewide significance among all local
health jurisdictions, best scientific evidence, national standards of
performance, and innovations in public health practice. The
performance measures shall be developed to meet the goals and outcomes
in section 2 of this act. The office of the state auditor shall
provide advice and consultation to the committee to assist in the
development of effective performance measures and health status
indicators.
(c) On or before November 1, 2007, the experts assembled under this
section shall provide recommendations to the secretary related to the
activities and services that qualify as core public health functions of
statewide significance and performance measures. The secretary shall
provide written justification for any departure from the
recommendations.
(2) By January 1, 2008, the department shall:
(a) Adopt a list of activities and services performed by local
health jurisdictions that qualify as core public health functions of
statewide significance as defined in section 3 of this act; and
(b) Adopt appropriate performance measures with the intent of
improving health status indicators applicable to the core public health
functions of statewide significance that local health jurisdictions
must provide pursuant to section 3 of this act.
(3) The secretary may revise the list of activities and the
performance measures in future years as appropriate. Prior to
modifying either the list or the performance measures, the secretary
must provide a written explanation of the rationale for such changes.
(4) The department and the local health jurisdictions shall abide
by the list of activities and services and the performance measures
developed pursuant to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning November 15, 2009, the department shall report to the
legislature and the governor annually on the distribution of funds
under section 3 of this act and the use of those funds. The initial
report must discuss the performance measures adopted by the secretary
and any impact the funding in this act has had on local health
jurisdiction performance and health status indicators. Future reports
shall evaluate trends in performance over time and the effects of
expenditures on performance over time.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.70.520 and 1993 c 492 s 467 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the public health functions of
community assessment, policy development, and assurance of service
delivery are essential elements in achieving the objectives of health
reform in Washington state. The legislature further finds that the
population-based services provided by state and local health
departments are cost-effective and are a critical strategy for the
long-term containment of health care costs. The legislature further
finds that the public health system in the state lacks the capacity to
fulfill these functions consistent with the needs of a reformed health
care system.
(2) The department of health shall develop, in consultation with
local health departments and districts, the state board of health, the
health services commission, area Indian health service, and other state
agencies, health services providers, and citizens concerned about
public health, a public health services improvement plan. The plan
shall provide a detailed accounting of deficits in the core functions
of assessment, policy development, assurance of the current public
health system, how additional public health funding would be used, and
describe the benefits expected from expanded expenditures.
(3) The plan shall include:
(a) Definition of minimum standards for public health protection
through assessment, policy development, and assurances:
(i) Enumeration of communities not meeting those standards;
(ii) A budget and staffing plan for bringing all communities up to
minimum standards;
(iii) An analysis of the costs and benefits expected from adopting
minimum public health standards for assessment, policy development, and
assurances;
(b) Recommended strategies and a schedule for improving public
health programs throughout the state, including:
(i) Strategies for transferring personal health care services from
the public health system, into the uniform benefits package where
feasible; and
(ii) ((Timing of increased funding for public health services
linked to specific objectives for improving public health)) Linking
funding for public health services to performance measures that relate
to achieving improved health outcomes; and
(c) A recommended level of dedicated funding for public health
services to be expressed in terms of a percentage of total health
service expenditures in the state or a set per person amount; such
recommendation shall also include methods to ensure that such funding
does not supplant existing federal, state, and local funds received by
local health departments, and methods of distributing funds among local
health departments.
(4) The department shall coordinate this planning process with the
study activities required in section 258, chapter 492, Laws of 1993.
(5) By March 1, 1994, the department shall provide initial
recommendations of the public health services improvement plan to the
legislature regarding minimum public health standards, and public
health programs needed to address urgent needs, such as those cited in
subsection (7) of this section.
(6) By December 1, 1994, the department shall present the public
health services improvement plan to the legislature, with specific
recommendations for each element of the plan to be implemented over the
period from 1995 through 1997.
(7) Thereafter, the department shall update the public health
services improvement plan for presentation to the legislature prior to
the beginning of a new biennium.
(8) Among the specific population-based public health activities to
be considered in the public health services improvement plan are:
Health data assessment and chronic and infectious disease surveillance;
rapid response to outbreaks of communicable disease; efforts to prevent
and control specific communicable diseases, such as tuberculosis and
acquired immune deficiency syndrome; health education to promote
healthy behaviors and to reduce the prevalence of chronic disease, such
as those linked to the use of tobacco; access to primary care in
coordination with existing community and migrant health clinics and
other not for profit health care organizations; programs to ensure
children are born as healthy as possible and they receive immunizations
and adequate nutrition; efforts to prevent intentional and
unintentional injury; programs to ensure the safety of drinking water
and food supplies; poison control; trauma services; and other
activities that have the potential to improve the health of the
population or special populations and reduce the need for or cost of
health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
RCW 43.135.035(4) does not apply to the transfer in RCW
82.24.020(1).

--- END ---