BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.08.245 and 1985 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be in the public purpose for all port districts to engage
in economic development programs. In addition, port districts may
contract with nonprofit corporations in furtherance of this and other
acts relating to economic development. Port districts are also
authorized to provide financial support, including charitable
contributions, to nonprofit organizations whose principal, if not
exclusive, function is to provide support services to commercial
seafarers while their ships are in port.

--- END ---