BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state of Washington leads the nation in
providing employment for people with baccalaureate degrees, but only
ranks thirty-sixth in the nation in the production of degrees.
Beginning in 2007 it is estimated that for job openings in Washington
that require a bachelor's degree, forty-seven percent will be in fields
identified as high demand or high impact, but that only fourteen
percent of Washington students each year graduate with degrees in one
of these fields. Washington ranks among the top ten states in
scientists and computer specialists employed per capita and leads the
nation in engineers employed per capita, but must import employees to
meet employer demands. Therefore, the legislature finds that
Washington needs to produce eight to ten thousand additional
baccalaureate degrees per year so that Washington employers will not
have to look out of state to find employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A committee on the education of students
in high demand fields is established to:
(a) Develop a plan to increase the capacity of Washington
institutions of higher education by ten thousand students per year by
2020 to produce baccalaureate and advanced degrees in high impact, high
demand areas of study;
(b) Develop a marketing project to inform students, parents, and
educators of opportunities in high demand fields;
(c) Investigate ways to motivate students to take more mathematics
and science courses in high school and college; and
(d) Identify ways that the business community can enter into more
partnerships with the state to ensure that Washington institutions of
higher education produce graduates in high demand fields that are ready
and able to find employment in Washington.
(2) The committee shall consist of:
(a) Two members of the house of representatives, appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives;
(b) Two members of the senate, appointed by the president of the
senate;
(c) One person representing the higher education coordinating
board, appointed by the director of the board;
(d) One person representing the state board for community and
technical colleges, appointed by the director of the state board;
(e) One person representing the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction;
(f) One person representing each of the following, appointed by the
governor:
(i) The labor council;
(ii) The council of presidents;
(iii) The prosperity partnership;
(iv) The council of faculty representatives; and
(v) One employer of persons in high demand fields; and
(g) A graduate student member of the Washington student lobby,
appointed by the governor.
(3) The committee shall report its findings and recommendations to
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2007.

--- END ---