BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.379 and 2005 c 248 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the property tax exemption authorized by
Article VII, section 10 of the state Constitution should be made
available on the basis of a retired person's ability to pay property
taxes and that the best measure of a retired person's ability to pay
taxes is that person's disposable income as defined in RCW 84.36.383.
The legislature further finds that veterans with one hundred percent
service-connected disabilities have given so much to our country that
they deserve property tax relief.
The legislature further finds that senior citizens, persons retired
because of disability, and veterans of the armed forces with service-connected disabilities are often persons with fixed incomes and are at
risk of being taxed out of their homes by rising property values.
Therefore, the legislature finds that there should be a limit on
property value increases for such persons for the purposes of property
taxes. Regardless of income level, all persons with fixed incomes are
susceptible to rising property taxes. In which event, additional
protections are necessary in order to ensure that our retired and
disabled citizens are not forced out of their homes and that such
protections should be available to all seniors, persons retired because
of disabilities, and veterans of the armed forces with service-connected disabilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.36.381 and 2005 c 248 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person shall be exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a
portion of the amount of excess and regular real property taxes due and
payable in the year following the year in which a claim is filed, and
thereafter, in accordance with the following:
(1) The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence
which was occupied by the person claiming the exemption as a principal
place of residence as of the time of filing: PROVIDED, That any person
who sells, transfers, or is displaced from his or her residence may
transfer his or her exemption status to a replacement residence, but no
claimant shall receive an exemption on more than one residence in any
year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That confinement of the person to a hospital,
nursing home, boarding home, or adult family home shall not disqualify
the claim of exemption if:
(a) The residence is temporarily unoccupied;
(b) The residence is occupied by a spouse and/or a person
financially dependent on the claimant for support; or
(c) The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home,
hospital, boarding home, or adult family home costs;
(2) The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time
of filing, in fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the
residence on which the property taxes have been imposed or if the
person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership, such person must own a share
therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in which he
or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
a marital community or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to be owned
by each spouse or cotenant, and any lease for life shall be deemed a
life estate;
(3) The person claiming the exemption must be (a) sixty-one years
of age or older on December 31st of the year in which the exemption
claim is filed, or must have been, at the time of filing, retired from
regular gainful employment by reason of disability, or (b) a veteran of
the armed forces of the United States with one hundred percent service-connected disability as provided in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 423 (d)(1)(A) as
amended prior to January 1, 2005. However, any surviving spouse of a
person who was receiving an exemption at the time of the person's death
shall qualify if the surviving spouse is fifty-seven years of age or
older and otherwise meets the requirements of this section;
(4) The amount that the person shall be exempt from an obligation
to pay shall be calculated on the basis of combined disposable income,
as defined in RCW 84.36.383. If the person claiming the exemption was
retired for two months or more of the assessment year, the combined
disposable income of such person shall be calculated by multiplying the
average monthly combined disposable income of such person during the
months such person was retired by twelve. If the income of the person
claiming exemption is reduced for two or more months of the assessment
year by reason of the death of the person's spouse, or when other
substantial changes occur in disposable income that are likely to
continue for an indefinite period of time, the combined disposable
income of such person shall be calculated by multiplying the average
monthly combined disposable income of such person after such
occurrences by twelve. If it is necessary to estimate income to comply
with this subsection, the assessor may require confirming documentation
of such income prior to May 31 of the year following application;
(5)(a) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of thirty-five thousand dollars or less
shall be exempt from all excess property taxes; and
(b)(i) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less but
greater than twenty-five thousand dollars shall be exempt from all
regular property taxes on the greater of fifty thousand dollars or
thirty-five percent of the valuation of his or her residence, but not
to exceed seventy thousand dollars of the valuation of his or her
residence; or
(ii) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a
combined disposable income of twenty-five thousand dollars or less
shall be exempt from all regular property taxes on the greater of sixty
thousand dollars or sixty percent of the valuation of his or her
residence;
(6) For a person who otherwise qualifies under subsections (1)
through (3) of this section ((and has a combined disposable income of
thirty-five thousand dollars or less)), the valuation of the residence
shall be the assessed value of the residence on the later of January 1,
1995, or January 1st of the assessment year the person first qualifies
under this section. ((If the person subsequently fails to qualify
under this section only for one year because of high income, this same
valuation shall be used upon requalification. If the person fails to
qualify for more than one year in succession because of high income or
fails to qualify for any other reason, the valuation upon
requalification shall be the assessed value on January 1st of the
assessment year in which the person requalifies.)) If the person
transfers the exemption under this section to a different residence,
the valuation of the different residence shall be the assessed value of
the different residence on January 1st of the assessment year in which
the person transfers the exemption.
In no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater than
the true and fair value of the residence on January 1st of the
assessment year.
This subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to the
property in the year in which the improvements are made. Subsequent
improvements to the property shall be added to the value otherwise
determined under this subsection at their true and fair value in the
year in which they are made.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.36.385 and 2001 c 185 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A claim for exemption under RCW 84.36.381 as now or
hereafter amended, shall be made and filed at any time during the year
for exemption from taxes payable the following year and thereafter and
solely upon forms as prescribed and furnished by the department of
revenue. ((However,))
(b) An exemption from tax under RCW 84.36.381(5), as now or
hereafter amended, shall continue for no more than four years unless a
renewal application is filed as provided in subsection (3) of this
section. The county assessor may also require, by written notice, a
renewal application following an amendment of the income requirements
set forth in RCW 84.36.381. Renewal applications shall be on forms
prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue.
(c) An exemption from tax under RCW 84.36.381(6), as now or
hereafter amended, shall continue until the death of the person
claiming the exemption or upon the sale of the property.
(2) A person granted an exemption under RCW 84.36.381 shall inform
the county assessor of any change in status affecting the person's
entitlement to the exemption on forms prescribed and furnished by the
department of revenue.
(3) Each person exempt from taxes under RCW 84.36.381(5) in 1993
and thereafter, shall file with the county assessor a renewal
application not later than December 31 of the year the assessor
notifies such person of the requirement to file the renewal
application.
(4) Beginning in 1992 and in each of the three succeeding years,
the county assessor shall notify approximately one-fourth of those
persons exempt from taxes under RCW 84.36.381(5) in the current year
who have not filed a renewal application within the previous four
years, of the requirement to file a renewal application.
(5) If the assessor finds that the applicant does not meet the
qualifications as set forth in RCW 84.36.381, as now or hereafter
amended, the claim or exemption shall be denied but such denial shall
be subject to appeal under the provisions of RCW 84.48.010(5) and in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. If the applicant had
received exemption in prior years based on erroneous information, the
taxes shall be collected subject to penalties as provided in RCW
84.40.130 for a period of not to exceed three years.
(6) The department and each local assessor is hereby directed to
publicize the qualifications and manner of making claims under RCW
84.36.381 through 84.36.389, through communications media, including
such paid advertisements or notices as it deems appropriate. Notice of
the qualifications, method of making applications, the penalties for
not reporting a change in status, and availability of further
information shall be included on or with property tax statements and
revaluation notices for all residential property including mobile
homes, except rental properties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---