BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The driver of a vehicle waiting in a holding area operated by
Washington state ferries shall not have the vehicle idle in excess of
three consecutive minutes if the vehicle is gasoline-powered or in
excess of five consecutive minutes if the vehicle is diesel-powered,
unless:
(a) The vehicle is being used as an emergency vehicle in an
emergency situation;
(b) The vehicle is required by a federal, state, or local law or
official, but only to the extent necessary to comply with such a
requirement;
(c) The vehicle's engine is providing auxiliary power for
activities other than heating or air conditioning, such as loading,
refrigeration, well drilling, or farming;
(d) Running the vehicle's engine is necessary for maintenance,
servicing, repair, or diagnostic purposes;
(e) Running the vehicle's engine during adverse weather conditions
is necessary to ensure the safe operation of the vehicle; or
(f) The ambient air temperature is below twenty degrees Fahrenheit
for gasoline-powered vehicles or below thirty-two degrees Fahrenheit
for diesel-powered vehicles, and idling of the vehicle is necessary to
ensure the safety or health of the passengers or driver.
(2) RCW 47.04.090 does not apply to this section.

--- END ---