BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature has declared that the policy
of the state of Washington is to maintain and advance the efficiency
and availability of telecommunications services and to promote
diversity and competition among telecommunications services and product
providers. The legislature has found that telecommunications
facilities and services are essential to the economic well-being of
both rural and urban areas.
The legislature finds that public utility districts that own
utility poles and that are exempt from the pole attachment provisions
under chapter 80.54 RCW have sought to charge multiple attachment fees
on the same pole and have used attachment rates, terms, and conditions
that are inconsistent with the pole attachment provisions under chapter
80.54 RCW and federal communications commission regulations. The
legislature finds that these practices: (1) Are inconsistent with the
policy of the state; (2) do not advance the efficiency or availability
of telecommunications facilities in rural or urban areas; (3) do not
encourage the introduction of competition, making the use of these
essential facilities difficult for providers of telecommunications and
cable television services; and (4) result in excessive litigation
costs, the courts being the only recourse available to licensees who do
not agree to contract terms. Consequently, the regulation of rates,
terms, and conditions for pole attachments with public utility
districts is in the public interest. Furthermore, the joint use of
these facilities is in the public's interest because duplication of
these facilities by telecommunications or cable television service
providers would be uneconomical, unattractive, and contrary to the
public interest.

Sec. 2 RCW 54.04.045 and 1996 c 32 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Attachment" means the affixation or installation of any wire,
cable, or other physical material capable of carrying electronic
impulses or light waves for the carrying of intelligence for
telecommunications or television, including((,)) but not limited to
cable, and any related device, apparatus, or auxiliary equipment upon
any pole, duct, conduit, manhole, or handhole, or other similar
facilities owned or controlled in whole or in part by one or more
locally regulated utilities where the installation has been made with
the necessary consent.
(b) "Licensee" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
company, association, joint stock association, or cooperatively
organized association, which is authorized to construct attachments
upon, along, under, or across the public ways.
(c) "Locally regulated utility" means a public utility district
((not subject to rate or service regulation by the utilities and
transportation commission)) created in chapter 54.08 RCW.
(c) "Nondiscriminatory" means that pole owners may not arbitrarily
differentiate among or between similar classes of ((persons)) licensees
approved for attachments.
(2) ((All)) (a) The utilities and transportation commission shall
adopt procedures necessary to hear and resolve licensee complaints
concerning the rates, terms, and conditions made, demanded, or received
by a locally regulated utility for attachments ((to its poles)) by
licensees. All rates, terms, and conditions made, demanded, or
received by any locally regulated utility for any attachment by a
licensee must be just, fair, reasonable, nondiscriminatory, and
sufficient. ((A locally regulated utility shall levy attachment space
rental rates that are uniform for the same class of service within the
locally regulated utility service area.))
(b) If the utilities and transportation commission finds, after a
hearing to address a licensee complaint, that the rates, terms, or
conditions demanded, exacted, charged, or collected by any locally
regulated utility in connection with attachments are unjust, unfair,
unreasonable, or that the rates or charges are insufficient to yield a
reasonable compensation for the attachments, the commission shall
determine and fix just, fair, reasonable, or sufficient rates, terms,
and conditions for the attachments to be observed and followed
thereafter by any locally regulated utility. In determining and fixing
the rates, terms, and conditions, the commission shall consider the
interest of the customers of the attaching licensee as well as the
interest of the customers of the locally regulated utility upon which
the attachment is made.
(c) A just, fair, and reasonable rate must be determined on a per
pole basis rather than a per attachment basis, and the rate must allow
a locally regulated utility to recover at least all of the additional
costs of procuring and maintaining pole attachments but no more than
the utility's actual capital and operating expenses, including just
compensation, attributable to that portion of the pole, duct, conduit,
manhole, handhole, or other similar facilities used for the pole
attachment, including a share of the required support and clearance
space in proportion to the space used for the pole attachment, as
compared to all other uses made of the subject facilities and uses that
remain available to the owner or owners of the subject facilities.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, nothing
in this section shall be construed or is intended to confer upon the
utilities and transportation commission any authority to exercise
jurisdiction over locally regulated utilities.

--- END ---