BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds and declares:
(a) By reason of their employment, firefighters are required to
work in the midst of, and are subject to, smoke, fumes, infectious
diseases, and toxic substances;
(b) Firefighters are continually exposed to a vast and expanding
field of hazardous substances;
(c) Firefighters enter uncontrolled environments to save lives,
provide emergency medical services, and reduce property damage and are
frequently not aware or informed of the potential toxic and
carcinogenic substances, and infectious diseases that they may be
exposed to;
(d) Firefighters are often exposed simultaneously to multiple
carcinogens;
(e) Firefighters so exposed can potentially and unwittingly expose
coworkers, families, and members of the public to infectious diseases;
(f) Harmful effects caused by firefighters' exposure to hazardous
substances, whether cancer, infectious disease, a heart injury, or
respiratory disease, develop very slowly, usually manifesting
themselves years after exposure;
(g) Cardiovascular disease is exacerbated by firefighting duties
and firefighting increases the incidence of cardiovascular disease and
heart injuries in firefighters;
(h) Firefighters frequently and at unpredictable intervals perform
job duties under strenuous physical conditions when engaged in
firefighting activities and routinely are unable to meet normal
definitions of "unusual exertion" standards; and
(i) Firefighters who experience heart injuries during firefighting
activities shall be assumed to meet current "unusual exertion"
standards during strenuous physical exertion.
(2) The legislature further finds and declares that all the
conditions listed under subsection (1) of this section exist and arise
out of or in the course of firefighting employment.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.32.185 and 2002 c 337 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the case of firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030(4) (a),
(b), and (c) who are covered under Title 51 RCW and firefighters,
including supervisors, employed on a full-time, fully compensated basis
as a firefighter of a private sector employer's fire department that
includes over fifty such firefighters, there shall exist a prima facie
presumption that: (a) Respiratory disease; (b) ((heart problems that
are)) injury to the heart causing death, or any health condition or
impairment resulting in total or partial disability experienced within
seventy-two hours of exposure to smoke, fumes, ((or)) toxic substances,
or strenuous physical exertion; (c) cancer; and (d) infectious diseases
are occupational diseases under RCW 51.08.140. This presumption of
occupational disease may be rebutted by ((a preponderance of the
evidence)) clear, cogent, and convincing evidence. Such evidence may
include, but is not limited to, use of tobacco products, physical
fitness and weight, lifestyle, hereditary factors, and exposure from
other employment or nonemployment activities.
(2) The presumptions established in subsection (1) of this section
shall be extended to an applicable member following termination of
service for a period of three calendar months for each year of
requisite service, but may not extend more than sixty months following
the last date of employment.
(3) The presumption established in subsection (1)(c) of this
section shall only apply to any active or former firefighter who has
cancer that develops or manifests itself after the firefighter has
served at least ten years and who was given a qualifying medical
examination upon becoming a firefighter that showed no evidence of
cancer. The presumption within subsection (1)(c) of this section shall
only apply to primary brain cancer, malignant melanoma, leukemia, non-Hodgkin's lymphoma, bladder cancer, ureter cancer, stomach cancer,
intestinal cancer, multiple myeloma, testicular cancer, prostate
cancer, and kidney cancer.
(4) The presumption established in subsection (1)(d) of this
section shall be extended to any firefighter who has contracted any of
the following infectious diseases: Human immunodeficiency
virus/acquired immunodeficiency syndrome, all strains of hepatitis,
meningococcal meningitis, or mycobacterium tuberculosis.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2003, this section does not apply to a
firefighter who develops a heart or lung condition and who is a regular
user of tobacco products or who has a history of tobacco use. The
department, using existing medical research, shall define in rule the
extent of tobacco use that shall exclude a firefighter from the
provisions of this section.
(6) In any case where the presumption is upheld, or the employee
prevails on the basis of a presumption, whether at the board of
industrial insurance appeals or in any court, the employee must be
awarded full benefits, attorney fees, expert witness costs, and all
other costs from the date of the employee's initial application for
benefits.

--- END ---