BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.14.020 and 1959 c 1 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
Definition of terms:
(1) "Commission" means the civil service commission, or combined
county civil service commission, herein created, and "commissioner"
means any one of the ((three)) members of any such commission;
(2) "Appointing power" means the county sheriff who is invested by
law with power and authority to select, appoint, or employ any deputy,
deputies, or other necessary employees subject to civil service;
(3) "Appointment" includes all means of selecting, appointing, or
employing any person to any office, place, position, or employment
subject to civil service;
(4) "County" means any county of the state, or any counties
combined pursuant to RCW 41.14.040 for the purpose of carrying out the
provisions of this chapter;
(5) "Deputy sheriff or other members of the office of county
sheriff" means all persons regularly employed in the office of county
sheriff either on a part time or full time basis.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.14.030 and 1959 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) There is created in each county and in each combination of
counties, combined pursuant to RCW 41.14.040 to carry out the
provisions of this chapter, a civil service commission which shall be
composed of three persons, or five persons under subsection (2) of this
section. The commission members shall be appointed by the board of
county commissioners, or boards of county commissioners of each
combination of counties, within sixty days after December 4, 1958. No
person shall be appointed to the commission who is not a citizen of the
United States, a resident of the county, or one of the counties
combined, for at least two years immediately preceding his appointment,
and an elector of the county wherein he resides. The term of office of
the commissioners shall be six years, except that the first three
members of the commission shall be appointed for different terms, as
follows: One to serve for a period of two years, one to serve for a
period of four years, and one to serve for a period of six years. Any
member of the commission may be removed from office for incompetency,
incompatibility, or dereliction of duty, or malfeasance in office, or
other good cause: PROVIDED, That no member of the commission shall be
removed until charges have been preferred, in writing, due notice, and
a full hearing had. Any vacancy in the commission shall be filled by
the county commissioners for the unexpired term. Two members of the
commission shall constitute a quorum and the votes of any two members
concurring shall be sufficient for the decision of all matters and the
transaction of all business to be decided or transacted by the
commission. Confirmation of the appointment of commissioners by any
legislative body shall not be required. At the time of appointment not
more than two commissioners shall be adherents of the same political
party. No member after appointment shall hold any salaried public
office or engage in county employment, other than his commission
duties. The members of the commission shall serve without
compensation.
(2) In lieu of a three-person commission as provided for in
subsection (1) of this section, in each county and in each combination
of counties combined pursuant to RCW 41.14.040 to implement this
chapter, a civil service commission consisting of five persons may be
established by ordinance. In the event that a five-member commission
is established, the terms of the present commission members do not
change. The initial term of the two additional commission members is
for six years. Three members of the commission constitute a quorum for
a five-member commission and the votes of three members concurring are
sufficient for the decision of all matters and the transaction of all
business decided or transacted by a five-member commission. At the
time of appointment of the two additional commissioners, no more than
three commissioners may be adherents of the same political party.
Except as provided for in this subsection, subsection (1) of this
section applies in all other respects to a five-member commission.

--- END ---