BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28C.04.400 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 21 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
The legislature declares that it is an important function of
government to increase opportunities for gainful employment, to assist
in promoting a productive and expanding economy, and to encourage the
flow of business and industry support to educational institutions.
Therefore, the legislature finds that it is in the public interest of
the state to encourage and facilitate the formation of cooperative
relationships between business and industry and educational
institutions which provide for the development and significant
expansion of programs of skills training and education consistent with
employment needs and to make interested individuals aware of the
employment opportunities presented thereby. It is the policy of the
state of Washington to ensure that programs of skill training are: (1)
Available on a regional basis and are utilized by a variety of
businesses and industries; and (2) closely linked to cluster and
industry specific public investments.

Sec. 2 RCW 28C.04.410 and 1999 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 28C.04.390 and 28C.04.420.
(1) "Applicant" means an educational institution which has made
application for a job skills grant under RCW 28C.04.390 and 28C.04.420.
(2) "Business and industry" means a private corporation,
institution, firm, person, group, or association concerned with
commerce, trades, manufacturing, or the provision of services within
the state, or a public or nonprofit hospital licensed by the department
of social and health services.
(3) "Dislocated worker" means an individual who meets the
definition of dislocated worker contained in P.L. 105-220, Sec. 101 on
July 25, 1999.
(4) "Educational institution" means a public secondary or
postsecondary institution, an independent institution, or a private
career school or college within the state authorized by law to provide
a program of skills training or education beyond the secondary school
level. Any educational institution receiving a job skills grant under
RCW 28C.04.420 ((through 28C.04.480)) shall be free of sectarian
control or influence as set forth in Article IX, section 4 of the state
Constitution.
(5) "Equipment" means tangible personal property which will further
the objectives of the supported program and for which a definite value
and evidence in support of the value have been provided by the donor.
(6) "Financial support" means any thing of value which is
contributed by business, industry, and others to an educational
institution which is reasonably calculated to support directly the
development and expansion of a particular program under RCW 28C.04.390
and 28C.04.420 and represents an addition to any financial support
previously or customarily provided to such educational institutions by
the donor. "Financial support" includes, but is not limited to, funds,
equipment, facilities, faculty, and scholarships for matriculating
students and trainees.
(7) "Job skills grant" means funding that is provided to an
educational institution by the ((commission)) college board for the
development or significant expansion of a program under RCW 28C.04.390
and 28C.04.420.
(8) "Job skills program" means a program of skills training or
education separate from and in addition to existing vocational
education programs and which:
(a) Provides short-term training which has been designated for
specific industries;
(b) Provides training for prospective employees before a new plant
opens or when existing industry expands;
(c) Includes training and retraining for workers already employed
by an existing industry or business where necessary to avoid
dislocation or where upgrading of existing employees would create new
vacancies for unemployed persons;
(d) Serves areas with high concentrations of economically
disadvantaged persons and high unemployment;
(e) Serves areas with new and growing industries;
(f) Serves areas where there is a shortage of skilled labor to meet
job demands; or
(g) Promotes the location of new industry in areas affected by
economic dislocation.
(9) "Technical assistance" means professional and any other
assistance provided by business and industry to an educational
institution, which is reasonably calculated to support directly the
development and expansion of a particular program and which represents
an addition to any technical assistance previously or customarily
provided to the educational institutions by the donor.
(10) "College board" means the state board for community and
technical colleges under chapter 28B.50 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 28C.04.420 and 1999 c 121 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The college board may, subject to appropriation from the
legislature or from funds made available from any other public or
private source and pursuant to rules adopted by the college board with
the advice of the workforce training customer advisory committee
established in RCW 28C.04.390, provide job skills grants to educational
institutions. The job skills grants shall be used exclusively for
programs which are consistent with the job skills program. The college
board shall work in collaboration with the workforce training customer
advisory committee established in RCW 28C.04.390 to assure that:
(1) The program is within the scope of the job skills program under
this chapter and may reasonably be expected to succeed and thereby
increase employment within the state;
(2) Provision has been made to use any available alternative
funding from local, state, and federal sources;
(3) The job skills grant will only be used to cover the costs
associated with the program;
(4) The program will not unnecessarily duplicate existing programs
and could not be provided by another educational institution more
effectively or efficiently;
(5) The program involves an area of skills training and education
for which there is a demonstrable need;
(6) The applicant has made provisions for the use of existing
federal and state resources for student financial assistance;
(7) The job skills grant is essential to the success of the program
as the resources of the applicant are inadequate to attract the
technical assistance and financial support necessary for the program
from business and industry;
(8) The program represents a collaborative partnership between
business, industry, labor, educational institutions, and other
partners, as appropriate;
(9) The commitment of financial support from business and industry
shall be equal to or greater than the amount of the requested job
skills grant;
(10) Binding commitments have been made to the ((commission))
college board by the applicant for adequate reporting of information
and data regarding the program to the commission, particularly
information concerning the recruitment and employment of trainees and
students, and including a requirement for an annual or other periodic
audit of the books of the applicant directly related to the program,
and for such control on the part of the ((commission)) college board as
it considers prudent over the management of the program, so as to
protect the use of public funds, including, in the discretion of the
((commission)) college board and without limitation, right of access to
financial and other records of the applicant directly related to the
programs; ((and))
(11) A provision has been made by the applicant to work, in
cooperation with the employment security department, to identify and
screen potential trainees, and that provision has been made by the
applicant for the participation as trainees of low-income persons
including temporary assistance for needy families recipients,
dislocated workers, and persons from minority and economically
disadvantaged groups to participate in the program; and
(12) The following will be met in regards to the job skills
program:
(a) Development of additional mechanisms for identification of, and
outreach to, firms with a strong potential to effectively compete in
the global marketplace after participating in the job skills program.
This should be done by using a variety of approaches, including
collaboration with industry and cluster associations that have
participated in cluster and industry specific public investment
programs such as industry skill panels, centers of excellence,
innovation zones, local cluster-based economic development initiatives,
and federal job training initiatives; and
(b) Encouragement of businesses participating in the job skills
program to participate in workshops or training in continuous quality
improvement, performance measurement, strategic planning, or other
approaches offered by service providers such as Washington
manufacturing services, the Washington quality award, or the Washington
technology center and designed to improve company productivity and
effectiveness.
Beginning October 1, 1999, and every two years thereafter, the
college board shall provide the legislature and the governor with a
report describing the activities and outcomes of the state job skills
program.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.330.080 and 2007 c 249 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall contract with county-designated associate
development organizations to increase the support for and coordination
of community and economic development services in communities or
regional areas. The organizations contracted with in each community or
regional area shall be broadly representative of community and economic
interests. The organization shall be capable of identifying key
economic and community development problems, developing appropriate
solutions, and mobilizing broad support for recommended initiatives.
The contracting organization shall work with and include local
governments, local chambers of commerce, workforce development
councils, port districts, labor groups, institutions of higher
education, community action programs, and other appropriate private,
public, or nonprofit community and economic development groups. The
scope of services delivered under these contracts shall include two
broad areas of work:
(1) Direct assistance, including business planning, to companies
who need support to stay in business, expand, or relocate to Washington
from out of state or other countries. Assistance includes:
(a) Working with the appropriate partners, including but not
limited to, local governments, workforce development organizations,
port districts, community colleges and higher education institutions,
export assistance providers, the Washington manufacturing services, the
Washington state quality award((,)) council, small business assistance
programs, and other federal, state, and local programs to facilitate
the alignment of planning efforts and the seamless delivery of business
support services in the county;
(b) Providing information on state and local permitting processes,
tax issues, and other essential information for operating, expanding,
or locating a business in Washington;
(c) Marketing Washington and local areas as excellent locations to
expand or relocate a business and positioning Washington as a globally
competitive place to grow business, which may include developing and
executing regional plans to attract companies from out of state;
(d) Working with businesses on site location and selection
assistance;
(e) Providing business retention and expansion services, including
business outreach and monitoring efforts to identify and address
challenges and opportunities faced by businesses; and
(f) ((Participate [Participating])) Participating in economic
development system-wide discussions regarding gaps in business start-up
assistance in Washington; and
(2) Support for regional economic research and regional planning
efforts to implement target industry strategies and other economic
development strategies that support increased living standards and
increase foreign direct investment throughout Washington. Activities
include:
(a) Participation in regional planning efforts involving combined
strategies around workforce development and economic development
policies and programs. The contracting organization shall participate
with the local workforce development councils in carrying out such
planning efforts and with the state board for community and technical
colleges as created in RCW 28B.50.050, and any local community and
technical colleges, in providing for the coordination of job skills
program training within its region;
(b) Collecting and reporting data as specified by the contract with
the department for statewide systemic analysis. The department shall
consult with the Washington state economic development commission in
the establishment of such uniform data as is needed to conduct a
statewide systemic analysis of the state's economic development
programs and expenditures. In cooperation with other local, regional,
and state planning efforts, contracting organizations may provide
insight into the needs of target industry clusters, business expansion
plans, early detection of potential relocations or layoffs, training
needs, and other appropriate economic information;
(c) In conjunction with other governmental jurisdictions and
institutions, participate in the development of a countywide economic
development plan, consistent with the state comprehensive plan for
economic development developed by the Washington state economic
development commission.

--- END ---