BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is a primary
goal of economic development to increase the competitiveness of
Washington businesses in the global market. The legislature further
finds that ISO-9000 certification is highly regarded in the global
market and that attaining certification improves relationships with
customers and suppliers. The legislature further finds that attaining
ISO-9000 certification is an important step for many Washington
businesses in becoming viable exporters or suppliers for companies that
export. The process of becoming ISO-9000 certified can prove a
complicated and expensive one for many Washington businesses.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.31.088 and 1994 c 140 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The department, through its business assistance center, shall
assist companies seeking to adopt ISO-9000 quality standards. The
department shall:
(a) Prepare and disseminate information regarding ISO-9000;
(b) Assemble and maintain information on public and private sector
individuals, organizations, educational institutions, and advanced
technology centers that can provide technical assistance to firms that
wish to become ISO-registered;
(c) Assemble and maintain information on Washington firms which
have received ISO registration;
(d) Undertake other activities it deems necessary to execute this
section;
(e) Survey appropriate sectors to determine the level of interest
in receiving ISO-9000 certification and coordinate with the program;
(f) Establish a mechanism for businesses to make self-assessments
of relative need to become ISO-9000 certified;
(g) Assist and support nonprofit organizations, and other
organizations, currently providing education, screening, and
certification training; and
(h) Coordinate the Washington program with other similar state,
regional, and federal programs.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "ISO-9000" means the series
of standards published in 1987, and subsequent revisions, by the
international organization for standardization for quality assurance in
design, development, production, final inspection and testing, and
installation and servicing of products, processes, and services.
(3) For the purposes of this section, registration to the American
national standards institute/American society for quality control Q90
series shall be considered ISO-9000 registration.)) For the purposes of
this act, "ISO-9000" means the series of standards published in 1987,
and subsequent revisions, by the international organization for
standardization which provides quality assurance in design,
development, production, final inspection and testing, and installation
and servicing of products, processes, and services.
(2) The ISO-9000 quality standards training assistance program is
established in the department of community, trade, and economic
development. In implementing the program, the department must:
(a) Convene a working group, consisting of representatives from
Washington manufacturing services, the Washington technology center,
and the small business development center to develop and implement an
ISO-9000 quality standards training assistance program; and
(b) Contract for technical assistance services to be delivered to
businesses in the state to allow them to meet ISO-9000 certification
standards. The organization with which the department contracts under
this subsection (2)(b) must:
(i) Provide to companies ISO-9000 certification training classes
that must: Instruct companies on the requirements of the ISO-9000
standards; offer internal audit training; critique their procedures;
offer suggestions as to how their procedures can be improved; and
provide a gap audit at the completion of the program;
(ii) Recruit for the classes using their own network of contacts,
as well as industry associations, cluster associations, chambers of
commerce, and economic development councils to fill classes;
(iii) Provide a lead auditor, who has obtained certification from
a nationally recognized certification board;
(iv) Provide for a gap audit by lead auditors to help companies
finalize their requirements for certification. The auditor must give
the companies a list of nonconformances with the ISO-9000 standards.
After these nonconformances are corrected by a company, the company
must be determined to have successfully completed the program; and
(v) Charge a fee to companies that participate in the program.
This fee may be on a sliding scale. After a company successfully
completes the program and becomes ISO-9000 certified, the company must
be refunded half of this fee.

--- END ---