BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.473 and 2005 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person in a residence or commercial establishment which has
an adequate source of heat without burning wood shall:
(a) Not burn wood in any solid fuel burning device whenever the
department has determined under RCW 70.94.715 that any air pollution
episode exists in that area;
(b) Not burn wood in any solid fuel burning device except those
which are either Oregon department of environmental quality phase II or
United States environmental protection agency certified or certified by
the department under RCW 70.94.457(1) or a pellet stove either
certified or issued an exemption by the United States environmental
protection agency in accordance with Title 40, Part 60 of the code of
federal regulations, in the geographical area and for the period of
time that a first stage of impaired air quality has been determined, by
the department or any authority, for that area. A first stage of
impaired air quality is reached when:
(i) Fine particulates are at an ambient level of thirty-five
micrograms per cubic meter measured on a twenty-four hour average; and
(ii) Forecasted meteorological conditions are not expected to allow
levels of fine particulates to decline below thirty-five micrograms per
cubic meter for a period of forty-eight hours or more from the time
that the fine particulates are measured at the trigger level; and
(c) Not burn wood in any solid fuel burning device in a
geographical area and for the period of time that a second stage of
impaired air quality has been determined by the department or any
authority, for that area. A second stage of impaired air quality is
reached when:
(i) A first stage of impaired air quality has been in force and not
been sufficient to reduce the increasing fine ((particle
[particulate])) particulate pollution trend;
(ii) Fine particulates are at an ambient level of sixty micrograms
per cubic meter measured on a twenty-four hour average; and
(iii) Forecasted meteorological conditions are not expected to
allow levels of fine particulates to decline below sixty micrograms per
cubic meter for a period of forty-eight hours or more from the time
that the fine particulates are measured at the trigger level.
(2) Until June 30, 2009, an authority comprised of one county east
of the Cascade mountains with a population of equal to or greater than
four hundred thousand people, may determine by rule an alternative
ambient air level of fine particulates that defines when a first stage
and when a second stage of impaired air quality exists under subsection
(1) of this section. All other criteria of subsection (1) of this
section continue to apply.
(3) Actions of the department and local air pollution control
authorities under this section shall preempt actions of other state
agencies and local governments for the purposes of controlling air
pollution from solid fuel burning devices, except where authorized by
chapter 199, Laws of 1991.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature finds that there are
communities in the state that may exceed recently adopted lower
national ambient air quality standards for fine particulate and that
wood smoke emissions from solid fuel burning devices are a source of
fine particulate.
(2) The department of ecology shall prepare a report to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2007, with recommendations that may
include statutory or regulatory changes, incentives, and other
strategies that will reduce wood smoke where it is likely to contribute
to nonattainment with the new national ambient air quality standards
for fine particulates in Washington state. In preparing its report,
the department of ecology shall seek input from all regional air
quality agencies, the state department of health, local health
departments, and the hearth products industries.

--- END ---