BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.04.060 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 63 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commission shall hold at least one regular meeting during
the first two months of each calendar quarter, and special meetings
when called by the chair and by five members. The chair of the
commission shall set the agenda for commission meetings. Five members
constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.
(2) The commission at a meeting in each odd-numbered year shall
elect one of its members as ((chairman)) chair and another member as
((vice chairman)) vice-chair, each of whom shall serve for a term of
two years or until a successor is elected and qualified.
(3) No member may serve as chair of the commission unless that
member has been confirmed by the senate.
(4) Members of the commission shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.250. In addition, members are allowed their travel
expenses incurred while absent from their usual places of residence in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

--- END ---