BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds it is necessary to
realign Washington's child welfare system from time to time, as more
information becomes available about the types of evidence-based and
emerging practices that keep Washington's families strong and healthy.
The legislature intends to clarify the mission and focus of the
administration within the department of social and health services that
is primarily responsible for the delivery of services to families,
children, and youth so that children and youth will have safe,
permanent homes and so that families will be better supported in their
efforts to care for and parent their own children, whenever possible.
The legislature believes that clear and specific legislative direction,
setting out the importance of collaboration with the community and how
services to families, adolescents, and children must be provided, will
help to provide a strong foundation for a more efficient and effective
agency.
The legislature expects the new children in families administration
to cooperate with communities to deliver services and to prevent child
abuse and neglect, to provide intervention services early to preserve
the family when high-risk situations are identified, and to provide
effective services to protect children and strengthen families when
child abuse and neglect have occurred.
The legislature intends that the new children in families
administration work with community partners, including foster parents,
to provide services to support the efforts of families to care for and
parent their own children safely, protect abused and neglected
children, and provide quality care and permanent families for children.
The legislature intends that the new administration work with families
to create opportunities to strengthen the parent-child relationship,
encourage social behaviors that connect parents to beneficial community
resources, and eliminate practices that are unsafe for children and
youth. The new administration's responsibility will include working
with community partners to promote safe and stable placements of
children, facilitate the delivery of appropriate treatment services to
families and their children, help to connect youth to appropriate
services, improve foster parent training and support, and help to
maintain connections between siblings in out-of-home placement.
The legislature finds that confidence in government is critical to
achieving the goals of the mission and that confidence is built by
establishing accountability for providing needed services to families,
children, and youth. The legislature finds that a clear mission will
help the new administration fulfill the responsibility of protecting
children, helping their parents, and finding families for children, in
a cost-effective manner. The legislature intends that the leadership
of the new administration be held accountable to produce results, based
upon the legislature's articulation of the agency's mission and goals.
The legislature also encourages the new administration to recognize the
critical nature of fostering a sense of employee satisfaction and
achievement in doing the important work of the administration.

PART 1
CHILDREN IN FAMILIES ADMINISTRATION
Sec. 101 RCW 43.20A.010 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 211 are each
amended to read as follows:
The department of social and health services is designed to
integrate and coordinate all those activities involving provision of
care for individuals who, as a result of their economic, social or
health condition, require financial assistance, institutional care,
rehabilitation or other social and health services. In order to
provide for maximum efficiency of operation consistent with meeting the
needs of those served or affected, the department will encompass
substantially all of the powers, duties and functions vested by law on
June 30, 1970, in the department of public assistance, the department
of institutions, the veterans' rehabilitation council and the division
of vocational rehabilitation of the coordinating council on
occupational education. The department will ((concern itself with
changing social needs, and will)) expedite the development and
implementation of programs designed to achieve its goals. In
furtherance of this policy, it is generally the ((legislative))
legislature's intent to set forth ((only)) the broad outline of the
structure of the department, leaving specific details of its internal
organization and management to those charged with its administration.

Sec. 102 RCW 43.20A.060 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 213 are each
amended to read as follows:
The department of social and health services shall be subdivided
into divisions and administrations, including a division of vocational
rehabilitation and the children in families administration. Except as
otherwise specified or as federal requirements may differently require,
these divisions and administrations shall be established and organized
in accordance with plans to be prepared by the secretary and approved
by the governor. In preparing such plans, the secretary shall endeavor
to promote efficient public management, to improve programs, and to
take full advantage of the economies, both fiscal and administrative,
to be gained from the consolidation of the departments of public
assistance, institutions, the veterans' rehabilitation council, and the
division of vocational rehabilitation of the coordinating council on
occupational education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The mission of the children in families administration is to
coordinate and work with the community, including foster parents, to
develop services and programs designed to prevent child abuse and
neglect, to support the efforts of families to care for and parent
their own children safely, to strengthen families when child abuse and
neglect have occurred, to provide intervention services early designed
to preserve the family when high-risk situations are identified, to
provide effective services to protect abused and neglected children,
and to ensure permanent families for children. The administration
must, either directly or through interagency agreements or contracts
with service providers in local communities:
(a) Promote safe and stable placements of children;
(b) Facilitate the delivery of appropriate treatment services to
families and their children;
(c) Help connect youth to appropriate services;
(d) Improve foster parent recruitment, retention, training, and
support; and
(e) Help maintain connections between siblings in out-of-home
placement.
(2) The administration must, within available funds, offer or
contract with service providers who offer evidence-based programs or
practices, as well as promising practices, in such areas as substance
abuse treatment, mental health services, domestic violence treatment,
parent-child interaction therapy, and parenting classes.
(3) If the workload for the administration's social workers reaches
a level in which the focus of the social workers' attention in a
particular office shifts away from the priority work of conducting
social work in the field, the administration may hire support staff to
fulfill such functions as:
(a) Providing in-office support that does not require the level of
education and training of a social worker, such as providing
transportation, gathering documents, delivering information, and other
administrative functions;
(b) Assisting with court discovery requests and public disclosure
requests; and
(c) Providing in-home services to families to teach basic skills
necessary to better care for their children.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Promising practice" means a practice that presents, based on
preliminary information, potential for becoming a research-based or
consensus-based practice.
(b) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had
multiple site, random controlled trials across heterogeneous
populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for
the population.

PART 2
REFERENCES TO CHILDREN IN FAMILIES ADMINISTRATION
Sec. 201 RCW 26.44.125 and 1998 c 314 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who is named as an alleged perpetrator after October
1, 1998, in a founded report of child abuse or neglect has the right to
seek review and amendment of the finding as provided in this section.
(2) Within twenty calendar days after receiving written notice from
the department under RCW 26.44.100 that a person is named as an alleged
perpetrator in a founded report of child abuse or neglect, he or she
may request that the department review the finding. The request must
be made in writing. If a request for review is not made as provided in
this subsection, the alleged perpetrator may not further challenge the
finding and shall have no right to agency review or to an adjudicative
hearing or judicial review of the finding.
(3) Upon receipt of a written request for review, the department
shall review and, if appropriate, may amend the finding. Management
level staff within the ((children's)) children in families
administration designated by the secretary shall be responsible for the
review. The review must be conducted in accordance with procedures the
department establishes by rule. Upon completion of the review, the
department shall notify the alleged perpetrator in writing of the
agency's determination. The notification must be sent by certified
mail, return receipt requested, to the person's last known address.
(4) If, following agency review, the report remains founded, the
person named as the alleged perpetrator in the report may request an
adjudicative hearing to contest the finding. The adjudicative
proceeding is governed by chapter 34.05 RCW and this section. The
request for an adjudicative proceeding must be filed within thirty
calendar days after receiving notice of the agency review
determination. If a request for an adjudicative proceeding is not made
as provided in this subsection, the alleged perpetrator may not further
challenge the finding and shall have no right to agency review or to an
adjudicative hearing or judicial review of the finding.
(5) Reviews and hearings conducted under this section are
confidential and shall not be open to the public. Information about
reports, reviews, and hearings may be disclosed only in accordance with
federal and state laws pertaining to child welfare records and child
protective services reports.
(6) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 202 RCW 26.44.220 and 2005 c 345 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Within existing resources, the department shall develop a
curriculum designed to train staff of the department's ((children's))
children in families administration who assess or provide services to
adolescents on how to screen and respond to referrals to child
protective services when those referrals may involve victims of abuse
or neglect between the ages of eleven and eighteen. At a minimum, the
curriculum developed pursuant to this section shall include:
(a) Review of relevant laws and regulations, including the
requirement that the department investigate complaints if a parent's or
caretaker's actions result in serious physical or emotional harm or
present an imminent risk of serious harm to any person under eighteen;
(b) Review of policies of the department's ((children's)) children
in families administration that require assessment and screening of
abuse and neglect referrals on the basis of risk and not age;
(c) Explanation of safety assessment and risk assessment models;
(d) Case studies of situations in which the department has received
reports of alleged abuse or neglect of older children and adolescents;
(e) Discussion of best practices in screening and responding to
referrals involving older children and adolescents; and
(f) Discussion of how abuse and neglect referrals related to
adolescents are investigated and when law enforcement must be notified.
(2) As it develops its curriculum pursuant to this section, the
department shall request that the office of the family and children's
ombudsman review and comment on its proposed training materials. The
department shall consider the comments and recommendations of the
office of the family and children's ombudsman as it develops the
curriculum required by this section.
(3) The department shall complete the curriculum materials required
by this section no later than December 31, 2005.
(4) Within existing resources, the department shall incorporate
training on the curriculum developed pursuant to this section into
existing training for child protective services workers who screen
intake calls, ((children's)) children in families administration staff
responsible for assessing or providing services to older children and
adolescents, and all new employees of the ((children's)) children in
families administration responsible for assessing or providing services
to older children and adolescents.

Sec. 203 RCW 28A.300.800 and 2002 c 326 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Within existing resources, the department of social and health
services, in cooperation with the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, shall convene a working group to prepare a plan for
the legislature which addresses educational stability and continuity
for school-age children who enter into short-term foster care. The
working group shall be comprised of representatives from:
(a) The ((children's)) children in families administration of the
department of social and health services;
(b) The special education, transportation, and apportionment
divisions of the office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(c) The Washington state institute for public policy;
(d) School districts;
(e) Organizations that regularly advocate for foster children;
(f) Foster parents; and
(g) Other individuals with related expertise as deemed appropriate
by the working group.
(2)(a) The working group shall develop a plan for assuring that the
best interests of the child are a primary consideration in the school
placement of a child in short-term foster care. The plan must:
(i) Determine the current status of school placement for children
placed in short-term foster care;
(ii) Identify options and possible funding sources from existing
resources which could be made available to assure that children placed
in short-term foster care are able to remain in the school where they
were enrolled prior to placement;
(iii) Submit recommendations to the legislature by November 1,
2002, to assure the best interest of the child receives primary
consideration in school placement decisions.
(b) The plan shall be developed within existing resources.

Sec. 204 RCW 72.05.435 and 1998 c 269 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish by rule a policy for the common
use of residential group homes for juvenile offenders under the
jurisdiction of the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the
((children's)) children in families administration.
(2) A juvenile confined under the jurisdiction of the juvenile
rehabilitation administration who is convicted of a class A felony is
not eligible for placement in a community facility operated by
((children's)) children in families administration that houses
juveniles who are not under the jurisdiction of juvenile rehabilitation
administration unless:
(a) The juvenile is housed in a separate living unit solely for
juvenile offenders;
(b) The community facility is a specialized treatment program and
the youth is not assessed as sexually aggressive under RCW 13.40.470;
or
(c) The community facility is a specialized treatment program that
houses one or more sexually aggressive youth and the juvenile is not
assessed as sexually vulnerable under RCW 13.40.470.

Sec. 205 RCW 74.13.570 and 2005 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish an oversight committee composed
of staff from the ((children's)) children in families administration of
the department, the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
the higher education coordinating board, foster youth, former foster
youth, foster parents, and advocacy agencies to develop strategies for
maintaining foster children in the schools they were attending at the
time they entered foster care and to promote opportunities for foster
youth to participate in postsecondary education or training.
(2) The duties of the oversight committee shall include, but are
not limited to:
(a) Developing strategies for school-based recruitment of foster
homes;
(b) Monitoring the progress of current pilot projects that assist
foster children to continue attending the schools they were attending
at the time they entered foster care;
(c) Overseeing the expansion of the number of pilot projects;
(d) Promoting the use of best practices, throughout the state,
demonstrated by the pilot projects and other programs relating to
maintaining foster children in the schools they were attending at the
time they entered foster care;
(e) Informing the legislature of the status of efforts to maintain
foster children in the schools they were attending at the time they
entered foster care;
(f) Assessing the scope and nature of statewide need among current
and former foster youth for assistance to pursue and participate in
postsecondary education or training opportunities;
(g) Identifying available sources of funding available in the state
for services to former foster youth to pursue and participate in
postsecondary education or training opportunities;
(h) Reviewing the effectiveness of activities in the state to
support former foster youth to pursue and participate in postsecondary
education or training opportunities;
(i) Identifying new activities, or existing activities that should
be modified or expanded, to best meet statewide needs; and
(j) Reviewing on an ongoing basis the progress toward improving
educational and vocational outcomes for foster youth.

Sec. 206 RCW 74.13.660 and 2006 c 353 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Under the foster parent critical support and retention program,
foster parents who care for sexually reactive children, physically
assaultive children, or children with other high-risk behaviors shall
receive:
(1) Availability at any time of the day or night to address
specific concerns related to the identified child;
(2) Assessment of risk and development of a safety and supervision
plan;
(3) Home-based foster parent training utilizing evidence-based
models; and
(4) Referral to relevant community services and training provided
by the local ((children's)) children in families administration office
or community agencies.

PART 3
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

--- END ---