BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.110.005 and 2006 c 171 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington's dependence on energy supplied from outside the
state and volatile global energy markets makes its economy and citizens
vulnerable to unpredictable and high energy prices;
(2) Washington's dependence on petroleum-based fuels increases
energy costs for citizens and businesses;
(3) Diesel soot from diesel engines ranks as the highest toxic air
pollutant in Washington, leading to hundreds of premature deaths and
increasing rates of asthma and other lung diseases;
(4) The use of biodiesel results in significantly less air
pollution than traditional diesel fuels;
(5) Improper disposal and treatment of organic waste from farms and
livestock operations can have a significant negative impact on water
quality;
(6) Landfill gas and wastewater treatment gas, if vented into the
atmosphere, poses a great risk to Washington's climate;
(7) Washington has abundant supplies of landfill methane and
wastewater treatment gas and organic wastes from farms ((that)), which
can be used for energy production, and abundant farmland where crops
could be grown to supplement or supplant petroleum-based fuels;
(((7))) (8) The use of energy and fuel derived from these sources
can help citizens and businesses conserve energy and reduce the use of
petroleum-based fuels, would improve air and water quality in
Washington, reduce environmental risks from landfills, wastewater
treatment plants, and farm wastes, create new markets for farm
products, and provide new industries and jobs for Washington citizens;
(((8))) (9) The bioenergy industry is a new and developing industry
that is, in part, limited by the availability of capital for the
construction of facilities for converting farm and forest products and
waste gases into energy and fuels and the availability of
infrastructure necessary to allow motorists in Washington to refuel
their biofueled or alternative fueled vehicles while traveling along
major state highways;
(((9))) (10) The 2010 Olympic and Paralympic Winter Games present
an opportunity to further Washington's energy independence by working
with Vancouver, British Columbia, Oregon, and California to develop a
hydrogen highway to showcase sustainable transportation and all of
Washington state's biofuels and alternative fuels, and to accelerate
the commercialization of hydrogen and fuel cell technologies;
(11) Instead of leaving our economy at the mercy of global events,
and the policies of foreign nations, Washington state should adopt a
policy of energy independence; and
(((10))) (12) The energy freedom program is meant to lead
Washington state towards energy independence.
Therefore, the legislature finds that it is in the public interest
to encourage the rapid adoption and use of bioenergy, to develop a
viable bioenergy industry within Washington state, to promote public
research and development in bioenergy sources and markets, ((and)) to
support a viable agriculture industry to grow bioenergy crops, and to
develop infrastructure for the use of alternative fuels and biofuels by
the motorists of Washington state. To accomplish this, the energy
freedom program is established to promote public research and
development in bioenergy, ((and)) to stimulate the construction of
facilities in Washington to generate energy from farm sources or
convert organic matter, landfill gas, or wastewater treatment gas into
fuels, and to develop refueling infrastructure in Washington state to
ensure that alternative fuels and biofuels are readily accessible to
the motorists of Washington state.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.110.010 and 2006 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Alternative fuel" means electricity, hydrogen, or liquid
natural gas produced from landfill methane gas or wastewater treatment
gas.
(2) "Applicant" means any political subdivision of the state,
including port districts, counties, cities, towns, special purpose
districts, and other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal
corporations. "Applicant" may also include federally recognized tribes
and state institutions of higher education with appropriate research
capabilities.
(((2))) (3) "Assistance" includes loans, leases, product purchases,
or other forms of financial or technical assistance.
(((3))) (4) "Department" means the department of agriculture.
(((4))) (5) "Director" means the director of the department of
agriculture.
(((5))) (6) "Green highway zone" means an area in the state
designated by the department that is within reasonable proximity of
state route number 5, state route number 90, and state route number 82.
(7) "Peer review committee" means a board, appointed by the
director, that includes bioenergy specialists, energy conservation
specialists, scientists, and individuals with specific recognized
expertise.
(((6))) (8) "Project" means the construction of facilities,
including the purchase of equipment, to convert landfill methane gas,
wastewater treatment gas, or farm products or wastes into electricity
or gaseous or liquid fuels or other coproducts associated with such
conversion. These specifically include fixed or mobile facilities to
generate electricity or methane from the anaerobic digestion of organic
matter, and fixed or mobile facilities for extracting oils from canola,
rape, mustard, and other oilseeds. "Project" may also include the
construction of facilities associated with such conversion for the
distribution and storage of such feedstocks and fuels.
(((7))) (9) "Refueling project" means the construction of new
biofuel and alternative fuel refueling facilities, as well as upgrades
and expansion of existing refueling facilities, that will enable these
facilities to offer alternative fuels to the motoring public.
(10) "Research and development project" means research and
development, by an institution of higher education as defined in
subsection (((1))) (2) of this section, relating to:
(a) Bioenergy sources including but not limited to biomass and
associated gases, landfill gas, and wastewater treatment gas; or
(b) The development of markets for bioenergy coproducts.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.110.020 and 2006 c 171 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The energy freedom program is established within the
department. The director may establish policies and procedures
necessary for processing, reviewing, and approving applications made
under this chapter.
(2) When reviewing applications submitted under this program, the
director shall consult with those agencies having expertise and
knowledge to assess the technical and business feasibility of the
project and probability of success. These agencies may include, but
are not limited to, Washington State University, the University of
Washington, the department of ecology, the department of community,
trade, and economic development, and the Washington state conservation
commission.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
director, in cooperation with the department of community, trade, and
economic development, may approve an application only if the director
finds:
(a) The project will convert landfill methane gas, wastewater
treatment gas, or farm products or wastes directly into electricity or
into gaseous or liquid fuels or other coproducts associated with such
conversion;
(b) The project demonstrates technical feasibility and directly
assists in moving a commercially viable project into the marketplace
for use by Washington state citizens;
(c) The facility will produce long-term economic benefits to the
state, a region of the state, or a particular community in the state;
(d) The project does not require continuing state support;
(e) The assistance will result in new jobs, job retention, or
higher incomes for citizens of the state;
(f) The state is provided an option under the assistance agreement
to purchase a portion of the fuel or feedstock to be produced by the
project, exercisable by the department of general administration;
(g) The project will increase energy independence or diversity for
the state;
(h) The project will use landfill methane gas, wastewater treatment
gas, or feedstocks produced in the state, if feasible, except this
criterion does not apply to the construction of facilities used to
distribute and store fuels that are produced from landfill methane gas,
wastewater treatment gas, or farm products or wastes;
(i) Any product produced by the project will be suitable for its
intended use, will meet accepted national or state standards, and will
be stored and distributed in a safe and environmentally sound manner;
(j) The application provides for adequate reporting or disclosure
of financial and employment data to the director, and permits the
director to require an annual or other periodic audit of the project
books; and
(k) For research and development projects, the application has been
independently reviewed by a peer review committee as defined in RCW
15.110.010 and the findings delivered to the director.
(4) When reviewing an application for a refueling project, the
director may award assistance to an applicant if the director finds:
(a) The project will offer biofuels or alternative fuels to the
motoring public;
(b) The project does not require continued state support;
(c) The project is located within a green highway zone as defined
in RCW 15.110.010;
(d) The project will contribute towards an efficient and adequately
spaced biofuel or alternative fuel refueling network along the green
highways designated in RCW 47.17.020, 47.17.135, and 47.17.140; and
(e) The project will result in increased access to a biofueling
infrastructure or an alternative fueling infrastructure for the
motoring public along the green highways designated in RCW 47.17.020,
47.17.135, and 47.17.140.
(5) The director may approve ((an)) a project application for
assistance under subsection (3) of this section up to five million
dollars. In no circumstances shall this assistance constitute more
than fifty percent of the total project cost.
(((5))) (6) The director may approve a refueling project
application for assistance under subsection (4) of this section up to
fifty thousand dollars. In no circumstances shall assistance awarded
constitute more than fifty percent of the total project cost.
(7) The director shall enter into agreements with approved
applicants to fix the terms and rates of the assistance to minimize the
costs to the applicants, and to encourage establishment of a viable
bioenergy industry. The agreement shall include provisions to protect
the state's investment, including a requirement that a successful
applicant enter into contracts with any partners that may be involved
in the use of any assistance provided under this program, including
services, facilities, infrastructure, or equipment. Contracts with any
partners shall become part of the application record.
(((6))) (8) The director may defer any payments for up to twenty-four months or until the project starts to receive revenue from
operations, whichever is sooner.

Sec. 4 RCW 15.110.040 and 2006 c 171 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the total requested dollar amount of assistance awarded for
projects under RCW 15.110.020(3) exceeds the amount available in the
energy freedom account created in RCW 15.110.050, the applications must
be prioritized based upon the following criteria:
(((1))) (a) The extent to which the project will help reduce
dependence on petroleum fuels and imported energy either directly or
indirectly;
(((2))) (b) The extent to which the project will reduce air and
water pollution either directly or indirectly;
(((3))) (c) The extent to which the project will establish a viable
bioenergy production capacity in Washington;
(((4))) (d) The benefits to Washington's agricultural producers;
and
(((5))) (e) The number and quality of jobs and economic benefits
created by the project.
(2) This section does not apply to assistance awarded for refueling
projects under RCW 15.110.020(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 15.110 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If the total requested dollar amount of funds for refueling
projects under RCW 15.110.020(4) exceeds the amount available in the
green energy incentive subaccount created in section 6 of this act, the
applications must be prioritized based upon the following criteria:
(a) The extent to which the project will help reduce dependence on
petroleum fuels and imported energy either directly or indirectly;
(b) The extent to which the project will reduce air and water
pollution either directly or indirectly;
(c) The extent to which the project will establish a viable biofuel
or alternative fuel production capacity in Washington;
(d) The extent to which the project will make biofuels and
alternative fuels more accessible to the motoring public;
(e) The benefits to Washington's agricultural or alternative fuel
producers; and
(f) The number and quality of jobs and economic benefits created by
the project.
(2) This section does not apply to assistance awarded for projects
under RCW 15.110.020(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 15.110 RCW
to read as follows:
The green energy incentive subaccount is created as a subaccount of
the energy freedom account. All receipts from appropriations made to
the green energy incentive subaccount shall be deposited into the
subaccount and shall be appropriated only for:
(1) Refueling projects awarded under this chapter;
(2) Pilot projects for plug-in hybrids;
(3) Programs to reduce truck stop idling;
(4) Demonstration projects developed with a science museum for the
purpose of bringing science education to children by way of a mobile
learning vehicle; and
(5) Demonstration projects developed with the University of
Washington that result in the design and building of a hydrogen vehicle
fueling station.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Moneys deposited in the green energy
incentive subaccount created in section 6 of this act shall not exceed
one million dollars.

Sec. 8 RCW 15.110.060 and 2006 c 171 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall report to the legislature and governor on the
status of the energy freedom program created under this chapter, on or
before December 1, 2006, and annually thereafter. This report must
include information on the projects that have been funded, the status
of these projects, and their environmental, energy savings, and job
creation benefits, as well as an assessment of the availability of
biofuels and alternative fuels in the state.

Sec. 9 RCW 47.17.020 and 1970 ex.s. c 51 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 5, and designated
as a Washington green highway, is established as follows:
Beginning at the Washington-Oregon boundary line on the interstate
bridge over the Columbia river at Vancouver, thence northerly by way of
Kelso, Chehalis, Centralia, Olympia, Tacoma, Seattle, Everett and Mt.
Vernon, thence northwesterly to the east of Lake Samish, thence
northeasterly and northerly by way of Bellingham to the international
boundary line in the vicinity of Blaine in Whatcom county.

Sec. 10 RCW 47.17.135 and 1979 ex.s. c 33 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 82, and
designated as a Washington green highway, is established as follows:
Beginning at a junction with state route number 90 in the vicinity
of Ellensburg, thence southerly and easterly by way of Yakima, Union
Gap, Sunnyside, Prosser, Kiona, and Goose Gap west of Richland, thence
southeasterly near Kennewick and southwesterly by way of the vicinity
of Plymouth to a crossing of the Columbia river at the Washington-Oregon boundary line.

Sec. 11 RCW 47.17.140 and 1991 c 56 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 90, and
designated as the American Veterans Memorial Highway as well as a
Washington green highway, is established as follows:
Beginning at a junction with state route number 5, thence, via the
west approach to the Lake Washington bridge in Seattle, in an easterly
direction by way of Mercer Island, North Bend, Snoqualmie pass,
Ellensburg, Vantage, Moses Lake, Ritzville, Sprague and Spokane to the
Washington-Idaho boundary line.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 6 and 8 of this act
expire June 30, 2016.

--- END ---