BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that state
investment in public infrastructure contributes to the economic
development of Washington state by encouraging private investment and
the creation of high-wage jobs. The legislature further recognizes
that, while legislative and executive branch efforts to develop a
comprehensive funding structure and systematic approach to state
infrastructure programs are important and ongoing, providing dedicated
funding for programs in chapter 43.150 RCW will provide certainty and
continuity in state economic development decisions and further
encourage private investment without diminishing the potential for
developing a coordinated infrastructure system in the state. The
legislature further finds that removing outdated and obsolete language
from chapter 43.160 RCW will streamline and enhance the understanding
of program requirements.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.160.010 and 1999 c 164 s 101 and 1999 c 94 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that it is the public policy of the state
of Washington to direct financial resources toward the fostering of
economic development through the stimulation of investment and job
opportunities and the retention of sustainable existing employment for
the general welfare of the inhabitants of the state. Reducing
unemployment and reducing the time citizens remain jobless is important
for the economic welfare of the state. A valuable means of fostering
economic development is the construction of public facilities which
contribute to the stability and growth of the state's economic base.
((Strengthening the economic base through issuance of industrial
development bonds, whether single or umbrella, further serves to reduce
unemployment. Consolidating issues of industrial development bonds
when feasible to reduce costs additionally advances the state's purpose
to improve economic vitality.)) Expenditures made for these purposes
as authorized in this chapter are declared to be in the public
interest, and constitute a proper use of public funds. A community
economic revitalization board is needed which shall aid the development
of economic opportunities. The general objectives of the board should
include:
(a) Strengthening the economies of areas of the state which have
experienced or are expected to experience chronically high unemployment
rates or below average growth in their economies;
(b) Encouraging the diversification of the economies of the state
and regions within the state in order to provide greater seasonal and
cyclical stability of income and employment;
(c) Encouraging wider access to financial resources for both large
and small industrial development projects;
(d) Encouraging new economic development or expansions to maximize
employment;
(e) Encouraging the retention of viable existing firms and
employment; and
(f) Providing incentives for expansion of employment opportunities
for groups of state residents that have been less successful relative
to other groups in efforts to gain permanent employment.
(2) The legislature also finds that the state's economic
development efforts can be enhanced by, in certain instances, providing
funds to improve state highways, county roads, or city streets for
industries considering locating or expanding in this state.
(a) The legislature finds it desirable to provide a process whereby
the need for diverse public works improvements necessitated by planned
economic development can be addressed in a timely fashion and with
coordination among all responsible governmental entities.
(b) All transportation improvements on state highways must first be
approved by the state transportation commission and the community
economic revitalization board in accordance with the procedures
established by RCW 43.160.074 and 47.01.280.
(3) The legislature also finds that the state's economic
development efforts can be enhanced by, in certain instances, providing
funds to assist development of telecommunications infrastructure that
supports business development, retention, and expansion in ((rural
natural resources impact areas and rural counties of)) the state.
(4) The legislature also finds that the state's economic
development efforts can be enhanced by providing funds to improve
markets for those recyclable materials representing a large fraction of
the waste stream. The legislature finds that public facilities which
result in private construction of processing or remanufacturing
facilities for recyclable materials are eligible for consideration from
the board.
(5) The legislature finds that sharing economic growth statewide is
important to the welfare of the state. ((Rural counties and rural
natural resources impact areas do not share in the economic vitality of
the Puget Sound region.)) The ability of ((these)) communities to
pursue business and job retention, expansion, and development
opportunities depends on their capacity to ready necessary economic
development project plans, sites, permits, and infrastructure for
private investments. Project-specific planning, predevelopment, and
infrastructure are critical ingredients for economic development.
((Rural counties and rural natural resources impact areas generally
lack these necessary tools and resources to diversify and revitalize
their economies.)) It is, therefore, the intent of the legislature to
increase the amount of funding available through the community economic
revitalization board ((for rural counties and rural natural resources
impact areas,)) and to authorize flexibility for available resources in
these areas to help fund planning, predevelopment, and construction
costs of infrastructure and facilities and sites that foster economic
vitality and diversification.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.160.020 and 2004 c 252 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board.
(2) (("Bond" means any bond, note, debenture, interim certificate,
or other evidence of financial indebtedness issued by the board
pursuant to this chapter.
(3))) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(((4) "Financial institution" means any bank, savings and loan
association, credit union, development credit corporation, insurance
company, investment company, trust company, savings institution, or
other financial institution approved by the board and maintaining an
office in the state.
(5) "Industrial development facilities" means "industrial
development facilities" as defined in RCW 39.84.020.
(6) "Industrial development revenue bonds" means tax-exempt revenue
bonds used to fund industrial development facilities.
(7))) (3) "Local government" or "political subdivision" means any
port district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any
other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the
state providing for public facilities under this chapter.
(((8) "Sponsor" means any of the following entities which
customarily provide service or otherwise aid in industrial or other
financing and are approved as a sponsor by the board: A bank, trust
company, savings bank, investment bank, national banking association,
savings and loan association, building and loan association, credit
union, insurance company, or any other financial institution,
governmental agency, or holding company of any entity specified in this
subsection.
(9) "Umbrella bonds" means industrial development revenue bonds
from which the proceeds are loaned, transferred, or otherwise made
available to two or more users under this chapter.
(10) "User" means one or more persons acting as lessee, purchaser,
mortgagor, or borrower under a financing document and receiving or
applying to receive revenues from bonds issued under this chapter.
(11))) (4) "Public facilities" means a project of a local
government or a federally recognized Indian tribe for the planning,
acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement,
rehabilitation, or improvement of bridges, roads, domestic and
industrial water, earth stabilization, sanitary sewer, storm sewer,
railroad, electricity, telecommunications, transportation, natural gas,
buildings or structures, and port facilities, all for the purpose of
job creation, job retention, or job expansion.
(((12))) (5) "Rural county" ((means a county with a population
density of fewer than one hundred persons per square mile as determined
by the office of financial management)) has the same meaning as in RCW
82.14.370.
(((13) "Rural natural resources impact area" means:
(a) A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial
census, that meets three of the five criteria set forth in subsection
(14) of this section;
(b) A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty
thousand in the 1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five
criteria as set forth in subsection (14) of this section; or
(c) A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census,
that is located in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five
criteria set forth in subsection (14) of this section.
(14) For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact
areas, the following criteria shall be considered:
(a) A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(b) A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(c) Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses
of one hundred positions or more;
(d) Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses
of one hundred positions or more; and
(e) An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state
average. The counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by
the employment security department for the most recent year for which
data is available. For the purposes of administration of programs
under this chapter, the United States post office five-digit zip code
delivery areas will be used to determine residence status for
eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition, a zip code
delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an urbanized
area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by zip
codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also
considered nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make
available a zip code listing of the areas to all agencies and
organizations providing services under this chapter.))

Sec. 4 RCW 43.160.030 and 2004 c 252 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The community economic revitalization board is hereby created
to exercise the powers granted under this chapter.
(2) The board shall consist of one member from each of the two
major caucuses of the house of representatives to be appointed by the
speaker of the house and one member from each of the two major caucuses
of the senate to be appointed by the president of the senate. The
board shall also consist of the following members appointed by the
governor: A recognized private or public sector economist; one port
district official; one county official; one city official; one
representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe; one
representative of the public; one representative of small businesses
each from: (a) The area west of Puget Sound, (b) the area east of
Puget Sound and west of the Cascade range, (c) the area east of the
Cascade range and west of the Columbia river, and (d) the area east of
the Columbia river; one executive from large businesses each from the
area west of the Cascades and the area east of the Cascades. The
appointive members shall initially be appointed to terms as follows:
Three members for one-year terms, three members for two-year terms, and
three members for three-year terms which shall include the chair.
Thereafter each succeeding term shall be for three years. The chair of
the board shall be selected by the governor. The members of the board
shall elect one of their members to serve as vice-chair. The director
of community, trade, and economic development, the director of revenue,
the commissioner of employment security, and the secretary of
transportation shall serve as nonvoting advisory members of the board.
(3) Management services, including fiscal and contract services,
shall be provided by the department to assist the board in implementing
this chapter ((and the allocation of private activity bonds)).
(4) Members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) If a vacancy occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise of
appointive members of the board, the governor shall fill the same for
the unexpired term. Members of the board may be removed for
malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific written charges by
the governor, under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) A member appointed by the governor may not be absent from more
than fifty percent of the regularly scheduled meetings in any one
calendar year. Any member who exceeds this absence limitation is
deemed to have withdrawn from the office and may be replaced by the
governor.
(7) A majority of members currently appointed constitutes a quorum.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.160.050 and 1996 c 51 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board may:
(1) Adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct
of its business.
(2) Adopt an official seal and alter the seal at its pleasure.
(3) Utilize the services of other governmental agencies.
(4) Accept from any federal agency loans or grants for the planning
or financing of any project and enter into an agreement with the agency
respecting the loans or grants.
(5) Conduct examinations and investigations and take testimony at
public hearings of any matter material for its information that will
assist in determinations related to the exercise of the board's lawful
powers.
(6) Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or
financial or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms
and conditions which are not in conflict with this chapter.
(7) Exercise all the powers of a public corporation under chapter
39.84 RCW.
(8) ((Invest any funds received in connection with industrial
development revenue bond financing not required for immediate use, as
the board considers appropriate, subject to any agreements with owners
of bonds.
(9) Arrange for lines of credit for industrial development revenue
bonds from and enter into participation agreements with any financial
institution.
(10) Issue industrial development revenue bonds in one or more
series for the purpose of defraying the cost of acquiring or improving
any industrial development facility or facilities and securing the
payment of the bonds as provided in this chapter.
(11))) Enter into agreements or other transactions with and accept
grants and the cooperation of any governmental agency in furtherance of
this chapter.
(((12) Sell, purchase, or insure loans to finance the costs of
industrial development facilities.
(13) Service, contract, and pay for the servicing of loans for
industrial development facilities.
(14) Provide financial analysis and technical assistance for
industrial development facilities when the board reasonably considers
it appropriate.
(15) Collect, with respect to industrial development revenue bonds,
reasonable interest, fees, and charges for making and servicing its
lease agreements, loan agreements, mortgage loans, notes, bonds,
commitments, and other evidences of indebtedness. Interest, fees, and
charges are limited to the amounts required to pay the costs of the
board, including operating and administrative expenses and reasonable
allowances for losses that may be incurred.
(16) Procure insurance or guarantees from any party as allowable
under law, including a governmental agency, against any loss in
connection with its lease agreements, loan agreements, mortgage loans,
and other assets or property.
(17))) (9) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to
carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(((18))) (10) Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to
carry out the powers expressly granted or implied under this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.160.060 and 2007 c 231 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board is authorized to make direct loans to political
subdivisions of the state and to federally recognized Indian tribes for
the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions and federally
recognized Indian tribes in financing the cost of public facilities,
including development of land and improvements for public facilities,
project-specific environmental, capital facilities, land use,
permitting, feasibility, and marketing studies and plans; project
design, site planning, and analysis; project debt and revenue impact
analysis; as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration,
expansion, or improvement of the facilities. A grant may also be
authorized for purposes designated in this chapter, but only when, and
to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the
limited resources of the political subdivision or the federally
recognized Indian tribe and the finding by the board that financial
circumstances require grant assistance to enable the project to move
forward. However, ((at least ten)) no more than twenty-five percent of
all financial assistance ((provided)) approved by the board in any
biennium ((shall)) may consist of grants to political subdivisions and
federally recognized Indian tribes.
Application for funds shall be made in the form and manner as the
board may prescribe. In making grants or loans the board shall conform
to the following requirements:
(1) The board shall not provide financial assistance:
(a) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or
promote a retail shopping development or expansion.
(b) For any project that evidence exists would result in a
development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other
community in the state.
(c) ((For the acquisition of real property, including buildings and
other fixtures which are a part of real property.
(d))) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate
or promote gambling.
(d) For a project located outside the jurisdiction of the applicant
political subdivision or federally recognized Indian tribe.
(2) The board shall only provide financial assistance:
(a) For ((those projects which would result in specific private
developments or expansions (i) in manufacturing, production, food
processing, assembly, warehousing, advanced technology, research and
development, and industrial distribution; (ii) for processing
recyclable materials or for facilities that support recycling,
including processes not currently provided in the state, including but
not limited to, de-inking facilities, mixed waste paper, plastics, yard
waste, and problem-waste processing; (iii) for manufacturing facilities
that rely significantly on recyclable materials, including but not
limited to waste tires and mixed waste paper; (iv) which support the
relocation of businesses from nondistressed urban areas to rural
counties or rural natural resources impact areas; or (v) which
substantially support the trading of goods or services outside of the
state's borders.
(b) For projects which it finds)) a project demonstrating
convincing evidence that a specific private development or expansion is
ready to occur and will occur only if the public facility improvement
is made that:
(i) Results in the creation of significant private sector jobs or
significant private sector capital investment as determined by the
board and is consistent with the state comprehensive economic
development plan developed by the Washington economic development
commission pursuant to chapter 43.162 RCW; and
(ii) Will improve the opportunities for the successful maintenance,
establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial plants or will
otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic
opportunities((.
(c) When the application includes convincing evidence that a
specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will
occur only if the public facility improvement is made));
(b) For a project that cannot meet the requirement of (a) of this
subsection but is a project that:
(i) Results in the creation of significant private sector jobs or
significant private sector capital investment as determined by the
board and is consistent with the state comprehensive economic
development plan developed by the Washington economic development
commission pursuant to chapter 43.162 RCW;
(ii) Is part of a local economic development plan consistent with
applicable state planning requirements;
(iii) Can demonstrate project feasibility using standard economic
principles; and
(iv) Is located in a rural community as defined by the board, or a
rural county;
(c) For a tourism project that is located in a rural county; or
(d) For site-specific plans, studies, and analyses that address
environmental impacts, capital facilities, land use, permitting,
feasibility, marketing, project engineering, design, site planning, and
project debt and revenue impacts, as grants not to exceed fifty
thousand dollars.
(3) An application must demonstrate local match and local
participation.
(4) An application must be approved by the political subdivision
and supported by the local associate development organization or local
workforce development council or approved by the governing body of the
federally recognized Indian tribe.
(5) The board shall develop guidelines for local participation and
allowable match and activities.
(6) The board may allow de minimis general system improvements to
be funded if they are critically linked to the viability of the
project.
(7) An application must demonstrate convincing evidence that the
average hourly wage of the private sector jobs created after the
project is completed will exceed the countywide average hourly wage.
(8) The board shall prioritize each proposed project according to:
(a) ((The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs
the project would create, not just the total number of jobs it would
create after the project is completed and according to)) The
unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs would be located;
(b) The total number of jobs it would create after project
construction is complete relative to the total employment in the area;
(c) The rate of return of the state's investment, that includes the
expected increase in state and local tax revenues associated with the
project; ((and
(c))) (d) Whether the proposed project offers a health insurance
plan for employees that includes an option for dependents of employees;
(e) Whether the public facility investment will be used in a manner
that supports infill and redevelopment of existing urban or industrial
areas that are served by adequate public facilities. Projects should
maximize the use of existing infrastructure and provide for adequate
funding of necessary transportation improvements; and
(f) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007.
(((4))) (9) A responsible official of the political subdivision or
the federally recognized Indian tribe shall be present during board
deliberations and provide information that the board requests.
Before any financial assistance application is approved, the
political subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking
the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic
revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is
available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from
the community economic revitalization board.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.160.070 and 1999 c 164 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
Public facilities financial assistance, when authorized by the
board, is subject to the following conditions:
(1) The moneys in the public facilities construction loan revolving
account ((and the distressed county public facilities construction loan
account)) shall be used solely to fulfill commitments arising from
financial assistance authorized in this chapter ((or, during the 1989-91 fiscal biennium, for economic development purposes as appropriated
by the legislature)). The total outstanding amount which the board
shall dispense at any time pursuant to this section shall not exceed
the moneys available from the account((s)). ((The total amount of
outstanding financial assistance in Pierce, King, and Snohomish
counties shall never exceed sixty percent of the total amount of
outstanding financial assistance disbursed by the board under this
chapter without reference to financial assistance provided under RCW
43.160.220.))
(2) On contracts made for public facilities loans the board shall
determine the interest rate which loans shall bear. The interest rate
shall not exceed ten percent per annum. The board may provide
reasonable terms and conditions for repayment for loans, including
partial forgiveness of loan principal and interest payments on projects
located in rural communities as defined by the board, or rural counties
((or rural natural resources impact areas, as the board determines)).
The loans shall not exceed twenty years in duration.
(3) Repayments of loans made from the public facilities
construction loan revolving account under the contracts for public
facilities construction loans shall be paid into the public facilities
construction loan revolving account. ((Repayments of loans made from
the distressed county public facilities construction loan account under
the contracts for public facilities construction loans shall be paid
into the distressed county public facilities construction loan
account.)) Repayments of loans from moneys from the new appropriation
from the public works assistance account for the fiscal biennium ending
June 30, 1999, shall be paid into the public works assistance account.
(4) When every feasible effort has been made to provide loans and
loans are not possible, the board may provide grants upon finding that
unique circumstances exist.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.160.076 and 1999 c 164 s 105 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as authorized to the contrary under subsection (2) of
this section, from all funds available to the board for financial
assistance in a biennium under this chapter ((without reference to
financial assistance provided under RCW 43.160.220)), the board shall
((spend)) approve at least ((seventy-five)) fifty percent for financial
assistance for projects in rural counties ((or rural natural resources
impact areas)).
(2) If at any time during the last six months of a biennium the
board finds that the actual and anticipated applications for qualified
projects in rural counties ((or rural natural resources impact areas))
are clearly insufficient to use up the ((seventy-five)) fifty percent
allocation under subsection (1) of this section, then the board shall
estimate the amount of the insufficiency and during the remainder of
the biennium may use that amount of the allocation for financial
assistance to projects not located in rural counties ((or rural natural
resources impact areas)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.162 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state economic development commission shall, in
consultation with the community economic revitalization board created
in chapter 43.160 RCW, conduct outcome-based evaluations of the
financial assistance provided by the community economic development
revitalization board on a biennial basis. The commission's review of
data for the evaluations shall include, but not be limited to, the jobs
generated or retained upon completion of funded projects, the wages and
health benefits associated with such jobs, the number and types of
projects funded, the total number of grants and loans made, the amount
of state funds and total capital invested in projects, the number and
types of businesses assisted by funded projects, the location of funded
projects, the transportation infrastructure available for completed
projects, the local match and local participation obtained, and such
other data and performance measures as the commission determines are
appropriate. The evaluations shall be presented to the legislature and
the governor by December 31st of each even-numbered year, with the
first evaluation due December 31, 2010.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.160.900 and 1993 c 320 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The community economic revitalization board shall report to the
appropriate standing committees of the legislature biennially on the
implementation of this chapter. The report shall include information
on the number of applications for community economic revitalization
board assistance, the number and types of projects approved, the grant
or loan amount awarded each project, the projected number of jobs
created or retained by each project, the actual number of jobs created
or retained by each project, the number of delinquent loans, and the
number of project terminations. The report may also include additional
performance measures and recommendations for programmatic changes.
((The first report shall be submitted by December 1, 1994.))
(2) The community economic revitalization board shall provide the
Washington state economic development commission with such information
as is requested for the purpose of conducting the outcome-based
evaluations required under section 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The public works assistance account
must transfer funds annually to the public facilities construction loan
revolving account in amounts as follows: In fiscal year 2010, fifty
million dollars; and in each subsequent fiscal year an amount equal to
the previous year's amount plus a proportionate increase equivalent to
the growth in the consumer price index for the state of Washington for
the fiscal year that ends June 30th of the prior calendar year.
(2) The obligation to transfer of funds required in this section
may not be operative unless the public works assistance account has
received an additional source of funds equaling or exceeding the amount
to be transferred.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.45.060 and 2005 c 450 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property at
the rate of one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the selling
price. An amount equal to six and one-tenth percent of the proceeds of
this tax to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the public works
assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050. An amount equal to one
and six-tenths percent of the proceeds of this tax to the state
treasurer shall be deposited in the city-county assistance account
created in RCW 43.08.290. An amount equal to three and three-tenths
percent of the proceeds of this tax to the state treasurer shall be
deposited into the public facilities construction loan revolving
account created in RCW 43.160.080.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.160.080 and 1998 c 321 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be a fund in the state treasury known as the public
facilities construction loan revolving account, which shall consist of
all moneys collected under this chapter((, except moneys of the board
collected in connection with the issuance of industrial development
revenue bonds and moneys deposited in the distressed county public
facilities construction loan account under RCW 43.160.220,)) and any
moneys appropriated to it by law((: PROVIDED, That seventy-five
percent of all principal and interest payments on loans made with the
proceeds deposited in the account under section 901, chapter 57, Laws
of 1983 1st ex. sess. shall be deposited in the general fund as
reimbursement for debt service payments on the bonds authorized in RCW
43.83.184)). Disbursements from the revolving account shall be on
authorization of the board. In order to maintain an effective
expenditure and revenue control, the public facilities construction
loan revolving account shall be subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW.

Sec. 14 2005 c 425 s 6 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
This act expires June 30, ((2011)) 2009.

Sec. 15 2006 c 371 s 238 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) Section 229 of this act expires June 30, ((2011)) 2009.
(2) Section 231 of this act expires June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.160.100 (Status of board) and 1984 c 257 s 3;
(2) RCW 43.160.120 (Commingling of funds prohibited) and 1984 c 257
s 5;
(3) RCW 43.160.130 (Personal liability) and 1984 c 257 s 6;
(4) RCW 43.160.140 (Accounts) and 1987 c 422 s 8 & 1984 c 257 s 7;
(5) RCW 43.160.150 (Faith and credit not pledged) and 1984 c 257 s
8;
(6) RCW 43.160.160 (Security) and 1984 c 257 s 9;
(7) RCW 43.160.170 (Special reserve account) and 1984 c 257 s 10;
(8) RCW 43.160.200 (Economic development account -- Eligibility for
assistance) and 2004 c 252 s 4, 1999 c 164 s 107, 1996 c 51 s 9, & 1995
c 226 s 16;
(9) RCW 43.160.210 (Distressed counties -- Twenty percent of
financial assistance) and 1998 c 321 s 31 & 1998 c 55 s 5; and
(10) RCW 43.160.220 (Distressed county public facilities
construction loan account) and 1998 c 321 s 9.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 2 through 8, 12, 13, and 16 of
this act take effect July 1, 2009.

--- END ---