BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.855 and 2006 c 172 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale to
an eligible farmer of replacement parts for qualifying farm machinery
and equipment.
(2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, if
replacement parts are installed by the seller during the course of
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving qualifying farm machinery
and equipment and the seller makes a separate charge for the parts, the
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the separately stated
charge to an eligible farmer for replacement parts but only if the
separately stated charge does not exceed either the seller's current
publicly stated retail price for the parts or, if no ((separately))
publicly stated retail price is available, the seller's cost for the
parts. However, the exemption provided by this section shall not apply
if replacement parts are installed by the seller during the course of
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving qualifying farm machinery
and equipment and the seller makes a single nonitemized charge for
providing the parts and service.
(3)(a)(i) A person claiming an exemption under this section must
keep and make available to the department upon request records
necessary ((for the department)) to verify eligibility under this
section. Nothing in (b)(vi) of this subsection may be construed as
limiting a person's obligations under this subsection (3)(a)(i).
(ii) An exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate issued by the department
containing such information as the department requires. The exemption
certificate shall be in a form and manner prescribed by the department.
The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's
files.
(b) The department shall provide an exemption certificate to an
eligible farmer or renew an exemption certificate, upon application by
that eligible farmer. The application must be in a form and manner
prescribed by the department and shall contain the following
information as required by the department:
(i) The name and address of the applicant;
(ii) The uniform business identifier or tax reporting account
number of the applicant, if the applicant is required to be registered
with the department;
(iii) The type of farming engaged in;
(iv) ((A copy of the applicant's Schedule F of Form 1040, Form
1120, or other applicable form filed with the internal revenue service
indicating the gross sales of agricultural products by the applicant in
the calendar year immediately preceding the year that the application
was made to the department. If application is made before the due date
of the applicant's federal income tax return for the prior calendar
year, or any extension of the due date, the applicant shall provide a
copy of the appropriate federal income tax form that was due for the
second calendar year immediately preceding the year that the
application is made to the department. If the applicant is not
required to file federal income tax returns, the department may require
the applicant to provide copies of other documents establishing the
amount of the applicant's gross sales of agricultural products for the
relevant calendar year;
(v))) The name of the individual authorized to sign the
certificate, printed in a legible fashion;
(((vi))) (v) The signature of the authorized individual; and
(((vii) Other information the department may require to verify the
applicant's eligibility for the exemption))
(vi) A declaration signed under penalty of perjury as provided in
RCW 9A.72.085 that the applicant is an eligible farmer as defined in
subsection (4)(b) of this section. Any person who knowingly makes a
materially false statement on an application submitted to the
department under the provisions of this section shall be guilty of
perjury in the second degree under chapter 9A.72 RCW. In addition, the
person is liable for payment of any taxes for which an exemption under
this section was claimed, with interest at the rate provided for
delinquent taxes, retroactively to the date the exemption was claimed,
and penalties as provided under chapter 82.32 RCW.
(c)(i) Except as otherwise provided in this section, exemption
certificates take effect on the date issued by the department, are not
transferable, and are valid for the remainder of the calendar year in
which the certificate is issued and the following four calendar years.
The department shall attempt to notify holders of exemption
certificates of the impending expiration of the certificate at least
sixty days before the certificate expires and shall provide an
application for renewal of the certificate.
(ii) When a certificate holder merely changes identity or form of
ownership of an entity and there is no change in beneficial ownership,
the exemption certificate shall be transferred to the new entity upon
written notice to the department by the transferor or transferee.
(d)(i) ((Exemption certificates issued to persons who are eligible
farmers under subsection (4)(b)(iii) of this section are conditioned on
the person making at least ten thousand dollars of gross sales of
agricultural products grown, raised, or produced by that person in the
first full calendar year that the person engages in business as a
farmer.
(ii) A person who is issued a conditional exemption certificate
must provide the department with a copy of the person's Schedule F of
Form 1040, Form 1120, or other applicable form filed with the internal
revenue service indicating the gross sales of agricultural products by
the person in the first full calendar year that the person engaged in
business as a farmer. If a person is not required to file federal
income tax returns, the person shall provide copies of other documents
establishing the amount of the person's gross sales of agricultural
products for the first full calendar year that the person engaged in
business as a farmer. The documentation required in this subsection
(3)(d)(ii) is due no later than December 31st of the year immediately
following the first full calendar year in which the person engaged in
business as a farmer.
(iii))) A person who is an eligible farmer as defined in subsection
(4)(b)(iii) of this section will be issued a conditional exemption
certificate. The exemption certificate is conditioned upon:
(A) The eligible farmer having gross sales or a harvested value of
agricultural products grown, raised, or produced by that person of at
least ten thousand dollars in the first full year in which the person
engages in business as a farmer; or
(B) The eligible farmer, during the first full year in which that
person engages in business as a farmer, growing, raising, or producing
agricultural products having an estimated value in that year of at
least ten thousand dollars, if the person will not sell or harvest an
agricultural product during the first full year in which the person
engages in business as a farmer.
(ii) If a person fails to ((provide the required documentation to
the department by the due date or any extension granted by the
department, or if)) meet the condition provided in (d)(i) of this
subsection ((is not met)), the department shall ((revoke))
retroactively cancel the exemption certificate. The department shall
notify the person in writing of the ((revocation)) cancellation and the
person's responsibility, and due date, for ((repayment)) payment of any
taxes for which an exemption under this section was claimed. Any taxes
for which an exemption under this section was claimed shall be due and
payable within thirty days of the date of the notice revoking the
certificate. The department shall assess interest on the taxes for
which the exemption was claimed. Interest shall be assessed at the
rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
retroactively to the date the exemption was claimed, and shall accrue
until the taxes for which the exemption was claimed are repaid.
Penalties shall not be imposed on any tax required to be ((repaid))
paid under this subsection (3)(d)ii), if full payment is received by
the due date. Nothing in this subsection (3)(d) prohibits a person
from reapplying for an exemption certificate.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning provided in RCW
82.04.213.
(b) "Eligible farmer" means:
(i) A farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213 whose gross proceeds of
sales or harvested value of agricultural products grown, raised, or
produced by that person is at least ten thousand dollars in the
calendar year immediately preceding the year in which ((a claim of
exemption is made under this section)) an application for exemption
under this section is submitted to the department;
(ii) The transferee of an exemption certificate under subsection
(3)(c)(ii) of this section where the transferred certificate expires
before the transferee engages in farming operations for a full calendar
year, if the combined gross ((proceeds of)) sales ((by)) or harvested
value of agricultural products that the transferor and transferee ((of
agricultural products that they)) have grown, raised, or produced meet
the requirements of (b)(i) of this subsection;
(iii) A farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213, who does not meet the
definition of "eligible farmer" in (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection,
and who did not engage in farming for the entire calendar year
immediately preceding the year in which application for exemption under
this section is made and who did not engage in farming in any other
year;
(iv) Anyone who otherwise meets the definition of "eligible farmer"
in this subsection except that they are not a "person" as defined in
RCW 82.04.030.
(c) "Harvested value" means the number of units of the agricultural
product that were grown, raised, or produced, multiplied by the average
sales price of the agricultural product. For purposes of this
subsection (4)(c), "average sales price" means the average price per
unit of agricultural product received by farmers in this state as
reported by the United States department of agriculture's national
agricultural statistics service for the twelve-month period that
coincides with, or that begins or ends closest to, the calendar year
immediately preceding the calendar year during which an application for
exemption under this section is submitted to the department or the
first full calendar year during which a person engages in business as
a farmer, as the case may be, regardless of whether the prices are
subject to revision. If the price per unit of an agricultural product
received by farmers in this state is not available from the national
agricultural statistics service, average sales price may be determined
by using the average price per unit of agricultural product received by
farmers in this state as reported by a recognized authority for the
agricultural product.
(d) "Qualifying farm machinery and equipment" means machinery and
equipment used primarily by an eligible farmer for growing, raising, or
producing agricultural products. "Qualifying farm machinery and
equipment" does not include:
(i) Farm vehicles and other vehicles as those terms are defined in
chapter 46.04 RCW, except farm tractors as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and
other farm implements. For purposes of this subsection
(4)(((c)))(d)(i), "farm implement" means machinery or equipment
manufactured, designed, or reconstructed for agricultural purposes and
used primarily by an eligible farmer to grow, raise, or produce
agricultural products, but does not include lawn tractors and
all-terrain vehicles;
(ii) Aircraft;
(iii) Hand tools and hand-powered tools; and
(iv) Property with a useful life of less than one year.
(((d))) (e)(i) "Replacement parts" means those parts that replace
an existing part, or which are essential to maintain the working
condition, of a piece of qualifying farm machinery or equipment.
((However,))
(ii) "Replacement parts" shall not include paint, fuel, oil,
grease, hydraulic fluids, antifreeze, and similar items.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.855 and 2006 c 172 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use by an eligible farmer of replacement parts for qualifying farm
machinery and equipment.
(2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, if
replacement parts are installed by the seller during the course of
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving qualifying farm machinery
and equipment and the seller makes a separate charge for the parts, the
tax imposed by this chapter does not apply to the separately stated
charge to an eligible farmer for replacement parts but only if the
separately stated charge does not exceed either the seller's current
publicly stated retail price for the parts or, if no ((separately))
publicly stated retail price is available, the seller's cost for the
parts. However, the exemption provided by this section shall not apply
if replacement parts are installed by the seller during the course of
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving qualifying farm machinery
and equipment and the seller makes a single nonitemized charge for
providing the parts and service.
(3) The definitions, other than the definition of "eligible
farmer," and recordkeeping requirements in RCW 82.08.855, other than
the exemption certificate requirement, apply to this section.
(4) For purposes of this section, "eligible farmer" means a
taxpayer who is currently eligible for an exemption certificate under
RCW 82.08.855, or who is not currently eligible for an exemption
certificate under RCW 82.08.855 but was previously eligible for an
exemption certificate and the certificate would currently be valid,
regardless of whether the taxpayer has applied for an exemption
certificate under RCW 82.08.855.
(5)(a) If a taxpayer is an eligible farmer under this section
because the taxpayer is eligible for an exemption certificate under RCW
82.08.855 but that exemption certificate would be subject to the
condition in RCW 82.08.855(3)(d), the exemption under this section
shall no longer apply if the condition in RCW 82.08.855(3)(d) is not
met.
(b)(i) Any taxes for which an exemption under this section no
longer applies as a result of (a) of this subsection shall be based on
the value of the article used or value of the service used at the time
of first use in this state. Such taxes are due January 31st of the
year immediately following the first full calendar year in which the
person engaged in business as a farmer.
(ii) The department shall assess interest on the taxes due under
this subsection (5)(b). Interest shall be assessed at the rate
provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
retroactively to the date the replacement part or service was first
used in this state, and shall accrue until the taxes for which the
exemption was claimed are repaid. Penalties shall not be imposed on
any tax required to be repaid, if full payment is received by the due
date.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the
department shall not assess the tax imposed under this chapter against
a person who no longer qualifies as an eligible farmer with respect to
the use of any articles or services exempt under subsection (1) of this
section, if the person was an eligible farmer when the first taxable
use of the articles or services in this state occurred.

--- END ---