BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.73.065 and 2005 c 336 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, taxes,
fees, charges, and tolls may not be imposed by a district without
approval of a majority of the voters in the district voting on a
proposition at a general or special election. The proposition must
include a specific description of the transportation improvement or
improvements proposed by the district and the proposed taxes, fees,
charges, and the range of tolls imposed by the district to raise
revenue to fund the improvement or improvements.
(2) Voter approval under this section shall be accorded substantial
weight regarding the validity of a transportation improvement as
defined in RCW 36.73.015.
(3) A district may not increase any taxes, fees, charges, or range
of tolls imposed under this chapter once the taxes, fees, charges, or
tolls take effect, unless authorized by the district voters pursuant to
RCW 36.73.160.
(4)(a) A district that includes all the territory within the
boundaries of the jurisdiction, or jurisdictions, establishing the
district may impose by a majority vote of the governing board of the
district the following fees and charges:
(i) Up to twenty dollars of the vehicle license fee authorized in
RCW 82.80.140; or
(ii) A fee or charge in accordance with RCW 36.73.120.
(b) A district solely comprised of a city or cities shall not
impose the fees or charges identified in (a) of this subsection within
one hundred eighty days after the effective date of this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.80.140 and 2005 c 336 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions of RCW 36.73.065, a transportation
benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW may fix and impose an annual
vehicle fee, not to exceed one hundred dollars per vehicle registered
in the district, for each vehicle subject to license tab fees under RCW
46.16.0621 and for each vehicle subject to gross weight fees under RCW
46.16.070 with an unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less.
(2)(a) A district that includes all the territory within the
boundaries of the jurisdiction, or jurisdictions, establishing the
district may impose by a majority vote of the governing board of the
district up to twenty dollars of the vehicle license fee authorized in
subsection (1) of this section. If the district is countywide, the
revenues of the fee shall be distributed to each jurisdiction within
the county as provided in an interlocal agreement between each
jurisdiction or according to the number of vehicles that are determined
to be registered within the boundaries of each jurisdiction.
(b) A district may not impose a fee under this subsection (2) that,
if combined with the fees previously imposed by another district within
its boundaries under RCW 36.73.065(4)(a)(i), exceeds twenty dollars.
If a district imposes or increases a fee under this subsection (2)
that, if combined with the fees previously imposed by another district
within its boundaries, exceeds twenty dollars, the district fee shall
be reduced or eliminated so the combined vehicle fee does not exceed
twenty dollars.
(3) The department of licensing shall administer and collect the
fee. The department shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed one percent of the fees collected, for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The department
shall remit remaining proceeds to the custody of the state treasurer.
The state treasurer shall distribute the proceeds to the district on a
monthly basis.
(((3))) (4) No fee under this section may be collected until six
months after approval ((by the district voters)) under RCW 36.73.065.
(((4))) (5) The vehicle fee under this section applies only when
renewing a vehicle registration, and is effective upon the registration
renewal date as provided by the department of licensing.
(((5))) (6) The following vehicles are exempt from the fee under
this section:
(a) Farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and
46.04.181;
(b) Off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020;
(c) Vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW and the
international registration plan; and
(d) Snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.

--- END ---