BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall implement an early learning and child care
grant program specifically for programs located on campuses of
institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall select recipients for grants. Grant moneys shall be used solely
to maintain staff and services at the selected early learning and child
care centers.
(3) The department of community, trade, and economic development
may adopt rules to implement this section.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of five million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2009, from the child care facility revolving fund to the
department of community, trade, and economic development for the
purposes of this act.

--- END ---