BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.40.091 and 2005 c 246 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot, a
security envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger
envelope with first class postage prepaid in which to return the
security envelope, and instructions on how to mark the ballot and how
to return it to the county auditor. The instructions that accompany an
absentee ballot for a partisan primary must include instructions for
voting the applicable ballot style, as provided in chapter 29A.36 RCW.
The absentee voter's name and address must be printed on the larger
return envelope, which must also contain a declaration by the absentee
voter reciting his or her qualifications and stating that he or she has
not voted in any other jurisdiction at this election, together with a
summary of the penalties for any violation of any of the provisions of
this chapter. The declaration must clearly inform the voter that it is
illegal to vote if he or she is not a United States citizen; it is
illegal to vote if he or she has been convicted of a felony and has not
had his or her voting rights restored; and, except as otherwise
provided by law, it is illegal to cast a ballot or sign an absentee
envelope on behalf of another voter. The return envelope must provide
space for the voter to indicate the date on which the ballot was voted
and for the voter to sign the oath. It must also contain a space so
that the voter may include a telephone number. A summary of the
applicable penalty provisions of this chapter must be printed on the
return envelope immediately adjacent to the space for the voter's
signature. The signature of the voter on the return envelope must
affirm and attest to the statements regarding the qualifications of
that voter and to the validity of the ballot. The return envelope must
also have a secrecy flap that the voter may seal that will cover the
voter's signature and optional telephone number. For out-of-state
voters, overseas voters, and service voters, the signed declaration on
the return envelope constitutes the equivalent of a voter registration
for the election or primary for which the ballot has been issued. The
voter must be instructed to either return the ballot to the county
auditor by whom it was issued or ((attach sufficient first class
postage, if applicable, and)) mail the ballot to the appropriate county
auditor no later than the day of the election or primary for which the
ballot was issued.
If the county auditor chooses to forward absentee ballots, he or
she must include with the ballot a clear explanation of the
qualifications necessary to vote in that election and must also advise
a voter with questions about his or her eligibility to contact the
county auditor. This explanation may be provided on the ballot
envelope, on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on the ballot
itself. If the information is not included, the envelope must clearly
indicate that the ballot is not to be forwarded and that return postage
is guaranteed.

--- END ---