BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.060 and 2005 c 232 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The commission, after hearing upon reasonable notice, shall
decide in each application for certification as an exclusive bargaining
representative, the unit appropriate for the purpose of collective
bargaining. In determining, modifying, or combining the bargaining
unit, the commission shall consider the duties, skills, and working
conditions of the public employees; the history of collective
bargaining by the public employees and their bargaining
representatives; the extent of organization among the public employees;
and the desire of the public employees. The commission shall determine
the bargaining representative by: (a) Examination of organization
membership rolls; (b) comparison of signatures on organization
bargaining authorization cards; or (c) conducting an election
specifically therefor.
(b) When only one organization is seeking certification as the
representative of unrepresented employees, and the showing of interest
submitted in support of the petition indicates that the organization
has been authorized by a majority of the employees to act as their
representative for the purposes of collective bargaining, the executive
director of the public employment relations commission shall (i)(A)
conduct a cross-check comparing bargaining authorization cards against
the employer's records, and (B) if majority support exists, certify the
organization as the sole representative; or (ii) at the petitioner's
request, conduct an election.
(2) For classified employees of school districts and educational
service districts:
(a) Appropriate bargaining units existing on July 24, 2005, may not
be divided into more than one unit without the agreement of the public
employer and the certified bargaining representative of the unit; and
(b) In making bargaining unit determinations under this section,
the commission must consider, in addition to the factors listed in
subsection (1) of this section, the avoidance of excessive
fragmentation.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.76.020 and 2002 c 356 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall certify exclusive bargaining representatives
in accordance with the procedures specified in this section.
(1) No question concerning representation may be raised within one
year following issuance of a certification under this section.
(2) If there is a valid collective bargaining agreement in effect,
no question concerning representation may be raised except during the
period not more than ninety nor less than sixty days prior to the
expiration date of the agreement: PROVIDED, That in the event a valid
collective bargaining agreement, together with any renewals or
extensions thereof, has been or will be in existence for more than
three years, then a question concerning representation may be raised
not more than ninety nor less than sixty days prior to the third
anniversary date or any subsequent anniversary date of the agreement;
and if the exclusive bargaining representative is removed as the result
of such procedure, the collective bargaining agreement shall be deemed
to be terminated as of the date of the certification or the anniversary
date following the filing of the petition, whichever is later.
(3) An employee organization seeking certification as exclusive
bargaining representative of a bargaining unit, or faculty members
seeking decertification of their exclusive bargaining representative,
must make a confidential showing to the commission of credible evidence
demonstrating that at least thirty percent of the faculty in the
bargaining unit are in support of the petition. The petition must
indicate the name, address, and telephone number of any employee
organization known to claim an interest in the bargaining unit.
(4) A petition filed by an employer must be supported by credible
evidence demonstrating the good faith basis on which the employer
claims the existence of a question concerning the representation of its
faculty.
(5) Any employee organization which makes a confidential showing to
the commission of credible evidence demonstrating that it has the
support of at least ten percent of the faculty in the bargaining unit
involved is entitled to intervene in proceedings under this section and
to have its name listed as a choice on the ballot in an election
conducted by the commission.
(6) The commission shall determine any question concerning
representation by conducting a secret ballot election among the faculty
members in the bargaining unit, except under the following
circumstances:
(a) ((If only one employee organization is seeking certification as
exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit for which
there is no incumbent exclusive bargaining representative, the
commission may, upon the concurrence of the employer and the employee
organization, determine the question concerning representation by
conducting a cross-check comparing the employee organization's
membership records or bargaining authorization cards against the
employment records of the employer)) When only one organization is
seeking certification as the representative of unrepresented employees,
and the showing of interest submitted in support of the petition
indicates that the organization has been authorized by a majority of
the employees to act as their representative for the purposes of
collective bargaining, the director of the public employment relations
commission shall (i)(A) conduct a cross-check comparing bargaining
authorization cards against the employer's records, and (B) if majority
support exists, certify the organization as the sole representative; or
(ii) at the petitioner's request, conduct an election; or
(b) If the commission determines that a serious unfair labor
practice has been committed which interfered with the election process
and precludes the holding of a fair election, the commission may
determine the question concerning representation by conducting a cross-check comparing the employee organization's membership records or
bargaining authorization cards against the employment records of the
employer.
(7) The representation election ballot must contain a choice for
each employee organization qualifying under subsection (3) or (5) of
this section, together with a choice for no representation. The
representation election shall be determined by the majority of the
valid ballots cast. If there are three or more choices on the ballot
and none of the three or more choices receives a majority of the valid
ballots cast, a runoff election shall be conducted between the two
choices receiving the highest and second highest numbers of votes.
(8) The commission shall certify as the exclusive bargaining
representative the employee organization that has been determined to
represent a majority of faculty members in a bargaining unit.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.80.080 and 2002 c 354 s 309 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The commission shall determine all questions pertaining to
representation and shall administer all elections and be responsible
for the processing and adjudication of all disputes that arise as a
consequence of elections. The commission shall adopt rules that
provide for at least the following:
(((a))) (i) Secret balloting;
(((b))) (ii) Consulting with employee organizations;
(((c))) (iii) Access to lists of employees, job classification,
work locations, and home mailing addresses;
(((d))) (iv) Absentee voting;
(((e))) (v) Procedures for the greatest possible participation in
voting;
(((f))) (vi) Campaigning on the employer's property during working
hours; and
(((g))) (vii) Election observers.
(b) When only one organization is seeking certification as the
representative of unrepresented employees, and the showing of interest
submitted in support of the petition indicates that the organization
has been authorized by a majority of the employees to act as their
representative for the purposes of collective bargaining, the director
of the public employment relations commission shall (i)(A) conduct a
cross-check comparing bargaining authorization cards against the
employer's records, and (B) if majority support exists, certify the
organization as the sole representative; or (ii) at the petitioner's
request, conduct an election.
(2)(a) If an employee organization has been certified as the
exclusive bargaining representative of the employees of a bargaining
unit, the employee organization may act for and negotiate master
collective bargaining agreements that will include within the coverage
of the agreement all employees in the bargaining unit as provided in
RCW 41.80.010(2)(a). However, if a master collective bargaining
agreement is in effect for the exclusive bargaining representative, it
shall apply to the bargaining unit for which the certification has been
issued. Nothing in this section requires the parties to engage in new
negotiations during the term of that agreement.
(b) This subsection (2) does not apply to exclusive bargaining
representatives who represent employees of institutions of higher
education.
(3) The certified exclusive bargaining representative shall be
responsible for representing the interests of all the employees in the
bargaining unit. This section shall not be construed to limit an
exclusive representative's right to exercise its discretion to refuse
to process grievances of employees that are unmeritorious.
(4) No question concerning representation may be raised if:
(a) Fewer than twelve months have elapsed since the last
certification or election; or
(b) A valid collective bargaining agreement exists covering the
unit, except for that period of no more than one hundred twenty
calendar days nor less than ninety calendar days before the expiration
of the contract.

--- END ---