BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.05.630 and 2005 c 504 s 112 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, all treatment records
shall remain confidential and may be released only to the persons
designated in this section, or to other persons designated in an
informed written consent of the patient.
(2) Treatment records of a person may be released without informed
written consent in the following circumstances:
(a) To a person, organization, or agency as necessary for
management or financial audits, or program monitoring and evaluation.
Information obtained under this subsection shall remain confidential
and may not be used in a manner that discloses the name or other
identifying information about the person whose records are being
released.
(b) To the department, the director of regional support networks,
or a qualified staff member designated by the director only when
necessary to be used for billing or collection purposes. The
information shall remain confidential.
(c) For purposes of research as permitted in chapter 42.48 RCW.
(d) Pursuant to lawful order of a court.
(e) To qualified staff members of the department, to the director
of regional support networks, to resource management services
responsible for serving a patient, or to service providers designated
by resource management services as necessary to determine the progress
and adequacy of treatment and to determine whether the person should be
transferred to a less restrictive or more appropriate treatment
modality or facility. The information shall remain confidential.
(f) Within the treatment facility where the patient is receiving
treatment, confidential information may be disclosed to persons
employed, serving in bona fide training programs, or participating in
supervised volunteer programs, at the facility when it is necessary to
perform their duties.
(g) Within the department as necessary to coordinate treatment for
mental illness, developmental disabilities, alcoholism, or drug abuse
of persons who are under the supervision of the department.
(h) To a licensed physician who has determined that the life or
health of the person is in danger and that treatment without the
information contained in the treatment records could be injurious to
the patient's health. Disclosure shall be limited to the portions of
the records necessary to meet the medical emergency.
(i) To a facility that is to receive a person who is involuntarily
committed under chapter 71.05 RCW, or upon transfer of the person from
one treatment facility to another. The release of records under this
subsection shall be limited to the treatment records required by law,
a record or summary of all somatic treatments, and a discharge summary.
The discharge summary may include a statement of the patient's problem,
the treatment goals, the type of treatment which has been provided, and
recommendation for future treatment, but may not include the patient's
complete treatment record.
(j) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 71.05.390(7), to a
correctional facility or a corrections officer who is responsible for
the supervision of a person who is receiving inpatient or outpatient
evaluation or treatment. Except as provided in RCW 71.05.445 and
((71.34.225)) 71.34.345, release of records under this section is
limited to:
(i) An evaluation report provided pursuant to a written supervision
plan.
(ii) The discharge summary, including a record or summary of all
somatic treatments, at the termination of any treatment provided as
part of the supervision plan.
(iii) When a person is returned from a treatment facility to a
correctional facility, the information provided under (j)(iv) of this
subsection.
(iv) Any information necessary to establish or implement changes in
the person's treatment plan or the level or kind of supervision as
determined by resource management services. In cases involving a
person transferred back to a correctional facility, disclosure shall be
made to clinical staff only.
(k) To the person's counsel or guardian ad litem, without
modification, at any time in order to prepare for involuntary
commitment or recommitment proceedings, reexaminations, appeals, or
other actions relating to detention, admission, commitment, or
patient's rights under chapter 71.05 RCW.
(l) To staff members of the protection and advocacy agency or to
staff members of a private, nonprofit corporation for the purpose of
protecting and advocating the rights of persons with mental disorders
or developmental disabilities. Resource management services may limit
the release of information to the name, birthdate, and county of
residence of the patient, information regarding whether the patient was
voluntarily admitted, or involuntarily committed, the date and place of
admission, placement, or commitment, the name and address of a guardian
of the patient, and the date and place of the guardian's appointment.
Any staff member who wishes to obtain additional information shall
notify the patient's resource management services in writing of the
request and of the resource management services' right to object. The
staff member shall send the notice by mail to the guardian's address.
If the guardian does not object in writing within fifteen days after
the notice is mailed, the staff member may obtain the additional
information. If the guardian objects in writing within fifteen days
after the notice is mailed, the staff member may not obtain the
additional information.
(m) For purposes of coordinating health care, the department may
release without informed written consent of the patient, information
acquired for billing and collection purposes as described in (b) of
this subsection to all current treating providers of the patient with
prescriptive authority who have written a prescription for the patient
within the last twelve months. The department shall notify the patient
that billing and collection information has been released to named
providers, and provide the substance of the information released and
the dates of such release. The department shall not release
counseling, inpatient psychiatric hospitalization, or drug and alcohol
treatment information without a signed written release from the client.
(3) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the
release of information contained in the treatment records of any
patient who receives treatment for chemical dependency, the department
may restrict the release of the information as necessary to comply with
federal law and regulations.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.05.020 and 2005 c 504 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician that a
person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;
(2) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily
used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with
thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical
antipsychotic medications;
(3) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or
private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a
patient;
(4) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person
should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or
both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;
(5) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a
commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;
(6) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of
this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of
unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing
involuntary care and treatment;
(7) "Department" means the department of social and health
services;
(8) "Designated chemical dependency specialist" means a person
designated by the county alcoholism and other drug addiction program
coordinator designated under RCW 70.96A.310 to perform the commitment
duties described in chapters 70.96A and 70.96B RCW;
(9) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health
professional appointed by the county or the regional support network to
perform the duties specified in this chapter;
(10) "Designated mental health professional" means a mental health
professional designated by the county or other authority authorized in
rule to perform the duties specified in this chapter;
(11) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a
person, under the provisions of this chapter;
(12) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who
has specialized training and three years of experience in directly
treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is
a psychiatrist, psychologist, or social worker, and such other
developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules
adopted by the secretary;
(13) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW
71A.10.020(3);
(14) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical
authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be
amended by court order;
(15) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which
can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or
private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care,
and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a
mental disorder, and which is certified as such by the department. A
physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital
may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility
which is part of, or operated by, the department or any federal agency
will not require certification. No correctional institution or
facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within
the meaning of this chapter;
(16) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a
result of a mental disorder: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm
resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human
needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration in
routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of
cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not
receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;
(17) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by
program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life
skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and
vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education,
training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall
be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety
presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged
criminal conduct;
(18) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of
time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter,
excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a
mental health facility or in confinement as a result of a criminal
conviction;
(19) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a
developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a
team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:
(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged
criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;
(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes
of habilitation;
(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation
program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;
(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve
those intermediate and long-range goals;
(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;
(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due
consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to
less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or
release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and
(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person
and possible future types of residences;
(20) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter;
(21) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:
(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted
by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or
attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii)
physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced
by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person
or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii)
physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of
others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or
damage to the property of others; or
(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and
has a history of one or more violent acts;
(22) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional
impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a person's
cognitive or volitional functions;
(23) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist,
psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other
mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the
secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
(24) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public
agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given
peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial
order of appointment;
(25) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation,
or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in
whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and
treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, which is
conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care
and treatment of persons who are mentally ill;
(26) "Professional person" means a mental health professional and
shall also mean a physician, registered nurse, and such others as may
be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter;
(27) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician
and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of
graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American
medical association or the American osteopathic association and is
certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of
psychiatry and neurology;
(28) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a
psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;
(29) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or
institution, or hospital which is conducted for, or includes a
department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons who
are mentally ill, if the agency is operated directly by, federal,
state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such
governments;
(30) "Registration records" include all the records of the
department, regional support networks, treatment facilities, and other
persons providing services to the department, county departments, or
facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness;
(31) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the
provisions of this chapter;
(32) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in
chapter 71.24 RCW;
(33) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social
and health services, or his or her designee;
(34) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further
advanced degree from an accredited school of social work or a degree
deemed equivalent under rules adopted by the secretary;
(35) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records
concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received
services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department, by
regional support networks and their staffs, and by treatment
facilities. Treatment records include mental health information
contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health
drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service
stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include
notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing
treatment services for the department, regional support networks, or a
treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others;
(36) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide,
attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to
property.

--- END ---