BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to determine the character, competence, and
suitability of any applicant or service provider to have unsupervised
access, the secretary may require a fingerprint-based background check
through the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of
investigation at anytime, but shall require a fingerprint-based
background check when the applicant or service provider has resided in
the state less than three consecutive years before application, and:
(a) Is an applicant or service provider providing services to
children or people with developmental disabilities under RCW 74.15.030;
(b) Is an individual residing in an applicant or service provider's
home, facility, entity, agency, or business or who is authorized by the
department to provide services to children or people with developmental
disabilities under RCW 74.15.030; or
(c) Is an applicant or service provider providing in-home services
funded by:
(i) Medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520;
(ii) Community options program entry system waiver services under
RCW 74.39A.030;
(iii) Chore services under RCW 74.39A.110; or
(iv) Other home and community long-term care programs, established
pursuant to chapters 74.39 and 74.39A RCW, administered by the
department.
(2) The secretary shall require a fingerprint-based background
check through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal
history section and the federal bureau of investigation when the
department seeks to approve an applicant or service provider for a
foster or adoptive placement of children in accordance with federal and
state law.
(3) Any secure facility operated by the department under chapter
71.09 RCW shall require applicants and service providers to undergo a
fingerprint-based background check through the Washington state patrol
identification and criminal history section and the federal bureau of
investigation.
(4) Service providers and service provider applicants who are
required to complete a fingerprint-based background check may be hired
for a one hundred twenty-day provisional period as allowed under law or
program rules when:
(a) A fingerprint-based background check is pending; and
(b) The applicant or service provider is not disqualified based on
the immediate result of the background check.
(5) Fees charged by the Washington state patrol and the federal
bureau of investigation for fingerprint-based background checks shall
be paid by the department for applicants or service providers
providing:
(a) Services to people with a developmental disability under RCW
74.15.030;
(b) In-home services funded by medicaid personal care under RCW
74.09.520;
(c) Community options program entry system waiver services under
RCW 74.39A.030;
(d) Chore services under RCW 74.39A.110;
(e) Services under other home and community long-term care
programs, established pursuant to chapters 74.39 and 74.39A RCW,
administered by the department;
(f) Services in, or to residents of, a secure facility under RCW
71.09.115; and
(g) Foster care when fees create a hardship as required under RCW
74.15.030.
(6) Service providers licensed under RCW 74.15.030 must pay fees
charged by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of
investigation for conducting fingerprint-based background checks.
(7) Children's administration service providers licensed under RCW
74.15.030 may not pass on the cost of the background check fees to
their applicants unless the individual is determined to be disqualified
due to the background information.
(8) The department shall develop rules identifying the financial
responsibility of service providers, applicants, and the department for
paying the fees charged by law enforcement to roll, print, or scan
fingerprints-based for the purpose of a Washington state patrol or
federal bureau of investigation fingerprint-based background check.
(9) The department shall confirm that an applicant or service
provider is a United States citizen or an eligible noncitizen.
Citizenship or eligibility status may be confirmed through verification
of the applicant's or service provider's social security number.
(10) For purposes of this section, unless the context plainly
indicates otherwise:
(a) "Applicant" means a current or prospective department or
service provider employee, volunteer, student, intern, researcher,
contractor, or any other individual who will or may have unsupervised
access because of the nature of the work or services he or she
provides. "Applicant" includes but is not limited to any individual
who will or may have unsupervised access and is:
(i) Applying for a license or certification from the department;
(ii) Seeking a contract with the department or a service provider;
(iii) Applying for employment, promotion, reallocation, or
transfer;
(iv) An individual that a department client or guardian of a
department client chooses to hire or engage to provide services to
himself or herself or another vulnerable adult, juvenile, or child and
who might be eligible to receive payment from the department for
services rendered; or
(v) A department applicant who will or may work in a department-covered position.
(b) "Authorized" means the department grants an applicant, home, or
facility permission to:
(i) Conduct licensing, certification, or contracting activities;
(ii) Have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, juveniles, and
children;
(iii) Receive payments from a department program; or
(iv) Work or serve in a department-covered position.
(c) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(d) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services.
(e) "Secure facility" has the meaning provided in RCW 71.09.020.
(f) "Service provider" means entities, facilities, agencies,
businesses, or individuals who are licensed, certified, authorized, or
regulated by, receive payment from, or have contracts or agreements
with the department to provide services to vulnerable adults,
juveniles, or children. "Service provider" includes individuals whom
a department client or guardian of a department client may choose to
hire or engage to provide services to himself or herself or another
vulnerable adult, juvenile, or child and who might be eligible to
receive payment from the department for services rendered. "Service
provider" does not include those certified under chapter 70.96A RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.33.190 and 1991 c 136 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person may at any time request an agency, the department,
an individual approved by the court, or a qualified salaried court
employee to prepare a preplacement report. A certificate signed under
penalty of perjury by the person preparing the report specifying his or
her qualifications as required in this chapter shall be attached to or
filed with each preplacement report and shall include a statement of
training or experience that qualifies the person preparing the report
to discuss relevant adoption issues. A person may have more than one
preplacement report prepared. All preplacement reports shall be filed
with the court in which the petition for adoption is filed.
(2) The preplacement report shall be a written document setting
forth all relevant information relating to the fitness of the person
requesting the report as an adoptive parent. The report shall be based
on a study which shall include an investigation of the home
environment, family life, health, facilities, and resources of the
person requesting the report. The report shall include a list of the
sources of information on which the report is based. The report shall
include a recommendation as to the fitness of the person requesting the
report to be an adoptive parent. The report shall also verify that the
following issues were discussed with the prospective adoptive parents:
(a) The concept of adoption as a lifelong developmental process and
commitment;
(b) The potential for the child to have feelings of identity
confusion and loss regarding separation from the birth parents;
(c) Disclosure of the fact of adoption to the child;
(d) The child's possible questions about birth parents and
relatives; and
(e) The relevance of the child's racial, ethnic, and cultural
heritage.
(3) All preplacement reports shall include ((an investigation)) a
background check of the conviction records, pending charges, or
disciplinary board final decisions of prospective adoptive parents.
The ((investigation)) background check shall include an examination of
state and national criminal identification data provided by the
Washington state patrol criminal identification system ((as described
in chapter 43.43 RCW)) including, but not limited to, a fingerprint-based background check of national crime information databases for any
person being investigated. It shall also include a review of any child
abuse and neglect history of any adult living in the prospective
adoptive parents' home. The background check of the child abuse and
neglect history shall include a review of the child abuse and neglect
registries of all states in which the prospective adoptive parents or
any other adult living in the home have lived during the five years
preceding the date of the preplacement report.
(4) An agency, the department, or a court approved individual may
charge a reasonable fee based on the time spent in conducting the study
and preparing the preplacement report. The court may set a reasonable
fee for conducting the study and preparing the report when a court
employee has prepared the report. An agency, the department, a court
approved individual, or the court may reduce or waive the fee if the
financial condition of the person requesting the report so warrants.
An agency's, the department's, or court approved individual's, fee is
subject to review by the court upon request of the person requesting
the report.
(5) The person requesting the report shall designate to the agency,
the department, the court approved individual, or the court in writing
the county in which the preplacement report is to be filed. If the
person requesting the report has not filed a petition for adoption, the
report shall be indexed in the name of the person requesting the report
and a cause number shall be assigned. A fee shall not be charged for
filing the report. The applicable filing fee may be charged at the
time a petition governed by this chapter is filed. Any subsequent
preplacement reports shall be filed together with the original report.
(6) A copy of the completed preplacement report shall be delivered
to the person requesting the report.
(7) A person may request that a report not be completed. A
reasonable fee may be charged for the value of work done.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.44.030 and 2005 c 417 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner,
law enforcement officer, professional school personnel, registered or
licensed nurse, social service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist,
licensed or certified child care providers or their employees, employee
of the department, juvenile probation officer, placement and liaison
specialist, responsible living skills program staff, HOPE center staff,
or state family and children's ombudsman or any volunteer in the
ombudsman's office has reasonable cause to believe that a child has
suffered abuse or neglect, he or she shall report such incident, or
cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to
the department as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(b) When any person, in his or her official supervisory capacity
with a nonprofit or for-profit organization, has reasonable cause to
believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect caused by a person
over whom he or she regularly exercises supervisory authority, he or
she shall report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the
proper law enforcement agency, provided that the person alleged to have
caused the abuse or neglect is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the organization and coaches, trains, educates, or
counsels a child or children or regularly has unsupervised access to a
child or children as part of the employment, contract, or voluntary
service. No one shall be required to report under this section when he
or she obtains the information solely as a result of a privileged
communication as provided in RCW 5.60.060.
Nothing in this subsection (1)(b) shall limit a person's duty to
report under (a) of this subsection.
For the purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Official supervisory capacity" means a position, status, or
role created, recognized, or designated by any nonprofit or for-profit
organization, either for financial gain or without financial gain,
whose scope includes, but is not limited to, overseeing, directing, or
managing another person who is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the nonprofit or for-profit organization.
(ii) "Regularly exercises supervisory authority" means to act in
his or her official supervisory capacity on an ongoing or continuing
basis with regards to a particular person.
(c) The reporting requirement also applies to department of
corrections personnel who, in the course of their employment, observe
offenders or the children with whom the offenders are in contact. If,
as a result of observations or information received in the course of
his or her employment, any department of corrections personnel has
reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect,
he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.
(d) The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult who has
reasonable cause to believe that a child who resides with them, has
suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable of making a report. For
the purposes of this subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the
following: Any single act of abuse that causes physical trauma of
sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause death; any
single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep
bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than
one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep
bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or
unconsciousness.
(e) The report must be made at the first opportunity, but in no
case longer than forty-eight hours after there is reasonable cause to
believe that the child has suffered abuse or neglect. The report must
include the identity of the accused if known.
(2) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred
during childhood if it is discovered after the child has become an
adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to believe other children
are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the accused, the reporting
requirement of subsection (1) of this section does apply.
(3) Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe that a
child has suffered abuse or neglect may report such incident to the
proper law enforcement agency or to the department of social and health
services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(4) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law
enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received
by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written
report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within
five days thereafter.
(5) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means, or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in writing as provided
in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney for
appropriate action whenever the law enforcement agency's investigation
reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law enforcement
agency shall also notify the department of all reports received and the
law enforcement agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases,
where the child's welfare is endangered, the law enforcement agency
shall notify the department within twenty-four hours. In all other
cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within
seventy-two hours after a report is received by the law enforcement
agency.
(6) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under
subsection (5) of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the
victim requests, and the local office of the department, of the
decision to charge or decline to charge a crime, within five days of
making the decision.
(7) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under
this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with
designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child
protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under
this section if the department determines it is in the best interests
of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(8) Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed
under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical
opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and
that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if returned home,
the department shall file a dependency petition unless a second
licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such expert
medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate a
second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that
such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the
child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the
physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home
while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.
(9) Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (7)
of this section shall not further disseminate or release the
information except as authorized by state or federal statute.
Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(10) Upon receiving reports of alleged abuse or neglect, the
department or law enforcement agency may interview children. The
interviews may be conducted on school premises, at day-care facilities,
at the child's home, or at other suitable locations outside of the
presence of parents. Parental notification of the interview must occur
at the earliest possible point in the investigation that will not
jeopardize the safety or protection of the child or the course of the
investigation. Prior to commencing the interview the department or law
enforcement agency shall determine whether the child wishes a third
party to be present for the interview and, if so, shall make reasonable
efforts to accommodate the child's wishes. Unless the child objects,
the department or law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts
to include a third party in any interview so long as the presence of
the third party will not jeopardize the course of the investigation.
(11) Upon receiving a report of alleged child abuse and neglect,
the department or investigating law enforcement agency shall have
access to all relevant records of the child in the possession of
mandated reporters and their employees.
(12) In investigating and responding to allegations of child abuse
and neglect, the department may conduct background checks as authorized
by state and federal law.
(13) The department shall maintain investigation records and
conduct timely and periodic reviews of all cases constituting abuse and
neglect. The department shall maintain a log of screened-out
nonabusive cases.
(((13))) (14) The department shall use a risk assessment process
when investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The
department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the
placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a
risk factor. The department shall, within funds appropriated for this
purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to persons who are
determined not to require further state intervention.
(((14))) (15) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect
the law enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making
the report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is
involved in the reporting.
(((15))) (16) The department shall make reasonable efforts to learn
the name, address, and telephone number of each person making a report
of abuse or neglect under this section. The department shall provide
assurances of appropriate confidentiality of the identification of
persons reporting under this section. If the department is unable to
learn the information required under this subsection, the department
shall only investigate cases in which: (a) The department believes
there is a serious threat of substantial harm to the child; (b) the
report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that has, or is
about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or (c) the department
has, after investigation, a report of abuse or neglect that has been
founded with regard to a member of the household within three years of
receipt of the referral.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.43.842 and 1998 c 10 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The secretary of social and health services and the
secretary of health shall adopt additional requirements for the
licensure or relicensure of agencies, facilities, and licensed
individuals who provide care and treatment to vulnerable adults,
including nursing pools registered under chapter 18.52C RCW. These
additional requirements shall ensure that any person associated with a
licensed agency or facility having unsupervised access with a
vulnerable adult shall not be the respondent in an active protective
order under RCW 74.34.130, nor have been: (i) Convicted of a crime
against persons as defined in RCW 43.43.830, except as provided in this
section; (ii) convicted of crimes relating to financial exploitation as
defined in RCW 43.43.830, except as provided in this section; or (iii)
found in any disciplinary board final decision to have abused a
vulnerable adult under RCW 43.43.830((; or (iv) the subject in a
protective proceeding under chapter 74.34 RCW)).
(b) A person associated with a licensed agency or facility who has
unsupervised access with a vulnerable adult shall make the disclosures
specified in RCW 43.43.834(2). The person shall make the disclosures
in writing, sign, and swear to the contents under penalty of perjury.
The person shall, in the disclosures, specify all crimes against
children or other persons, all crimes relating to financial
exploitation, and all crimes relating to drugs as defined in RCW
43.43.830, committed by the person.
(2) The rules adopted under this section shall permit the licensee
to consider the criminal history of an applicant for employment in a
licensed facility when the applicant has one or more convictions for a
past offense and:
(a) The offense was simple assault, assault in the fourth degree,
or the same offense as it may be renamed, and three or more years have
passed between the most recent conviction and the date of application
for employment;
(b) The offense was prostitution, or the same offense as it may be
renamed, and three or more years have passed between the most recent
conviction and the date of application for employment;
(c) The offense was theft in the third degree, or the same offense
as it may be renamed, and three or more years have passed between the
most recent conviction and the date of application for employment;
(d) The offense was theft in the second degree, or the same offense
as it may be renamed, and five or more years have passed between the
most recent conviction and the date of application for employment;
(e) The offense was forgery, or the same offense as it may be
renamed, and five or more years have passed between the most recent
conviction and the date of application for employment.
The offenses set forth in (a) through (e) of this subsection do not
automatically disqualify an applicant from employment by a licensee.
Nothing in this section may be construed to require the employment of
any person against a licensee's judgment.
(3) In consultation with law enforcement personnel, the secretary
of social and health services and the secretary of health shall
investigate, or cause to be investigated, the conviction record and the
protection proceeding record information under this chapter of the
staff of each agency or facility under their respective jurisdictions
seeking licensure or relicensure. An individual responding to a
criminal background inquiry request from his or her employer or
potential employer shall disclose the information about his or her
criminal history under penalty of perjury. The secretaries shall use
the information solely for the purpose of determining eligibility for
licensure or relicensure. Criminal justice agencies shall provide the
secretaries such information as they may have and that the secretaries
may require for such purpose.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.15.030 and 2006 c 265 s 402 and 2006 c 54 s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The secretary shall have the power and it shall be the secretary's
duty:
(1) In consultation with the children's services advisory
committee, and with the advice and assistance of persons representative
of the various type agencies to be licensed, to designate categories of
facilities for which separate or different requirements shall be
developed as may be appropriate whether because of variations in the
ages, sex and other characteristics of persons served, variations in
the purposes and services offered or size or structure of the agencies
to be licensed hereunder, or because of any other factor relevant
thereto;
(2) In consultation with the children's services advisory
committee, and with the advice and assistance of persons representative
of the various type agencies to be licensed, to adopt and publish
minimum requirements for licensing applicable to each of the various
categories of agencies to be licensed.
The minimum requirements shall be limited to:
(a) The size and suitability of a facility and the plan of
operation for carrying out the purpose for which an applicant seeks a
license;
(b) ((The character, suitability and competence of an agency and
other persons associated with an agency directly responsible for the
care and treatment of children, expectant mothers or developmentally
disabled persons.
In consultation with law enforcement personnel, the secretary shall
investigate the conviction record or pending charges and dependency
record information under chapter 43.43 RCW of each agency and its staff
seeking licensure or relicensure.
No unfounded allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020 may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption
agency, or any other provider licensed under this chapter. In order to
determine the suitability of applicants for an agency license,
licensees, their employees, and other persons who have unsupervised
access to children in care, and who have not resided in the state of
Washington during the three-year period before being authorized to care
for children shall be fingerprinted. The fingerprints shall be
forwarded to the Washington state patrol and federal bureau of
investigation for a criminal history records check. The fingerprint
criminal history records checks will be at the expense of the licensee
except that in the case of a foster family home, if this expense would
work a hardship on the licensee, the department shall pay the expense.
The licensee may not pass this cost on to the employee or
prospective employee, unless the employee is determined to be
unsuitable due to his or her criminal history record. The secretary
shall use the information solely for the purpose of determining
eligibility for a license and for determining the character,
suitability, and competence of those persons or agencies, excluding
parents, not required to be licensed who are authorized to care for
children, expectant mothers, and developmentally disabled persons.
Criminal justice agencies shall provide the secretary such information
as they may have and that the secretary may require for such purpose;
(c))) Obtaining background information and any out-of-state
equivalent, to determine whether the applicant or service provider is
disqualified and to determine the character, competence, and
suitability of an agency, the agency's employees, volunteers, and other
persons associated with an agency;
(c) Conducting background checks for those who will or may have
unsupervised access to children, expectant mothers, or individuals with
a developmental disability;
(d) Obtaining child protective services information or records
maintained in the department case management information system. No
unfounded allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020 may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption
agency, or any other provider licensed under this chapter;
(e) Submitting a fingerprint-based background check through the
Washington state patrol under chapter 10.97 RCW and through the federal
bureau of investigation for:
(i) Agencies and their staff, volunteers, students, and interns
when the agency is seeking license or relicense;
(ii) Foster care and adoption placements; and
(iii) Any adult living in a home where a child may be placed;
(f) If any adult living in the home has not resided in the state of
Washington for the preceding five years, the department shall review
any child abuse and neglect registries maintained by any state where
the adult has resided over the preceding five years;
(g) The cost of fingerprint background check fees will be paid as
required in section 1 of this act;
(h) National and state background information must be used solely
for the purpose of determining eligibility for a license and for
determining the character, suitability, and competence of those persons
or agencies, excluding parents, not required to be licensed who are
authorized to care for children or expectant mothers;
(i) The number of qualified persons required to render the type of
care and treatment for which an agency seeks a license;
(((d))) (j) The safety, cleanliness, and general adequacy of the
premises to provide for the comfort, care and well-being of children,
expectant mothers or developmentally disabled persons;
(((e))) (k) The provision of necessary care, including food,
clothing, supervision and discipline; physical, mental and social well-being; and educational, recreational and spiritual opportunities for
those served;
(((f))) (l) The financial ability of an agency to comply with
minimum requirements established pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW
74.13.031; and
(((g))) (m) The maintenance of records pertaining to the admission,
progress, health and discharge of persons served;
(3) To investigate any person, including relatives by blood or
marriage except for parents, for character, suitability, and competence
in the care and treatment of children, expectant mothers, and
developmentally disabled persons prior to authorizing that person to
care for children, expectant mothers, and developmentally disabled
persons. However, if a child is placed with a relative under RCW
13.34.065 or 13.34.130, and if such relative appears otherwise suitable
and competent to provide care and treatment the criminal history
background check required by this section need not be completed before
placement, but shall be completed as soon as possible after placement;
(4) On reports of alleged child abuse and neglect, to investigate
agencies in accordance with chapter 26.44 RCW, including child day-care
centers and family day-care homes, to determine whether the alleged
abuse or neglect has occurred, and whether child protective services or
referral to a law enforcement agency is appropriate;
(5) To issue, revoke, or deny licenses to agencies pursuant to
chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031. Licenses shall specify the
category of care which an agency is authorized to render and the ages,
sex and number of persons to be served;
(6) To prescribe the procedures and the form and contents of
reports necessary for the administration of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW
74.13.031 and to require regular reports from each licensee;
(7) To inspect agencies periodically to determine whether or not
there is compliance with chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 and the
requirements adopted hereunder;
(8) To review requirements adopted hereunder at least every two
years and to adopt appropriate changes after consultation with affected
groups for child day-care requirements and with the children's services
advisory committee for requirements for other agencies;
(9) To engage in negotiated rule making pursuant to RCW
34.05.310(2)(a) with the exclusive representative of the family child
care licensees selected in accordance with RCW 74.15.--- (section 6,
chapter 54, Laws of 2006) and with other affected interests before
adopting requirements that affect family child care licensees; and
(10) To consult with public and private agencies in order to help
them improve their methods and facilities for the care of children,
expectant mothers and developmentally disabled persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Federal and state law require the balancing
of the privacy interests of individuals with the government's interest
in the protection of children and vulnerable adults. The legislature
finds that the balancing of these interests may be skewed in favor of
the privacy rights of individuals. Therefore, a work group is created
to research the current laws regarding background checks for
prospective employees of public and private entities which work with
vulnerable adults or children. The legislature finds that a
comprehensive background check which includes both civil and criminal
information is a valuable tool in safeguarding vulnerable adults and
children from preventable risk.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The department of social and health
services shall convene a work group to review the current federal and
state laws and administrative rules and practices with respect to
sharing confidential information.
(2)(a) The work group shall include but not be limited to the
following members, chosen by the chief executive officer of each
entity:
(i) A representative of the department of social and health
services;
(ii) A representative of the department of early learning;
(iii) A representative of the department of health;
(iv) A representative of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction;
(v) A representative of the department of licensing;
(vi) A representative of the Washington state patrol;
(vii) A representative from the Washington state bar association;
(viii) A representative of the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs;
(ix) A representative of the Washington association of criminal
defense attorneys;
(x) A representative from the administrative office of the courts;
and
(xi) A representative from the department of information services.
(b) The work group shall also include as nonvoting ex officio
members:
(i) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate; and
(ii) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(c) Additional voting members may be invited to participate as
determined by the work group.
(3) Appointments to the work group shall be completed within thirty
days of the effective date of this section.
(4) The work group may form an executive committee, create
subcommittees, designate alternative representatives, and define other
procedures, as needed, for operation of the work group.
(5) Legislative members of the work group shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except
those representing an employee or organization, are entitled to be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(6) The secretary of the department of social and health services
or the secretary's designee shall serve as chair of the work group.
(7) The department of social and health services shall provide
staff support to the work group.
(8) The work group shall:
(a) Provide an interim report to the legislature and the governor
by December 1, 2007; and
(b) Make recommendations to the legislature and the governor by
July 1, 2008, regarding improving current processes for sharing
information, including but not limited to the feasibility of creating
a clearinghouse of information.
(9) This section expires November 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If specific funding for the purposes of
sections 6 and 7 of this act, referencing sections 6 and 7 of this act
by bill or chapter number and section number, is not provided by June
30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, sections 6 and 7 of this
act are null and void.

--- END ---