BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.155.010 and 1995 c 77 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the purpose of RCW 28A.155.010 through ((28A.155.100))
28A.155.160, 28A.160.030, and 28A.150.390 to ensure that all children
with disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020 shall have the
opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense as
guaranteed to them by the Constitution of this state and applicable
federal laws.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.155.020 and 1995 c 77 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is established in the office of the superintendent of public
instruction an administrative section or unit for the education of
children with ((disabling conditions)) disabilities who require special
education.
((Children)) Students with disabilities are those children whether
enrolled in school or ((out of school)) not who ((are temporarily or
permanently retarded in normal educational processes by reason of
physical or mental disability, or by reason of emotional maladjustment,
or by reason of other disability, and those children who have specific
learning and language disabilities resulting from perceptual-motor
disabilities, including problems in visual and auditory perception and
integration)) through an evaluation process are determined eligible for
special education due to a disability.
In accordance with part B of the federal individuals with
disabilities education improvement act and any other federal or state
laws relating to the provision of special education services, the
superintendent of public instruction shall require each school district
in the state to insure an appropriate educational opportunity for all
children with disabilities between the ages of three and twenty-one,
but when the twenty-first birthday occurs during the school year, the
educational program may be continued until the end of that school year.
The superintendent of public instruction, by rule, shall establish for
the purpose of excess cost funding, as provided in RCW 28A.150.390,
28A.160.030, and 28A.155.010 through ((28A.155.100)) 28A.155.160,
functional definitions of special education, the various types of
disabling conditions, and eligibility criteria for special education
programs for ((students)) children with disabilities, including
referral procedures, use of aversive interventions, the education
curriculum and statewide or district-wide assessments, parent and
district requests for special education due process hearings, and
procedural safeguards. For the purposes of RCW 28A.155.010 through
((28A.155.100)) 28A.155.160, an appropriate education is defined as an
education directed to the unique needs, abilities, and limitations of
the children with disabilities who are enrolled either full time or
part time in a school district. School districts are strongly
encouraged to provide parental training in the care and education of
the children and to involve parents in the classroom.
Nothing in this section shall prohibit the establishment or
continuation of existing cooperative programs between school districts
or contracts with other agencies approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, which can meet the obligations of school districts
to provide education for children with disabilities, or prohibit the
continuation of needed related services to school districts by the
department of social and health services.
This section shall not be construed as in any way limiting the
powers of local school districts set forth in RCW 28A.155.070.
((No child shall be removed from the jurisdiction of juvenile court
for training or education under RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100
without the approval of the superior court of the county.))

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.155.030 and 1995 c 77 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall ((appoint)) employ
an administrative officer of the division. The administrative officer,
under the direction of the superintendent of public instruction, shall
coordinate and supervise the program of special education for eligible
children with disabilities in the school districts of the state. He or
she shall ((cooperate with the educational service district
superintendents and local school district superintendents and with all
other interested school officials in ensuring that all)) ensure that
school districts provide an appropriate educational opportunity for all
children with disabilities in need of special education and related
services and shall ((cooperate)) coordinate with the state secretary of
social and health services and with county and regional officers on
cases where ((medical examination or other attention is needed))
related services are available for children with disabilities.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.155.040 and 1995 c 77 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of directors of each school district, for the purpose of
compliance with the provisions of RCW 28A.150.390, 28A.160.030, and
28A.155.010 through ((28A.155.100)) 28A.155.160 and chapter 28A.190
RCW, shall cooperate with the superintendent of public instruction and
with the administrative officer and shall provide an appropriate
educational opportunity ((and give other appropriate aid and special
attention)) to children with disabilities, as defined in RCW
28A.155.020, in regular or special school facilities within the
district or shall contract for such services with other agencies as
provided in RCW 28A.155.060 or shall participate in an interdistrict
arrangement in accordance with RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.220 and/or
28A.225.250 and 28A.225.260.
In carrying out their responsibilities under this chapter, school
districts severally or jointly with the approval of the superintendent
of public instruction are authorized to ((establish, operate,)) support
and/or contract for residential schools and/or homes approved by the
department of social and health services for aid and special attention
to ((children)) students with disabilities.
The cost of board and room in facilities approved by the department
of social and health services shall be provided by the department of
social and health services for those students with disabilities
eligible for such aid under programs of the department. The cost of
approved board and room shall be provided for those students with
disabilities not eligible under programs of the department of social
and health services but deemed in need of the same by the
superintendent of public instruction: PROVIDED, That no school
district shall be financially responsible for special ((aid)) education
programs for students who are attending residential schools operated by
the department of social and health services: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
the provisions of RCW 28A.150.390, 28A.160.030, and 28A.155.010 through
28A.155.100 shall not preclude the extension by the superintendent of
public instruction of special education opportunities to ((children))
students with disabilities in residential schools operated by the
department of social and health services.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.155.050 and 1995 c 77 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any child ((who is not able to attend school and)) who is eligible
for special education services through special excess cost aid programs
authorized under RCW 28A.155.010 through ((28A.155.100)) 28A.155.160
shall be given such ((aid at home or at such other place)) services in
the least restrictive environment as determined by the ((board of
directors of)) student's individualized education program (IEP) team in
the school district in which such ((child)) student resides. Any
school district ((within which such a child resides)) required to
provide such services shall thereupon be granted regular apportionment
of state and county school funds and, in addition, allocations from
state excess funds made available for such special services for such
period of time as such special ((aid)) education program is given:
PROVIDED, That should such ((child)) student or any other ((child))
student with disabilities attend and participate in a special ((aid))
education program operated by another school district in accordance
with the provisions of RCW 28A.225.210, 28A.225.220, and/or
28A.225.250, such regular apportionment shall be granted to the
receiving school district, and such receiving school district shall be
reimbursed by the district in which such student resides in accordance
with rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction for the
entire approved excess cost not reimbursed from such regular
apportionment.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.155.060 and 2006 c 263 s 915 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of RCW 28A.155.020
through 28A.155.050, the board of directors of every school district
shall be authorized to contract with agencies approved by the
superintendent of public instruction for operating special education
programs for students with disabilities. Approval standards for such
agencies shall conform substantially with those ((promulgated for
approval)) of special education ((aid)) programs in the common schools.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.155.065 and 2006 c 269 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2009, each school district shall provide or
contract for early intervention services to all eligible children with
disabilities from birth to three years of age. Eligibility shall be
determined according to Part C of the federal individuals with
disabilities education improvement act or other applicable federal and
state laws, and as specified in the Washington Administrative Code
adopted by the state lead agency. School districts shall provide or
contract for early intervention services in partnership with local
birth-to-three lead agencies and birth-to-three providers. Services
provided under this section shall not supplant services or funding
currently provided in the state for early intervention services to
eligible children with disabilities from birth to three years of age.
The state-designated birth-to-three lead agency shall be payor of last
resort for birth-to-three early intervention services provided under
this section.
(2) The services in this section are not part of the state's
program of basic education pursuant to Article IX of the state
Constitution.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.155.070 and 1995 c 77 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Special educational ((and training)) programs provided by the state
and the school districts thereof for ((children)) students with
disabilities may be extended to include ((children)) students of
preschool age. School districts which extend such special programs to
children of preschool age shall be entitled to the regular
apportionments from state and county school funds, as provided by law,
and in addition to allocations from state excess cost funds made
available for such special services for those children with
disabilities who are given such special services.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.155.070 and 2006 c 269 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Special educational ((and training)) programs provided by the state
and the school districts thereof for ((children)) students with
disabilities shall be extended to include ((children)) students of
preschool age. School districts shall be entitled to the regular
apportionments from state and county school funds, as provided by law,
and in addition to allocations from state excess cost funds made
available for such special services for those ((children)) students
with disabilities who are given such special services.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.155.080 and 1995 c 77 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
Where a child with disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020 has
been denied the opportunity of ((an)) a special educational program by
a local school district ((superintendent under the provisions of RCW
28A.225.010, or for any other reason there shall be an affirmative
showing by the school district superintendent in a writing directed to
the parents or guardian of such a child within ten days of such
decision that
(1) No agency or other school district with whom the district may
contract under RCW 28A.155.040 can accommodate such child, and
(2) Such child will not benefit from an alternative educational
opportunity as permitted under RCW 28A.155.050.)) there shall be a
right of appeal by the parent or guardian of such child to the
superintendent of public instruction pursuant to procedures established
by the superintendent and in accordance with RCW 28A.155.090 and part
B of the federal individuals with disabilities education improvement
act.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.155.090 and 1995 c 77 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall have the duty and
authority, through the administrative section or unit for the education
of children with disabling conditions, to:
(1) Assist school districts in the formation of ((total school))
programs to meet the needs of children with disabilities;
(2) Develop interdistrict cooperation programs for children with
disabilities as authorized in RCW 28A.225.250;
(3) Provide, upon request, to parents or guardians of children with
disabilities, information as to the special education programs for
students with disabilities offered within the state;
(4) Assist, upon request, the parent or guardian of any child with
disabilities in the placement of any child with disabilities who is
eligible for but not receiving special educational ((aid)) services for
children with disabilities;
(5) Approve school district and agency programs as being eligible
for special excess cost financial aid to ((children)) students with
disabilities;
(6) ((Adjudge, upon appeal by a parent or guardian of a child with
disabilities who is not receiving an educational program, whether the
decision of a local school district superintendent under RCW
28A.155.080 to exclude such child with disabilities was justified by
the available facts and)) Consistent with the provisions of RCW
28A.150.390, 28A.160.030, and 28A.155.010 through ((28A.155.100. If
the superintendent of public instruction shall decide otherwise he or
she shall apply sanctions as provided in RCW 28A.155.100 until such
time as the school district assures compliance with the provisions of
RCW 28A.150.390, 28A.160.030, and 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100))
28A.155.160, and part B of the federal individuals with disabilities
education improvement act, administer administrative hearings and other
procedures to ensure procedural safeguards of children with
disabilities; and
(7) Promulgate such rules as are necessary to implement part B of
the federal individuals with disabilities education improvement act or
other federal law providing for special education services for children
with disabilities and the several provisions of RCW 28A.150.390,
28A.160.030, and 28A.155.010 through ((28A.155.100)) 28A.155.160 and to
ensure ((educational opportunities within the common school system for
all children with disabilities who are not institutionalized))
appropriate access to and participation in the general education
curriculum and participation in statewide assessments for all students
with disabilities.

Sec. 12 RCW 28A.155.100 and 1990 c 33 s 128 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction is hereby authorized and
directed to establish appropriate sanctions to be applied to any school
district of the state failing to comply with the provisions of RCW
28A.150.390, 28A.160.030, and 28A.155.010 through ((28A.155.100))
28A.155.060 and 28A.155.080 through 28A.155.160 to be applied beginning
upon the effective date thereof, which sanctions shall include
withholding of any portion of state aid to such district until such
time as compliance is assured.

Sec. 13 RCW 28A.155.115 and 1996 c 135 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each student shall be assessed individually to determine the
appropriate learning media for the student including but not limited to
Braille.
(2) No student may be denied the opportunity for instruction in
Braille reading and writing solely because the student has some
remaining vision.
(3) This section does not require the exclusive use of Braille if
there are other special education services to meet the student's
educational needs. The provision of special education or other
services does not preclude Braille use or instruction.
(4) If a student's individualized learning media assessment
indicates that Braille is an appropriate learning medium, instruction
in Braille shall be provided as a part of such student's educational
curriculum and if such student has an individualized education program,
such instruction shall be provided as part of that program.
(5) If Braille will not be provided to a student, the reason for
not incorporating it in the student's individualized education program
shall be documented in ((such plan)) writing and provided to the parent
or guardian. If no individualized education program exists, such
documentation, signed by the parent or guardian, shall be placed in the
student's file.

Sec. 14 RCW 28A.155.140 and 1991 c 116 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
School districts may use curriculum-based assessment procedures as
measures for developing academic early ((intervention programs))
intervening services, as defined under part B of the federal
individuals with disabilities education improvement act, and curriculum
planning: PROVIDED, That the use of curriculum-based assessment
procedures shall not deny a student the right to ((an)) use of other
assessments to determine eligibility or participation in ((learning
disabilities)) special education programs as provided by RCW
28A.155.010 through ((28A.155.100)) 28A.155.160.

Sec. 15 RCW 28A.155.160 and 1997 c 104 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the department of early learning,
the Washington state school for the deaf, the Washington state school
for the blind, school districts, educational service districts, and all
other state and local government educational agencies and the
department of services for the blind, the department of social and
health services, and all other state and local government agencies
concerned with the care, education, or habilitation or rehabilitation
of children with disabilities may enter into interagency cooperative
agreements for the purpose of providing assistive technology devices
and services to children with disabilities. Such arrangements may
include but are not limited to interagency agreements for the
acquisition, including joint funding, maintenance, loan, sale, lease,
or transfer of assistive technology devices and for the provision of
assistive technology services including but not limited to assistive
technology assessments and training.
For the purposes of this section, "assistive device" means any
item, piece of equipment, or product system, whether acquired
commercially off-the-shelf, modified, or customized, that is used to
increase, maintain, or improve functional capabilities of children with
disabilities. The term "assistive technology service" means any
service that directly assists a child with a disability in the
selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology device.
Assistive technology service includes:
(1) The evaluation of the needs of a child with a disability,
including a functional evaluation of the child in the child's customary
environment;
(2) Purchasing, leasing, or otherwise providing for the acquisition
of assistive technology devices by children with disabilities;
(3) Selecting, designing, fitting, customizing, adapting, applying,
retaining, repairing, or replacing of assistive technology devices;
(4) Coordinating and using other therapies, interventions, or
services with assistive technology devices, such as those associated
with existing education and rehabilitation plans and programs;
(5) Training or technical assistance for a child with a disability
or if appropriate, the child's family; and
(6) Training or technical assistance for professionals, including
individuals providing education and rehabilitation services, employers,
or other individuals who provide services to, employ, or are otherwise
substantially involved in the major life functions of children with
disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Section 8 of this act expires September 1,
2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Section 9 of this act takes effect
September 1, 2009.

--- END ---