BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.13.031 and 2006 c 266 s 1 and 2006 c 221 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The department shall have the duty to provide child welfare
services and shall:
(1) Develop, administer, supervise, and monitor a coordinated and
comprehensive plan that establishes, aids, and strengthens services for
the protection and care of runaway, dependent, or neglected children.
(2) Within available resources, recruit an adequate number of
prospective adoptive and foster homes, both regular and specialized,
i.e. homes for children of ethnic minority, including Indian homes for
Indian children, sibling groups, handicapped and emotionally disturbed,
teens, pregnant and parenting teens, and annually report to the
governor and the legislature concerning the department's success in:
(a) Meeting the need for adoptive and foster home placements; (b)
reducing the foster parent turnover rate; (c) completing home studies
for legally free children; and (d) implementing and operating the
passport program required by RCW 74.13.285. The report shall include
a section entitled "Foster Home Turn-Over, Causes and Recommendations."
(3) Investigate complaints of any recent act or failure to act on
the part of a parent or caretaker that results in death, serious
physical or emotional harm, or sexual abuse or exploitation, or that
presents an imminent risk of serious harm, and on the basis of the
findings of such investigation, offer child welfare services in
relation to the problem to such parents, legal custodians, or persons
serving in loco parentis, and/or bring the situation to the attention
of an appropriate court, or another community agency: PROVIDED, That
an investigation is not required of nonaccidental injuries which are
clearly not the result of a lack of care or supervision by the child's
parents, legal custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis. If the
investigation reveals that a crime against a child may have been
committed, the department shall notify the appropriate law enforcement
agency.
(4) Offer, on a voluntary basis, family reconciliation services to
families who are in conflict.
(5) Monitor out-of-home placements, on a timely and routine basis,
to assure the safety, well-being, and quality of care being provided is
within the scope of the intent of the legislature as defined in RCW
74.13.010 and 74.15.010, and annually submit a report measuring the
extent to which the department achieved the specified goals to the
governor and the legislature.
(6) Have authority to accept custody of children from parents and
to accept custody of children from juvenile courts, where authorized to
do so under law, to provide child welfare services including placement
for adoption, to provide for the routine and necessary medical, dental,
and mental health care, or necessary emergency care of the children,
and to provide for the physical care of such children and make payment
of maintenance costs if needed. Except where required by Public Law
95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915), no private adoption agency which receives
children for adoption from the department shall discriminate on the
basis of race, creed, or color when considering applications in their
placement for adoption.
(7) Have authority to provide temporary shelter to children who
have run away from home and who are admitted to crisis residential
centers.
(8) Have authority to purchase care for children; and shall follow
in general the policy of using properly approved private agency
services for the actual care and supervision of such children insofar
as they are available, paying for care of such children as are accepted
by the department as eligible for support at reasonable rates
established by the department.
(9) Establish a children's services advisory committee which shall
assist the secretary in the development of a partnership plan for
utilizing resources of the public and private sectors, and advise on
all matters pertaining to child welfare, licensing of child care
agencies, adoption, and services related thereto. At least one member
shall represent the adoption community.
(10)(a) Have authority to provide continued foster care or group
care as needed to participate in or complete a high school or
vocational school program.
(b)(i) Beginning in 2006, the department has the authority to allow
up to fifty youth reaching age eighteen to continue in foster care or
group care as needed to participate in or complete a posthigh school
academic or vocational program, and to receive necessary support and
transition services.
(ii) In 2007 and 2008, the department has the authority to allow up
to fifty additional youth per year reaching age eighteen to remain in
foster care or group care as provided in (b)(i) of this subsection.
(iii) A youth who remains eligible for such placement and services
pursuant to department rules may continue in foster care or group care
until the youth reaches his or her twenty-first birthday. Eligibility
requirements shall include active enrollment in a posthigh school
academic or vocational program and maintenance of a 2.0 grade point
average.
(11) Refer cases to the division of child support whenever state or
federal funds are expended for the care and maintenance of a child,
including a child with a developmental disability who is placed as a
result of an action under chapter 13.34 RCW, unless the department
finds that there is good cause not to pursue collection of child
support against the parent or parents of the child. Cases involving
individuals age eighteen through twenty shall not be referred to the
division of child support unless required by federal law.
(12) Have authority within funds appropriated for foster care
services to purchase care for Indian children who are in the custody of
a federally recognized Indian tribe or tribally licensed child-placing
agency pursuant to parental consent, tribal court order, or state
juvenile court order; and the purchase of such care shall be subject to
the same eligibility standards and rates of support applicable to other
children for whom the department purchases care.
Notwithstanding any other provision of RCW 13.32A.170 through
13.32A.200 and 74.13.032 through 74.13.036, or of this section all
services to be provided by the department of social and health services
under subsections (4), (6), and (7) of this section, subject to the
limitations of these subsections, may be provided by any program
offering such services funded pursuant to Titles II and III of the
federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974.
(13) Within amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, provide
preventive services to families with children that prevent or shorten
the duration of an out-of-home placement.
(14) Have authority to provide independent living services to
youths, including individuals who have attained eighteen years of age,
and have not attained twenty-one years of age who are or have been in
foster care.
(15)(a) Engage in a meet and confer process with certified
representatives of licensed foster parents to help ensure that the
department is meeting the duties and obligations specified in RCW
74.13.031, 74.13.250, and 74.13.320 regarding the recruitment of foster
homes, reducing foster parent turnover rates, providing effective
training for foster parents, and administering a coordinated and
comprehensive plan that strengthens services for the protection of
children.
(b) The department shall meet and confer with certified
representatives of licensed foster parents over issues of mutual
concern to the department and the foster parents, including but not
limited to recruitment, training, compensation and benefits, reduced
turnover among foster parents, and recommendations for the creation of
a professional career track for foster parents to compliment the
continued provision of services by volunteer foster parents to care for
abused and neglected children needing special services. The department
shall commence meet and confer discussions initially upon certification
of a representative according to provisions of this act and thereafter
by February 1st of any even-numbered year.
(c) The results of meet and confer discussions shall be committed
to writing and be subject to any agency rule-making, statutory, or
budgetary changes that may be required to implement the agreements and
recommendations from the meet and confer process. Any agreement or
recommendations that require rule-making, statutory, or budgetary
changes will be contingent upon the successful completion of such rule-making and/or legislative process. The parties will jointly seek the
enactment of such legislative or regulatory action.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, the department shall recognize
as a certified representative a foster parent organization that has
written authorization for representation from at least ten percent of
licensed foster parent households in the state, the total number of
which is to be defined by the department on January 1st of any given
year and made available to any foster parent organization seeking,
through written request to the department, to become a certified
representative for purposes of this section, provided that such
authorization by foster parents has been verified by an outside neutral
party, such as the American arbitration association, that is mutually
agreeable to the department and the foster parent organization seeking
to become a certified representative, provided however, that the costs
of such verification shall be fully borne by the organization seeking
to be certified as a representative for purposes of this section. A
representative organization certified under this subsection shall be
deemed the representative of only those foster parents who have
expressly authorized that representative organization to represent them
for the purposes of this section.
(e) Should a certified representative seek to be the exclusive
representative for all licensed foster parents in the state, it must
secure a majority vote from licensed foster parents voting in a mail
ballot election for representation to be held among all licensed foster
parents in the state. Upon written request by a foster parent
organization to the department for such an election, the department
shall make available to the requesting foster parent organization the
names and addresses of licensed foster parents as of January 1st of
that year and provide that list to an outside neutral party, such as
the American arbitration association, that the department and the
requesting foster parent organization can mutually agree upon to
conduct an impartial election among foster parents, provided however,
that all costs of such an election shall be borne by the foster parent
organization requesting the election. If more than one certified
representative seeks to be on the ballot for such an election, it shall
submit in writing to the department its intention to be on the ballot
within thirty days of the written request for an election by another
certified representative, and the ballot shall provide the voting
foster parents the option of selecting exclusive representation by one
of the certified representative organizations or no representation. If
more than one certified representative seeks to be on the ballot, the
costs of the election shall be equally borne by each of the certified
representatives on the ballot.
(f) Nothing in this section is intended to grant employee status or
in any way imply an employer-employee relationship between the state or
the certified representative and foster parents as a result of foster
parents having the right to a certified representative. Any state
employment track that may result as an outcome of recommendations from
the meet and confer process to create a professional track for foster
parents serving children with special needs would be subject to
approval by the legislature to create and authorize any new state
employment positions and any such positions created would fall under
relevant state employment representation and collective bargaining
statutes and not this section.
(g) Nothing in this section is intended to give or imply that
foster parents have a right to engage in a strike or stoppage of
services as a result of having the right to representation.
(h) Nothing in this section shall modify the department's
obligation to comply with federal statutes and regulations or court
orders regarding the delivery of foster care services; nor the
legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to the delivery
of state services under this section.
(i) Nothing in this section shall modify the legislature's right to
make programmatic modifications to the delivery of state services under
this title. Nothing in this section is intended to modify or supplant
the statutory or regulatory rights of parents or children in the foster
care system.

--- END ---