BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.72.030 and 1992 c 100 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislative authority of each county having shellfish tidelands
within its boundaries is authorized to establish a shellfish protection
district to include areas in which nonpoint pollution threatens the
water quality upon which the continuation or restoration of shellfish
farming or harvesting is dependent. The legislative authority shall
constitute the governing body of the district and shall adopt a
shellfish protection program to be effective within the district. The
legislative authority may appoint a local advisory council to advise
the legislative authority in preparation and implementation of
shellfish protection programs. This program shall include any elements
deemed appropriate to deal with the nonpoint pollution threatening
water quality, including, but not limited to, requiring the elimination
or decrease of contaminants in storm water runoff, establishing
monitoring, inspection, and repair elements to ensure that on-site
sewage systems are adequately maintained and working properly, assuring
that animal grazing and manure management practices are consistent with
best management practices, and establishing educational and public
involvement programs to inform citizens on the causes of the
threatening nonpoint pollution and what they can do to decrease the
amount of such pollution. The county legislative authority shall
consult with the department of health, the department of ecology, the
department of agriculture, or the conservation commission as
appropriate as to the elements of the program. An element may be
omitted where another program is effectively addressing those sources
of nonpoint water pollution. Within the limits of RCW 90.72.040 and
90.72.070, the county legislative authority shall have full
jurisdiction and authority to manage, regulate, and control its
programs and to fix, alter, regulate, and control the fees for services
provided and charges or rates as provided under those programs.
Programs established under this chapter, may, but are not required to,
be part of a system of sewerage as defined in RCW 36.94.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.72.045 and 1992 c 100 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county legislative authority shall create a shellfish
protection district and establish a shellfish protection program
developed under RCW 90.72.030 or an equivalent program to address the
causes or suspected causes of pollution within one hundred eighty days
after the department of health, because of water quality degradation
due to ongoing nonpoint sources of pollution((,)) has((, after June 11,
1992,)) closed or downgraded the classification of a recreational or
commercial shellfish growing area within the boundaries of the county.
The county legislative authority shall initiate implementation of the
shellfish protection program within sixty days after it is established.
A copy of the program must be provided to the departments of
health, ecology, and agriculture. An agency that has regulatory
authority for any of the sources of nonpoint pollution covered by the
program shall cooperate with the county in its implementation. The
county legislative authority shall submit a written report to the
department of health annually that describes the status and progress of
the program.

--- END ---