BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.34.020 and 2000 c 247 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated:
(1) "Actuary" means the state actuary or the office of the state
actuary.
(2) "Assured benefit program" means the provisions of this chapter
allowing certain members the option to contribute a specified
percentage of their compensation, invest that contribution in the
Washington state investment board investment program, and receive a
specified benefit.
(3) "Assured benefit subaccount" means a portion of a member
account that must be directed to the Washington state investment board
investment program.
(4) "Board" means the employee retirement benefits board authorized
in chapter 41.50 RCW.
(((3))) (5) "Department" means the department of retirement
systems.
(((4))) (6)(a) "Compensation" for teachers for purposes of this
chapter is the same as "earnable compensation" for plan 3 in chapter
41.32 RCW except that the compensation may be reported when paid,
rather than when earned.
(b) "Compensation" for classified employees for purposes of this
chapter is the same as "compensation earnable" for plan 3 in RCW
41.35.010, except that the compensation may be reported when paid,
rather than when earned.
(c) "Compensation" for public employees for purposes of this
chapter is the same as "compensation earnable" for plan 3 in RCW
41.40.010, except that the compensation may be reported when paid,
rather than when earned.
(((5))) (7)(a) "Employer" for teachers for purposes of this chapter
means the same as "employer" for plan 3 in chapter 41.32 RCW.
(b) "Employer" for classified employees for purposes of this
chapter means the same as "employer" for plan 3 in RCW 41.35.010.
(c) "Employer" for public employees for purposes of this chapter
means the same as "employer" for plan 3 in RCW 41.40.010.
(((6))) (8) "Member" means any employee included in the membership
of a retirement system as provided for in chapter 41.32 RCW of plan 3,
chapter 41.35 RCW of plan 3, or chapter 41.40 RCW of plan 3.
(((7))) (9) "Member account" or "member's account" means the sum of
the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member.
(((8))) (10) "Retiree" means any member in receipt of an allowance
or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service
rendered to an employer by such member.
(((9))) (11) "Teacher" means a member of the teachers' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.32.010(29).
(((10))) (12) "Classified employee" means a member of the school
employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010.
(((11))) (13) "Public employee" means a member of the public
employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.34.040 and 2003 c 156 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Members of the public employees', school employees', and
teachers' retirement systems participating in the assured benefit
program shall contribute from his or her compensation according to one
of the rate structures in (c) of this subsection in addition to the
mandatory minimum of five percent. However, the total contribution
rate must be at least equal to his or her system's assured benefit base
rate in (d) of this subsection. The assured benefit base rate
contributions are deposited in the member's assured benefit subaccount
and are directed to the Washington state investment board investment
program.
(b) A member not participating in the assured benefit program shall
contribute from his or her compensation according to one of the
((following)) rate structures in (c) of this subsection in addition to
the mandatory minimum five percent((:)).
(c)

Option A Contribution Rate

All Ages 0.0% fixed

Option B

Up to Age 35 0.0%

Age 35 to 44 1.0%

Age 45 and above 2.5%

Option C

Up to Age 35 1.0%

Age 35 to 44 2.5%

Age 45 and above 3.5%

Option D

All Ages 2.0%

Option E

All Ages 5.0%

Option F

All Ages 10.0%

(d) System Assured Benefit Base Rate

Teachers' Retirement System fixed 6%

School Employees' Retirement System fixed 5%

Public Employees' Retirement System fixed 5%

(2) The board shall have the right to offer contribution rate
options in addition to those listed in subsection (1) of this section,
provided that no significant additional administrative costs are
created. All options offered by the board shall conform to the
requirements stated in subsections (3) and (5) of this section.
(3)(a) For members of the teachers' retirement system entering plan
3 under RCW 41.32.835 or members of the school employees' retirement
system entering plan 3 under RCW 41.35.610, within ninety days of
becoming a member he or she has an option to choose one of the above
contribution rate structures. If the member does not select an option
within the ninety-day period, he or she shall be assigned option A.
(b) For members of the public employees' retirement system entering
plan 3 under RCW 41.40.785, within the ninety days described in RCW
41.40.785 an employee who irrevocably chooses plan 3 shall select one
of the above contribution rate structures. If the member does not
select an option within the ninety-day period, he or she shall be
assigned option A.
(c) For members of the teachers' retirement system transferring to
plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817, members of the school employees' retirement
system transferring to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510, or members of the
public employees' retirement system transferring to plan 3 under RCW
41.40.795, upon election to plan 3 he or she must choose one of the
above contribution rate structures.
(d) Within ninety days of the date that an employee changes
employers, he or she has an option to choose one of the above
contribution rate structures. If the member does not select an option
within this ninety-day period, he or she shall be assigned option A.
(4) Each year, members may change their contribution rate option by
notifying their employer in writing during the month of January.
(5) Contributions shall begin the first day of the pay cycle in
which the rate option is made, or the first day of the pay cycle in
which the end of the ninety-day period occurs.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.34.060 and 2001 c 180 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the
member's account shall be invested by the state investment board. In
order to reduce transaction costs and address liquidity issues, based
upon recommendations of the state investment board, the department may
require members to provide up to ninety days' notice prior to moving
funds from the state investment board portfolio to self-directed
investment options provided under subsection (3) of this section.
(a) For members of the retirement system as provided for in chapter
41.32 RCW of plan 3, investment shall be in the same portfolio as that
of the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund under RCW
41.50.075(2).
(b) For members of the retirement system as provided for in chapter
41.35 RCW of plan 3, investment shall be in the same portfolio as that
of the school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund
under RCW 41.50.075(4).
(c) For members of the retirement system as provided for in chapter
41.40 RCW of plan 3, investment shall be in the same portfolio as that
of the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund
under RCW 41.50.075(3).
(2) The state investment board shall declare monthly unit values
for the portfolios or funds, or portions thereof, utilized under
subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section. The declared values
shall be an approximation of portfolio or fund values, based on
internal procedures of the state investment board. Such declared unit
values and internal procedures shall be in the sole discretion of the
state investment board. The state investment board may delegate any of
the powers and duties under this subsection, including discretion,
pursuant to RCW 43.33A.030. Member accounts shall be credited by the
department with a rate of return based on changes to such unit values.
(3)(a) Members may elect to self-direct their investments as set
forth in RCW 41.34.130 and 43.33A.190.
(b) Members who elect to participate in the assured benefit program
may elect to self-direct only that portion of their investment that is
outside their assured benefit program subaccount.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.31A.020 and 2003 c 294 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On January 1, 2004, and on January 1st of even-numbered years
((thereafter)) through January 1, 2008, the member account of a person
meeting the requirements of this section shall be credited by the
extraordinary investment gain amount. After January 1, 2008, no
further amount under this section shall either accrue, be credited, or
be paid to member accounts.
(2) Through January 1, 2008, the following persons shall be
eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Any member of the teachers' retirement system plan 3, the
Washington school employees' retirement system plan 3, or the public
employees' retirement system plan 3 who earned service credit during
the twelve-month period from September 1st to August 31st immediately
preceding the distribution and had a balance of at least one thousand
dollars in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution; or
(b) Any person in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.875,
41.35.680, or 41.40.820; or
(c) Any person who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(((8)))
(10) and who:
(i) Completed ten service credit years; or
(ii) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
months after attaining age fifty-four; or
(d) Any teacher who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(((8)))
(10) and who has completed five service credit years by July 1, 1996,
under plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817; or
(e) Any classified employee who is a retiree pursuant to RCW
41.34.020(((8))) (10) and who has completed five service credit years
by September 1, 2000, and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW
41.35.510; or
(f) Any public employee who is a retiree pursuant to RCW
41.34.020(((8))) (10) and who has completed five service credit years
by March 1, 2002, and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.40.795; or
(g) Any person who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars
in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution and who:
(i) Completed ten service credit years; or
(ii) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service
months after attaining age fifty-four; or
(h) Any teacher who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars
in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution and who has completed five service credit
years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under
RCW 41.32.817; or
(i) Any classified employee who had a balance of at least one
thousand dollars in their member account on August 31st of the year
immediately preceding the distribution and who has completed five
service credit years by September 1, 2000, and who transferred to plan
3 under RCW 41.35.510; or
(j) Any public employee who had a balance of at least one thousand
dollars in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution and who has completed five service credit
years by March 1, 2002, and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW
41.40.795. After January 1, 2008, no member shall be eligible for the
benefit provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Through July 1, 2007, the extraordinary investment gain amount
shall be calculated as follows:
(a) One-half of the sum of the value of the net assets held in
trust for pension benefits in the teachers' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 fund, the Washington school employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 fund, and the public employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 fund at the close of the previous state fiscal
year not including the amount attributable to member accounts;
(b) Multiplied by the amount which the compound average of
investment returns on those assets over the previous four state fiscal
years exceeds ten percent;
(c) Multiplied by the proportion of:
(i) The sum of the service credit on August 31st of the previous
year of all persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1)
of this section; to
(ii) The sum of the service credit on August 31st of the previous
year of:
(A) All persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1)
of this section;
(B) Any person who earned service credit in the teachers'
retirement system plan 2, the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 2, or the public employees' retirement system plan 2 during
the twelve-month period from September 1st to August 31st immediately
preceding the distribution;
(C) Any person in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.765,
41.35.420, or 41.40.630; and
(D) Any person with five or more years of service in the teachers'
retirement system plan 2, the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 2, or the public employees' retirement system plan 2;
(d) Divided proportionally among persons eligible for the benefit
provided in subsection (1) of this section on the basis of their
service credit total on August 31st of the previous year. After July
1, 2007, no extraordinary gain shall be calculated.
(4) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to receive this distribution not granted prior to that time.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.34.110 and 1996 c 39 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member who separates from service and then reestablishes
membership may restore contributions to the member account.
(2) A member electing to participate in the assured benefit
program, who separates from service and then reestablishes membership,
may continue to be eligible for benefits under RCW 41.32.840(2),
41.35.620(2), or 41.40.790(2)(a)(i) by restoring all contributions and
earnings to the member account made after the election, plus interest
as determined by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 1" to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2009, the annual increase amount as defined in
RCW 41.32.010(46) shall be increased by an amount equal to $0.23 minus
the 2008 gain sharing increase amount under RCW 41.31.010 per month per
year of service. This adjustment shall not decrease the annual
increase amount, and is not to exceed $0.05 per month per year of
service.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.32.835 and 1995 c 239 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All teachers who first become employed by an employer in an
eligible position on or after ((July 1, 1996, shall be members of plan
3)) July 1, 2007, shall have a period of ninety days to make an
irrevocable choice to become a member of plan 2 or plan 3. At the end
of ninety days, if the member has not made a choice to become a member
of plan 2, he or she becomes a member of plan 3.
(2) For administrative efficiency, until a member elects to become
a member of plan 3, or becomes a member of plan 3 by default under
subsection (1) of this section, the member shall be reported to the
department in plan 2, with member and employer contributions. Upon
becoming a member of plan 3 by election or by default, all service
credit shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined benefit, and
all employee accumulated contributions shall be transferred to the
member's plan 3 defined contribution account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2008, and through September 30, 2008, plan 3
members who first became plan 3 members prior to July 1, 2007, may make
an irrevocable election, filed in writing with the department, to
participate in the assured benefit program prospective provisions under
RCW 41.32.840(2) and 41.34.040.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.32.840 and 1996 c 39 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member of the retirement system shall receive a retirement
allowance equal to one percent of such member's average final
compensation for each service credit year.
(2)(a) A member of the retirement system who elects to participate
in the assured benefit program shall receive an additional benefit
under one of (a)(i) through (iv) of this subsection. The member shall
select the form of their additional benefit from among these options at
retirement from service. However, a minimum of five years from the
date a member elects to participate in the assured benefit program must
elapse before the member can begin drawing a prospective assured
benefit under (a)(ii) through (iv) of this subsection.
(i) The member may elect to terminate the assured benefit
subaccount and have the funds in the subaccount, including any
investment earnings, returned to the member's defined contribution
account;
(ii) The member, at time of retirement from service, may elect to
receive at normal retirement age, an assured benefit of one percent of
the member's average final compensation for each year of service credit
during participation in the assured benefit program, with
postretirement cost-of-living adjustments calculated as under RCW
41.32.845;
(iii) The member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has
completed at least ten years of service, at time of retirement from
service, may elect to receive an assured benefit of one percent of the
member's average final compensation for each year of service credit
during participation in the assured benefit program, with
postretirement cost-of-living adjustments calculated under RCW
41.32.845, and adjusted for early retirement under RCW 41.32.875(2); or
(iv) The member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has
completed at least thirty years of service, at time of retirement from
service, may elect to receive an assured benefit of one percent of the
member's average final compensation for each year of service credit
during participation in the assured benefit program, with
postretirement cost-of-living adjustments calculated under RCW
41.32.845, and adjusted for alternate early retirement under RCW
41.32.875(3).
If the member chooses to receive the assured benefit, the assured
benefit subaccount balance will be reduced by an amount that is
actuarially equivalent to the value of the assured benefit and that
amount will be transferred to the pension reserve as defined in RCW
41.32.010(18). If funds in the subaccount exceed that amount, the
excess shall be returned to the member's defined contribution account.
If the funds in the subaccount are less than that amount, the entire
subaccount balance will be transferred.
The assured benefit is subject to the same conditions as the
retirement allowance in subsection (1) of this section, including but
not limited to provisions for retirement and return to work, early
retirement, death, and disability, and is subject to adjustments under
this chapter.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "actuarially equivalent"
means of equal value when computed on the basis of mortality tables and
rules adopted by the director.
(3) The retirement allowance payable under RCW 41.32.875 to a
member who separates after having completed at least twenty service
credit years shall be increased by twenty-five one-hundredths of one
percent, compounded for each month from the date of separation to the
date that the retirement allowance commences.

Sec. 10 RCW 41.35.610 and 1998 c 341 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All classified employees who first become employed by an
employer in an eligible position on or after ((September 1, 2000, shall
be members of plan 3)) July 1, 2007, shall have a period of ninety days
to make an irrevocable choice to become a member of plan 2 or plan 3.
At the end of ninety days, if the member has not made a choice to
become a member of plan 2, he or she becomes a member of plan 3.
(2) For administrative efficiency, until a member elects to become
a member of plan 3, or becomes a member of plan 3 by default under
subsection (1) of this section, the member shall be reported to the
department in plan 2, with member and employer contributions. Upon
becoming a member of plan 3 by election or by default, all service
credit shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined benefit, and
all employee accumulated contributions shall be transferred to the
member's plan 3 defined contribution account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2008, and through September 30, 2008, plan 3
members who first became members of plan 3 prior to July 1, 2007, may
make an irrevocable election, filed in writing with the department, to
participate in the assured benefit program prospective provisions under
RCW 41.34.040 and 41.35.620(2).

Sec. 12 RCW 41.35.620 and 1998 c 341 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A member of the retirement system shall receive a retirement
allowance equal to one percent of such member's average final
compensation for each service credit year.
(2)(a) A member of the retirement system who elects to participate
in the assured benefit program shall receive an additional benefit
under one of (a)(i) through (iv) of this subsection. The member shall
select the form of their additional benefit from among these options at
retirement from service. However, a minimum of five years from the
date a member elects to participate in the assured benefit program must
elapse before the member can begin drawing a prospective assured
benefit under (a)(ii) through (iv) of this subsection.
(i) The member may elect to terminate the assured benefit
subaccount and have the funds in the subaccount, including any
investment earnings, returned to the member's defined contribution
account;
(ii) The member, at time of retirement from service, may elect to
receive at normal retirement age an assured benefit of one percent of
the member's average final compensation for each year of service credit
during participation in the assured benefit program, with
postretirement cost-of-living adjustments calculated as under RCW
41.35.210;
(iii) The member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has
completed at least ten years of service, at time of retirement from
service, may elect to receive an assured benefit of one percent of the
member's average final compensation for each year of service credit
during participation in the assured benefit program, with
postretirement cost-of-living adjustments calculated under RCW
41.35.210, and adjusted for early retirement under RCW 41.35.680(2); or
(iv) The member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has
completed at least thirty years of service, at time of retirement from
service, may elect to receive an assured benefit of one percent of the
member's average final compensation for each year of service credit
during participation in the assured benefit program, with
postretirement cost-of-living adjustments calculated under RCW
41.35.210, and adjusted for alternate early retirement under RCW
41.35.680(3).
If the member chooses to receive the assured benefit, the assured
benefit subaccount balance will be reduced by an amount that is
actuarially equivalent to the value of the assured benefit and that
amount will be transferred to the school employees' retirement system.
If funds in the subaccount exceed that amount, the excess shall be
returned to the member's defined contribution account. If the funds in
the subaccount are less than that amount, the entire subaccount balance
will be transferred.
The assured benefit is subject to the same conditions as the
retirement allowance in subsection (1) of this section, including but
not limited to provisions for retirement and return to work, early
retirement, death, and disability, and is subject to adjustment under
this chapter.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "actuarially equivalent"
means of equal value when computed on the basis of mortality tables and
rules adopted by the director.
(3) The retirement allowance payable under RCW 41.35.680 to a
member who separates after having completed at least twenty service
credit years shall be increased by twenty-five one-hundredths of one
percent, compounded for each month from the date of separation to the
date that the retirement allowance commences.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 1" to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2009, the annual increase amount as defined in
RCW 41.40.010(41) shall be increased by an amount equal to $0.23 minus
the 2008 gain-sharing increase amount under RCW 41.31.010 per month per
year of service. This adjustment shall not decrease the annual
increase amount, and is not to exceed $0.05 per month per year of
service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2008, and through September 30, 2008, plan 3
members who first became members of plan 3 prior to July 1, 2007, may
make an irrevocable election, filed in writing with the department, to
participate in the assured benefit program prospective provisions under
RCW 41.34.040 and 41.40.790(2).

Sec. 15 RCW 41.40.790 and 2000 c 247 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A member of the retirement system shall receive a retirement
allowance equal to one percent of such member's average final
compensation for each service credit year.
(2)(a) A member of the retirement system who elects to participate
in the assured benefit program shall receive an additional benefit
under one of (a)(i) through (iv) of this subsection. The member shall
select the form of their additional benefit from among these options at
retirement from service. However, a minimum of five years from the
date a member elects to participate in the assured benefit program must
elapse before the member can begin drawing a prospective assured
benefit under (a)(ii) through (iv) of this subsection.
(i) The member may elect to terminate the assured benefit
subaccount and have the funds in the subaccount, including any
investment earnings, returned to the member's defined contribution
account; or
(ii) The member, at time of retirement from service, may elect to
receive at normal retirement age an assured benefit of one percent of
the member's average final compensation for each year of service credit
year during participation in the assured benefit program, with
postretirement cost-of-living adjustments calculated as under RCW
41.40.840;
(iii) The member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has
completed at least ten years of service, at time of retirement from
service, may elect to receive an assured benefit of one percent of the
member's average final compensation for each year of service credit
during participation in the assured benefit program, with
postretirement cost-of-living adjustments calculated under RCW
41.40.840, and adjusted for early retirement under RCW 41.40.815(2); or
(iv) The member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has
completed at least thirty years of service, at time of retirement from
service, may elect to receive an assured benefit of one percent of the
member's average final compensation for each year of service credit
during participation in the assured benefit program, with
postretirement cost-of-living adjustments calculated under RCW
41.40.840, and adjusted for alternate early retirement under RCW
41.40.815(3).
If the member chooses to receive the assured benefit, the assured
benefit subaccount balance will be reduced by an amount that is
actuarially equivalent to the value of the assured benefit and that
amount will be transferred to the public employees' retirement system.
If funds in the subaccount exceed that amount, the excess shall be
returned to the member's defined contribution account. If the funds in
the subaccount are less than that amount, the entire subaccount balance
will be transferred.
(b) For the purposes of this section, "actuarially equivalent"
means of equal value when computed on the basis of mortality tables and
rules adopted by the director.
The assured benefit is subject to the same conditions as the
retirement allowance in subsection (1) of this section, including but
not limited to provisions for retirement and return to work, early
retirement, death, and disability, and is subject to adjustment under
this chapter.
(3) The retirement allowance payable under RCW 41.40.820 to a
member who separates after having completed at least twenty service
credit years shall be increased by twenty-five one-hundredths of one
percent, compounded for each month from the date of separation to the
date that the retirement allowance commences.

Sec. 16 RCW 41.31.010 and 1998 c 340 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning July 1, 1998, and on January 1st of even-numbered years
thereafter, through 2008, the annual increase amount as defined in RCW
41.32.010 and 41.40.010 shall be increased by the gain-sharing increase
amount, if any. No further amount shall either accrue, be credited, or
be paid to member accounts after January 1, 2008. The monthly
retirement allowance of a person in receipt of the benefit provided in
RCW 41.32.489 or 41.40.197 shall immediately be adjusted to reflect any
increase.

Sec. 17 RCW 41.31.020 and 1998 c 340 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Through January 1, 2008, the gain-sharing increase amount shall
be the amount of increase, rounded to the nearest cent, that can be
fully funded in actuarial present value by the amount of extraordinary
investment gains, if any. Through January 1, 2008, the amount of
extraordinary investment gains shall be calculated as follows:
(a) One-half of the sum of the value of the net assets held in
trust for pension benefits in the teachers' retirement system plan 1
fund and the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund at the
close of the previous state fiscal year;
(b) Multiplied by the amount which the compound average of
investment returns on those assets over the previous four state fiscal
years exceeds ten percent. After July 1, 2007, no extraordinary gain
shall be calculated.
(2) The gain-sharing increase amount for July 1998, as provided for
in RCW 41.31.010, is ten cents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 41.34 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of retirement systems is authorized to adopt rules
to ensure that assured benefits under RCW 41.32.840(2)(a)(ii) through
(iv), 41.35.620(2)(a)(ii) through (iv), and 41.40.790 (2)(a)(ii)
through (iv) are treated equivalently to defined benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 41.34 RCW
to read as follows:
The benefits provided pursuant to this act are not provided to
employees as a matter of contractual right prior to July 1, 2008. The
legislature retains the right to alter or abolish these benefits at any
time prior to July 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 RCW 41.31A.020, 41.31.010, and 41.31.020
are decodified, effective January 2, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with a final determination by the federal internal revenue
service that is a prescribed condition to favorable tax treatment of
one or more of the retirement plans, the conflicting part of this act
is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to
the individual members directly affected. This finding does not affect
the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the
members concerned. The legislature reserves the right to amend or
repeal this act in the future as may be required to comply with a final
federal determination that amendment or repeal is necessary to maintain
the favorable tax treatment of a plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---