BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Manufactured/mobile home communities provide a significant
source of homeownership opportunities for Washington residents.
However, the increasing closure and conversion of manufactured/mobile
home communities to other uses, combined with increasing
manufactured/mobile home lot rents, low vacancy rates in existing
manufactured/mobile home communities, and the extremely high cost of
moving homes when manufactured/mobile home communities close,
increasingly make manufactured/mobile home community living insecure
for manufactured/mobile home tenants.
(b) The preservation of manufactured/mobile home communities is a
more economical alternative than providing new replacement housing
units for tenants who are displaced from closing manufactured/mobile
home communities.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to encourage and facilitate
the preservation of existing manufactured/mobile home communities in
the event of voluntary sales of manufactured/mobile home communities
and, to the extent necessary and possible, to involve
manufactured/mobile home community tenants or an eligible organization
representing tenants in the preservation of manufactured/mobile home
communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Eligible organization" includes local governments, local
housing authorities, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based
organizations, federally recognized Indian tribes in the state of
Washington, and regional or statewide nonprofit housing assistance
organizations.
(2) "Housing authority" or "authority" means any of the public body
corporate and politic created in RCW 35.82.030.
(3) "Local government" means a town government, city government,
code city government, or county government in the state of Washington.
(4) "Manufactured home" means a single-family dwelling built
according to the United States department of housing and urban
development manufactured home construction and safety standards act,
which is a national preemptive building code. A manufactured home
also: (a) Includes plumbing, heating, air conditioning, and electrical
systems; (b) is built on a permanent chassis; and (c) can be
transported in one or more sections with each section at least eight
feet wide and forty feet long when transported, or when installed on
the site is three hundred twenty square feet or greater.
(5) "Mobile home" means a factory-built dwelling built before June
15, 1976, to standards other than the United States department of
housing and urban development code, and acceptable under applicable
state codes in effect at the time of construction or introduction of
the home into the state. Mobile homes have not been built since the
introduction of the United States department of housing and urban
development manufactured home construction and safety act.
(6) "Manufactured/mobile home" means either a manufactured home or
a mobile home.
(7) "Manufactured/mobile home community" means any real property
that is rented or held out for rent to others for the placement of two
or more manufactured/mobile homes or park models for the primary
purpose of production of income, except where the real property is
rented or held out for rent for seasonal recreational purpose only and
is not intended for year-round occupancy.
(8) "Qualified tenant organization" means a formal organization of
tenants within a manufactured/mobile home community, with the only
requirement for membership consisting of being a tenant.
(9) "Qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community" means
the sale of land and improvements comprising a manufactured/mobile home
community that is transferred in a single purchase to a qualified
tenant organization or to an eligible organization representing the
tenants.
(10) "Sale" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.45.010.
(11) "Tenant" means a person who rents a manufactured/mobile home
lot for a term of one month or longer and owns the manufactured/mobile
home on the lot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile
home community is exempt from the excise tax imposed under chapter
82.45 RCW, as provided for in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community as
described in section 3 of this act is exempt from tax under this
chapter.
(2) The department shall establish by rule a process to determine
whether such a sale is exempt from tax under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 59.23.005 (Findings -- Intent) and 1993 c 66 s 1;
(2) RCW 59.23.010 (Obligation of good faith) and 1993 c 66 s 2;
(3) RCW 59.23.015 (Application of chapter -- Definition of "notice")
and 1993 c 66 s 3;
(4) RCW 59.23.020 (Definitions) and 1993 c 66 s 4;
(5) RCW 59.23.025 (Notice to qualified tenant organization of sale
of mobile home park -- Time frame for negotiations -- Terms -- Transfer or
sale to relatives) and 1993 c 66 s 5;
(6) RCW 59.23.030 (Improper notice by mobile home park owner -- Sale
may be set aside -- Attorneys' fees) and 1993 c 66 s 6;
(7) RCW 59.23.035 (Notice to mobile home park owner of sale of
tenant's mobile home -- Time frame for negotiations -- Terms -- Transfer or
sale to relatives) and 1993 c 66 s 7; and
(8) RCW 59.23.040 (Improper notice by mobile home owner -- Sale may
be set aside -- Attorneys' fees) and 1993 c 66 s 8.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 59 RCW.

--- END ---