BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
performing a vegetative management service through the use of goats or
sheep, as to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such
business must be equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
For the purposes of this section, "vegetative management service"
means when an owner of goats or sheep provides these animals for
compensation for the purpose of clearing or controlling the vegetation
on another person's land.

--- END ---