BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.56.028 and 2006 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this
chapter applies to the governor with respect to family child care
providers. Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the public employer of family child care providers who,
solely for the purposes of collective bargaining, are public employees.
The public employer shall be represented for bargaining purposes by the
governor or the governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW.
(2) This chapter governs the collective bargaining relationship
between the governor and family child care providers, except as
follows:
(a) A statewide unit of all family child care providers is the only
unit appropriate for purposes of collective bargaining under RCW
41.56.060.
(b) The exclusive bargaining representative of family child care
providers in the unit specified in (a) of this subsection shall be the
representative chosen in an election conducted pursuant to RCW
41.56.070, except that in the initial election conducted under chapter
54, Laws of 2006, if more than one labor organization is on the ballot
and none of the choices receives a majority of the votes cast, a
run-off election shall be held.
(c) Notwithstanding the definition of "collective bargaining" in
RCW 41.56.030(4), the scope of collective bargaining for child care
providers under this section shall be limited solely to: (i) Economic
compensation, such as manner and rate of subsidy and reimbursement,
including tiered reimbursements; (ii) health and welfare benefits;
(iii) professional development and training; (iv) labor-management
committees; (v) grievance procedures; and (vi) other economic matters.
Retirement benefits shall not be subject to collective bargaining. By
such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal
or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(d) The mediation and interest arbitration provisions of RCW
41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and 41.56.480 apply, except that:
(i) With respect to commencement of negotiations between the
governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of family child
care providers, negotiations shall be commenced initially upon
certification of an exclusive bargaining representative under (a) of
this subsection and, thereafter, by February 1st of any even-numbered
year;
(ii) In addition to the factors to be taken into consideration by
an interest arbitration panel under RCW 41.56.465, the panel shall
consider:
(A) A comparison of child care provider subsidy rates and
reimbursement programs by public entities, including counties and
municipalities, along the west coast of the United States; and
(B) The financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement; ((and))
(iii) In addition to the factors to be taken into consideration by
an interest arbitration panel under RCW 41.56.465, the panel may
consider:
(A) The public's interest in reducing turnover and increasing
retention of child care providers;
(B) The state's interest in promoting a stable child care workforce
to provide quality and reliable care throughout the state; and
(C) For employees exempt from licensing under chapter 74.15 RCW,
the state's fiscal interest in reducing reliance upon public benefit
programs including but not limited to medical coupons, food stamps,
subsidized housing, and emergency medical services; and
(iv) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and benefit provisions of
the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, is not binding on the
state.
(e) Family child care providers do not have the right to strike.
(3) Family child care providers who are public employees solely for
the purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this
section are not, for that reason, employees of the state for any
purpose. This section applies only to the governance of the collective
bargaining relationship between the employer and family child care
providers as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) This section does not create or modify:
(a) The parents' or legal guardians' right to choose and terminate
the services of any family child care provider that provides care for
their child or children;
(b) The secretary of the department of social and health services'
right to adopt requirements under RCW 74.15.030, except for
requirements related to grievance procedures and collective
negotiations on personnel matters as specified in subsection (2)(c) of
this section;
(c) Chapter 26.44 RCW, RCW 43.43.832, 43.20A.205, and 74.15.130;
and
(d) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to
the delivery of state services through child care subsidy programs,
including standards of eligibility of parents, legal guardians, and
family child care providers participating in child care subsidy
programs, and the nature of services provided. The governor shall not
enter into, extend, or renew any agreement under this section that does
not expressly reserve the legislative rights described in this
subsection (4)(d).
(5) Upon meeting the requirements of subsection (6) of this
section, the governor must submit, as a part of the proposed biennial
or supplemental operating budget submitted to the legislature under RCW
43.88.030, a request for funds necessary to implement the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered
into under this section or for legislation necessary to implement such
agreement.
(6) A request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and
benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into
under this section shall not be submitted by the governor to the
legislature unless such request has been:
(a) Submitted to the director of financial management by October
1st before the legislative session at which the request is to be
considered, except that, for initial negotiations under this section,
the request must be submitted by November 15, 2006; and
(b) Certified by the director of financial management as being
feasible financially for the state or reflects the binding decision of
an arbitration panel reached under this section.
(7) The legislature must approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds as a whole. If the legislature rejects or fails to
act on the submission, any such agreement will be reopened solely for
the purpose of renegotiating the funds necessary to implement the
agreement.
(8) The governor shall periodically consult with the joint
committee on employment relations established by RCW 41.80.010
regarding appropriations necessary to implement the compensation and
benefit provisions of any collective bargaining agreement and, upon
completion of negotiations, advise the committee on the elements of the
agreement and on any legislation necessary to implement such agreement.
(9) After the expiration date of any collective bargaining
agreement entered into under this section, all of the terms and
conditions specified in any such agreement remain in effect until the
effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from
the expiration date stated in the agreement, except as provided in
subsection (4)(d) of this section.
(10) If, after the compensation and benefit provisions of an
agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue
shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by
proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both
parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a
mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.
(11) In enacting this section, the legislature intends to provide
state action immunity under federal and state antitrust laws for the
joint activities of family child care providers and their exclusive
bargaining representative to the extent such activities are authorized
by this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.39A.270 and 2006 c 106 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the public employer, as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW, of
individual providers, who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, are public employees as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW. To
accommodate the role of the state as payor for the community-based
services provided under this chapter and to ensure coordination with
state employee collective bargaining under chapter 41.80 RCW and the
coordination necessary to implement RCW 74.39A.300, the public employer
shall be represented for bargaining purposes by the governor or the
governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW. The governor or
governor's designee shall periodically consult with the authority
during the collective bargaining process to allow the authority to
communicate issues relating to the long-term in-home care services
received by consumers. The governor or the governor's designee shall
consult the authority on all issues for which the exclusive bargaining
representative requests to engage in collective bargaining under
subsection (6) of this section. The authority shall work with the
developmental disabilities council, the governor's committee on
disability issues and employment, the state council on aging, and other
consumer advocacy organizations to obtain informed input from consumers
on their interests, including impacts on consumer choice, for all
issues proposed for collective bargaining under subsection (6) of this
section.
(2) Chapter 41.56 RCW governs the collective bargaining
relationship between the governor and individual providers, except as
otherwise expressly provided in this chapter and except as follows:
(a) The only unit appropriate for the purpose of collective
bargaining under RCW 41.56.060 is a statewide unit of all individual
providers;
(b) The showing of interest required to request an election under
RCW 41.56.060 is ten percent of the unit, and any intervener seeking to
appear on the ballot must make the same showing of interest;
(c) The mediation and interest arbitration provisions of RCW
41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and 41.56.480 apply, except that:
(i) With respect to commencement of negotiations between the
governor and the bargaining representative of individual providers,
negotiations shall be commenced by May 1st of any year prior to the
year in which an existing collective bargaining agreement expires;
(ii) With respect to factors to be taken into consideration by an
interest arbitration panel, the panel shall consider:
(A) A comparison of wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
publicly reimbursed and employed personnel providing similar services
to similar clients, including clients who are elderly, frail, or have
developmental disabilities, both in the state and across the United
States; and
(B) The financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and fringe benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement;
((and))
(iii) With respect to factors to be taken into consideration by an
interest arbitration panel, the panel may consider:
(A) The state's interest in promoting a stable long-term care
workforce to provide quality and reliable care to vulnerable elderly
and disabled recipients;
(B) The state's interest in ensuring access to affordable, quality
health care for all state citizens; and
(C) The state's fiscal interest in reducing reliance upon public
benefit programs including but not limited to medical coupons, food
stamps, subsidized housing, and emergency medical services; and
(iv) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit
provisions of the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, is not
binding on the authority or the state;
(d) Individual providers do not have the right to strike; and
(e) Individual providers who are related to, or family members of,
consumers or prospective consumers are not, for that reason, exempt
from this chapter or chapter 41.56 RCW.
(3) Individual providers who are public employees solely for the
purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this section
are not, for that reason, employees of the state, its political
subdivisions, or an area agency on aging for any purpose. Chapter
41.56 RCW applies only to the governance of the collective bargaining
relationship between the employer and individual providers as provided
in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) Consumers and prospective consumers retain the right to select,
hire, supervise the work of, and terminate any individual provider
providing services to them. Consumers may elect to receive long-term
in-home care services from individual providers who are not referred to
them by the authority.
(5) In implementing and administering this chapter, neither the
authority nor any of its contractors may reduce or increase the hours
of service for any consumer below or above the amount determined to be
necessary under any assessment prepared by the department or an area
agency on aging.
(6) Except as expressly limited in this section and RCW 74.39A.300,
the wages, hours, and working conditions of individual providers are
determined solely through collective bargaining as provided in this
chapter. No agency or department of the state may establish policies
or rules governing the wages or hours of individual providers.
However, this subsection does not modify:
(a) The department's authority to establish a plan of care for each
consumer or its core responsibility to manage long-term in-home care
services under this chapter, including determination of the level of
care that each consumer is eligible to receive. However, at the
request of the exclusive bargaining representative, the governor or the
governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW shall engage in
collective bargaining, as defined in RCW 41.56.030(4), with the
exclusive bargaining representative over how the department's core
responsibility affects hours of work for individual providers. This
subsection shall not be interpreted to require collective bargaining
over an individual consumer's plan of care;
(b) The department's authority to terminate its contracts with
individual providers who are not adequately meeting the needs of a
particular consumer, or to deny a contract under RCW 74.39A.095(8);
(c) The consumer's right to assign hours to one or more individual
providers selected by the consumer within the maximum hours determined
by his or her plan of care;
(d) The consumer's right to select, hire, terminate, supervise the
work of, and determine the conditions of employment for each individual
provider providing services to the consumer under this chapter;
(e) The department's obligation to comply with the federal medicaid
statute and regulations and the terms of any community-based waiver
granted by the federal department of health and human services and to
ensure federal financial participation in the provision of the
services; and
(f) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to
the delivery of state services under this title, including standards of
eligibility of consumers and individual providers participating in the
programs under this title, and the nature of services provided. The
governor shall not enter into, extend, or renew any agreement under
this chapter that does not expressly reserve the legislative rights
described in this subsection (6)(f).
(7)(a) The state, the department, the authority, the area agencies
on aging, or their contractors under this chapter may not be held
vicariously or jointly liable for the action or inaction of any
individual provider or prospective individual provider, whether or not
that individual provider or prospective individual provider was
included on the authority's referral registry or referred to a consumer
or prospective consumer. The existence of a collective bargaining
agreement, the placement of an individual provider on the referral
registry, or the development or approval of a plan of care for a
consumer who chooses to use the services of an individual provider and
the provision of case management services to that consumer, by the
department or an area agency on aging, does not constitute a special
relationship with the consumer.
(b) The members of the board are immune from any liability
resulting from implementation of this chapter.
(8) Nothing in this section affects the state's responsibility with
respect to unemployment insurance for individual providers. However,
individual providers are not to be considered, as a result of the state
assuming this responsibility, employees of the state.

--- END ---