BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to required
college instructional materials sold by bookstores affiliated with any
institution of higher education in Washington state to students
enrolled in the same institution.
(2) The seller shall obtain documentation, from the institution of
higher education, showing which college instructional materials are
required for specific courses. The governing body of each institution,
in collaboration with its affiliated bookstores and student and faculty
representatives, shall determine the institution's process and
requirements for providing documentation. The seller shall maintain
this documentation as part of the records required under RCW 82.32.070.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "College instructional materials" means textbooks, workbooks,
standardized data, or prewritten computer software, delivered through
any tangible storage medium or through electronic download.
(b) "Institution of higher education" means a college or university
which is accredited by an accrediting association recognized as such by
rule of the higher education coordinating board.
(c) "Required" means required by the instructor of a course.
(d) "Prewritten computer software" is defined as provided in RCW
82.04.215.
(e) "Affiliated" means run by or in a contractual relationship with
an institution of higher education in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of required college instructional materials acquired from bookstores
affiliated with any institution of higher education in Washington state
by students enrolled in the same institution. The definitions in
section 1 of this act apply to this section.

--- END ---