BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.12.190 and 1982 c 123 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The management and control of a library shall be vested in a
board of either five or seven trustees as hereinafter in this section
provided. In cities and towns five trustees shall be appointed by the
mayor with the consent of the legislative body. In counties, rural
county library districts, and island library districts, five trustees
shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners. In a regional
library district a board of either five or seven trustees shall be
appointed by the joint action of the legislative bodies concerned. In
intercounty rural library districts a board of either five or seven
trustees shall be appointed by the joint action of the boards of county
commissioners of each of the counties included in a district.
(2) The first appointments for boards comprised of but five
trustees shall be for terms of one, two, three, four, and five years
respectively, and thereafter a trustee shall be appointed annually to
serve for five years. The first appointments for boards comprised of
seven trustees shall be for terms of one, two, three, four, five, six,
and seven years respectively, and thereafter a trustee shall be
appointed annually to serve for seven years. No person shall be
appointed to any board of trustees for more than two consecutive terms.
Vacancies shall be filled for unexpired terms as soon as possible in
the manner in which members of the board are regularly chosen.
(3) A library trustee shall not receive a salary or other
compensation for services as trustee, but necessary expenses actually
incurred shall be paid from the library funds.
(4) A library trustee in the case of a city or town may be removed
only by vote of the legislative body. A trustee of a county library,
a rural county library district library, or an island library district
library may be removed for just cause by the county commissioners after
a public hearing upon a written complaint stating the ground for
removal, which complaint, with a notice of the time and place of
hearing, shall have been served upon the trustee at least fifteen days
before the hearing. A trustee of an intercounty rural library district
may be removed by the joint action of the board of county commissioners
of the counties involved in the same manner as provided herein for the
removal of a trustee of a county library.
(5)(a) If a county comprising part of an intercounty rural library
district has a population exceeding fifty percent of the total district
population, and if fewer than fifty percent of the trustees of that
intercounty rural library district are residents of that county, the
following applies:
(i) The votes of the trustees for the district, which shall be
equal in number to the number of trustees, shall be allocated to the
nearest one-tenth of one percent among the trustees of the counties
comprising the district in direct proportion to the population of each
county, excluding incorporated areas that are not part of the district,
as it relates to the population of the district; and
(ii) A board subject to this subsection (5) shall adopt procedures
for the proportional distribution of trustee votes, including
procedures ensuring that voting rights of trustees from the same county
are shared equally.
(b) Population determinations made in accordance with this
subsection (5) shall be determined by the most recent federal decennial
census.
(c) The office of the secretary of state is responsible for
enforcing this subsection (5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---