BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.95.030 and 1993 c 479 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any
person convicted of the crime of aggravated first degree murder shall
be sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility of release or
parole. A person sentenced to life imprisonment under this section
shall not have that sentence suspended, deferred, or commuted by any
judicial officer and the indeterminate sentence review board or its
successor may not parole such prisoner nor reduce the period of
confinement in any manner whatsoever including but not limited to any
sort of good-time calculation. The department of social and health
services or its successor or any executive official may not permit such
prisoner to participate in any sort of release or furlough program.
(2) If, pursuant to a special sentencing proceeding held under RCW
10.95.050, the trier of fact finds that there are not sufficient
mitigating circumstances to merit leniency, the sentence shall be
death, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) In no case((, however,)) shall a person be sentenced to death
if, at the time the crime was committed, the person was mentally
retarded ((at the time the crime was committed, under the definition of
mental retardation set forth)) as defined in (a) of this subsection, or
had a severe mental disorder as defined in (f) of this subsection. A
diagnosis of mental retardation or severe mental disorder shall be
documented by a licensed ((psychiatrist or licensed psychologist))
mental health professional designated by the court, who is an expert in
the diagnosis and evaluation of mental retardation or severe mental
disorders. A defendant may bring a pretrial motion for
disqualification from death penalty eligibility as a result of mental
retardation or severe mental disorder. The defense must establish
mental retardation or severe mental disorder by a preponderance of the
evidence and the court must make a finding as to the existence of
mental retardation or severe mental disorder. If the court denies the
motion, the question of whether the defendant was mentally retarded or
had a severe mental disorder at the time the crime was committed may be
presented to the jury during the special sentencing proceeding. A jury
verdict that either factor has been proved will result in disqualifying
the defendant from the death penalty.
(a) "Mentally retarded" means the individual has: (i)
Significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning; (ii)
existing concurrently with deficits in adaptive behavior; and (iii)
both significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning and
deficits in adaptive behavior were manifested during the developmental
period.
(b) "General intellectual functioning" means the results obtained
by assessment with one or more of the individually administered general
intelligence tests developed for the purpose of assessing intellectual
functioning.
(c) "Significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning"
means intelligence quotient seventy or below.
(d) "Adaptive behavior" means the effectiveness or degree with
which individuals meet the standards of personal independence and
social responsibility expected for his or her age.
(e) "Developmental period" means the period of time between
conception and the eighteenth birthday.
(f) "Severe mental disorder" means a severe mental illness or
defect that significantly impairs a person's capacity to appreciate the
wrongfulness of his or her conduct or to conform his or her conduct to
the requirements of law. A mental illness or defect manifested
primarily by repeated criminal conduct or attributable solely to the
effects of voluntary use of alcohol or other drugs does not, standing
alone, constitute a severe mental disorder for purposes of this
section.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.95.060 and 1981 c 138 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the commencement of the special sentencing proceeding, the
trial court shall instruct the jury as to the nature and purpose of the
proceeding and as to the consequences of its decision, as provided in
RCW 10.95.030.
(2) At the special sentencing proceeding both the prosecution and
defense shall be allowed to make an opening statement. The prosecution
shall first present evidence and then the defense may present evidence.
Rebuttal evidence may be presented by each side. Upon conclusion of
the evidence, the court shall instruct the jury and then the
prosecution and defense shall be permitted to present argument. The
prosecution shall open and conclude the argument.
(3) The court shall admit any relevant evidence which it deems to
have probative value regardless of its admissibility under the rules of
evidence, including hearsay evidence and evidence of the defendant's
previous criminal activity regardless of whether the defendant has been
charged or convicted as a result of such activity. The defendant shall
be accorded a fair opportunity to rebut or offer any hearsay evidence.
In addition to evidence of whether or not there are sufficient
mitigating circumstances to merit leniency, and evidence relating to
whether the defendant was mentally retarded or had a severe mental
disorder, if the jury sitting in the special sentencing proceeding has
not heard evidence of the aggravated first degree murder of which the
defendant stands convicted, both the defense and prosecution may
introduce evidence concerning the facts and circumstances of the
murder.
(4)(a) Upon conclusion of the evidence and argument at the special
sentencing proceeding, the jury shall retire to deliberate upon the
following question: "Having in mind the crime of which the defendant
has been found guilty, are you convinced beyond a reasonable doubt that
there are not sufficient mitigating circumstances to merit leniency?"
(b) If the defendant has filed a motion seeking disqualification
from death penalty eligibility based on either mental retardation,
severe mental disorder, or both, the jury will also deliberate on the
following question: "Has the defendant proved by a preponderance of
the evidence that, at the time of the crime, the defendant was mentally
retarded or suffered from a severe mental disorder?"
(c) In order to return an affirmative answer to the questions posed
by this subsection, the jury must so find unanimously.

Sec. 3 RCW 10.95.070 and 1993 c 479 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In deciding the question posed by RCW 10.95.060(4)(a), the jury, or
the court if a jury is waived, may consider any relevant factors,
including but not limited to the following:
(1) Whether the defendant has or does not have a significant
history, either as a juvenile or an adult, of prior criminal activity;
(2) Whether the murder was committed while the defendant was under
the influence of extreme mental disturbance;
(3) Whether the victim consented to the act of murder;
(4) Whether the defendant was an accomplice to a murder committed
by another person where the defendant's participation in the murder was
relatively minor;
(5) Whether the defendant acted under duress or domination of
another person;
(6) Whether, at the time of the murder, the capacity of the
defendant to appreciate the wrongfulness of his or her conduct or to
conform his or her conduct to the requirements of law was
((substantially)) impaired as a result of mental disease or defect((.
However, a person found to be mentally retarded under RCW 10.95.030(2)
may in no case be sentenced to death));
(7) Whether, at the time of the murder, the defendant had
significant intellectual impairments, but which do not constitute
mental retardation;
(8) Whether the age of the defendant at the time of the crime calls
for leniency; and
(((8))) (9) Whether there is a likelihood that the defendant will
pose a danger to others in the future.

Sec. 4 RCW 10.95.080 and 1981 c 138 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a jury answers affirmatively the question posed by RCW
10.95.060(4)(a) and negatively the question posed by RCW
10.95.060(4)(b), or when a jury is waived as allowed by RCW
10.95.050(2) and the trial court answers affirmatively the question
posed by RCW 10.95.060(4)(a) and negatively the question posed by RCW
10.95.060(4)(b), the defendant shall be sentenced to death. The trial
court may not suspend or defer the execution or imposition of the
sentence.
(2) If the jury does not return an affirmative answer to the
question posed in RCW 10.95.060(4)(a), or if the jury does return an
affirmative answer to the question posed in RCW 10.95.060(4)(b), the
defendant shall be sentenced to life imprisonment as provided in RCW
10.95.030(1).

--- END ---