BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the home inspector licensing board.
(2) "Classroom education" means training in observing and
identifying defects in structural components, foundations, roof
coverings, insulation and ventilation, exterior and interior
components; wood destroying organism inspections; and plumbing,
heating, cooling, and electrical systems. It does not include online
or video training.
(3) "Component" means a readily accessible and observable aspect of
a system, such as a floor or wall, but not individual pieces such as
boards or nails where many pieces make up a system.
(4) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.
(6) "Home inspection" means a visual analysis for the purposes of
providing a professional opinion of the condition of a building and its
attached carports and attached garages, any reasonably accessible
installed components and the operation of the building systems,
including the controls normally operated by the owner, for the
following components of a residential building of four units or less:
Heating system, electrical system, cooling system, plumbing system,
structural components, foundation, roof covering, exterior and interior
components, and site aspects as they affect the building. "Home
inspection" also means an inspection for wood destroying organisms.
(7) "Home inspection report" or "inspection report" means a written
report prepared and issued after a home inspection. The inspector
shall include the following in the report:
(a) On those systems and components inspected which, in the
professional opinion of the inspector, are significantly deficient or
near the end of its service life;
(b) A reason why, if not self-evident, the system or component is
significantly deficient or near the end of its service life;
(c) The home inspector's recommendations to correct or monitor the
reported deficiency;
(d) Whether or not there is damage from wood destroying organisms;
and
(e) Any systems and components designated for inspection in the
standards developed by the board under section 5 of this act.
(8) "Home inspector" means any person licensed under this chapter
as a home inspector and who engages in the business of performing home
inspections and writing home inspection reports.
(9) "Readily accessible" means areas typically and routinely
visible by normal access.
(10) "Wood destroying organism" means insects or fungi that
consume, excavate, develop in, or otherwise modify the integrity of
wood or wood products. "Wood destroying organism" includes but is not
limited to carpenter ants, moisture ants, subterranean termites,
dampwood termites, beetles in the family Anobiidae, and wood decay
fungi, known as wood rot.
(11) "Wood destroying organism inspection" means the inspection of
a building for the presence of wood destroying organisms, their damage,
or conducive conditions leading to the development or establishment of
the organism.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 LICENSURE REQUIRED. (1) Beginning September
1, 2008, a person shall not engage in or conduct, or advertise or hold
himself or herself out as engaging in or conducting the business of or
acting in the capacity of a home inspector within this state without
first obtaining a license as provided in this chapter.
(2) On July 1, 2008, any person who has been actively engaged in
the business of conducting complete home inspections and has been
licensed as a structural pest inspector by the state department of
agriculture for at least two years and who has conducted at least one
hundred complete home inspections may apply to the board for initial
licensure without meeting the examination or instruction requirements
of this chapter.
(3) This chapter does not affect the practice of architecture or
engineering or prevent an architect or an engineer from offering to
provide or providing home inspection services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 HOME INSPECTOR LICENSING BOARD. (1) The
state home inspector licensing board is created. The board consists of
eight members appointed by the director, who shall advise the director
concerning the administration of this chapter. Of the appointments to
this board, five shall be actively engaged as home inspectors
immediately prior to their appointment to the board, one shall be a
licensed real estate broker, one shall be currently teaching in a home
inspector certificate program, and one shall be a member of the general
public with no family or business connection with the home inspector
business or practice. Insofar as possible, the composition of the
appointed home inspector members of the board shall be generally
representative of the occupational distribution of home inspectors
licensed under this chapter.
(2) A home inspector must have the following qualifications to be
appointed to the board:
(a) Actively engaged as a home inspector in the state of Washington
for five years;
(b) Licensed as a home inspector under this chapter; and
(c) Performed three hundred fifty home inspections in the state of
Washington.
(3) Members of the board are appointed for three-year terms. Terms
must be staggered so that not more than two appointments are scheduled
to be made in any calendar year. Members hold office until the
expiration of the terms for which they were appointed. The director
may remove a board member for just cause. The director may appoint a
new member to fill a vacancy on the board for the remainder of the
unexpired term. All board members are limited to two consecutive
terms.
(4) Each board member is entitled to compensation for each day
spent conducting official business and to reimbursement for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.240, 43.03.050, and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 DIRECTOR'S AUTHORITY. The director has the
following authority in administering this chapter:
(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind rules approved by the board as
deemed necessary to carry out this chapter;
(2) To adopt fees as provided in RCW 43.24.086;
(3) To administer licensing examinations approved by the board and
to adopt or recognize examinations prepared by other organizations as
approved by the board; and
(4) To adopt standards of professional conduct, practice, and
ethics as approved by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 BOARD'S AUTHORITY. The board has the
following authority in administering this chapter:
(1) To establish rules, including board organization and assignment
of terms, and meeting frequency and timing, for adoption by the
director;
(2) To establish the minimum qualifications for licensing
applicants as provided in this chapter;
(3) To approve the method of administration of examinations
required by this chapter or by rule as established by the director;
(4) To approve the content of or recognition of examinations
prepared by other organizations for adoption by the director;
(5) To set the time and place of examinations with the approval of
the director; and
(6) To establish and review standards of professional conduct,
practice, and ethics for adoption by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSURE. In order to
become licensed as a home inspector, an applicant must submit the
following to the department:
(1) An application on a form developed by the department;
(2) The fee in an amount set by the department and approved by the
board;
(3) Proof of a minimum of one hundred twenty hours of classroom
instruction approved by the board;
(4) Evidence of successful passage of the written exam as required
in section 8 of this act;
(5) Proof of current state licensure as a structural pest inspector
under chapter 15.58 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 APPLICATION FOR LICENSING. An application
for licensing must be filed with the director and must contain
statements made under oath demonstrating the applicant's
qualifications. The director with the board's approval may require any
information and documentation that reasonably relates to the need to
determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for licensing. The
application fee for initial licensing shall be determined by the
director as provided in RCW 43.24.086. The application, together with
the fee, must be submitted to the department prior to the application
deadline established by the director. Fees for initial licensing must
include the examination and issuance of a certificate. If the director
finds the applicant ineligible for licensing, the director shall retain
the application fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 WRITTEN EXAMS. (1) The exam shall be
designed to test applicants on conducting home inspections specific to
Washington state.
(2) The exam shall be divided into five sections with forty
questions in each section. Each applicant must pass each section of
the exam with a score of seventy-five percent or better. The sections
in the exam shall be divided as follows: (a) Ethics and standards of
practice; (b) structure, roofing, site, exterior, interior; (c)
heating, ventilation, and air conditioning; (d) plumbing; and (e)
electrical.
(3) To qualify to take the exam, an applicant must provide the
board and the department with acceptable documentation that the
applicant has passed a state accredited home inspection course of at
least one hundred twenty hours of classroom education. Persons who are
performing home inspections as of the effective date of this section
may receive up to twenty-five hours of credit towards the one hundred
twenty hours of classroom education by proof of experience as
determined by the board. In making this determination, the board shall
consider the length of time a person has held a structural pest
inspection license from the department of agriculture under chapter
15.58 RCW.
(4) Examinations of applicants for licensing must be held at times
and places as determined by the board with the director's approval. A
candidate failing an examination may apply for reexamination.
Subsequent examinations must be granted upon payment of a fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 LICENSE LENGTH AND RENEWAL. (1) Licenses
are issued for a term of two years and expire on the last day of the
month the license was issued. Licenses must be in a form prescribed by
the board and approved by the director. Licenses that are not renewed
are considered to be expired and any home inspection activity which
would require a license to perform which occurs after the expiration of
the license is a violation of this chapter.
(2) Any person who receives an initial license under section 2(2)
of this act must, upon renewal of his or her license, pass the
examination required in section 6(4) of this act.
(3) Any licensee who fails to timely renew his or her license may
renew his or her license only upon payment of renewal and late fees as
set by the director. A licensee who fails to renew his or her license
within six months from the date it expires is considered to have
forfeited his or her rights to renew the license and can only be
licensed by filing an application as an initial applicant and meeting
all the requirements of an initial applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 ADVERTISING. The term "licensed home
inspector" along with the license number of the inspector must appear
on all advertising, correspondence, and documents incidental to a home
inspection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS. (1) As
a condition of renewing a license under this chapter, a licensed home
inspector shall present satisfactory evidence to the board of having
completed the continuing education requirements provided for in this
section.
(2) Each applicant for license renewal shall complete at least
thirty hours of instruction in courses approved by the board every two
years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 INSURANCE. All active practicing licensed
home inspectors shall carry errors and omissions insurance at a minimum
of one hundred thousand dollars or post a bond at the same level to
cover all activities contemplated under this chapter, including
inspection for wood destroying organisms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 HOME INSPECTORS AS CORPORATIONS PROHIBITED.
A license as a home inspector may not be issued to a corporation,
limited liability company, partnership, firm, or group. However, this
section does not prevent a licensed home inspector from rendering home
inspections for or on behalf of a corporation, limited liability
company, partnership, firm, or group, when the home inspection report
is performed, prepared, and signed by a licensed home inspector.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 WRITTEN REPORTS. (1) A licensed home
inspector shall provide a written report of the home inspection to each
person for whom the inspector performs a home inspection within seven
calendar days from the date of the inspections.
(2) A licensed home inspector shall not, from the time of the
inspection until one year from the date of the report, perform any work
other than home inspection-related consultation on the home upon which
he or she has performed a home inspection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 HOME INSPECTOR'S ACCOUNT. The home
inspector's account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All receipts from fines and fees collected under this chapter must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only to carry out the duties required for the operation and enforcement
of this chapter. Only the director may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 SUSPENSION OF LICENSE. The director shall
immediately suspend the license or practice permit of a person who has
been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social
and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a child
support order. If the person has continued to meet all other
requirements for a license under this chapter during the suspension,
reissuance of the license is automatic upon the board's receipt of a
release issued by the department of social and health services stating
that the licensee is in compliance with the child support order. The
procedure in RCW 74.20A.320 is the exclusive administrative remedy for
contesting the establishment of noncompliance with a child support
order, and suspension of a license under this subsection, and satisfies
the requirements of RCW 34.05.422.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 CIVIL INFRACTIONS. The department has the
authority to issue civil infractions under chapter 7.80 RCW in the
following instances:
(1) Conducting or offering to conduct a home inspection without
being licensed in accordance with this chapter;
(2) Presenting or attempting to use as his or her own the home
inspector license of another;
(3) Giving any false or forged evidence of any kind to the director
or his or her authorized representative in obtaining a license;
(4) Falsely impersonating any other licensee; or
(5) Attempting to use an expired or revoked license.
All fees, fines, and penalties collected or assessed by a court
because of a violation of this section must be remitted to the
department to be deposited into the home inspector's account created in
section 15 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 RELIEF BY INJUNCTION. The director is
authorized to apply for relief by injunction without bond, to restrain
a person from the commission of any act that is prohibited under
section 17 of this act. In such proceedings, it is not necessary to
allege or prove either that an adequate remedy at law does not exist,
or that substantial or irreparable damage would result from continued
violation. The director, individuals acting on the director's behalf,
and members of the board are immune from suit in any action, civil or
criminal, based on disciplinary proceedings or other official acts
performed in the course of their duties in the administration and
enforcement of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 GENERAL EXCLUSIONS. (1) The home inspector
is not required to determine the following:
(a) The condition of systems or components that are not readily
accessible;
(b) The remaining life of any system or component;
(c) The strength, adequacy, effectiveness, or efficiency of any
system or component;
(d) The cause of any condition or deficiency;
(e) The methods, materials, or costs of corrections;
(f) Future conditions including but not limited to failure of
systems and components;
(g) The suitability of the property for any specialized use;
(h) Compliance with regulatory requirements;
(i) The market value of the property or its marketability; and
(j) The presence of environmental hazards including, but not
limited to, toxins, carcinogens, noise, and contaminants in soil,
water, and air.
(2) Home inspectors are not required to enter the following:
(a) Any area that will likely be dangerous to the inspector or
other persons or damage the property or its systems or components; or
(b) The underfloor crawl spaces or attics that are not readily
accessible; however, substructure crawl spaces must be inspected when
accessible. Inaccessibility of substructure crawl space areas due to
inadequate clearance, the presence of ducting or piping, foundation
walls, partitions, or other such conditions that block access must be
explained in the inspection report. The report must state that
inaccessible substructure crawl space areas may be vulnerable to
infestation by wood-destroying organisms and should be made accessible
for inspection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 EXEMPTION FROM LICENSING. Any person
licensed by the department of agriculture as a pesticide applicator or
operator under chapter 17.21 RCW, or as a structural pest inspector
under chapter 15.58 RCW who performs only wood destroying organism
inspections, is exempt from the licensing provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Sections 1 through 20 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

--- END ---