BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that student access to
programs offered at skill centers can help prepare them for careers,
apprenticeships, and postsecondary education. The legislature further
finds that current limits on how school districts and skill centers
report full-time equivalent students and the time students are served
provide a disincentive for school districts to send their students to
skill centers. The legislature further finds that there are barriers
to providing access to students in rural and remote areas but that
there are opportunities to do so with satellite and branch campus
programs, distance and online learning programs, and collaboration with
higher education, business, and labor. The legislature further finds
that skill centers provide opportunities for dropout prevention and
retrieval programs by offering programs that accommodate students' work
schedules and provide credit retrieval opportunities. The legislature
further finds that implementing the recommendations from the study by
the workforce training and education coordinating board will enhance
skill center programs and student access to those programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A skill center is a regional career and
technical education partnership established to provide access to
comprehensive industry-defined career and technical programs of study
that prepare students for careers, employment, apprenticeships, and
postsecondary education. A skill center is operated by a host school
district and governed by an administrative council in accordance with
a cooperative agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Beginning in the 2007-08 school year and
thereafter, students attending skill centers shall be funded for all
classes at the skill center and the sending districts, up to one and
four-tenths full-time equivalents. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall develop procedures to ensure that the school
district and the skill center report no student for more than one and
four-tenths full-time equivalent students combining both their high
school enrollment and skill center enrollment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall review and revise the guidelines for skill
centers to encourage skill center programs. The superintendent, in
cooperation with the workforce training and education coordinating
board, skill center directors, and the Washington association for
career and technical education, shall review and revise the existing
skill centers' policy guidelines and create and adopt rules governing
skill centers as follows:
(a) The threshold enrollment at a skill center shall be revised so
that a skill center program need not have a minimum of seventy percent
of its students enrolled on the skill center core campus in order to
facilitate serving rural students through expansion of skill center
programs by means of satellite programs or branch campuses;
(b) The developmental planning for branch campuses shall be
encouraged. Underserved rural areas or high-density areas may partner
with an existing skill center to create satellite programs or a branch
campus. Once a branch campus reaches sufficient enrollment to become
self-sustaining, it may become a separate skill center or remain an
extension of the founding skill center; and
(c) Satellite and branch campus programs shall be encouraged to
address high-demand fields.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and
deliver a ten-year capital plan for legislative review before
implementation.
(3) Subject to available funding, the superintendent shall:
(a) Conduct approved feasibility studies for serving noncooperative
rural and high-density area students in their geographic areas; and
(b) Develop a statewide master plan that identifies standards and
resources needed to create a technology infrastructure for connecting
all skill centers to the K-20 network.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Subject to available funding, skill centers
shall provide access to late afternoon and evening sessions and summer
school programs, to rural and high-density area students aligned with
regionally identified high-demand occupations. When possible, the
programs shall be specifically targeted for credit retrieval, dropout
prevention and intervention for at-risk students, and retrieval of
dropouts. Skill centers that receive funding for these activities must
participate in an evaluation that is designed to quantify results and
identify best practices, collaborate with local community partners in
providing a comprehensive program, and provide matching funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The superintendent of public instruction
shall establish and support skill centers of excellence in key economic
sectors of regional significance. The superintendent shall broker the
development of skill centers of excellence and identify their roles in
developing curriculum and methodologies for reporting skill center
course equivalencies for purposes of high school graduation.
(2) Once the skill centers of excellence are established, the
superintendent of public instruction shall develop and seek funding for
a running start for career and technical education grant program to
develop and implement career and technical programs of study targeted
to regionally determined high-demand occupations. Grant recipients
should be partnerships of skill centers of excellence, community
college centers of excellence, tech-prep programs, industry advisory
committees, area workforce development councils, and skill panels in
the related industry. Grant recipients should be expected to develop
and assist in the replication of model career and technical education
programs of study. The career and technical education programs of
study developed should be consistent with the expectations in the
applicable federal law.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.52.068 and 2005 c 514 s 1104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A portion of the proceeds of the state property tax levy shall
be deposited into the student achievement fund as provided in this
section.
(2)(a) The amount of the deposit shall be based upon the average
number of full-time equivalent students in the school districts during
the previous school year as reported to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction by August 31st of the previous
school year.
(b) For the 2004-2005 through 2007-2008 school years, an annual
amount equal to two hundred fifty-four dollars per full-time equivalent
student in all school districts shall be deposited in the student
achievement fund.
(c) For the 2008-2009 school year, an annual amount equal to two
hundred sixty-five dollars per full-time equivalent student in all
school districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(d) For the 2009-2010 school year, an annual amount equal to two
hundred seventy-seven dollars per full-time equivalent student in all
school districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(e) For the 2010-2011 school year and each year thereafter, an
annual amount equal to two hundred seventy-eight dollars per full-time
equivalent student in all school districts shall be deposited in the
student achievement fund.
(f) The school district annual amounts shall be deposited based on
the monthly apportionment schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall notify the
department of the monthly amounts to be deposited into the student
achievement fund to meet the apportionment schedule. The
superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that moneys generated
by skill center students is returned to skill centers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

--- END ---