BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) School districts are encouraged to offer as an elective a one-term course in firearm safety that shall be designated as the
Washington hunter and firearm safety program course.
(2) A student shall be deemed to have satisfactorily completed the
Washington hunter and firearm safety program course by demonstrating
that he or she has the ability to discharge a firearm safely.
(3) The Washington hunter and firearm safety program course shall
be developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
in conjunction with the department of fish and wildlife, the Washington
state patrol, and private firearms organizations. The program course
may include materials provided by private youth organizations.
(4) At a minimum, the program course shall include:
(a) Instruction on the rules of firearm safety;
(b) Instruction on the basic operation of firearms;
(c) Instruction on the history of firearms;
(d) Instruction on the role of firearms in preserving peace and
freedom;
(e) Instruction on the right to keep and bear arms under Second
Amendment to the United States Constitution;
(f) Instruction on the use of clay targets; and
(g) Practice time at a shooting range.
(5) School districts shall arrange for adequate use of shooting
range time by students in the Washington hunter and firearm safety
program course and any established shooting range.
(6) Students who satisfactorily complete the Washington hunter and
firearm safety program course shall receive a certificate of
accomplishment.
(7) Instructors shall be certified by the department of fish and
wildlife. By providing this training, certified hunter education
instructors shall receive credit for hunter education instruction
towards their annual teaching requirement.
(8) This section shall not be construed to limit or expand the
liability of any person under other provision of law.

--- END ---