BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.17.050 and 1965 c 8 s 43.17.050 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each department shall maintain its principal office at the
state capital. The director of each department may, with the approval
of the governor, establish and maintain branch offices at other places
than the state capital for the conduct of one or more of the functions
of his or her department.
(2) A geographically equal distribution of all departmental branch
offices across the state shall be a goal of all departmental directors'
decisions regarding the placement of each newly created or relocated
branch office. Gubernatorial approval or disapproval of all directors'
decisions, where necessary, shall be made in furtherance of the goal of
the geographically equal distribution of all branch offices.
(3) The directors of all departments shall give priority to
counties with less than one million population whenever they consider
the establishment of a new branch office or the relocation of an
existing branch office.
(4) The governor, in his or her discretion, may require all
administrative departments of the state and the appointive officers
thereof, other than those created by this chapter, to maintain their
principal offices at the state capital in rooms to be furnished by the
director of general administration.

--- END ---