BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.04.030 and 2001 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The fish and wildlife commission consists of nine registered
voters of the state. In January of each odd-numbered year, the
governor shall appoint with the advice and consent of the senate three
registered voters to the commission to serve for terms of six years
from that January or until their successors are appointed and
qualified. If a vacancy occurs on the commission prior to the
expiration of a term, the governor shall appoint a registered voter
within sixty days to complete the term. ((Three members shall be
residents of that portion of the state lying east of the summit of the
Cascade mountains, and three shall be residents of that portion of the
state lying west of the summit of the Cascade mountains. Three
additional members shall be appointed at-large. No two members may be
residents of the same county.))
(2) At least one member must reside within the boundaries of each
of the six administrative regions recognized by the department on the
effective date of this section. No more than two members may reside in
any single administrative region recognized by the department on the
effective date of this section. No two members may be residents of the
same county. With each appointment after the effective date of this
section, the governor must incrementally bring commission membership
into conformance with this subsection.
(3) If a member is not confirmed by the senate within one year of
that member's appointment, that member's position is considered vacated
and the governor must appoint a registered voter within sixty days to
complete the term.
(4) The legal office of the commission is at the administrative
office of the department in Olympia.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.04.040 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Persons eligible for appointment as members of the commission
shall have general knowledge of the habits and distribution of fish and
wildlife and shall not hold another state, county, or municipal
elective or appointive office. ((In making these appointments, the
governor shall seek to maintain a balance reflecting all aspects of
fish and wildlife, including representation recommended by organized
groups representing sportfishers, commercial fishers, hunters, private
landowners, and environmentalists.))
(2) Membership on the commission shall be composed of: Two members
recommended by statewide hunting organizations; two members recommended
by statewide sportfishing associations; one member recommended by
statewide commercial fishing organizations; three members recommended
by statewide agricultural organizations; and one member recommended by
statewide conservation organizations. With each appointment after the
effective date of this section, the governor must incrementally bring
commission membership into conformance with this subsection.
(3) Persons eligible for appointment as fish and wildlife
commissioners shall comply with the provisions of chapters 42.52 and
42.17 RCW.

--- END ---