BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
An allocation is established to compensate the largest district in
the state for the disproportionate amount of state property tax that is
generated in that district and then redistributed to other school
districts through the state funding formulas. This allocation is also
intended to promote academic achievement and help students overcome
obstacles that come along with being educated in a large urban area.
The amounts provided shall supplement and not supplant current state
and local funding for this purpose.
(1) A district is eligible for an allocation only if its annual
full-time equivalent student enrollment exceeds forty thousand
students.
(2) In the 2007-08 school year, an additional allocation of seven
hundred dollars per student eligible for free and reduced-price lunch
or enrolled in the transitional bilingual program shall be made to an
eligible district based on the criteria in subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) In the 2008-09 school year and each school year thereafter
until the state adopts a new basic education definition, an additional
allocation of one thousand four hundred dollars per student eligible
for free and reduced-price lunch or enrolled in the transitional
bilingual program shall be made to an eligible district based on the
criteria in subsection (1) of this section. After the 2008-09 school
year, the amount of per student allocation shall be adjusted based on
inflation.
(4) School districts shall use sixty-five to eighty percent of the
funds allocated under this section to provide class size relief,
program enhancement, and restoration of critical coursework in
elementary, middle, and high schools across the district. School
districts shall use fifteen to thirty percent of the funds allocated
under this section to reduce the disparity in educational achievement
that exists between students of varying economic, ethnic, racial, and
cultural backgrounds. School districts shall use five to ten percent
of the funds allocated under this section to support classrooms,
purchase teaching materials, support new teachers, and support
custodial and maintenance needs for the increased operational hours and
space utilization.
(5) Each district receiving an allocation under this section shall
annually report to its citizens on the impact of the activities funded
on class size, graduation rates, student attendance, student
achievement, and closing the achievement gap.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of sixteen million one hundred
ninety-eight thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the
general fund to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of thirty-two thousand three hundred
ninety-six thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, from the general
fund to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the
purposes of this act.

--- END ---