BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.20.780 and 2001 c 226 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of transportation shall develop a process for
awarding competitively bid highway construction contracts for projects
over ten million dollars that may be constructed using a design-build
procedure. As used in this section and RCW 47.20.785, "design-build
procedure" means a method of contracting under which the department of
transportation contracts with another party for the party to both
design and build the structures, facilities, and other items specified
in the contract.
The process developed by the department must, at a minimum, include
the scope of services required under the design-build procedure,
contractor prequalification requirements, criteria for evaluating
technical information and project costs, contractor selection criteria,
and issue resolution procedures.
((This section expires April 30, 2008.))

--- END ---