BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature has previously recognized
that landlords who choose the option of storing a tenant's property as
part of an eviction should be entitled to recover the costs of drayage
and storage from the tenant who was evicted. It has always been the
intent of the legislature to give a landlord the option, but not the
obligation, to store a tenant's property as part of an eviction. The
legislature also recognizes that county sheriffs when executing writs
of restitution provide one or more deputies to maintain the peace while
the landlord's personnel, under the direction of the sheriff, enter the
premises and remove the property belonging to the tenant and place it
on the nearest public property.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.18.312 and 1992 c 38 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A landlord may, upon the execution of a writ of restitution by
the sheriff, enter and take possession of any property of the tenant
found on the premises and either store the property in any reasonably
secure place or deposit the property on the nearest public property.
If((, however,)) the tenant or the tenant's representative objects to
the storage of the property, the ((property)) landlord shall ((be
deposited upon)) deposit the property on the nearest public property
and ((may not be moved and stored by the landlord)) shall not store the
property. If the tenant is not present at the time the writ of
restitution is executed, it shall be presumed that the tenant does not
object to the storage of the property ((as provided in this section))
and the landlord may either store the property or deposit the property
on the nearest public property. RCW 59.18.310 shall apply to the
moving and storage of a tenant's property when the premises are
abandoned by the tenant.
(2) Property moved and stored under this section shall be returned
to the tenant after the tenant has paid the actual or reasonable
drayage and storage costs, whichever is less, or until it is sold or
disposed of by the landlord in accordance with subsection (3) of this
section.
(3) Prior to the sale or disposal of property stored pursuant to
this section with a cumulative value of over fifty dollars, the
landlord shall notify the tenant of the pending sale or disposal.
After forty-five days from the date the notice of the sale or disposal
is mailed or personally delivered to the tenant, the landlord may sell
or dispose of the property, including personal papers, family pictures,
and keepsakes.
If the property that is being stored has a cumulative value of
fifty dollars or less, then the landlord may sell or dispose of the
property in the manner provided in this section, except for personal
papers, family pictures, and keepsakes. Prior to the sale or disposal
of property stored pursuant to this section with a cumulative value of
fifty dollars or less, the landlord shall notify the tenant of the
pending sale or disposal. The notice shall either be mailed or
personally delivered to the tenant. After seven days from the date the
notice is mailed or delivered to the tenant, the landlord may sell or
dispose of the property.
The landlord may apply any income derived from the sale of the
tenant's property against moneys due the landlord for drayage and
storage of the property. The amount of sale proceeds that the landlord
may apply towards such costs may not exceed the actual or reasonable
costs for drayage and storage of the property, whichever is less. Any
excess income derived from the sale of such property shall be held by
the landlord for the benefit of the tenant for a period of one year
from the date of the sale. If no claim is made or action commenced by
the tenant for the recovery of the excess income prior to the
expiration of that period of time, then the balance shall be treated as
abandoned property and deposited by the landlord with the department of
revenue pursuant to chapter 63.29 RCW.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed as creating a right
of distress for rent.
(5) When serving a tenant with a writ of restitution pursuant to
RCW 59.12.100 and 59.18.410, the sheriff shall provide written notice
to the tenant that: (a) Upon execution of the writ, the landlord may
store the tenant's property; (b) if the property is stored, it may not
be returned to the tenant unless the tenant pays the actual or
reasonable costs of drayage and storage, whichever is less; (c) if the
tenant objects to storage of the property, it will not be stored but
will be placed on the nearest public property; and (d) if the tenant is
not present at the time of the execution of the writ, it shall be
presumed the tenant does not object to storage of the property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---