BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that prison chaplains
in Washington state are asked to meet the diverse, growing spiritual
and physical needs of inmates from a variety of faith backgrounds with
limited resources. Chaplaincy programs in Washington state positively
impact inmate behavior, encouraging prison order and reducing prison
violence. Chaplaincy programs in Washington state have a strong
capacity for rehabilitation and reducing recidivism, thereby
contributing to the well-being of Washington state and all
Washingtonians.

Sec. 2 RCW 72.01.210 and 1993 c 281 s 62 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of corrections shall appoint chaplains for the state
correctional institutions for convicted felons((; and)) under his or
her control at the ratio of at least one chaplain for the first five
hundred inmates and at least one chaplain for each additional five
hundred inmates. These chaplains shall be so appointed as full-time
employees of the department of corrections. The secretary of
corrections shall further contract with part-time chaplains who will
not function as state actors and are only to be employed as is
necessary to meet the religious needs of those inmates whose religious
denominations are not represented by staff chaplains. The secretary of
corrections shall also ensure that any contracts with other publicly or
privately operated institutions for the care and custody of inmates
under his or her control meet the standards of this section and require
consistency with religion-related policies of the department. The
secretary of social and health services shall appoint and contract
chaplains for the correctional institutions for juveniles found
delinquent by the juvenile courts((; and the secretary of corrections
and the secretary of social and health services shall appoint one or
more chaplains for other custodial, correctional and)), mental
institutions, and sex offender civil commitment institutions under
((their)) his or her control at the same ratio and standards. ((The))
Staff chaplains so appointed under this section shall have the
qualifications necessary to function as religious program coordinators
for all faith groups represented within the department. Every chaplain
so appointed and contracted with under this section shall have
qualifications consistent with community standards of the given faith
group to which the chaplain belongs, shall only minister to those
inmates and residents who are of their own faith group, and shall be
compensated in an amount, as shall hereafter be recommended by the
departments and approved by the Washington personnel resources board.
The department of corrections and the department of social and health
services shall require chaplains so appointed or contracted with under
this section to participate in training to the extent the training is
necessary and appropriate to enable the chaplain to fulfill his or her
duties as a chaplain.

--- END ---