BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.120 and 2005 c 314 s 306 and 2005 c 61 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
An applicant for a new or renewed driver's license must
successfully pass a driver licensing examination to qualify for a
driver's license. The department shall give examinations at places and
times reasonably available to the people of this state.
(1) Waiver. The department may waive:
(a) All or any part of the examination of any person under the age
of seventy applying for the renewal of a driver's license unless the
department determines that the applicant is not qualified to hold a
driver's license under this title; ((or))
(b) The knowledge part of the examination, as described in RCW
46.20.130(1), of any person over the age of sixty-nine applying for the
renewal of a driver's license unless the department determines that the
applicant is not qualified to hold a driver's license under this title;
or
(c) All or any part of the examination involving operating a motor
vehicle if the applicant:
(i) Surrenders a valid driver's license issued by the person's
previous home state; or
(ii) Provides for verification a valid driver's license issued by
a foreign driver licensing jurisdiction with which the department has
an informal agreement under RCW 46.20.125; and
(iii) Is otherwise qualified to be licensed.
(2) Fee. Each applicant for a new license must pay an examination
fee of twenty dollars.
(a) The examination fee is in addition to the fee charged for
issuance of the license.
(b) "New license" means a license issued to a driver:
(i) Who has not been previously licensed in this state; or
(ii) Whose last previous Washington license has been expired for
more than five years.
(3) An application for driver's license renewal may be submitted by
means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her license by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired. However, the
department may accept an application for renewal of a driver's license
submitted by means of mail or electronic commerce only if specific
authority and funding is provided for this purpose by June 30, 2004, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act.
(4) A person whose license expired or will expire while he or she
is living outside the state, may:
(a) Apply to the department to extend the validity of his or her
license for no more than twelve months. If the person establishes to
the department's satisfaction that he or she is unable to return to
Washington before the date his or her license expires, the department
shall extend the person's license. The department may grant
consecutive extensions, but in no event may the cumulative total of
extensions exceed twelve months. An extension granted under this
section does not change the expiration date of the license for purposes
of RCW 46.20.181. The department shall charge a fee of five dollars
for each license extension;
(b) Apply to the department to renew his or her license by mail or,
if permitted by rule of the department, by electronic commerce even if
subsection (3)(b) of this section would not otherwise allow renewal by
that means. If the person establishes to the department's satisfaction
that he or she is unable to return to Washington within twelve months
of the date that his or her license expires, the department shall renew
the person's license by mail or, if permitted by rule of the
department, by electronic commerce.
(5) If a qualified person submits an application for renewal under
subsection (3)(b) or (4)(b) of this section, he or she is not required
to pass an examination nor provide an updated photograph. A license
renewed by mail or by electronic commerce that does not include a
photograph of the licensee must be labeled "not valid for
identification purposes."

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.181 and 1999 c 308 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, every
driver's license expires on the fifth anniversary of the licensee's
birthdate following the issuance of the license.
(2) A person may renew his or her license on or before the
expiration date by submitting an application as prescribed by the
department and paying a fee of twenty-five dollars. This fee includes
the fee for the required photograph.
(3) A person renewing his or her driver's license more than sixty
days after the license has expired shall pay a penalty fee of ten
dollars in addition to the renewal fee, unless his or her license
expired when:
(a) The person was outside the state and he or she renews the
license within sixty days after returning to this state; or
(b) The person was incapacitated and he or she renews the license
within sixty days after the termination of the incapacity.
(4)(a) During the period from July 1, 2000, to July 1, 2006, the
department may issue or renew a driver's license for a period other
than five years, or may extend by mail a license that has already been
issued, in order to evenly distribute, as nearly as possible, the
yearly renewal rate of licensed drivers. The fee for a driver's
license issued or renewed for a period other than five years, or that
has been extended by mail, is five dollars for each year that the
license is issued, renewed, or extended. The department may adopt any
rules as are necessary to carry out this subsection.
(b) The driver's license of a person over the age of seventy-nine
expires two years after the licensee's birthdate following the issuance
of the license.

--- END ---