BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.820 and 2006 c 354 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses ((or)), grain elevators, or large grain elevator facilities,
and retailers who own or operate distribution centers, and who have
paid the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 on:
(a) Material-handling and racking equipment((,)) or large grain
elevator equipment and labor and services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving ((the)) all
such equipment; or
(b) Construction of a warehouse or grain elevator, or construction,
remodeling, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of a large
grain elevator, including materials, and including service and labor
costs,
are eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance. The amount
of the remittance is computed under subsection (3) of this section and
is based on the state share of sales tax.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.820:
(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.213;
(b) "Cold storage warehouse" has the meaning provided in RCW
82.74.010;
(c) "Construction" means the actual construction of a warehouse
((or)), grain elevator, or large grain elevator that did not exist
before the construction began. "Construction" includes expansion, but
in the case of a cold storage warehouse, only if the expansion adds at
least twenty-five thousand square feet of additional space to an
existing cold storage warehouse, or in the case of a warehouse other
than a cold storage warehouse, only if the expansion adds at least two
hundred thousand square feet of additional space to an existing
warehouse other than a cold storage warehouse, or ((additional)) in the
case of a grain elevator, only if the expansion adds storage capacity
of at least one million bushels to an existing grain elevator.
"Construction" does not include renovation, remodeling, or repair;
(d) "Department" means the department of revenue;
(e) "Distribution center" means a warehouse that is used
exclusively by a retailer solely for the storage and distribution of
finished goods to retail outlets of the retailer. "Distribution
center" does not include a warehouse at which retail sales occur;
(f) "Finished goods" means tangible personal property intended for
sale by a retailer or wholesaler. "Finished goods" does not include
agricultural products stored by wholesalers, third-party warehouses, or
retailers if the storage takes place on the land of the person who
produced the agricultural product. "Finished goods" does not include
logs, minerals, petroleum, gas, or other extracted products stored as
raw materials or in bulk;
(g) "Grain elevator" means a structure used for storage and
handling of grain in bulk;
(h) "Large grain elevator" means storage silos, tanks, conveyers
and their supports, scale towers, bins, electrical improvements,
scales, foundations, rails and rail beds, and other buildings primarily
used to handle, store, organize, condition, analyze, or convey grain,
oil seeds, and byproducts thereof in bulk. Office space, lunchrooms,
restrooms, maintenance buildings, control and computer systems used to
operate such facilities, and other space necessary for the operation of
the large grain elevator are considered part of the large grain
elevator as are loading docks and other such space or structures
attached or adjacent to the conveyers, and other necessary devices and
structures used to receive, convey, or discharge grain, oil seeds, and
byproducts thereof via means of waterborne, rail, highway, or
intermodal transport and used for handling of grain, oil seeds, and
byproducts thereof. Roads, landscaping, and parking lots are not
considered part of the large grain elevator. A storage yard is not a
large grain elevator nor is a structure in which manufacturing takes
place;
(((h))) (i) "Large grain elevator facility" means one or more
contiguous parcels of real property with one or more large grain
elevators with a combined capacity of at least three million bushels;
(j) "Large grain elevator equipment" means equipment within a large
grain elevator facility that is primarily used to handle, store,
organize, convey, condition, or analyze grain, oil seeds, and
byproducts thereof which is not defined as a large grain elevator. The
term includes tangible personal property with a useful life of one year
or more that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment,
including repair and replacement parts. The term does not include
equipment in offices, lunchrooms, restrooms, and other like space,
within a large grain elevator facility, or equipment used for nonlarge
grain elevator purposes. "Large grain elevator equipment" includes but
is not limited to: Samplers, air compressors, quality analyzing
equipment, worker and environmental safety equipment, conditioning
equipment used to maintain quality, lifts, positioners, cranes, hoists,
mechanical arms, and robots; and forklifts and other off-the-road
vehicles that are used to lift or move tangible personal property and
that cannot be operated legally on roads and streets;
(k) "Material-handling equipment and racking equipment" means
equipment in a warehouse or grain elevator that is primarily used to
handle, store, organize, convey, package, or repackage finished goods.
The term includes tangible personal property with a useful life of one
year or more that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment,
including repair and replacement parts. The term does not include
equipment in offices, lunchrooms, restrooms, and other like space,
within a warehouse or grain elevator, or equipment used for
nonwarehousing purposes. "Material-handling equipment" includes but is
not limited to: Conveyers, carousels, lifts, positioners, pick-up-and-place units, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots; mechanized
systems, including containers that are an integral part of the system,
whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal property; and
automated handling, storage, and retrieval systems, including computers
that control them, whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal
property; and forklifts and other off-the-road vehicles that are used
to lift or move tangible personal property and that cannot be operated
legally on roads and streets. "Racking equipment" includes, but is not
limited to, conveying systems, chutes, shelves, racks, bins, drawers,
pallets, and other containers and storage devices that form a necessary
part of the storage system;
(((i))) (l) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030;
(((j))) (m) "Retailer" means a person who makes "sales at retail"
as defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property;
(((k))) (n) "Square footage" means the product of the two
horizontal dimensions of each floor of a specific warehouse. The
entire footprint of the warehouse shall be measured in calculating the
square footage, including space that juts out from the building profile
such as loading docks. "Square footage" does not mean the aggregate of
the square footage of more than one warehouse at a location or the
aggregate of the square footage of warehouses at more than one
location;
(((l))) (o) "Third-party warehouser" means a person taxable under
RCW 82.04.280(4);
(((m))) (p) "Warehouse" means an enclosed building or structure in
which finished goods are stored. A warehouse building or structure may
have more than one storage room and more than one floor. Office space,
lunchrooms, restrooms, and other space within the warehouse and
necessary for the operation of the warehouse are considered part of the
warehouse as are loading docks and other such space attached to the
building and used for handling of finished goods. Landscaping and
parking lots are not considered part of the warehouse. A storage yard
is not a warehouse, nor is a building in which manufacturing takes
place; and
(((n))) (q) "Wholesaler" means a person who makes "sales at
wholesale" as defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal
property, but "wholesaler" does not include a person who makes sales
exempt under RCW 82.04.330.
(3)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020. The buyer may then apply to the department for remittance
of all or part of the tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. For grain
elevators with bushel capacity of one million but less than two
million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred thousand or
more, other than cold storage warehouses, and for grain elevators with
bushel capacity of two million or more, the remittance is equal to one
hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying construction,
materials, service, and labor, and fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment,
and labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the equipment. For cold storage
warehouses with square footage of twenty-five thousand or more, the
remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid
for qualifying construction, materials, service, and labor, and one
hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment. For large grain elevator facilities, the
remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid
for qualifying construction, remodeling, repairing, cleaning, altering,
or improving, and materials, service, and labor of large grain
elevators, and fifty percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying
large grain elevator equipment, and labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
equipment.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment or
large grain elevator equipment; location and size of warehouses
((and)), grain elevators, and large grain elevator facilities; and
construction invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications during the
previous quarter.
(4) Warehouses, grain elevators, large grain elevators, large grain
elevator equipment, and material-handling equipment and racking
equipment for which an exemption, credit, or deferral has been or is
being received under chapter 82.60, 82.62, or 82.63 RCW or RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not eligible for any remittance under
this section. Warehouses ((and)), grain elevators, and large grain
elevators upon which construction was initiated before May 20, 1997,
are not eligible for a remittance under this section.
(5) The lessor or owner of a warehouse ((or)), grain elevator, or
large grain elevator is not eligible for a remittance under this
section unless the underlying ownership of the warehouse ((or)), grain
elevator, or large grain elevator, and the material-handling equipment
and racking equipment or large grain elevator equipment vests
exclusively in the same person, or unless the lessor by written
contract agrees to pass the economic benefit of the remittance to the
lessee in the form of reduced rent payments.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.820 and 2006 c 354 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
on:
(a) Material-handling and racking equipment, or grain elevator
equipment, and labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving ((the)) all such equipment;
or
(b) Construction of a warehouse, or construction, remodeling,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of a grain elevator,
including materials, and including service and labor costs,
are eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance. The amount
of the remittance is computed under subsection (3) of this section and
is based on the state share of sales tax.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.820:
(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.213;
(b) "Cold storage warehouse" has the meaning provided in RCW
82.74.010;
(c) "Construction" means the actual construction of a warehouse or
grain elevator that did not exist before the construction began.
"Construction" includes expansion, but in the case of a cold storage
warehouse, only if the expansion adds at least twenty-five thousand
square feet of additional space to an existing cold storage warehouse,
or in the case of a warehouse other than a cold storage warehouse, only
if the expansion adds at least two hundred thousand square feet of
additional space to an existing warehouse other than a cold storage
warehouse((, or additional storage capacity of at least one million
bushels to an existing grain elevator)). "Construction" does not
include renovation, remodeling, or repair;
(d) "Department" means the department of revenue;
(e) "Distribution center" means a warehouse that is used
exclusively by a retailer solely for the storage and distribution of
finished goods to retail outlets of the retailer. "Distribution
center" does not include a warehouse at which retail sales occur;
(f) "Finished goods" means tangible personal property intended for
sale by a retailer or wholesaler. "Finished goods" does not include
agricultural products stored by wholesalers, third-party warehouses, or
retailers if the storage takes place on the land of the person who
produced the agricultural product. "Finished goods" does not include
logs, minerals, petroleum, gas, or other extracted products stored as
raw materials or in bulk;
(g) "Grain elevator" means ((a structure used for storage and
handling of grain in bulk)) storage silos, tanks, conveyers and their
supports, scale towers, bins, electrical improvements, scales,
foundations, rails and rail beds, and other buildings primarily used to
handle, store, organize, condition, analyze, or convey grain, oil
seeds, and byproducts thereof in bulk. Office space, lunchrooms,
restrooms, maintenance buildings, control and computer systems used to
operate such facilities, and other space necessary for the operation of
the grain elevator are considered part of the grain elevator as are
loading docks and other such space or structures attached or adjacent
to the conveyers, and other necessary devices and structures used to
receive, convey, or discharge grain, oil seeds, and byproducts thereof
via means of waterborne, rail, highway, or intermodal transport and
used for handling of grain, oil seeds, and byproducts thereof. Roads,
landscaping, and parking lots are not considered part of the grain
elevator. A storage yard is not a grain elevator nor is a structure in
which manufacturing takes place;
(h) "Grain exporting facility" means one or more contiguous parcels
of real property with one or more grain elevators;
(i) "Grain elevator equipment" means equipment within a grain
elevator facility that is primarily used to handle, store, organize,
convey, condition, or analyze grain, oil seeds, and byproducts thereof
which is not defined as a grain elevator. The term includes tangible
personal property with a useful life of one year or more that becomes
an ingredient or component of the equipment, including repair and
replacement parts. The term does not include equipment in offices,
lunchrooms, restrooms, and other like space, within a grain elevator
facility, or equipment used for nongrain elevator purposes. "Grain
elevator equipment" includes but is not limited to: Samplers, air
compressors, quality analyzing equipment, worker and environmental
safety equipment, conditioning equipment used to maintain quality,
lifts, positioners, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots; and
forklifts and other off-the-road vehicles that are used to lift or move
tangible personal property and that cannot be operated legally on roads
and streets;
(j) "Material-handling equipment and racking equipment" means
equipment in a warehouse or grain elevator that is primarily used to
handle, store, organize, convey, package, or repackage finished goods.
The term includes tangible personal property with a useful life of one
year or more that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment,
including repair and replacement parts. The term does not include
equipment in offices, lunchrooms, restrooms, and other like space,
within a warehouse or grain elevator, or equipment used for
nonwarehousing purposes. "Material-handling equipment" includes but is
not limited to: Conveyers, carousels, lifts, positioners, pick-up-and-place units, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots; mechanized
systems, including containers that are an integral part of the system,
whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal property; and
automated handling, storage, and retrieval systems, including computers
that control them, whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal
property; and forklifts and other off-the-road vehicles that are used
to lift or move tangible personal property and that cannot be operated
legally on roads and streets. "Racking equipment" includes, but is not
limited to, conveying systems, chutes, shelves, racks, bins, drawers,
pallets, and other containers and storage devices that form a necessary
part of the storage system;
(((i))) (k) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030;
(((j))) (l) "Retailer" means a person who makes "sales at retail"
as defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property;
(((k))) (m) "Square footage" means the product of the two
horizontal dimensions of each floor of a specific warehouse. The
entire footprint of the warehouse shall be measured in calculating the
square footage, including space that juts out from the building profile
such as loading docks. "Square footage" does not mean the aggregate of
the square footage of more than one warehouse at a location or the
aggregate of the square footage of warehouses at more than one
location;
(((l))) (n) "Third-party warehouser" means a person taxable under
RCW 82.04.280(4);
(((m))) (o) "Warehouse" means an enclosed building or structure in
which finished goods are stored. A warehouse building or structure may
have more than one storage room and more than one floor. Office space,
lunchrooms, restrooms, and other space within the warehouse and
necessary for the operation of the warehouse are considered part of the
warehouse as are loading docks and other such space attached to the
building and used for handling of finished goods. Landscaping and
parking lots are not considered part of the warehouse. A storage yard
is not a warehouse, nor is a building in which manufacturing takes
place; and
(((n))) (p) "Wholesaler" means a person who makes "sales at
wholesale" as defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal
property, but "wholesaler" does not include a person who makes sales
exempt under RCW 82.04.330.
(3)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020. The buyer may then apply to the department for remittance
of all or part of the tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. For grain
elevators with combined bushel capacity of one million ((but less than
two million,)) or more and for grain elevators required to be issued a
license by the department of agriculture under chapter 22.09 RCW or
required to be licensed by the federal government for purposes similar
to those of licensure under chapter 22.09 RCW but with bushel capacity
of less than one million the remittance is equal to ((fifty)) one
hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying construction,
remodeling, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving, and materials,
service, and labor relating to a grain elevator, and fifty percent of
the amount of tax paid for qualifying grain elevator equipment, and
labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the equipment. For warehouses with
square footage of two hundred thousand or more, other than cold storage
warehouses, ((and for grain elevators with bushel capacity of two
million)) the remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount
of tax paid for qualifying construction, materials, service, and labor,
and fifty percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying
material-handling equipment and racking equipment, and labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving the equipment. For cold storage warehouses with
square footage of twenty-five thousand or more, the remittance is equal
to one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying
construction, materials, service, and labor, and ((fifty)) one hundred
percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying material-handling
equipment and racking equipment, and labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
equipment. ((For cold storage warehouses with square footage of
twenty-five thousand or more, the remittance is equal to one hundred
percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying construction,
materials, service, and labor, and one hundred percent of the amount of
tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking
equipment, and labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the equipment.))
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment or
grain elevator equipment; location and size of warehouses and grain
elevators; and construction invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications during the
previous quarter.
(4) Warehouses, grain elevators, ((and)) material-handling
equipment and racking equipment, and grain elevator equipment for which
an exemption, credit, or deferral has been or is being received under
chapter 82.60, 82.62, or 82.63 RCW or RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565
are not eligible for any remittance under this section. Warehouses
((and grain elevators)) upon which construction was initiated before
May 20, 1997, are not eligible for a remittance under this section.
(5) The lessor or owner of a warehouse or grain elevator is not
eligible for a remittance under this section unless the underlying
ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and the material-handling
equipment and racking equipment or grain elevator equipment vests
exclusively in the same person, or unless the lessor by written
contract agrees to pass the economic benefit of the remittance to the
lessee in the form of reduced rent payments.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.820 and 2006 c 354 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
on:
(a) Material-handling and racking equipment or grain elevator
equipment, and labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving ((the)) all such equipment;
or
(b) Construction of a warehouse, or construction, remodeling,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of a grain elevator,
including materials, and including service and labor costs, are
eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance. The amount of
the remittance is computed under subsection (3) of this section and is
based on the state share of sales tax.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.820:
(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.213;
(b) "Construction" means the actual construction of a warehouse or
grain elevator that did not exist before the construction began.
"Construction" includes expansion, but in the case of a warehouse, only
if the expansion adds at least two hundred thousand square feet of
additional space to an existing warehouse ((or additional storage
capacity of at least one million bushels to an existing grain
elevator)). "Construction" does not include renovation, remodeling, or
repair;
(c) "Department" means the department of revenue;
(d) "Distribution center" means a warehouse that is used
exclusively by a retailer solely for the storage and distribution of
finished goods to retail outlets of the retailer. "Distribution
center" does not include a warehouse at which retail sales occur;
(e) "Finished goods" means tangible personal property intended for
sale by a retailer or wholesaler. "Finished goods" does not include
agricultural products stored by wholesalers, third-party warehouses, or
retailers if the storage takes place on the land of the person who
produced the agricultural product. "Finished goods" does not include
logs, minerals, petroleum, gas, or other extracted products stored as
raw materials or in bulk;
(f) "Grain elevator" means ((a structure used for storage and
handling of grain in bulk)) silos, tanks, conveyers and their supports,
scale towers, bins, electrical improvements, scales, foundations, rails
and rail beds, and other buildings primarily used to handle, store,
organize, condition, analyze, or convey grain, oil seeds, and
byproducts thereof in bulk. Office space, lunchrooms, restrooms,
maintenance buildings, control and computer systems used to operate
such facilities, and other space necessary for the operation of the
grain elevator are considered part of the grain elevator as are loading
docks and other such space or structures attached or adjacent to the
conveyers, and other necessary devices and structures used to receive,
convey, or discharge grain, oil seeds, and byproducts thereof via means
of waterborne, rail, highway, or intermodal transport and used for
handling of grain, oil seeds, and byproducts thereof. Roads,
landscaping, and parking lots are not considered part of the grain
elevator. A storage yard is not a grain elevator nor is a structure in
which manufacturing takes place;
(g) "Grain elevator facility" means one or more contiguous parcels
of real property with one or more grain elevators;
(h) "Grain elevator equipment" means equipment within a grain
elevator facility that is primarily used to handle, store, organize,
convey, condition, or analyze grain, oil seeds, and byproducts thereof
which is not defined as a grain elevator. The term includes tangible
personal property with a useful life of one year or more that becomes
an ingredient or component of the equipment, including repair and
replacement parts. The term does not include equipment in offices,
lunchrooms, restrooms, and other like space, within a grain elevator
facility, or equipment used for nongrain elevator purposes. "Grain
elevator equipment" includes but is not limited to: Samplers, air
compressors, quality analyzing equipment, worker and environmental
safety equipment, conditioning equipment used to maintain quality,
lifts, positioners, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots; and
forklifts and other off-the-road vehicles that are used to lift or move
tangible personal property and that cannot be operated legally on roads
and streets;
(i) "Material-handling equipment and racking equipment" means
equipment in a warehouse or grain elevator that is primarily used to
handle, store, organize, convey, package, or repackage finished goods.
The term includes tangible personal property with a useful life of one
year or more that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment,
including repair and replacement parts. The term does not include
equipment in offices, lunchrooms, restrooms, and other like space,
within a warehouse or grain elevator, or equipment used for
nonwarehousing purposes. "Material-handling equipment" includes but is
not limited to: Conveyers, carousels, lifts, positioners, pick-up-and-place units, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots; mechanized
systems, including containers that are an integral part of the system,
whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal property; and
automated handling, storage, and retrieval systems, including computers
that control them, whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal
property; and forklifts and other off-the-road vehicles that are used
to lift or move tangible personal property and that cannot be operated
legally on roads and streets. "Racking equipment" includes, but is not
limited to, conveying systems, chutes, shelves, racks, bins, drawers,
pallets, and other containers and storage devices that form a necessary
part of the storage system;
(((h))) (j) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030;
(((i))) (k) "Retailer" means a person who makes "sales at retail"
as defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property;
(((j))) (l) "Square footage" means the product of the two
horizontal dimensions of each floor of a specific warehouse. The
entire footprint of the warehouse shall be measured in calculating the
square footage, including space that juts out from the building profile
such as loading docks. "Square footage" does not mean the aggregate of
the square footage of more than one warehouse at a location or the
aggregate of the square footage of warehouses at more than one
location;
(((k))) (m) "Third-party warehouser" means a person taxable under
RCW 82.04.280(4);
(((l))) (n) "Warehouse" means an enclosed building or structure in
which finished goods are stored. A warehouse building or structure may
have more than one storage room and more than one floor. Office space,
lunchrooms, restrooms, and other space within the warehouse and
necessary for the operation of the warehouse are considered part of the
warehouse as are loading docks and other such space attached to the
building and used for handling of finished goods. Landscaping and
parking lots are not considered part of the warehouse. A storage yard
is not a warehouse, nor is a building in which manufacturing takes
place; and
(((m))) (o) "Wholesaler" means a person who makes "sales at
wholesale" as defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal
property, but "wholesaler" does not include a person who makes sales
exempt under RCW 82.04.330.
(3)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020. The buyer may then apply to the department for remittance
of all or part of the tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. For grain
elevators with combined bushel capacity of one million ((but less than
two million,)) or more and for grain elevators required to be issued a
license by the department of agriculture under chapter 22.09 RCW or
required to be licensed by the federal government for purposes similar
to those of licensure under chapter 22.09 RCW but with bushel capacity
of less than one million the remittance is equal to ((fifty)) one
hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying construction,
remodeling, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving, and materials,
service, and labor relating to a grain elevator, and fifty percent of
the amount of tax paid for qualifying grain elevator equipment, and
labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the equipment. For warehouses with
square footage of two hundred thousand or more ((and for grain
elevators with bushel capacity of two million or more)), the remittance
is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for
qualifying construction, materials, service, and labor, and fifty
percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying material-handling
equipment and racking equipment, and labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
equipment.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment or
grain elevator equipment; location and size of warehouses and grain
elevators; and construction invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications during the
previous quarter.
(4) Warehouses, grain elevators, ((and)) material-handling
equipment and racking equipment, and grain elevator equipment for which
an exemption, credit, or deferral has been or is being received under
chapter 82.60, 82.62, or 82.63 RCW or RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565
are not eligible for any remittance under this section. Warehouses
((and grain elevators)) upon which construction was initiated before
May 20, 1997, are not eligible for a remittance under this section.
(5) The lessor or owner of a warehouse or grain elevator is not
eligible for a remittance under this section unless the underlying
ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and the material-handling
equipment and racking equipment or grain elevator equipment vests
exclusively in the same person, or unless the lessor by written
contract agrees to pass the economic benefit of the remittance to the
lessee in the form of reduced rent payments.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.12.820 and 2005 c 513 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses ((or)), grain elevators, or large grain elevator facilities,
and retailers who own or operate distribution centers, and who have
paid the tax levied under RCW 82.12.020 on:
(a) Material-handling equipment and racking equipment or large
grain elevator equipment, and labor and services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving ((the)) all
such equipment; or
(b) Materials incorporated in the construction of a warehouse
((or)), grain elevator, or construction, remodeling, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving of a large grain elevator((,)) are
eligible for an exemption on tax paid in the form of a remittance or
credit against tax owed. The amount of the remittance or credit is
computed under subsection (2) of this section and is based on the state
share of use tax.
(2)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.12.020 to the department. The person may then apply to the
department for remittance of all or part of the tax paid under RCW
82.12.020. For grain elevators with bushel capacity of one million but
less than two million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the
amount of tax paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred
thousand or more, other than cold storage warehouses, and for grain
elevators with bushel capacity of two million or more, the remittance
is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for
qualifying construction materials, and fifty percent of the amount of
tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking
equipment. For cold storage warehouses with square footage of twenty-five thousand or more, the remittance is equal to one hundred percent
of the amount of tax paid for qualifying construction, materials,
service, and labor, and one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid
for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment, and
labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the equipment. For large grain
elevator facilities the remittance is equal to one hundred percent of
the amount of tax paid for materials for qualifying construction,
remodeling, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving, and fifty
percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying large grain elevator
equipment.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment or
large grain elevator equipment; location and size of warehouses, ((if
applicable)) grain elevators, and large grain elevator facilities; and
construction invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit or credit
exempted amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications
during the previous quarter.
(3) Warehouses, grain elevators, ((and)) large grain elevators,
large grain elevator equipment, and material-handling equipment and
racking equipment, for which an exemption, credit, or deferral has been
or is being received under chapter 82.60, ((82.61,)) 82.62, or 82.63
RCW or RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not eligible for any
remittance under this section. Materials incorporated in warehouses
((and)), grain elevators, and large grain elevators upon which
construction was initiated prior to May 20, 1997, are not eligible for
a remittance under this section.
(4) The lessor or owner of ((the)) a warehouse ((or)), grain
elevator, or large grain elevator is not eligible for a remittance or
credit under this section unless the underlying ownership of the
warehouse ((or)), grain elevator, or large grain elevator and the
material-handling equipment and racking equipment or large grain
elevator equipment vests exclusively in the same person, or unless the
lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic benefit of the
((exemption)) remittance to the lessee in the form of reduced rent
payments.
(5) The definitions in RCW 82.08.820 apply to this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.12.820 and 2005 c 513 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators((,)) and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied under RCW
82.12.020 on:
(a) Material-handling equipment and racking equipment or grain
elevator equipment, and labor and services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving ((the)) all
such equipment; or
(b) Materials incorporated in the construction of a warehouse or
construction, remodeling, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
of a grain elevator((,)) are eligible for an exemption on tax paid in
the form of a remittance or credit against tax owed. The amount of the
remittance or credit is computed under subsection (2) of this section
and is based on the state share of use tax.
(2)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.12.020 to the department. The person may then apply to the
department for remittance of all or part of the tax paid under RCW
82.12.020. For grain elevators with combined bushel capacity of one
million ((but less than two million)) or more and for grain elevators
required to be issued a license by the department of agriculture under
chapter 22.09 RCW or required to be licensed by the federal government
for purposes similar to those of licensure under chapter 22.09 RCW but
with bushel capacity of less than one million, the remittance is equal
to ((fifty)) one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for
materials for qualifying construction, remodeling, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving of a grain elevator, and fifty percent of the
amount of tax paid for qualifying grain elevator equipment. For
warehouses with square footage of two hundred thousand or more, other
than cold storage warehouses, ((and for grain elevators with bushel
capacity of two million or more,)) the remittance is equal to one
hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying construction
materials, and fifty percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying
material-handling equipment and racking equipment. For cold storage
warehouses with square footage of twenty-five thousand or more, the
remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid
for qualifying construction, materials, service, and labor, and one
hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment or
grain elevator equipment; location and size of warehouses, ((if
applicable)) grain elevators, and grain elevator facilities; and
construction invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit or credit
exempted amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications
during the previous quarter.
(3) Warehouses, grain elevators, ((and)) grain elevator equipment,
and material-handling equipment and racking equipment, for which an
exemption, credit, or deferral has been or is being received under
chapter 82.60, ((82.61,)) 82.62, or 82.63 RCW or RCW 82.08.02565 or
82.12.02565 are not eligible for any remittance under this section.
Materials incorporated in warehouses ((and grain elevators)) upon which
construction was initiated prior to May 20, 1997, are not eligible for
a remittance under this section.
(4) The lessor or owner of ((the)) a warehouse or grain elevator is
not eligible for a remittance or credit under this section unless the
underlying ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and the
material-handling equipment and racking equipment or grain elevator
equipment vests exclusively in the same person, or unless the lessor by
written contract agrees to pass the economic benefit of the
((exemption)) remittance to the lessee in the form of reduced rent
payments.
(5) The definitions in RCW 82.08.820 apply to this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.12.820 and 2006 c 354 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators((,)) and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied under RCW
82.12.020 on:
(a) Material-handling equipment and racking equipment or grain
elevator equipment, and labor and services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving ((the)) all
such equipment; or
(b) Materials incorporated in the construction of a warehouse or
construction, remodeling, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
of a grain elevator((,)) are eligible for an exemption on tax paid in
the form of a remittance or credit against tax owed. The amount of the
remittance or credit is computed under subsection (2) of this section
and is based on the state share of use tax.
(2)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.12.020 to the department. The person may then apply to the
department for remittance of all or part of the tax paid under RCW
82.12.020. For grain elevators with bushel capacity of one million
((but less than two million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent
of the amount of tax paid)) or more and for grain elevators required to
be issued a license by the department of agriculture under chapter
22.09 RCW or required to be licensed by the federal government for
purposes similar to those of licensure under chapter 22.09 RCW but with
bushel capacity of less than one million, the remittance is equal to
one hundred percent of the tax paid for materials for qualifying
construction, remodeling, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
of a grain elevator, and fifty percent of the amount of tax paid for
qualifying grain elevator equipment. For warehouses with square
footage of two hundred thousand or more ((and for grain elevators with
bushel capacity of two million or more)), the remittance is equal to
one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying
construction materials, and fifty percent of the amount of tax paid for
qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment or
grain elevator equipment; location and size of warehouses((, if
applicable)) and grain elevators; and construction invoices and
documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit or credit
exempted amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications
during the previous quarter.
(3) Warehouses, grain elevators, ((and)) grain elevator equipment,
and material-handling equipment and racking equipment, for which an
exemption, credit, or deferral has been or is being received under
chapter 82.60, 82.62, or 82.63 RCW or RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565
are not eligible for any remittance under this section. Materials
incorporated in warehouses ((and grain elevators)) upon which
construction was initiated prior to May 20, 1997, are not eligible for
a remittance under this section.
(4) The lessor or owner of ((the)) a warehouse or grain elevator is
not eligible for a remittance or credit under this section unless the
underlying ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and material-handling equipment and racking equipment or grain elevator equipment
vests exclusively in the same person, or unless the lessor by written
contract agrees to pass the economic benefit of the ((exemption))
remittance to the lessee in the form of reduced rent payments.
(5) The definitions in RCW 82.08.820 apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 and 4 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2 and 5 of this act take effect
January 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 3 and 6 of this act take effect
July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 and 4 of this act expire January
1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 2 and 5 of this act expire July 1,
2012.

--- END ---