BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
TUITION--FUNDING LEVELS--LIMITATIONS. (1) Beginning with the
2007-08 academic year and ending with the 2016-17 academic year,
tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate students may
increase no greater than seven percent over the previous academic year
in any institution of higher education. Annual reductions or increases
in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students shall be
as provided in the omnibus appropriations act, within the seven percent
increase limit established in this section. To the extent that state
appropriations combined with tuition and fee revenues are insufficient
to achieve the total per-student funding goals established in
subsection (2) of this section, the legislature may revisit state
appropriations, authorized enrollment levels, and changes in tuition
fees for any given fiscal year.
(2) The state shall adopt as its goal total per-student funding
levels, from state appropriations plus tuition and fees, of at least
the sixtieth percentile of total per-student funding at similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states. In
defining comparable per-student funding levels, the office of financial
management shall adjust for regional cost-of-living differences; for
differences in program offerings and in the relative mix of lower
division, upper division, and graduate students; and for accounting and
reporting differences among the comparison institutions. The office of
financial management shall develop a funding trajectory for each four-year institution of higher education and for the community and
technical college system as a whole that when combined with tuition and
fees revenue allows the state to achieve its funding goal for each
four-year institution and the community and technical college system as
a whole no later than fiscal year 2017. The state shall not reduce
enrollment levels below fiscal year 2007 budgeted levels in order to
improve or alter the per-student funding amount at any four-year
institution of higher education or the community and technical college
system as a whole. The state recognizes that each four-year
institution of higher education and the community and technical college
system as a whole have different funding requirements to achieve
desired performance levels, and that increases to the total per-student
funding amount may need to exceed the minimum funding goal.
(3) By September 1st of each year beginning 2008, the office of
financial management shall report to the governor, the higher education
coordinating board, and appropriate committees of the legislature with
updated estimates of the total per-student funding level that
represents the sixtieth percentile of funding for comparable
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states, and
the progress toward that goal that was made for each of the public
institutions of higher education.
(4) As used in this section, "global challenge states" are the top
performing states on the new economy index published by the progressive
policy institute as of the effective date of this section. The new
economy index ranks states on indicators of their potential to compete
in the new economy. At least once every five years, the office of
financial management shall determine if changes to the list of global
challenge states are appropriate. The office of financial management
shall report its findings to the governor and the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
BILLING DISCLOSURES TO STUDENTS. In addition to the requirement in
RCW 28B.76.300(4), institutions of higher education shall disclose to
their undergraduate resident students on the tuition billing statement,
in dollar figures for a full-time equivalent student: (1) The full
cost of instruction, (2) the amount collected from student tuition and
fees, and (3) the difference between the amounts for the full cost of
instruction and the student tuition and fees, noting that the
difference between the cost and tuition was paid by state tax funds and
other moneys.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

--- END ---