BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that child
protective services employees who promote healthy, safe relationships
between children and families benefit from training designed to improve
the efficacy and efficiency of child protective services
investigations. The state has an important interest in helping to
promote healthy, safe relationships between children and families. The
state also has an interest in requiring intensive training for social
workers who are committed to investigating the most difficult child
protective services cases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The secretary of the department of social
and health services shall establish a pilot program, focusing on
intensive child protective services training in two field offices of
the children's administration. The training and supporting field work
shall be attended by all child protective services workers assigned to
the pilot sites and shall last for a total of ten days. In selecting
the two field offices to participate in the program, the secretary
shall endeavor to site one in an urban office and the other in a rural
office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The social workers who participate in
the intensive child protective services training program must attend
the training, either before they are assigned their own child
protective services caseload or as soon as possible after the pilot
program begins. Each social worker who participates shall, for the
duration of the training, and for the duration of the pilot program,
receive a financial incentive from the department of social and health
services in recognition of the additional work undertaken as part of
the pilot program.
(2) All social workers who participate in the intensive child
protective services training program must be trained for ten days
within six months of June 30, 2007.
(3) The social workers who participate in the intensive child
protective services training program shall receive advanced
investigative training developed by the department of social and health
services, in collaboration with local law enforcement, the attorney
general's office, and the northwest institute for children and families
at the University of Washington in such areas as principles of
investigations, critical thinking, interviewing witnesses, analyzing
and preserving evidence, legal framework and policies, and writing
investigation reports. The training may also include courses in staff
safety, including basic self-defense and handling volatile situations.
Participants in the program may also receive specialized training in
drug investigations.
(4) The social workers who participate in the intensive child
protective services training program shall receive training from
medical experts or child psychologists in such areas as recognizing
physical abuse injuries to children and assessing whether children
present symptoms of self-mutilation or self-harm.
(5) The children's administration shall provide and social workers
in the pilot program are required to participate in other courses of
advanced training, in such areas as advanced critical thinking,
analysis, and techniques for combating confirmatory bias. For the
purposes of this section, "confirmatory bias" means the inclination to
emphasize evidence that tends to support a preexisting conclusion,
rather than continuing to objectively analyze new evidence.
(6) All social workers who participate in the intensive child
protective services training program shall show measurable proficiency
in tools and skills that are the objective of the training, in a manner
that can be established by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall begin
evaluating the intensive child protective services training pilot
program at least by December 30, 2007, and make a report to the
legislature by December 30, 2009.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall design
its evaluation of the intensive child protective services training
pilot program to determine if the pilot program:
(a) Produces more efficient investigations, with reports being
completed more quickly;
(b) Enhances staff morale and staff retention, as compared to other
field offices;
(c) Generates higher quality reports, with documented evidence that
clearly supports findings of abuse or neglect;
(d) Reduces the number of child abuse and neglect allegations
involving the same children and families;
(e) Reduces the number of continuances or delays in court
proceedings; or
(f) Reduces the number of dependency petitions that are dismissed
because there is insufficient evidence or there are problems with case
investigations or documentation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Sections 1 through 3 of this act expire
July 1, 2009.
(2) Section 4 of this act expires July 1, 2010.

--- END ---