BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.59 RCW
to read as follows:
Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the Washington traffic safety commission shall
implement a public awareness campaign educating the public about the
requirements for securing vehicle loads on public highways, and
applicable penalties for violating these requirements, under RCW
46.61.655. As part of the campaign, the commission shall administer a
grant program providing funding to the state and local governments to
post signs along roadways visible to drivers indicating the
requirements under RCW 46.61.655. If feasible, and under conditions
safe to the driving public, the signs should also indicate the
applicable penalties for violating RCW 46.61.655. At a minimum, the
signs must read: "State Law: Vehicles must secure all loads."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of two hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2009, from the motor vehicle fund to the Washington
traffic safety commission for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---