BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.82.420 and 2006 c 219 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The advisory committee shall consult with the department in the
development and maintenance of a basic minimum required curriculum and
the department shall furnish to each qualifying applicant for an
instructor's license or a driver training school license a copy of such
curriculum.
(2) In addition to information on the safe, lawful, and responsible
operation of motor vehicles on the state's highways, the basic minimum
required curriculum shall include information on:
(a) Intermediate driver's license issuance, passenger and driving
restrictions and sanctions for violating the restrictions, and the
effect of traffic violations and collisions on the driving privileges;
(b) The effects of alcohol and drug use on motor vehicle operators,
including information on drug and alcohol related traffic injury and
mortality rates in the state of Washington and the current penalties
for driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol; ((and))
(c) Motorcycle awareness, approved by the Motorcycle Safety
Foundation, to ensure new operators of motor vehicles have been
instructed in the importance of safely sharing the road with
motorcyclists; and
(d) The requirements for securing vehicle loads on public highways,
and applicable penalties for violating these requirements, under RCW
46.61.655, to ensure that new drivers have been instructed in the
dangers of improperly securing vehicle loads and the importance of
complying with this particular rule of the road.
(3) Should the director be presented with acceptable proof that any
licensed instructor or driver training school is not showing proper
diligence in teaching such basic minimum curriculum as required, the
instructor or school shall be required to appear before the advisory
committee and show cause why the license of the instructor or school
should not be revoked for such negligence. If the committee does not
accept such reasons as may be offered, the director may revoke the
license of the instructor or school, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.220
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall include information
on the requirements for securing vehicle loads on public highways, and
applicable penalties for violating these requirements, under RCW
46.61.655, in instructional materials used in traffic safety education
courses, to ensure that new drivers have been instructed in the dangers
of improperly securing vehicle loads and the importance of complying
with this particular rule of the road.

--- END ---