BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.34.020 and 2005 c 57 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is required by
the context:
(1) "Open space land" means (a) any land area so designated by an
official comprehensive land use plan adopted by any city or county and
zoned accordingly, or (b) any land area, the preservation of which in
its present use would (i) conserve and enhance natural or scenic
resources, or (ii) protect streams or water supply, or (iii) promote
conservation of soils, wetlands, beaches ((or)), tidal marshes, or
wildlife habitats, or (iv) enhance the value to the public of abutting
or neighboring parks, forests, wildlife preserves, nature reservations
or sanctuaries or other open space, or (v) enhance recreation
opportunities, or (vi) preserve historic sites, or (vii) preserve
visual quality along highway, road, and street corridors or scenic
vistas, or (viii) retain in its natural state tracts of land not less
than one acre situated in an urban area and open to public use on such
conditions as may be reasonably required by the legislative body
granting the open space classification, or (c) any land meeting the
definition of farm and agricultural conservation land under subsection
(8) of this section. As a condition of granting open space
classification, the legislative body may not require public access on
land classified under (b)(iii) of this subsection for the purpose of
promoting conservation of wetlands or wildlife habitats.
(2) "Farm and agricultural land" means:
(a) Any parcel of land that is twenty or more acres or multiple
parcels of land that are contiguous and total twenty or more acres:
(i) Devoted primarily to the production of livestock or
agricultural commodities for commercial purposes;
(ii) Enrolled in the federal conservation reserve program or its
successor administered by the United States department of agriculture;
or
(iii) Other similar commercial activities as may be established by
rule;
(b)(i) Any parcel of land that is five acres or more but less than
twenty acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses, which has produced
a gross income from agricultural uses equivalent to, as of January 1,
1993:
(A) One hundred dollars or more per acre per year for three of the
five calendar years preceding the date of application for
classification under this chapter for all parcels of land that are
classified under this subsection or all parcels of land for which an
application for classification under this subsection is made with the
granting authority prior to January 1, 1993; and
(B) On or after January 1, 1993, two hundred dollars or more per
acre per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date
of application for classification under this chapter;
(ii) For the purposes of (b)(i) of this subsection, "gross income
from agricultural uses" includes, but is not limited to, the wholesale
value of agricultural products donated to nonprofit food banks or
feeding programs;
(c) Any parcel of land of less than five acres devoted primarily to
agricultural uses which has produced a gross income as of January 1,
1993, of:
(i) One thousand dollars or more per year for three of the five
calendar years preceding the date of application for classification
under this chapter for all parcels of land that are classified under
this subsection or all parcels of land for which an application for
classification under this subsection is made with the granting
authority prior to January 1, 1993; and
(ii) On or after January 1, 1993, fifteen hundred dollars or more
per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date of
application for classification under this chapter.
Parcels of land described in (b)(i)(A) and (c)(i) of this subsection
shall, upon any transfer of the property excluding a transfer to a
surviving spouse, be subject to the limits of (b)(i)(B) and (c)(ii) of
this subsection;
(d) Any lands including incidental uses as are compatible with
agricultural purposes, including wetlands preservation, provided such
incidental use does not exceed twenty percent of the classified land
and the land on which appurtenances necessary to the production,
preparation, or sale of the agricultural products exist in conjunction
with the lands producing such products. Agricultural lands shall also
include any parcel of land of one to five acres, which is not
contiguous, but which otherwise constitutes an integral part of farming
operations being conducted on land qualifying under this section as
"farm and agricultural lands"; or
(e) The land on which housing for employees and the principal place
of residence of the farm operator or owner of land classified pursuant
to (a) of this subsection is sited if: The housing or residence is on
or contiguous to the classified parcel; and the use of the housing or
the residence is integral to the use of the classified land for
agricultural purposes.
(3) "Timber land" means any parcel of land that is five or more
acres or multiple parcels of land that are contiguous and total five or
more acres which is or are devoted primarily to the growth and harvest
of timber for commercial purposes. Timber land means the land only and
does not include a residential homesite. The term includes land used
for incidental uses that are compatible with the growing and harvesting
of timber but no more than ten percent of the land may be used for such
incidental uses. It also includes the land on which appurtenances
necessary for the production, preparation, or sale of the timber
products exist in conjunction with land producing these products.
(4) "Current" or "currently" means as of the date on which property
is to be listed and valued by the assessor.
(5) "Owner" means the party or parties having the fee interest in
land, except that where land is subject to real estate contract "owner"
shall mean the contract vendee.
(6) "Contiguous" means land adjoining and touching other property
held by the same ownership. Land divided by a public road, but
otherwise an integral part of a farming operation, shall be considered
contiguous.
(7) "Granting authority" means the appropriate agency or official
who acts on an application for classification of land pursuant to this
chapter.
(8) "Farm and agricultural conservation land" means either:
(a) Land that was previously classified under subsection (2) of
this section, that no longer meets the criteria of subsection (2) of
this section, and that is reclassified under subsection (1) of this
section; or
(b) Land that is traditional farmland that is not classified under
chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW, that has not been irrevocably devoted to a
use inconsistent with agricultural uses, and that has a high potential
for returning to commercial agriculture.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.34.030 and 1989 c 378 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
An owner of agricultural land desiring current use classification
under subsection (2) of RCW 84.34.020 shall make application to the
county assessor upon forms prepared by the state department of revenue
and supplied by the county assessor. An owner of open space or timber
land desiring current use classification under subsections (1) and (3)
of RCW 84.34.020 shall make application to the county legislative
authority upon forms prepared by the state department of revenue and
supplied by the county assessor. The application shall be accompanied
by a reasonable processing fee if such processing fee is established by
the city or county legislative authority. ((Said)) The county
legislative authority may not impose a processing fee when the owner of
farm and agricultural land classified under RCW 84.34.020(2) applies
for reclassification under RCW 84.34.020(1)(b)(iii). The application
shall require only such information reasonably necessary to properly
classify an area of land under this chapter with a notarized
verification of the truth thereof and shall include a statement that
the applicant is aware of the potential tax liability involved when
such land ceases to be designated as open space, farm and agricultural
or timber land. Applications must be made during the calendar year
preceding that in which such classification is to begin. The assessor
shall make necessary information, including copies of this chapter and
applicable regulations, readily available to interested parties, and
shall render reasonable assistance to such parties upon request.

--- END ---