BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The director of agriculture shall
reactivate the cattle advisory committee convened under chapter 150,
Laws of 2006, composed of the same representatives from the various
segments of the cattle industry as the original committee. The scope
of the cattle advisory committee's activities is limited to bovines and
does not extend to other species of livestock.
(2) The cattle advisory committee shall complete its evaluation of
the voluntary national animal identification program and the approaches
being taken by other states, and complete its evaluation of
demonstration projects that the department of agriculture is conducting
at two or more facilities that handle large numbers of cattle. The
cattle advisory committee shall make a recommendation on how the
voluntary federal program for bovines should be implemented in
Washington that includes recommended funding amounts and sources. In
developing a funding proposal, the cattle advisory committee shall
consult with the office of financial management.
(3) The department of agriculture shall submit a final written
report of the activities and recommendations of the cattle advisory
committee to appropriate committees of the house of representatives and
the senate by December 1, 2007.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2008.

--- END ---