BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.310.080 and 2006 c 263 s 602 are each amended to
read as follows:
Not later than the twenty-fifth day of August of every ((even-numbered)) odd-numbered year, the superintendent of public instruction
shall call an election to be held in each educational service district
within which resides a member of the board of the educational service
district whose term of office expires on the second Monday of January
next following, and shall give written notice thereof to each member of
the board of directors of each school district in such educational
service district. Such notice shall include instructions and rules
established by the superintendent of public instruction for the conduct
of the election.

--- END ---