BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 MATHEMATICS AND SCIENCE INSTRUCTIONAL COACH
PROJECT. (1) A mathematics and science instructional coach
demonstration project is authorized to develop, pilot, and refine
program elements as a first step in the creation of a new instructional
staff professional development program. The mathematics and science
instructional coach demonstration project coaching program shall
consist of a coach development institute, coaching seminars, coaching
activities in schools, and program evaluation.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop a mathematics and science instructional coach program that
includes an initial coach development experience for new coaches
provided through an institute setting, coaching support seminars, and
additional coach development services. The office shall draw upon the
experiences of coaches in federally supported elementary literacy
programs and other successful programs, research and policy briefs on
adult professional development, and research that specifically
addresses the instructional environments of middle, junior high, and
high schools as well as the unique aspects of the fields of mathematics
and science.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
design the application process and select the demonstration project
participants.
(4) Schools and school districts participating in the demonstration
project shall carefully select the individuals to perform the role of
mathematics or science instructional coach. Characteristics to be
considered for a successful coach include:
(a) Expertise in content area;
(b) Expertise in various instructional methodologies and
personalizing learning;
(c) Personal skills that include skilled listening, questioning,
trust-building, and problem-solving;
(d) Understanding and appreciation for the differences in adult
learners and student learners; and
(e) Capacity for strategic planning and quality program
implementation.
(5) The role of the mathematics or science instructional coach is
focused on supporting teachers as they apply knowledge, develop skills,
polish techniques, and deepen their understanding of content and
instructional practices. This work takes a number of forms including:
Individualized professional development, department-wide and school-wide professional development, guidance in student data interpretation,
and using assessment to guide instruction. Each coach shall be
assigned to two schools as part of this project.
(6) Project participants have the following responsibilities:
(a) Mathematics and science coaches shall participate in the coach
development institute as well as in coaching support seminars that take
place throughout the school year, practice coaching activities as
guided by those articulated in the role of the coach in subsection (5)
of this section, collect data, and participate in program evaluation
activities as requested by the institute pursuant to subsection (7) of
this section.
(b) School and district administrators in districts in which the
mathematics and science coaches are practicing shall participate in
program evaluation activities.
(7)(a) The Washington state institute for public policy shall
conduct an evaluation of the mathematics and science instructional
coach demonstration project in this section. Data shall be collected
through various instruments including surveys, program and activity
reports, student performance measures, observations, interviews, and
other processes. Findings shall include an evaluation of the coach
development institute, coaching support seminars, and other coach
support activities; recommendations with regard to changes in the
characteristics required of the coaches; identification of changes in
teacher instruction related to coaching activities; and identification
of the satisfaction level with coaching activities as experienced by
classroom teachers and administrators.
(b) The institute for public policy shall report its findings to
the governor, the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
and the education and fiscal committees of the legislature. An interim
report is due November 1, 2008. The final report is due December 1,
2009.
(8) This section expires September 1, 2010.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.660.005 and 2001 c 158 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds and declares:
(((1))) (a) Teacher qualifications and effectiveness are the most
important influences on student learning in schools((.));
(((2))) (b) Preparation of individuals to become well-qualified,
effective teachers must be high quality((.));
(((3))) (c) Teachers who complete high-quality alternative route
programs with intensive field-based experience, adequate coursework,
and strong mentorship do as well or better than teachers who complete
traditional preparation programs((.));
(((4))) (d) High-quality alternative route programs can provide
more flexibility and expedience for individuals to transition from
their current career to teaching((.));
(((5))) (e) High-quality alternative route programs can help school
districts fill subject matter shortage areas and areas with shortages
due to geographic location((.));
(((6))) (f) Regardless of route, all candidates for residency
teacher certification must meet the high standards required by the
state; and
(g) Teachers need an adequate background in subject matter content
if they are to teach it well, and should hold full, appropriate
credentials in those subject areas.
(2) The legislature recognizes widespread concerns about the
potential for teacher shortages and finds that classified instructional
staff in public schools, current certificated staff, and unemployed
certificate holders represent a great untapped resource for recruiting
((the)) more teachers ((of the future)) in critical shortage areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.660
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program
is created. Participation is limited to paraeducators without a
college degree who have at least three years of classroom experience.
It is anticipated that candidates enrolled in this program will
complete their associate of arts degree at a community and technical
college in two years or less and become eligible for a mathematics,
special education, or English as a second language endorsement via
route one in the alternative routes to teacher certification program
provided in this chapter.
(2) Entry requirements for candidates include district or building
validation of qualifications, including three years of successful
student interaction and leadership as a classified instructional
employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.660
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The retooling to teach mathematics and science conditional
scholarship program is created. Participation is limited to current K-12 teachers and individuals having an elementary education certificate
but who are not employed in positions requiring an elementary education
certificate. It is anticipated that candidates enrolled in this
program will complete the requirements for a mathematics or science
endorsement, or both, in two years or less.
(2) Entry requirements for candidates include current K-12 teachers
pursuing a middle level mathematics or science endorsement, or
secondary mathematics or science endorsement.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.660.050 and 2004 c 23 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((alternative route)) conditional scholarship programs ((is))
in this chapter are created under the following guidelines:
(1) The programs shall be administered by the higher education
coordinating board. In administering the programs, the higher
education coordinating board has the following powers and duties:
(a) To adopt necessary rules and develop guidelines to administer
the programs;
(b) To collect and manage repayments from participants who do not
meet their service obligations; and
(c) To accept grants and donations from public and private sources
for the programs.
(2) Requirements for participation in the ((alternative route))
conditional scholarship programs are as provided in this subsection
(2).
(a) The alternative route conditional scholarship program is
limited to interns of the partnership grant programs under RCW
28A.660.040. In order to receive conditional scholarship awards,
recipients shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment in alternative
certification routes through the partnership grant program;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of
the alternative route certification program and receipt of a residency
teaching certificate; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed eight thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees,
and educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation
for the alternative route certification program in which the recipient
is enrolled. The board may adjust the annual award by the average rate
of resident undergraduate tuition and fee increases at the state
universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(b) The pipeline for paraeducators conditional scholarship program
is limited to qualified paraeducators as provided by section 4 of this
act. In order to receive conditional scholarship awards, recipients
shall:
(i) Be accepted and maintain enrollment at a community and
technical college for no more than two years and attain an associate of
arts degree;
(ii) Continue to make satisfactory progress toward completion of an
associate of arts degree. This progress requirement is a condition for
eligibility into a route one program of the alternative routes to
teacher certification program for a mathematics, special education, or
English as a second language endorsement; and
(iii) Receive no more than the annual amount of the scholarship,
not to exceed four thousand dollars, for the cost of tuition, fees, and
educational expenses, including books, supplies, and transportation for
the alternative route certification program in which the recipient is
enrolled. The board may adjust the annual award by the average rate of
tuition and fee increases at the state community and technical
colleges.
(c) The retooling to teach mathematics and science conditional
scholarship program is limited to current K-12 teachers and individuals
having an elementary education certificate but who are not employed in
positions requiring an elementary education certificate as provided by
section 5 of this act. In order to receive conditional scholarship
awards:
(i) Individuals currently employed as teachers shall pursue a
middle level mathematics or science, or secondary mathematics or
science endorsement; or
(ii) Individuals who are certificated with an elementary education
endorsement, but not employed in positions requiring an elementary
education certificate, shall pursue an endorsement in middle level
mathematics or science, or both; and
(iii) Individuals shall use one of the pathways to endorsement
processes to receive a mathematics or science endorsement, or both,
which shall include passing a mathematics or science endorsement test,
or both tests, plus observation and completing applicable coursework to
attain the proper endorsement; and
(iv) Individuals shall receive no more than the annual amount of
the scholarship, not to exceed three thousand dollars, for the cost of
tuition, test fees, and educational expenses, including books,
supplies, and transportation for the endorsement pathway being pursued.
(3) The Washington professional educator standards board shall
select ((interns)) individuals to receive conditional scholarships.
(((3) In order to receive conditional scholarship awards,
recipients shall be accepted and maintain enrollment in alternative
certification routes through the partnership grant program, as provided
in RCW 28A.660.040. Recipients must continue to make satisfactory
progress towards completion of the alternative route certification
program and receipt of a residency teaching certificate.))
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, a conditional scholarship is
a loan that is forgiven in whole or in part in exchange for service as
a certificated teacher employed in a Washington state K-12 public
school. The state shall forgive one year of loan obligation for every
two years a recipient teaches in a public school. Recipients ((that))
who fail to continue a course of study leading to residency teacher
certification or cease to teach in a public school in the state of
Washington in their endorsement area are required to repay the
remaining loan principal with interest.
(5) Recipients who fail to fulfill the required teaching obligation
are required to repay the remaining loan principal with interest and
any other applicable fees. The higher education coordinating board
shall adopt rules to define the terms for repayment, including
applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.
(6) ((To the extent funds are appropriated for this specific
purpose, the annual amount of the scholarship is the annual cost of
tuition; fees; and educational expenses, including books, supplies, and
transportation for the alternative route certification program in which
the recipient is enrolled, not to exceed eight thousand dollars. The
board may adjust the annual award by the average rate of resident
undergraduate tuition and fee increases at the state universities as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(7))) The higher education coordinating board may deposit all
appropriations, collections, and any other funds received for the
program in this chapter in the ((student loan)) future teachers
conditional scholarship account authorized in RCW ((28B.102.060))
28B.102.080.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.102.080 and 2004 c 58 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The future teachers conditional scholarship account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures of funds from the account. The account is
not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW except for
moneys used for program administration.
(2) The board shall deposit in the account all moneys received for
the future teachers conditional scholarship and loan repayment program
and for conditional loan programs under chapter 28A.660 RCW. The
account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds appropriated by
the legislature for the future teachers conditional scholarship and
loan repayment program, private contributions to the program, ((and))
receipts from participant repayments from the future teachers
conditional scholarship and loan repayment program, and conditional
loan programs established under chapter 28A.660 RCW. Beginning July 1,
2004, the board shall also deposit into the account: (a) All funds
from the institution of higher education loan account that are
traceable to any conditional scholarship program for teachers or
prospective teachers established by the legislature before June 10,
2004; and (b) all amounts repaid by individuals under any such program.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for
conditional loans and loan repayments to participants in the future
teachers conditional scholarship and loan repayment program established
by this chapter, conditional scholarships for participants in programs
established in chapter 28A.660 RCW, and costs associated with program
administration by the board.
(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the
authorization of the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The legislature finds that knowledge,
skills, and opportunities in mathematics, science, and technology
should be increased for all students in Washington. The legislature
intends to foster capacity between and among the educational sectors to
enable continuous and sustainable growth of the learning and teaching
of mathematics, science, and technologies. The legislature intends to
foster high quality mathematics, science, and technology programs to
increase the number of students in the kindergarten through twelfth
grade pipeline who are prepared and aspire to continue in the areas of
mathematics, science, and technology, whether it be at a college,
university, or in the workforce.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.230.130 and 2003 c 49 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program,
directly or in cooperation with a community college or another school
district, for students whose educational plans include application for
entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a
high school diploma. The program shall help these students to meet at
least the minimum entrance requirements under RCW 28B.10.050.
(2) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program,
directly or in cooperation with a community or technical college, a
skills center, an apprenticeship committee, or another school district,
for students who plan to pursue career or work opportunities other than
entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a
high school diploma. These programs may:
(a) Help students demonstrate the application of essential academic
learning requirements to the world of work, occupation-specific skills,
knowledge of more than one career in a chosen pathway, and
employability and leadership skills; and
(b) Help students demonstrate the knowledge and skill needed to
prepare for industry certification, and/or have the opportunity to
articulate to postsecondary education and training programs.
(3) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, a middle
school that receives approval from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to provide a career and technical program directly
to students shall receive funding at the same rate as a high school
operating a similar program. Additionally, a middle school that
provides a hands-on experience in math and science with an integrated
curriculum of academic content and career and technical education, and
includes a career and technical education exploratory component shall
also qualify for the career and technical education funding.
(4) The state board of education, upon request from local school
districts, may grant waivers from the requirements to provide the
program described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section for
reasons relating to school district size and the availability of staff
authorized to teach subjects which must be provided. In considering
waiver requests related to programs in subsection (2) of this section,
the state board of education shall consider the extent to which the
school district has offered such programs before the 2003-04 school
year.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.230.130 and 2006 c 263 s 407 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program,
directly or in cooperation with a community college or another school
district, for students whose educational plans include application for
entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a
high school diploma. The program shall help these students to meet at
least the minimum entrance requirements under RCW 28B.10.050.
(2) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program,
directly or in cooperation with a community or technical college, a
skills center, an apprenticeship committee, or another school district,
for students who plan to pursue career or work opportunities other than
entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a
high school diploma. These programs may:
(a) Help students demonstrate the application of essential academic
learning requirements to the world of work, occupation-specific skills,
knowledge of more than one career in a chosen pathway, and
employability and leadership skills; and
(b) Help students demonstrate the knowledge and skill needed to
prepare for industry certification, and/or have the opportunity to
articulate to postsecondary education and training programs.
(3) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, a middle
school that receives approval from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to provide a career and technical program directly
to students shall receive funding at the same rate as a high school
operating a similar program. Additionally, a middle school that
provides a hands-on experience in math and science with an integrated
curriculum of academic content and career and technical education, and
includes a career and technical education exploratory component shall
also qualify for the career and technical education funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall provide support for
statewide coordination for math, science, and technology, including
employing a statewide director for math, science, and technology. The
duties of the director shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, obtain a
statewide license, or otherwise obtain and disseminate, an interactive,
project-based high school and middle school technology curriculum that
includes a comprehensive professional development component for
teachers and, if possible, counselors, and also includes a systematic
program evaluation. The curriculum must be distributed to all school
districts, or as many as feasible, by the 2007-08 school year;
(2) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, supporting a
public-private partnership to assist school districts with implementing
an ongoing, inquiry-based science program that is based on a research-based model of systemic reform and aligned with the Washington state
science grade level expectations;
(3) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, supporting a
public-private partnership to provide enriching opportunities in
mathematics, engineering, and science for underrepresented students in
grades kindergarten through twelve using exemplary materials and
instructional approaches;
(4) In an effort to increase precollege and prework interest in
math, science, and technology fields, in collaboration with the
community and technical colleges, the four-year institutions of higher
education, and the workforce training and education coordinating board,
conducting outreach efforts to attract middle and high school students
to careers in math, science, and technology and to educate students
about the coursework that is necessary to be adequately prepared to
succeed in these fields;
(5) Coordinating youth opportunities in math, science, and
technology, including facilitating student participation in school
clubs, state-level fairs, national competitions, and encouraging
partnerships between students and university faculty or industry to
facilitate such student participation;
(6) Developing and maintaining public-private partnerships to
generate business and industry assistance to accomplish the following:
(a) Increasing student engagement and career awareness, including
increasing student participation in the youth opportunities in
subsection (5) of this section;
(b) Creation and promotion of student scholarships, internships,
and apprenticeships;
(c) Provision of relevant teacher experience and training,
including on-the-job professional development opportunities;
(d) Upgrading kindergarten through twelfth grade school equipment
and facilities to support high quality math, science, and technology
programs;
(7) Assembling a cadre of inspiring speakers employed or
experienced in the relevant fields to speak to kindergarten through
twelfth grade students to demonstrate the breadth of the opportunities
in the relevant fields as well as share the types of coursework that is
necessary for someone to be successful in the relevant field;
(8) Providing technical assistance to schools and school districts,
including working with counselors in support of the math, science, and
technology programs; and
(9) Reporting annually to the legislature about the actions taken
to provide statewide coordination for math, science, and technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, by December 1,
2008, the superintendent of public instruction shall develop essential
academic learning requirements and grade level expectations for
educational technology literacy and technology fluency that identify
the knowledge and skills that all public school students need to know
and be able to do in the areas of technology and technology literacy.
The development process shall include a review of current standards
that have been developed or are used by other states and national and
international technology associations. To the maximum extent possible,
the superintendent shall integrate goal four and the knowledge and
skill areas in the other goals in the technology essential academic
learning requirements.
(a) As used in this section, "technology literacy" means the
ability to responsibly, creatively, and effectively use appropriate
technology to communicate; access, collect, manage, integrate, and
evaluate information; solve problems and create solutions; build and
share knowledge; and improve and enhance learning in all subject areas
and experiences.
(b) Technology fluency builds upon technology literacy and is
demonstrated when students: Apply technology to real-world
experiences; adapt to changing technologies; modify current and create
new technologies; and personalize technology to meet personal needs,
interests, and learning styles.
(2)(a) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, the
superintendent shall obtain or develop education technology assessments
that may be administered in the elementary, middle, and high school
grades to assess the essential academic learning requirements for
technology. The assessments shall be designed to be classroom or
project-based so that they can be embedded in classroom instruction and
be administered and scored by school staff throughout the regular
school year using consistent scoring criteria and procedures. By the
2010-11 school year, these assessments shall be made available to
school districts for the districts' voluntary use. If a school
district uses the assessments created under this section, then the
school district shall notify the superintendent of public instruction
of the use. The superintendent shall report annually to the
legislature on the number of school districts that use the assessments
each school year.
(b) Beginning December 1, 2010, and annually thereafter, the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide a report to the
relevant legislative committees regarding the use of the assessments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76
RCW to read as follows:
As part of the state needs assessment process conducted by the
board in accordance with RCW 28B.76.230, the board shall assess the
need for additional baccalaureate degree programs in Washington that
specialize in teacher preparation in mathematics, science, and
technology. If the board determines that there is a need for
additional programs, then the board shall encourage the appropriate
institutions of higher education or institutional sectors to create
such a program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Section 8 of this act expires September 1,
2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Section 9 of this act takes effect
September 1, 2009.

--- END ---