BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that knowledge,
skills, and opportunities in mathematics, science, and technology
should be increased for all students in Washington. The legislature
intends to foster capacity between and among the educational sectors to
enable continuous and sustainable growth of the learning and teaching
of mathematics, science, and technologies. The legislature intends to
foster high quality mathematics, science, and technology programs to
increase the number of students in the kindergarten through twelfth
grade pipeline who are prepared and aspire to continue in the areas of
mathematics, science, and technology, whether it be at a college,
university, or in the workforce.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.130 and 2003 c 49 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program,
directly or in cooperation with a community college or another school
district, for students whose educational plans include application for
entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a
high school diploma. The program shall help these students to meet at
least the minimum entrance requirements under RCW 28B.10.050.
(2) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program,
directly or in cooperation with a community or technical college, a
skills center, an apprenticeship committee, or another school district,
for students who plan to pursue career or work opportunities other than
entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a
high school diploma. These programs may:
(a) Help students demonstrate the application of essential academic
learning requirements to the world of work, occupation-specific skills,
knowledge of more than one career in a chosen pathway, and
employability and leadership skills; and
(b) Help students demonstrate the knowledge and skill needed to
prepare for industry certification, and/or have the opportunity to
articulate to postsecondary education and training programs.
(3) A middle school that receives approval from the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to provide a career and technical
program directly to students shall receive funding at the same rate as
a high school operating a similar program. Additionally, a middle
school that provides a hands-on experience in math and science with an
integrated curriculum of academic content and career and technical
education, and includes a career and technical education exploratory
component shall also qualify for the career and technical education
funding.
(4) The state board of education, upon request from local school
districts, may grant waivers from the requirements to provide the
program described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section for
reasons relating to school district size and the availability of staff
authorized to teach subjects which must be provided. In considering
waiver requests related to programs in subsection (2) of this section,
the state board of education shall consider the extent to which the
school district has offered such programs before the 2003-04 school
year.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.230.130 and 2006 c 263 s 407 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program,
directly or in cooperation with a community college or another school
district, for students whose educational plans include application for
entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a
high school diploma. The program shall help these students to meet at
least the minimum entrance requirements under RCW 28B.10.050.
(2) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program,
directly or in cooperation with a community or technical college, a
skills center, an apprenticeship committee, or another school district,
for students who plan to pursue career or work opportunities other than
entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a
high school diploma. These programs may:
(a) Help students demonstrate the application of essential academic
learning requirements to the world of work, occupation-specific skills,
knowledge of more than one career in a chosen pathway, and
employability and leadership skills; and
(b) Help students demonstrate the knowledge and skill needed to
prepare for industry certification, and/or have the opportunity to
articulate to postsecondary education and training programs.
(3) A middle school that receives approval from the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to provide a career and technical
program directly to students shall receive funding at the same rate as
a high school operating a similar program. Additionally, a middle
school that provides a hands-on experience in math and science with an
integrated curriculum of academic content and career and technical
education, and includes a career and technical education exploratory
component shall also qualify for the career and technical education
funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall provide support for
statewide coordination for math, science, and technology, including
employing a statewide director for math, science, and technology. The
duties of the director shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Subject to the availability of funds, obtain a statewide
license, or otherwise obtain and disseminate, an interactive, project-based high school and middle school technology curriculum that includes
a comprehensive professional development component for teachers and, if
possible, counselors, and also includes a systematic program
evaluation. The curriculum must be distributed to all school
districts, or as many as feasible, by the 2007-08 school year;
(2) Subject to available funds, supporting a public-private
partnership to assist school districts with implementing an ongoing,
inquiry-based science program that is based on a research-based model
of systemic reform and aligned with the Washington state science grade
level expectations;
(3) Subject to available funds, supporting a public-private
partnership to provide enriching opportunities in mathematics,
engineering, and science for underrepresented students in grades
kindergarten through twelve using exemplary materials and instructional
approaches;
(4) In an effort to increase precollege and prework interest in
math, science, and technology fields, in collaboration with the
community and technical colleges, the four-year institutions of higher
education, and the workforce training and education coordinating board,
conducting outreach efforts to attract middle and high school students
to careers in math, science, and technology and to educate students
about the coursework that is necessary to be adequately prepared to
succeed in these fields;
(5) Coordinating youth opportunities in math, science, and
technology, including facilitating student participation in school
clubs, state-level fairs, national competitions, and encouraging
partnerships between students and university faculty or industry to
facilitate such student participation;
(6) Developing and maintaining public-private partnerships to
generate business and industry assistance to accomplish the following:
(a) Increasing student engagement and career awareness, including
increasing student participation in the youth opportunities in
subsection (5) of this section;
(b) Creation and promotion of student scholarships, internships,
and apprenticeships;
(c) Provision of relevant teacher experience and training,
including on-the-job professional development opportunities;
(d) Upgrading kindergarten through twelfth grade school equipment
and facilities to support high quality math, science, and technology
programs;
(7) Assembling a cadre of inspiring speakers employed or
experienced in the relevant fields to speak to kindergarten through
twelfth grade students to demonstrate the breadth of the opportunities
in the relevant fields as well as share the types of coursework that is
necessary for someone to be successful in the relevant field;
(8) Providing technical assistance to schools and school districts,
including working with counselors in support of the math, science, and
technology programs; and
(9) Reporting annually to the legislature about the actions taken
to provide statewide coordination for math, science, and technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to available funding, by December 1, 2008, the
superintendent of public instruction shall develop essential academic
learning requirements and grade level expectations for educational
technology literacy and technology fluency that identify the knowledge
and skills that all public school students need to know and be able to
do in the areas of technology and technology literacy. The development
process shall include a review of current standards that have been
developed or are used by other states and national and international
technology associations. To the maximum extent possible, the
superintendent shall integrate goal four and the knowledge and skill
areas in the other goals in the technology essential academic learning
requirements.
(a) As used in this section, "technology literacy" means the
ability to responsibly, creatively, and effectively use appropriate
technology to communicate; access, collect, manage, integrate, and
evaluate information; solve problems and create solutions; build and
share knowledge; and improve and enhance learning in all subject areas
and experiences.
(b) Technology fluency builds upon technology literacy and is
demonstrated when students: Apply technology to real-world
experiences; adapt to changing technologies; modify current and create
new technologies; and personalize technology to meet personal needs,
interests, and learning styles.
(2)(a) Subject to available funding, the superintendent shall
obtain or develop education technology assessments that may be
administered in the elementary, middle, and high school grades to
assess the essential academic learning requirements for technology.
The assessments shall be designed to be classroom or project-based so
that they can be embedded in classroom instruction and be administered
and scored by school staff throughout the regular school year using
consistent scoring criteria and procedures. By the 2010-11 school
year, these assessments shall be made available to school districts for
the districts' voluntary use. If a school district uses the
assessments created under this section, then the school district shall
notify the superintendent of public instruction of the use. The
superintendent shall report annually to the legislature on the number
of school districts that use the assessments each school year.
(b) Beginning December 1, 2010, and annually thereafter, the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide a report to the
relevant legislative committees regarding the use of the assessments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
As part of the state needs assessment process conducted by the
board in accordance with RCW 28B.76.230, the board shall assess the
need for additional baccalaureate degree programs in Washington that
specialize in teacher preparation in mathematics, science, and
technology. If the board determines that there is a need for
additional programs, then the board shall encourage the appropriate
institutions of higher education or institutional sectors to create
such a program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 2 of this act expires September 1,
2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 3 of this act takes effect September
1, 2009.

--- END ---