BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As an alternative procedure to RCW 70.44.400, territory within
an incorporated city of less than twenty thousand in population may be
withdrawn from a public hospital district in the following manner and
upon the following conditions: The petition for withdrawal shall be in
writing and shall designate the boundaries of the territory proposed to
be withdrawn from the district and shall be signed by at least fifteen
percent of the qualified voters residing within the territory so
designated who are qualified voters on the date of filing such
petition. The proposed area to be withdrawn must comprise all
residents within an incorporated city.
(2) The petition for withdrawal shall be filed with the county
auditor of each county in which the district is located, and after the
filing no person having signed the petition shall be allowed to
withdraw the person's name therefrom. Within ten days after such
filing, each county auditor shall examine and verify the signatures of
signers residing in the respective county. The petition shall be
transmitted to the auditor of the county in which all or the major
geographic portion of the district is located, who shall certify to the
sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures. If the area proposed
to be withdrawn is located in more than one county, the auditor of the
county in which the largest geographic portion of the area proposed to
be withdrawn is located shall be the lead auditor and shall immediately
transfer a copy of the petitions to the auditor of each other county in
which the area proposed to be withdrawn is located. Within ten days
after the lead auditor received the petition, the auditors of these
other counties shall certify to the lead auditor: (a) The number of
voters of that county residing in the area proposed to be withdrawn who
voted at the last municipal general election; and (b) the number of
valid signatures on the petition of voters of that county residing in
the area proposed to be withdrawn. The lead auditor shall certify the
sufficiency of the petition after receiving this information. If such
petition is found by such county auditor to contain sufficient
signatures, the petition, together with a certificate of sufficiency
attached thereto, shall be transmitted to the board of commissioners of
the district.
(3) Upon receipt by the board of commissioners of a petition and
certificate of sufficiency of the auditor, or if the petition is signed
by landowners and the board of commissioners is satisfied as to the
sufficiency of the signatures, it shall, at a regular or special
meeting, fix a date for a hearing on the petition and give notice that
the petition has been filed, stating the time and place of the meeting
of the board of commissioners at which the petition will be heard and
setting forth the boundaries of the territory proposed to be withdrawn.
The notice shall be published at least once a week for two successive
weeks in a newspaper of general circulation therein, and if no such
newspaper is printed in the county, then in some newspaper of general
circulation in the county and district. Any additional notice of the
hearing may be given as the board of commissioners may by resolution
direct.
(4) The petition for withdrawal shall be heard at the time and
place specified in the notice or the hearing may be adjourned from time
to time, not exceeding one month in all, and any person may appear at
the hearing and make objections to the withdrawal of the territory or
to the proposed boundary lines thereof. Upon final hearing on the
petition for withdrawal, the board of commissioners shall make and by
resolution either approve or deny the proposed withdrawal.
(5) Within ten days after the final hearing the board of
commissioners of the district shall transmit to the county legislative
authority of each county in which the district is located the petition
for withdrawal, together with a copy of the resolution of the board of
commissioners of the district certified by the secretary of the
district to be a true and correct copy of such findings and
recommendations as the same appear on the records of the district.
(6) If by resolution the board of commissioners approves a petition
for withdrawal, then the county legislative authority shall by
resolution declare that the territory be withdrawn from that district,
and thereupon the territory shall be withdrawn and excluded from that
district the same as if it had never been included in that district
except for the lien of taxes as hereinafter set forth.
(7) If the resolution of the district board of commissioners denies
the petition for withdrawal, then the county legislative authority of
each county in which the district is located shall by resolution cause
a special election to be held not less than thirty days or more than
sixty days from the date of the final hearing of any county legislative
authority upon the petition for withdrawal, at which election the
proposition expressed on the ballots shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall the territory established and defined by the district board
of commissioners at its meeting held on the. . . . . . (insert date of
final hearing of district board of commissioners upon the petition for
withdrawal) be withdrawn from district. . . . . . (naming it).

Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"

--- END ---