BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
The state board of education shall be comprised of two nonpartisan
members from each congressional district of the state, not including
any congressional district at large, elected by the voters of each
congressional district in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
(1) If any new and additional congressional district is created,
except a congressional district at large, two persons shall be elected
at the next general election at which state board of education members
are elected to serve as members of the state board of education. At
the first such election one member of the state board of education
shall be elected for a term of four years.
(2) The terms of office of members of the state board of education
who are elected from the various congressional districts shall not be
affected by the creation of either new or new and additional districts.
In such an event, each board member may continue to serve in office for
the balance of the term for which he or she was elected or appointed:
PROVIDED, That the board member continues to reside within the
boundaries of the congressional district as they existed at the time of
his or her election or appointment. Vacancies that occur in a board
member position during the balance of any such term shall be filled
under section 3 of this act by a successor who resides within the
boundaries of the congressional district from which the member whose
office was vacated was elected as they existed at the time of his or
her election. At the election immediately preceding expiration of the
term of office of each board member provided for in this subsection
following the creation of either new or new and additional
congressional districts, and thereafter, a successor shall be elected
from the congressional district that corresponds in number with the
congressional district from which the incumbent was appointed or
elected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
If there is a vacancy upon the state board of education, from any
cause whatever, it is the duty of the remaining members of the board to
fill that vacancy by appointment, and the person appointed continues in
office until his or her successor has been elected and has qualified.
At the next general election following the date of the occurrence of
the vacancy, a successor shall be elected to hold office for the
unexpired term of the member whose office was vacated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
An election shall be held at the general election after the
effective date of this section to elect members to the state board of
education. Members shall take office on the second Monday of January
following the election, on which date the terms of all members of the
state board of education holding office on the effective date of this
section shall expire. Of the initial members elected under this
section, members elected from even-numbered congressional districts
shall serve four-year terms and members elected from odd-numbered
congressional districts shall serve two-year terms. Newly elected
members of the state board of education shall serve until their
successors are elected and qualified. Members who are elected
subsequently shall be elected to four-year terms of office and shall
serve until their successors are elected and qualified and assume
office in accordance with RCW 29A.20.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.305.011 (Board membership -- Terms -- Compensation) and
2006 c 263 s 105 & 2005 c 497 s 101; and
(2) RCW 28A.305.021 (Election of board members -- Restrictions) and
2005 c 497 s 102.

--- END ---