BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that members of the
public are obtaining body art including tattooing and body piercing.
Body art involves procedures where the skin is broken and the chance
for exposure to virus and infection exists. These procedures involve
health risks, some of which are significant because of bloodborne
pathogens contained in blood and other bodily fluids and the exposure
to contaminated waste. Although many providers of body art, including
tattooing and body piercing, maintain sufficient health and safety
standards and use proper techniques that protect and promote public
health and the health and safety of members of the public, others do
not. Currently, members of the public have no way of knowing which
body artists and facilities are fully qualified to perform these
invasive procedures. While significant work has been done by many
providers as a group and individually to develop and implement health
and safety standards, intervention by state and local health
authorities is needed to protect the public's health and safety.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.20.050 and 1993 c 492 s 489 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of health shall provide a forum for the
development of public health policy in Washington state. It is
authorized to recommend to the secretary means for obtaining
appropriate citizen and professional involvement in all public health
policy formulation and other matters related to the powers and duties
of the department. It is further empowered to hold hearings and
explore ways to improve the health status of the citizenry.
(a) At least every five years, the state board shall convene
regional forums to gather citizen input on public health issues.
(b) Every two years, in coordination with the development of the
state biennial budget, the state board shall prepare the state public
health report that outlines the health priorities of the ensuing
biennium. The report shall:
(i) Consider the citizen input gathered at the forums;
(ii) Be developed with the assistance of local health departments;
(iii) Be based on the best available information collected and
reviewed according to RCW 43.70.050 ((and recommendations from the
council));
(iv) Be developed with the input of state health care agencies. At
least the following directors of state agencies shall provide timely
recommendations to the state board on suggested health priorities for
the ensuing biennium: The secretary of social and health services, the
health care authority administrator, the insurance commissioner, the
superintendent of public instruction, the director of labor and
industries, the director of ecology, and the director of agriculture;
(v) Be used by state health care agency administrators in preparing
proposed agency budgets and executive request legislation;
(vi) Be submitted by the state board to the governor by January 1
of each even-numbered year for adoption by the governor. The governor,
no later than March 1 of that year, shall approve, modify, or
disapprove the state public health report.
(c) In fulfilling its responsibilities under this subsection, the
state board may create ad hoc committees or other such committees of
limited duration as necessary.
(2) In order to protect public health, the state board of health
shall:
(a) Adopt rules necessary to assure safe and reliable public
drinking water and to protect the public health. Such rules shall
establish requirements regarding:
(i) The design and construction of public water system facilities,
including proper sizing of pipes and storage for the number and type of
customers;
(ii) Drinking water quality standards, monitoring requirements, and
laboratory certification requirements;
(iii) Public water system management and reporting requirements;
(iv) Public water system planning and emergency response
requirements;
(v) Public water system operation and maintenance requirements;
(vi) Water quality, reliability, and management of existing but
inadequate public water systems; and
(vii) Quality standards for the source or supply, or both source
and supply, of water for bottled water plants.
(b) Adopt rules and standards for prevention, control, and
abatement of health hazards and nuisances related to the disposal of
wastes, solid and liquid, including but not limited to sewage, garbage,
refuse, and other environmental contaminants; adopt standards and
procedures governing the design, construction, and operation of sewage,
garbage, refuse and other solid waste collection, treatment, and
disposal facilities;
(c) Adopt rules controlling public health related to environmental
conditions including but not limited to heating, lighting, ventilation,
sanitary facilities, cleanliness and space in all types of public
facilities including but not limited to food service establishments,
schools, institutions, recreational facilities and transient
accommodations and in places of work;
(d) Adopt rules for the imposition and use of isolation and
quarantine;
(e) Adopt rules for the prevention and control of infectious and
noninfectious diseases, including food and vector borne illness, and
rules governing the receipt and conveyance of remains of deceased
persons, and such other sanitary matters as admit of and may best be
controlled by universal rule; and
(f) Adopt rules for accessing existing data bases for the purposes
of performing health related research.
(3)(a) The state board of health may adopt rules for the purpose of
permitting local health jurisdictions to regulate body art operators
and body art facilities. These rules shall establish requirements
regarding:
(i) Minimum standards for facility cleanliness and education of
body artists;
(ii) Incorporation of national standards as developed by nationally
recognized organizations with extensive expertise in body art;
(iii) Knowledge and practice by operators of universal precautions,
and requirements for sanitation, personal hygiene, sterilization, and
aftercare requirements to prevent transmission of disease;
(iv) Appropriate exemptions for health care practitioners and other
health care personnel performing within their legal scope of practice;
(v) Requirements for disclosure of the health risks, aftercare
requirements, and contacts at the local health department to whom
complaints or inquiries may be addressed to customers or potential
customers of body art.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Body art" means the practice of physical body adornment by
body piercing, tattooing, branding, and scarification. "Body art" does
not include practices that are considered health care procedures, such
as implants under the skin that are within the licensed professionals'
scope of practice;
(ii) "Body art facility" means a place or premise, whether public,
private, temporary, or permanent in nature or location, where the
practices of body art are performed, even if no compensation is
received;
(iii) "Body piercing" means any method of piercing or invading the
skin or mucosa, except an ear lobe, in order to place any object or
forms of jewelry through the skin or mucosa. "Body piercing" does not
include practices that are considered health care procedures, such as
implants under the skin that are within the licensed professionals'
scope of practice;
(iv) "Jewelry" means any object used for personal adornment worn in
or through the body. "Jewelry" used for insertion in the initial (new
or fresh) piercings must be made of implant grade materials; free of
nicks, scratches, or irregular surfaces; and properly sterilized before
insertion. For the purposes of this section, "jewelry" does not
include stud and clasp systems used to pierce the earlobe in accordance
with the manufacturer's directions and applicable United States food
and drug administration requirements;
(v) "Operator" means a person who controls, operates, manages,
conducts, or practices body art activities and who is responsible for
compliance with this chapter, whether or not the person actually
performs body art. "Operator" includes a technician who performs body
art under the direction of an operator; and
(vi) "Tattooing" means any method of placing ink or other pigment
into or under the skin or mucosa, by the aid of needles or any other
instrument used to puncture the skin, resulting in permanent coloration
of the skin or mucosa.
(4) The state board may delegate any of its rule-adopting authority
to the secretary and rescind such delegated authority.
(((4))) (5) All local boards of health, health authorities and
officials, officers of state institutions, police officers, sheriffs,
constables, and all other officers and employees of the state, or any
county, city, or township thereof, shall enforce all rules adopted by
the state board of health. In the event of failure or refusal on the
part of any member of such boards or any other official or person
mentioned in this section to so act, he shall be subject to a fine of
not less than fifty dollars, upon first conviction, and not less than
one hundred dollars upon second conviction.
(((5))) (6) The state board may advise the secretary on health
policy issues pertaining to the department of health and the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The local public health officer, under powers and duties
provided in RCW 70.05.070, may establish a program to regulate body art
operators and body art facilities, based on standards adopted by rule
by the state board of health.
(2) Local public health officers may develop their own standards,
if the standards are not less rigorous than those developed by the
state board of health.
(3) Local public health officers may charge a fee or fees to body
art facilities and artists sufficient to cover the expenses of their
regulatory program under this chapter, but the fee or fees may not be
more than the actual cost of the regulatory program.
(4) Local public health officers that adopt a regulatory program
are encouraged to work with local body artists in promoting public
awareness of the risks of body art and the need to use body artists who
meet at least the minimum standards as set forth in the state board of
health rules.

--- END ---