BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.030 and 1998 c 276 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Dwelling unit" is a structure or that part of a structure
which is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person or
by two or more persons maintaining a common household, including but
not limited to single family residences and units of multiplexes,
apartment buildings, and mobile homes.
(2) "Landlord" means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of the
dwelling unit or the property of which it is a part, and in addition
means any person designated as representative of the landlord.
(3) "Person" means an individual, group of individuals,
corporation, government, or governmental agency, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, or association, two or more persons having
a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(4) "Owner" means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in
whom is vested:
(a) All or any part of the legal title to property; or
(b) All or part of the beneficial ownership, and a right to present
use and enjoyment of the property.
(5) "Premises" means a dwelling unit, appurtenances thereto,
grounds, and facilities held out for the use of tenants generally and
any other area or facility which is held out for use by the tenant.
(6) "Rental agreement" means all agreements which establish or
modify the terms, conditions, rules, regulations, or any other
provisions concerning the use and occupancy of a dwelling unit.
(7) "Section 8 program" means a federal, state, or local government
program in which a tenant's rent is paid partially by a government
program, through a direct contract between the government program and
the landlord, and partially by the tenant.
(8) A "single family residence" is a structure maintained and used
as a single dwelling unit. Notwithstanding that a dwelling unit shares
one or more walls with another dwelling unit, it shall be deemed a
single family residence if it has direct access to a street and shares
neither heating facilities nor hot water equipment, nor any other
essential facility or service, with any other dwelling unit.
(((8))) (9) A "tenant" is any person who is entitled to occupy a
dwelling unit primarily for living or dwelling purposes under a rental
agreement.
(((9))) (10) "Reasonable attorney's fees", where authorized in this
chapter, means an amount to be determined including the following
factors: The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty of
the questions involved, the skill requisite to perform the legal
service properly, the fee customarily charged in the locality for
similar legal services, the amount involved and the results obtained,
and the experience, reputation and ability of the lawyer or lawyers
performing the services.
(((10))) (11) "Gang" means a group that: (a) Consists of three or
more persons; (b) has identifiable leadership or an identifiable name,
sign, or symbol; and (c) on an ongoing basis, regularly conspires and
acts in concert mainly for criminal purposes.
(((11))) (12) "Gang-related activity" means any activity that
occurs within the gang or advances a gang purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a landlord to refuse to negotiate or enter
into a rental agreement with a prospective tenant on the basis that the
prospective tenant participates in a section 8 program.
(2) Any landlord who violates this section may be liable to the
prospective tenant for an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars.
The prevailing party may also recover court costs and reasonable
attorneys' fees.

--- END ---