BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Each school district shall ensure that
students in elementary schools do not have access to foods of minimal
nutritional value except on special occasions or as permitted in
subsection (5) of this section.
(2) Each school district shall ensure that students in middle
schools do not have access to foods of minimal nutritional value except
after school, at events that take place in the evening, and on special
occasions.
(3) Each school district shall ensure that students in high schools
do not have access to foods of minimal nutritional value until one hour
after the last lunch period.
(4) For purposes of this section, "foods of minimal nutritional
value" means any foods so defined in Section 210.11 of Title 7 of the
Code of Federal Regulations and listed in Appendix B of the regulations
for the national school lunch program.
(5) This section shall not be construed to prohibit the sale or
distribution of any food or beverage item through periodic fundraisers
by a student, a teacher, or school group when the item is for sale
after completion of the school day.

--- END ---