BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.182.020 and 1993 c 476 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A consumer reporting agency may furnish a consumer report only
under the following circumstances:
(a) In response to the order of a court having jurisdiction to
issue the order;
(b) In accordance with the written instructions of the consumer to
whom it relates; or
(c) To a person that the agency has reason to believe:
(i) Intends to use the information in connection with a credit
transaction involving the consumer on whom the information is to be
furnished and involving the extension of credit to, or review or
collection of an account of, the consumer;
(ii) Intends to use the information for employment purposes;
(iii) Intends to use the information in connection with the
underwriting of insurance involving the consumer;
(iv) Intends to use the information in connection with a
determination of the consumer's eligibility for a license or other
benefit granted by a governmental instrumentality required by law to
consider an applicant's financial responsibility or status; or
(v) Otherwise has a legitimate business need for the information in
connection with a business transaction involving the consumer.
(2)(a) Subject to (c) of this subsection, a person may not procure
a consumer report, or cause a consumer report to be procured, for
employment purposes with respect to any consumer who is not an employee
at the time the report is procured or caused to be procured unless:
(i) A clear and conspicuous disclosure has been made in writing to
the consumer before the report is procured or caused to be procured
that a consumer report may be obtained for purposes of considering the
consumer for employment. The disclosure may be contained in a written
statement contained in employment application materials; or
(ii) The consumer authorizes the procurement of the report.
(b) A person may not procure a consumer report, or cause a consumer
report to be procured, for employment purposes with respect to any
employee unless the employee has received, at any time after the person
became an employee, written notice that consumer reports may be used
for employment purposes. A written statement that consumer reports may
be used for employment purposes that is contained in employee
guidelines or manuals available to employees or included in written
materials provided to employees constitutes written notice for purposes
of this subsection. This subsection does not apply with respect to a
consumer report of an employee who the employer has reasonable cause to
believe has engaged in specific activity that constitutes a violation
of law.
(c) As applied to (a) and (b) of this subsection, a person may not
procure a consumer report for employment purposes where any information
contained in the report bears on the consumer's credit worthiness,
credit standing, or credit capacity, unless the information is either:
(i) Substantially job related and the employer's reasons for the
use of such information are disclosed to the consumer in writing; or
(ii) Required by law.
(d) In using a consumer report for employment purposes, before
taking any adverse action based in whole or part on the report, a
person shall provide to the consumer to whom the report relates: (i)
The name, address, and telephone number of the consumer reporting
agency providing the report; (ii) a description of the consumer's
rights under this chapter pertaining to consumer reports obtained for
employment purposes; and (iii) a reasonable opportunity to respond to
any information in the report that is disputed by the consumer. This
subsection applies to job applicants and current employees.

--- END ---