BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.121 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the years from birth to three are
critical in building the social, emotional, and cognitive developmental
foundations of a young child. Research into the brain development of
young children reveals that children are born learning. The
legislature also finds that the farther behind children are in their
social, emotional, physical, and cognitive development, the more
difficult it will be for them to catch up. The legislature further
finds that a significant number of children age birth to five years are
born with two or more of the following risk factors and have a greater
chance of failure in school and beyond: Poverty; single or no parent;
no parent employed full time or full year; all parents with disability;
mother without a high school degree; and no parent fluent in English.
The legislature finds that parents and children involved in home
visitation programs exhibit better birth outcomes, enhanced parent and
child interactions, more efficient use of health care services,
enhanced child development, and early detection of developmental
delays, as well as reduced welfare dependence, higher rates of school
completion and job retention, reduction in frequency and severity of
maltreatment, and higher rates of school graduation. The legislature
intends to promote the use of voluntary home visitation services to
families at high risk of child abuse or neglect as an early
intervention strategy to alleviate the effect risk factors have on
child development.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.121.015 and 1988 c 278 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Child" means an unmarried person who is under eighteen years
of age.
(2) "Council" means the Washington council for the prevention of
child abuse and neglect.
(3) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had
multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations
demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for the
population.
(4) "Home visitation" means providing services in the permanent or
temporary residence, or in other familiar surroundings, of the family
receiving such services.
(5) "Primary prevention" of child abuse and neglect means any
effort designed to inhibit or preclude the initial occurrence of child
abuse and neglect, both by the promotion of positive parenting and
family interaction, and the remediation of factors linked to causes of
child maltreatment.
(((4))) (6) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has
some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet
the standard of evidence-based practices.
(7) "Secondary prevention" means services and programs that
identify and assist families under such stress that abuse or neglect is
likely or families display symptoms associated with child abuse or
neglect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.121 RCW
to read as follows:
Within available funds, the council shall fund evidence-based and
research-based programs for home visitation for improving parenting
skills and outcomes for children. Home visitation programs must be
voluntary and must be directed at families at high risk of child abuse
and neglect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 43.70.530 (Home visitor program) and
1998 c 245 s 75 & 1993 c 179 s 2 are each repealed.

--- END ---