BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) A joint legislative task force on
heating, ventilating, air conditioning, and refrigeration is
established, with members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The chair and ranking minority member of the senate economic
development, trade, and management committee;
(ii) The chair and ranking minority member of the house commerce
and labor committee;
(iii) Four members representing the heating, ventilating, air
conditioning, and refrigeration industry, selected from nominations
submitted by statewide business organizations representing a
cross-section of industries and appointed jointly by the president of
the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives; and
(iv) Four members representing labor, selected from nominations
submitted by statewide labor organizations representing a cross-section
of industries and appointed jointly by the president of the senate and
the speaker of the house of representatives.
(b) In addition, the department of labor and industries shall
cooperate with the joint legislative task force and maintain a liaison
representative, who shall be a nonvoting member. The department shall
cooperate with the joint legislative task force and provide information
as the joint legislative task force may reasonably request.
(c) The joint legislative task force shall choose its chair from
among its membership.
(2) The joint legislative task force shall review the following
issues:
(a) Requirements for registering, certifying, or licensing heating,
ventilating, air conditioning, and refrigeration mechanics;
(b) Methods of registering or licensing contractors who qualify for
two or more registrations or licenses;
(c) Establishing at least three levels of HVAC/R mechanics, with
the ability to be certified in several specialities including gas
piping, sheet metal, and refrigeration;
(d) The on-the-job experience requirements for each mechanic level;
(e) The methods by which apprentices and other persons learning to
perform heating, ventilating, air conditioning, and refrigeration work
obtain training certificates;
(f) Exemptions to the registering, certification, or licensing
requirements; and
(g) Such other factors the joint legislative task force deems
necessary.
(3) Legislative members of the joint legislative task force shall
be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
Nonlegislative members, except those representing an employer or
organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The expenses of the joint legislative task force shall be paid
jointly by the senate and the house of representatives.
(5) The joint legislative task force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the legislature by January 1, 2009.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2009.

--- END ---