BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is a matter of
public necessity that forest resources in Washington be managed
properly. It is the intent of the legislature to provide for the
protection and benefit of the public by ensuring application of the
highest standards relative to the practice of consulting forestry and
to provide protection of the public from unqualified consulting
forestry practitioners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the state board of consulting foresters.
(2) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(3) "Consulting forester" means a person who, by reason of his or
her knowledge of the natural sciences, mathematics, and the principles
of forestry acquired by forestry education or experience, performs
forestry services for the public on a fee basis, including but not
limited to, consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning, or
responsible supervision of forestry activities when the services
require the application of forestry principles and techniques.
(4) "Consulting forestry" means all professional services relating
to the forest resources of the state that require the application of
forestry principles, data, and techniques as acquired by experience,
training, and education. Such services include, but are not limited
to, consultation, investigations, evaluations, planning, and the
formation and implementation of forestry policies when such activities
require the application of forestry practices, data, and techniques.
(5) "Forestry" means the science and practice of managing forested
landscapes and the treatment of the forest cover in general, and
includes, among other things, the application of scientific knowledge
and forestry principles in the fields of fuel management and forest
protection, timber growing and utilization, forest inventories, forest
economics, forest valuation and finance, and the evaluation and
mitigation of impacts from forestry activities on watershed values, to
achieve the purposes of this chapter. The practice of forestry applies
only to those activities undertaken on forested landscapes. "Forestry"
shall not include those activities performed by wildlife biologists,
fisheries biologists, botanists, ecological restorationists, stream
restorationists, hydrologists, or geologists.
(6) "Government forester" means any forester who is a regular full-time employee of a federal, state, or local governmental entity engaged
in the management of public lands or renders extension forestry
services to the public.
(7) "Industrial forestry business" means a private business which
possesses expertise in consulting forestry and forestry, or that is
engaged in the manufacture of wood products from raw materials
harvested from the business's own land.
(8) "Person" means a natural person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 No person shall receive income, whether
directly or indirectly, for engaging in the practice of consulting
forestry, or advertise as engaging in such practice, or solicit
business in such practice, including but not limited to foresters whose
responsibilities include industry-sponsored forestry assistance
programs for landowners and government foresters who advise private
landowners, unless the person holds a valid license issued by the
board. This section shall not prohibit, prevent, or affect:
(1) Any person from practicing forestry on his or her own land,
including application for forest practices permits;
(2) Any government forester from practicing forestry on government
land;
(3) Any person from practicing any other recognized profession or
trade, including but not limited to vendors of tree planting, timber
stand improvement practices, pesticide application, pest control, site
preparation, heavy equipment, fire control activities, and timber
harvesting;
(4) Any person employed by a forestry business from practicing
forestry on the business's land;
(5) An industrial forestry business from engaging the services of
an independent contractor to perform forestry tasks and projects
directed or designed by the business; or
(6) Any person from practicing forestry under the direct
supervision of a licensed consulting forester.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 There is created a state board of consulting
foresters within the department to administer the provisions of this
chapter. The board shall consist of five members appointed by the
governor as follows: Three members shall be consulting foresters, two
of whom shall be appointed from a list of at least three names
submitted by nationally recognized professional forestry societies and
associations; two members shall be members of the public, one of whom
shall be appointed from a list of at least three names submitted by a
recognized state-wide organization representing nonindustrial forest
landowners; and the remaining public member shall be a person who is
not, and never has been, a member of the forestry profession, or a
relative of such a person, and who does not have and never has had, a
material financial interest in the provision of forestry services or in
an activity directly related to forestry. Each consulting forester
member shall have actively practiced the profession of consulting
forestry for at least ten years prior to appointment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The initial members of the board shall
serve for the following terms: One member for one year, one member for
two years, one member for three years, one member for four years, and
one member for five years. All five members of the first board must be
appointed on the same date and shall serve their respective terms from
the date of appointment.
(2) By virtue of their appointment, the initial three consulting
forester members of the board shall issue to themselves the licenses as
consulting foresters and pay the fees required under this chapter once
the fees are established. After the initial three consulting forester
members of the board have so qualified and been administered their
oaths of office, no person shall be appointed as a consulting forester
member of the board unless such person, at the time appointed, is a
licensed consulting forester under this chapter.
(3) On the expiration of the term of each member, the governor
shall appoint a successor to serve for a term of five years. Members
of the board hold their offices until their successors are appointed.
No member shall serve more than two consecutive terms.
(4) A quorum of the board shall be three members.
(5) The governor may remove any member of the board for cause.
Vacancies on the board shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired
term.
(6) In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the members of
the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The board has the following powers and
duties:
(a) To adopt rules governing the holding of meetings and hearings,
applications for licenses, and any other duties necessary for the
administration of this chapter;
(b) To establish and issue standards of practice and a code of
ethics for consulting foresters and provide for the enforcement of such
standards and the code of ethics;
(c) To establish minimum requirements for professional continuing
education;
(d) To prepare a biennial roster of the names, business addresses,
and other information as the board deems necessary of all licensed
consulting foresters licensed under this chapter;
(e) To issue, suspend, or revoke licenses;
(f) To investigate and conduct hearings concerning alleged
violations of this chapter; and
(g) To keep a record of its proceedings and a register of all
applicants for licensing.
(2) The board may not impose standards of practice, a code of
ethics, or other rules or requirements regarding forest practices that
are more stringent than the rules adopted under chapter 76.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The minimum requirements for licensure
as a consulting forester prior to January 1, 2010, are:
(a) Evidence of seven or more years' experience in practicing
forestry and performing the services of a consulting forester that is
satisfactory to the board; or
(b) Passage of a written examination administered by the board
indicating that the applicant is competent to practice consulting
forestry.
(2) The minimum requirements for licensure after January 1, 2010,
are:
(a) Graduation in forestry or a related field, requiring study of
four years or more, from a school, college, or university approved by
the board;
(b) Evidence of five or more years' experience in practicing
forestry and performing the services of a consulting forester
satisfactory to the board; and
(c) Passage of a written examination administered by the board
indicating that the applicant is competent to practice consulting
forestry.
Evidence of seven or more years' experience in practicing forestry
and performing the services of a consulting forester satisfactory to
the board may substitute for the education and experience requirements
of (a) and (b) of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 An application for a consulting forester
license shall be filed with the board before the date set for
examination. The application fee shall be determined by the board and
shall include a nonrefundable examination fee and a fee for issuance of
the license. The examination fee must be paid to the board by thirty
days before the date of the examination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Examinations of applicants for licenses
shall be held at least annually and at such times and places as the
board may determine.
(2) The scope of the examination and methods of procedure shall be
prescribed by the board. The examination must cover timber management,
including the ability to evaluate and appraise timber, use of
contracts, applicable state statutes and rules, including labor and
industries, and similar subjects necessary to the practice of
consulting forestry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The board shall issue a license with a
license number, upon payment of the license fee, to a qualified
applicant who is certified by the board as having passed the required
examination and as having given satisfactory proof of completion of the
required experience to the board and who, in the opinion of the board,
has satisfactorily met all the requirements of this chapter and the
rules of the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 All plans, maps, specifications, and
reports issued by a licensed consulting forester shall be endorsed with
the name of the licensed consulting forester and a license number. No
licensed consulting forester shall endorse any plan, specification,
estimate, map, or related document unless he or she actually prepared
or directly supervised the preparation of such document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 No business, partnership, or corporation
may be licensed to practice consulting forestry. Licensing shall be
determined on the basis of individual personal qualifications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The initial license expires on the
second anniversary of the licensee's birthday following the issuance of
the license and biennially thereafter.
(2) A licensee may renew a license prior to its expiration by
paying any required license renewal fee to the board and submitting
proof of compliance with continuing education requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The board, upon application and payment of
a fee determined by the board, may issue a license without further
examination to a person who is legally licensed as a consulting
forester in a state other than Washington and meets requirements set by
the board. The requirements for licensure in the person's licensing
state must be substantially equivalent to the requirements of this
chapter and the state in which he or she is so licensed must observe
the same rules of reciprocity granted under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The board has the power, after notice and
hearing, to suspend or revoke the license of any licensee or assess
administrative penalties against a licensee who:
(1) Is found liable for fraud, deceit, gross negligence, gross
incompetency, or gross misconduct in the practice of consulting
forestry;
(2) Is found liable by the board of unprofessional or unethical
conduct;
(3) Has had his or her license suspended or revoked for cause in
another jurisdiction;
(4) Fails to comply with the continuing education requirements
established by the board;
(5) Has directly or indirectly through another person or entity,
purchased or attempted to purchase timber from a landowner while
providing forestry services for the landowner;
(6) Gives false or forged evidence of any kind to the board in
obtaining a license;
(7) Uses an expired or revoked license; or
(8) Endorses any plan, specification, estimate, map, or related
document unless he or she actually prepared or directly supervised the
preparation of such document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) If, after investigation, the board
determines there is reason to believe a violation of this chapter has
taken place, the board shall prepare a statement of allegations and
serve the statement on the licensee or license applicant. All
procedures related to hearings shall be in accordance with the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) In conducting hearings, any member of the board may administer
oaths to witnesses appearing before the board, subpoena witnesses and
compel their attendance, and require the production of books, records,
papers, and documents. If any person refuses to obey any subpoena
issued, or refuses to testify or to produce any books, records, papers,
or documents required to be produced, the board may present a petition
to the superior court of the county in which the person resides,
setting forth the facts, and the court may, in a proper case, enter an
order compelling compliance with this chapter and imposing other terms
and conditions as the court deems equitable.
(3) Any person who feels aggrieved by any action of the board may
appeal to the superior court of the county in which he or she resides.
The court shall review the board's proceedings on the record presented
and may, in a proper case, sustain or dismiss the appeal, or modify or
vacate the board's order. However, in case the order is modified or
vacated, the court may also, in its discretion, remand the matter to
the board for further proceedings consistent with the court's order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) It is a misdemeanor for any person to:
(a) Practice consulting forestry without being licensed in
accordance with this chapter;
(b) Use in connection with his or her name, or otherwise assume,
use, or advertise any title or description tending to convey the
impression that he or she is a licensed consulting forester without
being licensed in accordance with this chapter;
(c) Present or attempt to use as his or her own the license of
another;
(d) Give false or forged evidence of any kind to the board in
obtaining a license;
(e) Use an expired or revoked license; or
(f) Endorse any plan, specification, estimate, map, or related
document unless he or she actually prepared or directly supervised the
preparation of such document.
(2) The board shall refer criminal violations of this chapter to
the appropriate prosecuting attorney for prosecution. A person
convicted of a misdemeanor shall be punished according to RCW 9.92.030.
(3) The state attorney general or his or her designated assistant
shall act as legal advisor to the board and render such assistance as
may be necessary in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 17 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---