BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington state
and the nation benefit from equal educational opportunities for all
students and employees of the public schools. The legislature further
finds that in recognition of this benefit, numerous existing state and
federal constitutional provisions, laws, rules, and regulations
prohibit, and provide redress against, harassment and discrimination.
In doing so, these laws and regulations promote the protection and
well-being of students and staff. The legislature further finds that
lack of monitoring compliance with these laws and regulations
significantly weakens these protections and that the state has a
responsibility to identify noncompliance, coordinate resources, and
provide a greater presence by monitoring compliance more frequently
than is currently done. Additionally, the legislature recognizes that
regular and increased monitoring can play an important role in
preventing problems from arising by ensuring the school district's
understanding of its responsibilities under state and federal law; can
benefit the state by reducing the costs associated with complaints and
lawsuits due to noncompliance; and will further protect Washington's
students from suffering the harmful effects of discrimination,
harassment, and sexual misconduct.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.640.030 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 226 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall be
required to monitor the compliance by local school districts with this
chapter, including districts' compliance with state and federal laws,
rules, and regulations concerning sexual harassment, sexual misconduct,
and sex discrimination of students and employees, and employee and
student knowledge of those laws, rules, and regulations and of their
reporting responsibilities. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall establish a compliance timetable and ((regulations))
rules for enforcement of this chapter, and shall establish guidelines
for ((affirmative action)) nondiscrimination programs to be adopted by
all school districts.
(2) The compliance monitoring process shall be conducted on a
three-year cycle, with one-third of the school districts reporting each
year. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
conduct on-site district visits for at least one-fourth of the
districts that are reporting each year.

--- END ---