BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.44.060 and 2004 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any person
participating in good faith in the making of a report pursuant to this
chapter or testifying as to alleged child abuse or neglect in a
judicial proceeding shall in so doing be immune from any liability
arising out of such reporting or testifying under any law of this state
or its political subdivisions.
(b) A person convicted of a violation of subsection (4) of this
section shall not be immune from liability under (a) of this
subsection.
(2) An administrator of a hospital or similar institution or any
physician licensed pursuant to chapters 18.71 or 18.57 RCW taking a
child into custody pursuant to RCW 26.44.056 shall not be subject to
criminal or civil liability for such taking into custody.
(3) Conduct conforming with the reporting requirements of this
chapter shall not be deemed a violation of the confidential
communication privilege of RCW 5.60.060 (3) and (4), 18.53.200 and
18.83.110. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as to supersede
or abridge remedies provided in chapter 4.92 RCW.
(4) A person who, intentionally and in bad faith ((or
maliciously)), knowingly makes a false report of alleged abuse or
neglect shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable in accordance with
RCW 9A.20.021.
(5) A person who, in good faith and without gross negligence,
cooperates in an investigation arising as a result of a report made
pursuant to this chapter, shall not be subject to civil liability
arising out of his or her cooperation. This subsection does not apply
to a person who caused or allowed the child abuse or neglect to occur.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The child protective services section shall prepare a statement
warning against false reporting of alleged child abuse or neglect for
inclusion in any instructions, informational brochures, educational
forms, and handbooks developed or prepared for or by the department and
relating to the reporting of abuse or neglect of children. Such
statement shall include information on the criminal penalties that
apply to false reports of alleged child abuse or neglect under RCW
26.44.060(4). It shall not be necessary to reprint existing materials
if any other less expensive technique can be used. Materials shall be
revised when reproduced.
(2) The child protective services section shall send a letter by
certified mail to any person determined by the section to have made a
false report of child abuse or neglect informing the person that such
a determination has been made and that a second or subsequent false
report will be referred to the proper law enforcement agency for
investigation.

--- END ---