BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.210 and 1993 c 336 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
The goal of the basic education act for the schools of the state of
Washington set forth in this chapter shall be to provide students with
the opportunity to become responsible citizens, to contribute to their
own economic well-being and to that of their families and communities,
and to enjoy productive and satisfying lives, and to develop a public
school system that focuses more on the educational performance of
students and includes high expectations for all students. To these
ends, the goals of each school district, with the involvement of
parents and community members, shall be to provide opportunities for
all students to develop the knowledge and skills essential to:
(1) Read with comprehension, write with skill, and communicate
effectively and responsibly in a variety of ways and settings;
(2) Know and apply the core concepts and principles of mathematics;
social, physical, and life sciences; civics and history; geography;
arts; and health and fitness;
(3) Think analytically, logically, and creatively, and to integrate
experience and knowledge to form reasoned judgments and solve problems;
and
(4) Understand the importance of work and how performance, effort,
and decisions directly affect future career and educational
opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
ALL-DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS--FUNDING. Beginning with the 2007-08
school year, funding for voluntary all-day kindergarten programs shall
be phased-in beginning with schools with the highest poverty levels,
defined as those schools with the highest percentages of students
qualifying for free and reduced-price lunch support in the prior school
year. Once a school receives funding for the all-day kindergarten
program, that school shall remain eligible for funding in subsequent
school years regardless of changes in the school's percentage of
students eligible for free and reduced-price lunches as long as other
program requirements are fulfilled. Resources for all-day kindergarten
shall support students who qualify for free and reduced-price lunch
program support. The funding for voluntary all-day kindergarten
programs created in this section shall not be considered part of the
definition of basic education. Additionally, schools receiving all-day
kindergarten program support shall agree to the following conditions:
(1) Providing at least a one thousand-hour instructional program;
(2) Providing a curriculum that offers a rich, varied set of
experiences that assist students in:
(a) Developing initial skills in the academic areas of reading,
mathematics, and writing;
(b) Developing a variety of communication skills;
(c) Providing experiences in science, social studies, arts, health
and physical education, and a world language other than English;
(d) Acquiring large and small motor skills;
(e) Acquiring social and emotional skills including successful
participation in learning activities as an individual and as part of a
group;
(f) Establishing learning environments that are developmentally
appropriate and promote creativity; and
(g) Learning through hands-on experiences;
(3) Demonstrating strong connections and communication with early
learning community providers; and
(4) Participating in kindergarten program readiness activities with
early learning providers and parents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
PRIMARY LEVEL EDUCATION PROJECTS. (1) Four demonstration projects
are authorized for schools serving kindergarten through third grade
students to develop, implement, and document the effects of a
comprehensive K-3 foundations program. At least two demonstration
projects shall be in schools that are participating in the public-private early learning partnerships in the Highline and Yakima school
districts. A third demonstration project shall be in the Spokane
school district.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall select project
participants based on the criteria in this section, the commitment to
a school-wide program, and the degree to which applicants articulate an
understanding of development and implementation of a comprehensive K-3
foundations program.
(3) Successful school applicants shall:
(a) Demonstrate that there is engaged and committed school and
district leadership and support for the project;
(b) Demonstrate that school staff is engaged and committed and
believes in high expectations for all students;
(c) Have a history of successfully using data to guide decision
making for students and the program;
(d) Plan for the use of staff learning improvement days to support
project implementation;
(e) Demonstrate successful linkages with the early learning
providers in their communities;
(f) Outline the steps taken to develop this application and the
general plan for implementation of a comprehensive K-3 foundations
program; and
(g) Commit to individualized learning opportunities in early grades
by using district resources, such as funding under RCW 28A.505.210, to
reduce class sizes in grades kindergarten through three.
(4) Program resources provided to demonstration projects are:
(a) Support to implement an all-day kindergarten program;
(b) Support for class sizes at a ratio of one teacher to eighteen
students, and the additional resources for materials generated by that
ratio through associated nonemployee-related costs;
(c) Support for a one-half full-time equivalent instructional
coach; and
(d) Support for professional development time related to program
implementation.
(5) Demonstration projects shall provide:
(a) A program that implements an educational philosophy that
supports child-centered learning;
(b) Learning opportunities through personal exploration and
discovery, hands-on experiences, and by working independently, in small
groups and in large groups;
(c) Rich and varied subject matter that includes: Reading,
writing, mathematics, science, social studies, a world language other
than English, the arts, and health and physical education;
(d) Opportunities to learn and feel accomplishment, diligence,
creativity, and confidence;
(e) Social and emotional development opportunities;
(f) Personalized assessment for each student that addresses
academic knowledge and skill development, social and emotional skill
development, critical thinking and decision-making skills, large and
fine motor skill development, and knowledge of personal interests,
strengths, and goals;
(g) For students to progress to the upper elementary grades when a
solid foundation is in place and reading and mathematics primary skills
have been mastered;
(h) Class sizes that do not exceed one certificated instructional
staff to eighteen students; and
(i) That the project will agree to cooperate with the Washington
state institute for public policy in its evaluation of the
demonstration projects, including providing the data necessary for the
institute to complete its work.
(6) The Washington state institute for public policy shall conduct
an evaluation of the demonstration projects under this section.
Student, staff, program, and parent data shall be collected using
various instruments including surveys, program and activity
descriptions, student performance measures, observations, and other
processes.
(7) Within available funding, findings from the evaluation under
this section shall include conclusions regarding the degree to which
students thrive in the education environment; student progress in
academic, social, and emotional areas; the program components that have
been most important to student success; the degree to which educational
staff feel accomplished in their work and satisfied with student
progress; and recommendations for continued implementation and
expansion of the program.
(8) The institute for public policy shall report its findings to
the governor, the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
and the appropriate early learning, education, and fiscal committees of
the legislature. An interim report is due November 1, 2008. The final
report is due December 1, 2009.
(9) This section expires September 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
ENGLISH AS A SECOND LANGUAGE PROJECTS. (1) The goals of the
English as a second language demonstration project are to develop
recommendations:
(a) Identifying foundational competencies for developing academic
English skills in English language learner students that all teachers
should acquire in initial teacher preparation programs;
(b) Identifying components of a professional development program
that builds classroom teacher competence for developing academic
English skills in English language learner students; and
(c) Identifying job-embedded practices that connect the English
language learner teacher and classroom teachers to coordinate
instruction to support the work of the student.
(2) The English as a second language demonstration project shall
use two field strategies in the development of recommendations.
(a) The first strategy is to conduct a field study of an ongoing
project in a number of schools and school districts in which Spanish is
the predominate language other than English.
(b) The second strategy is to conduct a project that provides
professional development and planning time resources to approximately
three large schools in which there are many first languages among the
students. The participants of this project shall partner with an
institution of higher education or a professional development provider
with expertise in support student acquisition of academic English. The
superintendent of public instruction shall select the participants in
the project under this subsection (2)(b).
(3)(a) The Washington state institute for public policy shall
conduct the field study work and collect additional information from
the project schools. In conducting its work, the institute shall
review current literature regarding best practices and consult with
state and national experts as appropriate.
(b) The institute for public policy shall report its findings to
the governor, the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
and the education and fiscal committees of the legislature. An interim
report is due November 1, 2008. The final report is due December 1,
2009.
(4) This section expires September 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The state auditor's office, in consultation
with the office of financial management and the joint legislative audit
and review committee, will conduct an audit and evaluation of the
current process for determining student eligibility for free and
reduced price lunch. The audit and review shall include, but is not
limited to: (1) An assessment of the current error rate for
determining eligibility for free or reduced price lunch; (2)
recommendations on methods and procedures that would reduce the error
rate; and (3) an analysis of other poverty measures that could be used
as a more accurate indicator of school district poverty. The audit and
review shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by
September 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) To the extent necessary, funds shall be made available for
safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special
education funding beyond the amounts provided through the special
education funding formula. If safety net awards exceed the amount
appropriated, then the superintendent shall expend all available
federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. Safety net
funds shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider additional funds for districts
that can convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for
special education exceed all available revenues from state funding
formulas. In the determination of need, the committee shall also
consider additional available revenues from federal sources.
Differences in program costs attributable to district philosophy,
service delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate
basis for safety net awards.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) The committee shall then consider extraordinary costs
associated with communities that draw a larger number of families with
children in need of special education services.
(d) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(e) Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of
potential medicaid eligible students billed as calculated by the
superintendent in accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 1999.
(f) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
In adopting and revising the rules, the superintendent shall ensure the
application process to access safety net funding is streamlined,
timelines for submission are not in conflict, feedback to school
districts is timely and provides sufficient information to allow school
districts to know what they need to do to correct any deficiencies in
their safety net application, and that there is consistency between
awards approved by school districts and by application period. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall also provide
technical assistance to school districts to assist them in preparing
and submitting their special education safety net application.
(3) On an annual basis, the superintendent shall survey districts
regarding their satisfaction with the safety net process and consider
feedback to improve the safety net process. Each year by December 1st,
the superintendent shall prepare and submit a report to the office of
financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature that summarizes the survey results and changes made
to the safety net process as a result of the school district feedback.
(4) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff from the office of superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor who shall be nonvoting
members of the committee; and
(c) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) In addition to the responsibilities in
section 6 of this act, the state special education safety net oversight
committee, with the assistance of the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, shall conduct further evaluation of issues raised
in the recently completed review of the special education excess cost
accounting procedures by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and the 2006 report of the joint legislative audit and
review committee report on the accounting of special education excess
costs. Specifically, the state special education safety net oversight
committee shall evaluate options for modifying or replacing the current
accounting methodology in place for the 2005-06 school year in a way
that better reflects the special education program funding and
spending. By November 1, 2008, the oversight committee shall submit a
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate policy
and fiscal committees of the legislature outlining the options for
replacing the current excess cost method. One of the options will be
based on, to the maximum extent appropriate, a full cost accounting.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

--- END ---