BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
FINANCIAL HEALTH AND MONITORING--BUDGET REVIEW AND APPROVAL
PROCESS. (1) The legislature finds that the existing school district
budget review system focuses on current school year budget
implementation and preparation of the ensuing school year budget and
does not provide a systematic look of longer-range budget issues,
including any indication of impending financial problems in school
districts and the financial impact of long-term contractual agreements.
Parents, students, taxpayers, school employees, and school
administrators need a financial monitoring system that considers long-term budgeting issues and commitments, and provides early warning of
school district financial health concerns. Once financial concerns and
issues are identified, districts should receive early, practical
assistance.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
office of financial management shall jointly develop and implement a
school district financial health and monitoring system.
(3)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and
the office of financial management, with the involvement of school
district boards of directors and administrators, shall identify up to
six system measures that shall be established for a public financial
reporting system, including related data collection content and
processes. In developing the six system measures, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the office of financial
management shall consider the following: (i) How much the financial
health of a school district is dependent on local levy funds to cover
the cost of basic education; and (ii) How a school district's financial
health is related to insufficient funding of state requirements.
(b) In addition, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and the office of financial management shall jointly
develop a financial health outlook rating system that places school
districts in one of three financial health categories based on their
ratings on the financial measures.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
office of financial management shall present proposed system measures
and a financial health outlook rating system to the governor by
November 1, 2007. Subject to agreement between the governor and the
superintendent of public instruction on the measures and the rating
system, the financial health and monitoring system shall be implemented
during the 2008-09 school year.
(5) The financial health outlook rating category of each school
district shall be published annually. In addition, updates shall be
published throughout the year if subsequent data to the school
district's financial reporting measures cause a change in the
district's financial health categorization.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, with
regional financial specialists contracted through educational service
districts, shall provide progressive levels of technical assistance to
school districts in the lowest two categories on the financial health
outlook rating system.
(7) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
office of financial management shall jointly review the current school
district budget submittal and approval process and develop
recommendations for changes to the budget approval and financial
oversight system. With approval from the legislature through the
omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution, the
recommendations shall include a system of progressive state assistance
and potential interventions and oversight in school districts
identified in the lowest two categories on the financial health outlook
rating system.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a report
summarizing the review and reporting recommendations in subsection (7)
of this section to the governor and the education and fiscal committees
of the legislature by November 15, 2007.
(9) When the data center has collected and verified the data, the
office of financial management and the superintendent of public
instruction shall jointly conduct a review of teacher pay systems in
the global challenge states. The office of financial management and
the superintendent of public instruction shall develop a methodology
for comparing teacher salaries among the global challenge states. If
practical, the office of financial management shall report to the
governor and the legislature on the findings from this review and the
initial set of teacher salary comparisons among the global challenge
states by January 10, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
EDUCATION DATA CENTER. (1) The education data center shall be
established in the office of financial management. The education data
center shall conduct collaborative analyses of education issues across
the P-20 system, which system includes the department of early
learning, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional
educator standards board, the state board of education, the state board
for community and technical colleges, the workforce training and
education coordinating board, the higher education coordinating board,
public baccalaureate institutions of higher education, and the
employment security department in their collaborative analysis of early
learning, K-12, and higher education programs. The education data
center shall be considered an education research agency under
applicable federal and state statutes for purposes of receiving and
processing student record data for research purposes.
(2) The education data center shall:
(a) Coordinate with other state education agencies to compile
education data and complete P-20 research projects;
(b) Track enrollment and outcomes through the public centralized
higher education enrollment system;
(c) Assist other state educational agencies' collaborative efforts
to establish benchmarks for Washington compared to the global challenge
states as defined in section 3 of this act;
(d) Assist other state educational agencies' collaborative efforts
to develop a long-range enrollment plan for higher education including
estimates to meet demographic and workforce needs; and
(e) Provide research support that focuses on student transitions
within and among the early learning, K-12, and higher education sectors
in the P-20 system.
(3) The department of early learning, superintendent of public
instruction, professional educator standards board, state board of
education, state board for community and technical colleges, workforce
training and education coordinating board, higher education
coordinating board, public baccalaureate institutions, and employment
security department shall work with the education data center to
develop data sharing and research agreements, consistent with
applicable security and confidentiality requirements, to facilitate the
work of the center. The education data center shall make data from
collaborative analyses available to the education agencies and
institutions that contribute data to the education data center to the
extent allowed by federal and state security and confidentiality
requirements applicable to the data of each contributing agency or
institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
GLOBAL CHALLENGE STATES. The global challenge states are the top
performing states on the new economy index published by the progressive
policy institute as of the effective date of this section. The new
economy index ranks states on indicators of their potential to compete
in the new economy. At least once every five years, the office of
financial management shall determine if changes to the list of global
challenge states are appropriate. The office of financial management
shall report its findings to the governor and the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

--- END ---