BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Reliable data on student progress, characteristics of students
and schools, and teacher qualifications and mobility is critical for
accountability to the state and to the public;
(2) Educational data should be made available as widely as possible
while appropriately protecting the privacy of individuals as provided
by law;
(3) School districts and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction need robust and compatible data systems and programs to
reduce inefficiencies caused by the lack of connectivity and to
minimize or eliminate multiple data entry; and
(4) Schools and districts should be supported in their management
of educational data and should have access to user-friendly programs
and reports that can be readily used by classroom teachers and building
principals to improve instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) As a first step in establishing a framework and baseline
information for better linking data on students, teachers, and student
achievement, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall, to the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, conduct
a feasibility study on establishing a statewide longitudinal
student-teacher data system. The primary purpose of the data system is
to better aid research into programs and interventions that are most
effective in improving student performance, better understand the
state's public educator workforce, and to provide information on areas
within the educational system that need improvement.
(2) A preliminary set of data elements shall be developed by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction in collaboration
with the professional educator standards board, the state board of
education, and the joint legislative audit and review committee by
December 2007. The feasibility study shall include conducting pilot
studies on the collection of this preliminary set of identified data
elements in two school districts, with one over twenty thousand in
full-time equivalent enrollment and the other less than two thousand in
full-time equivalent enrollment.
(3) By November 1, 2008, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide a final report on the results of the
feasibility study, including the results from the pilot studies, to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature.
(4) The topics covered in the feasibility study shall include, but
are not limited to:
(a) Detailed estimates on the cost of the development and
implementation of the data system;
(b) A final list of specific data elements that are necessary to
allow effective and efficient research on an individual school,
district, and statewide basis, and of those data elements,
identification of what data is currently reported by schools and school
districts and what is not reported;
(c) The standards needed for validation and verification of data
entered into the systems to ensure accuracy and compatibility of data;
and
(d) The staffing and related impacts on schools and school
districts from the collection of the recommended data elements and
consideration of ways to reduce duplicate reporting of data.
(5) In conducting the feasibility study, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall consult with the Washington
state institute for public policy, the professional educator standards
board, the state board of education, the joint legislative audit and
review committee, the center for analysis of longitudinal data in
education research, other research organizations as appropriate, the
association of Washington school principals, the Washington association
of school administrators, the Washington education association, the
Washington association of school business officials, Washington
association of colleges for teacher education, and the Washington state
school directors' association about the needed data elements for an
effective statewide longitudinal student-teacher data system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of superintendent of public instruction is
authorized to establish a longitudinal student data system for and on
behalf of school districts in the state. Personally identifiable
student data will be safeguarded consistent with the requirements of
the federal family educational rights privacy act and any relevant
state laws. Consistent with privacy protections in the above-referenced laws, data may be disclosed for educational purposes and
studies, including but are not limited to:
(a) Educational studies authorized or mandated by the state
legislature;
(b) Studies initiated by other state educational authorities and
authorized by the office of superintendent of public instruction;
(c) Studies initiated by other state agencies and authorized by the
office of superintendent of public instruction;
(d) Studies initiated by private study groups authorized by the
office of superintendent of public instruction.
(2) Any group or agency that utilizes this data shall adhere to
federal and state laws protecting student data and safeguarding the
confidentiality and privacy of student records.
(3) Nothing in this section precludes the office of superintendent
of public instruction from collecting and distributing nonstudent level
data, nor student level data without personally identifiable
information.

--- END ---