BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.48.130 and 1995 c 366 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who violates a provision of this chapter, other than
the provisions contained in RCW 76.48.120, as now or hereafter amended,
is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be
punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars or by
imprisonment in the county jail for not to exceed one year or by both
a fine and imprisonment.
(2) In any prosecution for a violation of this chapter's
requirements to obtain or possess a specialized forest products permit
or true copy thereof, an authorization, sales invoice, or bill of
lading, it is an affirmative defense, if established by the defendant
by a preponderance of the evidence, that: (a) The specialized forest
products were harvested from the defendant's own land; or (b) the
specialized forest products were harvested with the permission of the
landowner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The specialized forest products work
group is established. The work group must consist of appropriate
representation from: The department of natural resources; county
sheriffs; county prosecutors; industrial and small forest landowners;
tribes; recreational and professional wood carvers; cedar and specialty
wood processors; and other appropriate persons invited by the
commissioner of public lands.
(2) The specialized forest products work group must review the
current specialized forest products statute, chapter 76.48 RCW, as well
as applicable theft laws. The specialized forest products work group
must evaluate the statute, as well as its application, and make
recommendations, if any, to ensure that the specialized forest products
requirements: Provide reasonable tools for law enforcement and
reasonably protect landowners from theft; are not unduly burdensome to
harvesters, those possessing or transporting specialized forest
products, or cedar or specialty wood processors or buyers; are clear
and may be readily understood by law enforcement and the public; and
are administered and enforced consistently throughout the state.
(3) The specialized forest products work group must be staffed by
the department of natural resources.
(4) The specialized forest products work group must provide a
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature containing its
recommendations, as well as draft legislation implementing its
recommendations, by December 1, 2007.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2008.

--- END ---