BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the demands made
on law enforcement by seasonal tourist populations in cities or towns
with populations under ten thousand are above and beyond the abilities
of the permanent residents of these cities or towns to fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.28.1815 and 1997 c 452 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All revenue from taxes imposed under this chapter shall be
credited to a special fund in the treasury of the municipality imposing
such tax and used solely for the purpose of paying all or any part of
the cost of tourism promotion((,)); the cost of acquisition of tourism-related facilities((, or)); the cost of operation of tourism-related
facilities; or the cost, such as salaries and equipment acquisition or
maintenance, of public safety activities directed towards tourism areas
in cities or towns with populations under ten thousand.
(2) Municipalities may, under chapter 39.34 RCW, agree to the
utilization of revenue from taxes imposed under this chapter for the
purposes of funding a multijurisdictional tourism-related facility.

--- END ---