BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 63.29.130 and 1993 c 498 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Intangible property held for the owner by a court, state or other
government, governmental subdivision or agency, public corporation,
public authority, or the United States or any instrumentality of the
United States that remains unclaimed by the owner for more than two
years after becoming payable or distributable is presumed abandoned.
However, courts may retain overpayments made in connection with any
litigation, including traffic, criminal, and noncriminal matters, in an
amount less than or equal to ten dollars. These overpayments shall be
remitted by the clerk of the court to the local treasurer for deposit
in the local current expense fund.

--- END ---