BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Population in western Washington is
growing and will continue to grow. Models indicate that the central
Cascades region can expect a doubling of the population within the next
one hundred years.
(2) The growth management act has used large lot zoning to
discourage residential development of rural and resource lands.
However, historical entitlement of smaller lots coupled with rapidly
increasing real estate values have led to widespread development of
nonurban lots of a variety of sizes, locations, and zoning categories.
This problem is exacerbated by recent trends in the timber industry,
resulting in ownership changes, accelerated harvesting regimes, and
likely conversion of many properties to residential development in the
near term. It is reasonable to assume that under a one hundred-year
timeframe all nonurban lots are likely to be developed.
(3) The increase in nonurban development has disproportionate
undesirable impacts to landscape and watershed integrity, environmental
functions, economic viability of resource lands, and public costs.
(4) Additional approaches to managing rural growth are needed.
Success will likely not come from a single strategy; rather, a
multifaceted approach is required. Implementation of a region-wide or
statewide transfer of development rights program could play a major
role in finding a solution.
(5) The most important component in building a successful transfer
of development rights program is creating adequate receiving area
capacity. Accommodating dramatic population growth while meeting
resource conservation goals over the next one hundred years will
require greatly increasing receiving area capacity. It is a regional
goal to direct growth to urban areas, and therefore it is a priority to
develop this receiving capacity primarily in urban areas. In addition,
the potential for additional receiving areas in appropriate nonurban
areas is being explored concurrently.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that meets the criteria
in subsection (2) of this section may designate no more than one rural
village in the rural area outside of limited areas of more intensive
rural development established pursuant to RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d). For
the purposes of this section, "rural village" is defined as a compact,
environmentally friendly rural development created using transfer of
development rights. Rural villages will be located in the rural area,
and shall coexist with traditional rural land uses such as farming and
forestry.
(2) Under this chapter, a county may designate a rural village in
the rural area outside of limited areas of more intensive rural
development established pursuant to RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d) as follows:
(a) Residential Development. The rural village may contain fifty
to two hundred dwelling units and may include single-family detached or
attached housing, multifamily housing, and accessory dwelling units.
The maximum allowable lot size for single-family detached units is
seven thousand square feet within a rural village.
(b) Nonresidential Development. The rural village may include
nonresidential development that is designed to serve the village
population and nearby existing and projected rural residents.
(c) Development Right Transfers. All rural village nonresidential
square footage or dwelling units that exceed base zoning shall require
the transfer or purchase of development rights from designated land
within the rural area or natural resource lands ("sending areas") as
follows:
(i) For the purposes of this section, one transferable development
right shall be allocated for each unrealized dwelling unit permitted by
applicable development regulations, as calculated on a gross basis
(allowed density x gross acreage of the property). In determining how
these development rights transfer to the rural village, the county may
consider local circumstances, but is encouraged to provide incentives
to transfer or purchase development rights from existing nonconforming
lots and authorize the transfer or purchase of development rights from
larger properties that will provide landscape scale conservation
benefits consistent with RCW 36.70A.011 and reduce transactions and
acquisition costs helping to make the end product more affordable.
(ii) At least one-half of the development rights included in a
rural village shall be transferred from the rural area, with any
remainder coming from resource lands. The county shall determine the
appropriate ratio of rural and resource development rights.
(iii) Each development right transferred from an existing rural lot
nonconforming as to minimum lot size or density shall be given a 0.25
development rights bonus when used within a rural village.
(d) Conservation Easements. Development rights purchased or
transferred from sending area properties shall be extinguished with
conservation easements held jointly by a nonprofit organization and the
relevant local government. The conservation easement shall permanently
restrict development of the property, but shall allow for typical rural
land uses, including agriculture and working forestry. A stewardship
fund established by endowment, contractually established annual
homeowners association fees, or a perpetual resale fee shall be created
for the sending area property to ensure capacity for stewardship and to
monitor and enforce the conservation easement by the responsible
parties.
(e) Siting Criteria. A county shall establish the criteria for
siting a rural village in the rural element of its comprehensive plan.
The criteria shall be in keeping with local circumstances, RCW
36.70A.070(5)(c), and favor sites with limited visual impacts,
proximity to existing transportation networks, limited need for service
improvements, affordability of housing in the rural village, and
appropriate environmental characteristics.
(f) Designation. A rural village shall be designated in the rural
element of the comprehensive plan. The regulations governing its
development, including location of sending areas, shall be included in
the county's development regulations. The rural village must comply
with all relevant development regulations, including critical areas
regulations and transportation concurrency requirements. The county
may adopt level of service or concurrency standards to address the
consolidation of traffic that will result from a rural village.
(g) Boundaries. Clear boundaries shall be delineated for each
rural village and shall not be expanded. Boundaries shall be buffered
from surrounding land uses by physical barriers (e.g., river or
undeveloped bluff) or a swath of permanently conserved land at least
two hundred fifty feet wide. A conservation easement restricting
development in this buffer shall be held jointly by a nonprofit
organization and the relevant local government.
(h) Public Services and Public Facilities.
(i) Public services and public facilities shall be limited to those
necessary to serve the rural village and shall be provided in a manner
that does not permit low-density sprawl.
(ii) New or improved infrastructure necessary to serve the rural
village shall be provided or applicable impact fees paid. New or
improved infrastructure may be provided by the applicant, the county,
or by a public-private partnership.
(iii) Transportation.
(A) Multimodal site planning shall be implemented and may include,
but is not limited to, neighborhood circulators; bicycle paths; and
park and ride, community vanpool, and carshare parking spaces.
(B) A pedestrian or nonmotorized transportation network of trails
or walkways should connect residences to services and open space within
and adjacent to the rural village.
(C) Road capacity shall meet county standards and accommodate the
projected needs of the rural village population, and necessary roadway
improvements may include safety enhancements, site access projects,
signage revisions, and traffic facility flow and management tools.
(D) Counties shall develop innovative road standards for rural
villages that are compatible with rural character and minimize
impervious surfaces and storm water runoff.
(iv) Water rights.
(A) A community water system shall be appropriately sized to serve
the rural village and shall rely on existing water law to obtain
adequate water rights. Such water system shall incorporate efficiency
and conservation measures designed to reduce water usage.
(B) At the time of sale or transfer of the development rights from
the sending area properties, conservation easements or covenants shall
include provisions to forego the development of groundwater wells in
the sending area properties for watering of lawns or noncommercial
gardens, for single or group domestic uses, and for nonagricultural
industrial uses. However, groundwater wells may be developed for
stock-watering or industrial uses related to agricultural production as
allowed under RCW 90.44.050.
(v) Wastewater treatment. Counties are encouraged to authorize
innovative techniques for wastewater treatment in rural villages,
including, but not limited to, membrane bioreactor systems. Greywater
reuse for flushing, irrigation, and other appropriate uses should be
encouraged.
(vi) Storm water management. Counties are encouraged to authorize
innovative techniques for storm water management, including, but not
limited to, bioswales and other natural storm water management systems
and alternative uses for storm water that encourage water reuse,
groundwater infiltration, or both.
(i) Open Space. The rural village shall contain community open
space. Uses of this open space may include, but are not limited to,
community gathering space, village green, park, or rural resource use.
A portion of the open space must function as a village green or
gathering place able to accommodate the population of the rural
village.
(j) Green Building. All rural villages shall meet the master
builders association of King and Snohomish counties built green - green
communities three-star standard and the built green – homebuilder or
multifamily (whichever is applicable) four-star standard. Equivalent
or more stringent green building standards may be substituted for this
requirement (e.g., leadership in energy and environmental design, green
globes, or other recognized green building standards).
(k) Native Vegetation. Disturbance of some native vegetation is
likely unavoidable in the development of rural villages. However,
maintaining forest cover and other native vegetation is important to
the health of watersheds and the Puget Sound. Thus, to the maximum
extent possible, clearing of native vegetation shall be avoided or
mitigated.
(i) The disturbance of native plants and forest cover on the
development site shall be minimized.
(ii) Disturbance of the development site shall be mitigated via on-site or off-site restoration or replanting of an area roughly
equivalent in size to the cleared area via a fee paid to a qualified
government or nonprofit land management organization.
(iii) Native plant species for landscaping of nonlawn areas of
private residences shall be used. Public rights-of-way, street
planting strips, and common areas shall be replanted with a regionally
appropriate native plant community and structure.
(l) Design Standards. A county shall include in its development
regulations design standards to protect the rural character of the
area. At a minimum these design standards should address the
following:
(i) Utilities;
(ii) Roadways and transportation;
(iii) Visual impacts (e.g., protecting view corridors along
roadways, ridgelines, hillsides, etc.); and
(iv) Lighting and the preservation of dark skies.
(m) Notice on Title. Each county designating a rural village pilot
project shall require that all plats, short plats, development permits,
and building permits issued for development activities within a rural
village demonstration project contain a notice that the subject
property is located in a rural area where a variety of traditional
rural activities may occur that may generate sights, sounds, and smells
associated with farming, forestry, and other traditional rural uses.
In addition, the notice for lands within a rural village demonstration
project shall advise that services in rural areas are often limited and
consist of rural governmental services rather than urban governmental
services. The notice shall run with the land.
(3) A county may not issue groundwater well permits for any
groundwater uses except stock-watering purposes, or agricultural
industrial purposes allowed under RCW 90.44.050 on properties from
which development rights have been sold or transferred (sending sites).
(4) Any county intending to designate a rural village demonstration
project shall notify the department. The department shall ensure that
a maximum of three demonstration projects may be established under this
section. Any county choosing to withdraw a demonstration project shall
notify the department and the department may accept an alternate
project.
(5) The department shall report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature annually on the progress of any rural villages
established under this section. Additionally, the department shall
prepare a final report to be submitted no later than December 1, 2012,
on the efficacy of this section in accomplishing the purposes of RCW
36.70A.011. In preparing this report, the department shall consult
with sending and receiving area landowners, project developers,
builders, the county, and any other interested individuals or
organizations. The report shall:
(a) Review the county adopted policies and regulations to enable
rural village demonstration projects for consistency with the goals of
section 1 of this act and RCW 36.70A.011;
(b) Provide pertinent information on the permitting and development
of the rural village demonstration projects;
(c) Provide a project-specific analysis for each demonstration
project looking at the effect of the rural village on the following:
(i) Rural population capacity including the impacts of the
transfers from resource lands;
(ii) Land disturbance and impervious surfaces;
(iii) Water resources and watershed health; and
(iv) Wildlife habitat; and
(d) Recommend whether additional rural villages should be
authorized and, if so, whether changes should be made to this section
to foster the purposes of rural villages and rural lands as described
in section 1 of this act, RCW 36.70A.011, and 36.70A.070(5).
(6) The authority of a county meeting the criteria of subsection
(2) of this section to designate a rural village in its development
regulations terminates on December 31, 2009. Any rural village
designated under this authority shall be available for the approved
uses as long as the rural village is in compliance with the conditions
of approval adopted by the county.
(7) This section applies to counties that are located within the
Puget Sound regional council's planning area.
(8) This section is intended to further the purposes of RCW
36.70A.070(5)(c), and should in no way be interpreted to alter the
requirements therein.

--- END ---