BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.76.050 and 2004 c 275 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The members of the board, except ((the chair serving on June 13,
2002, and)) the student member, shall serve for terms of four years,
the terms expiring on June 30th of the fourth year of the term ((except
that in the case of initial members, two shall be appointed to two-year
terms, three shall be appointed to three-year terms, and three shall be
appointed to four-year terms)). The student member shall hold his or
her office for a term of one year ((from)) starting on the first day of
July. ((The chair serving on June 13, 2002, shall serve at the
pleasure of the governor.))

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.76.090 and 2004 c 275 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The board shall employ a director and may delegate agency
management to the director.)) Effective July 1, 2007, an executive
director shall be appointed by the governor from a list of three names
submitted by the board to the governor. If requested by the governor,
the board shall submit additional names for the governor's
consideration until an appointment is made. The executive director
shall serve at the pleasure of the ((board)) governor, shall be the
executive officer of the board, and shall, under the board's
supervision, administer the provisions of this chapter. The executive
director shall, with the approval of the board: (1) Employ necessary
deputy and assistant directors and other exempt staff under chapter
41.06 RCW who shall serve at his or her pleasure on such terms and
conditions as he or she determines and (2) subject to the provisions of
chapter 41.06 RCW, appoint and employ such other employees as may be
required for the proper discharge of the functions of the board. The
executive director shall exercise such additional powers, other than
rule making, as may be delegated by the board by resolution. In
fulfilling the duties under this chapter, the board shall make
extensive use of those state agencies with responsibility for
implementing and supporting postsecondary education plans and policies
including but not limited to appropriate legislative groups, the
postsecondary education institutions, the office of financial
management, the work force training and education coordinating board,
and the state board for community and technical colleges. Outside
consulting and service agencies may also be employed. The board may
compensate these groups and consultants in appropriate ways.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.76.210 and 2004 c 275 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall collaborate with the four-year institutions
including the council of presidents, the community and technical
college system, and when appropriate the work force training and
education coordinating board, the superintendent of public instruction,
and the independent higher educational institutions to identify budget
priorities and levels of funding for higher education, including the
two and four-year institutions of higher education and state financial
aid programs. It is the intent of the legislature that recommendations
from the board reflect not merely the sum of budget requests from
multiple institutions, but prioritized funding needs for the overall
system of higher education.
(2) By December of each odd-numbered year, the board shall
distribute guidelines which outline the board's fiscal priorities to
the institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges. The institutions and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall submit an outline of their proposed budgets,
identifying major components, to the board no later than ((August))
July 1st of each even-numbered year.
(3) The board shall review and evaluate the operating and capital
budget requests from four-year institutions and the community and
technical college system based on how the requests align with the
board's budget priorities, the missions of the institutions, and the
statewide strategic master plan for higher education under RCW
28B.76.200.
(4) The board shall submit recommendations on the proposed budgets
and on the board's budget priorities to the office of financial
management before ((November)) October 1st of each even-numbered year,
and to the legislature by January 1st of each odd-numbered year.
(5) Institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall submit any supplemental budget requests and revisions to
the board at the same time they are submitted to the office of
financial management. The board shall submit recommendations on the
proposed supplemental budget requests to the office of financial
management by November 1st and to the legislature by January 1st.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 2007.

--- END ---