BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person who is a male citizen or noncitizen of the United
States, who applies for an original, the renewal of, or a replacement
instruction permit, intermediate license, driver's license, or
identicard under this chapter, and who is under the age of twenty-six,
must be registered as required by the military selective service act
(62 Stat. 604, 50 App. U.S.C. Sec. 451 et seq.), as amended.
(2) The submission of an application by an applicant under
subsection (1) of this section indicates that (a) the applicant has
already registered with the selective service system or (b) the
applicant authorizes the department to forward to the selective service
system the necessary personal information required for registration
into the system. The department shall forward electronically any
necessary personal information of the applicant to the selective
service system within ten days of receipt of the application, as
authorized under (b) of this subsection. When applicable, the
department shall notify the applicant at the time of application
submission that, by submitting the application, the applicant
authorizes the department to register the applicant with the selective
service system. If the applicant is under the age of eighteen at the
time of application, the department shall notify the applicant that he
will be registered with the selective service system as required by
federal law.
(3) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---