BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 89.08.400 and 2005 c 466 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Special assessments are authorized to be imposed for
conservation districts as provided in this section. Activities and
programs to conserve natural resources, including soil and water, are
declared to be of special benefit to lands and may be used as the basis
upon which special assessments are imposed.
(2) Special assessments to finance the activities of a conservation
district may be imposed by the county legislative authority of the
county in which the conservation district is located for a period or
periods each not to exceed ten years in duration.
The supervisors of a conservation district shall hold a public
hearing on a proposed system of assessments prior to the first day of
August in the year prior to which it is proposed that the initial
special assessments be collected. At that public hearing, the
supervisors shall gather information and shall alter the proposed
system of assessments when appropriate, including the number of years
during which it is proposed that the special assessments be imposed.
On or before the first day of August in that year, the supervisors
of a conservation district shall file the proposed system of
assessments, indicating the years during which it is proposed that the
special assessments shall be imposed, and a proposed budget for the
succeeding year with the county legislative authority of the county
within which the conservation district is located. The county
legislative authority shall hold a public hearing on the proposed
system of assessments. After the hearing, the county legislative
authority may accept, or modify and accept, the proposed system of
assessments, including the number of years during which the special
assessments shall be imposed, if it finds that both the public interest
will be served by the imposition of the special assessments and that
the special assessments to be imposed on any land will not exceed the
special benefit that the land receives or will receive from the
activities of the conservation district. The findings of the county
legislative authority shall be final and conclusive. Special
assessments may be altered during this period on individual parcels in
accordance with the system of assessments if land is divided or land
uses or other factors change.
Notice of the public hearings held by the supervisors and the
county legislative authority shall be posted conspicuously in at least
five places throughout the conservation district, and published once a
week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper in general circulation
throughout the conservation district, with the date of the last
publication at least five days prior to the public hearing.
(3) A system of assessments shall classify lands in the
conservation district into suitable classifications according to
benefits conferred or to be conferred by the activities of the
conservation district, determine an annual per acre rate of assessment
for each classification of land, and indicate the total amount of
special assessments proposed to be obtained from each classification of
lands. Lands deemed not to receive benefit from the activities of the
conservation district shall be placed into a separate classification
and shall not be subject to the special assessments. An annual
assessment rate shall be stated as either uniform annual per acre
amount, or an annual flat rate per parcel plus a uniform annual rate
per acre amount, for each classification of land. The maximum annual
per acre special assessment rate shall not exceed ten cents per acre.
The maximum annual per parcel rate shall not exceed five dollars,
except that: (a) For counties with a population of between seven
hundred fifty thousand and one million five hundred thousand persons,
the maximum annual per parcel rate shall not exceed ten dollars, with
all funds generated above five dollars per parcel being dedicated to
assisting commercial agricultural operations within the district's
boundaries; and (b) for counties with a population of over one million
five hundred thousand persons, the maximum annual per parcel rate shall
not exceed ten dollars.
Public land, including lands owned or held by the state, shall be
subject to special assessments to the same extent as privately owned
lands. The procedures provided in chapter 79.44 RCW shall be followed
if lands owned or held by the state are subject to the special
assessments of a conservation district.
Forest lands used solely for the planting, growing, or harvesting
of trees may be subject to special assessments if such lands benefit
from the activities of the conservation district, but the per acre rate
of special assessment on benefited forest lands shall not exceed one-tenth of the weighted average per acre assessment on all other lands
within the conservation district that are subject to its special
assessments. The calculation of the weighted average per acre special
assessment shall be a ratio calculated as follows: (a) The numerator
shall be the total amount of money estimated to be derived from the
imposition of per acre special assessments on the nonforest lands in
the conservation district; and (b) the denominator shall be the total
number of nonforest land acres in the conservation district that
receive benefit from the activities of the conservation district and
which are subject to the special assessments of the conservation
district. No more than ten thousand acres of such forest lands that is
both owned by the same person or entity and is located in the same
conservation district may be subject to the special assessments that
are imposed for that conservation district in any year. Per parcel
charges shall not be imposed on forest land parcels. However, in lieu
of a per parcel charge, a charge of up to three dollars per forest
landowner may be imposed on each owner of forest lands whose forest
lands are subject to a per acre rate of assessment.
(4) A conservation district shall prepare an assessment roll that
implements the system of assessments approved by the county legislative
authority. The special assessments from the assessment roll shall be
spread by the county assessor as a separate item on the tax rolls and
shall be collected and accounted for with property taxes by the county
treasurer. The amount of a special assessment shall constitute a lien
against the land that shall be subject to the same conditions as a tax
lien, collected by the treasurer in the same manner as delinquent real
property taxes, and subject to the same interest rate and penalty as
for delinquent property taxes. The county treasurer shall deduct an
amount from the collected special assessments, as established by the
county legislative authority, to cover the costs incurred by the county
assessor and county treasurer in spreading and collecting the special
assessments, but not to exceed the actual costs of such work. All
remaining funds collected under this section shall be transferred to
the conservation district and used by the conservation district in
accordance with this section.
(5) The special assessments for a conservation district shall not
be spread on the tax rolls and shall not be collected with property tax
collections in the following year if, after the system of assessments
has been approved by the county legislative authority but prior to the
fifteenth day of December in that year, a petition has been filed with
the county legislative authority objecting to the imposition of such
special assessments, which petition has been signed by at least twenty
percent of the owners of land that would be subject to the special
assessments to be imposed for a conservation district.

--- END ---