BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall work with the
department of early learning to develop kindergarten transition plans.
This shall include creating the format and content of the plans and
developing training for using the plans.
(2) The purpose of the kindergarten transition plans is to help
kindergarten teachers, parents, and early learning providers work
together to understand and plan for the social and academic development
of kindergarten students. The plans shall be based upon research that
acknowledges all aspects of development, including cultural differences
among children. The plans shall help support the smooth transitions
from early learning to kindergarten. The plans shall be developed to
be used by parents, early learning and child care providers,
preschools, and kindergartens.
(3) The plans shall be developed for use, to the extent possible,
beginning in September of 2007. The plans may initially be implemented
in demonstration sites under the private-public partnership in RCW
43.215.070, in schools receiving state support for all-day
kindergarten, and in primary-level demonstration projects.
(4) Kindergarten transition plans shall be implemented in public
school districts across the state not later than the 2009-10 school
year and shall also be available for voluntary use in child care,
preschool, and other early learning programs.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall seek input on
the development of the plans from the same categories of people who
were on the Washington early learning council or would be on an early
learning advisory council created during the 2007 legislative session,
and other representatives from the K-12 community.
(6) By December 31, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction,
working with the department of early learning and the private-public
partnership in RCW 43.215.070, shall report its findings and
recommendations for statewide implementation to the education
committees of the legislature.

--- END ---