BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.09.345 and 1997 c 364 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other information required to be released
under this chapter, the department is authorized, pursuant to RCW
4.24.550, to release relevant information that is necessary to protect
the public concerning offenders convicted of sex offenses.
(2) In order for public agencies to have the information necessary
to notify the public as authorized in RCW 4.24.550, and to provide for
consistency and fairness in risk assessment, the secretary shall
establish and administer an end-of-sentence review committee for the
purposes of assigning risk levels, reviewing available release plans,
and making appropriate referrals for sex offenders. The committee
shall assess, on a case-by-case basis, the public risk posed by sex
offenders who are: (a) Preparing for their release from confinement
for sex offenses committed on or after July 1, 1984; and (b) accepted
from another state under a reciprocal agreement under the interstate
compact authorized in chapter 72.74 RCW.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the committee shall
have access to all relevant records and information in the possession
of public agencies relating to the offenders under review, including
police reports; prosecutors' statements of probable cause; presentence
investigations and reports; complete judgments and sentences; current
classification referrals; criminal history summaries; violation and
disciplinary reports; all psychological evaluations and psychiatric
hospital reports; sex offender treatment program reports; and juvenile
records. Records and information obtained under this subsection shall
not be disclosed outside the committee unless otherwise authorized by
law.
(4) The committee shall review each sex offender under its
authority before the offender's release from confinement or start of
the offender's term of community placement or community custody in
order to: (a) Classify the offender into a risk level for the purposes
of public notification under RCW 4.24.550; (b) where available, review
the offender's proposed release plan in accordance with the
requirements of RCW 72.09.340; and (c) make appropriate referrals.
(5) The committee shall classify as risk level I those sex
offenders whose risk assessments indicate a low risk of reoffense
within the community at large. The committee shall classify as risk
level II those offenders whose risk assessments indicate a moderate
risk of reoffense within the community at large. The committee shall
classify as risk level III those offenders whose risk assessments
indicate a high risk of reoffense within the community at large.
(6) Where the end-of-sentence review committee assigns a risk level
classification, the risk level classification assigned by the
end-of-sentence review committee is the level to be used by law
enforcement for the purposes of community notification under RCW
4.24.550. If a law enforcement agency believes there is additional
information that was not considered by the end-of-sentence review
committee that would either mitigate or aggravate the risk level
assigned, the law enforcement agency shall forward that information to
the chair of the end-of-sentence review committee for reconsideration
at the next committee meeting. Upon reconsideration, the decision of
the end-of-sentence review committee shall be final.
(7) The committee shall issue to appropriate law enforcement
agencies, for their use in making public notifications under RCW
4.24.550, narrative notices regarding the pending release of sex
offenders from the department's facilities. The narrative notices
shall, at a minimum, describe the identity and criminal history
behavior of the offender and shall include the department's risk level
classification for the offender. For sex offenders classified as
either risk level II or III, the narrative notices shall also include
the reasons underlying the classification.

--- END ---