BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 6.13.030 and 1999 c 403 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A homestead may consist of lands, as described in RCW 6.13.010,
regardless of area, but the homestead exemption amount shall not exceed
the lesser of (1) the total net value of the lands, mobile home,
improvements, and other personal property, as described in RCW
6.13.010, or (2) the sum of ((forty)) one hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars in the case of lands, mobile home, and improvements, or the sum
of fifteen thousand dollars in the case of other personal property
described in RCW 6.13.010, except where the homestead is subject to
execution, attachment, or seizure by or under any legal process
whatever to satisfy a judgment in favor of any state for failure to pay
that state's income tax on benefits received while a resident of the
state of Washington from a pension or other retirement plan, in which
event there shall be no dollar limit on the value of the exemption.

--- END ---