BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Duly sworn and commissioned tribal law
enforcement or public safety officers who are employed by a tribal
government, Indian nation, or the bureau of Indian affairs, and are
assigned in Washington state, when entered into an agreement under
section 2 of this act, may exercise general authority peace officer
powers over non-Indian persons when those individuals are on tribal
lands or within the external boundaries of Indian reservations.
(2) Tribal law enforcement or public safety officers who are
subject to an agreement with the Washington state patrol must
successfully complete four hundred hours of basic police training that
is approved by the director of the Washington law enforcement academy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Tribal law enforcement or public safety
officers may exercise general authority peace officer powers over
non-Indian persons if the employing tribal government, Indian nation,
or the bureau of Indian affairs has entered into a written agreement
with the Washington state patrol, and the agreement contains the
following conditions:
(a) The tribe or Indian nation, but not the bureau of Indian
affairs, agrees to submit proof of adequate public liability and
property damage insurance for vehicles operated by law enforcement or
public safety officers and police professional liability insurance from
a company licensed to sell insurance in Washington state;
(b) The tribe, Indian nation, or the bureau of Indian affairs
agrees that the chief of the Washington state patrol has the authority
to suspend any commission for reasons solely within the chief's
discretion;
(c) The tribe, Indian nation, or the bureau of Indian affairs
agrees that if any provision of the agreement is violated by the tribe,
Indian nation, or the bureau of Indian affairs, or any of its agents,
the chief of the Washington state patrol shall suspend the agreement
with five days' notice. The suspension shall last until the chief is
satisfied that the violation has been corrected and will not recur;
(d) The tribe, Indian nation, or the bureau of Indian affairs
agrees that any citation issued pursuant to a commission shall be to a
court of Washington state, except that any citations issued to Indians
within the exterior boundaries of an Indian reservation may be cited to
a tribal court;
(e) The tribe, Indian nation, or the bureau of Indian affairs
agrees to meet with the chief or chief's designee of the Washington
state patrol annually or more frequently at the call of the chief of
the Washington state patrol to discuss the status of the agreement, and
invite other law enforcement or other officials to attend as necessary;
(f) Commissioned tribal law enforcement or public safety officers
shall submit a copy of any citation issued pursuant to a commission
within five days to the chief of the Washington state patrol; and
(g) Commissioned tribal law enforcement or public safety officers
may proceed in hot pursuit of an offender beyond the external
boundaries of Indian reservations.
(2) Nothing in this section impairs or affects the existing status
and sovereignty of a tribe or Indian nation as established under the
laws of the United States.
(3) Nothing in this section limits, impairs, or nullifies the
authority of county sheriffs to appoint duly commissioned state or
federally certified officers who are employees of a police or public
safety department of a tribe or Indian nation, or who are federal law
enforcement officers employed by the bureau of Indian affairs as deputy
sheriffs authorized to enforce Washington criminal and traffic laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 10 RCW.

--- END ---