BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.48.120 and 2002 c 340 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of civil disorder training if he or she
teaches or demonstrates to any other person the use, application, or
making of any device or technique capable of causing significant bodily
injury or death to persons, knowing, or having reason to know or
intending that same will be unlawfully employed for use in, or in
furtherance of, a civil disorder.
(2) Civil disorder training is a class B felony.
(3) Nothing in this section makes unlawful any act of any law
enforcement officer that is performed in the lawful performance of his
or her official duties.
(4) Nothing in this section makes unlawful any act of firearms
training, target shooting, or other firearms activity, so long as it is
not done for the purpose of furthering a civil disorder.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Civil disorder" means any public disturbance involving acts of
violence that is intended to cause an immediate danger of, or to result
in, significant injury to property or the person of any other
individual.
(b) "Law enforcement officer" means any law enforcement officer as
defined in RCW 9A.76.020(2) including members of the Washington
national guard, as defined in RCW 38.04.010.

--- END ---