BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.105.020 and 2003 c 18 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise,
the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Department" means the department of information services;
(2) "Board" means the information services board;
(3) "Committee" means the state interoperability executive
committee;
(4) "Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi municipal
corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of such
corporations and subdivisions authorized to contract separately;
(5) "Director" means the director of the department;
(6) "Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing, and necessary functions. This term
includes, but is not limited to, services acquired for equipment
maintenance and repair, operation of a physical plant, security,
computer hardware and software installation and maintenance,
telecommunications installation and maintenance, data entry, keypunch
services, programming services, and computer time-sharing;
(7) "Backbone network" means the shared high-density portions of
the state's telecommunications transmission facilities. It includes
specially conditioned high-speed communications carrier lines,
multiplexors, switches associated with such communications lines, and
any equipment and software components necessary for management and
control of the backbone network;
(8) "Telecommunications" means the transmission of information by
wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other means;
(9) "Information" includes, but is not limited to, data, text,
voice, and video;
(10) "Information processing" means the electronic capture,
collection, storage, manipulation, transmission, retrieval, and
presentation of information in the form of data, text, voice, or image
and includes telecommunications and office automation functions;
(11) "Information services" means data processing,
telecommunications, office automation, and computerized information
systems;
(12) "Equipment" means the machines, devices, and transmission
facilities used in information processing, such as computers, word
processors, terminals, telephones, wireless communications system
facilities, cables, and any physical facility necessary for the
operation of such equipment;
(13) "Information technology portfolio" or "portfolio" means a
strategic management process documenting relationships between agency
missions and information technology and telecommunications investments;
(14) "Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk analysis and
management designed to ensure optimum use of information technology
resources and telecommunications;
(15) "Personally identifiable information" means information that
can be associated with a particular natural person through one or more
identifiers or other information;
(16) "Official public business" means any legally authorized
transaction or communication between a state agency and federal
government, another state agency, tribes, or local governments, or
between a state agency, tribe, or local government and a private person
or entity;
(17) "Proprietary software" means that software offered for sale or
license;
(((16))) (18) "Video telecommunications" means the electronic
interconnection of two or more sites for the purpose of transmitting
and/or receiving visual and associated audio information. Video
telecommunications shall not include existing public television
broadcast stations as currently designated by the department of
community, trade, and economic development under chapter 43.330 RCW;
(((17))) (19) "K-20 educational network board" or "K-20 board"
means the K-20 educational network board created in RCW 43.105.800;
(((18))) (20) "K-20 network technical steering committee" or
"committee" means the K-20 network technical steering committee created
in RCW 43.105.810;
(((19))) (21) "K-20 network" means the network established in RCW
43.105.820;
(((20))) (22) "Educational sectors" means those institutions of
higher education, school districts, and educational service districts
that use the network for distance education, data transmission, and
other uses permitted by the K-20 board.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.105.052 and 2000 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall:
(1) Perform all duties and responsibilities the board delegates to
the department, including but not limited to:
(a) The review of agency information technology portfolios and
related requests; and
(b) Implementation of statewide and interagency policies,
standards, and guidelines;
(2) Make available information services to state agencies and local
governments and public benefit nonprofit corporations on a full cost-recovery basis. For the purposes of this section "public benefit
nonprofit corporation" means a public benefit nonprofit corporation as
defined in RCW 24.03.005 that is receiving local, state, or federal
funds either directly or through a public agency other than an Indian
tribe or political subdivision of another state. These services may
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Telecommunications services for voice, data, and video;
(b) Mainframe computing services;
(c) Support for departmental and microcomputer evaluation,
installation, and use;
(d) Equipment acquisition assistance, including leasing, brokering,
and establishing master contracts;
(e) Facilities management services for information technology
equipment, equipment repair, and maintenance service;
(f) Negotiation with local cable companies and local governments to
provide for connection to local cable services to allow for access to
these public and educational channels in the state;
(g) Office automation services;
(h) System development services; and
(i) Training.
These services are for discretionary use by customers and customers
may elect other alternatives for service if those alternatives are more
cost-effective or provide better service. Agencies may be required to
use the backbone network portions of the telecommunications services
during an initial start-up period not to exceed three years;
(3) Establish rates and fees for services provided by the
department to assure that the services component of the department is
self-supporting. A billing rate plan shall be developed for a two-year
period to coincide with the budgeting process. The rate plan shall be
subject to review at least annually by the customer advisory board.
The rate plan shall show the proposed rates by each cost center and
will show the components of the rate structure as mutually determined
by the department and the customer advisory board. The same rate
structure will apply to all user agencies of each cost center. The
rate plan and any adjustments to rates shall be approved by the office
of financial management. The services component shall not subsidize
the operations of the strategic planning and policy component;
(4) With the advice of the information services board and agencies,
develop a state strategic information technology plan and performance
reports as required under RCW 43.105.160;
(5) Develop plans for the department's achievement of statewide
goals and objectives set forth in the state strategic information
technology plan required under RCW 43.105.160. These plans shall
address such services as telecommunications, central and distributed
computing, local area networks, office automation, and end user
computing. The department shall seek the advice of the customer
advisory board and the board in the development of these plans;
(6) Under direction of the information services board and in
collaboration with the department of personnel, and other agencies as
may be appropriate, develop training plans and coordinate training
programs that are responsive to the needs of agencies;
(7) Identify opportunities for the effective use of information
services and coordinate appropriate responses to those opportunities;
(8) Assess agencies' projects, acquisitions, plans, information
technology portfolios, or overall information processing performance as
requested by the board, agencies, the director of financial management,
or the legislature. Agencies may be required to reimburse the
department for agency-requested reviews;
(9) Develop planning, budgeting, and expenditure reporting
requirements, in conjunction with the office of financial management,
for agencies to follow;
(10) Assist the office of financial management with budgetary and
policy review of agency plans for information services;
(11) Provide staff support from the strategic planning and policy
component to the board for:
(a) Meeting preparation, notices, and minutes;
(b) Promulgation of policies, standards, and guidelines adopted by
the board;
(c) Supervision of studies and reports requested by the board;
(d) Conducting reviews and assessments as directed by the board;
(12) Be the lead agency in coordinating video telecommunications
services for all state agencies and develop, pursuant to board
policies, standards and common specifications for leased and purchased
telecommunications equipment. The department shall not evaluate the
merits of school curriculum, higher education course offerings, or
other education and training programs proposed for transmission and/or
reception using video telecommunications resources. Nothing in this
section shall abrogate or abridge the legal responsibilities of
licensees of telecommunications facilities as licensed by the federal
communication commission on March 27, 1990; ((and))
(13) Create and maintain a registry of information systems
maintained by state agencies that contain personally identifiable
information. The registry need not include systems that contain
personally identifiable information pertaining solely to public
officials acting in their official capacity. The department may
require state agencies to provide information necessary to create and
maintain the registry. The registry shall contain at least the
following information about each information technology system used to
conduct official public business:
(a) The name of the agency responsible for the system;
(b) The name of the system;
(c) The number of records stored in the system;
(d) The United States Code, federal policy, Revised Code of
Washington, Washington Administrative Code, Washington state policy, or
other requirement, including citations, to collect the information
stored in the information technology system;
(e) The personally identifiable information stored in the system:
(i) Social security number;
(ii) Driver's license number;
(iii) Financial instrument information which includes account or
other trackable numbers;
(iv) Home address;
(v) Home phone number;
(vi) E-mail address;
(vii) Personal identification number;
(viii) Date of birth;
(ix) Unique biometric data;
(x) Bank account number;
(xi) Credit or debit card numbers; or
(xii) Any other information that can be used to access an
individual's financial accounts;
(f) The methods by which information is collected or updated;
(g) The retention schedule; and
(h) The number of system interfaces; and
(14) Perform all other matters and things necessary to carry out
the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

--- END ---