BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each plan offered to public employees and their covered
dependents under this chapter that is not subject to the provisions of
Title 48 RCW and is issued or renewed after December 31, 2007, shall
provide coverage for:
(a) Amino acid-based elemental formulas for infants and children,
when medically necessary, regardless of the delivery method: (i) For
the diagnosis and treatment of milk protein allergies and intolerances
and other food allergies and intolerances, impaired absorption of
nutrients caused by disorders affecting the absorptive surface,
functional length, motility of the gastrointestinal tract, and
inherited diseases of amino acids and organic acids; (ii) for testing
to determine an infant's or child's status with regard to various
diseases and disorders; and (iii) for any other metabolic condition
when recommended by a licensed health care provider; and
(b) Specialized amino acid-based elemental formulas when such
specialized formulas are medically necessary for the treatment of a
disease or condition and are the least restrictive means for meeting
the needs of the patient. The verification of a disease or a condition
must be directed by a licensed health care professional and
administered under the direction of a licensed health care
professional.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application
of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of the health care authority to negotiate rates and contract
with specific providers for the delivery of covered services. This
section does not apply to medicare supplemental policies or
supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited
benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each disability insurance policy issued or renewed after
December 31, 2007, that provides coverage for hospital or medical
expenses shall provide coverage for:
(a) Amino acid-based elemental formulas for infants and children,
when medically necessary, regardless of the delivery method: (i) For
the diagnosis and treatment of milk protein allergies and intolerances
and other food allergies and intolerances, impaired absorption of
nutrients caused by disorders affecting the absorptive surface,
functional length, motility of the gastrointestinal tract, and
inherited diseases of amino acids and organic acids; (ii) for testing
to determine an infant's or child's status with regard to various
diseases and disorders; and (iii) for any other metabolic condition
when recommended by a licensed health care provider; and
(b) Specialized amino acid-based elemental formulas when such
specialized formulas are medically necessary for the treatment of a
disease or condition and are the least restrictive means for meeting
the needs of the patient. The verification of a disease or a condition
must be directed by a licensed health care professional and
administered under the direction of a licensed health care
professional.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application
of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of an insurer to negotiate rates and contract with specific
providers for the delivery of services. This section does not apply to
medicare supplemental policies or supplemental contracts covering a
specified disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each group disability insurance policy issued or renewed after
December 31, 2007, that provides coverage for hospital or medical
expenses shall provide coverage for:
(a) Amino acid-based elemental formulas for infants and children,
when medically necessary, regardless of the delivery method: (i) For
the diagnosis and treatment of milk protein allergies and intolerances
and other food allergies and intolerances, impaired absorption of
nutrients caused by disorders affecting the absorptive surface,
functional length, motility of the gastrointestinal tract, and
inherited diseases of amino acids and organic acids; (ii) for testing
to determine an infant's or child's status with regard to various
diseases and disorders; and (iii) for any other metabolic condition
when recommended by a licensed health care provider; and
(b) Specialized amino acid-based elemental formulas when such
specialized formulas are medically necessary for the treatment of a
disease or condition and are the least restrictive means for meeting
the needs of the patient. The verification of a disease or a condition
must be directed by a licensed health care professional and
administered under the direction of a licensed health care
professional.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application
of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of an insurer to negotiate rates and contract with specific
providers for the delivery of services. This section does not apply to
medicare supplemental policies or supplemental contracts covering a
specified disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each health care service contract issued or renewed after
December 31, 2007, that provides coverage for hospital or medical
expenses shall provide coverage for:
(a) Amino acid-based elemental formulas for infants and children,
when medically necessary, regardless of the delivery method: (i) For
the diagnosis and treatment of milk protein allergies and intolerances
and other food allergies and intolerances, impaired absorption of
nutrients caused by disorders affecting the absorptive surface,
functional length, motility of the gastrointestinal tract, and
inherited diseases of amino acids and organic acids; (ii) for testing
to determine an infant's or child's status with regard to various
diseases and disorders; and (iii) for any other metabolic condition
when recommended by a licensed health care provider; and
(b) Specialized amino acid-based elemental formulas when such
specialized formulas are medically necessary for the treatment of a
disease or condition and are the least restrictive means for meeting
the needs of the patient. The verification of a disease or a condition
must be directed by a licensed health care professional and
administered under the direction of a licensed health care
professional.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application
of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of a contractor to negotiate rates and contract with specific
providers for the delivery of services. This section does not apply to
medicare supplemental policies or supplemental contracts covering a
specified disease or other limited benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each health maintenance agreement issued or renewed after
December 31, 2007, that provides coverage for hospital or medical
expenses shall provide coverage for:
(a) Amino acid-based elemental formulas for infants and children,
when medically necessary, regardless of the delivery method: (i) For
the diagnosis and treatment of milk protein allergies and intolerances
and other food allergies and intolerances, impaired absorption of
nutrients caused by disorders affecting the absorptive surface,
functional length, motility of the gastrointestinal tract, and
inherited diseases of amino acids and organic acids; (ii) for testing
to determine an infant's or child's status with regard to various
diseases and disorders; and (iii) for any other metabolic condition
when recommended by a licensed health care provider; and
(b) Specialized amino acid-based elemental formulas when such
specialized formulas are medically necessary for the treatment of a
disease or condition and are the least restrictive means for meeting
the needs of the patient. The verification of a disease or a condition
must be directed by a licensed health care professional and
administered under the direction of a licensed health care
professional.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application
of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of a health maintenance organization to negotiate rates and
contract with specific providers for the delivery of services. This
section does not apply to medicare supplemental policies or
supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited
benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.125 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement
established, operated, providing benefits, or maintained in this state
after December 31, 2007, that provides coverage for hospital or medical
expenses shall provide coverage for:
(a) Amino acid-based elemental formulas for infants and children,
when medically necessary, regardless of the delivery method: (i) For
the diagnosis and treatment of milk protein allergies and intolerances
and other food allergies and intolerances, impaired absorption of
nutrients caused by disorders affecting the absorptive surface,
functional length, motility of the gastrointestinal tract, and
inherited diseases of amino acids and organic acids; (ii) for testing
to determine an infant's or child's status with regard to various
diseases and disorders; and (iii) for any other metabolic condition
when recommended by a licensed health care provider; and
(b) Specialized amino acid-based elemental formulas when such
specialized formulas are medically necessary for the treatment of a
disease or condition and are the least restrictive means for meeting
the needs of the patient. The verification of a disease or a condition
must be directed by a licensed health care professional and
administered under the direction of a licensed health care
professional.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application
of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement to
negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery
of services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any schedule of benefits established or renewed by the
Washington basic health plan after December 31, 2007, shall provide
coverage for:
(a) Amino acid-based elemental formulas for infants and children,
when medically necessary, regardless of the delivery method: (i) For
the diagnosis and treatment of milk protein allergies and intolerances
and other food allergies and intolerances, impaired absorption of
nutrients caused by disorders affecting the absorptive surface,
functional length, motility of the gastrointestinal tract, and
inherited diseases of amino acids and organic acids; (ii) for testing
to determine an infant's or child's status with regard to various
diseases and disorders; and (iii) for any other metabolic condition
when recommended by a licensed health care provider; and
(b) Specialized amino acid-based elemental formulas when such
specialized formulas are medically necessary for the treatment of a
disease or condition and are the least restrictive means for meeting
the needs of the patient. The verification of a disease or a condition
must be directed by a licensed health care professional and
administered under the direction of a licensed health care
professional.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application
of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as
deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the
authority of the health care authority to negotiate rates and contract
with specific providers for the delivery of services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall provide coverage under this chapter for:
(1) Amino acid-based elemental formulas for infants and children,
when medically necessary, regardless of the delivery method: (a) For
the diagnosis and treatment of milk protein allergies and intolerances
and other food allergies and intolerances, impaired absorption of
nutrients caused by disorders affecting the absorptive surface,
functional length, motility of the gastrointestinal tract, and
inherited diseases of amino acids and organic acids; (b) for testing to
determine an infant's or child's status with regard to various diseases
and disorders; and (c) for any other metabolic condition when
recommended by a licensed health care provider; and
(2) Specialized amino acid-based elemental formulas when such
specialized formulas are medically necessary for the treatment of a
disease or condition and are the least restrictive means for meeting
the needs of the patient. The verification of a disease or a condition
must be directed by a licensed health care professional and
administered under the direction of a licensed health care
professional.

--- END ---