BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall produce educational materials discouraging
activities that harm or disturb the spawning beds of salmon and
steelhead. Discouraged activities to be addressed in the educational
materials include, but are not limited to: Wading on spawning beds;
driving motor vehicles on spawning beds; use of high-powered jet or
propeller-driven boats across spawning beds; dragging anchors through
spawning beds; digging or removing gravel from spawning beds; or any
other physical disturbance capable of disturbing spawning fish or
damaging or destroying nests of incubating eggs.
(2) The educational materials must include, at a minimum, brochures
for distribution to persons applying for fishing and boating licenses
statewide. The department must also distribute the brochures widely to
retail outlets that cater to outdoor recreation.
(3) The department shall work cooperatively with the tribal fishery
comanagers in the development of the educational materials.
(4) The department shall report to the legislature concerning the
effectiveness of this section after at least two spawning cycles of
salmon and steelhead have occurred following the initiation of
distribution of the educational materials. However, the report must be
provided by December 1, 2012, at the latest.

--- END ---