BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.16.050 and 1929 c 105 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person, firm, private or municipal corporation, or
association hereinafter called "claimant", claiming the right to the
use of water within or bordering upon the state of Washington for power
development, shall on or before the first day of ((July, 1929, and on
or before the first day of)) January of each year ((thereafter)) pay to
the state of Washington in advance an annual license fee, based upon
the theoretical water power claimed under each and every separate claim
to water according to the following schedule:
(a) For projects in operation: For each and every theoretical
horsepower claimed up to and including one thousand horsepower, at the
rate of ((ten)) eighteen cents per horsepower; for each and every
theoretical horsepower in excess of one thousand horsepower, up to and
including ten thousand horsepower, at the rate of ((two)) three and
six-tenths cents per horsepower; for each and every theoretical
horsepower in excess of ten thousand horsepower, at the rate of one and
eight-tenths cents per horsepower. The department of ecology shall, in
keeping with the rate structure under this subsection (1)(a),
biennially increase the rates enumerated in this subsection (1)(a) in
accordance with the fiscal growth factor as provided by the office of
financial management.
(b) For federal energy regulatory commission projects in operation,
the following fee schedule applies in addition to the fees in (a) of
this subsection: For each theoretical horsepower of capacity up to and
including one thousand horsepower, at the rate of thirty-two cents per
horsepower; for each theoretical horsepower in excess of one thousand
horsepower, up to and including ten thousand horsepower, at the rate of
six and four-tenths cents per horsepower; for each theoretical
horsepower in excess of ten thousand horsepower, at the rate of three
and two-tenths cents per horsepower. The department of ecology shall,
in keeping with the rate structure in this subsection (1)(b),
biennially adjust the rates enumerated in this subsection (1)(b) so
that the biennial total of fees collected under this subsection (1)(b)
increases in accordance with the fiscal growth factor as provided by
the office of financial management.
(c) To justify the appropriate use of fees collected under (b) of
this subsection, the department of ecology shall submit a progress
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature prior to
December 31, 2009, and biennially thereafter.
(i) The progress report will: (A) Describe how license fees were
expended in the federal energy regulatory commission licensing process
during the current biennium, and expected workload and full-time
equivalent employees for federal energy regulatory commission licensing
in the next biennium; (B) include any recommendations based on
consultation with the departments of ecology and fish and wildlife,
hydropower project operators, and other interested parties; and (C)
recognize hydropower operators that exceed their environmental
regulatory requirements.
(ii) The fees required in (b) of this subsection expire June 30,
2017. The biennial progress reports submitted by the department of
ecology will serve as a record for considering the extension of the fee
structure in (b) of this subsection.
(2) The following are exceptions to the fee schedule in subsection
(1) of this section:
(a) For undeveloped projects, the fee shall be at one-half the
rates specified for projects in operation; for projects partly
developed and in operation the fees paid on that portion of any project
that shall have been developed and in operation shall be the full
annual license fee ((above)) specified in subsection (1) of this
section for projects in operation, and for the remainder of the power
claimed under such project the fees shall be the same as for
undeveloped projects. ((PROVIDED, That upon the filing of statement,
as hereinafter required, by the United States or the state claiming the
right to the use of water to any extent for the generation of power, or
any other claimant to the use of water for the generation of fifty
horsepower, or less, shall be exempted from the payment of all fees
hereinafter required; and PROVIDED FURTHER, That))
(b) The fees required in subsection (1) of this section do not
apply to any hydropower project owned by the United States.
(c) The fees required in subsection (1) of this section do not
apply to the use of water for the generation of fifty horsepower or
less.
(d) The fees required in subsection (1) of this section for
projects developed by an irrigation district in conjunction with the
irrigation district's water conveyance system shall be reduced by fifty
percent to reflect the portion of the year when the project is not
operable.
(e) Any irrigation district or other municipal subdivision of the
state, developing power chiefly for use in pumping of water for
irrigation, ((may)) upon the filing of a statement((,)) showing the
amount of power used for irrigation pumping, ((be exempted)) is exempt
from the fees in subsection (1) of this section to the extent of the
power ((so)) used ((from the payment of the annual license fee herein
provided)) for irrigation pumping.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.16.090 and 1988 c 127 s 79 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All fees paid under provisions of this chapter, shall be
credited by the state treasurer to the reclamation ((revolving))
account created in RCW 89.16.020 and subject to legislative
appropriation, be allocated and expended by the director of ecology
for:
(a) Investigations and surveys of natural resources in cooperation
with the federal government, or independently thereof, including stream
gaging, hydrographic, topographic, river, underground water, mineral
and geological surveys((: PROVIDED, That in any one biennium all said
expenditures shall not exceed total receipts from said power license
fees collected during said biennium: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
portion of money allocated by said director to be expended in
cooperation with the federal government shall be contingent upon the
federal government making available equal amounts for such
investigations and surveys)); and
(b) Expenses associated with staff at the departments of ecology
and fish and wildlife working on federal energy regulatory commission
relicensing and license implementation.
(2) Unless otherwise required by the omnibus biennial
appropriations acts, the expenditures for these purposes must be
proportional to the revenues collected under RCW 90.16.050(1).

--- END ---