BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A seller may claim a credit against the tax imposed under RCW
82.08.020 on their tax return for the amount of interchange fees
charged on retail sales by a financial institution in the same calendar
year as the tax is imposed.
(2) The credit in this section only applies to the state portion of
the tax levied under RCW 82.08.020.
(3) The seller must keep records necessary to enable the department
to verify eligibility under this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Interchange fee" means the fee a merchant's financial
institution pays to a cardholder's financial institution when a
cardholder uses a credit card or debit card as payment during a retail
transaction.
(b) "Financial institution" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
63.14.010(4).

--- END ---