BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 INTENT. It is the intent of the
legislature in adopting this title to provide the necessary revenues
for the support of vital state services on a more stable and equitable
basis.

PART II
DEFINITIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 INTRODUCTORY. Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions in sections 202 through 212 of this
act apply throughout this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME. "Adjusted gross
income" means adjusted gross income as determined under the internal
revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 DEPARTMENT. "Department" means the state
department of revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FEDERAL BASE INCOME. "Federal base
income" means adjusted gross income.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 INDIVIDUAL. "Individual" means a natural
person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 INTERNAL REVENUE CODE. "Internal revenue
code" means the United States internal revenue code of 1986 and
amendments thereto, as existing and in effect on January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 PERSON OR COMPANY. "Person" or "company,"
herein used interchangeably, means any individual, receiver,
administrator, executor, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust,
estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint stock
company, business trust, municipal corporation, political subdivision
of the state of Washington, corporation, limited liability company,
association, society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit,
whether mutual, cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise and the
United States or any instrumentality thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 RESIDENT. "Resident" includes an
individual who:
(1) Has resided in this state for the entire tax year; or
(2) Is domiciled in this state unless the individual:
(a) Maintains no permanent place of abode in this state; and
(b) Does not maintain a permanent place of abode elsewhere; and
(c) Spends in the aggregate not more than thirty days in the tax
year in this state; or
(3) Is not domiciled in this state, but maintains a permanent place
of abode in this state and spends in the aggregate more than one
hundred eighty-three days of the tax year in this state unless the
individual establishes to the satisfaction of the director of revenue
that the individual is in the state only for temporary or transitory
purposes; or
(4) Claims the state of Washington as the individual's tax home for
federal income tax purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 S CORPORATION. "S corporation" means an
S corporation as defined in section 1361 of the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 TAXABLE INCOME. "Taxable income" means
federal base income as modified under sections 401 through 503 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 TAXABLE YEAR. "Taxable year" means the
taxpayer's taxable year as defined under the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 TAXPAYER. "Taxpayer" means an individual
receiving income subject to tax under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 DEFINITION OF TERMS GENERALLY. Except as
provided in sections 201 through 212 of this act, any term used in this
title has the same meaning as when used in a comparable context in the
internal revenue code.

PART III
DETERMINATION OF TAX
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 TAX IMPOSED--RATE. A tax is imposed at
the rate of one percent on all taxable income of resident individuals
and on all individuals deriving income from sources in Washington for
each taxable year. Taxable income of a taxpayer exempt from taxation
by internal revenue code section 501 is exempt from taxation by this
title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 CREDIT FOR INCOME TAXES DUE ANOTHER
JURISDICTION. (1) A resident individual is allowed a credit against
the tax imposed under this title for the amount of any income tax
imposed by another state or foreign country, or political subdivision
of the state or foreign country, on income taxed under this title,
subject to the following conditions, which shall be imposed separately
with respect to each taxing jurisdiction:
(a) The credit is allowed only for taxes imposed by the other
jurisdiction on net income from sources within that jurisdiction; and
(b) The amount of the credit shall not exceed the smaller of:
(i) The amount of tax paid to the other jurisdiction on net income
from sources within the other jurisdiction; or
(ii) The amount of tax due under this title before application of
credits allowable by this title, multiplied by a fraction. The
numerator of the fraction is the amount of the taxpayer's adjusted
gross income subject to tax in the other jurisdiction. The denominator
of the fraction is the taxpayer's total adjusted gross income as
modified by this title. The fraction shall never be greater than one.
(2) If, in lieu of a credit similar to the credit allowed under
subsection (1) of this section, the laws of the other taxing
jurisdiction contain a provision exempting a resident of this state
from liability for the payment of income taxes on income earned for
personal services performed in such jurisdiction, then the director is
authorized to enter into a reciprocal agreement with such jurisdiction
providing a similar tax exemption on income earned for personal
services performed in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 DUAL RESIDENCE. If an individual is
regarded as a resident both of this state and another jurisdiction for
state personal income tax purposes, the department shall reduce the tax
on that portion of the taxpayer's income which is subjected to tax in
both jurisdictions solely by virtue of dual residence, if the other
taxing jurisdiction allows a similar reduction. The reduction shall
equal the lower of the two taxes applicable to the income taxed twice,
multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the tax
imposed by this state on the income taxed twice. The denominator of
the fraction is the tax imposed by both jurisdictions on the income
taxed twice. The fraction shall never be greater than one.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX CREDIT. (1)
There shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this title
in the amount of the state of Washington business and occupation tax
paid by the taxpayer in the tax year subject to the limitation of
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The credit shall not exceed the smaller of:
(a) The amount of business and occupation tax paid; or
(b) The amount of tax of the taxpayer imposed by this title before
the application of credits allowed by this title, multiplied by a
fraction:
(i) The numerator is the amount of the taxpayer's adjusted gross
income attributable to activities subject to business and occupation
tax; and
(ii) The denominator is the taxpayer's adjusted gross income as
modified by this title. The fraction shall never be greater than one.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 PUBLIC UTILITY TAX CREDIT. (1) There
shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this title in the
amount of the state of Washington public utility tax paid by the
taxpayer in the tax year subject to the limitation of subsection (2) of
this section.
(2) The credit shall not exceed the smaller of:
(a) The amount of public utility tax paid; or
(b) The amount of tax of the taxpayer imposed by this title before
the application of credits allowed by this title, multiplied by a
fraction:
(i) The numerator is the amount of the taxpayer's adjusted gross
income attributable to activities subject to public utility tax; and
(ii) The denominator is the taxpayer's adjusted gross income as
modified by this title. The fraction shall never be greater than one.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 CARRYFORWARDS AND CARRYBACKS. The amount
of tax credits received by any taxpayer under sections 302, 304, and
305 of this act shall not exceed the total amount of tax due, and there
shall be no carryback or carryforward of any unused excess credits.

PART IV
TAXABLE INCOME MODIFICATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 INTRODUCTORY. In computing taxable
income, modifications shall be made to the taxpayer's federal base
income as required under sections 301 through 410 of this act, unless
the modification has the effect of duplicating an item of income or
deduction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 STATE AND LOCAL OBLIGATIONS. To federal
base income, add income which has been excluded under section 103 of
the internal revenue code in computing federal base income, except
interest on obligations of the state of Washington or political
subdivisions of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 STATE AND LOCAL INCOME TAXES--BUSINESS AND
OCCUPATION, PUBLIC UTILITY TAXES. To federal base income, add:
(1) Taxes on or measured by net income which have been deducted
under the internal revenue code in computing federal base income;
(2) The amount of taxes paid or accrued which have been deducted
for federal purposes, but for which a business and occupation tax
credit or public utility tax credit, or both, is allowed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 NET OPERATING LOSS. There shall be
allowed as a deduction from federal base income the amount of net
operating loss as allowed in section 172 of the internal revenue code.
The calculation of the loss amount shall reflect the modifications to
federal base income as provided in this title and a net operating loss
deduction may include a loss carried forward to the tax year but shall
not include a loss carried back from a future year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 CARRYOVERS. To federal base income, add
amounts which have been deducted in computing federal base income to
the extent the amounts have been carried over from taxable years ending
before the effective date of this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 FEDERAL OBLIGATIONS. From federal base
income, deduct, to the extent included in federal base income, income
derived from obligations of the United States which this state is
prohibited by federal law from subjecting to a net income tax.
However, the amount deducted under this section shall be reduced by any
expense, including amortizable bond premiums, incurred in the
production of such income to the extent the expense has been deducted
in calculating federal base income.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 STANDARD DEDUCTION. There shall be
allowed from federal base income the following standard deductions.
The standard deduction for an individual shall be:
(1) In the case of a joint return or a surviving spouse, one
million dollars;
(2) In the case of the head of a household, seven hundred fifty
thousand dollars;
(3) In the case of an individual who is not married and who is not
a surviving spouse or head of a household and in the case of a married
individual filing a separate return, five hundred thousand dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 ADJUSTMENT OF STANDARD DEDUCTIONS FOR
NONRESIDENTS. The deduction from federal base income allowed under
section 407 of this act for individual taxpayers who are not residents
of this state for the entire taxable year shall be reduced by
multiplying the amount of the deduction by a fraction. The numerator
of the fraction is the individual's adjusted gross income attributable
to sources within the state of Washington. The denominator of the
fraction is the individual's gross income from all sources. The
fraction shall never be greater than one.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409 TAX RETURNS FOR FRACTIONAL YEAR. (1) If
the first taxable year of any taxpayer with respect to which a tax is
imposed by this title ends before December 31st of the calendar year in
which this title becomes effective, the taxable income for the
fractional taxable year shall be the taxpayer's taxable income for the
entire taxable year, adjusted by one of the following methods, at the
taxpayer's election:
(a) The taxable income shall be multiplied by a fraction. The
numerator of the fraction is the number of days in the fractional
taxable year. The denominator of the fraction is the number of days in
the entire taxable year.
(b) The taxable income shall be adjusted, in accordance with rules
of the department, so as to include only such income and be reduced
only by such deductions as can be clearly determined from the permanent
records of the taxpayer to be attributable to the fractional taxable
year.
(2) If an individual taxpayer's taxable income is adjusted under
subsection (1) of this section, the deduction amounts allowed under
section 407 of this act for the taxpayer shall be reduced by
multiplying the amount of the exemption by a fraction. The numerator
of the fraction is the number of days in the taxpayer's fractional
taxable year. The denominator of the fraction is the number of days in
the entire taxable year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 410 INDEX FOR INFLATION. For each tax year
beginning after December 31, 2008, the standard deduction amounts under
section 407 of this act shall be adjusted by the department for
inflation by multiplying the standard deduction amounts of the previous
tax year by the cost-of-living adjustment as determined under internal
revenue code section 1(f) (3) through (5) for the calendar year in
which the tax year begins. No adjustment shall be made which decreases
the standard deduction amounts. If any adjustment increase is not a
multiple of ten dollars, the increase shall be rounded to the next
lowest multiple of ten dollars.

PART V
DIVISION OF INCOME, MODIFICATIONS, AND CREDITS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 APPORTIONMENT AND ALLOCATION OF INCOME.
(1) For resident individuals, all income shall be apportioned and
allocated to this state.
(2) For nonresident individuals, income derived from sources within
this state shall be apportioned and allocated to this state. For
purposes of this title:
(a) The adjusted gross income of a nonresident derived from sources
within this state is the net amount of items of income, gain, loss, and
deduction of the nonresident's federal adjusted gross income that are
derived from or connected with sources in this state including any
distributive share of partnership income and deductions, and any share
of estate or trust income and deductions, including any unrelated
business income of an otherwise exempt trust or organization.
(b) Items of income, gain, loss, and deduction derived from or
connected with sources within this state are those items attributable
to the ownership or disposition of any interest in real or tangible
personal property in this state, and a business, trade, profession, or
occupation carried on within this state. The department shall issue
rules to provide consistency of this section with the excise tax
provisions.
(c) Deduction with respect to expenses, capital losses, and net
operating losses shall be based solely on income, gains, losses, and
deductions derived from or connected with sources in this state but
shall otherwise be determined in the same manner as the corresponding
federal deduction except as provided in this title.
(d) Income from intangible personal property, including annuities,
dividends, interest, and gains from the disposition of intangible
personal property, constitutes income derived from sources within the
state of Washington only to the extent that such income is from
property employed in a business, trade, profession, or occupation
carried on within this state: PROVIDED, That distributed and
undistributed income of an electing S corporation for federal tax
purposes derived from or connected with sources within this state is
income derived from sources within this state for a nonresident
shareholder. A net operating loss of such corporation does constitute
a loss or deduction connected with sources within this state for a
nonresident shareholder.
(e) Compensation paid by the United States for service in the armed
forces of the United States performed in this state by a nonresident
does not constitute income derived from sources within this state.
(f) If a business, trade, profession, or occupation is carried on
partly within and partly without this state, the determination of net
income derived or connected with sources within this state as provided
in this section shall be made by apportionment and allocation of
chapter 82.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 PARTNERSHIPS AND S CORPORATIONS. (1)
Partnerships are not subject to tax under this title. Partners are
subject to tax in their separate or individual capacities.
(2) S corporations are not subject to tax under this title.
Shareholders of S corporations are subject to tax in their separate or
individual capacities.
(3) The taxable incomes of partners shall be computed by including
a pro rata share of the modifications under sections 401 through 503 of
this act and the credits allowed under sections 302, 304, and 305 of
this act, if the modification or credit relates to the income of the
partnership. Each partner's pro rata share of a modification or credit
is the amount of modification or credit multiplied by a fraction. The
numerator of the fraction is the partner's distributive share of
partnership income. The denominator of the fraction is the total
partnership income. The fraction shall never be greater than one.
(4) The taxable incomes of shareholders of S corporations shall be
computed by including a share of the modifications under sections 401
through 503 of this act and the credits allowed under sections 302,
304, and 305 of this act, if the modification or credit relates to the
income of the S corporation. Each shareholder's share of a
modification or credit is the amount of modification or credit
multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the
shareholder's pro rata share of S corporation income. The denominator
of the fraction is the total S corporation income. The fraction shall
never be greater than one.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "S corporation income" includes both distributed and
undistributed federal taxable income of the S corporation.
(b) "Pro rata share" means pro rata share as determined under
section 1366(a) of the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 BENEFICIARIES OF ESTATES AND TRUSTS. (1)
The taxable incomes of beneficiaries of estates and trusts thereof
shall be computed by including a share of the modifications under
sections 401 through 503 of this act and the credits allowed under
sections 302, 304, and 305 of this act.
Each taxpayer's share of a modification or credit is the amount of
modification or credit multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the
fraction is the taxpayer's share of the distributable net income of the
estate or trust. The denominator of the fraction is the total
distributable net income of the estate or trust. The fraction shall
never be greater than one.
(2) As used in this section, "distributable net income" means
distributable net income as defined in the internal revenue code. If
an estate or trust has no federal distributable net income, the term
means the income of the estate or trust which is distributed or is
required to be distributed during the taxable year under local law or
the terms of the estate or trust instrument.

PART VI
WITHHOLDING--ESTIMATED TAX
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 EMPLOYER WITHHOLDING--REQUIREMENTS. (1)
Every employer making a payment of wages or salaries earned in this
state, regardless of the place where the payment is made, and who is
required by the internal revenue code to withhold taxes, shall deduct
and withhold a tax as prescribed by the department by rule. The rules
prescribed shall reasonably reflect the annual tax liability of the
employee under this title. Every employer making such a deduction and
withholding shall furnish to the employee a record of the amount of tax
deducted and withheld from the employee on forms provided by the
department.
(2) If the employee is a resident of this state and earns income
from personal services entirely performed in another state which
imposes an income tax on the income, and the employer withholds income
taxes under the laws of the state in which the income is earned, the
employer is not required to withhold any tax imposed by this title on
the income if the laws of the state in which the income is earned allow
a similar exemption for its residents who earn income in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 LIABILITY OF EMPLOYER FOR TAX WITHHELD.
Any person required to deduct and withhold the tax imposed by this
title is liable to the department for the payment of the amount
deducted and withheld, and is not liable to any other person for the
amount of tax deducted and withheld under this title or for the act of
withholding. The amount of tax so deducted and withheld shall be held
to be a special fund in trust for this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 CREDIT FOR TAX WITHHELD--HOW CLAIMED. The
amount deducted and withheld as tax under sections 601 through 606 of
this act during any taxable year shall be allowed as a credit against
the tax imposed for the taxable year by this title. If the liability
of any individual for taxes, interest, penalties, or other amounts due
the state of Washington is less than the total amount of the credit
which the individual is entitled to claim under this section, the
individual is entitled to a refund from the department in the amount of
the excess of the credit over the tax otherwise due. If any individual
entitled to claim a credit under this section is not otherwise required
by this title to file a return, a refund may be obtained in the amount
of the credit by filing a return, with applicable sections completed,
to claim the refund. No credit or refund is allowed under this section
unless the credit or refund is claimed on a return filed for the
taxable year for which the amount was deducted and withheld.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 WITHHOLDING--EXEMPTION DECLARATIONS. An
employee shall be entitled to use and an employer shall use the
withholding exemption declaration on file with the employer for federal
income tax purposes. The department may redetermine the number of
withholding exemptions to which any employee is entitled, and the
department may require an additional withholding exemption declaration
to be filed on a form prescribed by the department where the department
finds that the exemption declaration filed for federal income tax
purposes does not properly reflect the number of withholding exemptions
to which the employee is entitled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 WITHHOLDING--FAILURE TO PAY OR COLLECT--PENALTIES. (1) The tax required by this title to be collected by the
employer shall be deemed to be held in trust by the employer until paid
to the department. Any employer who appropriates or converts the tax
deducted and withheld to his or her own use or to any use other than as
prescribed in this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) In case any employer, or a responsible person within the
meaning of internal revenue code section 6672, fails to collect the tax
herein imposed or having collected the tax, fails to pay it to the
department, the employer or responsible person shall, nevertheless, be
personally liable to the state for the amount of the tax. The interest
and penalty provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW shall apply to this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 ESTIMATED TAX IMPOSED--DUE DATE OF
ESTIMATED TAXES--AMOUNT OF ESTIMATED TAX--UNDERPAYMENT PENALTY. (1)
Each individual subject to taxation by this title which is required by
the internal revenue code to make payment of estimated taxes shall pay
to the department on forms prescribed by the department the estimated
taxes due under this title.
(2) The provisions of the internal revenue code relating to the
determination of reporting periods and due dates of payments of
estimated tax applies to the estimated tax payments due under this
section.
(3) The amount of the estimated tax shall be the annualized tax
divided by the number of months in the reporting period. No estimated
tax shall be due if the annualized tax is less than five hundred
dollars. The provisions of RCW 82.32.050 and 82.32.090 shall apply to
underpayments of estimated tax but shall not apply to underpayments, as
defined by the internal revenue code, if the tax remitted to the
department is either ninety percent of the tax shown on the return or
one hundred percent of the tax shown on the previous year's tax return.
(4) For purposes of this section, the annualized tax is the
taxpayer's projected tax liability for the tax year as computed
pursuant to internal revenue code section 6654 and the regulations
thereunder.

PART VII
CRIMES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 CRIMES. (1) Any person who knowingly
attempts to evade the tax imposed under this title or payment thereof
is guilty of a class C felony as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2) Any person required to collect tax imposed under this title who
knowingly fails to collect, truthfully account for, or pay over the tax
is guilty of a class C felony as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(3) Any person who knowingly fails to pay tax, pay estimated tax,
make returns, keep records, or supply information, as required under
this title, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor as provided in chapter
9A.20 RCW.

PART VIII
ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 METHOD OF ACCOUNTING. (1) A taxpayer's
method of accounting for purposes of the tax imposed under this title
shall be the same as the taxpayer's method of accounting for federal
income tax purposes. If no method of accounting has been regularly
used by a taxpayer for federal income tax purposes or if the method
used does not clearly reflect income, tax due under this title shall be
computed by a method of accounting which in the opinion of the
department fairly reflects income.
(2) If a person's method of accounting is changed for federal
income tax purposes, it shall be similarly changed for purposes of this
title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 PERSONS REQUIRED TO FILE RETURNS. (1) All
taxpayers shall file with the department, on forms prescribed by the
department, an income tax return for each tax year. Each person
required to file a return under this title shall, without assessment,
notice, or demand, pay any tax due thereon to the department on or
before the date fixed for the filing of the return.
(2) The department may by rule require that certain taxpayers file,
on forms prescribed by the department, informational returns for any
period. Each person required by rule to file an informational return
shall, without assessment, notice, or demand, pay any tax due thereon
to the department on or before the date fixed for the filing of the
informational return.
(3) If an adjustment to a taxpayer's federal return is made by the
taxpayer or the internal revenue service, the taxpayer shall, within
ninety days of the final determination of the adjustment by the
internal revenue service or within thirty days of the filing of a
federal return adjusted by the taxpayer, file with the department on
forms prescribed by the department a corrected return reflecting the
adjustments as finally determined. The taxpayer shall pay any
additional tax due resulting from the finally determined internal
revenue service adjustment or a taxpayer adjustment without notice and
assessment. Notwithstanding any provision of this title or any other
title to the contrary, the period of limitation for the collection of
the additional tax, interest, and penalty due as a result of an
adjustment by the taxpayer or a finally determined internal revenue
service adjustment shall begin at the later of thirty days following
the final determination of the adjustment or the date of the filing of
the corrected return.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 DUE DATE FOR FILING A RETURN--EXTENSIONS--INTEREST AND PENALTIES. The due date of a return required to be filed
with the department shall be the due date of the federal income tax
return or informational return for federal income tax purposes. The
department shall have the authority to grant extensions of times by
which returns required to be filed by this title may be submitted. The
department shall also have the authority to grant extensions of time to
pay tax with regard to taxes imposed by this title. Interest at the
rate as specified in RCW 82.32.050 shall accrue during any extension
period and the interest and penalty provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW
shall apply to late payments and deficiencies. Notwithstanding the
limitation of RCW 82.32.090, in the case of the late filing of an
informational return, there shall be imposed a penalty the amount of
which shall be established by the department by rule. The penalty
shall not exceed fifty dollars per month for a maximum of ten months.
RCW 82.32.105 shall apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 JOINT RETURN. (1) If the federal income
tax liabilities of both spouses are determined on a joint federal
return for the taxable year, they shall file a joint return under this
title unless one spouse is a resident and the other is a nonresident.
(2) If neither spouse is required to file a federal income tax
return for the taxable year, a joint return may be filed under this
title under the same conditions under which a joint return may be filed
for purposes of the federal income tax.
(3) If the federal income tax liability of either spouse is
determined on a separate federal return for the taxable year, they
shall file separate returns under this title.
(4) If one spouse is a resident and the other is a nonresident,
they shall file separate returns under this title, unless they elect to
determine their tax liabilities under this title on a joint return as
if they were both residents, and:
(a) Their federal tax liability for the taxable year was determined
on a joint federal return; or
(b) Neither spouse has filed a federal income tax return for the
taxable year and they would be permitted to file a joint federal return
for the taxable year.
(5) In any case in which a joint return is filed under this
section, the liability of the husband and wife is joint and several,
unless the spouse is relieved of liability under section 6013 of the
internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805 RECORDS--RETURNS. (1) Every taxpayer and
every person required to deduct and withhold the tax imposed under this
title shall keep records, render statements, make returns, file
reports, and perform other acts as the department requires by rule.
Each return shall be made under penalty of perjury and on forms
prescribed by the department. The department may require other
statements and reports be made under penalty of perjury and on forms
prescribed by the department. The department may require any taxpayer
and any person required to deduct and withhold the tax imposed under
this title to furnish to the department a correct copy of any return or
document which the taxpayer has filed with the internal revenue service
or received from the internal revenue service.
(2) All books and records and other papers and documents required
to be kept under this title are subject to inspection by the department
at all times during business hours of the day.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 806 ESTIMATION AGREEMENTS. The department may
reasonably estimate the items of business or nonbusiness income of a
taxpayer having an office within the state and one or more other states
or foreign countries which may be apportioned or allocated to the state
and may enter into estimation agreements with such taxpayers for the
determination of their liability for the tax imposed by this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 807 PROVISIONS OF INTERNAL REVENUE CODE
CONTROL. (1) To the extent possible without being inconsistent with
this title, all of the provisions of the internal revenue code relating
to the following subjects apply to the taxes imposed under this title:
(a) Time of payment of tax deducted and withheld under sections 301
through 306 of this act;
(b) Liability of transferees;
(c) Time and manner of making returns, extensions of time for
filing returns, verification of returns, and the time when a return is
deemed filed.
(2) The department by rule may provide modifications and exceptions
to the provisions listed in subsection (1) of this section, if
reasonably necessary to facilitate the prompt, efficient, and equitable
collection of tax under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 808 REFUNDS OF OVERPAYMENTS--OTHER
ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS. (1) The department shall refund all taxes
improperly paid or collected.
(2) The following sections shall apply to the administration of
taxes imposed under this title: 82.32.020, 82.32.050, 82.32.060,
82.32.070, 82.32.090, 82.32.100, 82.32.105, 82.32.110, 82.32.120,
82.32.130, 82.32.140, 82.32.150, 82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.32.180,
82.32.190, 82.32.200, 82.32.210, 82.32.220, 82.32.230, 82.32.235,
82.32.237, 82.32.240, 82.32.245, 82.32.265, 82.32.300, 82.32.310,
82.32.320, 82.32.330, 82.32.340, 82.32.350, and 82.32.360.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 809 The education enrichment account is
created in the state treasury. All receipts from the tax imposed under
this title shall be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used for the support of the common schools and for the support
of the state's institutions of higher education. Revenues provided
under this section shall not be used to supplant levels of funding
existing on the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 810 RULES. The department may adopt rules
under chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration and enforcement of this
title. The rules, to the extent possible without being inconsistent
with this title, shall follow the internal revenue code and the
regulations and rulings of the United States treasury department with
respect to the federal income tax. The department may adopt as a part
of these rules any portions of the internal revenue code and treasury
department regulations and rulings, in whole or in part.

PART IX
APPEALS
Sec. 901 RCW 82.03.130 and 2005 c 253 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall have jurisdiction to decide the following types
of appeals:
(a) Appeals taken pursuant to RCW 82.03.190.
(b) Appeals from a county board of equalization pursuant to RCW
84.08.130.
(c) Appeals by an assessor or landowner from an order of the
director of revenue made pursuant to RCW 84.08.010 and 84.08.060, if
filed with the board of tax appeals within thirty days after the
mailing of the order, the right to such an appeal being hereby
established.
(d) Appeals by an assessor or owner of an intercounty public
utility or private car company from determinations by the director of
revenue of equalized assessed valuation of property and the
apportionment thereof to a county made pursuant to chapter 84.12 and
84.16 RCW, if filed with the board of tax appeals within thirty days
after mailing of the determination, the right to such appeal being
hereby established.
(e) Appeals by an assessor, landowner, or owner of an intercounty
public utility or private car company from a determination of any
county indicated ratio for such county compiled by the department of
revenue pursuant to RCW 84.48.075: PROVIDED, That
(i) Said appeal be filed after review of the ratio under RCW
84.48.075(3) and not later than fifteen days after the mailing of the
certification; and
(ii) The hearing before the board shall be expeditiously held in
accordance with rules prescribed by the board and shall take precedence
over all matters of the same character.
(f) Appeals from the decisions of sale price of second class
shorelands on navigable lakes by the department of natural resources
pursuant to RCW ((79.94.210)) 79.125.450.
(g) Appeals from urban redevelopment property tax apportionment
district proposals established by governmental ordinances pursuant to
RCW 39.88.060.
(h) Appeals from interest rates as determined by the department of
revenue for use in valuing farmland under current use assessment
pursuant to RCW 84.34.065.
(i) Appeals from revisions to stumpage value tables used to
determine value by the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.33.091.
(j) Appeals from denial of tax exemption application by the
department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.36.850.
(k) Appeals pursuant to RCW 84.40.038(3).
(l) Appeals pursuant to RCW 84.39.020.
(m) Appeals relating to income tax deficiencies and refunds,
including penalties and interest, under Title 82A RCW (sections 101
through 810 of this act).
(2) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law hereafter, the
provisions of RCW 1.12.070 shall apply to all notices of appeal filed
with the board of tax appeals.

Sec. 902 RCW 82.03.140 and 2000 c 103 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In all appeals over which the board has jurisdiction under RCW
82.03.130, a party taking an appeal may elect either a formal or an
informal hearing, such election to be made according to rules of
practice and procedure to be promulgated by the board: PROVIDED, That
nothing shall prevent the assessor or taxpayer, as a party to an appeal
pursuant to RCW 84.08.130, within twenty days from the date of the
receipt of the notice of appeal, from filing with the clerk of the
board notice of intention that the hearing be a formal one: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That nothing herein shall be construed to modify the
provisions of RCW 82.03.190: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That upon an appeal
under RCW 82.03.130(1) (e) or (m), the director of revenue may, within
ten days from the date of its receipt of the notice of appeal, file
with the clerk of the board notice of its ((intention that the hearing
be held pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW)) election of a formal hearing.
In the event that appeals are taken from the same decision, order, or
determination, as the case may be, by different parties and only one of
such parties elects a formal hearing, a formal hearing shall be
granted.

PART X
APPLICATION OF TAX TO PUBLIC PENSIONS
Sec. 1001 RCW 2.10.180 and 1991 c 365 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), ((and)) (4), and
(5) of this section, the right of a person to a retirement allowance,
disability allowance, or death benefit, the retirement, disability or
death allowance itself, any optional benefit, any other right accrued
or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter, and the
moneys in the fund created under this chapter, are hereby exempt from
any state, county, municipal, or other local tax and shall not be
subject to execution, garnishment, or any other process of law
whatsoever.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not be deemed to prohibit
a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from authorizing deductions
therefrom for payment of premiums due on any group insurance policy or
plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised of public employees of
the state of Washington.
(3) Deductions made in the past from retirement benefits are hereby
expressly recognized, ratified, and affirmed. Future deductions may
only be made in accordance with this section.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the
department of retirement systems from complying with (a) a wage
assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18
RCW, (b) a notice of payroll deduction issued under chapter 26.23 RCW,
(c) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A
RCW, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued pursuant to
chapter 41.50 RCW, (e) a court order directing the department of
retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a
dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies
with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court
order expressly authorized by federal law.
(5) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or
other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW
(sections 101 through 810 of this act), nor does it prohibit the
department of retirement systems from complying with the tax
withholding requirements of that title.

Sec. 1002 RCW 2.12.090 and 1991 c 365 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), ((and)) (4), and
(5) of this section, the right of any person to a retirement allowance
or optional retirement allowance under the provisions of this chapter
and all moneys and investments and income thereof are exempt from any
state, county, municipal, or other local tax and shall not be subject
to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or
the insolvency laws, or other processes of law whatsoever and shall be
unassignable except as herein specifically provided.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the
department of retirement systems from complying with (a) a wage
assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18
RCW, (b) a notice of payroll deduction issued under chapter 26.23 RCW,
(c) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A
RCW, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued pursuant to
chapter 41.50 RCW, (e) a court order directing the department of
retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a
dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies
with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court
order expressly authorized by federal law.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not be deemed to prohibit
a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from authorizing deductions
therefrom for payment of premiums due on any group insurance policy or
plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised of public employees of
the state of Washington.
(4) Deductions made in the past from retirement benefits are hereby
expressly recognized, ratified, and affirmed. Future deductions may
only be made in accordance with this section.
(5) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or
other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW
(sections 101 through 810 of this act), nor does it prohibit the
department of retirement systems from complying with the tax
withholding requirements of that title.

Sec. 1003 RCW 6.13.030 and 1999 c 403 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
A homestead may consist of lands, as described in RCW 6.13.010,
regardless of area, but the homestead exemption amount shall not exceed
the lesser of (1) the total net value of the lands, mobile home,
improvements, and other personal property, as described in RCW
6.13.010, or (2) the sum of forty thousand dollars in the case of
lands, mobile home, and improvements, or the sum of fifteen thousand
dollars in the case of other personal property described in RCW
6.13.010((, except where the homestead is subject to execution,
attachment, or seizure by or under any legal process whatever to
satisfy a judgment in favor of any state for failure to pay that
state's income tax on benefits received while a resident of the state
of Washington from a pension or other retirement plan, in which event
there shall be no dollar limit on the value of the exemption)).

Sec. 1004 RCW 6.15.020 and 1999 c 81 s 1, and 1999 c 42 s 603 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) It is the policy of the state of Washington to ensure the well-being of its citizens by protecting retirement income to which they are
or may become entitled. For that purpose generally and pursuant to the
authority granted to the state of Washington under 11 U.S.C. Sec.
522(b)(2), the exemptions in this section relating to retirement
benefits are provided.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by federal law, any money received by
any citizen of the state of Washington as a pension from the government
of the United States, whether the same be in the actual possession of
such person or be deposited or loaned, shall be exempt from execution,
attachment, garnishment, or seizure by or under any legal process
whatever, and when a debtor dies, or absconds, and leaves his or her
family any money exempted by this subsection, the same shall be exempt
to the family as provided in this subsection. This subsection shall
not apply to child support collection actions issued under chapter
26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW, if otherwise permitted by federal law, or
to collection actions for taxes imposed under Title 82A RCW (sections
101 through 810 of this act).
(3) The right of a person to a pension, annuity, or retirement
allowance or disability allowance, or death benefits, or any optional
benefit, or any other right accrued or accruing to any citizen of the
state of Washington under any employee benefit plan, and any fund
created by such a plan or arrangement, shall be exempt from execution,
attachment, garnishment, or seizure by or under any legal process
whatever. This subsection shall not apply to child support collection
actions issued under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW if otherwise
permitted by federal law, or to collection actions for taxes imposed
under Title 82A RCW (sections 101 through 810 of this act). This
subsection shall permit benefits under any such plan or arrangement to
be payable to a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a
participant in such plan to the extent expressly provided for in a
qualified domestic relations order that meets the requirements for such
orders under the plan, or, in the case of benefits payable under a plan
described in sections 403(b) or 408 of the internal revenue code of
1986, as amended, or section 409 of such code as in effect before
January 1, 1984, to the extent provided in any order issued by a court
of competent jurisdiction that provides for maintenance or support.
This subsection shall not prohibit actions against an employee benefit
plan, or fund for valid obligations incurred by the plan or fund for
the benefit of the plan or fund.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the term "employee benefit
plan" means any plan or arrangement that is described in RCW 49.64.020,
including any Keogh plan, whether funded by a trust or by an annuity
contract, and in sections 401(a) or 403(a) of the internal revenue code
of 1986, as amended; or that is a tax-sheltered annuity described in
section 403(b) of such code or an individual retirement account
described in section 408 of such code; or a Roth individual retirement
account described in section 408A of such code; or a medical savings
account described in section 220 of such code; or an education
individual retirement account described in section 530 of such code; or
a retirement bond described in section 409 of such code as in effect
before January 1, 1984. The term "employee benefit plan" also means
any rights accruing on account of money paid currently or in advance
for purchase of tuition units under the advanced college tuition
payment program in chapter 28B.95 RCW. The term "employee benefit
plan" shall not include any employee benefit plan that is established
or maintained for its employees by the government of the United States,
by the state of Washington under chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32,
41.34, 41.35, 41.40 or 43.43 RCW or RCW 41.50.770, or by any agency or
instrumentality of the government of the United States.
(5) An employee benefit plan shall be deemed to be a spendthrift
trust, regardless of the source of funds, the relationship between the
trustee or custodian of the plan and the beneficiary, or the ability of
the debtor to withdraw or borrow or otherwise become entitled to
benefits from the plan before retirement. This subsection shall not
apply to child support collection actions issued under chapter 26.18,
26.23, or 74.20A RCW, if otherwise permitted by federal law, or to
collection actions for taxes imposed under Title 82A RCW (sections 101
through 810 of this act). This subsection shall permit benefits under
any such plan or arrangement to be payable to a spouse, former spouse,
child, or other dependent of a participant in such plan to the extent
expressly provided for in a qualified domestic relations order that
meets the requirements for such orders under the plan, or, in the case
of benefits payable under a plan described in sections 403(b) or 408 of
the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, or section 409 of such
code as in effect before January 1, 1984, to the extent provided in any
order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction that provides for
maintenance or support.
(6) Unless contrary to applicable federal law, nothing contained in
subsection (3), (4), or (5) of this section shall be construed as a
termination or limitation of a spouse's community property interest in
an individual retirement account held in the name of or on account of
the other spouse, the account holder spouse. At the death of the
nonaccount holder spouse, the nonaccount holder spouse may transfer or
distribute the community property interest of the nonaccount holder
spouse in the account holder spouse's individual retirement account to
the nonaccount holder spouse's estate, testamentary trust, inter vivos
trust, or other successor or successors pursuant to the last will of
the nonaccount holder spouse or the law of intestate succession, and
that distributee may, but shall not be required to, obtain an order of
a court of competent jurisdiction, including a nonjudicial dispute
resolution agreement entered into pursuant to RCW 11.96.170 or other
order entered under chapter 11.96A RCW, to confirm the distribution.
For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, the distributee of the
nonaccount holder spouse's community property interest in an individual
retirement account shall be considered a person entitled to the full
protection of subsection (3) of this section. The nonaccount holder
spouse's consent to a beneficiary designation by the account holder
spouse with respect to an individual retirement account shall not,
absent clear and convincing evidence to the contrary, be deemed a
release, gift, relinquishment, termination, limitation, or transfer of
the nonaccount holder spouse's community property interest in an
individual retirement account. For purposes of this subsection, the
term "nonaccount holder spouse" means the spouse of the person in whose
name the individual retirement account is maintained. The term
"individual retirement account" includes an individual retirement
account and an individual retirement annuity both as described in
section 408 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, a Roth
individual retirement account as described in section 408A of the
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, and an individual retirement
bond as described in section 409 of the internal revenue code as in
effect before January 1, 1984. As used in this subsection, an order of
a court of competent jurisdiction includes an agreement, as that term
is used under RCW 11.96A.220.

Sec. 1005 RCW 41.24.240 and 1995 c 11 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The right of any person to any future payment under the
provisions of this chapter shall not be transferable or assignable at
law or in equity, and none of the moneys paid or payable or the rights
existing under this chapter, shall be subject to execution, levy,
attachment, garnishment, or other legal process, or to the operation of
any bankruptcy or insolvency law. This section shall not be applicable
to any child support collection action taken under chapter 26.18,
26.23, or 74.20A RCW. Benefits under this chapter shall be payable to
a spouse or ex-spouse to the extent expressly provided for in any court
decree of dissolution or legal separation or in any court order or
court-approved property settlement agreement incident to any court
decree of dissolution or legal separation.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to deprive any
participant, eligible to receive a pension hereunder, from receiving a
pension under any other act to which that participant may become
eligible by reason of services other than or in addition to his or her
services under this chapter.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or
other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW
(sections 101 through 810 of this act), nor does it prohibit the
department of retirement systems from complying with the tax
withholding requirements of that title.

Sec. 1006 RCW 41.32.052 and 1991 c 365 s 21 and 1991 c 35 s 63
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsections (2) ((and)), (3), and (4) of this
section, the right of a person to a pension, an annuity, a retirement
allowance, or disability allowance, to the return of contributions, any
optional benefit or death benefit, any other right accrued or accruing
to any person under the provisions of this chapter and the moneys in
the various funds created by this chapter shall be unassignable, and
are hereby exempt from any state, county, municipal or other local tax,
and shall not be subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the
operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or other process of law
whatsoever.
(2) This section shall not be deemed to prohibit a beneficiary of
a retirement allowance who is eligible:
(a) Under RCW 41.05.080 from authorizing monthly deductions
therefrom for payment of premiums due on any group insurance policy or
plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised of public employees of
the state of Washington or its political subdivisions;
(b) Under a group health care benefit plan approved pursuant to RCW
28A.400.350 or 41.05.065 from authorizing monthly deductions therefrom,
of the amount or amounts of subscription payments, premiums, or
contributions to any person, firm, or corporation furnishing or
providing medical, surgical, and hospital care or other health care
insurance; or
(c) Under this system from authorizing monthly deductions therefrom
for payment of dues and other membership fees to any retirement
association composed of retired teachers and/or public employees
pursuant to a written agreement between the director and the retirement
association.
Deductions under (a) and (b) of this subsection shall be made in
accordance with rules that may be adopted by the director.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the
department from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child
support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold
and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of
payroll deduction issued pursuant to RCW 26.23.060, (d) a mandatory
benefits assignment order issued by the department, (e) a court order
directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly
to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3)
which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any
administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or
other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW
(sections 101 through 810 of this act), nor does it prohibit the
department of retirement systems from complying with the tax
withholding requirements of that title.

Sec. 1007 RCW 41.35.100 and 1998 c 341 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsections (2) ((and)), (3), and (4) of this
section, the right of a person to a pension, an annuity, or retirement
allowance, any optional benefit, any other right accrued or accruing to
any person under the provisions of this chapter, the various funds
created by this chapter, and all moneys and investments and income
thereof, are hereby exempt from any state, county, municipal, or other
local tax, and shall not be subject to execution, garnishment,
attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or other
process of law whatsoever, and shall be unassignable.
(2) This section does not prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement
allowance from authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of premiums
due on any group insurance policy or plan issued for the benefit of a
group comprised of public employees of the state of Washington or its
political subdivisions and which has been approved for deduction in
accordance with rules that may be adopted by the state health care
authority and/or the department. This section also does not prohibit
a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from authorizing deductions
therefrom for payment of dues and other membership fees to any
retirement association or organization the membership of which is
composed of retired public employees, if a total of three hundred or
more of such retired employees have authorized such deduction for
payment to the same retirement association or organization.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit the department
from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child support
issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold and
deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of payroll
deduction issued pursuant to RCW 26.23.060, (d) a mandatory benefits
assignment order issued by the department, (e) a court order directing
the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an
obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which
fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any
administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or
other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW
(sections 101 through 810 of this act), nor does it prohibit the
department of retirement systems from complying with the tax
withholding requirements of that title.

Sec. 1008 RCW 41.40.052 and 1999 c 83 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsections (2) ((and)), (3), and (4) of this
section, the right of a person to a pension, an annuity, or retirement
allowance, any optional benefit, any other right accrued or accruing to
any person under the provisions of this chapter, the various funds
created by this chapter, and all moneys and investments and income
thereof, are hereby exempt from any state, county, municipal, or other
local tax, and shall not be subject to execution, garnishment,
attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or other
process of law whatsoever, and shall be unassignable.
(2)(a) This section shall not be deemed to prohibit a beneficiary
of a retirement allowance from authorizing deductions therefrom for
payment of premiums due on any group insurance policy or plan issued
for the benefit of a group comprised of public employees of the state
of Washington or its political subdivisions and which has been approved
for deduction in accordance with rules that may be adopted by the state
health care authority and/or the department, and this section shall not
be deemed to prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from
authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of dues and other
membership fees to any retirement association or organization the
membership of which is composed of retired public employees, if a total
of three hundred or more of such retired employees have authorized such
deduction for payment to the same retirement association or
organization.
(b) This section does not prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement
allowance from authorizing deductions from that allowance for
charitable purposes on the same terms as employees and public officers
under RCW 41.04.035 and 41.04.036.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the
department from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child
support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold
and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of
payroll deduction issued pursuant to RCW 26.23.060, (d) a mandatory
benefits assignment order issued by the department, (e) a court order
directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly
to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3)
which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any
administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or
other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW
(sections 101 through 810 of this act), nor does it prohibit the
department of retirement systems from complying with the tax
withholding requirements of that title.

Sec. 1009 RCW 41.44.240 and 1989 c 360 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The right of a person to a pension, annuity or a retirement
allowance, to the return of contribution, the pension, annuity or
retirement allowance itself, any optional benefit, any other right
accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter,
and the moneys in the fund created under this chapter shall not be
subject to execution, garnishment, or any other process whatsoever.
(2) This section shall not apply to child support collection
actions taken under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW against
benefits payable under any such plan or arrangement. Benefits under
this chapter shall be payable to a spouse or ex-spouse to the extent
expressly provided for in any court decree of dissolution or legal
separation or in any court order or court-approved property settlement
agreement incident to any court decree of dissolution or legal
separation.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or
other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW
(sections 101 through 810 of this act), nor does it prohibit the
department of retirement systems from complying with the tax
withholding requirements of that title.

Sec. 1010 RCW 41.26.053 and 1991 c 365 s 20 and 1991 c 35 s 25
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsections (2) ((and)), (3), and (4) of this
section, the right of a person to a retirement allowance, disability
allowance, or death benefit, to the return of accumulated
contributions, the retirement, disability or death allowance itself,
any optional benefit, any other right accrued or accruing to any person
under the provisions of this chapter, and the moneys in the fund
created under this chapter, are hereby exempt from any state, county,
municipal, or other local tax and shall not be subject to execution,
garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency
laws, or any other process of law whatsoever, and shall be
unassignable.
(2) On the written request of any person eligible to receive
benefits under this section, the department may deduct from such
payments the premiums for life, health, or other insurance. The
request on behalf of any child or children shall be made by the legal
guardian of such child or children. The department may provide for
such persons one or more plans of group insurance, through contracts
with regularly constituted insurance carriers or health care service
contractors.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the
department from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child
support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold
and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of
payroll deduction issued pursuant to RCW 26.23.060, (d) a mandatory
benefits assignment order issued by the department, (e) a court order
directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly
to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3)
which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any
administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or
other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW
(sections 101 through 810 of this act), nor does it prohibit the
department of retirement systems from complying with the tax
withholding requirements of that title.

Sec. 1011 RCW 43.43.310 and 1991 c 365 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) ((and)), (3), and (4) of
this section, the right of any person to a retirement allowance or
optional retirement allowance under the provisions hereof and all
moneys and investments and income thereof are exempt from any state,
county, municipal, or other local tax and shall not be subject to
execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or the
insolvency laws, or other processes of law whatsoever and shall be
unassignable except as herein specifically provided.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the
department of retirement systems from complying with (a) a wage
assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18
RCW, (b) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter
74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of payroll deduction issued pursuant to RCW
26.23.060, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued pursuant to
chapter 41.50 RCW, (e) a court order directing the department of
retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a
dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies
with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court
order expressly authorized by federal law.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not be deemed to prohibit
a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from authorizing deductions
therefrom for payment of premiums due on any group insurance policy or
plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised of members of the
Washington state patrol or other public employees of the state of
Washington, or for contributions to the Washington state patrol
memorial foundation.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension or
other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW
(sections 101 through 810 of this act), nor does it prohibit the
department of retirement systems from complying with the tax
withholding requirements of that title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012 RCW 6.15.025 (Exemption of pension or
retirement plan benefits from execution for judgment for out-of-state
income tax) and 1991 c 123 s 3 are each repealed.

PART XI
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid,
the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1102 CAPTIONS AND PART HEADINGS. Captions and
part headings as used in this act constitute no part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1103 CODIFICATION. Sections 101 through 810
of this act constitute a new title in the Revised Code of Washington,
to be codified as Title 82A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1104 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---