BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.36.330 and 2006 c 347 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may classify a telecommunications service
provided by a telecommunications company as a competitive
telecommunications service if the service is subject to effective
competition. Effective competition means that customers of the service
have reasonably available alternatives and that the service is not
provided to a significant captive customer base. In determining
whether a service is competitive, factors the commission shall consider
include but are not limited to:
(a) The number and size of alternative providers of services,
including those not subject to commission jurisdiction;
(b) The extent to which services are available from alternative
providers in the relevant market;
(c) The ability of alternative providers to make functionally
equivalent or substitute services readily available at competitive
rates, terms, and conditions; and
(d) Other indicators of market power, which may include market
share, growth in market share, ease of entry, and the affiliation of
providers of services.
(2) Competitive telecommunications services are subject to minimal
regulation. The commission may waive any regulatory requirement under
this title for companies offering a competitive telecommunications
service when it determines that competition will serve the same
purposes as public interest regulation. The commission may waive
different regulatory requirements for different companies if such
different treatment is in the public interest. A company offering a
competitive telecommunications service shall at a minimum:
(a) Keep its accounts according to rules adopted by the commission;
(b) File financial reports for competitive telecommunications
services with the commission as required by the commission and in a
form and at times prescribed by the commission; and
(c) Cooperate with commission investigations of customer
complaints.
(3) Prices or rates charged for competitive telecommunications
services shall cover their cost. The commission shall determine proper
cost standards to implement this section, provided that in making any
assignment of costs or allocating any revenue requirement, the
commission shall act to preserve affordable universal
telecommunications service.
(4) The commission may investigate prices for competitive
telecommunications services upon complaint. In any complaint
proceeding initiated by the commission, the telecommunications company
providing the service shall bear the burden of proving that the prices
charged cover cost, and are fair, just, and reasonable.
(5) Telecommunications companies shall provide the commission with
all data it deems necessary to implement this section.
(6) No losses incurred by a telecommunications company in the
provision of competitive services may be recovered through rates for
noncompetitive services. The commission may order refunds or credits
to any class of subscribers to a noncompetitive telecommunications
service which has paid excessive rates because of below cost pricing of
competitive telecommunications services.
(7) The commission may reclassify any competitive
telecommunications service if reclassification would protect the public
interest.
(8) The commission may waive the requirements of RCW 80.36.170 and
80.36.180 in whole or in part for a service classified as competitive
if it finds that competition will serve the same purpose and protect
the public interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A noncompetitive telecommunications company may petition to
have packages or bundles of telecommunications services it offers be
subject to minimal regulation. The commission shall grant the petition
where (a) each noncompetititive service in the packages or bundle is
readily and separately available to customers at fair, just, and
reasonable prices; (b) the price of the package or bundle is equal to
or greater than the cost for tariffed services plus the cost of any
competitive services as determined in accordance with RCW 80.36.330(3);
and (c) the availability and price of the stand-alone noncompetitive
services are displayed in the company's tariff and on its web site
consistent with commission rules.
(2) For purposes of this section, the term "minimal regulation" has
the same meaning as in RCW 80.36.330(2). The commission may waive any
regulatory requirement under this title with respect to packages or
bundles of telecommunications services if it finds those requirements
are no longer necessary to protect public interest.

--- END ---