BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares:
(1) The national board for professional teaching standards has
established high and rigorous standards for what highly accomplished
teachers should know and be able to do in order to increase students'
learning results;
(2) The national board certifies teachers who meet these standards
through a rigorous, performance-based assessment process;
(3) A certificate awarded by the national board attests that a
teacher has met high and rigorous standards and has demonstrated the
ability to make sound professional judgments about how to best meet
students' learning needs and effectively help students meet challenging
academic standards; and
(4) Teachers who pursue national board certification should receive
funding assistance in order to encourage more teachers to pursue
certification for the benefit of Washington students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Certificated instructional staff who have met the eligibility
requirements and have applied for certification from the national board
for professional teaching standards shall receive funding for the
assessment fee. The assessment fee for national certification is
provided in addition to compensation received under a district's salary
schedule adopted in accordance with RCW 28A.405.200 and shall not be
included in calculations of a district's average salary and associated
salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200. The fee payment shall not be
considered earnable compensation as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
compensation earnable as defined in RCW 41.40.010 and 41.35.010.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall identify
criteria for selecting recipients if more than one thousand certified
instructional staff seek funding assistance for national board
certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of two million five hundred thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the
superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---