BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that homeowners have
experienced problems in residential construction, resulting in great
economic loss, only to discover that there are limited remedies
available at law, if any. However, it is unclear if construction
defects are an industry-wide problem or limited to a small segment of
builders and other construction professionals. The scope and nature of
the problem must be determined in order for the legislature to develop
a comprehensive solution that may necessitate several pieces of
legislation covering a wide range of issues from contractor licensing,
permit processes and sign offs, requirements of the state building code
and of building officials, as well as homeowner warranties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A committee on residential construction
is created. The committee consists of the following members who have
experience and expertise in residential construction law or residential
construction:
(a) One member from each caucus of the senate, appointed by the
president of the senate;
(b) One member from each caucus of the house of representatives,
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(c) The director of the department of labor and industries or the
director's designee;
(d) The president of the state building code council or the
president's designee;
(e) The following four members, jointly appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives and the president of the senate:
(i) Two builders;
(ii) A residential construction defect plaintiff's attorney; and
(iii) A residential construction defect defense attorney.
(2) The committee shall choose two cochairs from among its
membership.
(3) The committee shall:
(a) Examine the issue of contractor licensing including, but not
limited to, whether contractors should be licensed and what education
and training requirements should exist;
(b) Evaluate whether current surety bond requirements are
sufficient or if increased or additional bonding requirements are
necessary to protect both construction professionals and homebuyers;
(c) Examine the state building code and determine whether the code
should be strengthened to protect homeowners;
(d) Determine whether there should be increased standards for city
and county building inspectors;
(e) Study current remedies at law for residential construction
defects; and
(f) Evaluate what impact a statutory warranty for new home
construction would have on the industry and homebuyers including, but
not limited to, any concerns regarding increased insurance costs for
construction professionals. Within this evaluation, the committee
shall examine other states that have implemented statutory home
warranties including, at a minimum, Maryland and California.
(4) By December 31, 2007, the committee shall deliver to the
consumer protection and housing committee of the senate and the
judiciary committee of the house of representatives a report of the
findings and conclusions of the committee and any proposed legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires January 31, 2008.

--- END ---