BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A tax equal to ten percent is imposed on the adjusted gross
income of a professional athlete derived from Washington sources in
compensation for professional athletic labor or services.
(2) "Professional athlete" means:
(a) A resident or nonresident athlete who renders labor or services
to a professional athletic team that plays in a sports facility
financed with ten percent or more public funds; and
(b) A resident or nonresident athlete who has a gross annual income
that is ten times the first-year base salary of a public school teacher
in Washington state.
(3) "Adjusted gross income" means adjusted gross income as
determined under the United States internal revenue code of 1986 and
amendments thereto, as existing and in effect on January 1, 2006.
(4) A resident professional athlete is allowed a credit against the
tax imposed under this act for the amount of any income tax imposed by
another state or foreign country, or political subdivision of the state
or foreign country, on income taxed under this act.
(5) The tax on a nonresident professional athlete is determined by
using a fraction in which the denominator contains the total number of
days in which the individual is under a duty to perform for the
professional athletic employer, and the numerator is the total number
of those days spent in Washington.
(6) The athletic public facilities account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from the tax imposed under this section shall
be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used for the
support of public sports facilities.
(7) No taxes other than the income tax collected under this section
may be used to fund, finance, operate, or maintain a public stadium or
sports facility.

--- END ---