BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.020 and 1985 c 360 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purpose of this chapter is to promote the health, safety and
welfare of the occupants or users of buildings and structures and the
general public by the provision of building codes throughout the state
and by allowing a cause of action for damages based on the grossly
negligent failure of a county or city to enforce the provisions of the
state building code. Accordingly, this chapter is designed to
effectuate the following purposes, objectives, and standards:
(1) To require minimum performance standards and requirements for
construction and construction materials, consistent with accepted
standards of engineering, fire and life safety.
(2) To require standards and requirements in terms of performance
and nationally accepted standards.
(3) To permit the use of modern technical methods, devices and
improvements.
(4) To eliminate restrictive, obsolete, conflicting, duplicating
and unnecessary regulations and requirements which could unnecessarily
increase construction costs or retard the use of new materials and
methods of installation or provide unwarranted preferential treatment
to types or classes of materials or products or methods of
construction.
(5) To provide for standards and specifications for making
buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by ((physically
disabled persons)) individuals with disabilities.
(6) To consolidate within each authorized enforcement jurisdiction,
the administration and enforcement of building codes.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27.050 and 1985 c 360 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state building code required by this chapter shall be
enforced by the counties and cities. Building inspectors owe a duty of
care to uphold the provisions of the state building code. If a
building inspector or someone acting in the capacity of a building
inspector, in the course of his or her work, breaches that duty and
that breach results in damage to new residential construction
compromising the health, safety, or welfare of the homeowner, then the
city or county may be held liable for that building inspector's gross
negligence.
(2) Any county or city not having a building department shall
contract with another county, city, or inspection agency approved by
the county or city for enforcement of the state building code within
its jurisdictional boundaries.

--- END ---