BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state property tax levy for collection in 2008 shall be
reduced by 14.17 percent of the levy amount that would otherwise be
allowed under this chapter.
(2) The state property tax levy for collection in 2009 shall be
reduced by 13.85 percent of the levy amount that would otherwise be
allowed under this chapter.
(3) The tax reduction provided in this section is in addition to
any other tax reduction legislation that may be enacted by the
legislature.
(4) State levies for collection in 2010 and thereafter shall be set
at the amount that would otherwise be allowed under this chapter if the
state levy for collection in 2008 and 2009 had been set without the
reduction under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

--- END ---