BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.190 (Reimbursement of
extraordinary criminal justice costs) and 1999 c 303 s 1 are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
There is hereby created the extraordinary criminal justice
revolving fund in the custody of the state treasurer for the purpose of
reimbursing counties the extraordinary criminal justice costs
associated with aggravated murder cases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The attorney general is authorized to expend from the extraordinary
criminal justice revolving fund, such funds as are necessary to
reimburse the counties the extraordinary criminal justice costs
associated with aggravated murder cases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Counties may submit a petition for relief to the attorney
general for reimbursement of extraordinary criminal justice costs.
Extraordinary criminal justice costs are defined as those associated
with investigation, prosecution, indigent defense, jury impanelment,
expert witnesses, interpreters, incarceration, and other adjudication
costs of aggravated murder cases.
(2) The attorney general is responsible for the distribution of
funds from the extraordinary criminal justice revolving fund and shall,
in consultation with the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys and the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs,
develop procedures for processing the petitions, auditing the veracity
of the petitions, and prioritizing the petitions. Prioritization of
the petitions shall be based on, but not limited to, such factors as
disproportionate fiscal impact relative to the county budget, efficient
use of resources, and whether the costs are extraordinary and could not
be reasonably accommodated and anticipated in the normal budget
process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The sum of five million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the extraordinary criminal
justice revolving fund for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---