BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.206 and 2006 c 302 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A United States winery located outside the state of
Washington must hold a certificate of approval to allow sales and
shipment of the certificate of approval holder's wine to licensed
Washington wine distributors, importers, or retailers. A certificate
of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement may act as a
distributor of its own production. Notwithstanding any language in
this title to the contrary, a certificate of approval holder with a
direct shipment endorsement may use a common carrier to deliver up to
one hundred cases of its own production, in the aggregate, per month to
licensed Washington retailers. A certificate of approval holder may
not arrange for any such common carrier shipments to licensed retailers
of wine not of its own production.
(b) Authorized representatives must hold a certificate of approval
to allow sales and shipment of United States produced wine to licensed
Washington wine distributors or importers.
(c) Authorized representatives must also hold a certificate of
approval to allow sales and shipments of foreign produced wine to
licensed Washington wine distributors or importers.
(2) The certificate of approval shall not be granted unless and
until such winery ((or manufacturer of wine)) or authorized
representative shall have made a written agreement with the board to
furnish to the board, on or before the twentieth day of each month, a
report under oath, on a form to be prescribed by the board, showing the
quantity of wine sold or delivered to each licensed wine distributor,
importer, or retailer, during the preceding month, and shall further
have agreed with the board, that such wineries, manufacturers, or
authorized representatives, and all general sales corporations or
agencies maintained by them, and all of their trade representatives,
shall and will faithfully comply with all laws of the state of
Washington pertaining to the sale of intoxicating liquors and all rules
and regulations of the Washington state liquor control board. A
violation of the terms of this agreement will cause the board to take
action to suspend or revoke such certificate.
(3) The fee for the certificate of approval and related
endorsements, issued pursuant to the provisions of this title, shall be
from time to time established by the board at a level that is
sufficient to defray the costs of administering the certificate of
approval program. The fee shall be fixed by rule by the board in
accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) Certificate of approval holders are deemed to have consented to
the jurisdiction of Washington concerning enforcement of this chapter
and all laws and rules related to the sale and shipment of wine.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.170 and 2006 c 302 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for domestic wineries; fee to be
computed only on the liters manufactured: Less than two hundred fifty
thousand liters per year, one hundred dollars per year; and two hundred
fifty thousand liters or more per year, four hundred dollars per year.
(2) The license allows for the manufacture of wine in Washington
state from grapes or other agricultural products.
(3) Any domestic winery licensed under this section may also act as
a retailer of wine of its own production. Any domestic winery licensed
under this section may act as a distributor of its own production.
Notwithstanding any language in this title to the contrary, a domestic
winery may use a common carrier to deliver up to one hundred cases of
its own production, in the aggregate, per month to licensed Washington
retailers. A domestic winery may not arrange for any such common
carrier shipments to licensed retailers of wine not of its own
production. Except as provided in this section, any winery operating
as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection shall comply
with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or
retailers.
(4) A domestic winery licensed under this section, at locations
separate from any of its production or manufacturing sites, may serve
samples of its own products, with or without charge, and sell wine of
its own production at retail for off-premise consumption, provided
that: (a) Each additional location has been approved by the board
under RCW 66.24.010; (b) the total number of additional locations does
not exceed two; and (c) a winery may not act as a distributor at any
such additional location. Each additional location is deemed to be
part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. Nothing in
this subsection shall be construed to prevent a domestic winery from
holding multiple domestic winery licenses.
(5)(a) A domestic winery licensed under this section may apply to
the board for an endorsement to sell wine of its own production at
retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market.
The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars. An
endorsement issued pursuant to this subsection does not count toward
the two additional retail locations limit specified in this section.
(b) For each month during which a domestic winery will sell wine at
a qualifying farmers market, the winery must provide the board or its
designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled
wine may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board
before the winery may offer wine for sale at a qualifying farmers
market.
(c) The wine sold at qualifying farmers markets must be made
entirely from grapes grown in a recognized Washington appellation or
from other agricultural products grown in this state.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. The
approved locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection
do not include the tasting or sampling privilege of a winery. The
winery may not store wine at a farmers market beyond the hours that the
winery offers bottled wine for sale. The winery may not act as a
distributor from a farmers market location.
(e) Before a winery may sell bottled wine at a qualifying farmers
market, the farmers market must apply to the board for authorization
for any winery with an endorsement approved under this subsection to
sell bottled wine at retail at the farmers market. This application
shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers market showing
all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at which an approved
winery may sell bottled wine; and (ii) the name and contact information
for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or
its designee to verify the locations at which bottled wine may be sold.
Before authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved
winery to sell bottled wine at retail at its farmers market location,
the board shall notify the persons or entities of such application for
authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization
granted under this subsection (5)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for
any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be
necessary to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.
(6) Wine produced in Washington state by a domestic winery licensee
may be shipped out-of-state for the purpose of making it into sparkling
wine and then returned to such licensee for resale. Such wine shall be
deemed wine manufactured in the state of Washington for the purposes of
RCW 66.24.206, and shall not require a special license.

--- END ---