BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature makes the following
findings:
(1) It is in the public interest to reduce domestic violence,
sexual assault, and stalking by enabling victims to maintain the
financial independence necessary to leave abusive situations, achieve
safety, and minimize physical and emotional injuries, and to reduce the
devastating economic consequences of domestic violence, sexual assault,
and stalking to employers and employees. Victims of domestic violence,
sexual assault, and stalking should be able to recover from and cope
with the effects of such violence and participate in criminal and civil
justice processes without fear of adverse economic consequences.
(2) One of the best predictors of whether a victim of domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking will be able to stay away from an
abuser is his or her degree of economic independence. However,
domestic violence, sexual assault, and stalking often negatively impact
the victims' ability to maintain employment.
(3) An employee who is a victim of domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking, or an employee whose family member is a victim,
must often take leave from work due to injuries, court proceedings, or
safety concerns requiring legal protection.
(4) Thus, it is in the public interest to provide reasonable leave
from employment for employees who are victims of domestic violence,
sexual assault, or stalking, or for employees whose family members are
victims, to participate in legal proceedings, receive medical
treatment, or obtain other necessary services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries.
(3) "Employer" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 49.12.005.
(4) "Employee" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 49.12.005.
(5) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW
26.50.010.
(6) "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW
70.125.030.
(7) "Stalking" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW 9A.46.110.
(8) "Family member" means any individual whose relationship to the
employee can be classified as a child, spouse, parent, parent-in-law,
grandparent, or person with whom the employee has a dating
relationship.
(9) "Child," "spouse," "parent," "parent-in-law," and "grandparent"
have the same meaning as set forth in RCW 49.12.265.
(10) "Dating relationship" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW
26.50.010(3).
(11) "Reduced leave schedule" has the same meaning as set forth in
RCW 49.78.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 An employee may take reasonable leave from
work or a reduced leave schedule, with or without pay, to:
(1) Seek legal or law enforcement assistance or remedies to ensure
the health and safety of the employee or employee's family members,
including but not limited to preparing for or participating in any
civil or criminal legal proceeding related to or derived from domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking;
(2) Seek treatment by a health care provider for physical or mental
injuries caused by domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or
to attend to health care treatment for a victim who is the employee's
family member;
(3) Obtain, or assist a family member in obtaining, services from
a domestic violence shelter, rape crisis center, or other social
services program for relief from domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking;
(4) Obtain, or assist a family member in obtaining, mental health
counseling related to an experience of domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking; or
(5) Participate in safety planning, temporarily or permanently
relocate, or take other actions to increase the safety of the employee
or employee's family members from future domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) As a condition of taking time off for
any purpose set forth in section 3 of this act, an employee shall give
an employer reasonable advance notice of the employee's intention to
take time off, unless advance notice is not feasible.
(2) When an employee requests leave under section 3 of this act and
is not able to provide advance notice, the employer may require that a
request for leave under this chapter be supported by verification of
the following:
(a) The employee or employee's family member is a victim of
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking; and
(b) The leave taken was for one of the purposes described in
section 3 of this act.
(3) Verification must be provided in a timely manner. In the event
that advance notice of the leave is not feasible, verification must be
provided to the employer within a reasonable time period during or
after the leave.
(4) An employee may satisfy the verification requirement of this
section by providing the employer with one or more of the following:
(a) A police report indicating that the employee or employee's
family member was a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking;
(b) A court order protecting or separating the employee or
employee's family member from the perpetrator of the act of domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or other evidence from the court
or the prosecuting attorney that the employee or employee's family
member appeared in court;
(c) Documentation from an advocate for victims of domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking, an attorney, a member of the
clergy, or a medical or other professional, from whom the employee or
employee's family member sought assistance in addressing domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking and the effects of the violence.
The provision of documentation under this section does not waive or
diminish the confidential or privileged nature of communications
between a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking with
one or more of the above-named individuals pursuant to RCW 5.60.060,
70.123.075, 70.123.076, or 70.125.065; or
(d) An employee's written statement that the employee or the
employee's family member is a victim of domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking and that the leave taken was for one of the
purposes described in section 3 of this act.
(5) If the victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking
is the employee's family member, verification of the familial
relationship between the employee and the victim may include, but is
not limited to, a statement from the employee, a birth certificate, a
court document, or other similar documentation.
(6) An employee who is absent from work pursuant to section 3 of
this act may elect to use the employee's available paid vacation time,
personal leave time, sick leave time, compensatory time off that is
otherwise available to the employee, or unpaid leave time.
(7) An employee is required to provide only the information
enumerated in subsection (2) of this section to establish that the
employee's leave is protected under this chapter. An employee is not
required to produce or discuss any information with the employer that
is beyond the scope of subsection (2) of this section, or that would
compromise the employee's safety or the safety of the employee's family
member in any way, and an employer is prohibited from mandating any
such disclosure.
(8) To the extent allowed by law, an employer shall maintain the
confidentiality of all information provided by the employee under this
section, including the fact that the employee or employee's family
member is a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking,
that the employee has requested or obtained leave under this chapter,
and any written or oral statement, documentation, record, or
corroborating evidence provided by the employee. Information given by
an employee shall not be disclosed by an employer unless:
(a) Requested or consented to by the employee;
(b) Ordered by a court or administrative agency; or
(c) Otherwise required by applicable federal or state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Taking leave under section 3 of this act
shall not result in the loss of any pay or benefits to the employee
that accrued before the date on which the leave commenced.
(2) Upon an employee's return, an employer shall either:
(a) Restore the employee to the position of employment held by the
employee when the leave commenced; or
(b) Restore the employee to an equivalent position with equivalent
employment benefits, pay, and other terms and conditions of employment.
(3) To the extent allowed by law, an employer shall maintain
coverage under any health insurance plan for an employee who takes
leave under section 3 of this act. The coverage must be maintained,
for the duration of such leave, at the level and under the conditions
coverage would have been provided if the employee had not taken leave
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The rights provided in this chapter are
in addition to any other rights provided by state and federal law.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to discourage
employers from adopting policies that provide greater leave rights to
employees who are victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking than those required by this chapter.
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to diminish an
employer's obligation to comply with any collective bargaining
agreement or any employment benefit program or plan that provides
greater leave rights to employees than the rights provided by this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Upon complaint by an employee, the director
shall investigate to determine if there has been compliance with this
chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter. If the investigation
indicates that a violation has occurred, the director shall issue a
notice of infraction. Appeal from the director's decision is governed
by chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Any finding, determination, conclusion,
declaration, or notice of infraction made by the director, or his or
her representative or delegate, or by an appeal tribunal,
administrative law judge, reviewing officer, or other agent of the
department for purposes of enforcing this chapter, shall not be
conclusive nor binding in any civil action filed pursuant to section 12
of this act or in any other common law or other claim, whether the
prior action was between the same or related parties or involved the
same facts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) An employer found to have committed an
infraction of this chapter may be subject to a fine of up to five
hundred dollars for the first infraction and may be subject to a fine
of up to one thousand dollars for each subsequent infraction committed
within three years of a previous infraction.
(2) An employer found to have committed an infraction may also be
ordered to:
(a) Restore the employee to the position of employment held by the
employee when the leave commenced; or
(b) Restore the employee to an equivalent position with equivalent
employment benefits, pay, and other terms and conditions of employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Information contained in the complaint
files and records of employees, under the provisions of this chapter,
shall be deemed confidential and shall not be open to public
inspection: PROVIDED, That except as limited by state or federal
statutes or regulations, such information may be provided to public
employees in the performance of their official duties: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That except as otherwise limited by state or federal statutes
or regulations, a complainant or a representative of a complainant, be
it an individual or an organization, may review a complaint file or
receive specific information therefrom upon the presentation of the
signed authorization of the complainant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) No employer shall discharge, threaten
to discharge, demote, deny a promotion to, sanction, discipline,
harass, or otherwise discriminate against an employee with respect to
compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of employment because
the employee exercised rights under section 3 of this act.
(2) No employer may discharge, threaten to discharge, demote, deny
a promotion to, sanction, discipline, retaliate, harass, or otherwise
discriminate against an employee because such employee has filed or
communicated to the employer an intent to file a complaint under
section 7 or 12 of this act.
(3) No employer may discharge, threaten to discharge, demote, deny
a promotion to, sanction, discipline, retaliate, harass, or otherwise
discriminate against an employee for participation or assistance, as a
witness or otherwise, in another employee's attempt to exercise rights
under section 3, 7, or 12 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) Any employee deeming herself or himself
injured by any act in violation of this chapter shall have a civil
action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin further
violations, or to recover the actual damages sustained by the person,
or both, together with the cost of suit including reasonable attorneys'
fees.
(2) The remedy provided by this section is in addition to any
common law remedy or other remedy that may be available to an employee.
(3) An employee is not required to exhaust administrative remedies
before filing a civil action to enforce this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The department shall include notice of the
provisions of this chapter in the next reprinting of employment posters
printed under RCW 49.78.340. Employers must post this notice as
required in RCW 49.78.340.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Prosecuting attorney and victim/witness
offices are encouraged to make information regarding this chapter
available for distribution at their offices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The director shall, in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW, adopt rules necessary for the administration of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 15 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---