BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.06.335 and 2004 c 245 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington quality award council shall be organized as a
private, nonprofit corporation, in accordance with chapter 24.03 RCW
and this section.
(2) The council shall oversee the governor's Washington state
quality award program. The purpose of the program is to improve the
overall competitiveness of the state's economy by stimulating
Washington state industries, business, and organizations to bring about
measurable success through setting standards of organizational
excellence, encouraging organizational self-assessment, identifying
successful organizations as role models, and providing a valuable
mechanism for promoting and strengthening a commitment to continuous
quality improvement in all sectors of the state's economy. The
governor shall annually present the award to organizations that improve
the quality of their products and services and are noteworthy examples
of high-performing work organizations, as determined by the council in
consultation with the governor or appointed representative.
(3) The governor shall appoint a representative to serve on the
board of directors of the council.
(4) The council shall establish a board of examiners, a recognition
committee, and such other committees or subgroups as it deems
appropriate to carry out its responsibilities.
(5) The council may conduct such public information, research,
education, and assistance programs as it deems appropriate to further
quality improvement in organizations operating in the state of
Washington.
(6) The council shall:
(a) Approve and announce award recipients;
(b) Approve guidelines to examine applicant organizations;
(c) Approve appointment of board of examiners; ((and))
(d) Arrange appropriate annual awards and recognition for
recipients;
(e) Provide training to technical assistance providers from the
department of community, trade, and economic development, Washington
manufacturing service, associate development organizations, and other
organizations in continuous quality improvement, performance
measurement, strategic planning, and other approaches designed to
reduce operating costs, improve effectiveness, and increase
productivity in businesses receiving assistance; and
(f) Offer the services of a public sector and a private sector
manager to conduct conferences, perform outreach, provide training, and
deliver technical assistance to organizations, agencies, and businesses
to allow them to develop and implement quality management,
accountability, and performance systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The sum of two hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2008, from the state general fund to the
Washington quality award council for the operation of its quality award
program and the purposes of this act.
(2) The sum of two hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2009, from the state general fund to the Washington quality award
council for the operation of its quality award program and the purposes
of this act.

--- END ---