BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.08.166 and 2005 c 231 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
By September 1, 2005, the board shall expand operations in at least
twenty state-operated retail stores to include Sundays. By September
1, 2007, the board shall expand operations in at least twenty-nine
additional retail stores to include Sundays. The board shall select
the stores that are expected to gross the most revenues on Sunday by
considering factors including, but not limited to, population density,
proximity to shopping centers, and proximity to other businesses that
are open on Sunday. The selected stores shall be open for retail
business a minimum of five hours on Sunday. In implementing this
program, if the board determines it would be beneficial to retain a
consultant to assist the board in determining appropriate stores for
the program and monitoring the results of the program, the agency is
authorized to do so. The board shall track gross sales and expenses of
the selected stores and compare them to previous years' sales and
projected sales and expenses before opening on Sunday. The board shall
also examine the sales of state and contract liquor stores in proximity
to those stores opened on Sundays to determine whether Sunday openings
((has [have])) have reduced the sales of other state and contract
liquor stores that are not open on Sundays. The board shall present
this information to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature by January 31, ((2007)) 2009.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.08.190 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 927 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except for revenues generated by the 2003 surcharge of
$0.42/liter on retail sales of spirits that shall be distributed to the
state general fund during the 2003-2005 biennium, when excess funds are
distributed, all moneys subject to distribution shall be disbursed as
follows:
(a) Three-tenths of one percent to border areas under RCW
66.08.195; and
(b) From the amount remaining after distribution under (a) of this
subsection, (i) fifty percent to the general fund of the state, (ii)
ten percent to the counties of the state, and (iii) forty percent to
the incorporated cities and towns of the state.
(2) During the months of June, September, December, and March of
each year, prior to disbursing the distribution to incorporated cities
and towns under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the treasurer shall
deduct from that distribution an amount that will fund that quarter's
allotments under RCW 43.88.110 from any legislative appropriation from
the city and town research services account. The treasurer shall
deposit the amount deducted into the city and town research services
account.
(3) At the start of each fiscal year and prior to disbursing the
distribution to the state general fund under subsection (1)(b) of this
section, the treasurer shall deduct from the general fund distribution
one million nine hundred fifty thousand dollars to be deposited into
the public benefit and research services account created in section 3
of this act.
(4) The governor may notify and direct the state treasurer to
withhold the revenues to which the counties and cities are entitled
under this section if the counties or cities are found to be in
noncompliance pursuant to RCW 36.70A.340.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.110 RCW
to read as follows:
The public benefit and research services account is created in the
state treasury. The account shall consist of all money deposited,
transferred, or appropriated to the account by the legislature. Moneys
in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for the administrative office of the
courts to assist the superior courts with language interpreter services
and to assist the municipal council with research and services for
ports and special purpose districts.

--- END ---