BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in certain areas
of taxation, where both a tribe and the state have jurisdiction and
where there are challenges to administering a tax, tax agreements
between the state and a tribe are a sound approach to resolving issues
and simplifying processes. The legislature specifically recognizes
that in the area of the timber excise tax, within the boundaries of the
Quinault Reservation, the state faces challenges due to access to land
and access to taxpayers. The activity being taxed takes place entirely
within the reservation and is regulated by the tribe and by the state.
The legislature therefore finds that shifting from a state administered
tax, to a tribal tax credited against the state tax, will bring
benefits such as consistent taxation, improved forest practices and
water quality, improved fisheries, and sustainability. The legislature
intends to further the government-to-government relationship between
the state of Washington and the Quinault Nation by authorizing the
governor to enter into an agreement related to timber harvest excise
taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The governor may enter into a timber harvest excise tax
agreement with the Quinault Nation concerning the harvest of timber.
The tax agreement must meet the requirements under this section.
(2) The agreement shall be in regard to timber harvests on fee land
within the exterior boundaries of the reservation of the Quinault
Nation and are not in regard to timber harvests on trust land or land
owned by the tribe within the exterior boundaries of the reservation.
(3) The agreement must provide that the tribal tax shall be
credited against the state and county taxes otherwise due under RCW
84.33.041 and 84.33.051 with respect to timber harvested on fee land
within the exterior boundaries of the reservation of the Quinault
Nation, and that the tribal tax rate be equal to the rate of the state
tax imposed under RCW 84.33.041.
(4) Tribal ordinances for timber harvest excise taxation, or other
authorizing tribal laws, which implement the timber harvest excise tax
agreement with the state, must incorporate or contain provisions
identical to chapter 84.33 RCW that relate to the tax rates and
measures, such as stumpage values.
(5) The agreement must be for renewable periods of no more than
eight years.
(6) The agreement must include provisions for compliance, such as
inspection procedures, recordkeeping, and audit requirements.
(7) Tax revenue retained by the tribe must be used for essential
government services. Use of tax revenue for subsidization of timber
harvesters is prohibited.
(8) The governor may delegate the power to negotiate the timber
harvest excise tax agreement to the department of revenue.
(9) Information received by the state or open to state review under
the terms of the timber harvest excise tax agreement is subject to the
provisions of RCW 82.32.330. The department of revenue may enter into
an information sharing agreement with the tribe to facilitate sharing
information to improve tax collection.
(10) The timber harvest excise tax agreement must include dispute
resolution procedures, contract termination procedures, and provisions
delineating the respective roles and responsibilities of the tribe and
the department of revenue. The timber harvest excise tax agreement may
include provisions to resolve disputes using a nonjudicial process,
such as mediation.
(11) The timber harvest excise tax agreement must include
provisions to require taxpayers to submit information that may be
required by the department of revenue or tribe.
(12) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Essential government services" means services such as forest
land management; protection, enhancement, regulation, and stewardship
of forested land; land consolidation; tribal administration; public
facilities; fire; police; public health; education; job services;
sewer; water; environmental and land use; transportation; utility
services; and public facilities serving economic development purposes
as those terms are defined in RCW 82.14.370(3)(c);
(b) "Forest land" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.33.035;
(c) "Harvester" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.33.035; and
(d) "Timber" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.33.035.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 84.33 RCW
to read as follows:
A credit is allowed against the tax imposed under RCW 84.33.041 and
84.33.051, with respect to timber harvested on fee land within the
exterior boundaries of the reservation of the Quinault Nation, for a
tribal tax imposed on the same taxable activities under an agreement
authorized by section 2 of this act. Refunds may not be given in place
of credits. Credit may not be claimed in excess of the tax otherwise
due.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.33.081 and 1985 c 184 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On the last business day of the second month of each calendar
quarter, the state treasurer shall distribute from the timber tax
distribution account to each county the amount of tax collected on
behalf of each county under RCW 84.33.051, less each county's
proportionate share of appropriations for collection and administration
activities under RCW 84.33.051, and shall transfer to the state general
fund the amount of tax collected on behalf of the state under RCW
84.33.041, less the amount of the distribution under subsection (7) of
this section and the state's proportionate share of appropriations for
collection and administration activities under RCW 84.33.041. The
county treasurer shall deposit moneys received under this section in a
county timber tax account which shall be established by each county.
Following receipt of moneys under this section, the county treasurer
shall make distributions from any moneys available in the county timber
tax account to taxing districts in the county, except the state, under
subsections (2) through (4) of this section.
(2) From moneys available, there first shall be a distribution to
each taxing district having debt service payments due during the
calendar year, based upon bonds issued under authority of a vote of the
people conducted pursuant to RCW 84.52.056 and based upon excess levies
for a capital project fund authorized pursuant to RCW 84.52.053, of an
amount equal to the timber assessed value of the district multiplied by
the tax rate levied for payment of the debt service and capital
projects: PROVIDED, That in respect to levies for a debt service or
capital project fund authorized before July 1, 1984, the amount
allocated shall not be less than an amount equal to the same percentage
of such debt service or capital project fund represented by timber tax
allocations to such payments in calendar year 1984. Distribution under
this subsection (2) shall be used only for debt service and capital
projects payments. The distribution under this subsection shall be
made as follows: One-half of such amount shall be distributed in the
first quarter of the year and one-half shall be distributed in the
third quarter of the year.
(3) From the moneys remaining after the distributions under
subsection (2) of this section, the county treasurer shall distribute
to each school district an amount equal to one-half of the timber
assessed value of the district or eighty percent of the timber roll of
such district in calendar year 1983 as determined under this chapter,
whichever is greater, multiplied by the tax rate, if any, levied by the
district under RCW 84.52.052 or 84.52.053 for purposes other than debt
service payments and capital projects supported under subsection (2) of
this section. The distribution under this subsection shall be made as
follows: One-half of such amount shall be distributed in the first
quarter of the year and one-half shall be distributed in the third
quarter of the year.
(4) After the distributions directed under subsections (2) and (3)
of this section, if any, each taxing district shall receive an amount
equal to the timber assessed value of the district multiplied by the
tax rate, if any, levied as a regular levy of the district or as a
special levy not included in subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(5) If there are insufficient moneys in the county timber tax
account to make full distribution under subsection (4) of this section,
the county treasurer shall multiply the amount to be distributed to
each taxing district under that subsection by a fraction. The
numerator of the fraction is the county timber tax account balance
before making the distribution under that subsection. The denominator
of the fraction is the account balance which would be required to make
full distribution under that subsection.
(6) After making the distributions under subsections (2) through
(4) of this section in the full amount indicated for the calendar year,
the county treasurer shall place any excess revenue up to twenty
percent of the total distributions made for the year under subsections
(2) through (4) of this section in a reserve status until the beginning
of the next calendar year. Any moneys remaining in the county timber
tax account after this amount is placed in reserve shall be distributed
to each taxing district in the county in the same proportions as the
distributions made under subsection (4) of this section.
(7) On the last business day of the second month of each calendar
quarter, the state treasurer shall distribute from the timber tax
distribution account to the county an amount of tax collected by the
state under RCW 84.33.041 equal to the amount of any tribal tax
credited against the county's tax under an agreement entered into under
section 2 of this act.

--- END ---