BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.803 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 16 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish rules for issuing a certificate
of capital authorization. ((Applications for a certificate of capital
authorization shall be submitted and approved on a biennial basis.))
The rules shall address the following subjects, among others:
(a) The period of time during which applications for certificates
of capital authorization will be accepted;
(b) The period of time for which a certificate of capital
authorization will be valid; and
(c) The prioritization of applications for certificates of capital
authorization, consistent with the principles set out in this section.
(2) The rules for a certificate of capital authorization shall be
consistent with the following principles:
(((1) The certificate of capital authorization shall be approved on
a first-come, first-served basis.
(2) Those projects that do not receive approval in one
authorization period shall have priority the following biennium should
the project be resubmitted.))
(a) A certificate of capital authorization is only required for
capital expenditures exceeding the expenditure minimum as defined in
RCW 70.38.025.
(b) In processing and approving certificates of capital
authorization, priority shall be given to major renovation of existing
facilities or construction of replacement facilities. Those existing
or replacement facilities with the greatest length of time since their
last major renovation or construction, exceeding the expenditure
minimum as defined in RCW 70.38.025, shall be given first priority.
(c) Certificates of capital authorization for new facilities shall
receive last priority and be assigned on a first-come, first-served
basis.
(d) Within the priorities established by this section, applications
for certificates of capital authorization that do not receive approval
in one state fiscal year because that year's authorization limit has
been reached shall have priority the following year if the applications
are resubmitted. For example, a renovation or replacement project not
receiving certificate of capital authorization approval for one state
fiscal year shall have priority over other renovation or replacement
projects in the following year, if the applications are resubmitted;
and new facility projects not receiving certificate of capital
authorization approval for one state fiscal year shall have priority
over other new facility projects in the following fiscal year, if the
applications are resubmitted.
(e) Certificate of capital authorization applications must be filed
with the department by the end of the previous calendar year to be
considered for priority assignment the following state fiscal year
beginning July 1. For example, a facility requesting a certificate of
capital authorization for state fiscal year July 1, 2009, through June
30, 2010, must file a request for capital authorization no later than
December 31, 2008. Within ninety days of receipt of an application,
the department shall either reject the application as unacceptable or
act upon it.
(3) The department shall have the authority to give first priority
for a project that is necessitated by an emergency situation even if
the project is not submitted in a timely fashion. ((The department
shall establish rules for determining what constitutes an emergency.))
Projects shall be considered on an emergency basis if the construction
or renovation must be completed as soon as possible to:
(a) Retain a facility's license or certification;
(b) Protect the health or safety of the facility's residents; or
(c) Avoid closure.
(4) The department shall establish deadlines for progress and the
department shall have the authority to withdraw the certificate of
capital authorization where the holder of the certificate has not
complied with those deadlines in a good faith manner.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.807 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 15 are each amended
to read as follows:
The total capital authorization available for any ((biennial
period)) state fiscal year shall be specified in the biennial
appropriations act and shall be calculated on an annual basis. ((When
setting the capital authorization level, the legislature shall consider
both the need for, and the cost of, new and replacement beds.))

--- END ---