BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.16.020 and 2003 c 400 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Apprenticeship program" means an apprenticeship pilot program
approved under RCW 18.16.280 for the practice of cosmetology,
barbering, esthetics, and manicuring, which expires July 1, 2006.
(2) "Apprentice" means a person engaged in a state-approved
apprenticeship program and who may receive a wage or compensation while
engaged in the program.
(3) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(4) "Board" means the cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, and
manicuring advisory board.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing or
the director's designee.
(6) "((The)) Practice of cosmetology" means arranging, dressing,
cutting, trimming, styling, shampooing, permanent waving, chemical
relaxing, straightening, curling, bleaching, lightening, coloring,
waxing, tweezing, shaving, and mustache and beard design of the hair of
the face, neck, and scalp; temporary removal of superfluous hair by use
of depilatories, waxing, or tweezing; manicuring and pedicuring,
limited to cleaning, shaping, polishing, decorating, and caring for and
treatment of the cuticles and nails of the hands and feet, excluding
the application and removal of sculptured or otherwise artificial
nails; esthetics limited to toning the skin of the scalp, stimulating
the skin of the body by the use of preparations, tonics, lotions, or
creams; and tinting eyelashes and eyebrows.
(7) "Cosmetologist" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of cosmetology.
(8) "((The)) Practice of barbering" means the cutting, trimming,
arranging, dressing, curling, shampooing, shaving, and mustache and
beard design of the hair of the face, neck, and scalp.
(9) "Barber" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage
in the practice of barbering.
(10) "Practice of manicuring" means the cleaning, shaping,
polishing, decorating, and caring for and treatment of the cuticles and
the nails of the hands or feet, and the application and removal of
sculptured or otherwise artificial nails by hand or with mechanical or
electrical apparatus or appliances.
(11) "Manicurist" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of manicuring.
(12) "Practice of esthetics" means care of the skin by application
and use of preparations, antiseptics, tonics, essential oils, or
exfoliants, including the use of alpha hydroxy acids of no higher than
thirty percent nor lower than a pH of three or by any device, or
equipment, electrical or otherwise, or by wraps, compresses, cleansing,
conditioning, stimulation((,)) pore extraction, or product application
and removal; the temporary removal of superfluous hair by means of
lotions, creams, mechanical or electrical apparatus((,)) or appliance,
waxing, tweezing((,)) or depilatories; tinting of eyelashes and
eyebrows((;)), and lightening the hair, except the scalp, on another
person.
(13) "Esthetician" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of esthetics.
(14) "Practice of master esthetics" means the licensed practice of
esthetics plus additional requirements and scholastic criteria as
determined in rule by the department. Schools that elect to offer a
masters of esthetics program must at a minimum teach theory in the
proficiency and understanding of the concepts, and principles, and the
practical application of microdermabrasion, microcurrent, galvanic and
high frequency, and other advanced skin care therapies including, but
not limited to, ultrasonic and oxygen therapies for the skin, and
advanced chemical exfoliation using superficial peels. Schools must
also teach theory in the concepts, principles, and application of laser
technology, laser hair reduction, light, radio frequency, and plasma
devices. Additional curriculum will include, but is not limited to,
skin histology, skin disorders, dermatological/medical terminology,
dermatological pharmacology, nutrition, bacteriology, chemistry,
electricity, and skin care for precosmetic and postcosmetic procedures
or cosmetic surgical treatments.
(15) "Master esthetician" means a person first licensed under this
chapter to engage in the practice of esthetics and who meets the
requirements to be licensed as a master esthetician.
(16) "Instructor-trainee" means a person who is currently licensed
in this state as a cosmetologist, barber, manicurist, or esthetician,
and is enrolled in an instructor-trainee curriculum in a school
licensed under this chapter.
(((15))) (17) "School" means any establishment that offers
curriculum of instruction in the practice of cosmetology, barbering,
esthetics, manicuring, or instructor-trainee to students and is
licensed under this chapter.
(((16))) (18) "Student" means a person sixteen years of age or
older who is enrolled in a school licensed under this chapter and
receives instruction in any of the curricula of cosmetology, barbering,
esthetics, manicuring, or instructor-training with or without tuition,
fee, or cost, and who does not receive any wage or commission.
(((17))) (19) "Instructor" means a person who gives instruction in
a school in a curriculum in which he or she holds a license under this
chapter, has completed at least five hundred hours of instruction in
teaching techniques and lesson planning in a school, and has passed a
licensing examination approved or administered by the director. An
applicant who holds a degree in education from an accredited
postsecondary institution shall upon application be licensed as an
instructor to give instruction in a school in a curriculum in which he
or she holds a license under this chapter. An applicant who holds an
instructional credential from an accredited community or technical
college and who has passed a licensing examination approved or
administered by the director shall upon application be licensed as an
instructor to give instruction in a school in a curriculum in which he
or she holds a license under this chapter.
(((18))) (20) "Person" means any individual, partnership,
professional service corporation, joint stock association, joint
venture, or any other entity authorized to do business in this state.
(((19))) (21) "Salon/shop" means any building, structure, or any
part thereof, other than a school, where the commercial practice of
cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or manicuring is conducted; provided
that any person, except employees of a salon/shop, who operates from a
salon/shop is required to meet all salon/shop licensing requirements
and may participate in the apprenticeship program when certified by the
advisory committee as established by the department of labor and
industries apprenticeship council.
(((20))) (22) "Crossover training" means training approved by the
director as training hours that may be credited to current licensees
for similar training received in another profession licensed under this
chapter.
(((21))) (23) "Approved security" means surety bond.
(((22))) (24) "Personal services" means a location licensed under
this chapter where the practice of cosmetology, barbering, manicuring,
or esthetics is performed for clients in the client's home, office, or
other location that is convenient for the client.
(((23))) (25) "Individual license" means a cosmetology, barber,
manicurist, esthetician, or instructor license issued under this
chapter.
(((24))) (26) "Location license" means a license issued under this
chapter for a salon/shop, school, personal services, or mobile unit.
(((25))) (27) "Mobile unit" is a location license under this
chapter where the practice of cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or
manicuring is conducted in a mobile structure. Mobile units must
conform to the health and safety standards set by rule under this
chapter.
(((26))) (28) "Curriculum" means the courses of study taught at a
school, set by rule under this chapter, and approved by the department.
After consulting with the board, the director may set by rule a
percentage of hours in a curriculum, up to a maximum of ten percent,
that could include hours a student receives while training in a
salon/shop under a contract approved by the department. Each
curriculum must include at least the following required hours:
(a) Cosmetologist, one thousand six hundred hours;
(b) Barber, one thousand hours;
(c) Manicurist, six hundred hours;
(d) Esthetician, six hundred hours;
(e) Master estheticians, seven hundred hours;
(f) Instructor-trainee, five hundred hours.
(((27))) (29) "Student monthly report" means the student record of
daily activities and the number of hours completed in each course of a
curriculum that is prepared monthly by the school and provided to the
student, audited annually by the department, and kept on file by the
school for three years.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.16.100 and 2003 c 400 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon completion of an application approved by the department
and payment of the proper fee, the director shall issue the appropriate
license to any person who:
(a) Is at least seventeen years of age or older;
(b)(i) Has completed and graduated from a school licensed under
this chapter in a curriculum approved by the director of sixteen
hundred hours of training in cosmetology, one thousand hours of
training in barbering, six hundred hours of training in manicuring, six
hundred hours of training in esthetics, seven hundred hours of training
in esthetics for master esthetics licenses, and/or five hundred hours
of training as an instructor-trainee, or has met the requirements in
RCW 18.16.020 or 18.16.130; or
(ii) Has successfully completed a state-approved apprenticeship
training program; and
(c) Has received a passing grade on the appropriate licensing
examination approved or administered by the director.
(2) A person currently licensed under this chapter may qualify for
examination and licensure, after the required examination is passed, in
another category if he or she has completed the crossover training
course.
(3) Upon completion of an application approved by the department,
certification of insurance, and payment of the proper fee, the director
shall issue a location license to the applicant.
(4) The director may consult with the state board of health and the
department of labor and industries in establishing training,
apprenticeship, and examination requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must waive the curriculum requirements for licensure
as a master esthetician for an individual who files a license
application before April 30, 2008, and meets the following conditions:
(1) Has at least seven consecutive years' employment as a licensed
esthetician in good standing, immediately preceding application for a
master esthetician; or
(2) Holds a comite' international d'esthe'tique et de cosme'tologie
international diploma and is currently licensed in good standing as an
esthetician when making an application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---