BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.130.070 and 2006 c 99 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The secretary shall adopt rules requiring every license
holder to report to the appropriate disciplining authority any
conviction, determination, or finding that another license holder has
committed an act which constitutes unprofessional conduct, or to report
information to the disciplining authority, an impaired practitioner
program, or voluntary substance abuse monitoring program approved by
the disciplining authority, which indicates that the other license
holder may not be able to practice his or her profession with
reasonable skill and safety to consumers as a result of a mental or
physical condition.
(b) The secretary may adopt rules to require other persons,
including corporations, organizations, health care facilities, impaired
practitioner programs, or voluntary substance abuse monitoring programs
approved by a disciplining authority, and state or local government
agencies to report:
(i) Any conviction, determination, or finding that a license holder
has committed an act which constitutes unprofessional conduct; or
(ii) Information to the disciplining authority, an impaired
practitioner program, or voluntary substance abuse monitoring program
approved by the disciplining authority, which indicates that the
license holder may not be able to practice his or her profession with
reasonable skill and safety to consumers as a result of a mental or
physical condition.
(c) If a report has been made by a hospital to the department
pursuant to RCW 70.41.210, a report to the disciplining authority is
not required. To facilitate meeting the intent of this section, the
cooperation of agencies of the federal government is requested by
reporting any conviction, determination, or finding that a federal
employee or contractor regulated by the disciplining authorities
enumerated in this chapter has committed an act which constituted
unprofessional conduct and reporting any information which indicates
that a federal employee or contractor regulated by the disciplining
authorities enumerated in this chapter may not be able to practice his
or her profession with reasonable skill and safety as a result of a
mental or physical condition.
(d) Reporting under this section is not required by:
(i) Any entity with a peer review committee, quality improvement
committee or other similarly designated professional review committee,
or by a license holder who is a member of such committee, during the
investigative phase of the respective committee's operations if the
investigation is completed in a timely manner; or
(ii) An impaired practitioner program or voluntary substance abuse
monitoring program approved by a disciplining authority under RCW
18.130.175 if the license holder is currently enrolled in the treatment
program, so long as the license holder actively participates in the
treatment program and the license holder's impairment does not
constitute a clear and present danger to the public health, safety, or
welfare.
(2) If a person fails to furnish a required report, the
disciplining authority may petition the superior court of the county in
which the person resides or is found, and the court shall issue to the
person an order to furnish the required report. A failure to obey the
order is a contempt of court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW.
(3) A person is immune from civil liability, whether direct or
derivative, for providing information to the disciplining authority
pursuant to the rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Any member of a health profession listed under RCW 18.130.040
who has reasonable cause to believe that any other member of a health
profession listed under RCW 18.130.040 has engaged in unprofessional
conduct pursuant to RCW 18.130.180 is required to report such
unprofessional conduct to the agency, board, or commission responsible
for disciplinary activities for the person's profession under this
chapter. Failure to report such unprofessional conduct constitutes
unprofessional conduct under RCW 18.130.180. Any member of a health
profession listed under RCW 18.130.040 who makes such a report of
unprofessional conduct shall be immune from civil action for damages as
provided in RCW 4.24.260.
(5)(a) The holder of a license subject to the jurisdiction of this
chapter shall report to the disciplining authority:
(i) Any conviction, determination, or finding that he or she has
committed unprofessional conduct or is unable to practice with
reasonable skill or safety; and
(ii) Any disqualification from participation in the federal
medicare program, under Title XVIII of the federal social security act
or the federal medicaid program, under Title XIX of the federal social
security act.
(b) Failure to report within thirty days of notice of the
conviction, determination, finding, or disqualification constitutes
grounds for disciplinary action.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.130.180 and 1995 c 336 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute
unprofessional conduct for any license holder or applicant under the
jurisdiction of this chapter:
(1) The commission of any act involving moral turpitude,
dishonesty, or corruption relating to the practice of the person's
profession, whether the act constitutes a crime or not. If the act
constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is not a
condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction,
however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the
ensuing disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license holder or
applicant of the crime described in the indictment or information, and
of the person's violation of the statute on which it is based. For the
purposes of this section, conviction includes all instances in which a
plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for the conviction and
all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended.
Nothing in this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A
RCW;
(2) Misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in
obtaining a license or in reinstatement thereof;
(3) All advertising which is false, fraudulent, or misleading;
(4) Incompetence, negligence, or malpractice which results in
injury to a patient or which creates an unreasonable risk that a
patient may be harmed. The use of a nontraditional treatment by itself
shall not constitute unprofessional conduct, provided that it does not
result in injury to a patient or create an unreasonable risk that a
patient may be harmed;
(5) Suspension, revocation, or restriction of the individual's
license to practice any health care profession by competent authority
in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, a certified copy of the
order, stipulation, or agreement being conclusive evidence of the
revocation, suspension, or restriction;
(6) The possession, use, prescription for use, or distribution of
controlled substances or legend drugs in any way other than for
legitimate or therapeutic purposes, diversion of controlled substances
or legend drugs, the violation of any drug law, or prescribing
controlled substances for oneself;
(7) Violation of any state or federal statute or administrative
rule regulating the profession in question, including any statute or
rule defining or establishing standards of patient care or professional
conduct or practice;
(8) Failure to cooperate with the disciplining authority by:
(a) Not furnishing any papers or documents;
(b) Not furnishing in writing a full and complete explanation
covering the matter contained in the complaint filed with the
disciplining authority;
(c) Not responding to subpoenas issued by the disciplining
authority, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena is the accused
in the proceeding; or
(d) Not providing reasonable and timely access for authorized
representatives of the disciplining authority seeking to perform
practice reviews at facilities utilized by the license holder;
(9) Failure to comply with an order issued by the disciplining
authority or a stipulation for informal disposition entered into with
the disciplining authority;
(10) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to practice when a
license is required;
(11) Violations of rules established by any health agency;
(12) Practice beyond the scope of practice as defined by law or
rule;
(13) Misrepresentation or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of the
business or profession;
(14) Failure to adequately supervise auxiliary staff to the extent
that the consumer's health or safety is at risk;
(15) Engaging in a profession involving contact with the public
while suffering from a contagious or infectious disease involving
serious risk to public health;
(16) Promotion for personal gain of any unnecessary or
inefficacious drug, device, treatment, procedure, or service;
(17) Conviction of any gross misdemeanor or felony relating to the
practice of the person's profession. For the purposes of this
subsection, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere is the basis for conviction and all proceedings in
which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this
section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;
(18) The procuring, or aiding or abetting in procuring, a criminal
abortion;
(19) The offering, undertaking, or agreeing to cure or treat
disease by a secret method, procedure, treatment, or medicine, or the
treating, operating, or prescribing for any health condition by a
method, means, or procedure which the licensee refuses to divulge upon
demand of the disciplining authority;
(20) The willful betrayal of a practitioner-patient privilege as
recognized by law;
(21) Violation of chapter 19.68 RCW;
(22) Interference with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding
by willful misrepresentation of facts before the disciplining authority
or its authorized representative, or by the use of threats or
harassment against any patient or witness to prevent them from
providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any other legal
action, or by the use of financial inducements to any patient or
witness to prevent or attempt to prevent him or her from providing
evidence in a disciplinary proceeding;
(23) Current misuse of:
(a) Alcohol;
(b) Controlled substances; or
(c) Legend drugs;
(24) Abuse of a client or patient or sexual contact with a client
or patient;
(25) Acceptance of more than a nominal gratuity, hospitality, or
subsidy offered by a representative or vendor of medical or health-related products or services intended for patients, in contemplation of
a sale or for use in research publishable in professional journals,
where a conflict of interest is presented, as defined by rules of the
disciplining authority, in consultation with the department, based on
recognized professional ethical standards;
(26) Failure to report unprofessional conduct as required by RCW
18.130.070(4) constitutes unprofessional conduct.

--- END ---