BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of labor and industries
shall conduct a study of the outcomes of injured workers found
employable and not eligible for vocational rehabilitation benefits.
The outcomes to be studied shall include the injured workers'
employment status at the time the study is conducted, and the injured
workers' economic status at the time the study is conducted compared to
their economic status prior to injury.
(2) The department shall contract with an independent researcher,
approved by the labor and business members of the workers' compensation
advisory committee, to conduct the study.
(3) In conducting the study, the researcher selected shall consider
the following:
(a) The employment history of the injured worker found to be
employable two years and four years after the worker's claim was
closed;
(b) The number of injured workers found to be employable by the
department who later receive other forms of public assistance; and
(c) Innovative programs in other jurisdictions that have gainful
employment statutes without a minimum wage component.
(4) The department shall report to the workers' compensation
advisory committee on the results of the study on or before July 1,
2008.

--- END ---