BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 27.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the Washington talking book and Braille
library is a statewide public library for Washington residents who
cannot read conventional books due to blindness, learning disabilities,
or physical disabilities. Using free postage provided by the United
States postal service, the Washington talking book and Braille library
lends talking books, talking book players, Braille materials, and other
items to over eleven thousand patrons located throughout Washington
state.
The Washington state library has the statutory authority and
responsibility for providing these services. The Washington talking
book and Braille library is currently operated by the Seattle public
library, city of Seattle, through a contract with the Washington state
library.
The 2003-2005 and 2005-2007 biennial contracts between the city of
Seattle and the state library included provisions to study the
transition of the Washington talking book and Braille program from the
city to the state. A contract to study the transition was funded
jointly by the city and the state library.
The legislature further finds that chapter 22, Laws of 1993 1st sp.
sess. appropriated three million three hundred thousand dollars to
purchase and renovate real estate for a permanent home for the
Washington talking book and Braille library, a state program, created
pursuant to RCW 27.04.045(14). The city of Seattle was entrusted to
acquire a building, renovate such building, and provide rent-free space
as a permanent home for the library for as long as the state contracts
for such services from the Seattle public library. The state of
Washington appropriated the three million three hundred thousand
dollars so the Seattle public library would provide such services. The
state continued to pay the Seattle public library for all operating
expenses after the building was occupied. The city of Seattle provided
no funding and covenanted that the state funds would be used only for
purchase and renovation of a building for the Washington talking book
and Braille library. The transaction was memorialized in a memorandum
of understanding executed between the city of Seattle and the state of
Washington on June 18, 1993.
Exercising its power to transfer any created asset from one
political subdivision to another, it is the intent of the legislature
to transfer all real and personal assets used in the operation of the
Washington talking book and Braille library from the city of Seattle to
the state of Washington in a manner consistent with Moses Lake school
district No. 161, et al., respondents, v. Big Bend community college
and the state board of community colleges, 81 Wn.2d 551, 503 P.2d 86
(1972). Sections 1 through 3 of this act transfer all real and
personal property entrusted to the city of Seattle for the benefit of
the Washington talking book and Braille library.
To ensure a successful transition of the assets and management of
the talking book and Braille library from the city of Seattle to the
state, as well as provide for the long-term operation and enhancement
of the program, the legislature intends to create the Washington
talking book and Braille library account for the purposes prescribed in
section 5 of this act. In creating the Washington talking book and
Braille library account, the legislature affirms the state's commitment
to providing library services to residents who cannot read conventional
books due to blindness, learning disabilities, or physical
disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 27.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature shall transfer from the city of Seattle to the
state of Washington the following:
Title to or all interest in real estate, choses in action, and all
other assets including, but not limited to, buildings, facilities,
equipment, and appurtenances thereto obtained with state or federal
funds appropriated, budgeted, or granted for Washington talking book
and Braille library purposes including, but not limited to, all of the
rights, title, and interest in the following described real estate:

(1) Legal description:

Lots 7, 8, 9, and 10, block 25, plat of the second addition to
the town of Seattle, as laid off by the heirs of Sarah A. Bell,
according to the plat thereof recorded in volume 1 of plats,
page 121 in King county, Washington;

(2) Assessor's property tax parcel account number: 066000-0585;

(3) Street address:

The real property originally consisting of the showroom and
parts warehouse floor of the savidge building at 821 Lenora
Street, Seattle, Washington; now readdressed as the Washington
talking book and Braille library located at 2021 9th Avenue,
Seattle, Washington
.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 27.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Pursuant to section 2 of this act, the attorney general shall
prepare a deed in the name of the state conveying to the state of
Washington all of the rights, title, and interest in the real estate
described in section 2 of this act and the secretary of state shall
attest to the governor signing such deed and shall affix the seal of
the state of Washington thereto, and shall cause to be filed a true and
correct copy of such deed in the King county recorder's office.
In that the state appropriated the funding for the purchase and
renovation of the real and personal property described in section 2 of
this act, this transfer is not subject to the requirements of RCW
43.09.210.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 27.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary of state shall not sell, lease, rent, or otherwise
dispose of the property transferred from the city of Seattle to the
state of Washington pursuant to this act for a minimum of five years
after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 27.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington talking book and Braille library account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer.
(2) All net proceeds resulting from the sale, lease, or other
disposition of the real property located at 2021 9th Avenue in Seattle,
Washington, consisting of lots 7-10, block 25, plat of the second
addition to the town of Seattle are to be deposited into the Washington
talking book and Braille library account.
(3) Only the secretary of state or the secretary's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.
(4) Expenditures from the account may be made only to assist the
state in carrying out the provisions of RCW 27.04.045(14) in any of the
following ways:
(a) To construct, purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire a facility
or space in which to house operations of the Washington talking book
and Braille library;
(b) To fund one-time costs associated with transition of the
Washington talking book and Braille library from the city of Seattle,
Seattle public library to the office of the secretary of state,
Washington state library;
(c) To supplement or expand library services to the blind and
physically handicapped population not otherwise funded through the
state general fund appropriation.
(5) All interest earned on the Washington talking book and Braille
library account shall be retained by the account.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2006 c 311 s 21 and 2006 c 120 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers
conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the
grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing commission
class C purse fund account, the individual development account program
account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account
(earnings from the Washington horse racing commission operating account
must be credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account), the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington
talking book and Braille library account, and the reading achievement
account. However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 27.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The memorandum of understanding between the city of Seattle and the
state of Washington, executed June 21, 1993, that outlines the city's
commitment and covenants regarding the operation of the Washington
talking book and Braille library, is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---