BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts received by physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW for
physician-administered oncology prescription drugs, when the amount
received is less than the cost of the prescription drug covered under:
(a) A medical assistance program established under RCW 74.09.500 or (b)
a federal medicare program authorized under Title XVIII of the federal
social security act.
(2) The deduction authorized by this section does not apply to
amounts received from patient copayments or patient deductibles.
(3) The physician must keep records necessary for the department to
verify eligibility under this section.

--- END ---