BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.18.170 and 1947 c 79 s .18.17 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Premium" as used in this code means all sums charged, received, or
deposited as consideration for an insurance contract or the continuance
thereof. "Premium" does not include a regulatory surcharge imposed by
RCW 48.02.190, except as otherwise provided in this section. Any
assessment, or any "membership," "policy," "survey," "inspection,"
"service" or similar fee or charge made by the insurer in consideration
for an insurance contract is deemed part of the premium.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.18.180 and 1994 c 203 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The premium stated in the policy shall be inclusive of all
fees, charges, premiums, or other consideration charged for the
insurance or for the procurement thereof.
(2) No insurer or its officer, employee, agent, solicitor, or other
representative shall charge or receive any fee, compensation, or
consideration for insurance which is not included in the premium
specified in the policy.
(3) Each violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.
(4) This section does not apply to:
(a) A fee paid to a broker by an insured as provided in RCW
48.17.270; or
(b) A regulatory surcharge imposed by RCW 48.02.190.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.02.190 and 2004 c 260 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Organization" means every insurer, as defined in RCW
48.01.050, having a certificate of authority to do business in this
state and every health care service contractor or (([self-funded]))
self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement registered to do
business in this state. "Class one" organizations shall consist of all
insurers as defined in RCW 48.01.050. "Class two" organizations shall
consist of all organizations registered under provisions of chapter
48.44 RCW. "Class three" organizations shall consist of self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangements as defined in RCW 48.125.010.
(b)(i) "Receipts" means (A) net direct premiums consisting of
direct gross premiums, as defined in RCW 48.18.170, paid for insurance
written or renewed upon risks or property resident, situated, or to be
performed in this state, less return premiums and premiums on policies
not taken, dividends paid or credited to policyholders on direct
business, and premiums received from policies or contracts issued in
connection with qualified plans as defined in RCW 48.14.021, and (B)
prepayments to health care service contractors as set forth in RCW
48.44.010(3) or participant contributions to self-funded multiple
employer welfare arrangements as defined in RCW 48.125.010 less
experience rating credits, dividends, prepayments returned to
subscribers, and payments for contracts not taken.
(ii) Participant contributions, under chapter 48.125 RCW, used to
determine the receipts in this state under this section shall be
determined in the same manner as premiums taxable in this state are
determined under RCW 48.14.090.
(c) "Regulatory surcharge" means the fees imposed by this section.
(2) The annual cost of operating the office of insurance
commissioner shall be determined by legislative appropriation. A pro
rata share of the cost shall be charged to all organizations as a
regulatory surcharge. Each class of organization shall contribute a
sufficient ((in fees)) amount to the insurance commissioner's
regulatory account to pay the reasonable costs, including overhead, of
regulating that class of organization.
(3) ((Fees charged)) The regulatory surcharge shall be calculated
separately for each class of organization. The ((fee charged))
regulatory surcharge collected from each organization shall be that
portion of the cost of operating the insurance commissioner's office,
for that class of organization, for the ensuing fiscal year that is
represented by the organization's portion of the receipts collected or
received by all organizations within that class on business in this
state during the previous calendar year((: PROVIDED, That)). However,
the ((fee shall)) regulatory surcharge must not exceed one-eighth of
one percent of receipts((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)) and the minimum
((fee)) regulatory surcharge shall be one thousand dollars.
(4) The commissioner shall annually, on or before June 1, calculate
and bill each organization for the amount of ((its fee)) the regulatory
surcharge. ((Fees)) The regulatory surcharge shall be due and payable
no later than June 15 of each year((: PROVIDED, That)). However, if
the necessary financial records are not available or if the amount of
the legislative appropriation is not determined in time to carry out
such calculations and bill such ((fees)) regulatory surcharge within
the time specified, the commissioner may use the ((fee)) regulatory
surcharge factors for the prior year as the basis for the ((fees))
regulatory surcharge and, if necessary, the commissioner may impose
supplemental fees to fully and properly charge the organizations. The
penalties for failure to pay fees and regulatory surcharges when due
shall be the same as the penalties for failure to pay taxes pursuant to
RCW 48.14.060. The ((fees)) regulatory surcharge required by this
section ((are)) is in addition to all other taxes and fees now imposed
or that may be subsequently imposed.
(5) All moneys collected shall be deposited in the insurance
commissioner's regulatory account in the state treasury which is hereby
created.
(6) Unexpended funds in the insurance commissioner's regulatory
account at the close of a fiscal year shall be carried forward in the
insurance commissioner's regulatory account to the succeeding fiscal
year and shall be used to reduce future ((fees)) regulatory surcharges.
During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from
the insurance commissioner's regulatory account to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect excess fund balance in the account.
(7)(a) Each insurer may annually collect regulatory surcharges
remitted in preceding years by means of a policyholder surcharge on
premiums charged for all kinds of insurance. The recoupment shall be
at a uniform rate reasonably calculated to collect the regulatory
surcharge remitted by the insurer.
(b) If an insurer fails to collect the entire amount of the
recoupment in the first year under this section, it may repeat the
recoupment procedure provided for in this subsection (7) in succeeding
years until the regulatory surcharge is fully collected or a de minimis
amount remains uncollected. Any such de minimis amount may be
collected as provided in (d) of this subsection.
(c) The amount and nature of any recoupment shall be separately
stated on either a billing or policy declaration sent to an insured.
The amount of the recoupment must not be considered a premium for any
purpose, including the premium tax or agents' commissions.
(d) An insurer may elect not to collect the regulatory surcharge
from its insured. In such a case, the insurer may recoup the
regulatory surcharge through its rates, if the following requirements
are met:
(i) The insurer remits the amount of surcharge not collected by
election under this subsection; and
(ii) The surcharge is not considered a premium for any purpose,
including the premium tax or agents' commission.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.14.040 and 1988 c 248 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If pursuant to the laws of any other state or country, any
taxes, licenses, fees, deposits, or other obligations or prohibitions,
in the aggregate, or additional to or at a net rate in excess of any
such taxes, licenses, fees, deposits or other obligations or
prohibitions imposed by the laws of this state upon like foreign or
alien insurers and their agents and solicitors, are imposed on insurers
of this state and their agents doing business in such other state or
country, a like rate, obligation or prohibition may be imposed by the
commissioner, as to any item or combination of items involved, upon all
insurers of such other state or country and their agents doing business
in this state, so long as such laws remain in force or are so applied.
(2) For the purposes of this section, an alien insurer may be
deemed to be domiciled in the state wherein it has established its
principal office or agency in the United States. If no such office or
agency has been established, the domicile of the alien insurer shall be
deemed to be the country under the laws of which it is formed.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the regulatory surcharge
imposed by RCW 48.02.190 shall not be included in the calculation of
any retaliatory taxes, licenses, fees, deposits, or other obligations
or prohibitions imposed under this section.

--- END ---