BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a health
care provider from the United States or any instrumentality of the
United States, or from the state of Washington or any municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington, to the
same extent provided for health or social welfare organizations under
RCW 82.04.4297.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Health professional" means a health care practitioner who is
licensed by the state of Washington under chapters 18.57, 18.57A,
18.71, and 18.71A RCW.
(b) "Health care provider" means any health professional, hospital,
or other institution, organization, or person that furnishes any health
care services and is licensed or otherwise authorized to furnish such
services.

--- END ---