BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.370 and 2004 c 130 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a rural county may impose a sales
and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is
in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
county. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.08 percent of the selling
price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the
case of a use tax, except that for rural counties with ((population
densities between sixty and one hundred persons per square mile, the
rate shall not exceed 0.04 percent before January 1, 2000)) poverty
rates twenty percent or more above the state poverty rate and median
household income twenty percent or more below the state median
household income, the rate shall not exceed 0.15 percent.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.
(3)(a) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used to
finance public facilities serving economic development purposes in
rural counties. The public facility must be listed as an item in the
officially adopted county overall economic development plan, or the
economic development section of the county's comprehensive plan, or the
comprehensive plan of a city or town located within the county for
those counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040. For those counties that
do not have an adopted overall economic development plan and do not
plan under the growth management act, the public facility must be
listed in the county's capital facilities plan or the capital
facilities plan of a city or town located within the county.
(b) In implementing this section((,)):
(i) The county shall consult with cities, towns, and port districts
located within the county and the associate development organization
serving the county to ensure that the expenditure meets the goals of
chapter 130, Laws of 2004 and the requirements of (a) of this
subsection.
(ii) Each county collecting money under this section shall report
to the office of the state auditor, ((no later than October 1st))
within one hundred fifty days after the close of each fiscal year((,)):
(A) A list of new projects ((from)) begun during the ((prior)) fiscal
year, showing that the county has used the funds for those projects
consistent with the goals of chapter 130, Laws of 2004 and the
requirements of (a) of this subsection; and (B) expenditures during the
fiscal year on projects begun in a previous year.
(iii) Any projects financed prior to June 10, 2004, from the
proceeds of obligations to which the tax imposed under subsection (1)
of this section has been pledged shall not be deemed to be new projects
under this subsection.
(iv) Public facilities may not be funded for a project the primary
purpose of which is to facilitate or promote:
(A) A retail shopping development or expansion;
(B) A tourist or sports facility; or
(C) A gambling facility.
(v) Public facilities may not be funded for projects that will
cause sprawl.
(c) For the purposes of this section, (i) "public facilities" means
bridges, roads, domestic and industrial water facilities, sanitary
sewer facilities, earth stabilization, storm sewer facilities,
railroad, electricity, natural gas, buildings, structures,
telecommunications infrastructure, transportation infrastructure, or
commercial infrastructure, and port facilities in the state of
Washington; and (ii) "economic development purposes" means those
purposes which facilitate the creation or retention of businesses and
((jobs in a county)) the creation or retention of jobs with health
benefits and with hourly wages that exceed the countywide median hourly
wage.
(4) ((No tax may be collected under this section before July 1,
1998.)) No tax may be collected under this section by a county more
than twenty-five years after the date that a tax is first imposed under
this section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "rural county" means a county
with a population density of less than one hundred persons per square
mile or a county smaller than two hundred twenty-five square miles as
determined by the office of financial management and published each
year by the department for the period July 1st to June 30th.

--- END ---