BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some current
estimates place the percentage of unreported employment in Washington
state's construction industry at between twenty percent and fifty
percent, although solid data on this phenomenon is not readily
available in Washington. The legislature also finds that unreported
construction employment may result in the loss of a worker's employment
rights and protections, including workers' compensation and
unemployment insurance compensation. The legislature further finds
that unreported construction employment also could deny the state the
revenues it is due, including sales taxes, business and occupation
taxes, and other business fees paid to the state. The legislature
declares that the underground economy in this state may permit unfair
conditions to exist against persons working in the construction
industry who do follow the employment laws and appropriately pay taxes.
It is the legislature's intent to determine the extent and potential
costs to the state of the underground economy in the construction
industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint legislative task force on the
underground economy in the Washington state construction industry is
established. For purposes of this section, "underground economy" means
contracting and construction activities in which payroll is unreported
or underreported with consequent nonpayment of payroll taxes to federal
and state agencies including nonpayment of workers' compensation and
unemployment compensation taxes.
(2) The purpose of the task force is to formulate a state policy to
establish cohesion and transparency between state agencies so as to
increase the oversight and regulation of the underground economy
practices in the construction industry in this state. To assist the
task force in achieving this goal and to determine the extent of and
projected costs to the state and workers of the underground economy in
the construction industry, the task force shall contract with the
institute for public policy.
(3)(a) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(i) The chair and ranking minority member of the senate labor,
commerce, research and development committee;
(ii) The chair and ranking minority member of the house of
representatives commerce and labor committee;
(iii) Four members representing the construction business, selected
from nominations submitted by statewide construction business
organizations and appointed jointly by the president of the senate and
the speaker of the house of representatives;
(iv) Four members representing construction laborers, selected from
nominations submitted by statewide labor organizations and appointed
jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(b) In addition, the employment security department, the department
of labor and industries, and the department of revenue shall cooperate
with the task force and shall each maintain a liaison representative,
who is a nonvoting member of the task force. The departments shall
cooperate with the task force and the institute for public policy and
shall provide information and data as the task force or the institute
may reasonably request.
(c) The task force shall choose its chair or cochairs from among
its legislative membership. The chairs of the senate labor, commerce,
research and development committee and the house of representatives
commerce and labor committee shall convene the initial meeting of the
task force.
(4)(a) The task force shall use legislative facilities and staff
support shall be provided by senate committee services and the house of
representatives office of program research. The task force may hire
additional staff with specific technical expertise if such expertise is
necessary to carry out the mandates of this study.
(b) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(c) The expenses of the task force will be paid jointly by the
senate and house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(5) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the legislature by January 1, 2008.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2008.

--- END ---