BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who with the intent of causing an activation of the
voluntary broadcast notification system commonly known as the "Amber
alert," or as the same system may otherwise be known, which is used to
notify the public of abducted children, knowingly makes a false or
misleading material statement to a public servant that a child has been
abducted and which statement causes an activation, is guilty of a class
C felony.
(2) "Material statement" means a written or oral statement
reasonably likely to be relied upon by a public servant in the
discharge of his or her official powers or duties.

--- END ---