BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
USE STATE PURCHASING TO IMPROVE HEALTH CARE QUALITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The health care authority and the department
of social and health services shall, by September 1, 2007, develop a
five-year plan to change reimbursement within state purchased health
care programs to:
(1) Reward quality health outcomes rather than simply paying for
the receipt of particular services or procedures;
(2) Pay for care that reflects patient preference and is of proven
value;
(3) Require the use of evidence-based standards of care where
available;
(4) Tie provider rate increases to measurable improvements in
access to quality care;
(5) Direct enrollees to quality care systems;
(6) Better support primary care and provide a medical home to all
enrollees; and
(7) Pay for e-mail consultations, telemedicine, and telehealth
where doing so reduces the overall cost of care.
The plan shall identify any existing barriers and opportunities to
support implementation, including needed changes to state or federal
law and be submitted to the governor and the legislature upon
completion. The agencies shall report annually to the legislature
beginning September 2007, and September of each year thereafter,
initially on what the targets are; and in the years to follow, the
effectiveness and efficiency with which each strategy in the plan has
achieved the goals of reducing the cost of health care for individuals,
improving people's health, and achieving the goals set for this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that unwarranted
variations in health care, variations not explained by illness, patient
preference, or the dictates of evidence-based medicine, are a
significant feature of health care in Washington state. There is
growing evidence that, for preference-sensitive care involving elective
surgery, the quality of patient-practitioner communication about the
benefits, harms, and uncertainty of available treatment options can be
improved by introducing high-quality decision aids that encourage
shared decision making. The international patient decision aid
standards collaboration, a network of over one hundred researchers,
practitioners, patients, and policy makers from fourteen countries,
have developed standards for constructing high-quality decision aids.
The legislature declares an intent to focus on improving the quality of
patient-practitioner communication and on increasing the extent to
which patients make genuinely informed, preference-based treatment
decisions. Randomized clinical trial evidence indicates that effective
use of well designed decision aids is likely to improve the quality of
patient decision making, reduce unwarranted variations in health care,
and result in lower health care costs overall. Despite this growing
body of evidence, widespread use of decision aids has yet to occur.
Barriers include: (1) Lack of awareness of existing, appropriate,
high-quality decision aids; (2) poor accessibility to such decision
aids; (3) low practitioner acceptance of decision aids in terms of
compatibility with their practice, ease of use, and expense to
incorporate into practice; (4) lack of incentives for use, such as
reduced liability and reimbursement for their use; and (5) lack of a
process to certify that a decision aid meets the standards required of
a high-quality decision aid. The legislature intends to promote new
public/private collaborative efforts to broaden the development, use,
evaluation, and certification of effective decision aids and intends to
support the collaborative through providing new recognition of the
shared decision-making process and patient decision aids in the state's
laws on informed consent. The legislature also intends to establish a
process for certifying that a given decision aid meets the standards
required for a high-quality decision aid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The state health care authority shall work
in collaboration with the health professions and quality improvement
communities to increase awareness of appropriate, high-quality decision
aids, and to train physicians and other practitioners in their use.
The effort shall focus on one or more of the preference-sensitive
conditions with high rates of unwarranted variation in Washington, and
can include strategies such as prominent linkage to such decision aids
in state web sites, and training/awareness programs in conjunction with
professional and quality improvement groups. The state health care
authority shall, in consultation with the national committee for
quality assurance, identify a certification process for patient
decision aids. The state health care authority may accept donations or
grants to support such efforts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The state health care authority shall work
with contracting health carriers and health care providers, and a
nonproprietary public interest research group and/or university-based
research group, to implement practical and usable models to demonstrate
shared decision making in everyday clinical practice. The
demonstrations shall be conducted at one or more multispecialty group
practice sites providing state purchased health care in the state of
Washington, and may include other practice sites providing state
purchased health care. The demonstrations must include the following
elements: Incorporation into clinical practice of one or more decision
aids for one or more identified preference-sensitive care areas
combined with ongoing training and support of involved practitioners
and practice teams, preferably at sites with necessary supportive
health information technology. The evaluation must include the
following elements: (1) A comparison between the demonstration sites
and, if appropriate, between the demonstration sites and a control
group, of the impact of the shared decision-making process employing
the decision aids on: The use of preference-sensitive health care
services; and associated costs saved and/or expended; and (2) an
assessment of patient knowledge of the relevant health care choices,
benefits, harms, and uncertainties; concordance between patient values
and care received; and satisfaction with the decision-making process
and their health outcomes by patients and involved physicians and other
health care practitioners. The health care authority may solicit and
accept funding to support the demonstration and evaluation.

Sec. 5 RCW 7.70.060 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) If a patient while legally competent, or his or her
representative if he or she is not competent, signs a consent form
which sets forth the following, the signed consent form shall
constitute prima facie evidence that the patient gave his or her
informed consent to the treatment administered and the patient has the
burden of rebutting this by a preponderance of the evidence:
(((1))) (a) A description, in language the patient could reasonably
be expected to understand, of:
(((a))) (i) The nature and character of the proposed treatment;
(((b))) (ii) The anticipated results of the proposed treatment;
(((c))) (iii) The recognized possible alternative forms of
treatment; and
(((d))) (iv) The recognized serious possible risks, complications,
and anticipated benefits involved in the treatment and in the
recognized possible alternative forms of treatment, including
nontreatment;
(((2))) (b) Or as an alternative, a statement that the patient
elects not to be informed of the elements set forth in (a) of this
subsection (((1) of this section)).
(2) If a patient while legally competent, or his or her
representative if he or she is not competent, signs an acknowledgement
of shared decision making as described in subsection (3) of this
section, such acknowledgement shall constitute prima facie evidence
that the patient gave his or her informed consent to the treatment
administered and the patient has the burden of rebutting this by clear
and convincing evidence. An acknowledgement of shared decision making
shall include:
(a) A statement that the patient, or his or her representative, and
the health care provider have engaged in shared decision making as an
alternative means of meeting the informed consent requirements set
forth by laws, accreditation standards, and other mandates;
(b) A brief description of the services that the patient and
provider jointly have agreed will be furnished;
(c) A brief description of the patient decision aid or aids that
have been used by the patient and provider to address the needs for (i)
high-quality, up-to-date information about the condition, including
risk and benefits of available options and, if appropriate, a
discussion of the limits of scientific knowledge about outcomes; (ii)
values clarification to help patients sort out their values and
preferences; and (iii) guidance or coaching in deliberation, designed
to improve the patient's involvement in the decision process;
(d) A statement that the patient or his or her representative
understands: The risk or seriousness of the disease or condition to be
prevented or treated; the available treatment alternatives, including
nontreatment; and the risks, benefits, and uncertainties of the
treatment alternatives, including nontreatment; and
(e) A statement certifying that the patient or his or her
representative has had the opportunity to ask the provider questions,
and to have any questions answered to the patient's satisfaction, and
indicating the patient's intent to receive the identified services.
(3) "Shared decision making" means a process in which the physician
or other health care practitioner discusses with the patient or his or
her representative the information specified in subsection (1)(a) of
this section, with or without the use of a patient decision aid, and
the patient shares with the provider such relevant personal information
as might make one treatment or side effect more or less tolerable than
others. The goal of shared decision making is for the patient and
physician or other health care practitioner to feel they appropriately
understand the nature of the procedure, the risks and benefits, as well
as the individual values and preferences that influence the treatment
decision, such that both are willing to sign a statement acknowledging
that they have engaged in shared decision making and setting forth the
agreed treatment to be furnished.
(4) "Patient decision aid" means a written, audio-visual, or online
tool that provides a balanced presentation of the condition and
treatment options, benefits, and harms, including, if appropriate, a
discussion of the limits of scientific knowledge about outcomes, and
that is certified by one or more national certifying organizations
approved by the health care authority. In order to be an approved
national certifying organization, an organization must use a rigorous
evaluation process to assure that decision aids are competently
developed, provide a balanced presentation of treatment options,
benefits, and harms, and are efficacious at improving decision making.
(5) Failure to use a form or to engage in shared decision making,
with or without the use of a patient decision aid, shall not be
admissible as evidence of failure to obtain informed consent. There
shall be no liability, civil or otherwise, resulting from a health care
provider choosing either the signed consent form set forth in
subsection (1)(a) of this section or the signed acknowledgement of
shared decision making as set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

PREVENTION AND MANAGEMENT OF CHRONIC ILLNESS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services, in collaboration
with the department of health, shall:
(a) Design and implement medical homes for its aged, blind, and
disabled clients in conjunction with chronic care management programs
to improve health outcomes, access, and cost-effectiveness. Programs
must be evidence based, facilitating the use of information technology
to improve quality of care, and must improve coordination of primary,
acute, and long-term care for those clients with multiple chronic
conditions. The department shall consider expansion of existing
medical home and chronic care management programs and build on the
Washington state collaborative initiative. The department shall use
best practices in identifying those clients best served under a chronic
care management model using predictive modeling through claims or other
health risk information; and
(b) Contract for a study of chronic care management, to include
evaluation of current efforts in the health and recovery services
administration and the aging and disability services administration,
comparison to best practices, and recommendations for future efforts
and organizational structure to improve chronic care management.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Medical home" means a site of care that provides comprehensive
preventive and coordinated care centered on the patient needs and
assures high quality, accessible, and efficient care.
(b) "Chronic care management" means the department's program that
provides care management and coordination activities for medical
assistance clients determined to be at risk for high medical costs.
"Chronic care management" provides education and training and/or
coordination that assist program participants in improving self-management skills to improve health outcomes and reduce medical costs
by educating clients to better utilize services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall conduct a program of training and
technical assistance regarding care of people with chronic conditions
for providers of primary care. The program shall emphasize evidence-based high quality preventive and chronic disease care. The department
may designate one or more chronic conditions to be the subject of the
program.
(2) The training and technical assistance program shall include the
following elements:
(a) Clinical information systems and sharing and organization of
patient data;
(b) Decision support to promote evidence-based care;
(c) Clinical delivery system design;
(d) Support for patients managing their own conditions; and
(e) Identification and use of community resources that are
available in the community for patients and their families.
(3) In selecting primary care providers to participate in the
program, the department shall consider the number and type of patients
with chronic conditions the provider serves, and the provider's
participation in the medicaid and medicare programs.

COST AND QUALITY INFORMATION FOR CONSUMERS AND PROVIDERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state quality forum is established within the
authority. The forum shall collaborate with the Puget Sound health
alliance and other local organizations and shall:
(1) Collect and disseminate research regarding health care quality,
evidence-based medicine, and patient safety to promote best practices,
in collaboration with the technology assessment program and the
prescription drug program;
(2) Coordinate the collection of health care quality data among
state health care purchasing agencies;
(3) Adopt a set of measures to evaluate and compare health care
cost and quality and provider performance;
(4) Identify and disseminate information regarding variations in
clinical practice patterns across the state; and
(5) Produce an annual quality report detailing clinical practice
patterns identified to purchasers, providers, insurers, and policy
makers. The agencies shall report annually to the legislature
beginning September 2007, and September of each year thereafter,
initially on what the targets are; and in the years to follow, the
effectiveness and efficiency with which each strategy in the plan has
achieved the goals of reducing the cost of health care for individuals,
improving people's health, and achieving the goals set for this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The administrator shall design and pilot a consumer-centric
health information infrastructure and the first health record banks
that will facilitate the secure exchange of health information when and
where needed and shall:
(a) Complete the plan of initial implementation, including but not
limited to determining the technical infrastructure for health record
banks and the account locator service, setting criteria and standards
for health record banks, and determining oversight of health record
banks;
(b) Implement the first health record banks in pilot sites as
funding allows;
(c) Involve health care consumers in meaningful ways in the design,
implementation, oversight, and dissemination of information on the
health record bank system; and
(d) Promote adoption of electronic medical records and health
information exchange through continuation of the Washington health
information collaborative, and by working with private payors and other
organizations in restructuring reimbursement to provide incentives for
providers to adopt electronic medical records in their practices.
(2) The administrator may establish an advisory board, a
stakeholder committee, and subcommittees to assist in carrying out the
duties under this section. The administrator may reappoint health
information infrastructure advisory board members to assure continuity
and shall appoint any additional representatives that may be required
for their expertise and experience.
(a) The administrator shall appoint the chair of the advisory
board, chairs, and cochairs of the stakeholder committee, if formed;
(b) Meetings of the board, stakeholder committee, and any advisory
group are subject to chapter 42.30 RCW, the open public meetings act,
including RCW 42.30.110(1)(l), which authorizes an executive session
during a regular or special meeting to consider proprietary or
confidential nonpublished information; and
(c) The members of the board, stakeholder committee, and any
advisory group:
(i) Shall agree to the terms and conditions imposed by the
administrator regarding conflicts of interest as a condition of
appointment;
(ii) Are immune from civil liability for any official acts
performed in good faith as members of the board, stakeholder committee,
or any advisory group.
(3) Members of the board may be compensated for participation in
the work of the committee in accordance with a personal services
contract to be executed after appointment and before commencement of
activities related to the work of the board. Members of the
stakeholder committee shall not receive compensation but shall be
reimbursed under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The administrator may work with public and private entities to
develop and encourage the use of personal health records which are
portable, interoperable, secure, and respectful of patients' privacy.
(5) The administrator may enter into contracts to issue,
distribute, and administer grants that are necessary or proper to carry
out this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.70.110 and 2006 c 72 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining
a license. After June 30, 1995, municipal corporations providing
emergency medical care and transportation services pursuant to chapter
18.73 RCW shall be exempt from such fees, provided that such other
emergency services shall only be charged for their pro rata share of
the cost of licensure and inspection, if appropriate. The secretary
may waive the fees when, in the discretion of the secretary, the fees
would not be in the best interest of public health and safety, or when
the fees would be to the financial disadvantage of the state.
(2) Except as provided in ((RCW 18.79.202, until June 30, 2013, and
except for the cost of regulating retired volunteer medical workers in
accordance with RCW 18.130.360)) subsection (3) of this section, fees
charged shall be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the
department for the licensure of the activity or class of activities and
may include costs of necessary inspection.
(3) License fees shall include amounts in addition to the cost of
licensure activities in the following circumstances:
(a) For registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW, support of a central nursing resource center
as provided in RCW 18.79.202, until June 30, 2013;
(b) For all health care providers licensed under RCW 18.130.040,
the cost of regulatory activities for retired volunteer medical worker
licensees as provided in RCW 18.130.360; and
(c) For physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, physician
assistants licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, osteopathic physicians
licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, osteopathic physicians' assistants
licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW, naturopaths licensed under chapter
18.36A RCW, podiatrists licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, chiropractors
licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW, psychologists licensed under chapter
18.83 RCW, registered nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW,
optometrists licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW, mental health counselors
licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, massage therapists licensed under
chapter 18.108 RCW, clinical social workers licensed under chapter
18.225 RCW, and acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW, the
license fees shall include the cost to the department of contracting
with the University of Washington to allow online access to selected
vital clinical resources negotiated and maintained for the exclusive
use of the licensed health professionals included in this subsection by
the University of Washington health sciences library.
(4) Department of health advisory committees may review fees
established by the secretary for licenses and comment upon the
appropriateness of the level of such fees.

REDUCING UNNECESSARY EMERGENCY ROOM USE
Sec. 11 RCW 41.05.220 and 1998 c 245 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) State general funds appropriated to the department of health
for the purposes of funding community health centers to provide primary
health and dental care services, migrant health services, and maternity
health care services shall be transferred to the state health care
authority. Any related administrative funds expended by the department
of health for this purpose shall also be transferred to the health care
authority. The health care authority shall exclusively expend these
funds through contracts with community health centers to provide
primary health and dental care services, migrant health services, and
maternity health care services. The administrator of the health care
authority shall establish requirements necessary to assure community
health centers provide quality health care services that are
appropriate and effective and are delivered in a cost-efficient manner.
The administrator shall further assure that community health centers
have appropriate referral arrangements for acute care and medical
specialty services not provided by the community health centers.
(2) The authority, in consultation with the department of health,
shall work with community and migrant health clinics and other
providers of care to underserved populations, to ensure that the number
of people of color and underserved people receiving access to managed
care is expanded in proportion to need, based upon demographic data.
(3) In contracting with community health centers to provide primary
health and dental services, migrant health services, and maternity
health care services under subsection (1) of this section the authority
shall give priority to those community health centers working with
local hospitals, local community health collaboratives, and/or local
health jurisdictions to successfully reduce unnecessary emergency room
use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The Washington state health care authority
and the department of social and health services shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2007, on recent trends in unnecessary
emergency room use by enrollees in state purchased health care programs
and the uninsured, and then partner with community organizations and
local health care providers to design a demonstration pilot to reduce
such unnecessary visits.
The agencies shall design a plan to require hospitals serving
patients enrolled in their state financed health plans to effectively
link or refer nonemergent patients seeking care in hospital emergency
rooms to twenty-four hour clinics located in the community. The clinic
must be reasonably accessible and available to the patient. The
agencies shall design a plan to provide all enrollees, beneficiaries,
and participants in their health coverage access to a twenty-four hour,
seven day a week, nurse hotline that is accessible via the two-one-one
system. The agencies shall develop technical service agreements to
secure public service announcements through television, radio, and
print media to inform the public of access to the nurse hotline.

REDUCE HEALTH CARE ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 By September 1, 2007, the insurance
commissioner shall provide a report to the governor and the legislature
that identifies the key contributors to health care administrative
costs and evaluates opportunities to reduce them, including suggested
changes to state law. The report shall be completed in collaboration
with health care providers, carriers, state health purchasing agencies,
the Washington healthcare forum, and other interested parties. In
developing the report, the insurance commissioner shall work with
health insurance carriers to develop a plan to implement the
recommendations from the 2003-2004 health insurance regulation review
and streamlining work group.

COVERAGE FOR DEPENDENTS TO AGE TWENTY-FIVE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any plan offered to employees under this chapter must offer
each employee the option of covering any unmarried dependent of the
employee under the age of twenty-five who is a "qualifying child" or
"qualifying relative" as defined in section 152 of the internal revenue
code.
(2) Any employee choosing under subsection (1) of this section to
cover a dependent who is: (a) Age twenty through twenty-three and not
a registered student at an accredited secondary school, college,
university, vocational school, or school of nursing; or (b) age twenty-four, shall be required to pay the full cost of such coverage.
(3) Any employee choosing under subsection (1) of this section to
cover a dependent with disabilities, developmental disabilities, mental
illness, or mental retardation, who is incapable of self-support, may
continue enrollment under the same premium and payment structure as for
dependents under the age of twenty, irrespective of age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Any disability insurance contract that provides coverage for a
subscriber's dependent must offer the option of covering any unmarried
dependent under the age of twenty-five who is a "qualifying child" or
"qualifying relative" as defined in section 152 of the internal revenue
code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Any group disability insurance contract or blanket disability
insurance contract that provides coverage for a participating member's
dependent must offer each participating member the option of covering
any unmarried dependent under the age of twenty-five who is a
"qualifying child" or "qualifying relative" as defined in section 152
of the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any individual health care service plan contract that provides
coverage for a subscriber's dependent must offer the option of covering
any unmarried dependent under the age of twenty-five who is a
"qualifying child" or "qualifying relative" as defined in section 152
of the internal revenue code.
(2) Any group health care service plan contract that provides
coverage for a participating member's dependent must offer each
participating member the option of covering any unmarried dependent
under the age of twenty-five who is a "qualifying child" or "qualifying
relative" as defined in section 152 of the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any individual health maintenance agreement that provides
coverage for a subscriber's dependent must offer the option of covering
any unmarried dependent under the age of twenty-five who is a
"qualifying child" or "qualifying relative" as defined in section 152
of the internal revenue code.
(2) Any group health maintenance agreement that provides coverage
for a participating member's dependent must offer each participating
member the option of covering any unmarried dependent under the age of
twenty-five who is a "qualifying child" or "qualifying relative" as
defined in section 152 of the internal revenue code.

WASHINGTON HEALTH INSURANCE CONNECTOR
NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The authority, in collaboration with an advisory board
established under subsection (3) of this section, shall design a
Washington health insurance connector and submit implementing
legislation and supporting information, including funding options, to
the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2007. The connector
shall be designed to serve as a statewide, public-private partnership,
offering maximum value for Washington state residents, through which
nonlarge group health insurance may be bought and sold. It is the goal
of the connector to:
(a) Ensure that employees of small businesses and other individuals
can find affordable health insurance;
(b) Provide a mechanism for small businesses to contribute to their
employees' coverage without the administrative burden of directly
shopping or contracting for insurance;
(c) Ensure that individuals can access coverage as they change
and/or work in multiple jobs;
(d) Coordinate with other state agency health insurance assistance
programs, including the department of social and health services
medical assistance programs and the authority's basic health program;
and
(e) Lead the health insurance marketplace in implementation of
evidence-based medicine, data transparency, prevention and wellness
incentives, and outcome-based reimbursement.
(2) In designing the connector, the authority shall:
(a) Address all operational and governance issues;
(b) Consider best practices in the private and public sectors
regarding, but not limited to, such issues as risk and/or purchasing
pooling, market competition drivers, risk selection, and consumer
choice and responsibility incentives; and
(c) Address key functions of the connector, including but not
limited to:
(i) Methods for small businesses and their employees to realize tax
benefits from their financial contributions;
(ii) Options for offering choice among a broad array of affordable
insurance products designed to meet individual needs, including waiving
some current regulatory requirements. Options may include a health
savings account/high-deductible health plan, a comprehensive health
benefit plan, and other benchmark plans;
(iii) Benchmarking health insurance products to a reasonable
standard to enable individuals to make an informed choice of the
coverage that is right for them;
(iv) Aggregating premium contributions for an individual from
multiple sources: Employers, individuals, philanthropies, and
government;
(v) Mechanisms to collect and distribute workers' enrollment
information and premium payments to the health plan of their choice;
(vi) Mechanisms for spreading health risk widely to support health
insurance premiums that are more affordable;
(vii) Opportunities to reward carriers and consumers whose behavior
is consistent with quality, efficiency, and evidence-based best
practices;
(viii) Coordination of the transmission of premium assistance
payments with the department of social and health services for
individuals eligible for the department's employer-sponsored insurance
program.
(3) The authority shall appoint an advisory board and designate a
chair. Members of the advisory board shall receive no compensation,
but shall be reimbursed for expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
Meetings of the board are subject to chapter 42.30 RCW, the open public
meetings act, including RCW 42.30.110(1)(l), which authorizes an
executive session during a regular or special meeting to consider
proprietary or confidential nonpublished information.
(4) The authority may enter into contracts to issue, distribute,
and administer grants that are necessary or proper to carry out the
requirements of this section.

SUSTAINABILITY AND ACCESS TO PUBLIC PROGRAMS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1) The department of social and health
services shall seek necessary federal waivers and state plan amendments
to expand coverage and leverage federal and state resources for the
state's basic health program, for the medical assistance program, as
codified at Title XIX of the federal social security act, and the
state's children's health insurance program, as codified at Title XXI
of the federal social security act. The department shall propose
options including but not limited to:
(a) Offering alternative benefit designs to promote high quality
care, improve health outcomes, and encourage cost-effective treatment
options, including benefit designs that discourage the use of emergency
rooms for nonemergent care, and redirect savings to finance additional
coverage;
(b) Creation of a health opportunity account demonstration program;
and
(c) Promoting private health insurance plans and premium subsidies
to purchase employer-sponsored insurance wherever possible, including
federal approval to expand the department's employer-sponsored
insurance premium assistance program to enrollees covered through the
state's children's health insurance program.
(2) The department of social and health services, in collaboration
with the Washington state health care authority, shall ensure that
enrollees are not simultaneously enrolled in the state's basic health
program and the medical assistance program or the state's children's
health insurance program to ensure coverage for the maximum number of
people within available funds. Priority enrollment in the basic health
program shall be given to those who disenrolled from the program in
order to enroll in medicaid, and subsequently became ineligible for
medicaid coverage.
(3) In coordination with the health care authority, the departments
shall design and implement a medical home for chronically ill state
employees enrolled in the state's self-insured uniform medical plan.
Programs must be evidence based, facilitating the use of information
technology to improve quality of care and must improve coordination of
primary, acute, and long-term care for those enrollees with multiple
chronic conditions. The agencies shall consider expansion of existing
medical home and chronic care management programs. The agencies shall
use best practices in identifying those employees best served under a
chronic care management model using predictive modeling through claims
or other health risk information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
When the department of social and health services determines that
it is cost-effective to enroll a person eligible for medical assistance
under chapter 74.09 RCW in an employer-sponsored health plan, a carrier
shall permit the enrollment of the person in the health plan for which
he or she is otherwise eligible without regard to any open enrollment
period restrictions.

REINSURANCE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 (1) The office of financial management, in
collaboration with the office of the insurance commissioner, shall
evaluate and design a state-supported reinsurance program to address
the impact of high cost enrollees in the individual and small group
health insurance markets, and submit implementing legislation and
supporting information, including financing options, to the governor
and the legislature by December 1, 2007. In designing the program, the
office of financial management shall:
(a) Estimate the quantitative impact on premium savings, premium
stability over time and across groups of enrollees, individual and
employer take-up, number of uninsured, and government costs associated
with a government-funded stop-loss insurance program, including
distinguishing between one-time premium savings and savings in
subsequent years. In evaluating the various reinsurance models,
evaluate and consider (i) the reduction in total health care costs to
the state and private sector, and (ii) the reduction in individual
premiums paid by employers, employees, and individuals;
(b) Identify all relevant design issues and alternative options for
each issue. At a minimum, the evaluation shall examine (i) a
reinsurance corridor of ten thousand dollars to ninety thousand
dollars, and a reimbursement of ninety percent; (ii) the impacts of
providing reinsurance for all small group products or a subset of
products; and (iii) the applicability of a chronic care program like
the approach used by the department of labor and industries with the
centers of occupational health and education. Where quantitative
impacts cannot be estimated, the office of financial management shall
assess qualitative impacts of design issues and their options,
including potential disincentives for reducing premiums, achieving
premium stability, sustaining/increasing take-up, decreasing the number
of uninsured, and managing government's stop-loss insurance costs;
(c) Identify market and regulatory changes needed to maximize the
chance of the program achieving its policy goals, including how the
program will relate to other coverage programs and markets. Design
efforts shall coordinate with other design efforts targeting small
group programs that may be directed by the legislature, as well as
other approaches examining alternatives to managing risk;
(d) Address conditions under which overall expenditures could
increase as a result of a government-funded stop-loss program and
options to mitigate those conditions, such as passive versus aggressive
use of disease and care management programs by insurers;
(e) Evaluate, and quantify where possible, the behavioral responses
of insurers to the program including impacts on insurer premiums and
practices for settling legal disputes around large claims; and
(f) Provide alternatives for transitioning from the status quo and,
where applicable, alternatives for phasing in some design elements,
such as threshold or corridor levels, to balance government costs and
premium savings.
(2) Within funds specifically appropriated for this purpose, the
office of financial management may contract with actuaries and other
experts as necessary to meet the requirements of this section.

THE WASHINGTON STATE HEALTH INSURANCE POOL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The legislature finds that the Washington
state health insurance pool is a critically important insurance option
for people in this state and must reflect health care provisions based
on the best available evidence and be financially sustainable over
time. The laws governing the Washington state health insurance pool
have been read to preclude the program from modifying contracts, and
yet coverage needs and options change with time. Everyone in this
state benefits when the Washington state health insurance pool is more
affordable and higher performing. Changes are needed to the Washington
state health insurance pool to increase affordability, offer quality
and cost-effective benefits, and enhance the governance and operation
of the pool.

Sec. 24 RCW 48.41.110 and 2001 c 196 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The pool shall offer one or more care management plans of
coverage. Such plans may, but are not required to, include point of
service features that permit participants to receive in-network
benefits or out-of-network benefits subject to differential cost
shares. ((Covered persons enrolled in the pool on January 1, 2001, may
continue coverage under the pool plan in which they are enrolled on
that date. However,)) The pool may incorporate managed care features
and encourage enrollees to participate in chronic care and disease
management and evidence-based protocols into ((such)) existing plans.
(2) The administrator shall prepare a brochure outlining the
benefits and exclusions of ((the)) pool ((policy)) policies in plain
language. After approval by the board, such brochure shall be made
reasonably available to participants or potential participants.
(3) The health insurance ((policy)) policies issued by the pool
shall pay only reasonable amounts for medically necessary eligible
health care services rendered or furnished for the diagnosis or
treatment of covered illnesses, injuries, and conditions ((which are
not otherwise limited or excluded)). Eligible expenses are the
reasonable amounts for the health care services and items for which
benefits are extended under ((the)) a pool policy. ((Such benefits
shall at minimum include, but not be limited to, the following services
or related items:))
(4) The pool shall offer at least one policy which at a minimum
includes, but is not limited to, the following services or related
items:
(a) Hospital services, including charges for the most common
semiprivate room, for the most common private room if semiprivate rooms
do not exist in the health care facility, or for the private room if
medically necessary, but limited to a total of one hundred eighty
inpatient days in a calendar year, and limited to thirty days inpatient
care for mental and nervous conditions, or alcohol, drug, or chemical
dependency or abuse per calendar year;
(b) Professional services including surgery for the treatment of
injuries, illnesses, or conditions, other than dental, which are
rendered by a health care provider, or at the direction of a health
care provider, by a staff of registered or licensed practical nurses,
or other health care providers;
(c) The first twenty outpatient professional visits for the
diagnosis or treatment of one or more mental or nervous conditions or
alcohol, drug, or chemical dependency or abuse rendered during a
calendar year by one or more physicians, psychologists, or community
mental health professionals, or, at the direction of a physician, by
other qualified licensed health care practitioners, in the case of
mental or nervous conditions, and rendered by a state certified
chemical dependency program approved under chapter 70.96A RCW, in the
case of alcohol, drug, or chemical dependency or abuse;
(d) Drugs and contraceptive devices requiring a prescription;
(e) Services of a skilled nursing facility, excluding custodial and
convalescent care, for not more than one hundred days in a calendar
year as prescribed by a physician;
(f) Services of a home health agency;
(g) Chemotherapy, radioisotope, radiation, and nuclear medicine
therapy;
(h) Oxygen;
(i) Anesthesia services;
(j) Prostheses, other than dental;
(k) Durable medical equipment which has no personal use in the
absence of the condition for which prescribed;
(l) Diagnostic x-rays and laboratory tests;
(m) Oral surgery limited to the following: Fractures of facial
bones; excisions of mandibular joints, lesions of the mouth, lip, or
tongue, tumors, or cysts excluding treatment for temporomandibular
joints; incision of accessory sinuses, mouth salivary glands or ducts;
dislocations of the jaw; plastic reconstruction or repair of traumatic
injuries occurring while covered under the pool; and excision of
impacted wisdom teeth;
(n) Maternity care services;
(o) Services of a physical therapist and services of a speech
therapist;
(p) Hospice services;
(q) Professional ambulance service to the nearest health care
facility qualified to treat the illness or injury; and
(r) Other medical equipment, services, or supplies required by
physician's orders and medically necessary and consistent with the
diagnosis, treatment, and condition.
(((4))) (5) The pool shall offer at least one policy which closely
adheres to benefits available in the private, individual market.
(6) The board shall design and employ cost containment measures and
requirements such as, but not limited to, care coordination, provider
network limitations, preadmission certification, and concurrent
inpatient review which may make the pool more cost-effective.
(((5))) (7) The pool benefit policy may contain benefit
limitations, exceptions, and cost shares such as copayments,
coinsurance, and deductibles that are consistent with managed care
products, except that differential cost shares may be adopted by the
board for nonnetwork providers under point of service plans. ((The
pool benefit policy cost shares and limitations must be consistent with
those that are generally included in health plans approved by the
insurance commissioner; however, no limitation, exception, or reduction
may be used that would exclude coverage for any disease, illness, or
injury.
(6))) (8) The pool may not reject an individual for health plan
coverage based upon preexisting conditions of the individual or deny,
exclude, or otherwise limit coverage for an individual's preexisting
health conditions; except that it shall impose a six-month benefit
waiting period for preexisting conditions for which medical advice was
given, for which a health care provider recommended or provided
treatment, or for which a prudent layperson would have sought advice or
treatment, within six months before the effective date of coverage.
The preexisting condition waiting period shall not apply to prenatal
care services. The pool may not avoid the requirements of this section
through the creation of a new rate classification or the modification
of an existing rate classification. Credit against the waiting period
shall be as provided in subsection (((7))) (9) of this section.
(((7))) (9)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the
pool shall credit any preexisting condition waiting period in its plans
for a person who was enrolled at any time during the sixty-three day
period immediately preceding the date of application for the new pool
plan. For the person previously enrolled in a group health benefit
plan, the pool must credit the aggregate of all periods of preceding
coverage not separated by more than sixty-three days toward the waiting
period of the new health plan. For the person previously enrolled in
an individual health benefit plan other than a catastrophic health
plan, the pool must credit the period of coverage the person was
continuously covered under the immediately preceding health plan toward
the waiting period of the new health plan. For the purposes of this
subsection, a preceding health plan includes an employer-provided self-funded health plan.
(b) The pool shall waive any preexisting condition waiting period
for a person who is an eligible individual as defined in section
2741(b) of the federal health insurance portability and accountability
act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. 300gg-41(b)).
(((8))) (10) If an application is made for the pool policy as a
result of rejection by a carrier, then the date of application to the
carrier, rather than to the pool, should govern for purposes of
determining preexisting condition credit.
(11) The pool shall contract with organizations that provide care
management that has been demonstrated to be effective and shall
encourage enrollees who are eligible for care management services to
participate.

Sec. 25 RCW 48.41.160 and 1987 c 431 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A pool policy offered under this chapter prior to the effective
date of this section shall contain provisions under which the pool is
obligated to renew the policy until the day on which the individual in
whose name the policy is issued first becomes eligible for medicare
coverage. At that time, coverage of dependents shall terminate if such
dependents are eligible for coverage under a different health plan.
Dependents who become eligible for medicare prior to the individual in
whose name the policy is issued, shall receive benefits in accordance
with RCW 48.41.150.
(2) A pool policy offered after the effective date of this section
shall contain a guarantee of the individual's right to continued
coverage, subject to the provisions of subsections (4) and (5) of this
section.
(3) The guarantee of continuity of coverage required by this
section shall not prevent the pool from canceling or nonrenewing a
policy for:
(a) Nonpayment of premium;
(b) Violation of published policies of the pool;
(c) Failure of a covered person who becomes eligible for medicare
benefits by reason of age to apply for a pool medical supplement plan,
or a medicare supplement plan or other similar plan offered by a
carrier pursuant to federal laws and regulations;
(d) Failure of a covered person to pay any deductible or copayment
amount owed to the pool and not the provider of health care services;
(e) Covered persons committing fraudulent acts as to the pool;
(f) Covered persons materially breaching the pool policy; or
(g) Changes adopted to federal or state laws when such changes no
longer permit the continued offering of such coverage.
(4)(a) The guarantee of continuity of coverage provided by this
section requires that if the pool replaces a plan, it must make the
replacement plan available to all individuals in the plan being
replaced. The replacement plan must include all of the services
covered under the replaced plan, and must not significantly limit
access to the kind of services covered under the replaced plan. The
pool may also allow individuals who are covered by a plan that is being
replaced an unrestricted right to transfer to a fully comparable plan.
(b) The guarantee of continuity of coverage provided by this
section requires that if the pool discontinues offering a plan: (i)
The pool must provide notice to each individual of the discontinuation
at least ninety days prior to the date of the discontinuation; (ii) the
pool must offer to each individual provided coverage under the
discontinued plan the option to enroll in any other plan currently
offered by the pool for which the individual is otherwise eligible; and
(iii) in exercising the option to discontinue a plan and in offering
the option of coverage under (b)(ii) of this subsection, the pool must
act uniformly without regard to any health status-related factor of
enrolled individuals or individuals who may become eligible for this
coverage.
(c) The pool cannot replace a plan under this subsection until it
has completed an evaluation of the impact of replacing the plan upon:
(i) The cost and quality of care to pool enrollees;
(ii) Pool financing and enrollment;
(iii) The board's ability to offer comprehensive and other plans to
its enrollees;
(iv) The ability of carriers to offer health plans in the
individual market;
(v) Other items identified by the board.
In its evaluation, the board must request input from the
constituents represented by the board members.
(d) The guarantee of continuity of coverage provided by this
section does not apply if the pool has zero enrollment in a plan.
(5) The pool may not change the rates for pool policies except on
a class basis, with a clear disclosure in the policy of the pool's
right to do so.
(((3))) (6) A pool policy offered under this chapter shall provide
that, upon the death of the individual in whose name the policy is
issued, every other individual then covered under the policy may elect,
within a period specified in the policy, to continue coverage under the
same or a different policy.

Sec. 26 RCW 48.41.200 and 2000 c 79 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The pool shall determine the standard risk rate by calculating
the average individual standard rate charged for coverage comparable to
pool coverage by the five largest members, measured in terms of
individual market enrollment, offering such coverages in the state. In
the event five members do not offer comparable coverage, the standard
risk rate shall be established using reasonable actuarial techniques
and shall reflect anticipated experience and expenses for such coverage
in the individual market.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, maximum rates for
pool coverage shall be as follows:
(a) Maximum rates for a pool indemnity health plan shall be one
hundred fifty percent of the rate calculated under subsection (1) of
this section;
(b) Maximum rates for a pool care management plan shall be one
hundred twenty-five percent of the rate calculated under subsection (1)
of this section; and
(c) Maximum rates for a person eligible for pool coverage pursuant
to RCW 48.41.100(1)(a) who was enrolled at any time during the sixty-three day period immediately prior to the date of application for pool
coverage in a group health benefit plan or an individual health benefit
plan other than a catastrophic health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005,
where such coverage was continuous for at least eighteen months, shall
be:
(i) For a pool indemnity health plan, one hundred twenty-five
percent of the rate calculated under subsection (1) of this section;
and
(ii) For a pool care management plan, one hundred ten percent of
the rate calculated under subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) Subject to (b) and (c) of this subsection:
(i) The rate for any person ((aged fifty to sixty-four)) whose
current gross family income is less than two hundred fifty-one percent
of the federal poverty level shall be reduced by thirty percent from
what it would otherwise be;
(ii) The rate for any person ((aged fifty to sixty-four)) whose
current gross family income is more than two hundred fifty but less
than three hundred one percent of the federal poverty level shall be
reduced by fifteen percent from what it would otherwise be;
(iii) The rate for any person who has been enrolled in the pool for
more than thirty-six months shall be reduced by five percent from what
it would otherwise be.
(b) In no event shall the rate for any person be less than one
hundred ten percent of the rate calculated under subsection (1) of this
section.
(c) Rate reductions under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection shall
be available only to the extent that funds are specifically
appropriated for this purpose in the omnibus appropriations act.

Sec. 27 RCW 48.41.037 and 2000 c 79 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state health insurance pool account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from moneys
specifically appropriated to the account must be deposited in the
account. Expenditures from this account shall be used to cover
deficits incurred by the Washington state health insurance pool under
this chapter in excess of the threshold established in this section.
To the extent funds are available in the account, funds shall be
expended from the account to offset that portion of the deficit that
would otherwise have to be recovered by imposing an assessment on
members in excess of a threshold of seventy cents per insured person
per month. The commissioner shall authorize expenditures from the
account, to the extent that funds are available in the account, upon
certification by the pool board that assessments will exceed the
threshold level established in this section. The account is subject to
the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation
is not required for expenditures.
Whether the assessment has reached the threshold of seventy cents
per insured person per month shall be determined by dividing the total
aggregate amount of assessment by the proportion of total assessed
members. Thus, stop loss members shall be counted as one-tenth of a
whole member in the denominator given that is the amount they are
assessed proportionately relative to a fully insured medical member.

Sec. 28 RCW 48.41.100 and 2001 c 196 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following persons who are residents of this state are
eligible for pool coverage:
(a) Any person who provides evidence of a carrier's decision not to
accept him or her for enrollment in an individual health benefit plan
as defined in RCW 48.43.005 based upon, and within ninety days of the
receipt of, the results of the standard health questionnaire designated
by the board and administered by health carriers under RCW 48.43.018;
(b) Any person who continues to be eligible for pool coverage based
upon the results of the standard health questionnaire designated by the
board and administered by the pool administrator pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section;
(c) Any person who resides in a county of the state where no
carrier or insurer eligible under chapter 48.15 RCW offers to the
public an individual health benefit plan other than a catastrophic
health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 at the time of application to
the pool, and who makes direct application to the pool; and
(d) Any medicare eligible person upon providing evidence of
rejection for medical reasons, a requirement of restrictive riders, an
up-rated premium, or a preexisting conditions limitation on a medicare
supplemental insurance policy under chapter 48.66 RCW, the effect of
which is to substantially reduce coverage from that received by a
person considered a standard risk by at least one member within six
months of the date of application.
(2) The following persons are not eligible for coverage by the
pool:
(a) Any person having terminated coverage in the pool unless (i)
twelve months have lapsed since termination, or (ii) that person can
show continuous other coverage which has been involuntarily terminated
for any reason other than nonpayment of premiums. However, these
exclusions do not apply to eligible individuals as defined in section
2741(b) of the federal health insurance portability and accountability
act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-41(b));
(b) Any person on whose behalf the pool has paid out ((one)) two
million dollars in benefits;
(c) Inmates of public institutions and persons whose benefits are
duplicated under public programs. However, these exclusions do not
apply to eligible individuals as defined in section 2741(b) of the
federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 (42
U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-41(b));
(d) Any person who resides in a county of the state where any
carrier or insurer regulated under chapter 48.15 RCW offers to the
public an individual health benefit plan other than a catastrophic
health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 at the time of application to
the pool and who does not qualify for pool coverage based upon the
results of the standard health questionnaire, or pursuant to subsection
(1)(d) of this section.
(3) When a carrier or insurer regulated under chapter 48.15 RCW
begins to offer an individual health benefit plan in a county where no
carrier had been offering an individual health benefit plan:
(a) If the health benefit plan offered is other than a catastrophic
health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005, any person enrolled in a pool
plan pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section in that county shall
no longer be eligible for coverage under that plan pursuant to
subsection (1)(c) of this section, but may continue to be eligible for
pool coverage based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire designated by the board and administered by the pool
administrator. The pool administrator shall offer to administer the
questionnaire to each person no longer eligible for coverage under
subsection (1)(c) of this section within thirty days of determining
that he or she is no longer eligible;
(b) Losing eligibility for pool coverage under this subsection (3)
does not affect a person's eligibility for pool coverage under
subsection (1)(a), (b), or (d) of this section; and
(c) The pool administrator shall provide written notice to any
person who is no longer eligible for coverage under a pool plan under
this subsection (3) within thirty days of the administrator's
determination that the person is no longer eligible. The notice shall:
(i) Indicate that coverage under the plan will cease ninety days from
the date that the notice is dated; (ii) describe any other coverage
options, either in or outside of the pool, available to the person;
(iii) describe the procedures for the administration of the standard
health questionnaire to determine the person's continued eligibility
for coverage under subsection (1)(b) of this section; and (iv) describe
the enrollment process for the available options outside of the pool.
(4) The board shall ensure that an independent analysis of the
eligibility standards for the pool coverage is conducted, including
examining eligibility for medicaid enrollees and other publicly
sponsored enrollees, and the impacts on the pool and the state budget.
The board shall report the findings to the legislature by December 1,
2007.

Sec. 29 RCW 48.41.120 and 2000 c 79 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitation provided in subsection (((3))) (2) of
this section, a pool policy offered in accordance with RCW 48.41.110(3)
shall impose a deductible. Deductibles of five hundred dollars and one
thousand dollars on a per person per calendar year basis shall
initially be offered. The board may authorize deductibles in other
amounts. The deductible shall be applied to the first five hundred
dollars, one thousand dollars, or other authorized amount of eligible
expenses incurred by the covered person.
(2) ((Subject to the limitations provided in subsection (3) of this
section, a mandatory coinsurance requirement shall be imposed at the
rate of twenty percent of eligible expenses in excess of the mandatory
deductible.
(3))) The maximum aggregate out of pocket payments for eligible
expenses by the insured in the form of deductibles and coinsurance
under a pool policy offered in accordance with RCW 48.41.110(3) shall
not exceed in a calendar year:
(a) One thousand five hundred dollars per individual, or three
thousand dollars per family, per calendar year for the five hundred
dollar deductible policy;
(b) Two thousand five hundred dollars per individual, or five
thousand dollars per family per calendar year for the one thousand
dollar deductible policy; or
(c) An amount authorized by the board for any other deductible
policy.
(((4))) (3) Eligible expenses incurred by a covered person in the
last three months of a calendar year, and applied toward a deductible,
shall also be applied toward the deductible amount in the next calendar
year.
(4) The board may modify cost-sharing as an incentive for enrollees
to participate in care management services and other cost-effective
programs and policies.

Sec. 30 RCW 48.43.005 and 2006 c 25 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless otherwise specifically provided, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adjusted community rate" means the rating method used to
establish the premium for health plans adjusted to reflect actuarially
demonstrated differences in utilization or cost attributable to
geographic region, age, family size, and use of wellness activities.
(2) "Basic health plan" means the plan described under chapter
70.47 RCW, as revised from time to time.
(3) "Basic health plan model plan" means a health plan as required
in RCW 70.47.060(2)(e).
(4) "Basic health plan services" means that schedule of covered
health services, including the description of how those benefits are to
be administered, that are required to be delivered to an enrollee under
the basic health plan, as revised from time to time.
(5) "Catastrophic health plan" means:
(a) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering a
single enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, one thousand ((five)) seven hundred fifty
dollars and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under
the plan (other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least
three thousand five hundred dollars; and
(b) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering more
than one enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, three thousand five hundred dollars and an
annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan (other
than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least ((five)) six
thousand ((five hundred)) dollars; or
(c) Any health benefit plan that provides benefits for hospital
inpatient and outpatient services, professional and prescription drugs
provided in conjunction with such hospital inpatient and outpatient
services, and excludes or substantially limits outpatient physician
services and those services usually provided in an office setting.
(6) "Certification" means a determination by a review organization
that an admission, extension of stay, or other health care service or
procedure has been reviewed and, based on the information provided,
meets the clinical requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness,
level of care, or effectiveness under the auspices of the applicable
health benefit plan.
(7) "Concurrent review" means utilization review conducted during
a patient's hospital stay or course of treatment.
(8) "Covered person" or "enrollee" means a person covered by a
health plan including an enrollee, subscriber, policyholder,
beneficiary of a group plan, or individual covered by any other health
plan.
(9) "Dependent" means, at a minimum, the enrollee's legal spouse
and unmarried dependent children who qualify for coverage under the
enrollee's health benefit plan.
(10) "Eligible employee" means an employee who works on a full-time
basis with a normal work week of thirty or more hours. The term
includes a self-employed individual, including a sole proprietor, a
partner of a partnership, and may include an independent contractor, if
the self-employed individual, sole proprietor, partner, or independent
contractor is included as an employee under a health benefit plan of a
small employer, but does not work less than thirty hours per week and
derives at least seventy-five percent of his or her income from a trade
or business through which he or she has attempted to earn taxable
income and for which he or she has filed the appropriate internal
revenue service form. Persons covered under a health benefit plan
pursuant to the consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1986
shall not be considered eligible employees for purposes of minimum
participation requirements of chapter 265, Laws of 1995.
(11) "Emergency medical condition" means the emergent and acute
onset of a symptom or symptoms, including severe pain, that would lead
a prudent layperson acting reasonably to believe that a health
condition exists that requires immediate medical attention, if failure
to provide medical attention would result in serious impairment to
bodily functions or serious dysfunction of a bodily organ or part, or
would place the person's health in serious jeopardy.
(12) "Emergency services" means otherwise covered health care
services medically necessary to evaluate and treat an emergency medical
condition, provided in a hospital emergency department.
(13) "Enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing" means amounts paid to
health carriers directly providing services, health care providers, or
health care facilities by enrollees and may include copayments,
coinsurance, or deductibles.
(14) "Grievance" means a written complaint submitted by or on
behalf of a covered person regarding: (a) Denial of payment for
medical services or nonprovision of medical services included in the
covered person's health benefit plan, or (b) service delivery issues
other than denial of payment for medical services or nonprovision of
medical services, including dissatisfaction with medical care, waiting
time for medical services, provider or staff attitude or demeanor, or
dissatisfaction with service provided by the health carrier.
(15) "Health care facility" or "facility" means hospices licensed
under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW,
rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020, psychiatric
hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed
under chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental health centers licensed under
chapter 71.05 or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment centers licensed
under chapter 70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or surgical
facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, drug and alcohol treatment
facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A RCW, and home health agencies
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and includes such facilities if
owned and operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the
state and such other facilities as required by federal law and
implementing regulations.
(16) "Health care provider" or "provider" means:
(a) A person regulated under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to
practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing
health care services in this state consistent with state law; or
(b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of this
subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or her employment.
(17) "Health care service" means that service offered or provided
by health care facilities and health care providers relating to the
prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.
(18) "Health carrier" or "carrier" means a disability insurer
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care service
contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020.
(19) "Health plan" or "health benefit plan" means any policy,
contract, or agreement offered by a health carrier to provide, arrange,
reimburse, or pay for health care services except the following:
(a) Long-term care insurance governed by chapter 48.84 RCW;
(b) Medicare supplemental health insurance governed by chapter
48.66 RCW;
(c) Coverage supplemental to the coverage provided under chapter
55, Title 10, United States Code;
(d) Limited health care services offered by limited health care
service contractors in accordance with RCW 48.44.035;
(e) Disability income;
(f) Coverage incidental to a property/casualty liability insurance
policy such as automobile personal injury protection coverage and
homeowner guest medical;
(g) Workers' compensation coverage;
(h) Accident only coverage;
(i) Specified disease and hospital confinement indemnity when
marketed solely as a supplement to a health plan;
(j) Employer-sponsored self-funded health plans;
(k) Dental only and vision only coverage; and
(l) Plans deemed by the insurance commissioner to have a short-term
limited purpose or duration, or to be a student-only plan that is
guaranteed renewable while the covered person is enrolled as a regular
full-time undergraduate or graduate student at an accredited higher
education institution, after a written request for such classification
by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the insurance
commissioner.
(20) "Material modification" means a change in the actuarial value
of the health plan as modified of more than five percent but less than
fifteen percent.
(21) "Preexisting condition" means any medical condition, illness,
or injury that existed any time prior to the effective date of
coverage.
(22) "Premium" means all sums charged, received, or deposited by a
health carrier as consideration for a health plan or the continuance of
a health plan. Any assessment or any "membership," "policy,"
"contract," "service," or similar fee or charge made by a health
carrier in consideration for a health plan is deemed part of the
premium. "Premium" shall not include amounts paid as enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing.
(23) "Review organization" means a disability insurer regulated
under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care service contractor as
defined in RCW 48.44.010, or health maintenance organization as defined
in RCW 48.46.020, and entities affiliated with, under contract with, or
acting on behalf of a health carrier to perform a utilization review.
(24) "Small employer" or "small group" means any person, firm,
corporation, partnership, association, political subdivision, sole
proprietor, or self-employed individual that is actively engaged in
business that, on at least fifty percent of its working days during the
preceding calendar quarter, employed at least two but no more than
fifty eligible employees, with a normal work week of thirty or more
hours, the majority of whom were employed within this state, and is not
formed primarily for purposes of buying health insurance and in which
a bona fide employer-employee relationship exists. In determining the
number of eligible employees, companies that are affiliated companies,
or that are eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of
taxation by this state, shall be considered an employer. Subsequent to
the issuance of a health plan to a small employer and for the purpose
of determining eligibility, the size of a small employer shall be
determined annually. Except as otherwise specifically provided, a
small employer shall continue to be considered a small employer until
the plan anniversary following the date the small employer no longer
meets the requirements of this definition. A self-employed individual
or sole proprietor must derive at least seventy-five percent of his or
her income from a trade or business through which the individual or
sole proprietor has attempted to earn taxable income and for which he
or she has filed the appropriate internal revenue service form 1040,
schedule C or F, for the previous taxable year except for a self-employed individual or sole proprietor in an agricultural trade or
business, who must derive at least fifty-one percent of his or her
income from the trade or business through which the individual or sole
proprietor has attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she
has filed the appropriate internal revenue service form 1040, for the
previous taxable year. A self-employed individual or sole proprietor
who is covered as a group of one on the day prior to June 10, 2004,
shall also be considered a "small employer" to the extent that
individual or group of one is entitled to have his or her coverage
renewed as provided in RCW 48.43.035(6).
(25) "Utilization review" means the prospective, concurrent, or
retrospective assessment of the necessity and appropriateness of the
allocation of health care resources and services of a provider or
facility, given or proposed to be given to an enrollee or group of
enrollees.
(26) "Wellness activity" means an explicit program of an activity
consistent with department of health guidelines, such as, smoking
cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse,
appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle
safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition education for the
purpose of improving enrollee health status and reducing health service
costs.

Sec. 31 RCW 48.41.190 and 1989 c 121 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Neither the participation by members, the establishment of rates,
forms, or procedures for coverages issued by the pool, nor any other
joint or collective action required by this chapter or the state of
Washington shall be the basis of any legal action, civil or criminal
liability or penalty against the pool, any member of the board of
directors, or members of the pool either jointly or separately. The
pool, members of the pool, board directors of the pool, officers of the
pool, employees of the pool, the commissioner, the commissioner's
representatives, and the commissioner's employees shall not be civilly
or criminally liable and shall not have any penalty or cause of action
of any nature arise against them for any action taken or not taken,
including any discretionary decision or failure to make a discretionary
decision, when the action or inaction is done in good faith and in the
performance of the powers and duties under this chapter. Nothing in
this section prohibits legal actions against the pool to enforce the
pool's statutory or contractual duties or obligations.

Sec. 32 RCW 41.05.075 and 2006 c 103 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The administrator shall provide benefit plans designed by the
board through a contract or contracts with insuring entities, through
self-funding, self-insurance, or other methods of providing insurance
coverage authorized by RCW 41.05.140.
(2) The administrator shall establish a contract bidding process
that:
(a) Encourages competition among insuring entities;
(b) Maintains an equitable relationship between premiums charged
for similar benefits and between risk pools including premiums charged
for retired state and school district employees under the separate risk
pools established by RCW 41.05.022 and 41.05.080 such that insuring
entities may not avoid risk when establishing the premium rates for
retirees eligible for medicare;
(c) Is timely to the state budgetary process; and
(d) Sets conditions for awarding contracts to any insuring entity.
(3) The administrator shall establish a requirement for review of
utilization and financial data from participating insuring entities on
a quarterly basis.
(4) The administrator shall centralize the enrollment files for all
employee and retired or disabled school employee health plans offered
under chapter 41.05 RCW and develop enrollment demographics on a plan-specific basis.
(5) All claims data shall be the property of the state. The
administrator may require of any insuring entity that submits a bid to
contract for coverage all information deemed necessary including:
(a) Subscriber or member demographic and claims data necessary for
risk assessment and adjustment calculations in order to fulfill the
administrator's duties as set forth in this chapter; and
(b) Subscriber or member demographic and claims data necessary to
implement performance measures or financial incentives related to
performance under subsection (7) of this section.
(6) All contracts with insuring entities for the provision of
health care benefits shall provide that the beneficiaries of such
benefit plans may use on an equal participation basis the services of
practitioners licensed pursuant to chapters 18.22, 18.25, 18.32, 18.53,
18.57, 18.71, 18.74, 18.83, and 18.79 RCW, as it applies to registered
nurses and advanced registered nurse practitioners. However, nothing
in this subsection may preclude the administrator from establishing
appropriate utilization controls approved pursuant to RCW 41.05.065(2)
(a), (b), and (d).
(7) The administrator shall, in collaboration with other state
agencies that administer state purchased health care programs, private
health care purchasers, health care facilities, providers, and
carriers:
(a) Use evidence-based medicine principles to develop common
performance measures and implement financial incentives in contracts
with insuring entities, health care facilities, and providers that:
(i) Reward improvements in health outcomes for individuals with
chronic diseases, increased utilization of appropriate preventive
health services, and reductions in medical errors; and
(ii) Increase, through appropriate incentives to insuring entities,
health care facilities, and providers, the adoption and use of
information technology that contributes to improved health outcomes,
better coordination of care, and decreased medical errors;
(b) Through state health purchasing, reimbursement, or pilot
strategies, promote and increase the adoption of health information
technology systems, including electronic medical records, by hospitals
as defined in RCW 70.41.020(4), integrated delivery systems, and
providers that:
(i) Facilitate diagnosis or treatment;
(ii) Reduce unnecessary duplication of medical tests;
(iii) Promote efficient electronic physician order entry;
(iv) Increase access to health information for consumers and their
providers; and
(v) Improve health outcomes;
(c) Coordinate a strategy for the adoption of health information
technology systems using the final health information technology report
and recommendations developed under chapter 261, Laws of 2005.
(8) The administrator may permit the Washington state health
insurance pool to contract to utilize any network maintained by the
authority or any network under contract with the authority.

STRENGTHEN THE PUBLIC HEALTH SYSTEM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 31, 2007, within funds specifically appropriated
therefor, the department shall award basic, noncategorical state public
health funding to local public health jurisdictions through an annual
contract which is based on performance measures for public health
improvement, and which requires regular reporting to demonstrate
progress toward meeting performance goals. This shall include local
capacity development funds and any additional funds approved by the
legislature to strengthen the public health system.
The department shall require the local health jurisdiction to
regularly document compliance with contract requirements, and shall
report to the legislature every two years on progress toward achieving
public health improvement goals with funds provided for this purpose.
(2) Each contract with a local public health jurisdiction shall
require reports of data on specific local public health indicators
published in the most recent public health improvement plan, and a
record of efforts to protect and improve the health of people in each
local jurisdiction. To establish a basis for judging progress toward
health goals:
(a) The local public health jurisdiction shall report data to
document trends in protecting and improving public health using the
local public health indicators;
(b) The department shall assist in assuring that needed data can be
obtained at the county or local jurisdiction level;
(c) Technical assistance and information about evidence-based
practice shall be provided to local jurisdictions through the efforts
of the department; and
(d) The department shall routinely publish information on
successful practices so that all local jurisdictions have information
to improve effectiveness.
(3) To qualify for state funding under this section, local health
jurisdictions must participate in demonstrating basic capacity to
perform expected functions described in Standards for Public Health and
published in the public health services improvement plan under RCW
43.70.520:
(a) The Standards for Public Health shall serve as the basic
framework for evaluating each local health jurisdiction's ability to
meet minimum expectations to perform public health functions;
(b) A measurement of every local jurisdiction shall be conducted no
less than every third year;
(c) The department shall participate in the standards measurement
process so that state-level support of the public health system is
demonstrated; and
(d) Each local jurisdiction shall develop a quality improvement
plan to use standards measurement results to improve capacity to meet
public health standards prior to the next measurement cycle.

PREVENTION AND HEALTH PROMOTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 The Washington state health care authority,
the department of social and health services, the department of labor
and industries, and the department of health shall, by September 1,
2007, develop a five-year plan to integrate disease and accident
prevention and health promotion into state health programs by:
(1) Structuring benefits and reimbursements to promote healthy
choices and disease and accident prevention;
(2) Requiring enrollees in state health programs to complete a
health assessment, and providing appropriate follow up;
(3) Reimbursing for cost-effective prevention activities; and
(4) Developing prevention and health promotion contracting
standards for state programs that contract with health carriers.
The plan shall identify any existing barriers and opportunities to
support implementation, including needed changes to state or federal
law, and be submitted to the governor and the legislature upon
completion. The agencies shall report annually to the legislature
beginning September 2007, and September of each year thereafter,
initially on what the targets are; and in the years to follow, the
effectiveness and efficiency with which each strategy in the plan has
achieved the goals of reducing the cost of health care for individuals,
improving people's health, and achieving the goals set for this
section. The agencies shall include health insurance carriers in the
development of the plan.

Sec. 35 RCW 41.05.540 and 2005 c 360 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The health care authority, in coordination with ((the
department of personnel,)) the department of health, health plans
participating in public employees' benefits board programs, and the
University of Washington's center for health promotion, ((may create a
worksite health promotion program to develop and implement initiatives
designed to increase physical activity and promote improved self-care
and engagement in health care decision-making among state employees.
(2) The health care authority shall report to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2006, on progress in implementing, and
evaluating the results of, the worksite health promotion program))
shall establish and maintain a state employee health program focused on
reducing the health risks of state employees, dependents, and retirees
enrolled in the public employees' benefits board. The program shall
use public and private sector best practices to achieve goals of
measurable health outcomes, measurable productivity improvements,
positive impact on the cost of medical care, and positive return on
investment.
(2) The state employee health program shall:
(a) Provide technical assistance and other services as needed to
wellness staff in all state agencies and institutions of higher
education;
(b) Develop effective communication tools and ongoing training for
wellness staff;
(c) Contract with outside vendors for evaluation of program goals;
(d) Strongly encourage the widespread completion of online health
assessment tools for all state employees, dependents, and retirees.
The health assessment tool must be voluntary and confidential. Health
assessment data and claims data shall be used to:
(i) Engage state agencies and institutions of higher education in
providing evidence-based programs targeted at reducing identified
health risks;
(ii) Guide contracting with third-party vendors to implement
behavior change tools for targeted high-risk populations; and
(iii) Guide the benefit structure for state employees, dependents,
and retirees to include covered services and medications known to
manage and reduce health risks.
(3) The health care authority shall report to the legislature in
December 2008, 2009, and 2010 on outcome goals for the employee health
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The health care authority through the state employee health
program shall create a state employee health demonstration project in
four state agencies: The department of health, department of
personnel, department of natural resources, and department of labor and
industries. Demonstration project agencies shall operate employee
health programs for their employees in collaboration with the state
employee health program. Agency demonstration project employee health
programs:
(a) Shall include but are not limited to the following key
elements: Outreach to all staff with efforts made to reach the largest
percentage of employees possible; awareness-building information that
promotes health; motivational opportunities that encourage employees to
improve their health; behavior change opportunities that demonstrate
and support behavior change; and tools to improve employee health care
decisions;
(b) Must have wellness staff with direct accountability to agency
senior management;
(c) Shall initiate and maintain employee health programs using
current and emerging best practices in the field of health promotion;
(d) May offer employees such incentives as cash for completing
health risk assessments, free preventive screenings, training in
behavior change tools, improved nutritional standards on agency
campuses, bike racks, walking maps, on-site weight reduction programs,
and regular communication to promote personal health awareness.
(2) The state employee health program shall evaluate each of the
four programs separately and compare outcomes for each of them with the
entire state employee population to assess effectiveness of the
programs. Specifically, the program shall measure at least the
following outcomes in the demonstration population: The reduction in
the percent of the population that is overweight or obese, the
reduction in risk factors related to diabetes, the reduction in risk
factors related to absenteeism, the reduction in tobacco consumption,
and the increase in appropriate use of preventive health services. The
state employee health program shall report to the legislature in
December 2008, 2009, and 2010 on the demonstration project.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 The legislature finds that prescription
drug abuse has been on the rise and that often dispensers and
prescribing providers are unaware of prescriptions provided by others
both in and out of state.
It is the intent of the legislature to establish an electronic
database available in real time to dispensers and prescribers of
controlled substances. And further, that the department in as much as
possible should establish a common dataset with other sets of other
states.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Controlled substance" has the meaning provided in RCW
69.50.101.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Patient" means the person or animal who is the ultimate user
of a drug for whom a prescription is issued or for whom a drug is
dispensed.
(4) "Dispenser" means a person who delivers a Schedule II, III, IV,
or V controlled substance to the ultimate user, but does not include:
(a) A practitioner or other authorized person who administers, as
defined in RCW 69.41.010, a controlled substance; or
(b) A licensed wholesale distributor or manufacturer, as defined in
chapter 18.64 RCW, of a controlled substance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 (1) The department shall establish and
maintain a web-based interactive prescription monitoring program
available is real time to monitor the prescribing and dispensing of all
Schedules II, III, IV, and V controlled substances and any additional
drugs identified by the board of pharmacy as demonstrating a potential
for abuse by all professionals licensed to prescribe or dispense such
substances in this state. As much as possible, the department should
establish a common database with other states.
(2) Each dispenser shall submit to the department by electronic
means information regarding each prescription dispensed for a drug
included under subsection (1) of this section. Drug prescriptions for
more than immediate one day use should be immediately reported. The
information submitted for each prescription shall include, but not be
limited to:
(a) Patient identifier;
(b) Drug dispensed;
(c) Date of dispensing;
(d) Quantity dispensed;
(e) Prescriber; and
(f) Dispenser.
(3) Each dispenser shall immediately submit the information in
accordance with transmission methods established by the department.
(4) The department may issue a waiver to a dispenser that is unable
to submit prescription information by electronic means; however, all
dispensers shall be required to submit prescription information by
electronic means within one year from the effective date of this
section. The waiver may permit the dispenser to submit prescription
information by paper form or other means, provided all information
required in subsection (2) of this section is submitted in this
alternative format.
(5) The department shall seek federal grants to cover the costs of
operating the prescription monitoring program. The department may not
require a practitioner or a pharmacist to pay a fee or tax specifically
dedicated to the operation of the system.
(6) The department shall report to the legislature on the
implementation of this chapter by December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 (1) Prescription information submitted to
the department shall be confidential, in compliance with the health
insurance portability and accountability act, and not subject to
disclosure, except as provided in subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this
section.
(2) The department shall maintain procedures to ensure that the
privacy and confidentiality of patients and patient information
collected, recorded, transmitted, and maintained is not disclosed to
persons except as in subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section.
(3) The department shall review the prescription information. The
department shall notify the practitioner and allow explanation or
correction of any problem. If there is reasonable cause to believe a
violation of law or breach of professional standards may have occurred,
the department shall notify the appropriate law enforcement or
professional licensing, certification, or regulatory agency or entity,
and provide prescription information required for an investigation.
(4) The department may provide data in the prescription monitoring
program to the following persons:
(a) Persons authorized to prescribe or dispense controlled
substances, for the purpose of providing medical or pharmaceutical care
for their patients;
(b) An individual who requests the individual's own prescription
monitoring information;
(c) Health professional licensing, certification, or regulatory
agency or entity;
(d) Appropriate local, state, and federal law enforcement or
prosecutorial officials who are engaged in a bona fide specific
investigation involving a designated person;
(e) Authorized practitioners of the department of social and health
services regarding medicaid program recipients;
(f) Other entities under grand jury subpoena or court order; and
(g) Personnel of the department for purposes of administration and
enforcement of this chapter or chapter 69.50 RCW.
(5) The department may provide data to public or private entities
for statistical, research, or educational purposes after removing
information that could be used to identify individual patients,
dispensers, prescribers, and persons who received prescriptions from
dispensers.
(6) A dispenser or practitioner acting in good faith is immune from
any civil, criminal, or administrative liability that might otherwise
be incurred or imposed for requesting, receiving, or using information
from the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 The department may contract with another
agency of this state or with a private vendor, as necessary, to ensure
the effective operation of the prescription monitoring program. Any
contractor is bound to comply with the provisions regarding
confidentiality of prescription information in section 40 of this act
and is subject to the penalties specified in section 43 of this act for
unlawful acts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 The department shall adopt rules to
implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 43 (1) A dispenser who knowingly fails to
submit prescription monitoring information to the department as
required by this chapter or knowingly submits incorrect prescription
information is subject to disciplinary action under chapter 18.130 RCW.
(2) A person authorized to have prescription monitoring information
under this chapter who knowingly discloses such information in
violation of this chapter is subject to civil penalty.
(3) A person authorized to have prescription monitoring information
under this chapter who uses such information in a manner or for a
purpose in violation of this chapter is subject to civil penalty.
(4) In accordance with the health insurance portability and
accountability act, any physician or pharmacist authorized to access a
patient's prescription monitoring may discuss or release that
information to other health care providers involved with the patient in
order to provide safe and appropriate care coordination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 44 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

Sec. 45 RCW 42.56.360 and 2006 c 209 s 9 and 2006 c 8 s 112 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The following health care information is exempt from disclosure
under this chapter:
(a) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in
RCW 69.45.090;
(b) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department
of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044,
69.41.280, and 18.64.420;
(c) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee under RCW
43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250, or by a quality assurance committee pursuant to RCW 74.42.640
or 18.20.390, and notifications or reports of adverse events or
incidents made under RCW 70.56.020 or 70.56.040, regardless of which
agency is in possession of the information and documents;
(d)(i) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the
submitting entity, with review by the department of health,
specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with
an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption
sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310;
(ii) If a request for such information is received, the submitting
entity must be notified of the request. Within ten business days of
receipt of the notice, the submitting entity shall provide a written
statement of the continuing need for confidentiality, which shall be
provided to the requester. Upon receipt of such notice, the department
of health shall continue to treat information designated under this
subsection (1)(d) as exempt from disclosure;
(iii) If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure
under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to
demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality;
(e) Records of the entity obtained in an action under RCW 18.71.300
through 18.71.340;
(f) Except for published statistical compilations and reports
relating to the infant mortality review studies that do not identify
individual cases and sources of information, any records or documents
obtained, prepared, or maintained by the local health department for
the purposes of an infant mortality review conducted by the department
of health under RCW 70.05.170; ((and))
(g) Complaints filed under chapter 18.130 RCW after July 27, 1997,
to the extent provided in RCW 18.130.095(1); and
(h) Information obtained by the department of health under chapter
69.-- RCW (sections 37 through 44 of this act).
(2) Chapter 70.02 RCW applies to public inspection and copying of
health care information of patients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 46 The legislature finds that many small
employers struggle with the cost of providing employer-sponsored health
insurance coverage to their employees, while others are unable to offer
coverage due to its high cost. It is the intent of the legislature to
encourage the availability of less expensive health insurance plans,
and expand the flexibility of small employers to purchase less
expensive products.

Sec. 47 RCW 70.47A.040 and 2006 c 255 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2007, the administrator shall accept
applications from eligible employees, on behalf of themselves, their
spouses, and their dependent children, to receive premium subsidies
through the small employer health insurance partnership program.
(2) Premium subsidy payments may be provided to eligible employees
((if:)) or participating carriers on behalf of employees.
(a) The eligible employee ((is)) must be employed by a small
employer((;)).
(b) ((The actuarial value of the health benefit plan offered by the
small employer is at least equivalent to that of the basic health plan
benefit offered under chapter 70.47 RCW. The office of the insurance
commissioner under Title 48 RCW shall certify those small employer
health benefit plans that are at least actuarially equivalent to the
basic health plan benefit; and)) Small employers may offer any
available health benefit plan including health savings accounts.
Health savings account subsidy payments may be provided to eligible
employees if the eligible employee participates in an
employer-sponsored high deductible health plan and health savings
account that conforms to the requirements of the United States internal
revenue service.
(c) The small employer will pay at least forty percent of the
monthly premium cost for health benefit plan coverage of the eligible
employee.
(3) The amount of an eligible employee's premium subsidy shall be
determined by applying the sliding scale subsidy schedule developed for
subsidized basic health plan enrollees under RCW 70.47.060 to the
employee's premium obligation for his or her employer's health benefit
plan.
(4) After an eligible individual has enrolled in the program, the
program shall issue subsidies in an amount determined pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section to either the eligible employee or to
the carrier designated by the eligible employee.
(5) An eligible employee must agree to provide verification of
continued enrollment in his or her small employer's health benefit plan
on a semiannual basis or to notify the administrator whenever his or
her enrollment status changes, whichever is earlier. Verification or
notification may be made directly by the employee, or through his or
her employer or the carrier providing the small employer health benefit
plan. When necessary, the administrator has the authority to perform
retrospective audits on premium subsidy accounts. The administrator
may suspend or terminate an employee's participation in the program and
seek repayment of any subsidy amounts paid due to the omission or
misrepresentation of an applicant or enrolled employee. The
administrator shall adopt rules to define the appropriate application
of these sanctions and the processes to implement the sanctions
provided in this subsection, within available resources.

Sec. 48 RCW 48.21.045 and 2004 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a))) An insurer offering any health benefit plan to a small
employer, either directly or through an association or member-governed
group formed specifically for the purpose of purchasing health care,
may offer and actively market to the small employer ((a)) no more than
one health benefit plan featuring a limited schedule of covered health
care services. ((Nothing in this subsection shall preclude an insurer
from offering, or a small employer from purchasing, other health
benefit plans that may have more comprehensive benefits than those
included in the product offered under this subsection. An insurer
offering a health benefit plan under this subsection shall clearly
disclose all covered benefits to the small employer in a brochure filed
with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.21.130, 48.21.140, 48.21.141, 48.21.142,
48.21.144, 48.21.146, 48.21.160 through 48.21.197, 48.21.200,
48.21.220, 48.21.225, 48.21.230, 48.21.235, 48.21.240, 48.21.244,
48.21.250, 48.21.300, 48.21.310, or 48.21.320.
(2))) (a) The plan offered under this subsection may be offered
with a choice of cost-sharing arrangements, and may, but is not
required to, comply with: RCW 48.21.130 through 48.21.240, 48.21.244
through 48.21.280, 48.21.300 through 48.21.320, 48.43.045(1) except as
required in (b) of this subsection, 48.43.093, 48.43.115 through
48.43.185, 48.43.515(5), or 48.42.100.
(b) In offering the plan under this subsection, the insurer must
offer the small employer the option of permitting every category of
health care provider to provide health services or care for conditions
covered by the plan pursuant to RCW 48.43.045(1).
(2) An insurer offering the plan under subsection (1) of this
section must also offer and actively market to the small employer at
least one additional health benefit plan.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from
offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit plans with
benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under subsection
(1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts shall be
submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any plan
offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to the
benefits thereto.
(((3))) (4) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small
employers as defined in this section shall be subject to the following
provisions:
(a) The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (((3))) (4).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs ((due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network)) for a plan. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(i) Except for small group health benefit plans that qualify as
insurance coverage combined with a health savings account defined by
the United States internal revenue service, adjusted community rates
established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
small groups purchasing coverage. However, annual rate adjustments for
each small group health benefit plan may vary by up to plus or minus
((four)) eight percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool, ((such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal)) if certified by a member of the American academy of
actuaries, that: (i) The variation is a result of deductible leverage,
benefit design, claims cost trend for the plan, or provider network
characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period, the projected
weighted average of all small group benefit plans will have a revenue
neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool. Variations of
greater than eight percentage points are subject to review by the
commissioner and must be approved or denied within thirty days of
submittal. A variation that is not denied within ((sixty)) thirty days
shall be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier
a detailed actuarial justification for any denial ((within thirty
days)) at the time of the denial.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of
employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in
excess of those provided herein.
(((5))) (6)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements
used by an insurer in determining whether to provide coverage to a
small employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers
applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) An insurer shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) An insurer may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(((6))) (7) An insurer must offer coverage to all eligible
employees of a small employer and their dependents. An insurer may not
offer coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small
employer group or to only part of the group. An insurer may not modify
a health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee
or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.
(((7))) (8) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "small
employer," "adjusted community rate," and "wellness activities" mean
the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 49 RCW 48.44.023 and 2004 c 244 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a))) A health care services contractor offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, may offer and actively market to the
small employer ((a)) no more than one health benefit plan featuring a
limited schedule of covered health care services. ((Nothing in this
subsection shall preclude a contractor from offering, or a small
employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more
comprehensive benefits than those included in the product offered under
this subsection. A contractor offering a health benefit plan under
this subsection shall clearly disclose all covered benefits to the
small employer in a brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.44.225, 48.44.240, 48.44.245, 48.44.290,
48.44.300, 48.44.310, 48.44.320, 48.44.325, 48.44.330, 48.44.335,
48.44.340, 48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, 48.44.440, 48.44.450, and
48.44.460.
(2))) (a) The plan offered under this subsection may be offered
with a choice of cost-sharing arrangements, and may, but is not
required to, comply with: RCW 48.44.210, 48.44.212, 48.44.225,
48.44.240 through 48.44.245, 48.44.290 through 48.44.340, 48.44.344,
48.44.360 through 48.44.380, 48.44.400, 48.44.420, 48.44.440 through
48.44.460, 48.44.500, 48.43.045(1) except as required in (b) of this
subsection, 48.43.093, 48.43.115 through 48.43.185, 48.43.515(5), or
48.42.100.
(b) In offering the plan under this subsection, the health care
service contractor must offer the small employer the option of
permitting every category of health care provider to provide health
services or care for conditions covered by the plan pursuant to RCW
48.43.045(1).
(2) A health care service contractor offering the plan under
subsection (1) of this section must also offer and actively market to
the small employer at least one additional health benefit plan.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care service
contractor from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts
shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to
the benefits thereto.
(((3))) (4) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small
employers as defined in this section shall be subject to the following
provisions:
(a) The contractor shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The contractor shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (((3))) (4).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs ((due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network)) for a plan. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(i) Except for small group health benefit plans that qualify as
insurance coverage combined with a health savings account as defined by
the United States internal revenue service, adjusted community rates
established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
groups purchasing coverage. However, annual rate adjustments for each
small group health benefit plan may vary by up to plus or minus
((four)) eight percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool((, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal)) if certified by a member of the American academy of
actuaries, that: (i) The variation is a result of deductible leverage,
benefit design, claims cost trend for the plan, or provider network
characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period, the projected
weighted average of all small group benefit plans will have a revenue
neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool. Variations of
greater than eight percentage points are subject to review by the
commissioner and must be approved or denied within thirty days of
submittal. A variation that is not denied within ((sixty)) thirty days
shall be deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier
a detailed actuarial justification for any denial ((within thirty
days)) at the time of the denial.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of
employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in
excess of those provided herein.
(((5))) (6)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements
used by a contractor in determining whether to provide coverage to a
small employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers
applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A contractor shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A contractor may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(((6))) (7) A contractor must offer coverage to all eligible
employees of a small employer and their dependents. A contractor may
not offer coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small
employer group or to only part of the group. A contractor may not
modify a health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible
employee or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to
restrict or exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical
conditions, or services otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 50 RCW 48.46.066 and 2004 c 244 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a))) A health maintenance organization offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, may offer and actively market to the
small employer ((a)) no more than one health benefit plan featuring a
limited schedule of covered health care services. ((Nothing in this
subsection shall preclude a health maintenance organization from
offering, or a small employer from purchasing, other health benefit
plans that may have more comprehensive benefits than those included in
the product offered under this subsection. A health maintenance
organization offering a health benefit plan under this subsection shall
clearly disclose all the covered benefits to the small employer in a
brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.46.275, 48.46.280, 48.46.285, 48.46.290,
48.46.350, 48.46.355, 48.46.375, 48.46.440, 48.46.480, 48.46.510,
48.46.520, and 48.46.530.
(2))) (a) The plan offered under this subsection may be offered
with a choice of cost-sharing arrangements, and may, but is not
required to, comply with: RCW 48.46.250, 48.46.272 through 48.46.290,
48.46.320, 48.46.350, 48.46.375, 48.46.440 through 48.46.460,
48.46.480. 48.46.490, 48.46.510, 48.46.520, 48.46.530, 48.46.565,
48.46.570, 48.46.575, 48.43.045(1) except as required in (b) of this
subsection, 48.43.093, 48.43.115 through 48.43.185, 48.43.515(5), or
48.42.100.
(b) In offering the plan under this subsection, the health
maintenance organization must offer the small employer the option of
permitting every category of health care provider to provide health
services or care for conditions covered by the plan pursuant to RCW
48.43.045(1).
(2) A health maintenance organization offering the plan under
subsection (1) of this section must also offer and actively market to
the small employer at least one additional health benefit plan.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health maintenance
organization from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit
plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under
subsection (1) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts
shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of
any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to
the benefits thereto.
(((3))) (4) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small
employers as defined in this section shall be subject to the following
provisions:
(a) The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection (((3))) (4).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs ((due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network)) for a plan. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(i) Except for small group health benefit plans that qualify as
insurance coverage combined with a health savings account as defined by
the United States internal revenue service, adjusted community rates
established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
groups purchasing coverage. However, annual rate adjustments for each
small group health benefit plan may vary by up to plus or minus
((four)) eight percentage points from the overall adjustment of a
carrier's entire small group pool((, such overall adjustment to be
approved by the commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified
by a member of the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The
variation is a result of deductible leverage, benefit design, or
provider network characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period,
the projected weighted average of all small group benefit plans will
have a revenue neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool.
Variations of greater than four percentage points are subject to review
by the commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days
of submittal)) if certified by a member of the American academy of
actuaries, that: (i) The variation is a result of deductible leverage,
benefit design, claims cost trend for the plan, or provider network
characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period, the projected
weighted average of all small group benefit plans will have a revenue
neutral effect on the health maintenance organization's small group
pool. Variations of greater than eight percentage points are subject
to review by the commissioner and must be approved or denied within
thirty days of submittal. A variation that is not denied within
((sixty)) thirty days shall be deemed approved. The commissioner must
provide to the carrier a detailed actuarial justification for any
denial ((within thirty days)) at the time of the denial.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of
employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in
excess of those provided herein.
(((5))) (6)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements
used by a health maintenance organization in determining whether to
provide coverage to a small employer shall be applied uniformly among
all small employers applying for coverage or receiving coverage from
the carrier.
(b) A health maintenance organization shall not require a minimum
participation level greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A health maintenance organization may not increase any
requirement for minimum employee participation or modify any
requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small
employer at any time after the small employer has been accepted for
coverage.
(((6))) (7) A health maintenance organization must offer coverage
to all eligible employees of a small employer and their dependents. A
health maintenance organization may not offer coverage to only certain
individuals or dependents in a small employer group or to only part of
the group. A health maintenance organization may not modify a health
plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or
dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 51 RCW 48.21.047 and 2005 c 223 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An insurer may not offer any health benefit plan to any small
employer without complying with RCW 48.21.045(((3))) (4).
(2) Employers purchasing health plans provided through associations
or through member-governed groups formed specifically for the purpose
of purchasing health care are not small employers and the plans are not
subject to RCW 48.21.045(((3))) (4).
(3) For purposes of this section, "health benefit plan," "health
plan," and "small employer" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 52 RCW 48.43.028 and 2001 c 196 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
To the extent required of the federal health insurance portability
and accountability act of 1996, the eligibility of an employer or group
to purchase a health benefit plan set forth in RCW 48.21.045(1)(((b))),
48.44.023(1)(((b))), and 48.46.066(1)(((b))) must be extended to all
small employers and small groups as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 53 RCW 48.44.024 and 2003 c 248 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A health care service contractor may not offer any health
benefit plan to any small employer without complying with RCW
48.44.023(((3))) (4).
(2) Employers purchasing health plans provided through associations
or through member-governed groups formed specifically for the purpose
of purchasing health care are not small employers and the plans are not
subject to RCW 48.44.023(((3))) (4).
(3) For purposes of this section, "health benefit plan," "health
plan," and "small employer" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 54 RCW 48.46.068 and 2003 c 248 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A health maintenance organization may not offer any health
benefit plan to any small employer without complying with RCW
48.46.066(((3))) (4).
(2) Employers purchasing health plans provided through associations
or through member-governed groups formed specifically for the purpose
of purchasing health care are not small employers and are not subject
to RCW 48.46.066(((3))) (4).
(3) For purposes of this section, "health benefit plan," "health
plan," and "small employer" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 55 Sections 37 through 44 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 69 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 56 Subheadings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 57 Sections 14 through 18 of this act take
effect January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 58 If specific funding for the purposes of the
following sections of this act, referencing the section of this act by
bill or chapter number and section number, is not provided by June 30,
2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, the section is null and void:
(1) Section 8 of this act (Washington state quality forum);
(2) Section 9 of this act (health records banking pilot project);
(3) Section 19 of this act (health insurance connector); and
(4) Section 36 of this act (state employee health demonstration
project).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 59 Sections 23 through 32 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---