BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.293 and 2002 c 352 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to provide juvenile courts with the
department's record of traffic charges compiled under RCW 46.52.101 and
13.50.200, against any minor upon the request of any state juvenile
court or duly authorized officer of any juvenile court of this state.
Further, the department is authorized to provide any juvenile court
with any requested service which the department can reasonably perform
which is not inconsistent with its legal authority which substantially
aids juvenile courts in handling traffic cases and which promotes
highway safety.
The department is authorized to furnish to the parent, parents, or
guardian of any person under eighteen years of age who is not
emancipated from such parent, parents, or guardian, the department
records of traffic charges compiled against the person and shall
collect for the copy a fee of ((five)) ten dollars ((to)) fifty percent
of which must be deposited in the highway safety fund and fifty percent
of which must be deposited according to section 4 of this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.29.050 and 2002 c 352 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall upon request furnish any person or his
attorney a certified abstract of his driving record, which abstract
shall include enumeration of any motor vehicle accidents in which such
person has been involved. Such abstract shall (a) indicate the total
number of vehicles involved, whether the vehicles were legally parked
or moving, and whether the vehicles were occupied at the time of the
accident; and (b) contain reference to any convictions of the person
for violation of the motor vehicle laws as reported to the department,
reference to any findings that the person has committed a traffic
infraction which have been reported to the department, and a record of
any vehicles registered in the name of the person. The department
shall collect for each abstract the sum of ((five)) ten dollars, fifty
percent of which shall be deposited in the highway safety fund and
fifty percent of which must be deposited according to section 4 of this
act.
(2) The department shall upon request furnish any person who may
have been injured in person or property by any motor vehicle, with an
abstract of all information of record in the department pertaining to
the evidence of the ability of any driver or owner of any motor vehicle
to respond in damages. The department shall collect for each abstract
the sum of ((five)) ten dollars, fifty percent of which shall be
deposited in the highway safety fund and fifty percent of which must be
deposited according to section 4 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.52.130 and 2004 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A certified abstract of the driving record shall be furnished
only to:
(a) The individual named in the abstract;
(b) An employer or prospective employer or an agent acting on
behalf of an employer or prospective employer, or a volunteer
organization for which the named individual has submitted an
application for a position that could require the transportation of
children under eighteen years of age, adults over sixty-five years of
age, or ((physically or mentally disabled)) persons with mental or
physical disabilities;
(c) An employee or agent of a transit authority checking
prospective volunteer vanpool drivers for insurance and risk management
needs;
(d) The insurance carrier that has insurance in effect covering the
employer or a prospective employer;
(e) The insurance carrier that has motor vehicle or life insurance
in effect covering the named individual;
(f) The insurance carrier to which the named individual has
applied;
(g) An alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency approved by the
department of social and health services, to which the named individual
has applied or been assigned for evaluation or treatment; or
(h) City and county prosecuting attorneys.
(2) City attorneys and county prosecuting attorneys may provide the
driving record to alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies
approved by the department of social and health services to which the
named individual has applied or been assigned for evaluation or
treatment.
(3)(a) The director, upon proper request, shall furnish a certified
abstract covering the period of not more than the last three years to
insurance companies.
(b) The director may enter into a contractual agreement with an
insurance company or its agent for the limited purpose of reviewing the
driving records of existing policyholders for changes to the record
during specified periods of time. The department shall establish a fee
for this service, fifty percent of which must be deposited in the
highway safety fund and fifty percent of which must be deposited
according to section 4 of this act. The fee for this service must be
set at a level that will not result in a net revenue loss to the state.
Any information provided under this subsection must be treated in the
same manner and subject to the same restrictions as certified
abstracts.
(4) Upon proper request, the director shall furnish a certified
abstract covering a period of not more than the last five years to
state approved alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies, except
that the certified abstract shall also include records of alcohol-related offenses as defined in RCW 46.01.260(2) covering a period of
not more than the last ten years.
(5) Upon proper request, a certified abstract of the full driving
record maintained by the department shall be furnished to a city or
county prosecuting attorney, to the individual named in the abstract,
to an employer or prospective employer or an agent acting on behalf of
an employer or prospective employer of the named individual, or to a
volunteer organization for which the named individual has submitted an
application for a position that could require the transportation of
children under eighteen years of age, adults over sixty-five years of
age, or ((physically or mentally disabled)) persons with physical or
mental disabilities, or to an employee or agent of a transit authority
checking prospective volunteer vanpool drivers for insurance and risk
management needs.
(6) The abstract, whenever possible, shall include:
(a) An enumeration of motor vehicle accidents in which the person
was driving;
(b) The total number of vehicles involved;
(c) Whether the vehicles were legally parked or moving;
(d) Whether the vehicles were occupied at the time of the accident;
(e) Whether the accident resulted in any fatality;
(f) Any reported convictions, forfeitures of bail, or findings that
an infraction was committed based upon a violation of any motor vehicle
law;
(g) The status of the person's driving privilege in this state; and
(h) Any reports of failure to appear in response to a traffic
citation or failure to respond to a notice of infraction served upon
the named individual by an arresting officer.
(7) Certified abstracts furnished to prosecutors and alcohol/drug
assessment or treatment agencies shall also indicate whether a recorded
violation is an alcohol-related offense as defined in RCW 46.01.260(2)
that was originally charged as one of the alcohol-related offenses
designated in RCW 46.01.260(2)(b)(i).
(8) The abstract provided to the insurance company shall exclude
any information, except that related to the commission of misdemeanors
or felonies by the individual, pertaining to law enforcement officers
or fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030, or any officer of the
Washington state patrol, while driving official vehicles in the
performance of occupational duty. The abstract provided to the
insurance company shall include convictions for RCW 46.61.5249 and
46.61.525 except that the abstract shall report them only as negligent
driving without reference to whether they are for first or second
degree negligent driving. The abstract provided to the insurance
company shall exclude any deferred prosecution under RCW 10.05.060,
except that if a person is removed from a deferred prosecution under
RCW 10.05.090, the abstract shall show the deferred prosecution as well
as the removal.
(9) The director shall collect for each abstract the sum of
((five)) ten dollars, fifty percent of which shall be deposited in the
highway safety fund and fifty percent of which must be deposited
according to section 4 of this act.
(10) Any insurance company or its agent receiving the certified
abstract shall use it exclusively for its own underwriting purposes and
shall not divulge any of the information contained in it to a third
party. No policy of insurance may be canceled, nonrenewed, denied, or
have the rate increased on the basis of such information unless the
policyholder was determined to be at fault. No insurance company or
its agent for underwriting purposes relating to the operation of
commercial motor vehicles may use any information contained in the
abstract relative to any person's operation of motor vehicles while not
engaged in such employment, nor may any insurance company or its agent
for underwriting purposes relating to the operation of noncommercial
motor vehicles use any information contained in the abstract relative
to any person's operation of commercial motor vehicles.
(11) Any employer or prospective employer or an agent acting on
behalf of an employer or prospective employer, or a volunteer
organization for which the named individual has submitted an
application for a position that could require the transportation of
children under eighteen years of age, adults over sixty-five years of
age, or ((physically or mentally disabled)) persons with physical or
mental disabilities, receiving the certified abstract shall use it
exclusively for his or her own purpose to determine whether the
licensee should be permitted to operate a commercial vehicle or school
bus, or operate a vehicle for a volunteer organization for purposes of
transporting children under eighteen years of age, adults over sixty-five years of age, or ((physically or mentally disabled)) persons with
physical or mental disabilities, upon the public highways of this state
and shall not divulge any information contained in it to a third party.
(12) Any employee or agent of a transit authority receiving a
certified abstract for its vanpool program shall use it exclusively for
determining whether the volunteer licensee meets those insurance and
risk management requirements necessary to drive a vanpool vehicle. The
transit authority may not divulge any information contained in the
abstract to a third party.
(13) Any alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency approved by
the department of social and health services receiving the certified
abstract shall use it exclusively for the purpose of assisting its
employees in making a determination as to what level of treatment, if
any, is appropriate. The agency, or any of its employees, shall not
divulge any information contained in the abstract to a third party.
(14) Release of a certified abstract of the driving record of an
employee, prospective employee, or prospective volunteer requires a
statement signed by: (a) The employee, prospective employee, or
prospective volunteer that authorizes the release of the record, and
(b) the employer or volunteer organization attesting that the
information is necessary to determine whether the licensee should be
employed to operate a commercial vehicle or school bus, or operate a
vehicle for a volunteer organization for purposes of transporting
children under eighteen years of age, adults over sixty-five years of
age, or ((physically or mentally disabled)) persons with physical or
mental disabilities, upon the public highways of this state. If the
employer or prospective employer authorizes an agent to obtain this
information on their behalf, this must be noted in the statement.
(15) Any negligent violation of this section is a gross
misdemeanor.
(16) Any intentional violation of this section is a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The funding allocated under RCW 46.20.293, 46.29.050, and 46.52.130
shall be deposited into the state patrol highway account created in RCW
46.68.030, for the purposes enumerated therein, which may include the
provision of enhanced resources to address locations with higher than
average collision rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect August 1, 2007.

--- END ---