BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 68.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Apart from any criminal prosecution, any person with an
interest in a grave or cemetery that has been disturbed shall have a
civil action to secure an injunction, damages, or other appropriate
relief against any person who is alleged to have violated RCW
68.60.050. The action must be brought within two years of the
discovery of the violation by the plaintiff. The action may be filed
in the superior court of the county in which the grave or cemetery is
located, or in the superior court of the county within which the
defendant resides.
(2) Any conviction pursuant to RCW 68.60.050 shall be prima facie
evidence in an action brought under this section.
(3) If the plaintiff prevails:
(a) The court may award reasonable attorneys' fees to the
plaintiff;
(b) The court may grant injunctive or such other equitable relief
as is appropriate, including forfeiture of any human remains or
property acquired or equipment used in the violation. The court shall
order the disposition of any items forfeited as the court sees fit,
including the reinterment of human remains;
(c) The plaintiff shall recover imputed damages of five hundred
dollars or actual damages, whichever is greater. Actual damages
include special and general damages, which include damages for
emotional distress;
(d) The plaintiff may recover punitive damages upon proof that the
violation was willful. Punitive damages may be recovered without proof
of actual damages. All punitive damages shall be paid by the defendant
to the department of archaeology and historic preservation for the
purposes of preserving non-Indian graves and cemeteries and to cover
the cost of reinterment expenses by the department; and
(e) An award of imputed or punitive damages may be made only once
for a particular violation by a particular person, but shall not
preclude the award of such damages based on violations by other persons
or on other violations.
(4) If the defendant prevails, the court may award reasonable
attorneys' fees to the defendant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 27.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person who discovers human remains, graves, or a cemetery
shall immediately report the discovery to law enforcement officials.
This includes inadvertent discovery through any activity, including
construction, mining, logging, or agricultural activity.
(2) The law enforcement officials, medical examiner, or county
coroner shall determine if the human remains are evidence of a crime,
and whether the discovery contains Indian or non-Indian human remains
or graves. Within forty-eight hours of these determinations, the law
enforcement officials, medical examiner, or the county coroner shall
report the discovery to the department of archaeology and historic
preservation.
(3) If the discovery contains native Indian human remains, graves,
or cemeteries, the medical examiner or county coroner shall promptly
notify the affected Indian tribes of the discovery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 68.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person who discovers human remains, graves, or a cemetery
shall immediately report the discovery to law enforcement officials.
This includes inadvertent discovery through any activity, including
construction, mining, logging, or agricultural activity.
(2) The law enforcement officials, medical examiner, or county
coroner shall determine if the human remains are evidence of a crime,
and whether the discovery contains Indian or non-Indian human remains
or graves. Within forty-eight hours of these determinations, the law
enforcement officials, medical examiner, or the county coroner shall
report the discovery to the department of archaeology and historic
preservation.
(3) If the discovery contains native Indian human remains, graves,
or cemeteries, the medical examiner or county coroner shall promptly
notify the affected Indian tribes of the discovery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any person who intentionally fails to report
the discovery of human remains, graves, or a cemetery under section 2
or 3 of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A joint select legislative task force on
human remains is established, with members as provided in this section.
The task force shall consult with all interested Indian tribes
throughout the state.
(1) The task force shall include four members of the Washington
state legislature, one from each caucus in the senate and the house of
representatives as designated by each caucus. The task force shall
also include the director, or his or her designee, of the department of
archaeology and historic preservation, the department of licensing, and
the governor's office of Indian affairs.
(2) The governor shall appoint a chair to the task force who has
experience in intergovernmental relations with the Indian tribes of
Washington.
(3) The task force shall study the issues surrounding the discovery
of human remains, both Indian and non-Indian. The task force shall
examine the legal processes used to dedicate graves and human remains
as cemeteries, the legal process of decertifying a cemetery, and the
legal process to permit the removal of human remains from property.
The task force shall make findings and recommendations on how to ensure
that all discoveries of human remains are reported, and how to ensure
that all human remains, graves, and cemeteries are treated equally and
with the respect due to a finite, irreplaceable cultural resource of
the people of Washington.
(4) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) Staff support for the task force must be provided by senate
committee services.
(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the legislature by December 2007.
(7) This section expires December 31, 2007.

--- END ---