BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.33A.005 and 1996 c 152 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The citizens of Washington should enjoy a high quality of life,
which requires a healthy state economy. To achieve this goal, the
legislature recognizes that the state must be able to compete
economically at a national and international level. It is critical to
the economic well-being of the citizens of this state that the
legislature strive to continually improve the state's economic climate.
((Therefore,)) The legislature intends to provide a benchmarking
mechanism whereby the information necessary to achieve this goal is
available on a timely and reliable basis.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.33A.010 and 1998 c 245 s 168 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The economic climate council is hereby created.
(2) The council shall, in consultation with the Washington economic
development commission, select a series of ((no more than ten))
benchmarks that characterize the competitive environment of the state.
The benchmarks should be indicators of the cost of doing business; the
education and skills of the work force; a sound infrastructure; and the
quality of life. In selecting the appropriate benchmarks, the council
shall use the following criteria:
(a) The availability of comparative information for other states
and countries;
(b) The timeliness with which benchmark information can be
obtained; and
(c) The accuracy and validity of the benchmarks in measuring the
economic climate indicators named in this section.
(3) Each year the council shall prepare an official state economic
climate report on the present status of benchmarks, changes in the
benchmarks since the previous report, and the reasons for the changes.
The reports shall include current benchmark comparisons with other
states and countries, and an analysis of factors related to the
benchmarks that may affect the ability of the state to compete
economically at the national and international level.
(4) All agencies of state government shall provide to the council
immediate access to all information relating to economic climate
reports.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.33A.020 and 1996 c 152 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The economic climate council shall ((create an advisory
committee to assist the council)) consult with the Washington economic
development commission in selecting benchmarks and developing economic
climate reports and benchmarks. The ((advisory committee)) commission
shall provide for a process to ensure public participation in the
selection of the benchmarks. ((The advisory committee shall consist of
no more than seven members. At least two of the members of the
advisory committee shall have experience in and represent business, and
at least two of the members shall have experience in and represent
labor. All of the members of the advisory committee shall have special
expertise and interest in the state's economic climate and competitive
strategies. Appointments to the advisory committee shall be
recommended by the chair of the council and approved by a two-thirds
vote of the council. The chair of the advisory committee shall be
selected by the members of the committee.
(2) The advisory committee shall meet as determined by the chair of
the committee until September 30, 1996, and shall meet at least twice
per year thereafter in advance of the economic climate reports due on
March 31st and September 30th of each year.
(3) Members of the advisory council shall serve without
compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 while attending meetings of the
advisory committee, sessions of the economic climate council, or on
official business authorized by the council.))

--- END ---