BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.39A.007 and 1993 c 508 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the legislature's intent that:
(1) Long-term care services administered by the department of
social and health services include a balanced array of health, social,
and supportive services that promote individual choice, dignity, and
the highest practicable level of independence;
(2) Home and community-based services be developed, expanded, or
maintained in order to meet the needs of consumers and to maximize
effective use of limited resources;
(3) Long-term care services be responsive and appropriate to
individual need and also cost-effective for the state;
(4) Nursing home care is provided in such a manner and in such an
environment as will promote maintenance or enhancement of the quality
of life of each resident and timely discharge to a less restrictive
care setting when appropriate; ((and))
(5) State health planning for nursing home bed supply take into
account increased availability of other home and community-based
service options; and
(6) No employer, provider, or entity receiving state funds to
provide long-term care services use these funds to assist, promote, or
deter union organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any employer, provider, or other entity that receives state
funds to provide long-term care services shall not use those funds for
the following purposes:
(a) To train managers, supervisors, or other administrative
personnel regarding methods to encourage or discourage union
organization or to encourage or discourage an employee from
participating in a union organizing drive;
(b) To hire or otherwise compensate attorneys, consultants, or
other contractors to encourage or discourage union organization or to
encourage or discourage an employee from participating in a union
organizing drive; or
(c) To hire employees or pay the salary or other compensation of
employees whose principal job duties are to encourage or discourage
union organization or to encourage or discourage an employee from
participating in a union drive.
(2) Any employer, provider, or other entity receiving state funds
to provide long-term care services that engages in activities listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall maintain, for not less than three
years from the date those activities occurred, financial records
indicating that state funds were not used in violation of subsection
(1) of this section. An employer, provider, or other entity shall make
these financial records available to the department within twenty
business days of receiving a request from the department for the
documents.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.39A.080 and 2001 c 193 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to take one or more of the actions
listed in subsection (2) of this section in any case in which the
department finds that a provider of assisted living services, adult
residential care services, or enhanced adult residential care services
has:
(a) Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;
(b) Operated without a license or under a revoked license;
(c) Knowingly, or with reason to know, made a false statement of
material fact on his or her application for license or any data
attached thereto, or in any matter under investigation by the
department; ((or))
(d) Willfully prevented or interfered with any inspection or
investigation by the department; or
(e) Violated any of the provisions of section 2(1) of this act.
(2) When authorized by subsection (1) of this section, the
department may take one or more of the following actions:
(a) Refuse to issue a contract;
(b) Impose reasonable conditions on a contract, such as correction
within a specified time, training, and limits on the type of clients
the provider may admit or serve;
(c) Impose civil penalties of not more than one hundred dollars per
day per violation;
(d) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a contract; or
(e) Suspend admissions to the facility by imposing stop placement
on contracted services.
(3) When the department orders stop placement, the facility shall
not admit any person admitted by contract until the stop placement
order is terminated. The department may approve readmission of a
resident to the facility from a hospital or nursing home during the
stop placement. The department shall terminate the stop placement
when: (a) The violations necessitating the stop placement have been
corrected; and (b) the provider exhibits the capacity to maintain
correction of the violations previously found deficient. However, if
upon the revisit the department finds new violations that the
department reasonably believes will result in a new stop placement, the
previous stop placement shall remain in effect until the new stop
placement is imposed.
After a department finding of a violation for which a stop
placement has been imposed, the department shall make an on-site
revisit of the provider within fifteen working days from the request
for revisit, to ensure correction of the violation. For violations
that are serious or recurring or uncorrected following a previous
citation, and create actual or threatened harm to one or more
residents' well-being, including violations of residents' rights, the
department shall make an on-site revisit as soon as appropriate to
ensure correction of the violation. Verification of correction of all
other violations may be made by either a department on-site revisit or
by written or photographic documentation found by the department to be
credible. This subsection does not prevent the department from
enforcing license suspensions or revocations. Nothing in this
subsection shall interfere with or diminish the department's authority
and duty to ensure that the provider adequately cares for residents,
including to make departmental on-site revisits as needed to ensure
that the provider protects residents, and to enforce compliance with
this chapter.
(4) Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to department actions under this
section, except that orders of the department imposing contracts
suspension, stop placement, or conditions for continuation of a
contract are effective immediately upon notice and shall continue
pending any hearing.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.128.160 and 2001 c 193 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to take one or more of the actions
listed in subsection (2) of this section in any case in which the
department finds that an adult family home provider has:
(a) Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;
(b) Operated an adult family home without a license or under a
revoked license;
(c) Knowingly or with reason to know made a false statement of
material fact on his or her application for license or any data
attached thereto, or in any matter under investigation by the
department; ((or))
(d) Willfully prevented or interfered with any inspection or
investigation by the department; or
(e) Violated any of the provisions of section 2(1) of this act.
(2) When authorized by subsection (1) of this section, the
department may take one or more of the following actions:
(a) Refuse to issue a license;
(b) Impose reasonable conditions on a license, such as correction
within a specified time, training, and limits on the type of clients
the provider may admit or serve;
(c) Impose civil penalties of not more than one hundred dollars per
day per violation;
(d) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license; or
(e) Suspend admissions to the adult family home by imposing stop
placement.
(3) When the department orders stop placement, the facility shall
not admit any person until the stop placement order is terminated. The
department may approve readmission of a resident to the facility from
a hospital or nursing home during the stop placement. The department
shall terminate the stop placement when: (a) The violations
necessitating the stop placement have been corrected; and (b) the
provider exhibits the capacity to maintain correction of the violations
previously found deficient. However, if upon the revisit the
department finds new violations that the department reasonably believes
will result in a new stop placement, the previous stop placement shall
remain in effect until the new stop placement is imposed.
(4) After a department finding of a violation for which a stop
placement has been imposed, the department shall make an on-site
revisit of the provider within fifteen working days from the request
for revisit, to ensure correction of the violation. For violations
that are serious or recurring or uncorrected following a previous
citation, and create actual or threatened harm to one or more
residents' well-being, including violations of residents' rights, the
department shall make an on-site revisit as soon as appropriate to
ensure correction of the violation. Verification of correction of all
other violations may be made by either a department on-site revisit or
by written or photographic documentation found by the department to be
credible. This subsection does not prevent the department from
enforcing license suspensions or revocations. Nothing in this
subsection shall interfere with or diminish the department's authority
and duty to ensure that the provider adequately cares for residents,
including to make departmental on-site revisits as needed to ensure
that the provider protects residents, and to enforce compliance with
this chapter.
(5) Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to department actions under this
section, except that orders of the department imposing license
suspension, stop placement, or conditions for continuation of a license
are effective immediately upon notice and shall continue in effect
pending any hearing.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.42.580 and 1989 c 372 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may deny, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a
license or provisional license, assess monetary penalties of a civil
nature, deny payment, seek receivership, order stop placement, appoint
temporary management, order emergency closure, or order emergency
transfer as provided in RCW 18.51.054 and 18.51.060 for violations of
requirements of this chapter, violations of section 2(1) of this act,
or, in the case of medicaid contractors, the requirements of Title XIX
of the social security act, as amended, or rules adopted thereunder.
Chapter 34.05 RCW shall apply to any such actions, except for
receivership, and except that stop placement, appointment of temporary
management, emergency closure, emergency transfer, and summary license
suspension shall be effective pending any hearing, and except that
denial of payment shall be effective pending any hearing when the
department determines deficiencies jeopardize the health and safety of
the residents or seriously limit the nursing home's capacity to provide
adequate care.

--- END ---