BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
Certificated instructional staff who can demonstrate that they are
fluent in two languages and use both languages in the classroom
instruction of their students shall receive an annual bonus of ten
percent of the salary associated with the recipient's education and
experience on the statewide salary allocation schedule for the relevant
year. This annual bonus is provided in addition to compensation
received under a district's salary schedule adopted in accordance with
RCW 28A.405.200 and shall not be included in calculations of a
district's average salary and associated salary limitation under RCW
28A.400.200. The bonus shall not be considered earnable compensation
as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or compensation earnable as defined in RCW
41.40.010 and 41.35.010.

--- END ---