BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A new allocation is established to provide additional funding
to school districts to allow them to further assist struggling
students. In establishing this allocation, the legislature is
recognizing the impact that poverty, particularly high concentrations
of poverty, has on overall student performance. The intent behind this
allocation is to give school districts additional resources to provide
extended learning opportunities including, but not limited to,
tutoring, additional assistance before, during, and after the regular
school day, and summer school opportunities. Further, the intent
behind this new allocation is to augment and not supplant funding
provided through the learning assistance program, the student
achievement fund, federal Title I allocations, and other moneys
currently spent on these activities.
(2) A district is eligible for an allocation if, in the prior
school year, the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment
in grades K-12 eligible for free lunch exceeded the statewide average.
(3) In the 2007-08 school year and each subsequent school year,
each eligible district based on the criteria in subsection (1) of this
section, shall receive an allocation based on the percentage by which
the district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free lunch exceeded the statewide average, multiplied
by five hundred eighty-one dollars per K-12 full-time equivalent
student in that district in the prior school year. After the 2007-08
school year, the amount of the per-student allocation shall be adjusted
for inflation as measured by the average annual consumer price index,
compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, in the prior fiscal year.
(4) Each district receiving an allocation under this section shall
annually report to its citizens the impact of the activities funded on
graduation rates, student attendance, student achievement, closing the
achievement gap, and reducing dropouts.
(5) The allocation created in this section shall not be considered
part of the legislature's definition of basic education.

--- END ---