BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.31.100 and 2006 c 138 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has
committed or is committing a felony shall have the authority to arrest
the person without a warrant. A police officer may arrest a person
without a warrant for committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
only when the offense is committed in the presence of the officer,
except as provided in subsections (1) through (10) of this section.
(1) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor, involving physical harm or threats of harm to any person
or property or the unlawful taking of property or involving the use or
possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition, possession, or
consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one years
under RCW 66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070
or 9A.52.080, shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(2) A police officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that:
(a) An order has been issued of which the person has knowledge
under RCW 26.44.063, or chapter 7.90, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26,
26.50, or 74.34 RCW restraining the person and the person has violated
the terms of the order restraining the person from acts or threats of
violence, or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of or
entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibiting
the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within,
a specified distance of a location or, in the case of an order issued
under RCW 26.44.063, imposing any other restrictions or conditions upon
the person; or
(b) A foreign protection order, as defined in RCW 26.52.010, has
been issued of which the person under restraint has knowledge and the
person under restraint has violated a provision of the foreign
protection order prohibiting the person under restraint from contacting
or communicating with another person, or excluding the person under
restraint from a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or
prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly
remaining within, a specified distance of a location, or a violation of
any provision for which the foreign protection order specifically
indicates that a violation will be a crime; or
(c) The person is sixteen years or older and within the preceding
four hours has assaulted a family or household member as defined in RCW
10.99.020 and the officer believes: (i) A felonious assault has
occurred; (ii) an assault has occurred which has resulted in bodily
injury to the victim, whether the injury is observable by the
responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical action has
occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to fear
imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical
pain, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the
officer has probable cause to believe that family or household members
have assaulted each other, the officer is not required to arrest both
persons. The officer shall arrest the person whom the officer believes
to be the primary physical aggressor. In making this determination,
the officer shall make every reasonable effort to consider: (i) The
intent to protect victims of domestic violence under RCW 10.99.010;
(ii) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted or serious threats
creating fear of physical injury; and (iii) the history of domestic
violence between the persons involved.
(3) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of any of the
following traffic laws shall have the authority to arrest the person:
(a) RCW 46.52.010, relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(b) RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(c) RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or
racing of vehicles;
(d) RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(e) RCW 46.20.342, relating to driving a motor vehicle while
operator's license is suspended or revoked;
(f) RCW 46.61.5249, relating to operating a motor vehicle in a
negligent manner;
(g) RCW 46.20.740, relating to driving a motor vehicle without a
functioning ignition interlock device.
(4) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor
vehicle accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved in
the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the
driver has committed in connection with the accident a violation of any
traffic law or regulation.
(5) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of RCW 79A.60.040
shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(6) An officer may act upon the request of a law enforcement
officer in whose presence a traffic infraction was committed, to stop,
detain, arrest, or issue a notice of traffic infraction to the driver
who is believed to have committed the infraction. The request by the
witnessing officer shall give an officer the authority to take
appropriate action under the laws of the state of Washington.
(7) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing any act of indecent exposure, as
defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may arrest the person.
(8) A police officer may arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that
an order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under
chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated the terms of that order.
(9) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has, within twenty-four hours of the alleged violation,
committed a violation of RCW 9A.50.020 may arrest such person.
(10) A police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person illegally possesses or illegally has possessed a firearm or
other dangerous weapon on private or public elementary or secondary
school premises shall have the authority to arrest the person.
For purposes of this subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).
(11) Except as specifically provided in subsections (2), (3), (4),
and (6) of this section, nothing in this section extends or otherwise
affects the powers of arrest prescribed in Title 46 RCW.
(12) No police officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for
making an arrest pursuant to ((RCW 10.31.100)) subsection (2) or (8) of
this section if the police officer acts in good faith and without
malice.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.740 and 2004 c 95 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall attach or imprint a notation on the
driving record of any person restricted under RCW 46.20.720 stating
that the person may operate only a motor vehicle equipped with a
functioning ignition interlock device. The department shall determine
the person's eligibility for licensing based upon written verification
by a company doing business in the state that it has installed the
required device on a vehicle owned or operated by the person seeking
reinstatement. If, based upon notification from the interlock provider
or otherwise, the department determines that an ignition interlock
required under this section is no longer installed or functioning as
required, the department shall suspend the person's license or
privilege to drive. Whenever the license or driving privilege of any
person is suspended or revoked as a result of noncompliance with an
ignition interlock requirement, the suspension shall remain in effect
until the person provides notice issued by a company doing business in
the state that a vehicle owned or operated by the person is equipped
with a functioning ignition interlock device.
(2) It is a misdemeanor for a person with such a notation on his or
her driving record to operate a motor vehicle that is not so equipped.
(3) Whenever the driver of a motor vehicle is arrested or issued a
citation for operating a motor vehicle without a functioning ignition
interlock device, the arresting law enforcement officer or the officer
issuing the citation must impound the vehicle. The vehicle must be
impounded even if the driver arrested or issued a citation is not the
registered owner of the vehicle.
(4) Impoundment performed under this section shall be in accordance
with chapter 46.55 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.55.120 and 2004 c 250 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Vehicles or other items of personal property registered or
titled with the department that are impounded by registered tow truck
operators pursuant to RCW 46.55.080, 46.55.085, 46.55.113, 46.20.740,
or 9A.88.140 may be redeemed only under the following circumstances:
(a) Only the legal owner, the registered owner, a person authorized
in writing by the registered owner or the vehicle's insurer, a person
who is determined and verified by the operator to have the permission
of the registered owner of the vehicle or other item of personal
property registered or titled with the department, or one who has
purchased a vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled
with the department from the registered owner who produces proof of
ownership or written authorization and signs a receipt therefor, may
redeem an impounded vehicle or items of personal property registered or
titled with the department. In addition, a vehicle impounded because
the operator is in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c) shall not be
released until a person eligible to redeem it under this subsection
(1)(a) satisfies the requirements of (e) of this subsection, including
paying all towing, removal, and storage fees, notwithstanding the fact
that the hold was ordered by a government agency. If the department's
records show that the operator has been convicted of a violation of RCW
46.20.342 or a similar local ordinance within the past five years, the
vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written direction of
the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. A vehicle impounded because
the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342 may be
released only pursuant to a written order from the agency that ordered
the vehicle impounded or from the court having jurisdiction. An agency
may issue a written order to release pursuant to a provision of an
applicable state agency rule or local ordinance authorizing release on
the basis of the following:
(i) Economic or personal hardship to the spouse of the operator,
taking into consideration public safety factors, including the
operator's criminal history and driving record; or
(ii) The owner of the vehicle was not the driver, the owner did not
know that the driver's license was suspended or revoked, and the owner
has not received a prior release under this subsection or RCW
46.55.113(3).
In order to avoid discriminatory application, other than for the
reasons for release set forth in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, an
agency shall, under a provision of an applicable state agency rule or
local ordinance, deny release in all other circumstances without
discretion.
If a vehicle is impounded because the operator is in violation of
RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b), the vehicle may be held for up to thirty
days at the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle
impounded. However, if the department's records show that the operator
has been convicted of a violation of RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b) or a
similar local ordinance within the past five years, the vehicle may be
held at the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle
impounded for up to sixty days, and for up to ninety days if the
operator has two or more such prior offenses. If a vehicle is
impounded because the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW
46.20.342, the vehicle may not be released until a person eligible to
redeem it under this subsection (1)(a) satisfies the requirements of
(e) of this subsection, including paying all towing, removal, and
storage fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered by a
government agency.
(b) If the vehicle is directed to be held for a suspended license
impound, a person who desires to redeem the vehicle at the end of the
period of impound shall within five days of the impound at the request
of the tow truck operator pay a security deposit to the tow truck
operator of not more than one-half of the applicable impound storage
rate for each day of the proposed suspended license impound. The tow
truck operator shall credit this amount against the final bill for
removal, towing, and storage upon redemption. The tow truck operator
may accept other sufficient security in lieu of the security deposit.
If the person desiring to redeem the vehicle does not pay the security
deposit or provide other security acceptable to the tow truck operator,
the tow truck operator may process and sell at auction the vehicle as
an abandoned vehicle within the normal time limits set out in RCW
46.55.130(1). The security deposit required by this section may be
paid and must be accepted at any time up to twenty-four hours before
the beginning of the auction to sell the vehicle as abandoned. The
registered owner is not eligible to purchase the vehicle at the
auction, and the tow truck operator shall sell the vehicle to the
highest bidder who is not the registered owner.
(c) Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a rental car business
may immediately redeem a rental vehicle it owns by payment of the costs
of removal, towing, and storage, whereupon the vehicle will not be held
for a suspended license impound.
(d) Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a motor vehicle dealer
or lender with a perfected security interest in the vehicle may redeem
or lawfully repossess a vehicle immediately by payment of the costs of
removal, towing, and storage, whereupon the vehicle will not be held
for a suspended license impound. A motor vehicle dealer or lender with
a perfected security interest in the vehicle may not knowingly and
intentionally engage in collusion with a registered owner to repossess
and then return or resell a vehicle to the registered owner in an
attempt to avoid a suspended license impound. However, this provision
does not preclude a vehicle dealer or a lender with a perfected
security interest in the vehicle from repossessing the vehicle and then
selling, leasing, or otherwise disposing of it in accordance with
chapter 62A.9A RCW, including providing redemption rights to the debtor
under RCW 62A.9A-623. If the debtor is the registered owner of the
vehicle, the debtor's right to redeem the vehicle under chapter 62A.9A
RCW is conditioned upon the debtor obtaining and providing proof from
the impounding authority or court having jurisdiction that any fines,
penalties, and forfeitures owed by the registered owner, as a result of
the suspended license impound, have been paid, and proof of the payment
must be tendered to the vehicle dealer or lender at the time the debtor
tenders all other obligations required to redeem the vehicle. Vehicle
dealers or lenders are not liable for damages if they rely in good
faith on an order from the impounding agency or a court in releasing a
vehicle held under a suspended license impound.
(e) The vehicle or other item of personal property registered or
titled with the department shall be released upon the presentation to
any person having custody of the vehicle of commercially reasonable
tender sufficient to cover the costs of towing, storage, or other
services rendered during the course of towing, removing, impounding, or
storing any such vehicle, with credit being given for the amount of any
security deposit paid under (b) of this subsection. In addition, if a
vehicle is impounded because the operator was arrested for a violation
of RCW 46.20.342 or 46.20.345 and was being operated by the registered
owner when it was impounded under local ordinance or agency rule, it
must not be released to any person until the registered owner
establishes with the agency that ordered the vehicle impounded or the
court having jurisdiction that any penalties, fines, or forfeitures
owed by him or her have been satisfied. Registered tow truck operators
are not liable for damages if they rely in good faith on an order from
the impounding agency or a court in releasing a vehicle held under a
suspended license impound. Commercially reasonable tender shall
include, without limitation, cash, major bank credit cards issued by
financial institutions, or personal checks drawn on Washington state
branches of financial institutions if accompanied by two pieces of
valid identification, one of which may be required by the operator to
have a photograph. If the towing firm cannot determine through the
customer's bank or a check verification service that the presented
check would be paid by the bank or guaranteed by the service, the
towing firm may refuse to accept the check. Any person who stops
payment on a personal check or credit card, or does not make
restitution within ten days from the date a check becomes insufficient
due to lack of funds, to a towing firm that has provided a service
pursuant to this section or in any other manner defrauds the towing
firm in connection with services rendered pursuant to this section
shall be liable for damages in the amount of twice the towing and
storage fees, plus costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(2)(a) The registered tow truck operator shall give to each person
who seeks to redeem an impounded vehicle, or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department, written notice of the right
of redemption and opportunity for a hearing, which notice shall be
accompanied by a form to be used for requesting a hearing, the name of
the person or agency authorizing the impound, and a copy of the towing
and storage invoice. The registered tow truck operator shall maintain
a record evidenced by the redeeming person's signature that such
notification was provided.
(b) Any person seeking to redeem an impounded vehicle under this
section has a right to a hearing in the district or municipal court for
the jurisdiction in which the vehicle was impounded to contest the
validity of the impoundment or the amount of towing and storage
charges. The district court has jurisdiction to determine the issues
involving all impoundments including those authorized by the state or
its agents. The municipal court has jurisdiction to determine the
issues involving impoundments authorized by agents of the municipality.
Any request for a hearing shall be made in writing on the form provided
for that purpose and must be received by the appropriate court within
ten days of the date the opportunity was provided for in subsection
(2)(a) of this section and more than five days before the date of the
auction. At the time of the filing of the hearing request, the
petitioner shall pay to the court clerk a filing fee in the same amount
required for the filing of a suit in district court. If the hearing
request is not received by the court within the ten-day period, the
right to a hearing is waived and the registered owner is liable for any
towing, storage, or other impoundment charges permitted under this
chapter. Upon receipt of a timely hearing request, the court shall
proceed to hear and determine the validity of the impoundment.
(3)(a) The court, within five days after the request for a hearing,
shall notify the registered tow truck operator, the person requesting
the hearing if not the owner, the registered and legal owners of the
vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, and the person or agency authorizing the impound in
writing of the hearing date and time.
(b) At the hearing, the person or persons requesting the hearing
may produce any relevant evidence to show that the impoundment, towing,
or storage fees charged were not proper. The court may consider a
written report made under oath by the officer who authorized the
impoundment in lieu of the officer's personal appearance at the
hearing.
(c) At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall determine
whether the impoundment was proper, whether the towing or storage fees
charged were in compliance with the posted rates, and who is
responsible for payment of the fees. The court may not adjust fees or
charges that are in compliance with the posted or contracted rates.
(d) If the impoundment is found proper, the impoundment, towing,
and storage fees as permitted under this chapter together with court
costs shall be assessed against the person or persons requesting the
hearing, unless the operator did not have a signed and valid
impoundment authorization from a private property owner or an
authorized agent.
(e) If the impoundment is determined to be in violation of this
chapter, then the registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other
item of personal property registered or titled with the department
shall bear no impoundment, towing, or storage fees, and any security
shall be returned or discharged as appropriate, and the person or
agency who authorized the impoundment shall be liable for any towing,
storage, or other impoundment fees permitted under this chapter. The
court shall enter judgment in favor of the registered tow truck
operator against the person or agency authorizing the impound for the
impoundment, towing, and storage fees paid. In addition, the court
shall enter judgment in favor of the registered and legal owners of the
vehicle, or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, for the amount of the filing fee required by law for
the impound hearing petition as well as reasonable damages for loss of
the use of the vehicle during the time the same was impounded against
the person or agency authorizing the impound. However, if an
impoundment arising from an alleged violation of RCW 46.20.342 or
46.20.345 is determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the
law enforcement officer directing the impoundment and the government
employing the officer are not liable for damages if the officer relied
in good faith and without gross negligence on the records of the
department in ascertaining that the operator of the vehicle had a
suspended or revoked driver's license. If any judgment entered is not
paid within fifteen days of notice in writing of its entry, the court
shall award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs against the defendant
in any action to enforce the judgment. Notice of entry of judgment may
be made by registered or certified mail, and proof of mailing may be
made by affidavit of the party mailing the notice. Notice of the entry
of the judgment shall read essentially as follows:

TO: . . . . . .

YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED JUDGMENT was entered against you in the
. . . . . . Court located at . . . . . . in the sum of
$. . . . . ., in an action entitled . . . . . ., Case No.
. . . . YOU ARE FURTHER NOTIFIED that attorneys fees and costs
will be awarded against you under RCW . . . if the judgment is
not paid within 15 days of the date of this notice.

DATED this . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . .

Signature . . . . . . . . . .
Typed name and address
of party mailing notice

(4) Any impounded abandoned vehicle or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department that is not redeemed within
fifteen days of mailing of the notice of custody and sale as required
by RCW 46.55.110(3) shall be sold at public auction in accordance with
all the provisions and subject to all the conditions of RCW 46.55.130.
A vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled with the
department may be redeemed at any time before the start of the auction
upon payment of the applicable towing and storage fees.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.61.5055 and 2006 c 73 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as
follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than one
year. Twenty-four consecutive hours of the imprisonment may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the
mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection
(1)(a)(i), the court may order not less than fifteen days of electronic
home monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home
monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of
alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent. The court shall suspend the fine imposed if
it receives written verification by a company doing business in the
state that it has installed an ignition interlock device on a vehicle
owned or operated by the offender; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than one
year. Two consecutive days of the imprisonment may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory
minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence
is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason
for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term
of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the court may
order not less than thirty days of electronic home monitoring. The
offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county
or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine
the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the
court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent. The court shall suspend the fine imposed if it receives
written verification by a company doing business in the state that it
has installed an ignition interlock device on a vehicle owned or
operated by the offender.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as
follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than one
year and sixty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall
pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or
municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the
cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of
imprisonment and sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than
one year and ninety days of electronic home monitoring. The offender
shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or
municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the
cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days of
imprisonment and ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has two or three prior offenses within seven years shall be
punished as follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than one
year and one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring. The
offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The
county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall
determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may
consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring.
Ninety days of imprisonment and one hundred twenty days of electronic
home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds
that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the
court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based;
and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor
more than one year and one hundred fifty days of electronic home
monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic
monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred
fifty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory
minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence
is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason
for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars
nor more than five thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars
of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(4) A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 and who has four or more prior offenses within ten years, or
who has ever previously been convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.520
committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
or RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug, shall be punished in accordance with chapter 9.94A
RCW.
(5) If a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 committed the offense while a passenger under the age of
sixteen was in the vehicle, the court shall:
(a) In any case in which the installation and use of an interlock
or other device is not mandatory under RCW 46.20.720 or other law,
order the use of such a device for not less than sixty days following
the restoration of the person's license, permit, or nonresident driving
privileges; and
(b) In any case in which the installation and use of such a device
is otherwise mandatory, order the use of such a device for an
additional sixty days.
(6) In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the
limits allowed by this section, the court shall particularly consider
the following:
(a) Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was
responsible for injury or damage to another or another's property; and
(b) Whether at the time of the offense the person was driving or in
physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers.
(7) An offender punishable under this section is subject to the
alcohol assessment and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.
(8) The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a person
convicted of driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs must:
(a) If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if
for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
suspended or denied by the department for ninety days;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years;
(b) If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for one year;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for nine hundred days; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years; or
(c) If by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308, there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there have been no prior offenses within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for three years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more previous offenses within
seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years.
The department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for any
portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under
this subsection for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under
RCW 46.20.3101 arising out of the same incident.
For purposes of this subsection (8), the department shall refer to
the driver's record maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when determining the
existence of prior offenses.
(9) After expiration of any period of suspension, revocation, or
denial of the offender's license, permit, or privilege to drive
required by this section, the department shall place the offender's
driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW 46.20.355.
(10)(a) In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail
sentence required by this section, whenever the court imposes less than
one year in jail, the court shall also suspend but shall not defer a
period of confinement for a period not exceeding five years. The court
shall impose conditions of probation that include: (i) Not driving a
motor vehicle within this state without a valid license to drive and
proof of financial responsibility for the future; (ii) not driving a
motor vehicle within this state while having an alcohol concentration
of 0.08 or more within two hours after driving; and (iii) not refusing
to submit to a test of his or her breath or blood to determine alcohol
concentration upon request of a law enforcement officer who has
reasonable grounds to believe the person was driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor. The court may impose conditions of
probation that include nonrepetition, installation of an ignition
interlock device on the probationer's motor vehicle, alcohol or drug
treatment, supervised probation, or other conditions that may be
appropriate. The sentence may be imposed in whole or in part upon
violation of a condition of probation during the suspension period.
(b) For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under
(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection, the court shall order the
convicted person to be confined for thirty days, which shall not be
suspended or deferred.
(c) For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory
condition of probation imposed under this subsection, the license,
permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be suspended by the
court for thirty days or, if such license, permit, or privilege to
drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the finding
of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial
then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall
notify the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any
extension of a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this
subsection.
(11) A court may waive the electronic home monitoring requirements
of this chapter when:
(a) The offender does not have a dwelling, telephone service, or
any other necessity to operate an electronic home monitoring system;
(b) The offender does not reside in the state of Washington; or
(c) The court determines that there is reason to believe that the
offender would violate the conditions of the electronic home monitoring
penalty.
Whenever the mandatory minimum term of electronic home monitoring
is waived, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the
waiver and the facts upon which the waiver is based, and shall impose
an alternative sentence with similar punitive consequences. The
alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to, additional
jail time, work crew, or work camp.
Whenever the combination of jail time and electronic home
monitoring or alternative sentence would exceed three hundred sixty-five days, the offender shall serve the jail portion of the sentence
first, and the electronic home monitoring or alternative portion of the
sentence shall be reduced so that the combination does not exceed three
hundred sixty-five days.
(12) An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or
not a mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an
extraordinary medical placement by the jail administrator subject to
the standards and limitations set forth in RCW 9.94A.728(4).
(13) For purposes of this section and RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504:
(a) A "prior offense" means any of the following:
(i) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(ii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(iii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(iv) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(v) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or
9A.36.050 or an equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the
result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW
46.61.520 or 46.61.522;
(vi) An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have
been a violation of (a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this
subsection if committed in this state;
(vii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an
equivalent local ordinance; or
(viii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local
ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred prosecution was
granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or
46.61.522; and
(b) "Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within seven years of the arrest for the current offense.

--- END ---