BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature has adopted a process for
the dependable and systematic funding of the Washington state
retirement systems, and to that end, has established the office of the
state actuary. It is the legislature's intent to follow the
recommendations of the state actuary absent a clear indication that his
or her judgment is unreasonable. The legislature also recognizes that
it is more cost-efficient to begin to fund the expected long-term
obligations of the retirement systems as soon as possible, as this
policy increases opportunities to generate investment earnings to
offset plan liabilities. Furthermore, prefunding these expected long-term obligations promotes intergenerational equity for taxpayers,
contribution rate adequacy, and benefit security for retirement system
members and their beneficiaries.
The cost of retirement benefits is closely linked to the longevity
of retirees. As life expectancy increases, so do the financial
resources needed to fund pension plans. In the 2005 preliminary
actuarial valuation report, the state actuary recommended an assumption
change that recognized projected improvements in mortality. In
response, the legislature has the opportunity to make small adjustments
to pension contribution rates today in order to avoid large increases
tomorrow. For these reasons, it is the legislature's intent to adopt
contribution rates for the state retirement systems that are adequate
to address projected mortality improvements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For actuarial valuation reports issued after July 1, 2007, the
state actuary shall include a recommendation regarding the impact of
projected mortality improvements on contribution rates.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2007, the legislature shall recognize
projected mortality improvements when adopting contribution rates for
the Washington state retirement systems. To implement this change, the
legislature hereby adopts the contribution rate increases identified in
this section, which shall be collected in addition to the basic state,
employer, and plan 2 member rates otherwise adopted under this chapter.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2007, the following contribution rates shall
be charged in addition to the basic state and employer contribution
rates: 0.62 percent for the public employees' retirement system, of
which 0.16 percent shall be applied to the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability in plan 1; 0.16 percent for the public safety employees'
retirement system, all of which shall be applied to the unfunded
actuarial accrued liability in plan 1 of the public employees'
retirement system; and 1.04 percent for the Washington state patrol
retirement system.
(4) Beginning September 1, 2007, the following contribution rates
shall be charged in addition to the basic state and employer
contribution rates: 0.74 percent for the teachers' retirement system,
of which 0.28 percent shall be applied to the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability in plan 1; and 0.65 percent for the school employees'
retirement system, of which 0.16 percent shall be applied to the
unfunded actuarial accrued liability in plan 1.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2007, the following contribution rates shall
be charged in addition to the member rates: 0.45 percent for the
public employees' retirement system plan 2; 0.00 percent for the public
safety employees' retirement system; and 1.04 percent for the
Washington state patrol retirement system.
(6) Beginning September 1, 2007, the following contribution rates
shall be charged in addition to the member rates: 0.40 percent for the
teachers' retirement system, and 0.40 percent for the school employees'
retirement system.
(7) The contribution rates in subsections (3) and (5) of this
section shall be collected through June 30, 2009, for the public
employees' retirement system, public safety employees' retirement
system, and Washington state patrol retirement system. The
contribution rates in subsections (2) and (4) of this section shall be
collected through August 31, 2009, for the teachers' retirement system
and the school employees' retirement system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---