BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this
chapter applies to the governor with respect to adult family home
providers. Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the public employer of adult family home providers as
defined in RCW 70.128.010, who solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, are public employees. The public employer shall be
represented for bargaining purposes by the governor or the governor's
designee.
(2) There shall be collective bargaining, as defined in RCW
41.56.030, between the governor and adult family home providers, except
as follows:
(a) A statewide unit of all adult family home providers is the only
unit appropriate for purposes of collective bargaining under RCW
41.56.060;
(b) The state shall recognize the exclusive bargaining
representative of adult family home providers in the unit specified in
(a) of this subsection, upon verification that a majority of providers
have designated an exclusive representative. The certification of
majority status shall be conducted by the commission.
(i) The commission shall grant a prospective representative
intervener status if that organization submits authorization cards from
a majority of providers in the unit within five days of the initial
request for recognition.
(ii) In the event that two or more prospective representatives have
valid authorization cards from the same individual within the unit, the
commission shall add the cards to both organizations' total number of
authorization cards.
(c) Notwithstanding the definition of "collective bargaining" in
RCW 41.56.030(4), the scope of collective bargaining for adult family
home providers under this section includes, but is not limited to:
(i) Economic compensation, such as manner and rate of reimbursement,
including tiered reimbursements; (ii) benefits, including but not
limited to health and welfare upgrading; (iii) expanded options for
training beyond certification requirements; (iv) provider safety and
liability, including but not limited to liability insurance; (v) terms
and conditions of the current contract; (vi) comprehensive assessment
reporting evaluation assessment procedures; (vii) grievance procedures;
and (viii) any other matter that would affect the provision of services
in adult family homes or the livelihood of the providers. A party may
not be compelled to agree to a proposal or be required to make a
concession unless otherwise provided in this chapter.
(d) In addition to the entities listed in the mediation and
interest arbitration provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and
41.56.480, the provisions apply to the governor or the governor's
designee and the exclusive bargaining representative of adult family
home providers, except that:
(i) In addition to the factors to be taken into consideration by an
interest arbitration panel under RCW 41.56.465, the panel shall
consider the financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement.
(ii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and benefit provisions of
the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, the decision is not
binding on the state.
(3) Adult family home providers who are public employees solely for
the purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this
section are not, for that reason, employees of the state for any other
purpose. This section applies only to the governance of the collective
bargaining relationship between the employer and adult family home
providers as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) This section does not create or modify:
(a) The residents', parents', or legal guardians' right to choose
and terminate the services of any licensed adult family home provider;
and
(b) RCW 43.43.832, 43.20A.205, or 74.15.130.
(5) Upon meeting the requirements of subsection (6) of this
section, the governor must submit, as a part of the proposed biennial
or supplemental operating budget submitted to the legislature under RCW
43.88.030, a request for funds necessary to implement the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered
into under this section or for legislation necessary to implement the
agreement.
(6) A request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and
benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into
under this section shall not be submitted by the governor to the
legislature unless the request has been:
(a) Submitted to the director of financial management by October
1st prior to the legislative session at which the requests are to be
considered; and
(b) Certified by the director of financial management as
financially feasible for the state or reflective of a binding decision
of an arbitration panel reached under subsection (2)(d) of this
section.
(7) The legislature must approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds as a whole. If the legislature rejects or fails to
act on the submission, any collective bargaining agreement must be
reopened for the sole purpose of renegotiating the funds necessary to
implement the agreement.
(8) If, after the compensation and benefit provisions of an
agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue
shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by
proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both
parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a
mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.
(9) After the expiration date of any collective bargaining
agreement entered into under this section, all of the terms and
conditions specified in the agreement remain in effect until the
effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from
the expiration date stated in the agreement.
(10) In enacting this section, the legislature intends to provide
state action immunity under federal and state antitrust laws for the
joint activities of adult family home providers and their exclusive
bargaining representative to the extent the activities are authorized
by this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.04.810 and 2006 c 54 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Individual providers, as defined in RCW 74.39A.240, ((and)) family
child care providers, as defined in RCW 41.56.030, and adult family
home providers, as defined in RCW 70.128.010, are not employees of the
state or any of its political subdivisions and are specifically and
entirely excluded from all provisions of this title, except as provided
in RCW 74.39A.270 ((and)), 41.56.028, and section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.56.113 and 2006 c 54 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the written authorization of an individual provider
((or)), a family child care provider, or an adult family home provider
within the bargaining unit and after the certification or recognition
of the bargaining unit's exclusive bargaining representative, the state
as payor, but not as the employer, shall, subject to subsection (3) of
this section, deduct from the payments to an individual provider
((or)), a family child care provider, or an adult family home provider
the monthly amount of dues as certified by the secretary of the
exclusive bargaining representative and shall transmit the same to the
treasurer of the exclusive bargaining representative.
(2) If the governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of
a bargaining unit of individual providers ((or)), family child care
providers, or adult family home providers enter into a collective
bargaining agreement that:
(a) Includes a union security provision authorized in RCW
41.56.122, the state as payor, but not as the employer, shall, subject
to subsection (3) of this section, enforce the agreement by deducting
from the payments to bargaining unit members the dues required for
membership in the exclusive bargaining representative, or, for
nonmembers thereof, a fee equivalent to the dues; or
(b) Includes requirements for deductions of payments other than the
deduction under (a) of this subsection, the state, as payor, but not as
the employer, shall, subject to subsection (3) of this section, make
such deductions upon written authorization of the individual provider
((or the)), family child care provider, or adult family home provider.
(3)(a) The initial additional costs to the state in making
deductions from the payments to individual providers or family child
care providers under this section shall be negotiated, agreed upon in
advance, and reimbursed to the state by the exclusive bargaining
representative.
(b) The allocation of ongoing additional costs to the state in
making deductions from the payments to individual providers ((or)),
family child care providers, or adult family home providers under this
section shall be an appropriate subject of collective bargaining
between the exclusive bargaining representative and the governor unless
prohibited by another statute. If no collective bargaining agreement
containing a provision allocating the ongoing additional cost is
entered into between the exclusive bargaining representative and the
governor, or if the legislature does not approve funding for the
collective bargaining agreement as provided in RCW 74.39A.300 ((or)),
41.56.028, or section 1 of this act, as applicable, the ongoing
additional costs to the state in making deductions from the payments to
individual providers ((or)), family child care providers, or adult
family home providers under this section shall be negotiated, agreed
upon in advance, and reimbursed to the state by the exclusive
bargaining representative.
(4) The governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of a
bargaining unit of family child care providers may not enter into a
collective bargaining agreement that contains a union security
provision unless the agreement contains a process, to be administered
by the exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit of
family child care providers, for hardship dispensation for license-exempt family child care providers who are also temporary assistance
for needy families recipients or WorkFirst participants.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.01.047 and 2006 c 54 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
RCW 43.01.040 through 43.01.044 do not apply to individual
providers under RCW 74.39A.220 through 74.39A.300 ((or to)), family
child care providers under RCW 41.56.028, or adult family home
providers under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---