BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that assault by
strangulation may result in immobilization of a victim, may cause a
loss of consciousness, injury, or even death, and has been a factor in
a significant number of domestic violence related assaults and
fatalities. While not limited to acts of assault against an intimate
partner, assault by strangulation is often knowingly inflicted upon an
intimate partner with the intent to commit physical injury, or
substantial or great bodily harm. Strangulation is one of the most
lethal forms of domestic violence. The particular cruelty of this
offense and its potential effects upon a victim both physically and
psychologically, merit its categorization as a ranked felony offense
under chapter 9A.36 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.36.021 and 2003 c 53 s 64 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of assault in the second degree if he or
she, under circumstances not amounting to assault in the first degree:
(a) Intentionally assaults another and thereby recklessly inflicts
substantial bodily harm; or
(b) Intentionally and unlawfully causes substantial bodily harm to
an unborn quick child by intentionally and unlawfully inflicting any
injury upon the mother of such child; or
(c) Assaults another with a deadly weapon; or
(d) With intent to inflict bodily harm, administers to or causes to
be taken by another, poison or any other destructive or noxious
substance; or
(e) With intent to commit a felony, assaults another; or
(f) Knowingly inflicts bodily harm which by design causes such pain
or agony as to be the equivalent of that produced by torture; or
(g) Assaults another by strangulation.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, assault in the
second degree is a class B felony.
(b) Assault in the second degree with a finding of sexual
motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135 is a class A felony.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.04.110 and 2005 c 458 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In this title unless a different meaning plainly is required:
(1) "Acted" includes, where relevant, omitted to act;
(2) "Actor" includes, where relevant, a person failing to act;
(3) "Benefit" is any gain or advantage to the beneficiary,
including any gain or advantage to a third person pursuant to the
desire or consent of the beneficiary;
(4)(a) "Bodily injury," "physical injury," or "bodily harm" means
physical pain or injury, illness, or an impairment of physical
condition;
(b) "Substantial bodily harm" means bodily injury which involves a
temporary but substantial disfigurement, or which causes a temporary
but substantial loss or impairment of the function of any bodily part
or organ, or which causes a fracture of any bodily part;
(c) "Great bodily harm" means bodily injury which creates a
probability of death, or which causes significant serious permanent
disfigurement, or which causes a significant permanent loss or
impairment of the function of any bodily part or organ;
(5) "Building", in addition to its ordinary meaning, includes any
dwelling, fenced area, vehicle, railway car, cargo container, or any
other structure used for lodging of persons or for carrying on business
therein, or for the use, sale or deposit of goods; each unit of a
building consisting of two or more units separately secured or occupied
is a separate building;
(6) "Deadly weapon" means any explosive or loaded or unloaded
firearm, and shall include any other weapon, device, instrument,
article, or substance, including a "vehicle" as defined in this
section, which, under the circumstances in which it is used, attempted
to be used, or threatened to be used, is readily capable of causing
death or substantial bodily harm;
(7) "Dwelling" means any building or structure, though movable or
temporary, or a portion thereof, which is used or ordinarily used by a
person for lodging;
(8) "Government" includes any branch, subdivision, or agency of the
government of this state and any county, city, district, or other local
governmental unit;
(9) "Governmental function" includes any activity which a public
servant is legally authorized or permitted to undertake on behalf of a
government;
(10) "Indicted" and "indictment" include "informed against" and
"information", and "informed against" and "information" include
"indicted" and "indictment";
(11) "Judge" includes every judicial officer authorized alone or
with others, to hold or preside over a court;
(12) "Malice" and "maliciously" shall import an evil intent, wish,
or design to vex, annoy, or injure another person. Malice may be
inferred from an act done in wilful disregard of the rights of another,
or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an act or
omission of duty betraying a wilful disregard of social duty;
(13) "Officer" and "public officer" means a person holding office
under a city, county, or state government, or the federal government
who performs a public function and in so doing is vested with the
exercise of some sovereign power of government, and includes all
assistants, deputies, clerks, and employees of any public officer and
all persons lawfully exercising or assuming to exercise any of the
powers or functions of a public officer;
(14) "Omission" means a failure to act;
(15) "Peace officer" means a duly appointed city, county, or state
law enforcement officer;
(16) "Pecuniary benefit" means any gain or advantage in the form of
money, property, commercial interest, or anything else the primary
significance of which is economic gain;
(17) "Person", "he", and "actor" include any natural person and,
where relevant, a corporation, joint stock association, or an
unincorporated association;
(18) "Place of work" includes but is not limited to all the lands
and other real property of a farm or ranch in the case of an actor who
owns, operates, or is employed to work on such a farm or ranch;
(19) "Prison" means any place designated by law for the keeping of
persons held in custody under process of law, or under lawful arrest,
including but not limited to any state correctional institution or any
county or city jail;
(20) "Prisoner" includes any person held in custody under process
of law, or under lawful arrest;
(21) "Projectile stun gun" means an electronic device that projects
wired probes attached to the device that emit an electrical charge and
that is designed and primarily employed to incapacitate a person or
animal;
(22) "Property" means anything of value, whether tangible or
intangible, real or personal;
(23) "Public servant" means any person other than a witness who
presently occupies the position of or has been elected, appointed, or
designated to become any officer or employee of government, including
a legislator, judge, judicial officer, juror, and any person
participating as an advisor, consultant, or otherwise in performing a
governmental function;
(24) "Signature" includes any memorandum, mark, or sign made with
intent to authenticate any instrument or writing, or the subscription
of any person thereto;
(25) "Statute" means the Constitution or an act of the legislature
or initiative or referendum of this state;
(26) "Strangulation" means to compress a person's neck, thereby
obstructing the person's blood flow or ability to breathe, or doing so
with the intent to obstruct the person's blood flow or ability to
breathe.
(27) "Threat" means to communicate, directly or indirectly the
intent:
(a) To cause bodily injury in the future to the person threatened
or to any other person; or
(b) To cause physical damage to the property of a person other than
the actor; or
(c) To subject the person threatened or any other person to
physical confinement or restraint; or
(d) To accuse any person of a crime or cause criminal charges to be
instituted against any person; or
(e) To expose a secret or publicize an asserted fact, whether true
or false, tending to subject any person to hatred, contempt, or
ridicule; or
(f) To reveal any information sought to be concealed by the person
threatened; or
(g) To testify or provide information or withhold testimony or
information with respect to another's legal claim or defense; or
(h) To take wrongful action as an official against anyone or
anything, or wrongfully withhold official action, or cause such action
or withholding; or
(i) To bring about or continue a strike, boycott, or other similar
collective action to obtain property which is not demanded or received
for the benefit of the group which the actor purports to represent; or
(j) To do any other act which is intended to harm substantially the
person threatened or another with respect to his health, safety,
business, financial condition, or personal relationships;
(((27))) (28) "Vehicle" means a "motor vehicle" as defined in the
vehicle and traffic laws, any aircraft, or any vessel equipped for
propulsion by mechanical means or by sail;
(((28))) (29) Words in the present tense shall include the future
tense; and in the masculine shall include the feminine and neuter
genders; and in the singular shall include the plural; and in the
plural shall include the singular.

--- END ---