BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the waters,
moorage facilities, and recreational fleet of the state would be
improved if boaters and motor-driven boats and vessels were covered by
liability insurance. In order to protect marina facilities and other
boats moored at those facilities, it is important to institute a
liability insurance requirement for all owners and pilots of motor-driven boats and vessels over the length of thirty feet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person may own or pilot a motor-driven boat or vessel of
more than thirty feet in length subject to registration under chapter
88.02 RCW in this state unless the person is insured under a liability
policy with limits of at least three hundred thousand dollars, is self-
insured in a manner determined by the department of licensing, or is
covered by a certificate of deposit in conformance with parameters
determined by the department of licensing. Written proof of financial
responsibility for a motor-driven boat or vessel must be provided on
the request of a law enforcement officer.
(2) A person who pilots a motor-driven boat or vessel that is
required to be registered in another state that requires owners and
operators of boats in that state to maintain insurance or financial
responsibility shall, when requested by a law enforcement officer,
provide evidence of financial responsibility or insurance as required
by the laws of the state in which the vessel is registered.
(3) Failure to produce written proof of financial responsibility
for a motor-driven boat or vessel, when asked to do so by a law
enforcement officer as specified in this section, creates a presumption
that the person does not have vessel insurance.
(4) Failure to provide written proof of financial responsibility
for a motor-driven boat or vessel as required in this section is a
marine traffic infraction and is subject to a penalty as prescribed in
RCW 79A.60.020.
(5) The department of licensing shall notify the public of the
requirements of this section at the time of new vessel registration and
when the department sends a registration renewal notice.

--- END ---