BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
SCHOOL DISTRICT LEADERSHIP ACADEMY. (1) Research supports the
value of quality school and school district leadership. Effective
leadership is critical to improving student learning and transforming
underperforming schools and school districts into world-class learning
centers.
(2) A public-private partnership is established to develop, pilot,
and implement the Washington state leadership academy to focus on the
development and enhancement of personal leadership characteristics and
the teaching of effective practices and skills demonstrated by school
and district administrators who are successful managers and
instructional leaders. It is the goal of the academy to provide state-of-the-art programs and services across the state.
(3) Academy partners include the state superintendent and principal
professional associations, private nonprofit foundations, institutions
of higher education, the professional educator standards board, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, educational service
districts, and other entities identified by the partners. The partners
shall designate an independent organization to act as the fiscal agent
for the academy and shall establish a board of directors to oversee and
direct the academy's finances, services, and programs. The academy
shall be supported by a national research institution with demonstrated
expertise in educational leadership.
(4) Initial development of academy course content and activities
shall be supported by private funds. Initial tasks of the academy are
to:
(a) Finalize a comprehensive design of the academy and the
development of the curriculum frameworks for a comprehensive leadership
development program that includes coursework, practicum, mentoring, and
evaluation components;
(b) Develop curriculum for individual leadership topics;
(c) Pilot the curriculum and all program components; and
(d) Modify the comprehensive design, curriculum coursework,
practicum, and mentoring programs based on the research results gained
from pilot activities.
(5) The board of directors shall report semiannually to the
superintendent of public instruction on the financial contributions
provided by foundations and other organizations to support the work of
the academy. The board of directors shall report by December 31st each
year to the superintendent of public instruction on the programs and
services provided, numbers of participants in the various academy
activities, evaluation activities regarding program and participant
outcomes, and plans for the academy's future development.
(6) The board of directors shall identify possible areas to better
coordinate with and make recommendations for changes in superintendent
and principal preparation programs, the administrator licensure system,
and continuing education requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR STANDARDS BOARD
DUTIES. (1) The purpose of the duties in this section for the
professional educator standards board is to take the next steps in
developing quality teaching knowledge and skill in the state's teaching
ranks. The duties build upon the current teacher development
foundation that requires demonstrated teaching competency, requires
evidence of positive impact on student learning, and focuses on
furthering state kindergarten through twelfth grade learning goals
through instructional skill alignment.
(2) The professional educator standards board shall:
(a) By December 2007:
(i) Adopt new knowledge and skill standards that prepare all
individuals seeking residency teacher certification to integrate
mathematics across all content areas; and
(ii) Adopt new certification requirements for individuals seeking
residency teacher certification as elementary education or middle level
and secondary mathematics teachers to assure adequate content and
instructional strategy preparation to teach to the kindergarten through
twelfth grades state mathematics and science standards;
(b) By June 2009:
(i) Set performance standards and develop, pilot, and implement a
uniform and external professional-level certification assessment based
on demonstrated teaching skill. In the development of this assessment,
consideration shall be given to changes in professional certification
program components such as the culminating seminar;
(ii) Summarize its work in the development of the assessment in
(b)(i) of this subsection in the annual reports required by RCW
28A.410.240; and
(iii) Review and revise the standards for higher education teacher
preparation programs to incorporate updated practices to enhance
teacher success in a knowledge and skill-based performance system that
emphasizes strong content, applied learning, and personal, meaningful
connections with students; and
(c) By December 2009, review and revise as needed teacher
preparation standards and requirements to focus on diversity in
cultural knowledge and respect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
MATHEMATICS AND SCIENCE TEACHER PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT. (1)
Targeted professional development programs, to be known as learning
improvement days, are authorized to further the development of
outstanding mathematics, science, and reading teaching and learning
opportunities in the state of Washington. The learning improvement
days created in this section shall not be considered part of the
definition of basic education.
(2) The expected outcomes of this program are:
(a) Provision of meaningful, targeted professional development for
all teachers in mathematics, science, or reading;
(b) Increased knowledge and instructional skill for mathematics,
science, or reading teachers;
(c) Increased use of curriculum materials with supporting
diagnostic and supplemental materials that align with state standards;
(d) Skillful guidance for students participating in alternative
assessment activities;
(e) Increased rigor of course offerings especially in mathematics,
science, and reading;
(f) Increased student opportunities for focused, applied
mathematics and science classes;
(g) Increased student success on state achievement measures; and
(h) Increased student appreciation of the value and uses of
mathematics, science, and reading knowledge and exploration of related
careers.
(3) For the 2007-08 and 2008-09 school years, school districts
receiving professional development resources for learning improvement
days are directed to conduct the following activities:
(a) For middle school and junior high school mathematics teachers:
(i) During the 2007-08 school year the focus shall be on
development of basic mathematics knowledge and instructional skills;
and
(ii) During the 2008-09 school year the focus shall be on
implementing new international mathematics standards;
(b) For middle school and junior high school science teachers:
(i) During the 2007-08 school year the focus shall be on
examination of student science assessment data and identification of
science knowledge and skill areas in need of additional instructional
attention; and
(ii) During the 2008-09 school year the focus is on implementing
new international science standards;
(c) For high school mathematics teachers:
(i) During the 2007-08 school year the focus shall be on
implementing state mathematics learning modules, the segmented
mathematics class and assessment program, the collection of evidence
alternative assessment and basic mathematics knowledge, and
instructional skills; and
(ii) During the 2008-09 school year the focus shall be on
implementing new international mathematics standards;
(d) For high school science teachers:
(i) During the 2007-08 school year the focus shall be on
examination of student science assessment data and identification of
science knowledge and skill areas in need of additional instructional
attention; and
(ii) During the 2008-09 school year the focus shall be on
implementing new international science standards;
(e) For middle and high school language arts teachers: For the
2007-08 and 2008-09 school years, the focus shall be on development of
reading knowledge and instructional skills.
(4) School districts receiving resources under this section shall
submit reports to the superintendent of public instruction regarding
the use of the funds. The superintendent of public instruction and the
office of financial management shall collaborate on required report
content and format.
(5) Beginning with the 2009-10 school year, the focus for
professional development resources and activities may be adjusted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT LEARNING OPPORTUNITIES. (1) The
superintendent of public instruction and the educational service
districts shall create a partnership to develop and deliver
professional development learning opportunities, including learning
improvement days, if funded, as referenced in section 3 of this act,
for educators that fulfill the goals and address the specific targeted
activities described in this section. The partnership shall:
(a) Support school districts by providing professional development
leadership, courses, and consultation services to school districts in
their implementation of the professional development activities
described in this section; and
(b) Support one another in the delivery of state-level and
regional-level professional development activities such as state
conferences and regional accountability institutes.
(2) Each educational service district shall enter into a
performance agreement with the superintendent of public instruction to
clearly articulate partner responsibilities and to assure fidelity for
the delivery of professional development initiatives including job-embedded practices. Components of such performance agreement shall
include:
(a) Participation in the development of various professional
development workshops, programs, and activities;
(b) Characteristics and qualifications of professional development
staff supported by the program;
(c) Methods to ensure consistent delivery of professional
development services; and
(d) Reporting responsibilities related to services provided,
program participation, outcomes, and recommendations for service
improvement.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.310.350 and 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
The basic core services and cost upon which educational service
districts are budgeted shall include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(1) Educational service district administration and facilities such
as office space, maintenance and utilities;
(2) Cooperative administrative services such as assistance in
carrying out procedures to abolish sex and race bias in school
programs, fiscal services, grants management services, special
education services and transportation services;
(3) Personnel services such as certification/registration services;
(4) Learning resource services such as audio visual aids;
(5) Cooperative curriculum services such as health promotion and
health education services, in-service training, workshops and
assessment; ((and))
(6) Professional development services identified by statute or the
omnibus appropriations act; and
(7) Special needs of local education agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 FINDINGS--NATIONAL BOARD FOR PROFESSIONAL
TEACHING STANDARDS CERTIFICATION. The legislature finds and declares:
(1) The national board for professional teaching standards has
established high and rigorous standards for what highly accomplished
teachers should know and be able to do in order to increase student
learning results;
(2) The national board for professional teaching standards
certifies teachers who meet these standards through a rigorous,
performance-based assessment process;
(3) A certificate awarded by the national board attests that a
teacher has met high and rigorous standards and has demonstrated the
ability to make sound professional judgments about how to best meet
students' learning needs and effectively help students meet challenging
academic standards;
(4) The process of national board assessment is the most rigorous
advanced certification process in the teaching profession; and
(5) Teachers who attain national board certification should be
acknowledged and rewarded in order to encourage more teachers to pursue
certification for the benefit of Washington students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
NATIONAL BOARD FOR PROFESSIONAL TEACHING STANDARDS CERTIFICATION--BONUSES. (1) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall receive an annual bonus each year in which they
maintain certification from the national board. The annual bonus for
national board certification is provided in addition to compensation
received under a district's salary schedule adopted in accordance with
RCW 28A.405.200 and shall not be included in calculations of a
district's average salary and associated salary limitations under RCW
28A.400.200. The bonus shall be five thousand dollars in the 2007-08
school year. Thereafter, the amount of the annual bonus shall increase
by inflation.
(2) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall be eligible for bonuses in addition to that provided by
subsection (1) of this section if the individual is in an instructional
assignment in a school in which at least seventy percent of the
students qualify for the free or reduced-price lunch program.
(3) The amount of the additional bonus under subsection (2) of this
section for those meeting the qualifications of subsection (2) of this
section is five thousand dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 For the 2007-08 and 2008-09 school years,
twenty teachers, from middle, junior high, and high schools, each year
shall be provided professional development to implement a specialized
science, technology, engineering, and mathematics curriculum in their
school. Schools shall apply to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction for the learning improvement days program in section
3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

--- END ---