BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The educator tuition reimbursement program is created. The
purpose of the program is to provide full tuition reimbursement to
public school teachers who take college courses as a requirement for
obtaining their professional certification, as required under RCW
28A.410.250. The program shall be administered by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(2) With funds specifically appropriated for this purpose, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide full
or partial tuition reimbursement to any teacher employed in the common
school system of the state, subject to the following requirements:
(a) For coursework completed at an institution of higher education
as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, reimbursement shall be based on actual
tuition and fees paid by the teacher for the coursework;
(b) For coursework completed at an institution of higher education
as defined in RCW 28B.07.020(4), reimbursement shall be based on, and
shall not exceed, an average of the tuition and fees charged for
comparable coursework at the regional universities designated in RCW
28B.35.010; and
(c) The coursework must apply toward professional certification
requirements adopted by the state board of education.

--- END ---