BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 44.68.010 and 1986 c 61 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Administrative committee" means the joint legislative systems
administrative committee created under RCW 44.68.030.
(2) "Center" means the ((joint)) legislative service center
established under RCW 44.68.060.
(3) "Coordinator" means the legislative systems coordinator
employed under RCW 44.68.040.
(4) "Systems committee" means the joint legislative systems
committee created under RCW 44.68.020.

Sec. 2 RCW 44.68.030 and 1986 c 61 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The joint legislative systems administrative committee is
created to manage the information processing and communications systems
of the legislature. The administrative committee consists of five
members appointed as follows:
(a) The secretary of the senate, and another senate staff person
appointed by and serving at the pleasure of the secretary;
(b) The chief clerk of the house of representatives, and another
house of representatives staff person appointed by and serving at the
pleasure of the chief clerk; and
(c) The code reviser, or the code reviser's designee, serving in a
nonvoting capacity.
(2) The coordinator shall serve as the secretary of the
administrative committee.

Sec. 3 RCW 44.68.040 and 2001 c 259 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
Subject to RCW 44.04.260:
(1) The systems committee, after consultation with the
administrative committee, shall employ a legislative systems
coordinator. The coordinator shall serve at the pleasure of the
systems committee, which shall fix the coordinator's salary.
(2)(a) The coordinator shall serve as the executive and
administrative head of the center, and shall assist the administrative
committee in managing the information processing and communications
systems of the legislature as directed by the administrative committee;
(b) In accordance with an adopted personnel plan, the coordinator
shall employ or engage and fix the compensation for personnel required
to carry out the purposes of this chapter;
(c) The coordinator shall enter into contracts for: (i) The sale,
exchange, or acquisition of equipment, supplies, services, and
facilities required to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and (ii)
the distribution of legislative information.

Sec. 4 RCW 44.68.050 and 2001 c 259 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrative committee shall, subject to the approval of the
systems committee and subject to RCW 44.04.260:
(1) Adopt policies, procedures, and standards regarding the
information processing and communications systems of the legislature;
(2) Establish appropriate charges for services, equipment, and
publications provided by the legislative information processing and
communications systems, applicable to legislative and nonlegislative
users as determined by the administrative committee;
(3) ((Employ or engage and fix the)) Adopt a compensation plan for
personnel required to carry out the purposes of this chapter;
(4) ((Enter into contracts for (a) the sale, exchange, or
acquisition of equipment, supplies, services, and facilities)) Approve
strategic and tactical information technology plans and provide
guidance in operational matters required to carry out (a) the purposes
of this chapter; and (b) the distribution of legislative information;
(5) Generally assist the systems committee in carrying out its
responsibilities under this chapter, as directed by the systems
committee.

Sec. 5 RCW 44.68.060 and 1986 c 61 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The administrative committee, subject to the approval of the
systems committee, shall establish a ((joint)) legislative service
center. The center shall provide automatic data processing services,
equipment, training, and support to the legislature and legislative
agencies. The center may also, by agreement, provide services to
agencies of the judicial and executive branches of state government and
other governmental entities, and provide public access to legislative
information. All operations of the center shall be subject to the
general supervision of the administrative committee in accordance with
the policies, procedures, and standards established under RCW
44.68.050.
(2) Except as provided otherwise in subsection (3) of this section,
determinations regarding the security, disclosure, and disposition of
information placed or maintained in the center shall rest solely with
the originator and shall be made in accordance with any law regulating
the disclosure of such information. The originator is the person who
directly places information in the center.
(3) When utilizing the center to carry out the bill drafting
functions required under RCW 1.08.027, the code reviser shall be
considered the originator as defined in RCW 44.68.060. However,
determinations regarding the security, disclosure, and disposition of
drafts placed or maintained in the center shall be made by the person
requesting the code reviser's services and the code reviser, acting as
the originator, shall comply with and carry out such determinations as
directed by that person. A measure once introduced shall not be
considered a draft under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 44.68 RCW
to read as follows:
Subject to RCW 44.04.260, all expenses incurred, including salaries
and expenses of employees, shall be paid upon voucher forms as provided
and signed by the coordinator. Vouchers may be drawn on funds
appropriated by law for the systems committee, administrative
committee, and center: PROVIDED, That the senate, house of
representatives, and code reviser may authorize the systems committee,
administrative committee, and center to draw on funds appropriated by
the legislature for related information technology expenses. The
senate and house of representatives may transfer moneys appropriated
for legislative expenses to the systems committee, administrative
committee, and center, in addition to charges made under RCW
44.68.050(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 44.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The systems committee, administrative committee, and center are
hereby expressly exempted from the provisions of chapter 43.105 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The legislative systems revolving fund is
abolished as of July 1, 2007. All moneys remaining in the legislative
systems revolving fund on July 1, 2007, shall be transferred to the
state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RCW 44.68.070 (Legislative systems revolving
fund) and 1986 c 61 s 7 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2007.

--- END ---