BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the public policy of Washington to
promote access to medical care for all citizens and to encourage
innovative arrangements between patients and providers that will help
provide all citizens with a medical home.
Washington needs a multipronged approach to provide adequate health
care to many citizens who lack adequate access to it. Direct patient-provider practices, in which patients enter into a direct relationship
with medical practitioners and pay a fixed amount directly to the
health care provider for primary care services, represent an
innovative, affordable option which could improve access to medical
care, reduce the number of people who now lack such access, and cut
down on emergency room use for primary care purposes, thereby freeing
up emergency room facilities to treat true emergencies.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.44.010 and 1990 c 120 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Health care services" means and includes medical, surgical,
dental, chiropractic, hospital, optometric, podiatric, pharmaceutical,
ambulance, custodial, mental health, and other therapeutic services.
(2) "Provider" means any health professional, hospital, or other
institution, organization, or person that furnishes health care
services and is licensed to furnish such services.
(3) "Health care service contractor" means any corporation,
cooperative group, or association, which is sponsored by or otherwise
intimately connected with a provider or group of providers, who or
which not otherwise being engaged in the insurance business, accepts
prepayment for health care services from or for the benefit of persons
or groups of persons as consideration for providing such persons with
any health care services. "Health care service contractor" does not
include direct patient-provider primary care practices as defined in
section 3 of this act.
(4) "Participating provider" means a provider, who or which has
contracted in writing with a health care service contractor to accept
payment from and to look solely to such contractor according to the
terms of the subscriber contract for any health care services rendered
to a person who has previously paid, or on whose behalf prepayment has
been made, to such contractor for such services.
(5) "Enrolled participant" means a person or group of persons who
have entered into a contractual arrangement or on whose behalf a
contractual arrangement has been entered into with a health care
service contractor to receive health care services.
(6) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner.
(7) "Uncovered expenditures" means the costs to the health care
service contractor for health care services that are the obligation of
the health care service contractor for which an enrolled participant
would also be liable in the event of the health care service
contractor's insolvency and for which no alternative arrangements have
been made as provided herein. The term does not include expenditures
for covered services when a provider has agreed not to bill the
enrolled participant even though the provider is not paid by the health
care service contractor, or for services that are guaranteed, insured
or assumed by a person or organization other than the health care
service contractor.
(8) "Copayment" means an amount specified in a group or individual
contract which is an obligation of an enrolled participant for a
specific service which is not fully prepaid.
(9) "Deductible" means the amount an enrolled participant is
responsible to pay before the health care service contractor begins to
pay the costs associated with treatment.
(10) "Group contract" means a contract for health care services
which by its terms limits eligibility to members of a specific group.
The group contract may include coverage for dependents.
(11) "Individual contract" means a contract for health care
services issued to and covering an individual. An individual contract
may include dependents.
(12) "Carrier" means a health maintenance organization, an insurer,
a health care service contractor, or other entity responsible for the
payment of benefits or provision of services under a group or
individual contract.
(13) "Replacement coverage" means the benefits provided by a
succeeding carrier.
(14) "Insolvent" or "insolvency" means that the organization has
been declared insolvent and is placed under an order of liquidation by
a court of competent jurisdiction.
(15) "Fully subordinated debt" means those debts that meet the
requirements of RCW 48.44.037(3) and are recorded as equity.
(16) "Net worth" means the excess of total admitted assets as
defined in RCW 48.12.010 over total liabilities but the liabilities
shall not include fully subordinated debt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Direct patient-provider primary care practice" and "direct
practice" means a provider, group, or entity that meets the following
criteria in (a), (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection:
(a)(i) A health care provider who furnishes primary care services
through a direct agreement;
(ii) A group of health care providers who furnish primary care
services through a direct agreement; or
(iii) An entity that sponsors, employs, or is otherwise affiliated
with a group of health care providers who furnish only primary care
services through a direct agreement, which entity is wholly owned by
the group of health care providers or is a nonprofit corporation exempt
from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, and
is not otherwise regulated as a health care service contractor, health
maintenance organization, or disability insurer under Title 48 RCW.
Such entity is not prohibited from sponsoring, employing, or being
otherwise affiliated with other types of health care providers not
engaged in a direct practice;
(b) Enters into direct agreements with direct patients or parents
or legal guardians of direct patients;
(c) Does not accept payment for health care services provided to
direct patients from any entity subject to regulation under Title 48
RCW; and
(d) Does not provide, in consideration for the direct fee,
services, procedures, or supplies such as prescription drugs,
hospitalization costs, major surgery, dialysis, high level radiology
(CT, MRI, PET scans or invasive radiology), rehabilitation services,
procedures requiring general anesthesia, or similar advanced
procedures, services, or supplies.
(2) "Direct patient" means a person who is party to a direct
agreement and is entitled to receive primary care services under the
direct agreement from the direct practice.
(3) "Direct fee" means a fee charged by a direct practice as
consideration for being available to provide and providing primary care
services as specified in a direct agreement. The fee must represent
the total amount due for all health care services specified in the
direct agreement and may be paid by the direct patient or on his or her
behalf by others.
(4) "Direct agreement" means a written agreement entered into
between a direct practice and an individual direct patient, or the
parent or legal guardian of the direct patient or a family of direct
patients, whereby the direct practice charges a direct fee as
consideration for being available to provide and providing health care
services to the individual direct patient. A direct agreement must (a)
describe the specific health care services the direct practice will
provide; (b) be terminable at will upon written notice by the direct
patient; and (c) include the following disclaimer: "This agreement
does not provide comprehensive health insurance coverage. It provides
only the health care services specifically described." The direct
agreement may not be sold to a group and may not be entered with a
group of subscribers. It must be an agreement between a direct
practice and an individual direct patient. Nothing prohibits the
presentation of marketing materials to groups of potential subscribers
or their representatives.
(5) "Health care provider" or "provider" means a person regulated
under Title 18 RCW or chapter 70.127 RCW to practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing health care services in this
state consistent with state law.
(6) "Health carrier" or "carrier" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.43.005.
(7) "Primary care" means routine health care services, including
screening, assessment, diagnosis, and treatment for the purpose of
promotion of health, and detection and management of disease or injury.
(8) "Network" means the group of participating providers and
facilities providing health care services to a particular health
carrier.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A direct practice must charge a direct
fee on a monthly basis.
(2) A direct practice must:
(a) Maintain appropriate accounts and provide data regarding
payments made and services received to direct patients upon request;
and
(b) Either:
(i) Bill patients at the end of each monthly period; or
(ii) If the patient pays the monthly fee in advance, promptly
refund to the direct patient all unearned direct fees following receipt
of written notice of termination of the direct agreement from the
direct patient. The amount of the direct fee considered earned shall
be a proration of the monthly fee as of the date the notice of
termination is received.
(3) If the patient chooses to pay more than one monthly direct fee
in advance, the funds will be held in a trust account and paid to the
direct practice as earned at the end of each month. Any unearned
direct fees held in trust following receipt of termination of the
direct agreement shall be promptly refunded to the direct patient. The
amount of the direct fee earned shall be a proration of the monthly fee
for the then current month as of the date the notice of termination is
received.
(4) A direct practice must designate a contact person to receive
and address any patient complaints.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Direct practices may not:
(a) Enter into a participating provider contract as defined in RCW
48.44.010 or 48.46.020 with any carrier or with any carrier's
contractor or subcontractor to provide health care services through a
direct agreement except as set forth in subsection (2) of this section;
(b) Submit a claim for payment to any carrier or any carrier's
contractor or subcontractor for health care services provided to direct
patients as covered by their agreement;
(c) With respect to services provided through a direct agreement,
be identified by a carrier or any carrier's contractor or subcontractor
as a participant in the carrier's or any carrier's contractor or
subcontractor network for purposes of determining network adequacy or
being available for selection by an enrollee under a carrier's benefit
plan; or
(d) Pay for health care services covered by a direct agreement
rendered to direct patients by providers other than the providers in
the direct practice or their employees, except as described in
subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(2) Direct practices and providers may:
(a) Enter into a participating provider contract as defined by RCW
48.44.010 and 48.46.020 for purposes other than payment of claims for
services provided to direct patients through a direct agreement. Such
providers shall be subject to all other provisions of the participating
provider contract applicable to participating providers including but
not limited to the right to:
(i) Make referrals to other participating providers;
(ii) Admit the carrier's members to participating hospitals and
other health care facilities;
(iii) Prescribe prescription drugs; and
(iv) Implement other customary provisions of the contract not
dealing with reimbursement of services;
(b) Pay for charges associated with the provision of routine lab
and imaging services provided in connection with wellness physical
examinations. In aggregate such payments per year per direct patient
are not to exceed fifteen percent of the total annual direct fee
charged that direct patient. Exceptions to this limitation may occur
in the event of short-term equipment failure if such failure prevents
the provision of care that should not be delayed; and
(c) Charge an additional fee to direct patients for supplies,
medications, and specific vaccines provided to direct patients that are
specifically excluded under the agreement, provided the direct practice
notifies the direct patient of the additional charge, prior to their
administration or delivery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Direct practices may not decline to
accept new direct patients or discontinue care to existing patients
solely because of the patient's health status. A direct practice may
decline to accept a patient if the practice has reached its maximum
capacity, or if the patient's medical condition is such that the
provider is unable to provide the appropriate level and type of health
care services in the direct practice or if the direct practice
reasonably determines that the patient would be better served by
another health care provider.
(2) Direct practices may accept payment of direct fees directly or
indirectly from nonemployer third parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Direct practices, as defined in section 3 of
this act, who comply with this chapter are not insurers under RCW
48.01.050, health carriers under chapter 48.43 RCW, health care service
contractors under chapter 48.44 RCW, or health maintenance
organizations under chapter 48.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A person shall not make, publish, or
disseminate any false, deceptive, or misleading representation or
advertising in the conduct of the business of a direct practice, or
relative to the business of a direct practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A person shall not make, issue, or
circulate, or cause to be made, issued, or circulated, a
misrepresentation of the terms of any direct agreement, or the benefits
or advantages promised thereby, or use the name or title of any direct
agreement misrepresenting the nature thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Violations of this chapter constitute
unprofessional conduct enforceable under RCW 18.130.180.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Direct practices must submit annual
statements to the office of insurance commissioner specifying the
number of providers in each practice, total number of patients being
served, providers' names, and the business address for each direct
practice. The form for the annual statement will be developed in a
manner prescribed by the commissioner.
(2) A health care provider may not act as, or hold himself or
herself out to be, a direct practice in this state, nor may a direct
agreement be entered into with a direct patient in this state, unless
the provider submits the annual statement in subsection (1) of this
section to the commissioner.
(3) The commissioner shall report annually to the legislature on
direct practices. The initial report shall be due December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A comprehensive disclosure statement shall
be distributed to all direct patients with their enrollment forms.
Such disclosure must inform the direct patients of their financial
rights and responsibilities to the direct practice as provided for in
this chapter, encourage that direct patients obtain and maintain
insurance for services not provided by the direct practice, and state
that the direct practice will not bill a carrier for services covered
under the direct agreement. The disclosure statement shall include
contact information for the office of the insurance commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 3 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

--- END ---