BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The transitional housing operating and rent program is created
in the department to assist homeless individuals and families secure
and retain safe, decent, and affordable housing. The department shall
provide grants to eligible organizations, as described in RCW
43.185.060, to provide assistance to program participants. The
eligible organizations must use grant moneys for:
(a) Rental assistance, which includes security or utility deposits,
first and last month's rent assistance, and eligible moving expenses to
be determined by the department;
(b) Case management services designed to assist program
participants to secure and retain immediate housing and to transition
into permanent housing and greater levels of self-sufficiency;
(c) Operating expenses of transitional housing facilities that
serve homeless families with children; and
(d) Administrative costs of the eligible organization, which must
not exceed limits prescribed by the department.
(2) Eligible to receive assistance through the transitional housing
operating and rent program are:
(a) Families with children who are homeless or who are at risk of
becoming homeless and who have household incomes at or below fifty
percent of the median household income for their county;
(b) Individuals or families without children who are homeless or at
risk of becoming homeless and who have household incomes at or below
thirty percent of the median household income for their county;
(c) Individuals or families who are homeless or who are at risk of
becoming homeless and who have a household with an adult member who has
a mental health or chemical dependency disorder; and
(d) Individuals or families who are homeless or who are at risk of
becoming homeless and who have a household with an adult member who is
an offender released from confinement within the past eighteen months.
(3) All program participants must be willing to create and actively
participate in a housing stability plan for achieving permanent housing
and greater levels of self-sufficiency.
(4) Data on all program participants must be entered into and
tracked through the Washington homeless client management information
system as described in RCW 43.185C.180.
(5) The department encourages eligible organizations funded through
the program to have a quality management system and to submit an
application to the Washington state quality award program to evaluate
that system.
(6) The department may develop rules, requirements, procedures, and
guidelines as necessary to implement and operate the transitional
housing operating and rent program.
(7) The department shall produce an annual transitional housing
operating and rent program report that must be included in the
department's homeless housing strategic plan as described in
43.185C.040. The report must include performance measures to be
determined by the department that address, at a minimum, the following
issue areas:
(a) The success of the program in helping program participants
transition into permanent housing and increase their levels of self-sufficiency;
(b) The financial performance of the program related to efficient
program administration by the department and program operation by
selected eligible organizations, including an analysis of the costs per
program participant served;
(c) The quality, completeness, and timeliness of the information on
program participants provided to the Washington homeless client
management information system database; and
(d) The satisfaction of program participants in the assistance
provided through the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
The transitional housing operating and rent account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from sources directed
to the transitional housing operating and rent program must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
solely for the purpose of the transitional housing operating and rent
program as described in section 1 of this act. Only the director of
the department or the director's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 59.18.600 (Rental to offenders--Limitation on liability) and 2007 c 483 s 602 are each repealed.

--- END ---