BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A landlord may not charge a fee for late payment of the
tenant's portion of the rent in excess of ten percent of the tenant's
rent or fifty dollars, whichever is greater.
(2) A landlord may not charge a late payment fee more than once per
month or within the first five days after rent is due.
(3) A rental agreement may not impose any interest, penalty, or
fee, associated with the failure to pay rent, except as authorized by
this section.
(4) Any fee imposed in excess of the amounts allowed by this
section is void and unenforceable.
(5) A landlord may not evict a tenant for failure to pay a late
payment fee, but may deduct the late payment fee amount from the
tenant's security deposit.

--- END ---