BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever a person's bail exceeds four hundred dollars and the
bail is entered into forfeiture status, the clerk of the court shall,
within thirty days of the forfeiture, mail notice of the forfeiture to
the surety. The clerk of the court shall also mail a copy of the
forfeiture notice to the bail bond agent whose name appears on the
bond. The clerk of the court shall execute a certificate of mailing of
each forfeiture notice and shall place the certificate in the court's
file.
(2) If the bond displays the mailing address of the person or
persons to receive notice of forfeiture, then the notice shall be
mailed to the address or addresses displayed. A mailing to only one of
the persons listed on the bond shall not constitute compliance with
this section.
(3) The surety shall be released of all obligations if any of the
following conditions apply:
(a) The clerk of the court fails to mail the required notices of
forfeiture within thirty days after forfeiture;
(b) The clerk of the court fails to mail notice of forfeiture to
the surety at the address shown on the bond; or
(c) The clerk of the court fails to mail notice of forfeiture to
the surety's agent at the address listed on the bond.

--- END ---