BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that more than one
thousand years ago, Leif Erikson and his crew journeyed across the
Atlantic seeking unknown lands. Their pioneering spirit of courage,
determination, and discovery helped to open the world to new
exploration and unprecedented development. Each October, we join our
friends in Iceland, Norway, Denmark, Sweden, and Finland in honoring
this historic voyage and in celebrating the strong bonds that exist
between those countries and Washington state.

Sec. 2 RCW 1.16.050 and 2003 c 68 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
The following are legal holidays: Sunday; the first day of
January, commonly called New Year's Day; the third Monday of January,
being celebrated as the anniversary of the birth of Martin Luther King,
Jr.; the third Monday of February to be known as Presidents' Day and to
be celebrated as the anniversary of the births of Abraham Lincoln and
George Washington; the last Monday of May, commonly known as Memorial
Day; the fourth day of July, being the anniversary of the Declaration
of Independence; the first Monday in September, to be known as Labor
Day; the eleventh day of November, to be known as Veterans' Day; the
fourth Thursday in November, to be known as Thanksgiving Day; the day
immediately following Thanksgiving Day; and the twenty-fifth day of
December, commonly called Christmas Day.
Employees of the state and its political subdivisions, except
employees of school districts and except those nonclassified employees
of institutions of higher education who hold appointments or are
employed under contracts to perform services for periods of less than
twelve consecutive months, shall be entitled to one paid holiday per
calendar year in addition to those specified in this section. Each
employee of the state or its political subdivisions may select the day
on which the employee desires to take the additional holiday provided
for herein after consultation with the employer pursuant to guidelines
to be promulgated by rule of the appropriate personnel authority, or in
the case of local government by ordinance or resolution of the
legislative authority.
If any of the above specified state legal holidays are also federal
legal holidays but observed on different dates, only the state legal
holidays shall be recognized as a paid legal holiday for employees of
the state and its political subdivisions except that for port districts
and the law enforcement and public transit employees of municipal
corporations, either the federal or the state legal holiday, but in no
case both, may be recognized as a paid legal holiday for employees.
Whenever any legal holiday, other than Sunday, falls upon a Sunday,
the following Monday shall be the legal holiday.
Whenever any legal holiday falls upon a Saturday, the preceding
Friday shall be the legal holiday.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to have the effect of
adding or deleting the number of paid holidays provided for in an
agreement between employees and employers of political subdivisions of
the state or as established by ordinance or resolution of the local
government legislative authority.
The legislature declares that the twelfth day of October shall be
recognized as Columbus Day but shall not be considered a legal holiday
for any purposes.
The legislature declares that the ninth day of April shall be
recognized as former prisoner of war recognition day but shall not be
considered a legal holiday for any purposes.
The legislature declares that the twenty-sixth day of January shall
be recognized as Washington army and air national guard day but shall
not be considered a legal holiday for any purposes.
The legislature declares that the seventh day of August shall be
recognized as purple heart recipient recognition day but shall not be
considered a legal holiday for any purposes.
The legislature declares that the second Sunday in October be
recognized as Washington state children's day but shall not be
considered a legal holiday for any purposes.
The legislature declares that the sixteenth day of April shall be
recognized as Mother Joseph day and the fourth day of September as
Marcus Whitman day, but neither shall be considered legal holidays for
any purpose.
The legislature declares that the seventh day of December be
recognized as Pearl Harbor remembrance day but shall not be considered
a legal holiday for any purpose.
The legislature declares that the nineteenth day of February be
recognized as civil liberties day of remembrance but shall not be
considered a legal holiday for any purpose.
The legislature declares that the ninth day of October be
recognized as Lief Erikson day but shall not be considered a legal
holiday for any purpose.

--- END ---