BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.320 and 1993 c 492 s 411 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created in the state treasury an account to be known
as the health professions account. All fees received by the department
for health professions licenses, registration, certifications,
renewals, or examinations and the civil penalties assessed and
collected by the department under RCW 18.130.190 shall be forwarded to
the state treasurer who shall credit such moneys to the health
professions account.
(2) All expenses incurred in carrying out the health professions
licensing activities of the department shall be paid from the account
as authorized by legislative appropriation, except as provided in
subsection (4) of this section. Any residue in the account shall be
accumulated and shall not revert to the general fund at the end of the
biennium.
(3) The secretary shall biennially prepare a budget request based
on the anticipated costs of administering the health professions
licensing activities of the department which shall include the
estimated income from health professions fees.
(4) The secretary may spend unappropriated funds in the health
professions account to meet unanticipated costs when revenues exceed
more than fifteen percent over the department's estimated six-year
spending projections. Unanticipated costs shall be limited to spending
as authorized in subsection (3) of this section for anticipated costs.

--- END ---