BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.455 and 2005 c 277 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By September 30, 2004, the financial literacy public-private
partnership shall adopt a definition of financial literacy to be used
in educational efforts.
(2) By June 30, ((2006)) 2009, the financial literacy public-private partnership shall identify strategies to increase the financial
literacy of public school students in our state. To the extent funds
are available, strategies to be considered by the partnership shall
include, but not be limited to:
(a) Identifying and making available to school districts:
(i) Important financial literacy skills and knowledge;
(ii) Ways in which teachers at different grade levels may integrate
financial literacy in mathematics, social studies, and other course
content areas;
(iii) Instructional materials and programs, including schoolwide
programs, that include the important financial literacy skills and
knowledge;
(iv) Assessments and other outcome measures that schools and
communities may use to determine whether students are financially
literate; ((and))
(v) A template and resource materials to aid districts in guiding
student cumulating projects with a focus on personal finance; and
(vi) Other strategies for expanding and increasing the quality of
financial literacy instruction in public schools, including
professional development for teachers;
(b) Developing a structure and set of operating principles for the
financial literacy public-private partnership to assist interested
school districts in improving the financial literacy of their students
by providing such things as financial literacy instructional materials
and professional development; ((and))
(c) Developing essential academic learning requirements for
personal finance;
(d) Preparing recommendations for the inclusion of financial
literacy principles in the Washington assessment of student learning;
and
(e) Providing a report to the governor, the house and senate
financial institutions and education committees of the legislature, the
superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and
education stakeholder groups, on the results of work of the financial
literacy public-private partnership. ((A final)) An interim report
shall be submitted to the same parties by June 30, 2007, with a final
report by June 30, 2010.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.300.460 and 2004 c 247 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The task of the financial literacy public-private partnership is to
seek out and determine the best methods of equipping students with the
knowledge and skills they need, before they become self-supporting, in
order for them to make critical decisions regarding their personal
finances. The components of personal financial literacy examined shall
include, at a minimum, consumer financial education, personal finance,
and personal credit. The partnership shall identify the types of
outcome measures expected from participating districts and students, in
accordance with the definitions and outcomes developed under RCW
28A.300.455.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) To the extent funds are appropriated or are available for this
purpose, the superintendent of public instruction and other members of
the partnership created in RCW 28A.300.455 shall make available to
school districts the list of identified financial literacy skills and
knowledge, instructional materials, assessments, and other relevant
information.
(2) Each school district is encouraged to provide its students with
an opportunity to master the financial literacy skills and knowledge
developed under RCW 28A.300.460.
(3) For the purposes of RCW 28A.300.455, 28A.300.460, and this
section, it is not necessary to evaluate and apply the office of the
superintendent of public instruction essential academic learning
requirements or to develop grade level expectations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the Washington financial
literacy public-private partnership account for the purposes of RCW
28A.300.465.
(2) The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009,
from the general fund to the Washington financial literacy public-private partnership account for the purposes of RCW 28A.300.465.
(3) The amounts in this section are provided solely for the
purposes of RCW 28A.300.465. The superintendent of public instruction
or the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditure of the
amounts provided in this section as equal matching amounts from
nonstate sources are received in the Washington financial literacy
public-private partnership account.

--- END ---