BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that sustained
global climatic changes will have an effect on the health and
productivity of the forests in Washington. In just one instance,
recent observations of high summer temperatures coupled with low
moisture in eastern Washington, both outside of the one hundred year
historic range of variability, are contributing to an alarming increase
in mountain pine beatle infestations. The increase in pest
infestations leads to an increase in tree mortality and severe fires.
(2) The legislature further finds that minimizing the impacts of
global climate change, and restoring the health and resiliency of
eastern Washington's forests, will require an accelerated approach to
research coupled with an aggressive outreach and training program to
motivate an appropriate response on the ground. Better data can be
used to mobilize ground responses with enhanced site-specific
treatments.
(3) The legislature further finds that investments made today, both
in research, training, and on-the-ground treatments, will prove more
cost-effective, conserve more resources, and save more firefighting
costs than the option of doing nothing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The college of forest resources at the
University of Washington shall:
(1) Determine how treatments may be customized to site-specific
conditions and to identify the most cost-effective treatments for
reducing the risk of climate change and restoring forest health.
(2) Implement a program of technology transfer through a series of
outreach activities, including trainer training, community group
outreach, and the production of streaming video and other instructional
materials concerning the risks of not responding to changing climatic
conditions and the benefits of various treatment options.
(3) Develop methods by which state and federal agencies, private
and community groups, and Indian tribes may directly assess the costs
associated with different management options, including the cost of no
action and how future costs can be avoided.
(4) Analyze the institutional cost accounting methods to
demonstrate where savings are accumulated and where investments are
most needed to restore forest health, and provide recommended
alternatives that can improve the responsiveness of treatments, biomass
collection, and infrastructure development investments aimed at
reducing health risks as applied differently to federal, state, and
private ownerships.
(5) Support other programs that assess the feasibility of
converting large amounts of underutilized biomass into useful products
and green energy by providing required analyses needed to efficiently
collect and deliver biomass to green energy end users.
(6) Conduct a pilot project on a high hazard area of forest land
that collects and analyzes remote sensing data, using tools such as
light detection and ranging data, in order to rapidly track forest
health changes and provide information for planning ground treatments
and the design of a comprehensive health tracking and treatment
planning system for state monitoring.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 In carrying out section 2 of this act, the
college of forest resources at the University of Washington must work
cooperatively and share information and findings with the department of
natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The sum of five hundred thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the
University of Washington for the purposes of this act.
(2) The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2009, from the general fund to the University of Washington for the
purposes of this act.

--- END ---