BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The civic education travel grant program is created to provide
travel grants to students participating in statewide, regional,
national, or international civic education competitions or events.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grants
under the program established in this section from private donations or
with amounts appropriated for this specific purpose. The grants shall
be awarded on a competitive basis.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction may contract with
independent review panelists and establish an advisory panel to
evaluate and make recommendations to the superintendent of public
instruction based on grant applications.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall select grant
recipients from student applicants that meet all of the following
criteria:
(a) Students must be residents of the state of Washington;
(b) Students must use the grants to fund travel to civic education-based competitions or events;
(c) Students must be participants in the civic education
competition or event; and
(d) Students must be under the age of twenty-one and not yet have
received their high school diploma.
(5) Students are encouraged to seek matching funds, in-kind
contributions, or other sources of support to supplement their travel
expenses.
(6) Applicants must include in the grant application the following:
(a) A brief description of the civic education competition or
event;
(b) A brief description of what the applicant expects to learn from
the competition or event;
(c) The total travel costs and how much the applicant is requesting
from the program; and
(d) The total amount of matching funds the applicant has already
secured or expects to secure.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt other
criteria as appropriate for the review of grant proposals. In
reviewing student applications for funding, scoring shall be based on
an evaluation of all application materials that may be requested of
applicants. The superintendent of public instruction shall consider
the overall breadth and variety of the field of applicants to determine
the projects that would best fulfill the program's goal. Final grant
awards may be for the full amount of the grant requests or for a
portion of the grant request.
(8) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
accept gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources for
the program and may spend any gifts, grants, or endowments or income
from public or private sources according to their terms.

--- END ---