BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.39 RCW
to read as follows:
In determining the maximum amount of resources a person can have to
meet the resource eligibility requirements for community options
program entry system benefits or services, the department may not
include amounts paid by the person, or the person's spouse, for federal
income taxes.

--- END ---