BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that one in five of
Washington's one and one-half million children are children of color.
Broken out by racial groups, approximately six percent of children are
Asian/Pacific Islander, six percent are multiracial, four and one-half
percent are African American, and two percent are Native American.
Thirteen percent of Washington children are of Hispanic origin, but
representation of this group increases in the lower age ranges. For
example, seventeen percent of children birth to four years of age are
Hispanic.
The legislature also finds that in counties such as Adams,
Franklin, Yakima, and Grant, more than half of the births are of
Hispanic origin. Three-quarters of the state's African American
children and two-thirds of Asian/Pacific Islander children live in King
and Pierce counties. The legislature finds further that despite some
progress closing the achievement gap in recent years, children of color
continue to lag behind their classmates on the Washington assessment of
student learning. In 2005 children of color trailed in every category
of the fourth-grade reading, writing, and math assessments. On the
reading test alone, sixty-nine percent of African American students,
sixty-four percent of native American students, and sixty-one percent
of Hispanic students met the standards, compared with eighty-five
percent of caucasian students. And, since 1993, the number of
Washington students for which English is not their first language has
doubled to more than seven percent of students statewide.
The legislature finds further that according to national research,
African American children enter the child welfare system at far higher
rates than caucasian children, despite no greater incidence of
maltreatment in African American families compared to caucasian
families. This trend holds true for Washington state, where African
American children represent approximately nine and one-half percent of
the children in out-of-home care even though they represent slightly
more than four percent of the state's total child population. Native
American children represent slightly over ten percent of the children
in out-of-home care although they represent only two percent of the
children in the state. In King county, African American and Native
American children are over represented at nearly every decision point
in the child welfare system. Although these two groups of children
represent only eight percent of the child population in King county,
they account for one-third of all children removed from their homes and
one-half of children in foster care for more than four years.
The legislature finds also that children of immigrants are the
fastest growing component of the United States' child population.
While immigrants are eleven percent of the nation's total population,
the children of immigrants make up twenty-two percent of the nation's
children under six years of age. These immigrant children are twice as
likely as native-born children to be poor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The secretary of the department of
social and health services shall convene an advisory committee to
analyze and make recommendations on the disproportionate representation
of children of color in the child welfare and juvenile justice systems
of Washington. The department shall collaborate with the Washington
institute for public policy and private sector entities to develop a
methodology for the advisory committee to follow in conducting a
baseline analysis of data from the child welfare and juvenile justice
systems to determine whether racial disproportionality and racial
disparity exist in these systems. The Washington institute of public
policy shall serve as technical staff for purposes of the analysis. In
determining whether racial disproportionality or racial disparity
exists, the committee shall utilize existing research and evaluations
conducted within Washington state, nationally, and in other states and
localities that have similarly analyzed the prevalence of racial
disproportionality and disparity in child welfare and juvenile justice
systems.
(2) At a minimum, the advisory committee shall examine and analyze:
(a) The level of involvement of children of color at each stage in the
state's child welfare and juvenile justice systems, including the
points of entry and exit, and each point at which a treatment decision
is made; (b) the number of children of color in low-income or single-parent families involved in the state's child welfare and juvenile
justice systems; (c) the family structures of families involved in the
state's child welfare and juvenile justice systems; and (d) the
outcomes for children in the existing systems. This analysis shall be
disaggregated by racial and ethnic group, and by geographic region.
(3) The committee shall be selected as follows: (a) One member
from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the
president of the senate; (b) one member from each of the two largest
caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives; (c) a judicial officer, appointed by the
board for judicial administration; and (d) several members appointed by
the governor including at a minimum: (i) A representative who is an
expert in social work, law, child welfare, psychology, or related
fields; (ii) at least two tribal representatives; (iii) a
representative of a community-based organization involved with child
welfare or juvenile justice issues; (iv) a representative of the
department of social and health services; (v) a current or former
foster care youth; (vi) a representative of the governor's juvenile
justice advisory committee; (vii) a current or former foster care
parent; and (viii) a parent previously involved with Washington's child
welfare or juvenile justice system. After the advisory committee
appointments are finalized, the committee shall select two individuals
to serve as cochairs of the committee.
(4) The secretary shall make reasonable efforts to seek public and
private funding for the advisory committee.
(5) Not later than September 1, 2007, the advisory committee
created in subsection (1) of this section shall report to the secretary
of the department of social and health services on the results of the
analysis. If the results of the analysis indicate disproportionality
or disparity exists for any racial or ethnic group in any region of the
state, the committee, in conjunction with the secretary of the
department of social and health services, shall develop a plan for
remedying the disproportionality or disparity. The remediation plan
shall include: (a) Recommendations for administrative and legislative
actions related to appropriate programs and services to reduce and
eliminate disparities in the systems and improve the long-term outcomes
for children of color who are served by the systems; (b) a
recommendation for ongoing evaluation of current and prospective
policies and procedures for their contribution to or effect on racial
disproportionality or disparity; (c) an analysis of the impact that
family structure has on disproportionate or disparate representation in
the systems; and (d) performance measures for implementing the
remediation plan. To the extent possible and appropriate, the
remediation plan shall be developed to integrate the recommendations
required in this subsection with the department's existing compliance
plans, training efforts, and other practice improvement and reform
initiatives in progress.
(6) Not later than January 1, 2008, the secretary shall report the
results of the analysis conducted under subsection (2) of this section
and shall describe the remediation plan required under subsection (5)
of this section to the appropriate committees of the legislature with
jurisdiction over policy and fiscal matters relating to children,
families, and human services. Beginning January 1, 2009, the secretary
shall report annually to the appropriate committees of the legislature
on the implementation of the remediation plan, including any measurable
progress made in reducing and eliminating racial disproportionality and
disparity in the state's child welfare and juvenile justice systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires June 30, 2013.

--- END ---