BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 78.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may issue a notice of correction to the
following: (a) Any permit holder, miner, or other person who
authorizes, directs, violates, or who directly benefits by contracting
with or employing another to violate this chapter, the rules adopted by
the department, a reclamation permit, or a reclamation plan; or (b) a
permit holder whose surface mine is out of compliance with the
provisions of this chapter, the rules adopted by the department, or the
permit holder's current or valid reclamation permit or reclamation
plan. The department's authority to issue or its issuance of a notice
of correction does not limit the department's authority to pursue
enforcement actions, except as stated in other laws.
(2) The notice of correction must describe the items that need
correction and must provide a reasonable time for the recipient to make
corrections. The notice of correction must identify when, where, and
to whom a request to extend the time to achieve compliance may be
filed. The department may grant an extension when there is good cause
for the request. This notice of correction is not an enforcement
action and is not subject to administrative or judicial appeal.

Sec. 2 RCW 78.44.190 and 1993 c 518 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may issue an order to rectify deficiencies
((when a miner or permit holder is conducting surface mining in any
manner not authorized by:
(1) This chapter;
(2) The rules adopted by the department;
(3) The authorized reclamation plan; or
(4) The reclamation permit)) to the following: (a) Any permit
holder, miner, or other person who authorizes, directs, violates, or
who directly benefits by contracting with or employing another to
violate this chapter, the rules adopted by the department, a
reclamation permit, or a reclamation plan; or (b) a permit holder whose
surface mine is out of compliance with the provisions of this chapter,
the rules adopted by the department, or the permit holder's current and
valid reclamation permit or reclamation plan.
(2) The order shall describe the deficiencies and shall ((require
that the miner or permit holder correct all deficiencies no later than
sixty days from issuance of the order. The department may extend the
period for correction for delays clearly beyond the miner or permit
holder's control, but only when the miner or permit holder is, in the
opinion of the department, making every reasonable effort to comply))
initially require the order recipient to correct all deficiencies by a
date that is no later than sixty days after the department's issuance
of the order. The department may extend the period to correct
deficiencies for delays clearly beyond the order recipient's control,
but only when the person is, in the opinion of the department, making
every reasonable effort to comply. This order becomes final and
effective after being upheld upon completion of all administrative and
judicial review proceedings or following notice and a failure to timely
request a hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 78.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may issue an order to stop all surface mining to
any permit holder, miner, or other person who authorizes, directs, or
conducts such activities without a valid surface mine reclamation
permit. This order is effective upon issuance unless otherwise stated
in the order. Administrative appeal of the order to stop work does not
stay the stop work requirement. The department shall notify the local
jurisdiction of record when a stop work order has been issued for
operating without a valid reclamation permit.
(2) The department may issue an order to stop surface mining
occurring outside of any permit area to a permit holder that does not
have a legal right to occupy the affected area. This order is
effective upon issuance unless otherwise stated in the order. An
administrative appeal of the order to stop work does not stay the stop
work requirement.
(3) Where a permit holder is conducting surface mining activities
outside of its permit boundary, but within land that it has the right
to occupy, the department may issue an order to stop surface mining or
mining-related activities occurring outside of the authorized area
after the permit holder fails to comply with a notice of correction.
The notice of correction must specify the corrections necessary as per
the violation and provide a reasonable time to do so. This order is
effective upon issuance unless otherwise stated in the order. An
administrative appeal of the order to stop work does not stay the stop
work requirement.
(4) Stop work orders must be in writing, delivered by United States
certified mail with return receipt requested, facsimile, or by hand to
the permit holder of record. The order must state the facts supporting
the violation, the law being violated, and the specific activities
being stopped. Stop work orders must be signed by the state geologist
or an assistant state geologist. The department shall proceed as
quickly as feasible to complete any requested adjudicative proceedings
unless the parties stipulate to an appeal timeline or the department's
stop work order states that it is not effective until after the
administrative review process. If the recipient appeals the order, the
recipient may file a motion for stay with the presiding officer, which
will be reviewed under preliminary injunction standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 78.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the department's other authority to cancel a
reclamation permit, a permit holder may seek cancellation of its
reclamation permit in favor of a local development or construction
permit. A permit holder may request cancellation of its reclamation
permit and release of its performance security when:
(a) The permit holder has received an approved development or
construction permit covering all of the existing permit area from a
local jurisdiction;
(b) The local jurisdiction and the landowner agree with the permit
holder's request to cancel the reclamation permit and to release the
performance security; and
(c) The local jurisdiction provides assurance in writing that the
construction or development permit is being actively implemented by the
permit holder.
(2) The department is not responsible for overseeing a site's
development or reclamation when a reclamation permit is cancelled under
this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 78.44.210 and 1993 c 518 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Upon the failure of a miner or permit holder to comply with a
department order to rectify deficiencies, the department may issue an
order to suspend surface mining when a miner or permit holder is
conducting surface mining in any manner not authorized by:
(1) This chapter;
(2) The rules adopted by the department;
(3) The approved reclamation plan;
(4) The reclamation permit; or
(5) If the miner or permit holder fails to comply with any final
order of the department.
The order to suspend surface mining shall require the miner or
permit holder to suspend part or all of the miner's or permit holder's
mining operations until the conditions resulting in the issuance of the
order have been mitigated to the satisfaction of the department.
The attorney general may take the necessary legal action to enjoin,
or otherwise cause to be stopped, surface mining in violation of an
order to suspend surface mining.)) The department, through the state
geologist or assistant state geologist, may suspend a reclamation
permit whenever a permit holder or surface mine is out of compliance
with a final department order. The suspension order must be served on
the permit holder by certified mail with return receipt requested or by
personal service. The order must specify the final order alleged to be
violated, the facts upon which the conclusion of violation is based,
and the conclusions of law. This order becomes final and effective
after being upheld upon completion of all administrative review
proceedings or following notice and a failure to timely request a
hearing. No surface mining or reclamation may occur while a permit is
suspended unless under the express written authority of the department.

--- END ---