BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.40.165 and 2004 c 120 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of this disposition alternative is to ensure that
successful treatment options to reduce recidivism are available to
eligible youth, pursuant to RCW 70.96A.520. The court must consider
eligibility for the chemical dependency disposition alternative when a
juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local
sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A-or B+ offense, other than a first time B+ offense under chapter 69.50
RCW. The court, on its own motion or the motion of the state or the
respondent if the evidence shows that the offender may be chemically
dependent or substance abusing, may order an examination by a chemical
dependency counselor from a chemical dependency treatment facility
approved under chapter 70.96A RCW to determine if the youth is
chemically dependent or substance abusing. The offender shall pay the
cost of any examination ordered under this subsection unless the court
finds that the offender is indigent and no third party insurance
coverage is available, in which case the state shall pay the cost.
(2) The report of the examination shall include at a minimum the
following: The respondent's version of the facts and the official
version of the facts, the respondent's offense history, an assessment
of drug-alcohol problems and previous treatment attempts, the
respondent's social, educational, and employment situation, and other
evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of
the examiner's information.
(3) The examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's
relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall be
provided and shall include, at a minimum:
(a) Whether inpatient and/or outpatient treatment is recommended;
(b) Availability of appropriate treatment;
(c) Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living
conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members,
legal guardians, or others;
(d) Anticipated length of treatment; and
(e) Recommended crime-related prohibitions.
(4) The court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the
state or the respondent shall order, a second examination. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The
requesting party shall pay the cost of any examination ordered under
this subsection unless the requesting party is the offender and the
court finds that the offender is indigent and no third party insurance
coverage is available, in which case the state shall pay the cost.
(5)(a) After receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall
then consider whether the offender and the community will benefit from
use of this chemical dependency disposition alternative and consider
the victim's opinion whether the offender should receive a treatment
disposition under this section.
(b) If the court determines that this chemical dependency
disposition alternative is appropriate, then the court shall impose the
standard range for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters
reasons for its conclusion, that such disposition would effectuate a
manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition above the
standard range as indicated in option D of RCW 13.40.0357 if the
disposition is an increase from the standard range and the confinement
of the offender does not exceed a maximum of fifty-two weeks, suspend
execution of the disposition, and place the offender on community
supervision for up to one year. As a condition of the suspended
disposition, the court shall require the offender to undergo available
outpatient drug/alcohol treatment and/or inpatient drug/alcohol
treatment. For purposes of this section, inpatient treatment may not
exceed ((ninety)) one hundred twenty days. As a condition of the
suspended disposition, the court may impose conditions of community
supervision and other sanctions, including up to thirty days of
confinement, one hundred fifty hours of community restitution, and
payment of legal financial obligations and restitution.
(6) The drug/alcohol treatment provider shall submit monthly
reports on the respondent's progress in treatment to the court and the
parties. The reports shall reference the treatment plan and include at
a minimum the following: Dates of attendance, respondent's compliance
with requirements, treatment activities, the respondent's relative
progress in treatment, and any other material specified by the court at
the time of the disposition.
At the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review
hearings as the court considers appropriate.
If the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the
court finds that the respondent is failing to make satisfactory
progress in treatment, the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW
13.40.200 or revoke the suspension and order execution of the
disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement time
previously served if that confinement was for the offense for which the
suspension is being revoked.
(7) For purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has
sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to
person or property as a direct result of the offense charged. "Victim"
may also include a known parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor
child or is not a minor child but is incapacitated, incompetent,
disabled, or deceased.
(8) Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for time
spent in detention prior to a dispositional order, the dispositional
order shall specifically state the number of days of credit for time
served.
(9) In no case shall the term of confinement imposed by the court
at disposition exceed that to which an adult could be subjected for the
same offense.
(10) A disposition under this section is not appealable under RCW
13.40.230.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
With the exception of youth committed to the department of social
and health services, juvenile rehabilitation administration, when an
adjudicated offender is ordered to be confined in a local detention
facility pursuant to a disposition or modification order, the court may
grant credit toward the local sanction for time served or to be served
in a voluntary substance abuse or mental health inpatient treatment
facility, even though such facility is not a "detention facility" as
defined by RCW 13.40.020.

--- END ---