BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.220 and 1993 c 371 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Satisfaction of the basic education program requirements
identified in RCW 28A.150.210 shall be considered to be implemented by
the following program:
(a) Each school district shall make available to students enrolled
in kindergarten at least a total instructional offering of ((four))
five hundred ((fifty)) hours. The program shall include instruction in
the essential academic learning requirements ((under RCW 28A.630.885))
and such other subjects and such activities as the school district
shall determine to be appropriate for the education of the school
district's students enrolled in such program;
(b) Each school district shall make available to students enrolled
in grades one through twelve, at least a district-wide annual average
total instructional hour offering of one thousand one hundred ten
hours. The state board of education may define alternatives to
classroom instructional time for students in grades nine through twelve
enrolled in alternative learning experiences. The state board of
education shall establish rules to determine annual average
instructional hours for districts including fewer than twelve grades.
The program shall include the essential academic learning requirements
((under RCW 28A.630.885)) and such other subjects and such activities
as the school district shall determine to be appropriate for the
education of the school district's students enrolled in such group;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages.
(2) Nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to require individual students to attend school for any
particular number of hours per day or to take any particular courses.
(3) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic
educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five
years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one
years of age and shall consist of a minimum of ((one)) two hundred
((eighty)) school days per school year in such grades as are conducted
by a school district, and ((one)) two hundred ((eighty)) half-days of
instruction, or equivalent, in kindergarten: PROVIDED, That effective
May 1, 1979, a school district may schedule the last five school days
of the ((one)) two hundred ((and eighty)) day school year for
noninstructional purposes in the case of students who are graduating
from high school((,)) including, but not limited to, the observance of
graduation and early release from school upon the request of a student,
and all such students may be claimed as a full-time equivalent student
to the extent they could otherwise have been so claimed for the
purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260.
(4) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.250 and 1990 c 33 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
From those funds made available by the legislature for the current
use of the common schools, the superintendent of public instruction
shall distribute annually as provided in RCW 28A.510.250 to each school
district of the state operating a program approved by the state board
of education an amount which, when combined with an appropriate portion
of such locally available revenues, other than receipts from federal
forest revenues distributed to school districts pursuant to RCW
28A.520.010 and 28A.520.020, as the superintendent of public
instruction may deem appropriate for consideration in computing state
equalization support, excluding excess property tax levies, will
constitute a basic education allocation in dollars for each annual
average full-time equivalent student enrolled, based upon one full
school year of ((one)) two hundred ((eighty)) days, except that for
kindergartens one full school year shall be ((one)) two hundred
((eighty)) half days of instruction, or the equivalent as provided in
RCW 28A.150.220.
Basic education shall be considered to be fully funded by those
amounts of dollars appropriated by the legislature pursuant to RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 to fund those program requirements
identified in RCW 28A.150.220 in accordance with the formula and ratios
provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and those amounts of dollars appropriated
by the legislature to fund the salary requirements of RCW 28A.150.100
and 28A.150.410.
Operation of a program approved by the state board of education,
for the purposes of this section, shall include a finding that the
ratio of students per classroom teacher in grades kindergarten through
three is not greater than the ratio of students per classroom teacher
in grades four and above for such district: PROVIDED, That for the
purposes of this section, "classroom teacher" shall be defined as an
instructional employee possessing at least a provisional certificate,
but not necessarily employed as a certificated employee, whose primary
duty is the daily educational instruction of students: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the state board of education shall adopt rules ((and
regulations)) to ((insure)) ensure compliance with the student/teacher
ratio provisions of this section, and such rules ((and regulations))
shall allow for exemptions for those special programs and/or school
districts which may be deemed unable to practicably meet the
student/teacher ratio requirements of this section by virtue of a small
number of students.
If a school district's basic education program fails to meet the
basic education requirements enumerated in RCW 28A.150.250,
28A.150.260, and 28A.150.220, the state board of education shall
require the superintendent of public instruction to withhold state
funds in whole or in part for the basic education allocation until
program compliance is assured: PROVIDED, That the state board of
education may waive this requirement in the event of substantial lack
of classroom space.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.290 and 1992 c 141 s 504 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall have the power
and duty to make such rules ((and regulations)) as are necessary for
the proper administration of this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through
((28A.160.220)) 28A.160.210, 28A.300.035, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010
not inconsistent with the provisions thereof, and in addition to
require such reports as may be necessary to carry out his or her duties
under this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through ((28A.160.220))
28A.160.210, 28a.300.035, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall have the
authority to make rules ((and regulations which)) that establish the
terms and conditions for allowing school districts to receive state
basic education moneys as provided in RCW 28A.150.250 when said
districts are unable to fulfill for one or more schools as officially
scheduled the requirement of a full school year of ((one)) two hundred
((eighty)) days or the annual average total instructional hour offering
imposed by RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.260 due to one or more of the
following conditions:
(a) An unforeseen natural event, including, but not necessarily
limited to, a fire, flood, explosion, storm, earthquake, epidemic, or
volcanic eruption that has the direct or indirect effect of rendering
one or more school district facilities unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible,
or inoperable; and
(b) An unforeseen mechanical failure or an unforeseen action or
inaction by one or more persons, including negligence and threats, that
(i) is beyond the control of both a school district board of directors
and its employees and (ii) has the direct or indirect effect of
rendering one or more school district facilities unsafe, unhealthy,
inaccessible, or inoperable. Such actions, inactions or mechanical
failures may include, but are not necessarily limited to, arson,
vandalism, riots, insurrections, bomb threats, bombings, delays in the
scheduled completion of construction projects, and the discontinuance
or disruption of utilities such as heating, lighting and water:
PROVIDED, That an unforeseen action or inaction shall not include any
labor dispute between a school district board of directors and any
employee of the school district.
A condition is foreseeable for the purposes of this subsection to
the extent a reasonably prudent person would have anticipated prior to
August first of the preceding school year that the condition probably
would occur during the ensuing school year because of the occurrence of
an event or a circumstance which existed during such preceding school
year or a prior school year. A board of directors of a school district
is deemed for the purposes of this subsection to have knowledge of
events and circumstances which are a matter of common knowledge within
the school district and of those events and circumstances which can be
discovered upon prudent inquiry or inspection.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall make every
effort to reduce the amount of paperwork required in administration of
this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through ((28A.160.220)) 28A.160.210,
28A.300.035, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010; to simplify the application,
monitoring and evaluation processes used; to eliminate all duplicative
requests for information from local school districts; and to make every
effort to integrate and standardize information requests for other
state education acts and federal aid to education acts administered by
the superintendent of public instruction so as to reduce paperwork
requirements and duplicative information requests.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.195.010 and 2004 c 19 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature hereby recognizes that private schools should be
subject only to those minimum state controls necessary to ((insure))
ensure the health and safety of all the students in the state and to
((insure)) ensure a sufficient basic education to meet usual graduation
requirements. The state, any agency or official thereof, shall not
restrict or dictate any specific educational or other programs for
private schools except as hereinafter in this section provided.
Principals of private schools or superintendents of private school
districts shall file each year with the state superintendent of public
instruction a statement certifying that the minimum requirements
hereinafter set forth are being met, noting any deviations. After
review of the statement, the state superintendent will notify schools
or school districts of those deviations which must be corrected. In
case of major deviations, the school or school district may request and
the state board of education may grant provisional status for one year
in order that the school or school district may take action to meet the
requirements. The state board of education shall not require private
school students to meet the student learning goals, obtain a
certificate of academic achievement, or a certificate of individual
achievement to graduate from high school, to master the essential
academic learning requirements, or to be assessed pursuant to RCW
28A.655.061. However, private schools may choose, on a voluntary
basis, to have their students master these essential academic learning
requirements, take the assessments, and obtain a certificate of
academic achievement or a certificate of individual achievement.
Minimum requirements shall be as follows:
(1) The minimum school year for instructional purposes shall
consist of no less than ((one)) two hundred ((eighty)) school days or
the equivalent in annual minimum program hour offerings as prescribed
in RCW 28A.150.220.
(2) The school day shall be the same as that required in RCW
28A.150.030 and 28A.150.220, except that the percentages of total
program hour offerings as prescribed in RCW 28A.150.220 for basic
skills, work skills, and optional subjects and activities shall not
apply to private schools or private sectarian schools.
(3) All classroom teachers shall hold appropriate Washington state
certification except as follows:
(a) Teachers for religious courses or courses for which no
counterpart exists in public schools shall not be required to obtain a
state certificate to teach those courses.
(b) In exceptional cases, people of unusual competence but without
certification may teach students so long as a certified person
exercises general supervision. Annual written statements shall be
submitted to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
reporting and explaining such circumstances.
(4) An approved private school may operate an extension program for
parents, guardians, or persons having legal custody of a child to teach
children in their custody. The extension program shall require at a
minimum that:
(a) The parent, guardian, or custodian be under the supervision of
an employee of the approved private school who is certified under
chapter 28A.410 RCW;
(b) The planning by the certified person and the parent, guardian,
or person having legal custody include objectives consistent with this
subsection and subsections (1), (2), (5), (6), and (7) of this section;
(c) The certified person spend a minimum average each month of one
contact hour per week with each student under his or her supervision
who is enrolled in the approved private school extension program;
(d) Each student's progress be evaluated by the certified person;
and
(e) The certified employee shall not supervise more than thirty
students enrolled in the approved private school's extension program.
(5) Appropriate measures shall be taken to safeguard all permanent
records against loss or damage.
(6) The physical facilities of the school or district shall be
adequate to meet the program offered by the school or district:
PROVIDED, That each school building shall meet reasonable health and
fire safety requirements. A residential dwelling of the parent,
guardian, or custodian shall be deemed to be an adequate physical
facility when a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody is
instructing his or her child under subsection (4) of this section.
(7) Private school curriculum shall include instruction of the
basic skills of occupational education, science, mathematics, language,
social studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the
development of appreciation of art and music, all in sufficient units
for meeting state board of education graduation requirements.
(8) Each school or school district shall be required to maintain
up-to-date policy statements related to the administration and
operation of the school or school district.
All decisions of policy, philosophy, selection of books, teaching
material, curriculum, except as in subsection (7) of this section
provided, school rules and administration, or other matters not
specifically referred to in this section, shall be the responsibility
of the administration and administrators of the particular private
school involved.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.310.240 and 1997 c 13 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every educational service district board shall adopt written
policies granting leaves to persons under contracts of employment with
the district in positions requiring either certification or classified
qualifications, including but not limited to leaves for attendance at
official or private institutes and conferences and sabbatical leaves
for employees in positions requiring certification qualification, and
leaves for illness, injury, bereavement, and emergencies for both
certificated and classified employees, with such compensation as the
board prescribes. The board shall adopt written policies granting
annual leave with compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies as
follows:
(a) For persons under contract with the district for a full fiscal
year, at least ten days;
(b) For persons under contract with the district as part-time
employees, at least that portion of ten days as the total number of
days contracted for bears to ((one)) two hundred ((eighty)) days;
(c) For certificated and classified employees, annual leave with
compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies shall be granted and
accrue at a rate not to exceed twelve days per fiscal year. Provisions
of any contract in force on July 23, 1989, which conflict with
requirements of this subsection shall continue in effect until contract
expiration; after expiration, any new contract executed between the
parties shall be consistent with this subsection;
(d) Compensation for leave for illness or injury actually taken
shall be the same as the compensation the person would have received
had the person not taken the leave provided in this section;
(e) Leave provided in this section not taken shall accumulate from
fiscal year to fiscal year up to a maximum of ((one)) two hundred
((eighty)) days for the purposes of RCW 28A.310.490, and for leave
purposes up to a maximum of the number of contract days agreed to in a
given contract, but not greater than one fiscal year. Such accumulated
time may be taken at any time during the fiscal year, or up to twelve
days per year may be used for the purpose of payments for unused sick
leave; and
(f) Accumulated leave under this section shall be transferred to
educational service districts, school districts, and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, and from any such district or
office to another such district or office. An intervening customary
summer break in employment or the performance of employment duties
shall not preclude such a transfer.
(2) Leave accumulated by a person in a district prior to leaving
the district may, under rules of the board, be granted to the person
when the person returns to the employment of the district.
(3) Leave for illness or injury accumulated before July 23, 1989,
under the administrative practices of an educational service district,
and such leave transferred before July 23, 1989, to or from an
educational service district, school district, or the office of the
superintendent of public instruction under the administrative practices
of the district or office, is declared valid and shall be added to such
leave for illness or injury accumulated after July 23, 1989.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.330.100 and 2006 c 263 s 417 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every board of directors of a school district of the first class,
in addition to the general powers for directors enumerated in this
title, shall have the power:
(1) To employ for a term of not exceeding three years a
superintendent of schools of the district, and for cause to dismiss him
or her, and to fix his or her duties and compensation;
(2) To employ, and for cause dismiss one or more assistant
superintendents and to define their duties and fix their compensation;
(3) To employ a business manager, attorneys, architects, inspectors
of construction, superintendents of buildings and a superintendent of
supplies, all of whom shall serve at the board's pleasure, and to
prescribe their duties and fix their compensation;
(4) To employ, and for cause dismiss, supervisors of instruction
and to define their duties and fix their compensation;
(5) To prescribe a course of study and a program of exercises which
shall be consistent with the course of study prepared by the
superintendent of public instruction for the use of the common schools
of this state;
(6) To, in addition to the minimum requirements imposed by this
title establish and maintain such grades and departments, including
night, high, kindergarten, vocational training and, except as otherwise
provided by law, industrial schools, and schools and departments for
the education and training of any class or classes of youth with
disabilities, as in the judgment of the board, best shall promote the
interests of education in the district;
(7) To determine the length of time over and above ((one)) two
hundred ((eighty)) days that school shall be maintained: PROVIDED,
That for purposes of apportionment no district shall be credited with
more than ((one)) two hundred ((and eighty-three)) three days'
attendance in any school year; and to fix the time for annual opening
and closing of schools and for the daily dismissal of pupils before the
regular time for closing schools;
(8) To maintain a shop and repair department, and to employ, and
for cause dismiss, a foreman and the necessary help for the maintenance
and conduct thereof;
(9) To provide free textbooks and supplies for all children
attending school;
(10) To require of the officers or employees of the district to
give a bond for the honest performance of their duties in such penal
sum as may be fixed by the board with good and sufficient surety, and
to cause the premium for all bonds required of all such officers or
employees to be paid by the district: PROVIDED, That the board may, by
written policy, allow that such bonds may include a deductible proviso
not to exceed two percent of the officer's or employee's annual salary;
(11) To prohibit all secret fraternities and sororities among the
students in any of the schools of the said districts; and
(12) To appoint a practicing physician, resident of the school
district, who shall be known as the school district medical inspector,
and whose duty it shall be to decide for the board of directors all
questions of sanitation and health affecting the safety and welfare of
the public schools of the district who shall serve at the board's
pleasure: PROVIDED, That children shall not be required to submit to
vaccination against the will of their parents or guardian.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.400.300 and 1997 c 13 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every board of directors, unless otherwise specially provided by
law, shall:
(1) Employ for not more than one year, and for sufficient cause
discharge all certificated and classified employees;
(2) Adopt written policies granting leaves to persons under
contracts of employment with the school district(s) in positions
requiring either certification or classified qualifications, including
but not limited to leaves for attendance at official or private
institutes and conferences and sabbatical leaves for employees in
positions requiring certification qualification, and leaves for
illness, injury, bereavement and, emergencies for both certificated and
classified employees, and with such compensation as the board of
directors prescribe: PROVIDED, That the board of directors shall adopt
written policies granting to such persons annual leave with
compensation for illness, injury and emergencies as follows:
(a) For such persons under contract with the school district for a
full year, at least ten days;
(b) For such persons under contract with the school district as
part time employees, at least that portion of ten days as the total
number of days contracted for bears to ((one)) two hundred ((eighty))
days;
(c) For certificated and classified employees, annual leave with
compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies shall be granted and
accrue at a rate not to exceed twelve days per year; provisions of any
contract in force on June 12, 1980, which conflict with requirements of
this subsection shall continue in effect until contract expiration;
after expiration, any new contract executed between the parties shall
be consistent with this subsection;
(d) Compensation for leave for illness or injury actually taken
shall be the same as the compensation such person would have received
had such person not taken the leave provided in this proviso;
(e) Leave provided in this proviso not taken shall accumulate from
year to year up to a maximum of ((one)) two hundred ((eighty)) days for
the purposes of RCW 28A.400.210 and 28A.400.220, and for leave purposes
up to a maximum of the number of contract days agreed to in a given
contract, but not greater than one year. Such accumulated time may be
taken at any time during the school year or up to twelve days per year
may be used for the purpose of payments for unused sick leave.
(f) Sick leave heretofore accumulated under section 1, chapter 195,
Laws of 1959 (former RCW 28.58.430) and sick leave accumulated under
administrative practice of school districts prior to the effective date
of section 1, chapter 195, Laws of 1959 (former RCW 28.58.430) is
hereby declared valid, and shall be added to leave for illness or
injury accumulated under this proviso;
(g) Any leave for injury or illness accumulated up to a maximum of
forty-five days shall be creditable as service rendered for the purpose
of determining the time at which an employee is eligible to retire, if
such leave is taken it may not be compensated under the provisions of
RCW 28A.400.210 and 28A.310.490;
(h) Accumulated leave under this proviso shall be transferred to
and from one district to another, the office of superintendent of
public instruction and offices of educational service district
superintendents and boards, to and from such districts and such
offices;
(i) Leave accumulated by a person in a district prior to leaving
said district may, under rules and regulations of the board, be granted
to such person when the person returns to the employment of the
district.
When any certificated or classified employee leaves one school
district within the state and commences employment with another school
district within the state, the employee shall retain the same
seniority, leave benefits and other benefits that the employee had in
his or her previous position: PROVIDED, That classified employees who
transfer between districts after July 28, 1985, shall not retain any
seniority rights other than longevity when leaving one school district
and beginning employment with another. If the school district to which
the person transfers has a different system for computing seniority,
leave benefits, and other benefits, then the employee shall be granted
the same seniority, leave benefits and other benefits as a person in
that district who has similar occupational status and total years of
service.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.410.080 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.025 are each
amended to read as follows:
The school year for all matters pertaining to teacher certification
or for computing experience in teaching shall consist of not fewer than
((one)) two hundred ((eighty)) school days.

--- END ---