BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.29.010 and 2006 c 334 s 48 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the public-private transportation
initiatives act created under chapter 47.46 RCW has not met the needs
and expectations of the public or private sectors for the development
of transportation projects. The legislature intends to phase out
chapter 47.46 RCW coincident with the completion of the Tacoma Narrows
Bridge - SR 16 public-private partnership. From July 24, 2005, this
chapter will provide a more desirable and effective approach to
developing transportation projects in partnership with the private
sector by applying lessons learned from other states and from this
state's ten-year experience with chapter 47.46 RCW.
(2) It is the legislature's intent to achieve the following goals
through the creation of this new approach to public-private
partnerships:
(a) To provide a well-defined mechanism to facilitate the
collaboration between public and private entities in transportation;
(b) To bring innovative thinking from the private sector and other
states to bear on public projects within the state;
(c) To provide greater flexibility in achieving the transportation
projects; and
(d) To allow for creative cost and risk sharing between the public
and private partners.
(3) The legislature intends that the powers granted in this chapter
to the commission or department are in addition to any powers granted
under chapter 47.56 RCW.
(4) It is further the intent of the legislature that the commission
be authorized to appoint an expert review panel ((be established for
each project developed under chapter 334, Laws of 2006)) for single
projects as the commission finds desirable or to review more than one
project proposed for development under this chapter. An expert review
panel((s shall be responsible for reviewing selected proposals,
analyzing and reviewing tentative agreements, and making)) shall
review, analyze, and make recommendations to the ((governor and the
transportation)) commission on ((the advisability of executing
agreements under chapter 334, Laws of 2006)) issues presented to the
panel for review.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.29.030 and 2005 c 317 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the powers it now possesses, the commission shall:
(1) Approve or review contracts or agreements authorized in this
chapter;
(2) Adopt rules to carry out this chapter and govern the program,
which at a minimum must address the following issues:
(a) The types of projects allowed; however, all ((allowed)) state
highway projects must be included in the Washington transportation plan
or identified by the authority as being a priority need for the state;
(b) The types of contracts allowed, with consideration given to the
best practices available;
(c) The composition of the team responsible for the evaluation of
proposals to include:
(i) Washington state department of transportation staff;
(ii) An independent representative of a consulting or contracting
field with no interests in the project that is prohibited from becoming
a project manager for the project and bidding on any part of the
project;
(iii) An observer from the state auditor's office or the joint
legislative audit and review committee;
(iv) A person appointed by the commission, if the secretary of
transportation is a cabinet member, or appointed by the governor if the
secretary of transportation is not a cabinet member; and
(v) A financial expert;
(d) Minimum standards and criteria required of all proposals;
(e) Procedures for the proper solicitation, acceptance, review, and
evaluation of projects;
(f) Criteria to be considered in the evaluation and selection of
proposals that includes:
(i) Comparison with the department's internal ability to complete
the project that documents the advantages of completing the project as
a partnership versus solely as a public venture; and
(ii) Factors such as, but not limited to: Priority, cost, risk
sharing, scheduling, and management conditions;
(g) The protection of confidential proprietary information while
still meeting the need for public disclosure that is consistent with
RCW 47.29.190;
(h) Protection for local contractors to participate in
subcontracting opportunities;
(i) Specifying that maintenance issues must be resolved in a manner
consistent with the personnel system reform act, chapter 41.80 RCW;
(j) Specifying that provisions regarding patrolling and law
enforcement on a public facility are subject to approval by the
Washington state patrol;
(3) Adopt guidelines to address security and performance issues.
Preliminary rules and guidelines developed under this section must
be submitted to the chairs and ranking members of both transportation
committees by November 30, 2005, for review and comment. All final
rules and guidelines must be submitted to the full legislature during
the 2006 session for review.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.29.060 and 2005 c 317 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in this section, the department may,
in connection with the evaluation of eligible projects, accept for
review and consider any financing mechanisms identified under
subsections (3) through (5) of this section or any other lawful source,
either integrated as part of a project proposal or as a separate,
stand-alone proposal to finance a project. Financing may be considered
for all or part of a proposed project. A project may be financed in
whole or in part with:
(a) The proceeds of grant anticipation revenue bonds authorized by
23 U.S.C. Sec. 122 and applicable state law. Legislative authorization
and appropriation is required in order to use this source of financing;
(b) Grants, loans, loan guarantees, lines of credit, revolving
lines of credit, or other financing arrangements available under the
transportation infrastructure finance and innovation act under 23
U.S.C. Sec. 181 et seq., or any other applicable federal law;
(c) Infrastructure loans or assistance from the state
infrastructure bank established by RCW 82.44.195;
(d) Federal, state, or local revenues, subject to appropriation by
the applicable legislative authority;
(e) User fees, tolls, fares, lease proceeds, rents, gross or net
receipts from sales, proceeds from the sale of development rights,
franchise fees, or any other lawful form of consideration.
(2) As security for the payment of financing described in this
section, the revenues from the project may be pledged, but no such
pledge of revenues constitutes in any manner or to any extent a first
lien general obligation of the state that would be subject to the
state's constitutional debt limit. Any financing described in this
section may be structured on a senior, parity, or subordinate basis to
any other financing.
(3) For any transportation project developed under this chapter
that is owned, leased, used, or operated by the state, as a public
facility, if indebtedness is issued, it must be issued by the state
treasurer for the transportation project.
(4) For other public projects defined in RCW 47.29.050(2) that are
developed in conjunction with a transportation project, financing
necessary to develop, construct, or operate the public project must be
approved by the state finance committee or by the governing board of a
public benefit corporation as provided in the federal Internal Revenue
Code section 63-20;
(5) For projects that are developed in conjunction with a
transportation project but are not themselves a public facility or
public project, any lawful means of financing may be used.
(6) All financing plans must publicly disclose any possible impacts
the plan could have on toll payers, statewide taxpayers, state fund
sources, and projects or programs that are direct beneficiaries of
state fund sources. Plans utilizing debt as authorized under
subsection (3) of this section must be compared against alternative
financing options that utilize debt in any structure or combination
that would result in the lowest cost of capital that is commercially
available. If the commission finds that this alternative financing
structure is capable of providing sufficient proceeds to complete the
project, the commission may submit a proposal to the legislature to
deviate from the financing restrictions under subsection (3) of this
section.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.29.070 and 2005 c 317 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may accept from the United States or any of its
agencies such funds as are available to this state or to any other unit
of government for carrying out the purposes of this chapter, whether
the funds are made available by grant, loan, or other financing
arrangement. The department may enter into such agreements and other
arrangements with the United States or any of its agencies, or other
states, as may be necessary, proper, and convenient for carrying out
the purposes of this chapter, subject to RCW 47.29.080.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.29.140 and 2005 c 317 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following provisions must be included in any agreement to
which the state is a party:
(a) For any project that proposes terms for stand-alone maintenance
or asset management services for a public facility, those services must
be provided in a manner consistent with any collective bargaining
agreements, the personnel system reform act (chapter 41.80 RCW), and
civil service laws that are in effect for the public facility;
(b) ((Transportation)) State highway projects that are selected for
development under this chapter must be identified in the Washington
transportation plan or be identified by the authority as being a
priority need for the state;
(c) If there is a tolling component to the project, then it must be
specified that tolling technology used in the project must be
consistent with tolling technology standards adopted by the department
for transportation-related projects;
(d) Provisions for bonding, financial guarantees, deposits, or the
posting of other security to secure the payment of laborers,
subcontractors, and suppliers who perform work or provide materials as
part of the project;
(e) All projects must be financed in a manner consistent with RCW
47.29.060. This chapter is null and void if this subsection or RCW
47.29.060 fails to become law or is held invalid by a court of final
jurisdiction.
(2) Agreements between the state and private sector partners
entered into under this section must specifically include the following
contractual elements:
(a) The point in the project at which public and private sector
partners will enter the project and which partners will assume
responsibility for specific project elements;
(b) How the partners will share management of the risks of the
project;
(c) How the partners will share the costs of development of the
project;
(d) How the partners will allocate financial responsibility for
cost overruns;
(e) The penalties for nonperformance;
(f) The incentives for performance;
(g) The accounting and auditing standards to be used to evaluate
work on the project;
(h) For any project that reverts to public ownership, the
responsibility for reconstruction or renovations that are required in
order for a facility to meet all applicable government standards upon
reversion of the facility to the state; and
(i) Provisions for patrolling and law enforcement on transportation
projects that are public facilities.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.29.160 and 2005 c 317 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before approving an agreement under subsection (2) of this
section, the commission, with the technical assistance of the
department, must:
(a) Prepare a financial analysis that fully discloses all project
costs, direct and indirect, including costs of any financing proposals;
(b) Publish notice and make available the contents of the
agreement, with the exception of patent information, at least twenty
days before the public hearing required in (c) of this subsection; and
(c) Hold a public hearing on the proposed agreement, with proper
notice provided at least twenty days before the hearing. The public
hearing must be held within the boundaries of the county seat of the
county containing the project.
(2) The commission must allow at least twenty days from the public
hearing on the proposed agreement required under subsection (1)(c) of
this section before approving and executing any agreements authorized
under this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.29.180 and 2005 c 317 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For projects with costs, including financing costs, of three
hundred million dollars or greater, advisory committees are required.))
(1) The commission ((must)) may establish an advisory committee
((to advise with respect to eligible projects)) for a single project or
to provide advice on multiple projects. An advisory committee must
consist of not fewer than five and not more than nine members, as
determined by the public partners. Members must be appointed by the
commission, or for projects with joint public sector participation, in
a manner agreed to by the commission and any participating unit of
government. In making appointments to the committee, the commission
shall consider persons or organizations offering a diversity of
viewpoints on the project.
(2) An advisory committee shall review ((concepts or proposals for
eligible projects)), analyze, and submit comments to the public sector
partners on issues presented to the committee for their consideration.
(3) An advisory committee shall meet as necessary at times and
places fixed by the department, but not less than twice per year. The
state shall provide personnel services to assist the advisory committee
within the limits of available funds. An advisory committee may adopt
rules to govern its proceedings and may select officers.
(4) An advisory committee must be dissolved once the project has
been fully constructed and debt issued to pay for the project has been
fully retired.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.29.250 and 2005 c 317 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any authority the commission or department has
to issue and sell bonds and other similar obligations, this section
establishes continuing authority for the issuance and sale of bonds and
other similar obligations in a manner consistent with this section. To
finance a project in whole or in part, the commission may request that
the state treasurer issue ((revenue)) bonds on behalf of the public
sector partner. The bonds must be secured by a pledge of, and a lien
on, and be payable only from moneys in the transportation innovative
partnership account established in RCW 47.29.230, and any other
revenues specifically pledged to repayment of the bonds. Such a pledge
by the public partner creates a lien that is valid and binding from the
time the pledge is made. ((Revenue)) Bonds issued under this section
are not first lien general obligations of the state or local government
and are not secured by or payable from any funds or assets of the state
other than the moneys and revenues specifically pledged to the
repayment of such ((revenue)) bonds.
(2) Moneys received from the issuance of ((revenue)) bonds or other
debt obligations, including any investment earnings thereon, may be
spent:
(a) For the purpose of financing the costs of the project for which
the bonds are issued;
(b) To pay the costs and other administrative expenses of the
bonds;
(c) To pay the costs of credit enhancement or to fund any reserves
determined to be necessary or advantageous in connection with the
((revenue)) bonds; and
(d) To reimburse the public sector partners for any costs related
to carrying out the projects authorized under this chapter.

Sec. 9 RCW 47.29.280 and 2006 c 334 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((department shall)) commission may establish an expert
review panel to review, analyze, and make recommendations ((to the
governor and the transportation commission on whether to approve,
reject, or continue negotiations)) on any aspect of a proposal,
project, or a proposed project agreement under this chapter. The
department shall provide staff to support the expert review panel, if
requested by the panel. The expert review panel may utilize any of the
consultants under contract for the department, and the expert review
panel may contract for consulting expertise in specific areas as it
deems necessary to ensure a thorough and critical review of any
((proposed project agreement)) aspect of their assigned scope of
review.
(2) The ((governor)) commission shall appoint members of an expert
review panel that have experience in large capital project delivery,
public-private partnerships, public financing of infrastructure
improvements, or other areas of expertise that will benefit the panel.
The panel shall consist of no less than three, but no more than five
members, as determined by the ((governor)) commission.

Sec. 10 RCW 47.29.290 and 2006 c 334 s 50 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon receiving the recommendations of the expert review panel as
provided in RCW 47.29.280, ((and upon consultation with the governor,))
the transportation commission shall either execute the proposed project
agreement, reject the proposed project agreement, or continue further
negotiations between the state and a private partner. The execution of
any agreement or the rejection of any agreement shall constitute a
final action for legal or administrative purposes.

--- END ---