BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.09.340 and 2005 c 436 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In making all discretionary decisions regarding release plans
for and supervision of sex offenders, the department shall set
priorities and make decisions based on an assessment of public safety
risks.
(2) The department shall, no later than September 1, 1996,
implement a policy governing the department's evaluation and approval
of release plans for sex offenders. The policy shall include, at a
minimum, a formal process by which victims, witnesses, and other
interested people may provide information and comments to the
department on potential safety risks to specific individuals or classes
of individuals posed by a specific sex offender. The department shall
make all reasonable efforts to publicize the availability of this
process through currently existing mechanisms and shall seek the
assistance of courts, prosecutors, law enforcement, and victims'
advocacy groups in doing so. Notice of an offender's proposed
residence shall be provided to all people registered to receive notice
of an offender's release under RCW 9.94A.612(2), except that in no case
may this notification requirement be construed to require an extension
of an offender's release date.
(3)(a) The department shall notify a boarding home licensed under
chapter 18.20 RCW, a nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, or
an adult family home licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW that an offender
convicted of a sex offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 or convicted of
reckless burning or arson under chapter 9A.48 RCW, when an offender is
going to be discharged from total or partial confinement or is
currently under supervision or community custody and is seeking
admission to a facility.
(b) In making this notification, the department shall include:
(i) The person's name or names;
(ii) A physical description of the person;
(iii) Any conditions upon the person's probation, parole,
postprison supervision, or conditions of release;
(iv) A description of the offender's method of offense;
(v) A description of the person's primary and secondary targets;
(vi) A current photograph of the person; and
(vii) The name and telephone number of the person's parole or
probation officer.
(4)(a) For any offender convicted of a felony sex offense against
a minor victim after June 6, 1996, the department shall not approve a
residence location if the proposed residence: (i) Includes a minor
victim or child of similar age or circumstance as a previous victim who
the department determines may be put at substantial risk of harm by the
offender's residence in the household; or (ii) is within close
proximity of the current residence of a minor victim, unless the
whereabouts of the minor victim cannot be determined or unless such a
restriction would impede family reunification efforts ordered by the
court or directed by the department of social and health services. The
department is further authorized to reject a residence location if the
proposed residence is within close proximity to schools, child care
centers, playgrounds, or other grounds or facilities where children of
similar age or circumstance as a previous victim are present who the
department determines may be put at substantial risk of harm by the sex
offender's residence at that location.
(b) In addition, for any offender prohibited from living in a
community protection zone under RCW 9.94A.712(6)(a)(ii), the department
may not approve a residence location if the proposed residence is in a
community protection zone.
(((4))) (5) When the department requires supervised visitation as
a term or condition of a sex offender's community placement under RCW
9.94A.700(6), the department shall, prior to approving a supervisor,
consider the following:
(a) The relationships between the proposed supervisor, the
offender, and the minor; (b) the proposed supervisor's acknowledgment
and understanding of the offender's prior criminal conduct, general
knowledge of the dynamics of child sexual abuse, and willingness and
ability to protect the minor from the potential risks posed by contact
with the offender; and (c) recommendations made by the department of
social and health services about the best interests of the child.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.44.130 and 2006 c 129 s 2, 2006 c 128 s 2, 2006 c
127 s 2, and 2006 c 126 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1)(a) Any adult or juvenile residing whether or not the person has
a fixed residence, or who is a student, is employed, or carries on a
vocation in this state who has been found to have committed or has been
convicted of any sex offense or kidnapping offense, or who has been
found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of
committing any sex offense or kidnapping offense, shall register with
the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the
person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's
school, or place of employment or vocation, or as otherwise specified
in this section. Where a person required to register under this
section is in custody of the state department of corrections, the state
department of social and health services, a local division of youth
services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility as a result of
a sex offense or kidnapping offense, the person shall also register at
the time of release from custody with an official designated by the
agency that has jurisdiction over the person.
(b) Any adult or juvenile who is required to register under (a) of
this subsection:
(i) Who is attending, or planning to attend, a public or private
school regulated under Title 28A RCW or chapter 72.40 RCW shall, within
ten days of enrolling or prior to arriving at the school to attend
classes, whichever is earlier, notify the sheriff for the county of the
person's residence of the person's intent to attend the school, and the
sheriff shall promptly notify the principal of the school;
(ii) Who is admitted to a public or private institution of higher
education shall, within ten days of enrolling or by the first business
day after arriving at the institution, whichever is earlier, notify the
sheriff for the county of the person's residence of the person's intent
to attend the institution;
(iii) Who gains employment at a public or private institution of
higher education shall, within ten days of accepting employment or by
the first business day after commencing work at the institution,
whichever is earlier, notify the sheriff for the county of the person's
residence of the person's employment by the institution; ((or))
(iv) Whose enrollment or employment at a public or private
institution of higher education is terminated shall, within ten days of
such termination, notify the sheriff for the county of the person's
residence of the person's termination of enrollment or employment at
the institution; or
(v) Who is residing, or planning to reside, in a boarding home
licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, a nursing home licensed under chapter
18.51 RCW, or an adult family home licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW,
shall notify the sheriff for the county or his or her legal
representative shall notify the sheriff for the county in which a
boarding home, nursing home, or adult family home is located and in
which the person resides, or intends to reside, within five days. The
sheriff shall promptly notify the administrator of the boarding home,
nursing home, or adult family home that a person required to register
under this section intends to or resides in the boarding home, nursing
home, or adult family home.
The resident or his or her legal representative shall promptly
notify the sheriff, upon transfer or discharge from a boarding home
licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, nursing home licensed under chapter
18.51 RCW, or an adult family home licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW,
of the change in residence.
(c) Persons required to register under this section who are
enrolled in a public or private institution of higher education on June
11, 1998, or a public or private school regulated under Title 28A RCW
or chapter 72.40 RCW on September 1, 2006, or residing in a boarding
home licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, a nursing home licensed under
chapter 18.51 RCW, or an adult family home licensed under chapter
70.128 RCW on June 30, 2007, must notify the county sheriff
immediately.
(d) The sheriff shall notify the school's principal ((or)), the
institution's department of public safety, or the boarding home,
nursing home, or adult family home administrator, and shall provide
((that department with)) the same information provided to a county
sheriff under subsection (3) of this section.
(e)(i) A principal receiving notice under this subsection must
disclose the information received from the sheriff under (b) of this
subsection as follows:
(A) If the student who is required to register as a sex offender is
classified as a risk level II or III, the principal shall provide the
information received to every teacher of any student required to
register under (a) of this subsection and to any other personnel who,
in the judgment of the principal, supervises the student or for
security purposes should be aware of the student's record;
(B) If the student who is required to register as a sex offender is
classified as a risk level I, the principal shall provide the
information received only to personnel who, in the judgment of the
principal, for security purposes should be aware of the student's
record.
(ii) Any information received by a principal or school personnel
under this subsection is confidential and may not be further
disseminated except as provided in RCW 28A.225.330, other statutes or
case law, and the family and educational and privacy rights act of
1994, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g et seq.
(f)(i) An administrator of a boarding home licensed under chapter
18.20 RCW, a nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, or an adult
family home licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW, receiving notice under
this subsection may disclose to all management staff, and all
caregivers within the boarding home, nursing home, or adult family home
that a convicted sex offender resides in the boarding home, nursing
home, or adult family home and any other relevant information that may
be necessary for the proper care and treatment of that person.
(ii) Any information received by an administrator of a boarding
home, nursing home, or adult family home under this subsection is
confidential and may not be further disseminated except as required by
law.
(iii) The administrator shall notify the sheriff upon transfer or
discharge of the convicted sex offender that the person will no longer
reside in the boarding home, nursing home, or adult family home.
(2) This section may not be construed to confer any powers pursuant
to RCW 4.24.550 upon the public safety department of any public or
private school or institution of higher education.
(3)(a) The person shall provide the following information when
registering: (i) Name; (ii) complete residential address; (iii) date
and place of birth; (iv) place of employment; (v) crime for which
convicted; (vi) date and place of conviction; (vii) aliases used;
(viii) social security number; (ix) photograph; and (x) fingerprints.
(b) Any person who lacks a fixed residence shall provide the
following information when registering: (i) Name; (ii) date and place
of birth; (iii) place of employment; (iv) crime for which convicted;
(v) date and place of conviction; (vi) aliases used; (vii) social
security number; (viii) photograph; (ix) fingerprints; and (x) where he
or she plans to stay.
(4)(a) Offenders shall register with the county sheriff within the
following deadlines. For purposes of this section the term
"conviction" refers to adult convictions and juvenile adjudications for
sex offenses or kidnapping offenses:
(i) OFFENDERS IN CUSTODY. (A) Sex offenders who committed a sex
offense on, before, or after February 28, 1990, and who, on or after
July 28, 1991, are in custody, as a result of that offense, of the
state department of corrections, the state department of social and
health services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or
juvenile detention facility, and (B) kidnapping offenders who on or
after July 27, 1997, are in custody of the state department of
corrections, the state department of social and health services, a
local division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention
facility, must register at the time of release from custody with an
official designated by the agency that has jurisdiction over the
offender. The agency shall within three days forward the registration
information to the county sheriff for the county of the offender's
anticipated residence. The offender must also register within twenty-four hours from the time of release with the county sheriff for the
county of the person's residence, or if the person is not a resident of
Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of employment
or vocation. The agency that has jurisdiction over the offender shall
provide notice to the offender of the duty to register. Failure to
register at the time of release and within twenty-four hours of release
constitutes a violation of this section and is punishable as provided
in subsection (11) of this section.
When the agency with jurisdiction intends to release an offender
with a duty to register under this section, and the agency has
knowledge that the offender is eligible for developmental disability
services from the department of social and health services, the agency
shall notify the division of developmental disabilities of the release.
Notice shall occur not more than thirty days before the offender is to
be released. The agency and the division shall assist the offender in
meeting the initial registration requirement under this section.
Failure to provide such assistance shall not constitute a defense for
any violation of this section.
(ii) OFFENDERS NOT IN CUSTODY BUT UNDER STATE OR LOCAL
JURISDICTION. Sex offenders who, on July 28, 1991, are not in custody
but are under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence review
board or under the department of corrections' active supervision, as
defined by the department of corrections, the state department of
social and health services, or a local division of youth services, for
sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990, must
register within ten days of July 28, 1991. Kidnapping offenders who,
on July 27, 1997, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of
the indeterminate sentence review board or under the department of
corrections' active supervision, as defined by the department of
corrections, the state department of social and health services, or a
local division of youth services, for kidnapping offenses committed
before, on, or after July 27, 1997, must register within ten days of
July 27, 1997. A change in supervision status of a sex offender who
was required to register under this subsection (4)(a)(ii) as of July
28, 1991, or a kidnapping offender required to register as of July 27,
1997, shall not relieve the offender of the duty to register or to
reregister following a change in residence. The obligation to register
shall only cease pursuant to RCW 9A.44.140.
(iii) OFFENDERS UNDER FEDERAL JURISDICTION. Sex offenders who, on
or after July 23, 1995, and kidnapping offenders who, on or after July
27, 1997, as a result of that offense are in the custody of the United
States bureau of prisons or other federal or military correctional
agency for sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28,
1990, or kidnapping offenses committed on, before, or after July 27,
1997, must register within twenty-four hours from the time of release
with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if
the person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's
school, or place of employment or vocation. Sex offenders who, on July
23, 1995, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the
United States bureau of prisons, United States courts, United States
parole commission, or military parole board for sex offenses committed
before, on, or after February 28, 1990, must register within ten days
of July 23, 1995. Kidnapping offenders who, on July 27, 1997, are not
in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the United States bureau
of prisons, United States courts, United States parole commission, or
military parole board for kidnapping offenses committed before, on, or
after July 27, 1997, must register within ten days of July 27, 1997.
A change in supervision status of a sex offender who was required to
register under this subsection (4)(a)(iii) as of July 23, 1995, or a
kidnapping offender required to register as of July 27, 1997 shall not
relieve the offender of the duty to register or to reregister following
a change in residence, or if the person is not a resident of
Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of employment
or vocation. The obligation to register shall only cease pursuant to
RCW 9A.44.140.
(iv) OFFENDERS WHO ARE CONVICTED BUT NOT CONFINED. Sex offenders
who are convicted of a sex offense on or after July 28, 1991, for a sex
offense that was committed on or after February 28, 1990, and
kidnapping offenders who are convicted on or after July 27, 1997, for
a kidnapping offense that was committed on or after July 27, 1997, but
who are not sentenced to serve a term of confinement immediately upon
sentencing, shall report to the county sheriff to register immediately
upon completion of being sentenced.
(v) OFFENDERS WHO ARE NEW RESIDENTS OR RETURNING WASHINGTON
RESIDENTS. Sex offenders and kidnapping offenders who move to
Washington state from another state or a foreign country that are not
under the jurisdiction of the state department of corrections, the
indeterminate sentence review board, or the state department of social
and health services at the time of moving to Washington, must register
within three business days of establishing residence or reestablishing
residence if the person is a former Washington resident. The duty to
register under this subsection applies to sex offenders convicted under
the laws of another state or a foreign country, federal or military
statutes for offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990,
or Washington state for offenses committed before, on, or after
February 28, 1990, and to kidnapping offenders convicted under the laws
of another state or a foreign country, federal or military statutes, or
Washington state for offenses committed before, on, or after July 27,
1997. Sex offenders and kidnapping offenders from other states or a
foreign country who, when they move to Washington, are under the
jurisdiction of the department of corrections, the indeterminate
sentence review board, or the department of social and health services
must register within twenty-four hours of moving to Washington. The
agency that has jurisdiction over the offender shall notify the
offender of the registration requirements before the offender moves to
Washington.
(vi) OFFENDERS FOUND NOT GUILTY BY REASON OF INSANITY. Any adult
or juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under
chapter 10.77 RCW of (A) committing a sex offense on, before, or after
February 28, 1990, and who, on or after July 23, 1995, is in custody,
as a result of that finding, of the state department of social and
health services, or (B) committing a kidnapping offense on, before, or
after July 27, 1997, and who on or after July 27, 1997, is in custody,
as a result of that finding, of the state department of social and
health services, must register within twenty-four hours from the time
of release with the county sheriff for the county of the person's
residence. The state department of social and health services shall
provide notice to the adult or juvenile in its custody of the duty to
register. Any adult or juvenile who has been found not guilty by
reason of insanity of committing a sex offense on, before, or after
February 28, 1990, but who was released before July 23, 1995, or any
adult or juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity
of committing a kidnapping offense but who was released before July 27,
1997, shall be required to register within twenty-four hours of
receiving notice of this registration requirement. The state
department of social and health services shall make reasonable attempts
within available resources to notify sex offenders who were released
before July 23, 1995, and kidnapping offenders who were released before
July 27, 1997. Failure to register within twenty-four hours of
release, or of receiving notice, constitutes a violation of this
section and is punishable as provided in subsection (11) of this
section.
(vii) OFFENDERS WHO LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE. Any person who lacks
a fixed residence and leaves the county in which he or she is
registered and enters and remains within a new county for twenty-four
hours is required to register with the county sheriff not more than
twenty-four hours after entering the county and provide the information
required in subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(viii) OFFENDERS WHO LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE AND WHO ARE UNDER
SUPERVISION. Offenders who lack a fixed residence and who are under
the supervision of the department shall register in the county of their
supervision.
(ix) OFFENDERS WHO MOVE TO, WORK, CARRY ON A VOCATION, OR ATTEND
SCHOOL IN ANOTHER STATE. Offenders required to register in Washington,
who move to another state, or who work, carry on a vocation, or attend
school in another state shall register a new address, fingerprints, and
photograph with the new state within ten days after establishing
residence, or after beginning to work, carry on a vocation, or attend
school in the new state. The person must also send written notice
within ten days of moving to the new state or to a foreign country to
the county sheriff with whom the person last registered in Washington
state. The county sheriff shall promptly forward this information to
the Washington state patrol.
(b) Failure to register within the time required under this section
constitutes a per se violation of this section and is punishable as
provided in subsection (11) of this section. The county sheriff shall
not be required to determine whether the person is living within the
county.
(c) An arrest on charges of failure to register, service of an
information, or a complaint for a violation of this section, or
arraignment on charges for a violation of this section, constitutes
actual notice of the duty to register. Any person charged with the
crime of failure to register under this section who asserts as a
defense the lack of notice of the duty to register shall register
immediately following actual notice of the duty through arrest,
service, or arraignment. Failure to register as required under this
subsection (4)(c) constitutes grounds for filing another charge of
failing to register. Registering following arrest, service, or
arraignment on charges shall not relieve the offender from criminal
liability for failure to register prior to the filing of the original
charge.
(d) The deadlines for the duty to register under this section do
not relieve any sex offender of the duty to register under this section
as it existed prior to July 28, 1991.
(5)(a) If any person required to register pursuant to this section
changes his or her residence address within the same county, the person
must send signed written notice of the change of address to the county
sheriff within seventy-two hours of moving. If any person required to
register pursuant to this section moves to a new county, the person
must send signed written notice of the change of address at least
fourteen days before moving to the county sheriff in the new county of
residence and must register with that county sheriff within twenty-four
hours of moving. The person must also send signed written notice
within ten days of the change of address in the new county to the
county sheriff with whom the person last registered. The county
sheriff with whom the person last registered shall promptly forward the
information concerning the change of address to the county sheriff for
the county of the person's new residence. Upon receipt of notice of
change of address to a new state, the county sheriff shall promptly
forward the information regarding the change of address to the agency
designated by the new state as the state's offender registration
agency.
(b) It is an affirmative defense to a charge that the person failed
to send a notice at least fourteen days in advance of moving as
required under (a) of this subsection that the person did not know the
location of his or her new residence at least fourteen days before
moving. The defendant must establish the defense by a preponderance of
the evidence and, to prevail on the defense, must also prove by a
preponderance that the defendant sent the required notice within
twenty-four hours of determining the new address.
(6)(a) Any person required to register under this section who lacks
a fixed residence shall provide signed written notice to the sheriff of
the county where he or she last registered within forty-eight hours
excluding weekends and holidays after ceasing to have a fixed
residence. The notice shall include the information required by
subsection (3)(b) of this section, except the photograph and
fingerprints. The county sheriff may, for reasonable cause, require
the offender to provide a photograph and fingerprints. The sheriff
shall forward this information to the sheriff of the county in which
the person intends to reside, if the person intends to reside in
another county.
(b) A person who lacks a fixed residence must report weekly, in
person, to the sheriff of the county where he or she is registered.
The weekly report shall be on a day specified by the county sheriff's
office, and shall occur during normal business hours. The county
sheriff's office may require the person to list the locations where the
person has stayed during the last seven days. The lack of a fixed
residence is a factor that may be considered in determining an
offender's risk level and shall make the offender subject to disclosure
of information to the public at large pursuant to RCW 4.24.550.
(c) If any person required to register pursuant to this section
does not have a fixed residence, it is an affirmative defense to the
charge of failure to register, that he or she provided written notice
to the sheriff of the county where he or she last registered within
forty-eight hours excluding weekends and holidays after ceasing to have
a fixed residence and has subsequently complied with the requirements
of subsections (4)(a)(vii) or (viii) and (6) of this section. To
prevail, the person must prove the defense by a preponderance of the
evidence.
(7) All offenders who are required to register pursuant to this
section who have a fixed residence and who are designated as a risk
level II or III must report, in person, every ninety days to the
sheriff of the county where he or she is registered. Reporting shall
be on a day specified by the county sheriff's office, and shall occur
during normal business hours. An offender who complies with the
ninety-day reporting requirement with no violations for a period of at
least five years in the community may petition the superior court to be
relieved of the duty to report every ninety days. The petition shall
be made to the superior court in the county where the offender resides
or reports under this section. The prosecuting attorney of the county
shall be named and served as respondent in any such petition. The
court shall relieve the petitioner of the duty to report if the
petitioner shows, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the
petitioner has complied with the reporting requirement for a period of
at least five years and that the offender has not been convicted of a
criminal violation of this section for a period of at least five years,
and the court determines that the reporting no longer serves a public
safety purpose. Failure to report, as specified, constitutes a
violation of this section and is punishable as provided in subsection
(11) of this section.
(8) A sex offender subject to registration requirements under this
section who applies to change his or her name under RCW 4.24.130 or any
other law shall submit a copy of the application to the county sheriff
of the county of the person's residence and to the state patrol not
fewer than five days before the entry of an order granting the name
change. No sex offender under the requirement to register under this
section at the time of application shall be granted an order changing
his or her name if the court finds that doing so will interfere with
legitimate law enforcement interests, except that no order shall be
denied when the name change is requested for religious or legitimate
cultural reasons or in recognition of marriage or dissolution of
marriage. A sex offender under the requirement to register under this
section who receives an order changing his or her name shall submit a
copy of the order to the county sheriff of the county of the person's
residence and to the state patrol within five days of the entry of the
order.
(9) The county sheriff shall obtain a photograph of the individual
and shall obtain a copy of the individual's fingerprints. A photograph
may be taken at any time to update an individual's file.
(10) For the purpose of RCW 9A.44.130, 10.01.200, 43.43.540,
70.48.470, and 72.09.330:
(a) "Sex offense" means:
(i) Any offense defined as a sex offense by RCW 9.94A.030;
(ii) Any violation under RCW 9A.44.096 (sexual misconduct with a
minor in the second degree);
(iii) Any violation under RCW 9.68A.090 (communication with a minor
for immoral purposes);
(iv) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be classified as a sex offense under
this subsection; and
(v) Any gross misdemeanor that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a
criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit an offense that is classified as a sex offense under RCW
9.94A.030 or this subsection.
(b) "Kidnapping offense" means: (i) The crimes of kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, and unlawful
imprisonment, as defined in chapter 9A.40 RCW, where the victim is a
minor and the offender is not the minor's parent; (ii) any offense that
is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation,
or criminal conspiracy to commit an offense that is classified as a
kidnapping offense under this subsection (10)(b); and (iii) any federal
or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this
state would be classified as a kidnapping offense under this subsection
(10)(b).
(c) "Employed" or "carries on a vocation" means employment that is
full-time or part-time for a period of time exceeding fourteen days, or
for an aggregate period of time exceeding thirty days during any
calendar year. A person is employed or carries on a vocation whether
the person's employment is financially compensated, volunteered, or for
the purpose of government or educational benefit.
(d) "Student" means a person who is enrolled, on a full-time or
part-time basis, in any public or private educational institution. An
educational institution includes any secondary school, trade or
professional institution, or institution of higher education.
(11)(a) A person who knowingly fails to comply with any of the
requirements of this section is guilty of a class C felony if the crime
for which the individual was convicted was a felony sex offense as
defined in subsection (10)(a) of this section or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony sex offense as defined in subsection (10)(a) of this
section.
(b) If the crime for which the individual was convicted was other
than a felony or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be other than a felony,
violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.
(12)(a) A person who knowingly fails to comply with any of the
requirements of this section is guilty of a class C felony if the crime
for which the individual was convicted was a felony kidnapping offense
as defined in subsection (10)(b) of this section or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state
would be a felony kidnapping offense as defined in subsection (10)(b)
of this section.
(b) If the crime for which the individual was convicted was other
than a felony or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be other than a felony,
violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.
(13) Except as may otherwise be provided by law, nothing in this
section shall impose any liability upon a peace officer, including a
county sheriff, or law enforcement agency, for failing to release
information authorized under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.129 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If the department learns that a current or prospective resident
of a boarding home licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, a nursing home
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, or an adult family home licensed
under chapter 70.128 RCW has been convicted of a sex offense as defined
in RCW 9.94A.030 or convicted of reckless burning or arson under
chapter 9A.48 RCW, the department shall notify the facility's
administrator immediately. The administrator may notify other facility
staff consistent with RCW 9A.44.130 and may notify other persons
pursuant to law.
(2) Any person convicted of a sex offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030, or convicted of reckless burning or arson under chapter
9A.48 RCW, applying for admission to a boarding home licensed under
chapter 18.20 RCW, a nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, or
an adult family home licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW, shall promptly
notify the administrator of the person's conviction status. The
administrator may notify other facility staff consistent with RCW
9A.44.130.
(3) Any person convicted of a sex offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030, or convicted of reckless burning or arson under chapter
9A.48 RCW, residing in a boarding home licensed under chapter 18.20
RCW, a nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, or an adult
family home licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW, on the effective date of
this section shall promptly notify the administrator of the person's
conviction status. The administrator may notify other facility staff
consistent with RCW 9A.44.130.
(4) A boarding home licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, a nursing
home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, or an adult family home licensed
under chapter 70.128 RCW, may refuse admission to a person who is
required to register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130; any person
found guilty of a crime of arson in the first degree or reckless
burning in the first or second degree under chapter 9A.48 RCW; any
person committed as a sexually violent predator under chapter 71.09 RCW
or as a sexual psychopath under chapter 71.06 RCW; any person found not
guilty of a sex offense or arson or reckless burning offense by reason
of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW; and/or any person found
incompetent to stand trial for a sex offense or arson or reckless
burning offense and subsequently committed under chapter 71.05 or 71.34
RCW if the facility reasonably believes that the resident endangers the
health and safety of individuals in the facility.
(5)(a) A boarding home licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, a nursing
home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, or an adult family home licensed
under chapter 70.128 RCW may immediately, subject to available
placement but not to exceed ten days, transfer or discharge a resident
if:
(i) The facility was not notified prior to admission that the
resident was required to register as a sex offender under RCW
9A.44.130; was convicted of a sex offense as defined in chapter 9.94A
RCW; was convicted for felony arson or reckless burning under chapter
9A.48 RCW; was committed as a sexually violent predator under chapter
71.09 RCW or sexual psychopath under chapter 71.06 RCW; was found not
guilty of a sexual offense or arson or reckless burning offense by
reason of insanity; or was found incompetent to stand trial for a sex
offense or arson or reckless burning offense and subsequently committed
under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW; and
(ii) The facility reasonably believes that the resident endangers
the health or safety of individuals in the facility.
(b) A boarding home licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, a nursing
home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, or an adult family home licensed
under chapter 70.128 RCW shall provide the resident written notice of
posttransfer/discharge hearing rights under chapter 34.05 RCW. If the
resident requests a posttransfer/discharge hearing, any hearing must be
held within five business days of the transfer or discharge. A request
for a hearing shall not delay or postpone the transfer or discharge.
(6) A boarding home licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, a nursing
home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, or an adult family home licensed
under chapter 70.128 RCW, or its employees, are not liable for civil
damages resulting directly or indirectly from a decision to admit,
retain, transfer, or discharge the resident.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.129.110 and 1997 c 392 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The facility must permit each resident to remain in the
facility, and not transfer or discharge the resident from the facility
unless:
(a) The transfer or discharge is necessary for the resident's
welfare and the resident's needs cannot be met in the facility;
(b) The safety of individuals in the facility is endangered;
(c) The health of individuals in the facility would otherwise be
endangered;
(d) The resident has failed to make the required payment for his or
her stay; or
(e) The facility ceases to operate.
(2) All long-term care facilities shall fully disclose to potential
residents or their legal representative the service capabilities of the
facility prior to admission to the facility. If the care needs of the
applicant who is medicaid eligible are in excess of the facility's
service capabilities, the department shall identify other care settings
or residential care options consistent with federal law.
(3) Before a long-term care facility transfers or discharges a
resident, the facility must:
(a) First attempt through reasonable accommodations to avoid the
transfer or discharge, unless agreed to by the resident;
(b) Notify the resident and representative and make a reasonable
effort to notify, if known, an interested family member of the transfer
or discharge and the reasons for the move in writing and in a language
and manner they understand;
(c) Record the reasons in the resident's record; and
(d) Include in the notice the items described in subsection (5) of
this section.
(4)(a) Except when specified in this subsection, the notice of
transfer or discharge required under subsection (3) of this section
must be made by the facility at least thirty days before the resident
is transferred or discharged.
(b) Notice may be made as soon as practicable before transfer or
discharge when:
(i) The safety of individuals in the facility would be endangered;
(ii) The health of individuals in the facility would be endangered;
(iii) An immediate transfer or discharge is required by the
resident's urgent medical needs; or
(iv) A resident has not resided in the facility for thirty days.
(5) The written notice specified in subsection (3) of this section
must include the following:
(a) The reason for transfer or discharge;
(b) The effective date of transfer or discharge;
(c) The location to which the resident is transferred or
discharged, except when a resident is being transferred or discharged
under section 3(5) of this act;
(d) The name, address, and telephone number of the state long-term
care ombudsman;
(e) For residents with developmental disabilities, the mailing
address and telephone number of the agency responsible for the
protection and advocacy of developmentally disabled individuals
established under part C of the developmental disabilities assistance
and bill of rights act; and
(f) For residents who are mentally ill, the mailing address and
telephone number of the agency responsible for the protection and
advocacy of mentally ill individuals established under the protection
and advocacy for mentally ill individuals act.
(6) A facility must provide sufficient preparation and orientation
to residents to ensure safe and orderly transfer or discharge from the
facility.
(7) A resident discharged in violation of this section has the
right to be readmitted immediately upon the first availability of a
gender-appropriate bed in the facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A resident transferred or discharged under section 3(5)(a) of
this act is entitled to a posttransfer/discharge administrative hearing
under chapter 34.05 RCW. If the resident requests a
posttransfer/discharge hearing, any hearing must be held within five
business days of the transfer or discharge. A request for a hearing
shall not delay or postpone the transfer or discharge.
(2) Neither the boarding home, nor its employees, are liable for
any civil damages resulting directly or indirectly from a decision to
admit, retain, transfer, or discharge the resident.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.51 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A resident transferred or discharged under section 3(5)(a) of
this act is entitled to a posttransfer/discharge administrative hearing
under chapter 34.05 RCW. If the resident requests a
posttransfer/discharge hearing, any hearing must be held within five
business days of the transfer or discharge. A request for a hearing
shall not delay or postpone the transfer or discharge.
(2) Neither the nursing home, nor its employees, are liable for any
civil damages resulting directly or indirectly from a decision to
admit, retain, transfer, or discharge the resident.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A resident transferred or discharged under section 3(5)(a) of
this act is entitled to a posttransfer/discharge administrative hearing
under chapter 34.05 RCW. If the resident requests a
posttransfer/discharge hearing, any hearing must be held within five
business days of the transfer or discharge. A request for a hearing
shall not delay or postpone the transfer or discharge.
(2) Neither the adult family home, nor its employees, are liable
for any civil damages resulting directly or indirectly from a decision
to admit, retain, transfer, or discharge the resident.

--- END ---