BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.225.035 and 2001 c 162 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A petition for a civil action under RCW 28A.225.030 or
28A.225.015 shall consist of a written notification to the court
alleging that:
(a) The child has unexcused absences during the current school
year;
(b) Actions taken by the school district have not been successful
in substantially reducing the child's absences from school; and
(c) Court intervention and supervision are necessary to assist the
school district or parent to reduce the child's absences from school.
(2) The petition shall set forth the name, date of birth, school,
address, gender, race, and ethnicity of the child and the names and
addresses of the child's parents.
(3) The petition shall set forth facts that support the allegations
in this section and shall generally request relief available under this
chapter and provide information about what the court might order under
RCW 28A.225.090.
(4) When a petition is filed under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015,
the juvenile court shall schedule a hearing at which the court shall
consider the petition, or if the court determines that a referral to an
available community truancy board would substantially reduce the
child's unexcused absences, the court may refer the case to a community
truancy board under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.
(5) If a referral is made to a community truancy board, the truancy
board must meet with the child, a parent, and the school district
representative and enter into an agreement with the petitioner and
respondent regarding expectations and any actions necessary to address
the child's truancy within thirty days of the referral. If the
petition is based on RCW 28A.225.015, the child shall not be required
to attend and the agreement under this subsection shall be between the
truancy board, the school district, and the child's parent. The
agreement shall be presented to the juvenile court for its approval.
(6) The court shall approve the agreement by order or schedule a
hearing. The court may, if the school district and community truancy
board agree, permit the truancy board to provide continued supervision
over the student, or parent if the petition is based on RCW
28A.225.015, and report on compliance with the order.
(7) If the truancy board fails to reach an agreement, the truancy
board shall return the case to the juvenile court for a hearing.
(8) Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection (4) of this
section, a hearing shall not be required if other actions by the court
would substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences. When a
juvenile court hearing is ((held)) scheduled, the court shall, directly
and using its own resources:
(a) Separately notify the child, the parent of the child, and the
school district of the hearing;
(b) Notify the parent and the child of their rights to present
evidence at the hearing; and
(c) Notify the parent and the child of the options and rights
available under chapter 13.32A RCW.
(9) The court may require the attendance of the child if eight
years old or older, the parents, and the school district at any hearing
on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030.
(10) A school district is responsible for determining who shall
represent the school district at hearings on a petition filed under RCW
28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015.
(11) The court may permit the first hearing to be held without
requiring that either party be represented by legal counsel, and to be
held without a guardian ad litem for the child under RCW 4.08.050. At
the request of the school district, the court shall permit a school
district representative who is not an attorney to represent the school
district at any future hearings.
(12) If the allegations in the petition are established by a
preponderance of the evidence, the court shall grant the petition and
enter an order assuming jurisdiction to intervene for the period of
time determined by the court, after considering the facts alleged in
the petition and the circumstances of the juvenile, to most likely
cause the juvenile to return to and remain in school while the juvenile
is subject to this chapter. In no case may the order expire before the
end of the school year in which it is entered.
(13) If the court assumes jurisdiction, the school district shall
regularly report to the court any additional unexcused absences by the
child.
(14) Community truancy boards and the courts shall coordinate, to
the extent possible, proceedings and actions pertaining to children who
are subject to truancy petitions and at-risk youth petitions in RCW
13.32A.191 or child in need of services petitions in RCW 13.32A.140.
(15) If after a juvenile court assumes jurisdiction in one county
the child relocates to another county, the juvenile court in the
receiving county shall, upon the request of a school district or
parent, assume jurisdiction of the petition filed in the previous
county.

--- END ---