BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the people of
Washington state face a crisis brought upon by increased gang crime and
violence, which is threatening public safety in communities across the
state. Those who live in communities where gang membership is on the
rise find themselves living with the daily threat of intimidation and
harassment. Ordinary citizens are increasingly vulnerable to
gang-related crimes such as drug dealing, damage to real property,
theft of personal property and automobiles, or even assault, rape, and
murder. Even those not directly affected by gang-related crime, share
in the indirect costs such as lower property values, higher insurance
premiums, and the endangerment of our youth. Moreover, our first
responders find themselves increasingly vulnerable to personal injury
or death when responding to gang-related crimes such as drug dealing,
assault, driving without a license, or attempting to elude a police
vehicle.
It is the intent of the legislature to establish a work group to
evaluate and make legislative recommendations regarding the problem of
gang-related crime in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The office of the attorney general is
directed to establish a work group to evaluate the problem of
gang-related crime in Washington state. Members shall include one
member from each of the two largest caucuses in the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, one member from each of the two largest caucuses in
the senate, appointed by the president of the senate, representatives
of local law enforcement, prosecutors and municipal attorneys, criminal
defense attorneys, court administrators, prison or detention
administrators and probation officers, and experts in gang or
delinquency prevention including the governor's juvenile justice
advisory committee. The work group shall evaluate and make
recommendations regarding additional legislative measures to combat
gang-related crime, the creation of a statewide gang information
database, possible reforms to the juvenile justice system for
gang-related juvenile offenses, best practices for prevention and
intervention of youth gang membership, and the adoption of legislation
authorizing a civil antigang injunction. The office of the attorney
general shall report back to the legislature on its findings and the
recommendations of the work group or groups on or before January 1,
2008.

--- END ---