BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.143 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 901 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The uniform medical plan benefits administration account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the administrator
or the administrator's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. Moneys in the account shall be used exclusively for
contracted expenditures for uniform medical plan claims administration,
data analysis, utilization management, preferred provider
administration, and activities related to benefits administration where
the level of services provided pursuant to a contract fluctuate as a
direct result of changes in uniform medical plan enrollment. Moneys in
the account may also be used for administrative activities required to
respond to new and unforeseen conditions that impact the uniform
medical plan, but only when the authority and the office of financial
management jointly agree that such activities must be initiated prior
to the next legislative session.
(2) Receipts from amounts due from or on behalf of uniform medical
plan enrollees for expenditures related to benefits administration,
including moneys disbursed from the public employees' and retirees'
insurance account, shall be deposited into the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for expenditures. All proposals for
allotment increases shall be provided to the house of representatives
appropriations committee and to the senate ways and means committee at
the same time as they are provided to the office of financial
management.
(3) The uniform dental plan benefits administration account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the administrator
or the administrator's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. Moneys in the account shall be used exclusively for
contracted expenditures related to benefits administration for the
uniform dental plan as established under RCW 41.05.140. Receipts from
amounts due from or on behalf of uniform dental plan enrollees for
expenditures related to benefits administration, including moneys
disbursed from the public employees' and retirees' insurance account,
shall be deposited into the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for expenditures.
(4) The public employees' benefits board medical benefits
administration account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. Only the administrator or the administrator's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. Moneys in the account shall
be used exclusively for contracted expenditures related to claims
administration, data analysis, utilization management, preferred
provider administration, and other activities related to benefits
administration for self-insured medical plans other than the uniform
medical plan. Receipts from amounts due from or on behalf of enrollees
for expenditures related to benefits administration, including moneys
disbursed from the public employees' and retirees' insurance account,
shall be deposited into the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

--- END ---