BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The real and personal property owned and used exclusively by a
nonprofit small business incubator is exempt from property tax to the
extent the nonprofit organization provides, on an ongoing basis,
business-related training designed to assist new businesses in forming
a sound business plan, daily management support services, and general
technical assistance. This includes areas of the real property used by
the nonprofit for administrative offices, common areas of buildings,
and meeting or training rooms, as well as parking spaces reserved for
administrative staff, that are under the direct control and supervision
of the nonprofit organization and for which no rent or fee for use is
charged to client businesses.
(a) For purposes of this section, a "nonprofit small business
incubator" means a business incubator that is recognized by the federal
internal revenue service as an organization exempt from taxation under
Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or (c)(6) of the federal internal
revenue code.
(b) Any portion of the real property that is not exclusively used
or leased by the nonprofit organization, or that is otherwise used by
a for-profit business, will nullify the exemption and subject that area
of the property to taxation.
(2) In order to maintain eligibility to receive the exemption under
this section, a nonprofit organization that otherwise meets the
requirements in subsection (1) of this section must: (a) Apply for the
Washington state quality award within two years after first receiving
the exemption in this section; and (b) reapply for the Washington state
quality award at least once every three years after the initial
application for the award program.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.36.810 and 2006 c 305 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Upon cessation of a use under which an exemption has been
granted pursuant to RCW 84.36.030, 84.36.037, 84.36.040, 84.36.041,
84.36.042, 84.36.043, 84.36.046, 84.36.050, 84.36.060, 84.36.550,
84.36.560, 84.36.570, ((and)) 84.36.650, and section 1 of this act,
except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the county treasurer
shall collect all taxes which would have been paid had the property not
been exempt during the three years preceding, or the life of such
exemption, if such be less, together with the interest at the same rate
and computed in the same way as that upon delinquent property taxes.
If the property has been granted an exemption for more than ten
consecutive years, taxes and interest shall not be assessed under this
section.
(b) Upon cessation of use by an institution of higher education of
property exempt under RCW 84.36.050(2) the county treasurer shall
collect all taxes which would have been paid had the property not been
exempt during the seven years preceding, or the life of the exemption,
whichever is less.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies only when ownership of
the property is transferred or when fifty-one percent or more of the
area of the property loses its exempt status. The additional tax under
subsection (1) of this section shall not be imposed if the cessation of
use resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a nonprofit organization, association, or
corporation for a use which also qualifies and is granted exemption
under this chapter;
(b) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain,
or sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in
anticipation of the exercise of such power;
(c) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the property is located which disallows
the present use of such property;
(d) A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or
other such calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the
organization, association, or corporation changing the use of such
property;
(e) Relocation of the activity and use of another location or site
except for undeveloped properties of camp facilities exempted under RCW
84.36.030;
(f) Cancellation of a lease on leased property that had been exempt
under this chapter;
(g) A change in the exempt portion of a home for the aging under
RCW 84.36.041(3), as long as some portion of the home remains exempt;
or
(h) Transfer to an agency of the state of Washington or the city or
county within which the property is located.
(3) Subsection (2)(e) and (f) of this section ((do [does])) does
not apply to property leased to a state institution of higher education
and exempt under RCW 84.36.050(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2009 and thereafter.

--- END ---