BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to promote the safe
condition and operation of cranes used in construction work by
establishing certification requirements for construction cranes and
qualifications for construction crane operators. The legislature
intends that standards for safety of construction cranes and for
certification of personnel operating cranes in construction work be
established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 2 through
5 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Apprentice operator or trainee" means a crane operator who has
not met requirements established by the department under section 5 of
this act.
(2) "Attachments" includes, but is not limited to, crane-attached
or suspended hooks, magnets, grapples, clamshell buckets, orange peel
buckets, concrete buckets, drag lines, personnel platforms, augers, or
drills and pile-driving equipment.
(3) "Certified crane inspector" means a crane inspector who has
been certified by the department.
(4) "Construction" means all or any part of excavation,
construction, erection, alteration, repair, demolition, and dismantling
of buildings and other structures and all related operations; the
excavation, construction, alteration, and repair of sewers, trenches,
caissons, conduits, pipelines, roads, and all related operations; the
moving of buildings and other structures, and the construction,
alteration, repair, or removal of wharfs, docks, bridges, culverts,
trestles, piers, abutments, or any other related construction,
alteration, repair, or removal work. "Construction" does not include
manufacturing facilities or powerhouses.
(5) "Crane" means power-operated equipment used in construction
that can hoist, lower, and horizontally move a suspended load. "Crane"
includes, but is not limited to: Articulating cranes, such as knuckle-boom cranes; crawler cranes; floating cranes; cranes on barges;
locomotive cranes; mobile cranes, such as wheel-mounted, rough-terrain,
all-terrain, commercial truck mounted, and boom truck cranes;
multipurpose machines when configured to hoist and lower by means of a
winch or hook and horizontally move a suspended load; industrial
cranes, such as carry-deck cranes; dedicated pile drivers;
service/mechanic trucks with a hoisting device; a crane on a monorail;
tower cranes, such as fixed jib, hammerhead boom, luffing boom, and
self-erecting; pedestal cranes; portal cranes; overhead and gantry
cranes; straddle cranes; side-boom tractors; derricks; and variations
of such equipment.
(6) "Crane operator" means an individual engaged in the operation
of a crane.
(7) "Professional engineer" means a professional engineer as
defined in RCW 18.43.020.
(8) "Qualified crane operator" means a crane operator who meets the
requirements established by the department under section 5 of this act.
(9) "Safety or health standard" means a standard adopted under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Sections 2 through 5 of this act apply to cranes used with or
without attachments.
(2) Sections 2 through 5 of this act do not apply to:
(a) A crane while it has been converted or adapted for a
nonhoisting or nonlifting use including, but not limited to, power
shovels, excavators, and concrete pumps;
(b) Power shovels, excavators, wheel loaders, backhoes, loader
backhoes, and track loaders when used with or without chains, slings,
or other rigging to lift suspended loads;
(c) Automotive wreckers and tow trucks when used to clear wrecks
and haul vehicles;
(d) Service trucks with mobile lifting devices designed
specifically for use in the power line and electric service industries,
such as digger derricks (radial boom derricks), when used in the power
line and electric service industries for auguring holes to set power
and utility poles, or handling associated materials to be installed or
removed from utility poles;
(e) Equipment originally designed as vehicle-mounted aerial devices
(for lifting personnel) and self-propelled elevating work platforms;
(f) Hydraulic jacking systems, including telescopic/hydraulic
gantries;
(g) Stacker cranes;
(h) Powered industrial trucks (forklifts);
(i) Mechanic's truck with a hoisting device when used in activities
related to equipment maintenance and repair;
(j) Equipment that hoists by using a come-along or chainfall;
(k) Dedicated drilling rigs;
(l) Gin poles used for the erection of communication towers;
(m) Tree trimming and tree removal work;
(n) Anchor handling with a vessel or barge using an affixed A-frame;
(o) Roustabouts;
(p) Cranes used on-site in manufacturing facilities or powerhouses
for occasional or routine maintenance and repair work; and
(q) Crane operators operating cranes on-site in manufacturing
facilities or powerhouses for occasional or routine maintenance and
repair work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish, by rule, a crane certification
program for cranes used in construction. In establishing rules, the
department shall consult nationally recognized crane standards.
(2) The crane certification program must include, at a minimum, the
following:
(a) The department shall establish certification requirements for
crane inspectors, including an experience requirement, an education
requirement, a training requirement, and other necessary requirements
determined by the director;
(b) The department shall establish a process for certified crane
inspectors to issue temporary certificates of operation for a crane and
the department to issue a final certificate of operation for a crane
after a certified crane inspector determines that the crane meets
safety or health standards, including meeting or exceeding national
periodic inspection requirements recognized by the department;
(c) Crane owners must ensure that cranes are inspected and load
proof tested by a certified crane inspector at least annually and after
any significant modification or significant repairs of structural
parts. If the use of weights for a unit proof load test is not
possible or reasonable, other recording test equipment may be used. In
adopting rules implementing this requirement, the department may
consider similar standards and practices used by the federal
government;
(d) Tower cranes and tower crane assembly parts must be inspected
by a certified crane inspector both prior to assembly and following
erection of a tower crane;
(e) Before installation of a nonstandard tower crane base, the
engineering design of the nonstandard base shall be reviewed and
acknowledged as acceptable by an independent professional engineer;
(f) A certified crane inspector must notify the department and the
crane owner if, after inspection, the certified crane inspector finds
that the crane does not meet safety or health standards. A certified
crane inspector shall not attest that a crane meets safety or health
standards until any deficiencies are corrected and the correction is
verified by the certified crane inspector; and
(g) Inspection reports including all information and documentation
obtained from a crane inspection shall be made available or provided to
the department by a certified crane inspector upon request.
(3) Except as provided in section 3(2) of this act, any crane
operated in the state must have a valid temporary or final certificate
of operation issued by the certified crane inspector or department
posted in the operator's cab or station.
(4) Certificates of operation issued by the department under the
crane certification program established in this section are valid for
one year from the effective date of the temporary operating certificate
issued by the certified crane inspector.
(5) This section does not apply to maritime cranes regulated by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except for training purposes as provided in subsection (3) of
this section, an employer or contractor shall not permit a crane
operator to operate a crane unless the crane operator is a qualified
crane operator.
(2) The department shall establish, by rule, requirements that must
be met to be considered a qualified crane operator. In establishing
rules, the department shall consult nationally recognized crane
standards for crane operator certification. The rules must include, at
a minimum, the following:
(a) The crane operator must have a valid crane operator
certificate, for the type of crane to be operated, issued by a crane
operator testing organization accredited by a nationally recognized
accrediting agency which administers written and practical
examinations, has procedures for recertification that enable the crane
operator to recertify at least every five years, and is recognized by
the department;
(b) The crane operator must have up to two thousand hours of
documented crane operator experience, which meets experience levels
established by the department for crane types and capacities by rule;
and
(c) The crane operator must pass a substance abuse test conducted
by a recognized laboratory service.
(3) An apprentice operator or trainee may operate a crane when:
(a) The apprentice operator or trainee has been provided with
training prior to operating the crane that enables the apprentice
operator or trainee to operate the crane safely;
(b) The apprentice operator or trainee performs operating tasks
that are within his or her ability, as determined by the supervising
qualified crane operator; and
(c) The apprentice operator or trainee is under the direct and
continuous supervision of a qualified crane operator who meets the
following requirements:
(i) The qualified crane operator is an employee or agent of the
employer of the apprentice operator or trainee;
(ii) The qualified crane operator is familiar with the proper use
of the crane's controls;
(iii) While supervising the apprentice operator or trainee, the
qualified crane operator performs no tasks that detract from the
qualified crane operator's ability to supervise the apprentice operator
or trainee;
(iv) For equipment other than tower cranes, the qualified crane
operator and the apprentice operator or trainee must be in direct line
of sight of each other and shall communicate verbally or by hand
signals; and
(v) For tower cranes, the qualified crane operator and the
apprentice operator or trainee must be in direct communication with
each other.
(4) The department may recognize crane operator certification from
another state or territory of the United States as equivalent to
qualified crane operator requirements if the department determines that
the other jurisdiction's credentialing standards are substantially
similar to the qualified crane operator requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of labor and industries shall adopt rules necessary
to implement sections 2 through 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

--- END ---