BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Damage caused by deer grazing on crop lands
is detrimental to productive agriculture in Washington state. When the
currently authorized methods of addressing problem animals are
ineffective, including methods that often times may not be used because
of the dangers associated with fire season, responsible farmers and
ranchers must be authorized to take actions to protect their
livelihood.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must issue a farm tag to a farmer or rancher who
meets the requirements of this section. A farm tag is valid for
hunting deer only on those lands owned or leased by the farmer or
rancher who was granted the farm tag.
(2) The department must grant one farm tag for every two animals in
the highest verified count to a farmer or rancher:
(a)(i) Who is able to provide a written demonstration of a loss of
production based on yield due to damage caused by deer grazing; and
(ii) Who is able to provide photographic or third-party
verification of the number of deer on their property at least one time
within the preceding thirty-day period; or
(b)(i) Who has a count of at least twenty deer on their property a
minimum of three times within the preceding thirty-day period; and
(ii) Who is able to provide photographic or third-party
verification of such a count for at least one of the three occurrences.
(3) The department must issue the farm tag within seven days of
receipt of a written demonstration of loss of production based on yield
as provided in subsection (2)(a) of this section or notice and
verification of animal counts as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this
section.
(4) A farmer or rancher may sell a farm tag to recoup their crop
losses or may give a tag away.
(5) If the farm or ranch is located in an area where the local
legislative authority has restricted the discharge of firearms, weapons
used pursuant to a farm tag must be limited to shotguns with slugs,
muzzle loaders, or bow and arrow.
(6) A farmer or rancher may set the season for a farm tag after the
first of August, but may not set the season during any open regular
season.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.36.020 and 2003 c 385 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall work closely with landowners and tenants
suffering game damage problems to control damage without killing the
animals when practical, to increase the harvest of damage-causing
animals in hunting seasons, and to kill the animals when no other
practical means of damage control is feasible. A farmer or rancher may
choose to address damage to crop lands caused by deer using the option
provided under this section or by using the option provided under
section 2 of this act.
If the department receives recurring complaints regarding property
being damaged as described in this section or RCW 77.36.030 from the
owner or tenant of real property, or receives such complaints from
several such owners or tenants in a locale, the commission shall
conduct a special hunt or special hunts or take remedial action to
reduce the potential for such damage. The commission shall authorize
either one or two antlerless permits per hunter for special hunts held
in damage areas where qualified department staff, or their designee,
have confirmed six incidents of crop damage by deer or elk.
As an alternative to hunting, the department shall work with
affected entities to relocate deer and elk when needed to augment
existing herds.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.36.030 and 1996 c 54 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the following limitations and conditions, the owner,
the owner's immediate family member, the owner's documented employee,
or a tenant of real property may trap or kill on that property, without
the licenses required under RCW 77.32.010 or authorization from the
director under RCW 77.12.240, wild animals or wild birds that are
damaging crops, domestic animals, or fowl:
(a) Threatened or endangered species shall not be hunted, trapped,
or killed;
(b) Except in an emergency situation or as provided under section
2 of this act, deer, elk, and protected wildlife shall not be killed
without a permit issued and conditioned by the director or the
director's designee. In an emergency, the department may give verbal
permission followed by written permission to trap or kill any deer,
elk, or protected wildlife that is damaging crops, domestic animals, or
fowl; and
(c) On privately owned cattle ranching lands, the land owner or
lessee may declare an emergency only when the department has not
responded within forty-eight hours after having been contacted by the
land owner or lessee regarding damage caused by wild animals or wild
birds, or in cases where damage is caused by deer, the landowner may
opt to follow the process set out in section 2 of this act to receive
farm tags. In such an emergency, the owner or lessee may trap or kill
any deer, elk, or other protected wildlife that is causing the damage
but deer and elk may only be killed if such lands were open to public
hunting during the previous hunting season, or the closure to public
hunting was coordinated with the department to protect property and
livestock.
(2) Except for coyotes and Columbian ground squirrels, wildlife
trapped or killed under this section remain the property of the state,
and the person trapping or killing the wildlife shall notify the
department immediately. The department shall dispose of wildlife so
taken within three days of receiving such a notification and in a
manner determined by the director to be in the best interest of the
state.

--- END ---