BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.162.005 and 2003 c 235 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that Washington's innovation and trade-driven
economy has provided tremendous opportunities for citizens of the
state, but that there is no guarantee that globally competitive firms
will continue to grow and locate in the state. The current economic
development system is fragmented among numerous programs, councils,
centers, and organizations with inadequate overall coordination and
insufficient guidance built into the system to ensure that the system
is responsive to its customers. The current economic development
system's data-gathering and evaluation methods are inconsistent and
unable to provide adequate information for determining how well the
system is performing on a regular basis so the system may be held
accountable for its outcomes.
The legislature also finds that developing ((an effective)) a
comprehensive economic development ((strategy for the state and
operating)) strategic plan to guide the operation of effective economic
development programs, including workforce training, infrastructure
development, small business assistance, technology transfer, and export
assistance, ((are)) is vital to the state's efforts to increase the
competitiveness of state businesses, encourage employment growth,
increase state revenues, and generate economic well-being. ((In
addition, the legislature finds that)) There is a need for responsive
and consistent involvement of the private sector in the state's
economic development efforts. It is the intent of the legislature to
create an economic development commission that will ((develop and
update the state's economic development strategy and performance
measures and provide advice to and oversight of the department of
community, trade, and economic development)) provide planning,
coordination, evaluation, monitoring, and policy analysis and
development for the state economic development system as a whole, and
advice to the governor and legislature concerning the state economic
development system.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.162.010 and 2003 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission is
established ((to oversee the economic development strategies and
policies of the department of community, trade, and economic
development)) as a state agency.
(2)(a) The Washington state economic development commission shall
consist of ((at least seven and no more than nine)) eleven voting
members appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate as
follows: Six representatives of the private sector, one representative
of labor, one representative of port districts, two representatives of
institutions of higher education, and one representative of associate
development organizations. The director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development, the director of the
workforce training and education coordinating board, the commissioner
of the employment security department, and the chairs of the standing
committees of the house of representatives and the senate overseeing
economic development policies shall serve as nonvoting ex officio
members.
The chair of the commission shall be a nonvoting member selected by
the governor with the consent of the senate, and shall serve at the
pleasure of the governor. In selecting the chair, the governor shall
seek a person who understands the future economic needs of the state
and nation and the role the state's economic development system has in
meeting those needs. Each member of the commission may appoint a
designee to function in his or her place and designees appointed by a
voting member shall have the right to vote.
(b) In making the appointments, the governor shall consult with
organizations that have an interest in economic development, including,
but not limited to, industry associations, labor organizations,
minority business associations, economic development councils, chambers
of commerce, port associations, tribes, and the chairs of the
legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development.
(c) The members shall be representative of the geographic regions
of the state, including eastern and central Washington, as well as
represent the ethnic diversity of the state. ((Representation shall
derive primarily from the)) Private sector((, including, but not
limited to,)) members shall represent existing and emerging industries,
small businesses, women-owned businesses, and minority-owned
businesses((, but other sectors of the economy that have experience in
economic development, including labor organizations and nonprofit
organizations, shall be represented as well. A minimum of seventy-five
percent of the members shall represent the private sector)). Members
of the commission shall serve statewide interests while preserving
their diverse perspectives, and shall be recognized leaders in their
fields with demonstrated experience in economic development or
disciplines related to economic development.
(3) Members appointed by the governor shall serve at the pleasure
of the governor for three-year terms((, except that through June 30,
2004, members currently serving on the economic development commission
created by executive order may continue to serve at the pleasure of the
governor. Of the initial members appointed to serve after June 30,
2004, two members shall serve one-year terms, three members shall serve
two-year terms, and the remainder of the commission members shall serve
three-year terms)).
(4) ((The commission chair shall be selected from among the
appointed members by the majority vote of the members.
(5))) The commission may establish committees as it desires, and
may invite nonmembers of the commission to serve as committee members.
(5) The director of the commission shall be appointed by the
governor from a list of three names submitted by the voting members of
the commission. The governor may request, and the commission shall
provide, an additional list or lists from which the governor shall
select the director. The lists compiled by the commission may not be
subject to public disclosure. The governor may dismiss the director
only with the approval of a majority vote of the commission. The
commission, by a majority vote, may dismiss the director with the
approval of the governor.
(6) The commission may adopt rules for its own governance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.162 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall serve as chief executive officer of the
commission who shall administer the provisions of this chapter, employ
such personnel as may be necessary to implement the purposes of this
chapter, and utilize staff of existing operating agencies to the
fullest extent possible.
(2) The director may not be the chair of the commission.
(3) Subject to the approval of the commission, the director shall
appoint necessary deputy and assistant directors and other staff who
shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW. The
director's appointees shall serve at the director's pleasure on such
terms and conditions as the director determines but subject to chapter
42.52 RCW.
(4) The director shall appoint and employ such other employees as
may be required for the proper discharge of the functions of the
commission.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.162.020 and 2003 c 235 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state economic development commission shall
((perform the following duties:
(1) Review and periodically update the state's economic development
strategy, including implementation steps, and performance measures, and
perform an annual evaluation of the strategy and the effectiveness of
the state's laws, policies, and programs which target economic
development;
(2) Provide policy, strategic, and programmatic direction to the
department of community, trade, and economic development regarding
strategies to:
(a) Promote business retention, expansion, and creation within the
state;
(b) Promote the business climate of the state and stimulate
increased national and international investment in the state;
(c) Promote products and services of the state;
(d) Enhance relationships and cooperation between local
governments, economic development councils, federal agencies, state
agencies, and the legislature;
(e) Integrate economic development programs, including work force
training, technology transfer, and export assistance; and
(f) Make the funds available for economic development purposes more
flexible to meet emergent needs and maximize opportunities;
(3) Identify policies and programs to assist Washington's small
businesses;
(4) Assist the department of community, trade, and economic
development with procurement and deployment of private funds for
business development, retention, expansion, and recruitment as well as
other economic development efforts;
(5) Meet with the chairs and ranking minority members of the
legislative committees from both the house of representatives and the
senate overseeing economic development policies; and
(6) Make a biennial report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature regarding the commission's review of the state's economic
development policy, the commission's recommendations, and steps taken
by the department of community, trade, and economic development to
implement the recommendations. The first report is due by December 31,
2004)):
(1) Concentrate its major efforts on planning, coordination,
evaluation, policy analysis, and recommending improvements to the
state's economic development system;
(2) Develop and maintain on a biennial basis a state comprehensive
plan for economic development, including but not limited to goals,
objectives, and priorities for the state economic development system;
identify the elements local associate development organizations must
include in their countywide economic development plans; and review the
state system for consistency with the state comprehensive plan. In
developing the state comprehensive plan for economic development, the
commission shall use, but may not be limited to: Economic, labor
market, and populations trend reports in office of financial management
forecasts; the annual state economic climate report prepared by the
economic climate council; joint office of financial management and
employment security department labor force, industry employment, and
occupational forecasts; the results of scientifically based outcome
evaluations; the needs of industry associations, industry clusters,
businesses, and employees as evidenced in formal surveys and other
input;
(3) Establish and maintain an inventory of the programs of the
state economic development system and related state programs; perform
a biennial assessment of the ongoing and strategic economic development
needs of the state; and assess the extent to which the economic
development system and related programs represent a consistent,
coordinated, and integrated approach to meet such needs;
(4)(a) Monitor for consistency with the state comprehensive plan
for economic development the policies and plans established for:
(i) Business and technical assistance by the small business
development center, the Washington manufacturing service, the
Washington technology center, associate development organizations, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, and the
office of minority and women-owned business enterprises;
(ii) Export assistance by the small business export finance
assistance center, the international marketing program for agricultural
commodities and trade, the department of agriculture, the center for
international trade in forest products, associate development
organizations, and the department of community, trade, and economic
development; and
(iii) Infrastructure development by the department of community,
trade, and economic development and the department of transportation;
(b) Work with the workforce training and education coordinating
board to ensure alignment of the state comprehensive plan for economic
development with the state comprehensive plan for workforce training
and education; and
(c) Review and make recommendations to the office of financial
management and the legislature on budget requests and legislative
proposals relating to the state economic development system for
purposes of consistency with the state comprehensive plan for economic
development;
(5) Provide for coordination among the different agencies,
organizations, and components of the state economic development system
at the state level and at the regional level;
(6) Advocate for the state economic development system and for
meeting the needs of industry associations, industry clusters,
businesses, and employees;
(7) Develop a consistent and reliable database on participation
rates, costs, program activities, and outcomes from publicly funded
economic development programs in this state;
(8) Establish standards for data collection and maintenance for
providers in the economic development system in a format that is
accessible to use by the commission. The commission shall require a
minimum of common core data to be collected by each entity providing
economic development services with public funds and shall develop
requirements for minimum common core data in consultation with the
economic climate council, the office of financial management, and the
providers of economic development services;
(9) Establish minimum common standards and metrics for program
evaluation of economic development programs, and monitor such program
evaluations;
(10) Every two years administer scientifically based outcome
evaluations of the state economic development system including, but not
limited to, surveys of industry associations, industry cluster
associations, and businesses served by publicly funded economic
development programs; matches with employment security department
payroll and wage files; and matches with department of revenue tax
files;
(11) Provide for effectiveness and efficiency reviews of the state
economic development system;
(12) Participate in the development of coordination criteria for
business recruitment, expansion and retention activities carried out by
the department of community, trade, and economic development, and
related programs and services provided by local economic development
entities such as ports, associate development organizations, and
chambers of commerce;
(13) Evaluate proposals for expenditure from the economic
development strategic reserve account and recommend expenditures from
the account; and
(14) Produce a biennial report to the governor and the legislature
on progress by the commission in coordinating the state's economic
development system and meeting the other obligations of this chapter,
as well as include recommendations for any statutory changes necessary
to enhance operational efficiencies or improve coordination.
The commission may delegate to the director any of the functions of
this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.162.030 and 2003 c 235 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) The Washington state economic development commission shall
receive the necessary staff support from the staff resources of the
governor, the department of community, trade, and economic development,
and other state agencies as appropriate, and within existing resources
and operations.
(2))) Creation of the Washington state economic development
commission shall not be construed to modify any authority or budgetary
responsibility of the governor or the department of community, trade,
and economic development.

--- END ---