BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.350.005 and 2005 c 424 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature declares that promoting the health of state
residents is a fundamental purpose of state government. The
legislature declares it to be a clear public purpose and governmental
function to promote life sciences research and development to foster a
preventive and predictive vision of the next generation of health-related innovations, to enhance the competitive position of Washington
state in this vital sector of the economy, and to improve the quality
and delivery of health care for the people of Washington. The
legislature finds that public support for and promotion of life
sciences research and development will benefit the state and its
residents through improved health status and health outcomes, economic
development, and contributions to scientific knowledge, and such
research and development will lead to breakthroughs and improvements
that might not otherwise be discovered due to lack of existing market
incentives, especially in the area of regenerative medicine. The
legislature finds that public support for and promotion of life
sciences research and development has the potential to provide cures or
new treatments for many debilitating diseases that cost the state
millions of dollars each year. It is appropriate and consistent with
the intent of the master settlement agreement between the state and
tobacco product manufacturers to invest a portion of the revenues
derived therefrom by the state in life sciences research and
development, to leverage the revenues with other funds, and to
encourage cooperation and innovation among public and private
institutions involved in life sciences research and development. The
purpose of this chapter is to establish a life sciences discovery fund
authority, to grant that authority the power to contract with the state
to receive revenues under the master settlement agreement, and to
contract with other entities to receive other funds, and to disburse
those funds consistent with the purpose of this chapter. The life
sciences discovery fund is intended to promote the best available
research in life sciences disciplines through diverse Washington
institutions, promote commercialization, and ((to)) build upon existing
strengths in the area of biosciences and biomanufacturing in order to
spread the economic benefits across the state. The life sciences
discovery fund is also intended to foster improved health care outcomes
and improved agricultural production research across this state and the
world. The research and development investments of the life sciences
discovery fund are intended to further the goals of the "Bio 21" report
and to support future statewide, comprehensive strategies to lead the
nation in life sciences-related research, commercial development, and
employment.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.350.010 and 2005 c 424 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means the life sciences discovery fund authority
created in this chapter.
(2) "Board" means the governing board of trustees of the authority.
(3) "Contribution agreement" means any agreement authorized under
this chapter in which a private entity or a public entity other than
the state agrees to provide to the authority contributions for the
purpose of promoting life sciences research and development.
(4) "Life sciences research and development" means advanced and
applied research ((and)), development, and commercialization intended
to improve human health, including scientific study of the developing
brain and human learning and development, and other areas of scientific
research and development vital to the state's economy.
(5) "Master settlement agreement" means the national master
settlement agreement and related documents entered into on November 23,
1998, by the state and the four principal United States tobacco product
manufacturers, as amended and supplemented, for the settlement of
litigation brought by the state against the tobacco product
manufacturers.
(6) "Public employee" means any person employed by the state of
Washington or any agency or political subdivision thereof.
(7) "Public facilities" means any public institution, public
facility, public equipment, or any physical asset owned, leased, or
controlled by the state of Washington or any agency or political
subdivision thereof.
(8) "Public funds" means any funds received or controlled by the
state of Washington or any agency or political subdivision thereof,
including, but not limited to, funds derived from federal, state, or
local taxes, gifts or grants from any source, public or private,
federal grants or payments, or intergovernmental transfers.
(9) "State agreement" means the agreement authorized under this
chapter in which the state provides to the authority the strategic
contribution payments required to be made by tobacco product
manufacturers to the state and the state's rights to receive such
payments, pursuant to the master settlement agreement, for the purpose
of promoting life sciences research and development.
(10) "Strategic contribution payments" means the payments
designated as such under the master settlement agreement, which will be
made to the state in the years 2008 through 2017.
(11) "Commercialization" means a sequence of steps, including
technology transfer, technical assistance in product development,
production process design, and technical skills development, necessary
to achieve market entry and general market competitiveness of new
innovative technologies, processes, and products.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.350.020 and 2005 c 424 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The life sciences discovery fund authority is created and
constitutes a public instrumentality and agency of the state, separate
and distinct from the state, exercising public and essential
governmental functions.
(2) The powers of the authority are vested in and shall be
exercised by a board of trustees consisting of: Two members of either
the house appropriations committee or the house committee dealing with
technology issues, one from each caucus, to be appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives; two members of either the senate
committee on ways and means or the senate committee dealing with
technology issues, one from each caucus, to be appointed by the
president of the senate; and seven members appointed by the governor
with the consent of the senate, one of whom shall be appointed by the
governor as chair of the authority and who shall serve on the board and
as chair of the authority at the pleasure of the governor. At least
one member of the board shall be experienced in facilitating the
commercialization process. The respective officials shall make the
initial appointments no later than thirty days after May 12, 2005. The
term of the trustees, other than the chair, is four years from the date
of their appointment, except that the terms of three of the initial
gubernatorial appointees, as determined by the governor, are for two
years from the date of their appointment. A trustee appointed by the
governor may be removed by the governor for cause under RCW 43.06.070
and 43.06.080. The appropriate official shall fill any vacancy on the
board by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term. The
trustees appointed by the governor shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.240 and may be reimbursed, solely from the funds of the
authority, for expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties under
this chapter, subject to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The trustees who
are legislators shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 44.04.120.
(3) Seven members of the board constitute a quorum.
(4) The trustees shall elect a treasurer and secretary annually,
and other officers as the trustees determine necessary, and may adopt
bylaws or rules for their own government.
(5) Meetings of the board shall be held in accordance with the open
public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, and at the call of the chair or
when a majority of the trustees so requests. Meetings of the board may
be held at any location within or out of the state, and trustees may
participate in a meeting of the board by means of a conference
telephone or similar communication equipment under RCW 23B.08.200.
(6) The authority is subject to audit by the state auditor.
(7) The attorney general must advise the authority and represent it
in all legal proceedings.
The authority shall collaborate with organizations with
commercialization expertise such as the Spokane intercollegiate
research and technology institute, the Washington technology center,
and Washington manufacturing services, and contract with such
organizations for the provision of technical assistance in
commercialization as appropriate.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.350.030 and 2005 c 424 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to other powers and duties prescribed in this chapter,
the authority is empowered to:
(1) Use public moneys in the life sciences discovery fund,
leveraging those moneys with amounts received from other public and
private sources in accordance with contribution agreements, to promote
life sciences research and development;
(2) Solicit and receive gifts, grants, and bequests, and enter into
contribution agreements with private entities and public entities other
than the state to receive moneys in consideration of the authority's
promise to leverage those moneys with amounts received through
appropriations from the legislature and contributions from other public
entities and private entities, in order to use those moneys to promote
life sciences research and development. Nonstate moneys received by
the authority for this purpose shall be deposited in the life sciences
discovery fund created in RCW 43.350.070;
(3) Hold funds received by the authority in trust for their use
pursuant to this chapter to promote life sciences research and
development;
(4) Manage its funds, obligations, and investments as necessary and
as consistent with its purpose including the segregation of revenues
into separate funds and accounts;
(5) Make grants to entities pursuant to contract for the promotion
of life sciences research and development to be conducted in the state.
Grant agreements shall specify deliverables to be provided by the
recipient pursuant to the grant. The authority shall solicit requests
for funding and evaluate the requests by reference to factors such as:
(a) The quality of the proposed research or the proposed technical
assistance in product development or production process design; (b) its
potential to improve health outcomes, with particular attention to the
likelihood that it will also lower health care costs, substitute for a
more costly diagnostic or treatment modality, or offer a breakthrough
treatment for a particular disease or condition; (c) its potential for
leveraging additional funding; (d) its potential to provide health care
benefits or benefit human learning and development; (e) its potential
to stimulate ((the)) or promote technical skills training for health
care delivery, biomedical manufacturing, and life sciences related
employment in the state; (f) the geographic diversity of the grantees
within Washington; (g) evidence of potential royalty income and
contractual means to recapture such income for purposes of this
chapter; and (h) evidence of public and private collaboration;
(6) Create one or more advisory boards composed of scientists,
industrialists, and others familiar with life sciences research and
development; ((and))
(7) Adopt policies and procedures to facilitate the orderly process
of grant application, review, and reward; and
(8) Upon the recommendation of the Washington economic development
commission, provide funding for the recruitment of life sciences
researchers to public research institutions in the state who have a
history of commercialization of new technologies.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.350.040 and 2005 c 424 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The authority has all the general powers necessary to carry out its
purposes and duties and to exercise its specific powers. In addition
to other powers specified in this chapter, the authority may: (1) Sue
and be sued in its own name; (2) make and execute agreements,
contracts, and other instruments, with any public or private person or
entity, in accordance with this chapter; (3) employ, contract with, or
engage independent counsel, financial advisors, auditors, other
technical or professional assistants, and such other personnel as are
necessary or desirable to implement this chapter; (4) establish such
special funds, and controls on deposits to and disbursements from them,
as it finds convenient for the implementation of this chapter; (5)
enter into contracts with public and private entities for life sciences
research and development to be conducted in the state; (6) adopt rules,
consistent with this chapter; (7) delegate any of its powers and duties
if consistent with the purposes of this chapter; (8) exercise any other
power reasonably required to implement the purposes of this chapter;
and (9) hire staff and pay administrative costs.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.350.050 and 2005 c 424 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Members of the board and persons acting on behalf of the authority,
while acting within the scope of their employment or agency, are not
subject to personal liability resulting from carrying out the powers
and duties conferred on them under this chapter. Neither the state nor
the authority is liable for any loss, damage, harm, or other
consequence resulting directly or indirectly from grants made by the
authority or by any life sciences research and development funded by
such grants.

--- END ---