BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
In an effort to protect the public health, safety, and welfare, the
legislature has authorized and funded programs addressing child and
elderly abuse and neglect and criminal offenders. The work undertaken
by state employees and agents to deliver these important services
requires them to make decisions based upon circumstantial evidence and
measurable risk of harm associated with the available competing
choices.
The legislature is obligated for policy reasons and fiscal
responsibility to assure the state is accountable under fair and
reasonable standards of negligence. The state cannot guarantee the
safety of its citizens, particularly in cases of harm involving the
criminal conduct of others. The legislature expects state workers to
perform this difficult work nonnegligently, and does not intend to
immunize the state for negligence. However, the legislature finds that
the citizens of this state should not be liable when the state worker
exercises reasonable care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
The state or a person, individually or in a representative capacity
for the state, or a unit of local government or its representatives or
agents if acting as an agent of the state, who is involved in the
delivery of social and health services through the department of social
and health services, is not liable for selecting one of two or more
alternative courses of action even though the course of action chosen
results in a poor outcome if the person exercised reasonable care and
skill in arriving at the judgment to follow the particular course of
action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
In an effort to protect the public health, safety, and welfare, the
legislature has authorized and funded programs addressing child and
elderly abuse and neglect and criminal offenders. The work undertaken
by state employees and agents to deliver these important services
requires them to make decisions based upon circumstantial evidence and
measurable risk of harm associated with the available competing
choices.
The legislature is obligated for policy reasons and fiscal
responsibility to assure the state is accountable under fair and
reasonable standards of negligence. The state cannot guarantee the
safety of its citizens, particularly in cases of harm involving the
criminal conduct of others. The legislature expects state workers to
perform this difficult work nonnegligently, and does not intend to
immunize the state for negligence. However, the legislature finds that
the citizens of this state should not be liable when the state worker
exercises reasonable care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The state or a person, individually or in a representative capacity
for the state, or a unit of local government or its representatives or
agents if acting as an agent of the state, who is involved in the
delivery of services through the department of corrections, is not
liable for selecting one of two or more alternative courses of action
even though the course of action chosen results in a poor outcome if
the person exercised reasonable care and skill in arriving at the
judgment to follow the particular course of action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Nothing in this act may be construed to
limit the application of other statutes specifying a liability standard
for the state's employees and agents.

--- END ---