BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.29.025 and 2006 c 13 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (4) of this section,
the contribution rate for each employer subject to contributions under
RCW 50.24.010 shall be determined under this subsection.
(a) A fund balance ratio shall be determined by dividing the
balance in the unemployment compensation fund as of the September 30th
immediately preceding the rate year by the total remuneration paid by
all employers subject to contributions during the second calendar year
preceding the rate year and reported to the department by the following
March 31st. The division shall be carried to the fourth decimal place
with the remaining fraction, if any, disregarded. The fund balance
ratio shall be expressed as a percentage.
(b) The interval of the fund balance ratio, expressed as a
percentage, shall determine which tax schedule in (e) of this
subsection shall be in effect for assigning tax rates for the rate
year. The intervals for determining the effective tax schedule shall
be:

Interval of the
Fund Balance Ratio
Expressed as a Percentage
Effective
Tax Schedule

2.90 and above AA

2.10 to 2.89 A

1.70 to 2.09 B

1.40 to 1.69 C

1.00 to 1.39 D

0.70 to 0.99 E

Less than 0.70 F

(c) An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in
ascending order of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each
qualified employer: (i) Identification number; (ii) benefit ratio;
(iii) taxable payrolls for the four calendar quarters immediately
preceding the computation date and reported to the department by the
cut-off date; (iv) a cumulative total of taxable payrolls consisting of
the employer's taxable payroll plus the taxable payrolls of all other
employers preceding him or her in the array; and (v) the percentage
equivalent of the cumulative total of taxable payrolls.
(d) Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of twenty
rate classes according to the percentage intervals of cumulative
taxable payrolls set forth in (e) of this subsection: PROVIDED, That
if an employer's taxable payroll falls within two or more rate classes,
the employer and any other employer with the same benefit ratio shall
be assigned to the lowest rate class which includes any portion of the
employer's taxable payroll.
(e) Except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the contribution rate for
each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the following
tables for the rate class to which he or she has been assigned, as
determined under (d) of this subsection, within the tax schedule which
is to be in effect during the rate year:

Percent of
Cumulative
Taxable Payrolls
Schedules of Contributions Rates
for Effective Tax Schedule

From
To
Rate
Class
AA
A
B
C
D
E
F

0.00 5.00 1 0.47 0.47 0.57 0.97 1.47 1.87 2.47

5.01 10.00 2 0.47 0.47 0.77 1.17 1.67 2.07 2.67

10.01 15.00 3 0.57 0.57 0.97 1.37 1.77 2.27 2.87

15.01 20.00 4 0.57 0.73 1.11 1.51 1.90 2.40 2.98

20.01 25.00 5 0.72 0.92 1.30 1.70 2.09 2.59 3.08

25.01 30.00 6 0.91 1.11 1.49 1.89 2.29 2.69 3.18

30.01 35.00 7 1.00 1.29 1.69 2.08 2.48 2.88 3.27

35.01 40.00 8 1.19 1.48 1.88 2.27 2.67 3.07 3.47

40.01 45.00 9 1.37 1.67 2.07 2.47 2.87 3.27 3.66

45.01 50.00 10 1.56 1.86 2.26 2.66 3.06 3.46 3.86

50.01 55.00 11 1.84 2.14 2.45 2.85 3.25 3.66 3.95

55.01 60.00 12 2.03 2.33 2.64 3.04 3.44 3.85 4.15

60.01 65.00 13 2.22 2.52 2.83 3.23 3.64 4.04 4.34

65.01 70.00 14 2.40 2.71 3.02 3.43 3.83 4.24 4.54

70.01 75.00 15 2.68 2.90 3.21 3.62 4.02 4.43 4.63

75.01 80.00 16 2.87 3.09 3.42 3.81 4.22 4.53 4.73

80.01 85.00 17 3.27 3.47 3.77 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97

85.01 90.00 18 3.67 3.87 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97 5.17

90.01 95.00 19 4.07 4.27 4.57 4.97 5.07 5.17 5.37

95.01 100.00 20 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40

(f) The contribution rate for each employer not qualified to be in
the array shall be as follows:
(i) Employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified
employer" by reason of failure to pay contributions when due shall be
assigned a contribution rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class
20 for the applicable rate year, except employers who have an approved
agency-deferred payment contract by September 30 of the previous rate
year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred payment
contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely
manner, the employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to a
contribution rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class 20 for the
applicable rate year; and
(ii) For all other employers not qualified to be in the array, the
contribution rate shall be a rate equal to the average industry rate as
determined by the commissioner; however, the rate may not be less than
one percent.
(2) Beginning with contributions assessed for rate year 2005, the
contribution rate for each employer subject to contributions under RCW
50.24.010 shall be the sum of the array calculation factor rate and the
graduated social cost factor rate determined under this subsection, and
the solvency surcharge determined under RCW 50.29.041, if any.
(a) The array calculation factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i) An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in
ascending order of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each
qualified employer: (A) Identification number; (B) benefit ratio; and
(C) taxable payrolls for the four consecutive calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date and reported to the
employment security department by the cut-off date.
(ii) Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of forty
rate classes according to his or her benefit ratio as follows, and,
except as provided in RCW 50.29.026 and subsection (4) of this section,
the array calculation factor rate for each employer in the array shall
be the rate specified in the rate class to which the employer has been
assigned:

Benefit Ratio Rate
Class Rate
(percent)

At least Less than

0.000001 1 0.00

0.000001 0.001250 2 0.13

0.001250 0.002500 3 0.25

0.002500 0.003750 4 0.38

0.003750 0.005000 5 0.50

0.005000 0.006250 6 0.63

0.006250 0.007500 7 0.75

0.007500 0.008750 8 0.88

0.008750 0.010000 9 1.00

0.010000 0.011250 10 1.15

0.011250 0.012500 11 1.30

0.012500 0.013750 12 1.45

0.013750 0.015000 13 1.60

0.015000 0.016250 14 1.75

0.016250 0.017500 15 1.90

0.017500 0.018750 16 2.05

0.018750 0.020000 17 2.20

0.020000 0.021250 18 2.35

0.021250 0.022500 19 2.50

0.022500 0.023750 20 2.65

0.023750 0.025000 21 2.80

0.025000 0.026250 22 2.95

0.026250 0.027500 23 3.10

0.027500 0.028750 24 3.25

0.028750 0.030000 25 3.40

0.030000 0.031250 26 3.55

0.031250 0.032500 27 3.70

0.032500 0.033750 28 3.85

0.033750 0.035000 29 4.00

0.035000 0.036250 30 4.15

0.036250 0.037500 31 4.30

0.037500 0.040000 32 4.45

0.040000 0.042500 33 4.60

0.042500 0.045000 34 4.75

0.045000 0.047500 35 4.90

0.047500 0.050000 36 5.05

0.050000 0.052500 37 5.20

0.052500 0.055000 38 5.30

0.055000 0.057500 39 5.35

0.057500 40 5.40

(b) The graduated social cost factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i)(((A))) Except as provided in (((b)(i)(B) and (C) of this))
subsection (4) of this section, the commissioner shall calculate the
flat social cost factor for a rate year by dividing the total social
cost by the total taxable payroll. The division shall be carried to
the second decimal place with the remaining fraction disregarded unless
it amounts to five hundredths or more, in which case the second decimal
place shall be rounded to the next higher digit. The flat social cost
factor shall be expressed as a percentage.
(((B) If, on the cut-off date, the balance in the unemployment
compensation fund is determined by the commissioner to be an amount
that will provide more than ten months of unemployment benefits, the
commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost factor for the rate
year immediately following the cut-off date by reducing the total
social cost by the dollar amount that represents the number of months
for which the balance in the unemployment compensation fund on the cut-off date will provide benefits above ten months and dividing the result
by the total taxable payroll. However, the calculation under this
subsection (2)(b)(i)(B) for a rate year may not result in a flat social
cost factor that is more than four-tenths lower than the calculation
under (b)(i)(A) of this subsection for that rate year.
For the purposes of this subsection, the commissioner shall
determine the number of months of unemployment benefits in the
unemployment compensation fund using the benefit cost rate for the
average of the three highest calendar benefit cost rates in the twenty
consecutive completed calendar years immediately preceding the cut-off
date or a period of consecutive calendar years immediately preceding
the cut-off date that includes three recessions, if longer.
(C) The minimum flat social cost factor calculated under this
subsection (2)(b) shall be six-tenths of one percent, except that if
the balance in the unemployment compensation fund is determined by the
commissioner to be an amount that will provide:
(I) At least twelve months but less than fourteen months of
unemployment benefits, the minimum shall be five-tenths of one percent;
or
(II) At least fourteen months of unemployment benefits, the minimum
shall be five-tenths of one percent, except that, for employers in rate
class 1, the minimum shall be forty-five hundredths of one percent.))
(ii)(A) Except as provided in (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection and
subsection (4) of this section, the graduated social cost factor rate
for each employer in the array is the flat social cost factor
multiplied by the percentage specified as follows for the rate class to
which the employer has been assigned in (a)(ii) of this subsection,
except that the sum of an employer's array calculation factor rate and
the graduated social cost factor rate may not exceed six and five-
tenths percent or, for employers whose North American industry
classification system code is within "111," "112," "1141," "115,"
"3114," "3117," "42448," or "49312," may not exceed six percent through
rate year 2007 and may not exceed five and seven-tenths percent for
rate year 2008 and thereafter:
(I) Rate class 1 - 78 percent;
(II) Rate class 2 - 82 percent;
(III) Rate class 3 - 86 percent;
(IV) Rate class 4 - 90 percent;
(V) Rate class 5 - 94 percent;
(VI) Rate class 6 - 98 percent;
(VII) Rate class 7 - 102 percent;
(VIII) Rate class 8 - 106 percent;
(IX) Rate class 9 - 110 percent;
(X) Rate class 10 - 114 percent;
(XI) Rate class 11 - 118 percent; and
(XII) Rate classes 12 through 40 - 120 percent.
(B) For contributions assessed beginning July 1, 2005, through
December 31, 2007, for employers whose North American industry
classification system code is "111," "112," "1141," "115," "3114,"
"3117," "42448," or "49312," the graduated social cost factor rate is
zero.
(iii) For the purposes of this section:
(A) "Total social cost" means the amount calculated by subtracting
the array calculation factor contributions paid by all employers with
respect to the four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding
the computation date and paid to the employment security department by
the cut-off date from the total unemployment benefits paid to claimants
in the same four consecutive calendar quarters. To calculate the flat
social cost factor for rate year 2005, the commissioner shall calculate
the total social cost using the array calculation factor contributions
that would have been required to be paid by all employers in the
calculation period if (a) of this subsection had been in effect for the
relevant period.
(B) "Total taxable payroll" means the total amount of wages subject
to tax, as determined under RCW 50.24.010, for all employers in the
four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding the
computation date and reported to the employment security department by
the cut-off date.
(c) The array calculation factor rate for each employer not
qualified to be in the array shall be as follows:
(i) Employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified
employer" by reason of failure to pay contributions when due shall be
assigned an array calculation factor rate two-tenths higher than that
in rate class 40, except employers who have an approved agency-deferred
payment contract by September 30th of the previous rate year. If any
employer with an approved agency-deferred payment contract fails to
make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or fails to submit any
succeeding tax report and payment in a timely manner, the employer's
tax rate shall immediately revert to an array calculation factor rate
two-tenths higher than that in rate class 40; and
(ii) For all other employers not qualified to be in the array, the
array calculation factor rate shall be a rate equal to the average
industry array calculation factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, plus fifteen percent of that amount; however, the rate
may not be less than one percent or more than the array calculation
factor rate in rate class 40.
(d) The graduated social cost factor rate for each employer not
qualified to be in the array shall be as follows:
(i) For employers whose array calculation factor rate is determined
under (c)(i) of this subsection, the social cost factor rate shall be
the social cost factor rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of
this subsection.
(ii) For employers whose array calculation factor rate is
determined under (c)(ii) of this subsection, the social cost factor
rate shall be a rate equal to the average industry social cost factor
rate as determined by the commissioner, plus fifteen percent of that
amount, but not more than the social cost factor rate assigned to rate
class 40 under (b)(ii) of this subsection.
(3) Assignment of employers by the commissioner to industrial
classification, for purposes of this section, shall be in accordance
with established classification practices found in the "Standard
Industrial Classification Manual" issued by the federal office of
management and budget to the third digit provided in the standard
industrial classification code, or in the North American industry
classification system code.
(4) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, the department's goal
is to maintain, at all times, eleven to thirteen months of unemployment
insurance benefits in the unemployment compensation fund. Beginning
January 1, 2008, the department shall adjust the contribution rates,
including the array calculation factor and the social cost factor rates
on an annual basis to accomplish this goal. The department shall
maintain the same proportionate shares of these rates that exist
between each rate class as of the effective date of this act. In no
circumstance may the department set contribution rates that exceed the
maximum rates allowed under subsection (2)(b)(ii)(A) of this section,
nor may the department set the maximum tax rate below the minimum
maximum tax rate required by the federal department of labor. The
department shall accomplish this goal through rule and shall report to
the legislature annually, before the rates are adjusted.

--- END ---