BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.61 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon the expiration of an initial term or renewal term of a lake
management district, the county legislative authority may renew by
resolution the lake management district for the same term of years set
forth in the resolution adopted under RCW 36.61.070.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.61.020 and 2000 c 184 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any county may create lake management districts to finance the
improvement and maintenance of lakes located within or partially within
the boundaries of the county. All or a portion of a lake and the
adjacent land areas may be included within one or more lake management
districts. More than one lake, or portions of lakes, and the adjacent
land areas may be included in a single lake management district.
Special assessments or rates and charges may be imposed on the
property included within a lake management district to finance lake
improvement and maintenance activities, including: (1) The control or
removal of aquatic plants and vegetation; (2) water quality; (3) the
control of water levels; (4) storm water diversion and treatment; (5)
agricultural waste control; (6) studying lake water quality problems
and solutions; (7) cleaning and maintaining ditches and streams
entering or leaving the lake; and (8) the related administrative,
engineering, legal, and operational costs, including the costs of
creating the lake management district.
Special assessments or rates and charges may be imposed and
adjusted annually on all the land in a lake management district for the
duration of the lake management district without a related issuance of
lake management district bonds or revenue bonds. Special assessments
also may be imposed in the manner of special assessments in a local
improvement district with each landowner being given the choice of
paying the entire special assessment in one payment, or to paying
installments, with lake management district bonds being issued to
obtain moneys not derived by the initial full payment of the special
assessments, and the installments covering all of the costs related to
issuing, selling, and redeeming the lake management district bonds.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.61.270 and 1987 c 432 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever rates and charges are to be imposed in a lake management
district, the county legislative authority shall prepare a roll of
rates and charges that includes those matters required to be included
in a special assessment roll and shall hold a public hearing on the
proposed roll of rates and charges as provided under RCW 36.61.120
through 36.61.150 for a special assessment roll. The county
legislative authority ((shall have full jurisdiction and authority to
fix, alter, regulate, and control the rates and charges imposed by a
lake management district and)) may classify the rates or charges by any
reasonable factor or factors, including benefit, use, front footage,
acreage, the extent of improvements on the property, the type of
improvements on the property, uses to which the property is put,
service to be provided, and any other reasonable factor or factors.
The owners of land within the lake management district may adjust
annually, upon approval by a simple majority vote, the rates and
charges imposed by the lake management district. The flexibility to
((establish)) adjust rates and charges includes the authority to reduce
rates and charges on property owned by low-income persons.
Except as provided in this section, the collection of rates and
charges, lien status of unpaid rates and charges, and method of
foreclosing on such liens shall be subject to the provisions of chapter
36.94 RCW. Public property, including state property, shall be subject
to the rates and charges to the same extent that private property is
subject to them, except that liens may not be foreclosed on the public
property, and the procedure for imposing such rates and charges on
state property shall conform with the procedure provided for in chapter
79.44 RCW concerning the imposition of special assessments upon state
property. The total amount of rates and charges cannot exceed the cost
of lake improvement or maintenance activities proposed to be financed
by such rates and charges, as specified in the resolution of intention.
Revenue bonds exclusively payable from the rates and charges may be
issued by the county under chapter 39.46 RCW.

--- END ---