BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
establish a goal of promoting competition and consumer choice for cable
television service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cable service" is defined as set forth in 47 U.S.C. Sec.
522(6).
(2) "Cable operator" is defined as set forth in 47 U.S.C. Sec.
522(5).
(3) "Cable system" is defined as set forth in 47 U.S.C. Sec.
522(7).
(4) "Commission" means the Washington utilities and transportation
commission.
(5) "Competitive cable service provider" means an entity authorized
by this chapter to provide cable service over a cable system other than
the incumbent cable operator providing service in the area to be served
by the competitive cable service provider.
(6) "Competitive video service provider" means an entity authorized
by this chapter to provide video service. This term does not include
a cable operator, and a competitive video service provider may not be
considered a cable operator and the facilities of a competitive video
service provider may not be considered a cable system.
(7) "Competitive cable service provider fee" means the amount paid
by a competitive cable service provider under section 4 of this act.
(8) "Competitive video service provider fee" means the amount paid
by a competitive video service provider under section 4 of this act.
(9) "Franchise" means an initial authorization, or renewal of an
authorization, regardless of whether the authorization is designated as
a franchise, permit, license, resolution, contract, certificate,
agreement, or otherwise, that authorizes the construction and operation
of a cable system or video service provider's network in the public
rights-of-way.
(10) "Incumbent cable operator" means the provider serving the
largest number of cable television service subscribers in a particular
local franchise service area on July 1, 2007.
(11) "Local government" means any city, town, and county or other
municipality of this state.
(12) "Public rights-of-way" means the area on, below, or above a
public roadway, highway, street, public sidewalk, alley, waterway, or
utility easements dedicated for compatible uses.
(13) "Video programming" means programming provided by, or
generally considered comparable to programming provided by, a
television broadcast station, as set forth in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 522(20).
(14) "Video service" means video programming services provided
through wireline facilities located at least in part in the public
rights-of-way without regard to delivery technology, including internet
protocol technology. This definition does not include any video
programming provided by a commercial mobile service provider defined in
47 U.S.C. Sec. 332(d) or cable service provided by a competitive cable
service provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A competitive cable service provider or
competitive video service provider seeking to provide cable service or
video service in the state of Washington after the effective date of
this section shall file an application for authorization with the
commission as required by this section.
(2) The commission shall issue an authorization permitting a
competitive cable service provider or a competitive video service
provider to provide cable service or video service in the state of
Washington within thirty calendar days after receipt of a completed
affidavit submitted by the competitive cable service provider or
competitive video service provider and signed by an officer or general
partner of the applicant affirming the following:
(a) That the applicant agrees to comply with all applicable federal
and state laws and regulations;
(b) A written description of the city, town, county, or other
municipality of this state to be served, in whole or in part, by the
applicant, which written description must be amended by the applicant
before the provision of cable service within an area not described in
a previous application or amendment filed by the applicant. For
purposes of this subsection (2)(b), a map or other graphic
representation may supplement, but not substitute for, the written
description; and
(c) The location of the principal place of business and the names
of the principal executive officers of the applicant.
(3) A holder of a state authorization to provide cable service or
video service who seeks to amend the authorization to include
additional areas to be served must file an amended application with the
commission that reflects the new areas to be served.
(4) The authorization issued by the commission is fully
transferable to any successor in interest to the applicant to which it
is initially granted. A notice of transfer must be filed with the
commission within thirty days after the completion of such a transfer.
(5) The authorization issued by the commission may be terminated by
the competitive cable service provider or competitive video service
provider by submitting notice to the commission.
(6) To the extent required by applicable law, any cable or video
service authorization granted by this chapter by the commission
constitutes a "franchise" for purposes of 47 U.S.C. Sec. 541(b)(1). To
the extent required for purposes of 47 U.S.C. Secs. 521 through 561,
only the state of Washington shall constitute the exclusive
"franchising authority" for competitive cable service providers and
competitive video service providers in the state of Washington.
(7) Neither the commission, nor any other state agency, nor any
local government, nor any other political entity of the state of
Washington may:
(a) Require a competitive cable service provider or competitive
video service provider to obtain a separate franchise; or
(b) Otherwise impose any fee or franchise requirement on any
competitive cable service provider or competitive video service
provider except as provided in this chapter. For purposes of this
subsection (7)(b), a franchise requirement includes, without
limitation, any provision that:
(i) Regulates the rates charged by competitive cable service
providers or competitive video service providers;
(ii) Requires competitive cable service providers or competitive
video service providers to satisfy any build-out requirements or deploy
any facilities or equipment; and
(iii) Requires a franchise to be approved by a vote of the people.
(8) Not later than one hundred eighty days after a request by a
local government in which the competitive cable service provider or the
competitive video service provider is providing cable service or video
service, the holder of a state authorization to provide cable service
or video service shall designate a sufficient amount of capacity on its
communications network to allow the provision of a comparable number of
channels or capacity of public, educational, and governmental
noncommercial programming provided by the incumbent cable operator.
(9) The content to be provided over this public, educational, and
governmental access under this section is the responsibility of the
local government receiving the benefit of the capacity and the holder
of a state authorization to provide cable service or video service
bears only the responsibility for the transmission of the content,
subject to technological restraints.
(10) The local government must ensure that all transmissions,
content, or programming to be transmitted by a holder of a state
authorization to provide cable service or video service are provided or
submitted to the competitive cable service provider or competitive
video service provider in a manner or form that is capable of being
accepted and transmitted by a provider, without requirement for
additional alteration or change in the content by the provider, over
the particular network of the competitive cable service provider or
competitive video service provider, which is compatible with the
technology or protocol utilized by the competitive cable service
provider or competitive video service provider to deliver services.
(11) Where technically feasible, the holder of a state
authorization to provide cable service or video service and an
incumbent cable operator must use reasonable efforts to interconnect
their cable or video systems for the purpose of providing public,
educational, and governmental programming. Interconnection may be
accomplished by direct cable, microwave link, satellite, or other
reasonable method of connection. Holders of a state authorization to
provide cable service or video service and incumbent cable operators
must negotiate in good faith and incumbent cable operators may not
withhold interconnection of public, educational, and governmental
channels.
(12) If an incumbent cable operator pays any fee to a local
government for public, educational, and governmental channels, any
subsequent holder of a state authorization to provide cable service or
video service that includes the local government must pay this fee at
the same rate. All fees collected under this subsection (12) must be
used only for the support of the public, educational, and governmental
channels.
(13) A court of competent jurisdiction has exclusive jurisdiction
to enforce any requirement under this section.
(14) Except as provided in subsections (1) through (12) of this
section, competitive cable service providers and competitive video
service providers enjoy the same rights under the law of the state of
Washington as incumbent cable operators and other providers of video
programming.
(15) The commission is solely responsible for enforcing the
provisions of this chapter by filing a complaint in a court of
competent jurisdiction.
(16) Nothing in this chapter is intended to abrogate, nullify, or
adversely affect any franchise or other contractual rights, duties, or
obligations existing and incurred by a cable operator as of the
effective date of this section. A cable operator with an existing
franchise with a local government to provide cable service in the state
as of the effective date of this section is not eligible to obtain a
state authorization to provide cable service or video service for any
area for which the cable operator has an existing franchise agreement
with the local government, or any portion thereof, until the expiration
date of the existing franchise agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A competitive cable service provider or
competitive video service provider will provide notice to each local
government with jurisdiction in which a competitive cable service
provider or competitive video service provider begins to offer cable
service or video service.
(2) In any locality in which a competitive cable service provider
offers cable service or a competitive video service provider offers
video service, the competitive cable service provider or competitive
video service provider must calculate and pay the competitive cable
service provider or competitive video service provider fee to the local
government with jurisdiction upon the local government's written
request. If the local government makes such a request, the competitive
cable service provider or competitive video service provider fee is due
on a quarterly basis, forty-five days after the close of the quarter,
and must be calculated as a percentage of gross revenues, as defined in
this section. The local government may not demand any additional fees
or charges from the competitive cable service provider or competitive
video service provider except as provided by this chapter, and may not
demand the use of any other calculation method.
(3) The percentage to be applied against gross revenues under
subsection (1) of this section must be set by the local government and
identified in its written request equal to the percentage paid by the
incumbent cable operator or five percent, whichever is less.
(4) For purposes of this section, "gross revenues" means all
consideration of any kind or nature, including, without limitation,
cash, credits, property, and in-kind contributions (services or goods)
received by the provider from subscribers for the provision of cable
service over a cable system by a competitive cable provider or video
service by a competitive video service provider within the local
government's jurisdiction. Competitive cable service providers and
competitive video service providers are subject to and are only
required to pay either the competitive cable service provider fee or
the competitive video service provider fee but in no event may a
provider be subject to both the competitive cable service provider and
competitive video service provider fees.
(5) For purposes of this section, "gross revenues" does not
include:
(a) Revenues not actually received, even if billed, such as bad
debt;
(b) Revenues received by any affiliate or any other person in
exchange for supplying goods or services used by the provider to
provide cable service or video service;
(c) Refunds, rebates, or discounts made to subscribers, leased
access providers, advertisers, or any local government;
(d) Any revenues from services not classified as cable service or
video service, including, without limitation, revenue received from
telecommunications services, revenue received from information
services, revenue received in connection with advertising, revenue
received in connection with home shopping services, or any other
revenues attributed by the competitive cable service provider or
competitive video service provider to noncable service or nonvideo
service in accordance with any applicable laws, rules, regulations,
standards, or orders;
(e) Any revenue paid by subscribers to home shopping programmers
directly from the sale of merchandise through any home shopping channel
offered as part of the cable services or video services;
(f) The sale of cable services or video services for resale in
which the purchaser is required to collect the five-percent fee from
the purchaser's customer;
(g) Any tax of general applicability imposed upon the competitive
cable service provider or competitive video service provider or upon
subscribers by a city, state, federal, or any other governmental entity
and required to be collected by the competitive cable service provider
or competitive video service provider and remitted to the taxing entity
including, but not limited to, sales or use tax, gross receipts tax,
excise tax, utility users tax, public service tax, and communication
taxes, and including the five-percent fee specified in this subsection;
(h) The provision of cable services or video services to public
institutions, public schools, or governmental entities at no charge;
(i) Any foregone revenue from the competitive cable service
provider's or competitive video service provider's provision of free or
reduced-cost video service to any person, including, without
limitation, any municipality and other public institutions or other
institutions;
(j) Sales of capital assets or sales of surplus equipment;
(k) Reimbursement by programmers of marketing costs incurred by the
competitive cable service provider or competitive video service
provider for the introduction or promotion of new programming;
(l) Directory or internet advertising revenue including, but not
limited to, yellow page, white page, banner advertisement, and
electronic publishing; and
(m) Copyright fees paid to the United States copyright office.
(6) At the request of a local government, but no more than once per
year, the commission may retain an independent auditor to perform
reasonable audits of the competitive cable service provider's or
competitive video service provider's calculation of the competitive
cable service provider or competitive video service provider fee. The
requesting local government and the competitive cable service provider
or competitive video service provider shall each bear their own costs
associated with such an audit. The requesting local government shall
also bear the commission's costs, including but not limited to, the
commission's cost to retain an independent auditor to perform an audit.
(7) Any competitive cable service provider or competitive video
service provider may identify and collect the amount of the competitive
cable service provider or competitive video service provider fee as a
separate line item on the regular bill of each subscriber.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A local government may grant a use
permit under chapter 35.99 RCW to the holder of a state authorization
to provide cable service or video service to install, maintain, repair,
or remove a communications network within public rights-of-way and must
provide the holder of a state authorization to provide cable service or
video service with open, comparable, nondiscriminatory, and
competitively neutral access to the public rights-of-way. Consistent
with chapter 35.99 RCW, requirements otherwise applicable to holders of
master permits are deemed satisfied by a holder of a statewide
authorization to provide cable service or video service in good
standing.
(2) A local government may not discriminate against the holder of
a state authorization to provide cable service or video service
regarding, without limitation:
(a) The authorization or placement of a communications network in
public rights-of-way;
(b) Access to a building; or
(c) A municipal utility pole attachment term.
(3) A local government may impose on a competitive cable service
provider or competitive video service provider a permit fee only to the
extent it imposes such a fee on incumbent cable operators, and any fee
may not exceed the actual, direct costs incurred by the local
government for issuing the relevant permit. In no event may a fee
under this subsection be levied:
(a) If the competitive cable service provider or competitive video
service provider already has paid a permit fee of any kind in
connection with the same activity that would otherwise be covered by
the permit fee under this subsection or is otherwise authorized by law
or contract to place the facilities used by the competitive cable
service provider or competitive video service provider in the public
rights-of-way; or
(b) For general revenue purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A competitive cable service provider or
competitive video service provider that has been granted a state
authorization to provide cable service or video service may not deny
access to service to any group of potential residential subscribers
because of the income, race, or national origin of the residents in the
local area in which such a group resides.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The provisions of this chapter are
intended to be consistent with the federal cable act, (47 U.S.C. Sec.
521 et. seq.).
(2) Except as otherwise stated in this chapter, nothing in this
chapter may be interpreted to prevent a competitive cable service
provider, competitive video service provider, a cable operator or a
local government from seeking clarification of its rights and
obligations under federal law or to exercise any right or authority
under federal or state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

--- END ---