BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.537 and 2005 c 68 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At any time prior to trial or entry of the guilty plea if
substantial rights of the defendant are not prejudiced, the state may
give notice that it is seeking a sentence above the standard sentencing
range. The notice shall state aggravating circumstances upon which the
requested sentence will be based.
(2) In any case where an exceptional sentence above the standard
range was imposed prior to April 15, 2005, and where a new trial or new
sentencing hearing is required, the superior court may impanel a jury
to consider any alleged aggravating circumstances listed in RCW
9.94A.535(3) that were relied upon by the superior court in imposing
the previous sentence at either the new trial or, if no new trial is
necessary, at the new sentencing hearing.
(3) The facts supporting aggravating circumstances shall be proved
to a jury beyond a reasonable doubt. The jury's verdict on the
aggravating factor must be unanimous, and by special interrogatory. If
a jury is waived, proof shall be to the court beyond a reasonable
doubt, unless the defendant stipulates to the aggravating facts.
(((3))) (4) Evidence regarding any facts supporting aggravating
circumstances under RCW 9.94A.535(3) (a) through (y) shall be presented
to the jury during the trial of the alleged crime, unless the jury has
been impaneled solely for resentencing, or unless the state alleges the
aggravating circumstances listed in RCW 9.94A.535(3) (e)(iv), (h)(i),
(o), or (t). If one of these aggravating circumstances is alleged, the
trial court may conduct a separate proceeding if the evidence
supporting the aggravating fact is not part of the res geste of the
charged crime, if the evidence is not otherwise admissible in trial of
the charged crime, and if the court finds that the probative value of
the evidence to the aggravated fact is substantially outweighed by its
prejudicial effect on the jury's ability to determine guilt or
innocence for the underlying crime.
(((4))) (5) If the superior court conducts a separate proceeding to
determine the existence of aggravating circumstances listed in RCW
9.94A.535(3) (e)(iv), (h)(i), (o), or (t), the proceeding shall
immediately follow the trial on the underlying conviction, if possible.
If any person who served on the jury is unable to continue, the court
shall substitute an alternate juror.
(((5))) (6) If the jury finds, unanimously and beyond a reasonable
doubt, one or more of the facts alleged by the state in support of an
aggravated sentence, the court may sentence the offender pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.535 to a term of confinement up to the maximum allowed under
RCW 9A.20.021 for the underlying conviction if it finds, considering
the purposes of this chapter, that the facts found are substantial and
compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence.

--- END ---