BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 2.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each trial court organized under this title and Titles 3 and 35
RCW must develop a written language assistance plan to provide a
framework for the provision of interpreter services for non-English-speaking persons accessing the court system in both civil and criminal
legal matters. The language assistance plan must include, at a
minimum, provisions addressing the following:
(a) Procedures to identify and assess the language needs of non-English-speaking persons using the court system;
(b) Procedures for the appointment of interpreters as required
under RCW 2.43.030. Such procedures shall not require the non-English-speaking person to make the arrangements for the interpreter to appear
in court;
(c) Procedures for notifying court users of the right to and
availability of interpreter services. Such information shall be
prominently displayed in the courthouse in the five foreign languages
that census data indicates are predominate in the jurisdiction;
(d) A process for providing timely communication with non-English
speakers by all court employees who have regular contact with the
public and meaningful access to court services, including access to
services provided by the clerk's office;
(e) Procedures for evaluating the need for translation of written
materials, prioritizing those translation needs, and translating the
highest priority materials. These procedures should take into account
the frequency of use of forms by the language group, and the cost of
orally interpreting the forms;
(f) A process for requiring and providing training to judges, court
clerks, and other court staff on the requirements of the language
assistance plan and how to effectively access and work with
interpreters; and
(g) A process for ongoing evaluation of the language assistance
plan and monitoring of the implementation of the language assistance
plan.
(2) Each court, when developing its language assistance plan, must
consult with judges, court administrators and court clerks,
interpreters, and members of the community, such as domestic violence
organizations, pro bono programs, courthouse facilitators, legal
services programs, and/or other community groups whose members speak a
language other than English.
(3) Each court must provide a copy of its language assistance plan
to the interpreter commission established by supreme court rule for
approval prior to receiving state reimbursement for interpreter costs
under this chapter.
(4) Each court must provide to the administrative office of the
courts by November 15, 2007, a report detailing an assessment of the
need for interpreter services for non-English speakers in
court-mandated classes or programs, the extent to which interpreter
services are currently available for court-mandated classes or
programs, and the resources that would be required to ensure that
interpreters are provided to non-English speakers in court-mandated
classes or programs. The administrative office of the courts shall
compile these reports and provide them to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 15, 2007.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.42.120 and 1985 c 389 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a hearing impaired person is a party or witness at any stage
of a judicial or quasi-judicial proceeding in the state or in a
political subdivision, including but not limited to civil and criminal
court proceedings, grand jury proceedings, proceedings before a
magistrate, juvenile proceedings, adoption proceedings, mental health
commitment proceedings, and any proceeding in which a hearing impaired
person may be subject to confinement or criminal sanction, the
appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a qualified interpreter
to interpret the proceedings.
(2) If the parent, guardian, or custodian of a juvenile brought
before a court is hearing impaired, the appointing authority shall
appoint and pay for a qualified interpreter to interpret the
proceedings.
(3) If a hearing impaired person participates in a program or
activity ordered by a court as part of the sentence or order of
disposition, required as part of a diversion agreement or deferred
prosecution program, or required as a condition of probation or parole,
the appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a qualified
interpreter to interpret exchange of information during the program or
activity.
(4) If a law enforcement agency conducts a criminal investigation
involving the interviewing of a hearing impaired person, whether as a
victim, witness, or suspect, the appointing authority shall appoint
and pay for a qualified interpreter throughout the investigation.
Whenever a law enforcement agency conducts a criminal investigation
involving the interviewing of a minor child whose parent, guardian, or
custodian is hearing impaired, whether as a victim, witness, or
suspect, the appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a qualified
interpreter throughout the investigation. No employee of the law
enforcement agency who has responsibilities other than interpreting may
be appointed as the qualified interpreter.
(5) If a hearing impaired person is arrested for an alleged
violation of a criminal law the arresting officer or the officer's
supervisor shall, at the earliest possible time, procure and arrange
payment for a qualified interpreter for any notification of rights,
warning, interrogation, or taking of a statement. No employee of the
law enforcement agency who has responsibilities other than interpreting
may be appointed as the qualified interpreter.
(6) Where it is the policy and practice of a court of this state or
of a political subdivision to appoint and pay counsel for persons who
are indigent, the appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a
qualified interpreter for hearing impaired persons to facilitate
communication with counsel in all phases of the preparation and
presentation of the case.
(7) Where a qualified interpreter is appointed for a hearing
impaired person by a judicial officer in a proceeding before a court
under subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section in compliance with
the provisions of RCW 2.42.130 and 2.42.170, the state of Washington
shall reimburse the appointing authority for one-half of the payment to
the interpreter.

Sec. 3 RCW 2.43.040 and 1989 c 358 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Interpreters appointed according to this chapter are entitled
to a reasonable fee for their services and shall be reimbursed for
actual expenses which are reasonable as provided in this section.
(2) In all legal proceedings in which the non-English-speaking
person is a party, or is subpoenaed or summoned by the appointing
authority or is otherwise compelled by the appointing authority to
appear, including criminal proceedings, grand jury proceedings,
coroner's inquests, mental health commitment proceedings, and other
legal proceedings initiated by agencies of government, the cost of
providing the interpreter shall be borne by the governmental body
initiating the legal proceedings.
(3) In other legal proceedings, the cost of providing the
interpreter shall be borne by the non-English-speaking person unless
such person is indigent according to adopted standards of the body. In
such a case the cost shall be an administrative cost of the
governmental body under the authority of which the legal proceeding is
conducted.
(4) The cost of providing the interpreter is a taxable cost of any
proceeding in which costs ordinarily are taxed.
(5) Where an interpreter is appointed by a judicial officer in a
proceeding before a court at public expense, the state of Washington
shall reimburse the appointing authority for one-half of the payment to
the interpreter where:
(a) The interpreter appointed is an interpreter certified by the
administrative office of the courts or is a qualified interpreter
registered by the administrative office of the courts in a noncertified
language, or where the necessary language is not certified or
registered, the interpreter has been qualified by the judicial officer
pursuant to this chapter;
(b) The court conducting the legal proceeding has an approved
language assistance plan that complies with section 1 of this act; and
(c) The fee paid to the interpreter for services is in accordance
with standards established by the administrative office of the courts.

--- END ---