BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2006 c 372 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,692,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,856,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,100,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,089,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $392,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,820,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,753,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,904,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,946,000
Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,029,000
Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,386,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,883,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,863,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $469,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $588,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery
Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,755,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,043,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $411,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $528,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $248,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $315,520,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) As described in section 129(7) of this act, the department
shall make recommendations and report on monitoring activities related
to salmon recovery.
(2) $1,556,714 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,556,713 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action items DFW-01 through DFW-06, DFW-08 through DFW-12, and DFW-16.
(3) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(4) The department shall support the activities of the aquatic
nuisance species coordination committee to foster state, federal,
tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues.
The committee shall strive to prevent the introduction of nonnative
aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species that are
introduced.
(5) The department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to
protection of fish habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and
steelhead. Within the amount provided for the agency, the department
shall provide support to the department of health to enforce state
shellfish harvest laws.
(6) $180,000 of the wildlife account -- state appropriation is
provided solely to test deer and elk for chronic wasting disease and to
document the extent of swan lead poisoning. Of this amount, $65,000 is
provided solely to document the extent of swan lead poisoning and to
begin environmental cleanup.
(7) The department shall provide quarterly status reports to the
office of financial management regarding the replacement of the
Washington interactive licensing system and the implementation of the
hydraulic permit management system.
(8) The department shall prepare a report detailing the hydraulic
permit approval program applications and project types. The department
shall coordinate with the office of financial management in determining
the contents of the report. At minimum, the report shall include
permits by applicant (name, state, local, federal, tribal entity,
etc.), project type (pamphlet, minor, medium, major, extension,
revision, etc.) and project location (county and water resource
inventory area). The department shall submit the report to the office
of financial management and legislative fiscal committees no later than
September 1, 2006.
(9) $700,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided
solely for environmental data quality and access projects in support of
state salmon recovery efforts. The department shall coordinate
planning and implementation of all activities with the department of
information services and the governor's salmon recovery office. The
department shall make certain that any activity using these funds is
consistent with recommendations to be submitted (per section 405,
chapter 488, Laws of 2005) in the joint report to the legislature and
office of financial management on December 1, 2006.
(10) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
Army Corps of Engineers.
(11) $72,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1211 (multiple season big
game permit). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this section shall lapse.
(12) $528,000 of the aquatic invasive species prevention account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No.
5699 (preventing and controlling aquatic invasive species and algae).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $703,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to purchase six purse seine and three gill
net licenses to meet the provisions of the United States/Canada salmon
treaty.
(14) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for chum salmon production at
Minter creek hatchery.
(15) $45,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $45,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the management of Canada goose
seasons to increase the number of hunting days in southwest Washington.
(16) $46,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to increase the number of courses providing the hunter
education training program created in RCW 77.32.155. The department
shall reduce the current backlog of applicants waiting to take the
training program and provide for a stable supply of training program
courses in order to avoid future backlogs.
(17) $481,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to continued operation of the Naselle Hatchery during
the 2005-07 biennium. This will increase production by 3 million
Chinook, 1 million Coho, and 30,000 trout.
(18) $223,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5227 (wildlife harvest
reports). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for federal match funding for the control
of predators that damage livestock, crops, and property, of which
$25,000 shall be immediately transferred to the United States animal
and plant health inspection service as state matching funds to conduct
an emergency aerial control program for addressing the predation of
baby calves by coyotes, without requiring a permit.
(20) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the department to produce educational
materials discouraging activities that harm or disturb the spawning
beds of salmon and steelhead. Discouraged activities include, but are
not limited to, wading on spawning beds, driving motor vehicles on
spawning beds, use of high-powered jet or propeller-driven boats across
spawning beds, dragging anchors through spawning beds, digging or
removing gravel from spawning beds, or any other physical disturbance
capable of disturbing spawning fish or damaging or destroying nests of
incubating eggs.
(a) The educational materials produced by the department in
accordance with this subsection must include, at a minimum, brochures
that are to be disseminated to persons applying for fishing and boating
licenses statewide. The department must also distribute the brochures
widely to retail outlets that cater to outdoor recreation.
(b) The department shall work cooperatively with the tribal fishery
comanagers in the development of the educational materials under this
section.
(c) The department shall report to the legislature concerning the
effectiveness of this subsection after at least two spawning cycles of
salmon and steelhead have occurred.
(21) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, by December
1, 2006, the department shall:
(a) Submit a report detailing the reductions required by omnibus
appropriations acts since 1997 for activities supported by the state
wildlife fund; and
(b) Submit quarterly revenue and expenditure reports for the state
wildlife account based on current revenue forecasts to the office of
financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature((;
and)).
(22) The department shall assist the office of regulatory
assistance in implementing activities consistent with the governor's
regulatory improvement program. The department shall support and
provide expertise to facilitate, coordinate, and simplify citizen and
business interactions so as to improve state regulatory processes
involving state, local, and federal stakeholders.
(23) $408,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for fire suppression and remediation
activities on department lands and facilities that were impacted during
the 2005 fire season. Funding shall be used for seeding, planting
vegetation, fertilizing, weed control, and the establishment of water
bars and other erosion control measures.
(24) $266,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $214,000 of the state wildlife account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of the
Nemah, Mossyrock, Omak, Colville, Arlington, and Columbia Basin
hatcheries during the 2005-07 biennium. Funding shall be used to
offset the increased cost of utilities, fuel, fish feed, and mitigation
obligations previously funded from local sources. The department shall
consult with the appropriate natural resource and fiscal committees of
the legislature prior to submitting a 2007-09 budget proposal that
changes current hatchery operations, production, and/or maintenance to
the office of financial management. Unless specifically authorized by
the legislature, the department shall not close any hatchery facility
currently in operation.
(25) $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5385 (invasive species council). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(26) $76,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to pay for the added level of fishery
sampling and monitoring in the upper Columbia river area as required
under the endangered species act and federal court orders.
(27) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for an interagency working group scoping
of a study of the sinking of ships as dive attractions. The department
of fish and wildlife shall, as approved by the office of financial
management, enter into an interagency agreement with the department of
natural resources, the state parks and recreation commission, the
department of ecology, and the department of community, trade, and
economic development to delineate elements of this study. The
department of fish and wildlife shall report to the office of financial
management and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later
than November 15, 2006.
(28) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to increase fish production levels on a
statewide basis at state-operated fish hatcheries. By July 31, 2006,
the department shall submit to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature an implementation plan that outlines in
specific detail how the amount provided in this subsection will be
spent in order to increase fish production. The plan will include
production implementation timelines, increased production goals, by
species, at identified hatcheries that will receive financial
assistance, and the amount to be retained by the department for
administration and overhead costs, including the purchase of any new
equipment. By July 31, 2007, the department shall submit to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature a report
documenting the increased production levels, using fiscal year 2006 as
the base year for comparison purposes. If the department is unable to
produce the implementation plan by July 31, 2006, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.
(29) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the department to prevent impacts to
native species by controlling the nonnative nutria population in Skagit
county.
(30) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the northwest straits commission to
remove lost and abandoned fishing nets and crab and shrimp pots that
may be dangerous to humans and that unintentionally trap and kill
endangered salmon and other aquatic species.
(31) $4,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1210 (temporary fishing
license). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(32) Within existing appropriations and utilizing all available
federal moneys allocated for the crab buy-back program, the department
shall develop and implement a crab buy-back program that allows
commercial crab fishers the opportunity to sell their licenses back to
the state and exit from the crabbing fishery. The department shall
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature its detailed implementation plan no later
than December 1, 2006.
(33) $660,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely to initiate a review of the hydraulic project approval
permit rules and to undergo a public process for adoption of new or
revised rules that my be needed. Upon completion, the department shall
complete a habitat conservation plan for the hydraulic project approval
program, and shall seek legislative review prior to adoption of new or
revised rules.
(34) $125,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided to implement Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5232 (turkey tags). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---