BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A carryforward use tax credit shall be allowed against the
taxes imposed by this chapter upon the use of tangible personal
property that is an object of art or an object of cultural value, when
the taxpayer:
(a) Has paid use tax with respect to such property; and
(b) Subsequently donates the property to an artistic or cultural
organization that qualifies for tax-exempt status under 26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code, as amended on January
1, 2007, and that organization presents artistic or cultural
exhibitions, performances, or programs for attendance or viewing by the
general public.
(2) The amount of the credit shall be the appraised value at the
time of donation to an artistic or cultural organization multiplied by
the rate in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.
(3) The credit does not expire and any value of the credit that is
not applied may be carried forward.
(4) To claim the credit, the taxpayer must provide the following
documentation to the department of revenue:
(a) A copy of the bill of sale;
(b) A copy of the use tax return for the tax paid; and
(c) A copy of the appraisal required for a charitable deduction
from federal income tax for contributions made to an organization
exempt under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue
code, as existing and in effect on January 1, 2007.

--- END ---