BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.810 and 2005 c 64 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a
member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided
for under the provisions of RCW 41.32.755 through 41.32.825.
(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an
authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor
organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor
organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period
of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence.
This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the
member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of
leave. The earnable compensation reported for a member who establishes
service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary
paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) Except as specified in subsection (6) of this section, a member
shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit
during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member
is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such
credit may be obtained only if the member makes both the employer and
member contributions plus interest as determined by the department for
the period of the authorized leave of absence within five years of
resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner.
(4) If a member fails to meet the time limitations of subsection
(3) of this section, the member may receive a maximum of two years of
service credit during a member's working career for those periods when
a member is on unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. This
may be done by paying the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior
to retirement.
(5) For the purpose of subsection (3) of this section, ((the
contribution shall not include the contribution for the unfunded
supplemental present value as required by RCW 41.32.775.)) the
contributions required shall be based on the average of the member's
earnable compensation at both the time the authorized leave of absence
was granted and the time the member resumed employment.
(6) ((A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States shall be entitled to retirement
system service credit for up to five years of military service. This
subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent with the
requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and
reemployment rights act.
(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection
if:
(i) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the
uniformed services of the United States, the member applies for
reemployment with the employer who employed the member immediately
prior to the member entering the uniformed services; and
(ii) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW
41.32.775 within five years of resumption of service or prior to
retirement, whichever comes sooner; or
(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the
member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the
member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii), (d)(iii),
or (e)(iii) of this subsection, the department shall establish the
member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its
contribution required under RCW 41.32.775 for the period of military
service, plus interest as determined by the department.
(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii)
of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would
have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with
reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the
year prior to when the member went on military leave.
(d))) A member who has served or shall serve on active federal
service in the uniformed services of the United States and who left or
shall leave an employer to enter such service shall be deemed to be on
military leave of absence if he or she has resumed or shall resume
employment as an employee within one year from termination.
(7) If he or she has applied or shall apply for reinstatement of
employment, within one year from termination of the military service,
and is refused employment for reasons beyond his or her control, he or
she shall, upon resumption of service within ten years have such
service credited to him or her.
(8) In any event, after completing twenty-five years of creditable
service, any member may have service in the uniformed services credited
to him or her as a member whether or not he or she left the employ of
an employer to enter the uniformed services: PROVIDED, That in no
instance, described in this section, shall military service in excess
of five years be credited: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each instance
the member must restore all withdrawn accumulated contributions, which
restoration must be completed within five years of membership service
following the first resumption of employment or complete twenty-five
years of creditable service: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section
will not apply to any individual, not a veteran within the meaning of
RCW 41.04.005.
(9) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member
who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of
the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may,
on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service
credit under this ((subsection)) section up to the date of the member's
death in the uniformed services. The department shall establish the
deceased member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible
child or children:
(((i))) (a) Provides to the director proof of the member's death
while serving in the uniformed services;
(((ii))) (b) Provides to the director proof of the member's
honorable service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death;
and
(((iii))) (c) Pays the employee contributions required under
chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the date of death or prior to
the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first.
(((e))) (10) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter
the uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in
the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit
under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed
services if:
(((i))) (a) The member obtains a determination from the director
that he or she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to
conditions or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed
services;
(((ii))) (b) The member provides to the director proof of honorable
discharge from the uniformed services; and
(((iii))) (c) The member pays the employee contributions required
under chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the director's
determination of total disability or prior to the distribution of any
benefit, whichever comes first.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.35.470 and 2005 c 64 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a
member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided
for under the provisions of RCW 41.35.400 through 41.35.599.
(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an
authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor
organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor
organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period
of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence.
This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the
member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of
leave. The compensation earnable reported for a member who establishes
service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary
paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member
shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit
during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member
is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such
credit may be obtained only if:
(a) The member makes both the plan 2 employer and member
contributions plus interest as determined by the department for the
period of the authorized leave of absence within five years of
resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner; or
(b) If not within five years of resumption of service but prior to
retirement, pay the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be
based on the average of the member's compensation earnable at both the
time the authorized leave of absence was granted and the time the
member resumed employment.
(4) ((A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States shall be entitled to retirement
system service credit for up to five years of military service. This
subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent with the
requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and
reemployment rights act.
(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection
if:
(i) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the
uniformed services of the United States, the member applies for
reemployment with the employer who employed the member immediately
prior to the member entering the uniformed services; and
(ii) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW
41.35.430 within five years of resumption of service or prior to
retirement, whichever comes sooner; or
(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the
member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the
member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii), (d)(iii),
or (e)(iii) of this subsection, the department shall establish the
member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its
contribution required under RCW 41.35.430 for the period of military
service, plus interest as determined by the department.
(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii)
of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would
have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with
reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the
year prior to when the member went on military leave.)) A member who
has served or shall serve on active federal service in the uniformed
services of the United States and who left or shall leave an employer
to enter such service shall be deemed to be on military leave of
absence if he or she has resumed or shall resume employment as an
employee within one year from termination.
(5) If he or she has applied or shall apply for reinstatement of
employment, within one year from termination of the military service,
and is refused employment for reasons beyond his or her control, he or
she shall, upon resumption of service within ten years have such
service credited to him or her.
(6) In any event, after completing twenty-five years of creditable
service, any member may have service in the uniformed services credited
to him or her as a member whether or not he or she left the employ of
an employer to enter the uniformed services: PROVIDED, That in no
instance, described in this section, shall military service in excess
of five years be credited: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each instance
the member must restore all withdrawn accumulated contributions, which
restoration must be completed within five years of membership service
following the first resumption of employment or complete twenty-five
years of creditable service: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section
will not apply to any individual, not a veteran within the meaning of
RCW 41.04.005.
(((d))) (7) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of
a member who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed
services of the United States and died while serving in the uniformed
services may, on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement
system service credit under this ((subsection)) section up to the date
of the member's death in the uniformed services. The department shall
establish the deceased member's service credit if the surviving spouse
or eligible child or children:
(((i))) (a) Provides to the director proof of the member's death
while serving in the uniformed services;
(((ii))) (b) Provides to the director proof of the member's
honorable service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death;
and
(((iii))) (c) Pays the employee contributions required under
chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the date of death or prior to
the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first.
(((e))) (8) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter
the uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in
the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit
under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed
services if:
(((i))) (a) The member obtains a determination from the director
that he or she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to
conditions or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed
services;
(((ii))) (b) The member provides to the director proof of honorable
discharge from the uniformed services; and
(((iii))) (c) The member pays the employee contributions required
under chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the director's
determination of total disability or prior to the distribution of any
benefit, whichever comes first.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.40.710 and 2005 c 64 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a
member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided
for under the provisions of RCW 41.40.610 through 41.40.740.
(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an
authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor
organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor
organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period
of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence.
This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is
authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the
member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of
leave. The compensation earnable reported for a member who establishes
service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary
paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member
shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit
during a member's entire working career for those periods when a member
is on an unpaid leave of absence authorized by an employer. Such
credit may be obtained only if:
(a) The member makes both the plan 2 employer and member
contributions plus interest as determined by the department for the
period of the authorized leave of absence within five years of
resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever comes sooner; or
(b) If not within five years of resumption of service but prior to
retirement, pay the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
The contributions required under (a) of this subsection shall be
based on the average of the member's compensation earnable at both the
time the authorized leave of absence was granted and the time the
member resumed employment.
(4) ((A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States shall be entitled to retirement
system service credit for up to five years of military service. This
subsection shall be administered in a manner consistent with the
requirements of the federal uniformed services employment and
reemployment rights act.
(a) The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection
if:
(i) Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the
uniformed services of the United States, the member applies for
reemployment with the employer who employed the member immediately
prior to the member entering the uniformed services; and
(ii) The member makes the employee contributions required under RCW
41.45.061 and 41.45.067 within five years of resumption of service or
prior to retirement, whichever comes sooner; or
(iii) Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the
member's honorable discharge or five years of resumption of service the
member pays the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2).
(b) Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii), (d)(iii),
or (e)(iii) of this subsection, the department shall establish the
member's service credit and shall bill the employer for its
contribution required under RCW 41.45.060, 41.45.061, and 41.45.067 for
the period of military service, plus interest as determined by the
department.
(c) The contributions required under (a)(ii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii)
of this subsection shall be based on the compensation the member would
have earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with
reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the
year prior to when the member went on military leave.)) A member who
has served or shall serve on active federal service in the uniformed
services of the United States and who left or shall leave an employer
to enter such service shall be deemed to be on military leave of
absence if he or she has resumed or shall resume employment as an
employee within one year from termination.
(5) If he or she has applied or shall apply for reinstatement of
employment, within one year from termination of the military service,
and is refused employment for reasons beyond his or her control, he or
she shall, upon resumption of service within ten years have such
service credited to him or her.
(6) In any event, after completing twenty-five years of creditable
service, any member may have service in the uniformed services credited
to him or her as a member whether or not he or she left the employ of
an employer to enter the uniformed services: PROVIDED, That in no
instance, described in this section, shall military service in excess
of five years be credited: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each instance
the member must restore all withdrawn accumulated contributions, which
restoration must be completed within five years of membership service
following the first resumption of employment or complete twenty-five
years of creditable service: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section
will not apply to any individual, not a veteran within the meaning of
RCW 41.04.005.
(((d))) (7) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of
a member who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed
services of the United States and died while serving in the uniformed
services may, on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement
system service credit under this ((subsection)) section up to the date
of the member's death in the uniformed services. The department shall
establish the deceased member's service credit if the surviving spouse
or eligible child or children:
(((i))) (a) Provides to the director proof of the member's death
while serving in the uniformed services;
(((ii))) (b) Provides to the director proof of the member's
honorable service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death;
and
(((iii))) (c) Pays the employee contributions required under
chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the date of death or prior to
the distribution of any benefit, whichever comes first.
(((e))) (8) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter
the uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in
the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit
under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed
services if:
(((i))) (a) The member obtains a determination from the director
that he or she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to
conditions or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed
services;
(((ii))) (b) The member provides to the director proof of honorable
discharge from the uniformed services; and
(((iii))) (c) The member pays the employee contributions required
under chapter 41.45 RCW within five years of the director's
determination of total disability or prior to the distribution of any
benefit, whichever comes first.

--- END ---