BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79.105 RCW
under the subchapter heading "other management provisions" to read as
follows:
(1) There is created the Maury Island aquatic reserve. The reserve
encompasses only state-owned tidelands and bedlands, except that the
department may include tidelands or shorelands contiguous to state
aquatic lands where the owner provides written permission for inclusion
of such lands in the reserve and states in writing an intent to sell or
donate the lands to the state in the future. The commissioner may
expand the reserve by administrative order designating additional
contiguous state-owned tidelands and bedlands, or by accepting written
permission by the owner of contiguous aquatic lands, where the
commissioner determines the lands in the designation or private owner
permission meet one or more of the following characteristics:
(a) The lands have been identified as having high priority for
conservation, natural systems, wildlife, and low-impact public use
values;
(b) The lands have flora, fauna, geological, recreational,
archaeological, cultural, scenic, or similar features of critical
importance and have retained to some degree or reestablished its
natural character;
(c) The lands provide significant examples of native ecological
communities; and
(d) The lands have significant sites or features threatened with
conversion to incompatible uses.
(2) The Maury Island aquatic reserve shall include the lands
designated by administrative order under subsection (1) of this
section, and the tidelands and bedlands surrounding Maury Island and
including Quartermaster Harbor in King county, as described in this
subsection:
The tidelands and bedlands of navigable waters, owned by the state
of Washington, described as follows:
Those tidelands and bedlands surrounding Maury Island, which are
fronting and abutting Section 14, Sections 20-23, inclusively, and
Sections 28-32, inclusively, Township 22 North, Range 3 East, W.M.;
Together with, those tidelands and bedlands lying westerly of said
Maury Island which are fronting and abutting only those portions of
Sections 9 and 16, which are fronting on Quartermaster Harbor, Township
22 North, Range 3 East, W.M.;
Together with, those tidelands and bedlands lying southerly of said
Maury Island, which are fronting and abutting Sections 5 and 6,
Township 21 North, Range 3 East, W.M.; and said reserve extends
waterward to a water depth of 70 feet below mean lower low water or
one-half mile from the line of extreme low tide, whichever line is
further waterward;
Those tidelands and bedlands lying southerly and easterly of Vashon
Island, which are fronting and abutting Section 1, Township 21 North,
Range 2 East, W.M.;
Together with, those tidelands and bedlands lying easterly of said
Vashon Island, which are fronting and abutting Sections 24, 25, and 36,
Township 22 North, Range 2 East, W.M.;
Together with, those tidelands and bedlands lying easterly of said
Vashon Island, which are fronting and abutting Sections 17-20,
inclusively, Township 22 North, Range 3 East, W.M.;
Together with, those tidelands and bedlands lying southerly and
westerly of said Vashon Island, which are fronting and abutting only
those portions of Section 8, which is fronting on Quartermaster Harbor,
Township 22 North, Range 3 East, W.M.; and said reserve extends
waterward to a water depth of 70 feet below mean lower low water or
one-half mile from the line of extreme low tide, whichever line is
further waterward.
(3) The department shall manage the Maury Island aquatic reserve
primarily for the achievement of the following goals:
(a) To conserve native habitats and associated plant and wildlife
species, with a special emphasis upon forage fish, salmonids, and
migratory birds;
(b) To protect and restore the functions and natural processes of
nearshore ecosystems in support of the natural resources of the
reserve;
(c) To promote stewardship of riparian and aquatic habitats and
species by providing education and outreach opportunities and promoting
coordination with other resource managers; and
(d) To provide for low-impact public uses including recreation uses
and improvements that do not adversely affect the resource values, are
appropriate to the maintenance of the lands in a relatively unmodified
natural setting, and do not detract from long-term ecological
processes.
(4) The department shall develop a management plan for the aquatic
reserve, and may incorporate an existing management plan and policies
previously adopted for the lands where consistent with the management
guidance of this section. The plan must identify the significant
resources to be conserved consistent with the purposes of this chapter
and identify the areas with potential for low-impact public uses. The
plan must specify what types of management activities and public uses
are permitted, consistent with the conservation purposes of this
chapter. The department shall make the plan available for review and
comment by the public and other state, tribal, and local agencies,
prior to final approval by the commissioner.
(5) The department shall not authorize any portion of the Maury
Island aquatic reserve for industrial uses or for transportation of
materials from a surface mine or mining operation as defined under RCW
78.44.031 or other industrial activities, and may not authorize the
construction of docks or other improvements associated with these uses.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.105.210 and 2005 c 155 s 143 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The management of state-owned aquatic lands shall preserve and
enhance water-dependent uses. Water-dependent uses shall be favored
over other uses in state-owned aquatic land planning and in resolving
conflicts between competing lease applications. In cases of conflict
between water-dependent uses, priority shall be given to uses which
enhance renewable resources, water-borne commerce, and the navigational
and biological capacity of the waters, and to statewide interests as
distinguished from local interests.
(2) Nonwater-dependent use of state-owned aquatic lands is a low-priority use providing minimal public benefits and shall not be
permitted to expand or be established in new areas except in
exceptional circumstances where it is compatible with water-dependent
uses occurring in or planned for the area.
(3) The department shall consider the natural values of state-owned
aquatic lands as wildlife habitat, natural area preserve,
representative ecosystem, or spawning area prior to issuing any initial
lease or authorizing any change in use. The department may withhold
from leasing lands which it finds to have significant natural values,
or may provide within any lease for the protection of such values.
(4) The power to lease state-owned aquatic lands is vested in the
department, which has the authority to make leases upon terms,
conditions, and length of time in conformance with the state
Constitution and chapters 79.105 through 79.140 RCW. Leases,
easements, licenses, permits, rights-of-way, and any other agreements
allowing use of state-owned aquatic lands designated as an aquatic
reserve under section 1 of this act must conform with the management
criteria expressed in chapters 79.105 through 79.140 RCW and with
section 1 of this act.
(5) State-owned aquatic lands shall not be leased to persons or
organizations which discriminate on the basis of race, color, creed,
religion, sex, age, or physical or mental handicap.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---