BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the major industrial development allowed under
RCW 36.70A.365 and 36.70A.367, a county planning under RCW 36.70A.040
that meets the criteria in subsection (2) of this section may
establish, in consultation with cities consistent with RCW 36.70A.210,
a process for designating a master planned location for major
industrial activity outside urban growth areas on lands formerly used
or designated for surface coal mining and supporting uses. Once a
master planned location is designated, it shall be considered an urban
growth area retained for purposes of promoting major industrial
activity.
(2) This section applies to a county that, at the time the process
is established in subsection (1) of this section, had a surface coal
mining operation in excess of three thousand acres that ceased
operation after July 1, 2006, and that is located within fifteen miles
of the Interstate 5 corridor.
(3) Designation of a master planned location for major industrial
activities is an amendment to the comprehensive plan adopted under RCW
36.70A.070, except that RCW 36.70A.130(2) does not apply so that
designation of master planned locations may be considered at any time.
The process established under subsection (1) of this section for
designating a master planned location for one or more major industrial
activities must include, but is not limited to, the following
comprehensive plan policy criteria:
(a) The master planned location must be located on lands: Formerly
used or designated for surface coal mining and supporting uses; that
consist of an aggregation of land of one thousand or more acres, which
is not required to be contiguous; and that are suitable for
manufacturing, industrial, or commercial businesses;
(b) New infrastructure is provided for; and
(c) Environmental review of a proposed designation of a master
planned location must be at the programmatic level, as long as the
environmental review of a proposed designation that is being reviewed
concurrent with a proposed major industrial activity is at the project
level.
(4) Approval of a specific major industrial activity proposed for
a master planned location designated under this section is through a
local master plan process and does not require further comprehensive
plan amendment. The process for reviewing and approving a specific
major industrial activity proposed for a master planned location
designated under this section must include the following criteria in
adopted development regulations:
(a) The site consists of one hundred or more acres of land formerly
used or designated for surface coal mining and supporting uses that has
been or will be reclaimed as land suitable for industrial development;
(b) Urban growth will not occur in adjacent nonurban areas;
(c) Environmental review of a specific proposed major industrial
activity must be conducted as required in chapter 43.21C RCW.
Environmental review may be processed as a planned action, as long as
it meets the requirements of RCW 43.21C.031; and
(d) Commercial development within a master planned location must be
directly related to manufacturing or industrial uses. Commercial uses
shall not exceed ten percent of the total gross floor area of buildings
or facilities in the development.
(5) Final approval of the designation of a master planned location
designated under subsection (3) of this section is subject to appeal
under this chapter. Approval of a specific major industrial activity
under subsection (4) of this section is subject to appeal under chapter
36.70C RCW.
(6) RCW 36.70A.365 and 36.70A.367 do not apply to the designation
of master planned locations or the review and approval of specific
major industrial activities under this section.

--- END ---