BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The boating activities account is created in the state treasury.
All receipts from watercraft excise tax revenues received under RCW
82.49.030 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used only as authorized under sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Grants, gifts, or other financial assistance received by the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation from nonstate sources for
purposes of boating activities may be deposited into the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The boating activities program is created in the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation.
(2) The interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall
distribute moneys appropriated from the boating activities account
created in section 1 of this act as follows, or as otherwise
appropriated by the legislature, after deduction for the committee's
expenses in administering the boating activities grant program and for
related studies:
(a) To the commission for boater safety, boater education, boating-related law enforcement activities, activities included in RCW
88.02.040, related administrative expenses, and boating-related
environmental programs, such as pumpout stations, to enhance clean
waters for boating;
(b) For grants to state agencies, counties, municipalities, federal
agencies, nonprofit organizations, and Indian tribes to improve boating
access to water and marine parks, enhance the boater experience, boater
safety, boater education, and boating-related law enforcement
activities, and to provide funds for boating-related environmental
programs, such as pumpout stations, to enhance clean waters for
boating; and
(c) If the amount available for distribution from the boating
activities account is equal to or less than two million five hundred
thousand dollars per fiscal year, then eighty percent of the amount
available must be distributed to the commission for the purposes of (a)
of this subsection and twenty percent for grants in (b) of this
subsection. Amounts available for distribution in excess of two
million five hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year shall be
distributed by the committee for purposes of (a) and (b) of this
subsection.
(3) The interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall
establish an application process for boating activities grants.
(4) Agencies receiving grants for capital purposes from the boating
activities account shall consider the possibility of contracting with
the commission, the department of natural resources, or other federal,
state, and local agencies to employ the youth development and
conservation corps or other youth crews in completing the project.
(5) To solicit input on the boating activities grant application
process, criteria for grant awards, and use of grant moneys, and to
determine the interests of the boating community, the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation shall solicit input from a boating
activities advisory committee. The interagency committee for outdoor
recreation may utilize a currently established boating issues committee
that has similar responsibility for input on recreational boating-related funding issues. Members of the boating activities advisory
committee are not eligible for compensation but may be reimbursed for
travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The interagency committee for outdoor recreation may adopt
rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2007, the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation shall complete an initial study of boater needs and make
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the
initial amount of funding that should be provided to the commission for
boating-related law enforcement purposes under section 2(2)(a) of this
act.
(2) By September 1, 2008, and by September 1st of each even-numbered year thereafter, the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation shall update its study of boater needs as necessary and
shall make recommendations to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature concerning funding allocations to state
parks and other grant applicants.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.49.030 and 2000 c 103 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The excise tax imposed under this chapter is due and payable to
the department of licensing or its agents at the time of registration
of a vessel. The department of licensing shall not issue or renew a
registration for a vessel until the tax is paid in full.
(2) The excise tax collected under this chapter shall be deposited
in the ((general fund)) boating activities account created in section
1 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.49.065 and 2003 c 53 s 405 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any person has paid a vessel license fee, and with the
fee has paid an excise tax imposed under this chapter, and the director
of licensing determines that the payor is entitled to a refund of the
entire amount of the license fee as provided by law, then the payor
shall also be entitled to a refund of the entire excise tax collected
under this chapter together with interest at the rate specified in RCW
82.32.060. If the director determines that any person is entitled to
a refund of only a part of the license fee paid, the payor shall be
entitled to a refund of the difference, if any, between the excise tax
collected and that which should have been collected together with
interest at the rate specified in RCW 82.32.060. The state treasurer
shall determine the amount of such refund by reference to the
applicable excise tax schedule prepared by the department of revenue in
cooperation with the department of licensing.
(2) If no claim is to be made for the refund of the license fee, or
any part of the fee, but claim is made by any person that he or she has
paid an erroneously excessive amount of excise tax, the department of
licensing shall determine in the manner generally provided in this
chapter the amount of such excess, if any, that has been paid and shall
certify to the state treasurer that the person is entitled to a refund
in that amount together with interest at the rate specified in RCW
82.32.060.
(3) If due to error a person has been required to pay an excise tax
pursuant to this chapter and a license fee under chapter 88.02 RCW
which amounts to an overpayment of ten dollars or more, such person
shall be entitled to a refund of the entire amount of such overpayment,
together with interest at the rate specified in RCW 82.32.060,
regardless of whether a refund of the overpayment has been requested.
If due to error the department or its agents has failed to collect the
full amount of the license fee and excise tax due, which underpayment
is in the amount of ten dollars or more, the department shall charge
and collect such additional amount as will constitute full payment of
the tax and any penalties or interest at the rate specified in RCW
82.32.050.
(4) If the department approves the claim, it shall notify the state
treasurer to that effect and the treasurer shall make such approved
refunds and the other refunds provided for in this section from the
((general fund)) boating activities account created in section 1 of
this act and shall mail or deliver the same to the person entitled to
the refund.
(5) Any person who makes a false statement under which he or she
obtains a refund to which he or she is not entitled under this section
is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
RCW 43.135.035(4) does not apply to RCW 82.49.030.

--- END ---