BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.96B.050 and 2005 c 504 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(((a))) When a designated crisis responder receives information
alleging that a person, as a result of a mental disorder, chemical
dependency disorder, or both, presents a likelihood of serious harm or
is gravely disabled, the designated crisis responder may, after
investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the
reliability and credibility of any person providing information to
initiate detention, if satisfied that the allegations are true and that
the person will not voluntarily seek appropriate treatment, file a
petition for initial detention. Before filing the petition, the
designated crisis responder must personally interview the person,
unless the person refuses an interview, and determine whether the
person will voluntarily receive appropriate evaluation and treatment at
either an evaluation and treatment facility, a detoxification facility,
or other certified chemical dependency provider.
(((b)(i)(A) Whenever it appears, by petition for initial detention,
to the satisfaction of a judge of the superior court that a person
presents as a result of a mental disorder, a likelihood of serious
harm, or is gravely disabled, and that the person has refused or failed
to accept appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily, the judge
may issue an order requiring the person to appear within twenty-four
hours after service of the order at a designated evaluation and
treatment facility for not more than a seventy-two hour evaluation and
treatment period; or
(B) Whenever it appears, by petition for initial detention, to the
satisfaction of a judge of the superior court, district court, or other
court permitted by court rule, that a person presents as a result of a
chemical dependency, a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely
disabled, and that the person has refused or failed to accept
appropriate evaluation and treatment voluntarily, the judge may issue
an order requiring the person to appear within twenty-four hours after
service of the order at a secure detoxification facility or other
certified chemical dependency provider for not more than a seventy-two
hour evaluation and treatment period.
(ii) The order issued under this subsection (1)(b) shall state the
address of the evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification
facility, or other certified chemical dependency provider to which the
person is to report; whether the required seventy-two hour evaluation
and treatment services may be delivered on an outpatient or inpatient
basis; and that if the person named in the order fails to appear at the
evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification facility, or
other certified chemical dependency provider at or before the date and
time stated in the order, the person may be involuntarily taken into
custody for evaluation and treatment. The order shall also designate
retained counsel or, if counsel is appointed from a list provided by
the court, the name, business address, and telephone number of the
attorney appointed to represent the person.
(c))) (2)(a) An order to detain to an evaluation and treatment
facility, a detoxification facility, or other certified chemical
dependency provider for not more than a seventy-two hour evaluation and
treatment period may be issued by a judge upon request of a designated
crisis responder: (i) Whenever it appears to the satisfaction of a
judge of the superior court, district court, or other court permitted
by court rule, that there is probable cause to support the petition,
and (ii) that the person has refused or failed to accept appropriate
evaluation and treatment voluntarily.
(b) The petition for initial detention, signed under penalty of
perjury or sworn telephonic testimony, may be considered by the court
in determining whether there are sufficient grounds for issuing the
order.
(c) The order shall designate retained counsel or, if counsel is
appointed from a list provided by the court, the name, business
address, and telephone number of the attorney appointed to represent
the person.
(3) The designated crisis responder shall then serve or cause to be
served on such person, his or her guardian, and conservator, if any, a
copy of the order to appear, together with a notice of rights and a
petition for initial detention. After service on the person, the
designated crisis responder shall file the return of service in court
and provide copies of all papers in the court file to the evaluation
and treatment facility or secure detoxification facility and the
designated attorney. The designated crisis responder shall notify the
court and the prosecuting attorney that a probable cause hearing will
be held within seventy-two hours of the date and time of outpatient
evaluation or admission to the evaluation and treatment facility,
secure detoxification facility, or other certified chemical dependency
provider. The person ((shall be permitted to remain in his or her home
or other place of his or her choosing before the time of evaluation and
shall be permitted to)) may be accompanied by one or more of his or her
relatives, friends, an attorney, a personal physician, or other
professional or religious advisor to the place of evaluation. An
attorney accompanying the person to the place of evaluation shall be
permitted to be present during the admission evaluation. Any other
person accompanying the person may be present during the admission
evaluation. The facility may exclude the person if his or her presence
would present a safety risk, delay the proceedings, or otherwise
interfere with the evaluation.
(((d) If the person ordered to appear does appear on or before the
date and time specified, the evaluation and treatment facility, secure
detoxification facility, or other certified chemical dependency
provider may admit the person as required by subsection (3) of this
section or may provide treatment on an outpatient basis. If the person
ordered to appear fails to appear on or before the date and time
specified, the evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification
facility, or other certified chemical dependency provider shall
immediately notify))
(4) The designated crisis responder ((who)) may notify a peace
officer to take the person or cause the person to be taken into custody
and placed in an evaluation and treatment facility, a secure
detoxification facility, or other certified chemical dependency
provider. ((Should the designated crisis responder notify a peace
officer authorizing the officer to take a person into custody under
this subsection, the designated crisis responder shall file with the
court a copy of the authorization and a notice of detention.)) At the
time the person is taken into custody there shall commence to be served
on the person, his or her guardian, and conservator, if any, a copy of
the original order together with a notice of detention, a notice of
rights, and a petition for initial detention.
(((2) If a designated crisis responder receives information
alleging that a person, as the result of:
(a) A mental disorder, presents an imminent likelihood of serious
harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after
investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the
reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the
information if any, the designated crisis responder may take the
person, or cause by oral or written order the person to be taken into
emergency custody in an evaluation and treatment facility for not more
than seventy-two hours as described in this chapter; or
(b) Chemical dependency, presents an imminent likelihood of serious
harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after
investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the
reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the
information if any, the designated crisis responder may take the
person, or cause by oral or written order the person to be taken into
emergency custody in a secure detoxification facility for not more than
seventy-two hours as described in this chapter.
(3) If the designated crisis responder petitions for detention of
a person whose actions constitute a likelihood of serious harm, or who
is gravely disabled, the evaluation and treatment facility, the secure
detoxification facility, or other certified chemical dependency
provider providing seventy-two hour evaluation and treatment must
immediately accept on a provisional basis the petition and the person.
The evaluation and treatment facility, the secure detoxification
facility, or other certified chemical dependency provider shall then
evaluate the person's condition and admit, detain, transfer, or
discharge such person in accordance with this chapter. The facility
shall notify in writing the court and the designated crisis responder
of the date and time of the initial detention of each person
involuntarily detained so that a probable cause hearing will be held no
later than seventy-two hours after detention.
(4) A peace officer may, without prior notice of the proceedings
provided for in subsection (1) of this section, take or cause the
person to be taken into custody and immediately delivered to an
evaluation and treatment facility, secure detoxification facility,
other certified chemical dependency treatment provider only pursuant to
subsections (1)(d) and (2) of this section.
(5) Nothing in this chapter limits the power of a peace officer to
take a person into custody and immediately deliver the person to the
emergency department of a local hospital or to a detoxification
facility.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.96B RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a designated crisis responder receives information alleging
that a person, as the result of:
(a) A mental disorder, presents an imminent likelihood of serious
harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after
investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the
reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the
information if any, the designated crisis responder may take the
person, or cause by oral or written order the person to be taken into
emergency custody in an evaluation and treatment facility for not more
than seventy-two hours as described in this chapter; or
(b) Chemical dependency, presents an imminent likelihood of serious
harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after
investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the
reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the
information if any, the designated crisis responder may take the
person, or cause by oral or written order the person to be taken into
emergency custody in a secure detoxification facility for not more than
seventy-two hours as described in this chapter.
(2) The evaluation and treatment facility, the secure
detoxification facility, or other certified chemical dependency
provider shall then evaluate the person's condition and admit, detain,
transfer, or discharge such person in accordance with this chapter.
The facility shall notify in writing the court and the designated
crisis responder of the date and time of the initial detention of each
person involuntarily detained so that a probable cause hearing will be
held no later than seventy-two hours after detention.
(3) A peace officer may take or cause the person to be taken into
custody and immediately delivered to an evaluation and treatment
facility, secure detoxification facility, or other certified chemical
dependency treatment provider: (a) Pursuant to this section; or (b)
when he or she has reasonable cause to believe that such person, as a
result of a mental disorder or chemical dependency, presents an
imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is in imminent danger because
of being gravely disabled. An individual brought to a facility by a
peace officer may be held for up to twelve hours: PROVIDED, That the
individual is examined by a designated crisis responder within three
hours of arrival. Within twelve hours of arrival the designated crisis
responder must determine whether the individual meets detention
criteria. If the individual is detained, the designated mental health
professional shall file a petition for detention or supplemental
petition as appropriate and commence service on the designated attorney
for the detained person.
(4) Nothing in this chapter limits the power of a peace officer to
take a person into custody and immediately deliver the person to the
emergency department of a local hospital or to a detoxification
facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire July 1,
2008.

--- END ---