BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.48.130 and 1993 c 409 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature that all jail inmates receive
appropriate and cost-effective emergency and necessary medical care.
Governing units, the department of social and health services, and
medical care providers shall cooperate to achieve the best rates
consistent with adequate care.
Payment for emergency or necessary health care shall be by the
governing unit, except that the department of social and health
services shall directly reimburse the provider pursuant to chapter
74.09 RCW, in accordance with the rates and benefits established by the
department, if the confined person is eligible under the department's
medical care programs as authorized under chapter 74.09 RCW. After
payment by the department, the financial responsibility for any
remaining balance, including unpaid client liabilities that are a
condition of eligibility or participation under chapter 74.09 RCW,
shall be borne by the medical care provider and the governing unit as
may be mutually agreed upon between the medical care provider and the
governing unit. In the absence of mutual agreement between the medical
care provider and the governing unit, the financial responsibility for
any remaining balance shall be borne equally between the medical care
provider and the governing unit. Total payments from all sources to
providers for care rendered to confined persons eligible under chapter
74.09 RCW shall not exceed the amounts that would be paid by the
department for similar services provided under Title XIX medicaid,
unless additional resources are obtained from the confined person.
As part of the screening process upon booking or preparation of an
inmate into jail, general information concerning the inmate's ability
to pay for medical care shall be identified, including insurance or
other medical benefits or resources to which an inmate is entitled.
This information shall be made available to the department, the
governing unit, and any provider of health care services.
The governing unit or provider may obtain reimbursement from the
confined person for the cost of health care services not provided under
chapter 74.09 RCW, including reimbursement from any insurance program
or from other medical benefit programs available to the confined
person. Nothing in this chapter precludes civil or criminal remedies
to recover the costs of medical care provided jail inmates or paid for
on behalf of inmates by the governing unit. As part of a judgment and
sentence, the courts are authorized to order defendants to repay all or
part of the medical costs incurred by the governing unit or provider
during confinement.
To the extent that a confined person is unable to be financially
responsible for medical care and is ineligible for the department's
medical care programs under chapter 74.09 RCW, or for coverage from
private sources, and in the absence of an interlocal agreement or other
contracts to the contrary, the governing unit may obtain reimbursement
for the cost of such medical services from the unit of government whose
law enforcement officers initiated the charges on which the person is
being held in the jail: PROVIDED, That reimbursement for the cost of
such services shall be by the state when officers of state agencies
initiated the charges on which the person is being held in the jail,
and for state prisoners being held in a jail who are accused of either
escaping from a state facility or of committing an offense in a state
facility.
There shall be no right of reimbursement to the governing unit from
units of government whose law enforcement officers initiated the
charges for which a person is being held in the jail for care provided
after the charges are disposed of by sentencing or otherwise, unless by
intergovernmental agreement pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW, except that
when officers of state agencies initiate the charges for which a person
is ordered to serve a sentence in the jail, the state shall reimburse
the governing unit for care provided to that person whether pretrial or
during the term of the sentence.
Under no circumstance shall necessary medical services be denied or
delayed because of disputes over the cost of medical care or a
determination of financial responsibility for payment of the costs of
medical care provided to confined persons.
Nothing in this section shall limit any existing right of any
party, governing unit, or unit of government against the person
receiving the care for the cost of the care provided.

--- END ---