BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Consumer" means a person who purchases a retail product from
a retailer.
(2) "Package" means any type of container, article, or item that is
used to pack, contain, or hold a retail product in the form in which
the retail product is sold to the consumer. "Package" includes,
without limitation, a box, bag, bottle, can, or jar.
(3) "Radio frequency identification tag" means a device that (a) is
attached to, embedded in, or made part of a retail product or its
package; and (b) uses radio waves or other wireless technology to
transmit a unique electronic product code.
(4) "Retail product" means any type of product, good, or commodity
that is intended to be sold at retail.
(5) "Retailer" means a person who is engaged in the business of
selling retail products directly to consumers.
(6) "Unique electronic product code" means a number or identifier
that (a) uniquely identifies an individual retail product; (b) is
stored and transmitted electronically; and (c) is used for the control
and management of inventories of retail products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) If a person produces, manufactures,
packages, distributes, or sells a retail product and the person has
caused a radio frequency identification tag to be attached to, embedded
in, or made part of the retail product or its package, the person shall
ensure that the retail product or its package bears a label which
notifies consumers of the existence of the radio frequency
identification tag.
(2) If a retailer knows or reasonably should know that a retail
product or its package has a radio frequency identification tag, the
retailer shall not sell the retail product to a consumer unless the
retail product or its package bears the label required pursuant to this
section.
(3) The label required pursuant to this section must, at a minimum
(a) inform the consumer that the retail product or its package has a
radio frequency identification tag which can transmit unique
identification information before and after purchase of the retail
product; (b) be in a conspicuous location on the retail product or its
package; and (c) be printed in a size of type and in a manner that is
conspicuous and contrasts with the background on which the notice
appears.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Any business that uses a radio frequency
identification tag shall disclose to consumers that such a device is in
use. The disclosure must be in a conspicuous location and be printed
in a size of type and in a manner that is conspicuous to the average
consumer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for purposes of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The remedies, duties, and prohibitions set
forth in this chapter are not exclusive and are in addition to any
other remedies, duties, and prohibitions provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---