BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.06.140 and 2004 c 218 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The legislature finds ((that)) as follows:
(1) Washington faces serious forest health problems where forests
are overcrowded or trees are infested with or susceptible to insects,
diseases, wind, ice storms, and fire. The causes of and contributions
to these susceptible conditions include fire suppression, past timber
harvesting and silvicultural practices, altered species composition,
and the amplified risks that occur when the urban interface penetrates
forest land.
(2) ((The legislature further finds that)) There is a private and
public interest in preventing and controlling uncharacteristic
outbreaks of native and naturalized insects and diseases, and reducing
the risk of uncharacteristic loss due to ice storms, wind storms, and
wildfire. The public interest is in protecting forest productivity on
forests managed for commodity production; forest ecosystem vitality;
reducing the cost of fire suppression and the resulting public
expenditures; protecting, restoring, and enhancing fish and wildlife
habitat, including the habitat of threatened or endangered species; and
protecting drinking water supplies and water quality.
(3) Well managed forests are the first line of defense in
preventing destructive fires and outbreaks of native insects and
diseases. Active management of forests, consistent with landowner
objectives and the protection of public resources, is the most
economical and effective way to address forest health concerns. Native
insects and diseases play important ecological roles when their
occurrence does not present a material threat to forest productivity
and increase the likelihood of destructive fire.
(4) Forest health problems may exist on forest land regardless of
ownership, and the state should ((explore all possible avenues for
working in)) pursue collaboration with the federal government to
address common health deficiencies.
(((3) The legislature further finds that healthy forests benefit
not only the economic interests that rely on forest products but also
provide environmental benefits, such as improved water quality and
habitat for fish and wildlife.))

Sec. 2 RCW 76.06.020 and 2003 c 314 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agent" means the recognized legal representative,
representatives, agent, or agents for any owner.
(2) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(3) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(((3) "Owner" means and includes persons or their agents.
(4) "Timber land" means any land on which there is a sufficient
number of trees, standing or down, to constitute, in the judgment of
the department, a forest insect or forest disease breeding ground of a
nature to constitute a menace, injurious and dangerous to permanent
forest growth in the district under consideration.
(5) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(6))) (4) "Disturbance agent" means those forces that damage or
kill significant numbers of forest trees, such as insects, diseases,
other pests, wind storms, ice storms, and fires.
(5) "Exotic" means not native to forest lands in Washington state.
(((7) "Forest land" means any land on which there are sufficient
numbers and distribution of trees and associated species to, in the
judgment of the department, contribute to the spread of forest insect
or forest disease outbreaks that could be injurious to forest health.
(8))) (6) "Forest health" means, for the purposes of this chapter,
the condition of a forest being sound in ecological function,
sustainable, resilient, and resistant to insects, diseases, fire, and
other disturbance, and having the capacity to meet landowner
objectives.
(((9))) (7) "Forest health emergency" means the introduction of, or
an outbreak of, an exotic forest insect or disease that poses an
imminent danger of damage to the environment by threatening the
survivability of native tree species.
(((10))) (8) "Forest insect or disease" means a living stage of an
insect, other invertebrate animal, or disease-causing organism or agent
that can directly or indirectly injure or cause disease or damage in
trees, or parts of trees, or in processed or manufactured wood, or
other products of trees.
(((11))) (9) "Forest land" means any land on which there are
sufficient numbers and distribution of trees and associated species to,
in the judgment of the department, contribute to the spread of forest
insect or forest disease outbreaks that could be injurious to forest
health.
(10) "Integrated pest management" means a strategy that uses
various combinations of pest control methods, including biological,
cultural, and chemical methods, in a compatible manner to achieve
satisfactory control and ensure favorable economic and environmental
consequences.
(((12))) (11) "Native" means having populated Washington's forested
lands prior to European settlement.
(((13))) (12) "Outbreak" means a rapidly expanding population of
insects or diseases with potential to spread.
(13) "Owner" means and includes persons or their agents.

(14) "Person" means any individual, partnership, private, public,
or municipal corporation, county, federal, state, or local governmental
agency, tribes, or association of individuals of whatever nature.
(15) "Timber land" means any land on which there is a sufficient
number of trees, standing or down, to constitute, in the judgment of
the department, a forest insect or forest disease breeding ground of a
nature to constitute a menace, injurious and dangerous to permanent
forest growth in the district under consideration.

Sec. 3 RCW 76.06.030 and 1988 c 128 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter shall be administered by the department.
(2) The department has the lead role in developing a comprehensive
forest health program to achieve the goals of this act. Within
available funding, the department shall:
(a) Develop, gather, and disseminate information on forest health
conditions, monitor forest health conditions and changes over time, and
coordinate and enter agreements with interested and affected parties;
(b) Coordinate with universities, university extension services,
federal and state agencies, private, public, and tribal forest
landowners, consulting foresters, and forest managers to monitor forest
fuel buildup, forest insect and disease outbreaks, and wind and ice
storm events; and
(c) Coordinate with universities, university extension services,
and state and federal agencies to provide education and technical
assistance to private, public, and tribal forest landowners on
silvicultural and forest management science, techniques, and technology
to maintain forests in conditions that are resistant to disturbance
agents.
(3) The department may implement a committee to advise on subjects
and procedures for monitoring forest health conditions and program
activities.
(4) The department may coordinate, support, and assist in
establishing cooperative forest health projects to control and contain
outbreaks of insects or diseases. Priority for assistance authorized
under this section shall be given to areas under forest health hazard
warnings and areas where forest health decline has resulted in
increased risk to public safety from destructive wildfire.
(5) The state and its officers and employees are not liable for
damages to a person or their property to the extent that liability is
asserted to arise from providing or failing to provide assistance under
this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 76.06.040 and 1951 c 233 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Every owner of timber lands, or his agent, shall make every
reasonable effort to control, destroy and eradicate such forest insect
pests and forest tree diseases which threaten the existence of any
stand of timber or provide for the same to be done on timber lands
owned by him or under his control. In the event he fails, neglects, or
is unable to accomplish such control, the action may be performed as
provided for in this chapter.)) Landowners and managers are encouraged
to maintain their forest lands in a healthy condition in order to meet
their individual ownership objectives, protect public resources as
defined in chapter 76.09 RCW, and avoid contributing to forest insect
or disease outbreaks or increasing the risk of destructive fire.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 76.06 RCW
to read as follows:
Forest health issues shall be addressed by a tiered system.
(1) The first tier is intended to maintain forest health and
protect forests from disturbance agents through the voluntary efforts
of landowners. Tier 1 is the desired status. Consistent with
landowner objectives and the protection of public resources, forests
should be managed in ways that create, restore, or maintain healthy
forest ecosystems so that disturbance agents occur or exist at
nonepidemic levels. To the extent of available funding, information
and technical assistance will be made available to forest landowners so
they can plan for and implement necessary forest health maintenance and
restoration activities.
(2) The second tier is intended to manage the development of
threats to forest health, or contain or suppress existing threats to
forest health, due to disturbance agents. Actions by landowners to
address such threats to forest health are voluntary except as required
under chapter 76.04 RCW to reduce the danger of the spread of fire.
Actions suggested to reduce threats to forest health are specified in
forest health hazard warnings issued by the commissioner of public
lands under section 7 of this act. Within available funding, site-specific information, technical assistance, and project coordination
services shall be offered as determined appropriate by the department.
(3) The third tier is intended to address significant threats to
forest health due to disturbance agents that have spread to multiple
forest ownerships or increased forest fuel that is likely to further
the spread of fire. Actions required to reduce significant threats to
forest health are specified in forest health hazard orders issued by
the commissioner of public lands under section 7(5) of this act.
Within available funding, site-specific information, technical
assistance, and project coordination services shall be offered as
determined appropriate by the department. Landowners who are provided
notice of a forest health hazard order under section 7(5) of this act
and fail to take the action required under such order may be subject to
increased liability for the spread of fire as described in RCW
76.04.495 and 76.04.660.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 76.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner of public lands may appoint a forest health
technical advisory committee when the commissioner determines that
forest lands in any area of the state appear to be threatened by a
forest health condition of such a nature, extent, or timing that action
to reduce the threat may be necessary.
(a) The committee shall consist of one scientist chosen for
expertise in forest ecology, two scientists chosen for expertise
relative to the attendant risk, one specialist in wildfire protection,
one specialist in fuels management, one forester with extensive
silvicultural experience in the affected forest type, and a chairperson
who shall represent the commissioner. The departments of fish and
wildlife, ecology, and natural resources shall provide technical
assistance to the committee in the areas of fish and wildlife, water
quality, and forest practices, but shall not be members of the
committee. The director of forest health protection of region 6 of the
United States department of agriculture forest service or their named
designee shall be invited to be an ex officio member of the committee.
In the event the area affected contains substantial acreage of tribal
or federally owned lands, representatives of the affected agencies and
tribes shall be invited to participate in the proceedings of the
committee.
(b) The commissioner may disband the committee when he or she deems
appropriate.
(2) The committee shall evaluate the threat to forest health and
make a timely report to the commissioner on its nature, extent, and
location.
(a) In its deliberations, the committee shall consider the need for
action to reduce the threat and alternative methods of achieving the
desired results, including the environmental risks associated with the
alternatives.
(b) The committee shall also recommend potential approaches to
achieve the desired results for forest land ownerships of fewer than
ten acres and for forests owned for scientific, study, recreational, or
other uses not compatible with active management.
(c) The committee shall recommend to the commissioner whether a
forest health hazard warning or forest health hazard order is
warranted.
(d) When the commissioner issues a forest health hazard warning or
forest health hazard order, the committee shall monitor the progress
and results of activities to control or mitigate the hazard, and
periodically report its findings to the commissioner.
(3) The exercise by forest health technical advisory committee
members of their authority under this section shall not imply or create
any liability on their part. Advisory committee members shall be
compensated as provided in RCW 43.03.250 and shall receive
reimbursement for travel expenses as provided by RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. Costs associated with the committee may be paid from the
general fund appropriation made available to the department of natural
resources for fire suppression.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 76.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to issuing a forest health hazard warning or forest
health hazard order, the commissioner shall consider the findings and
recommendations of the forest health technical advisory committee and
shall consult with county government officials, forest landowners and
forest land managers, consulting foresters, and other interested
parties to gather information on the threat, opportunities or
constraints on control mechanisms, and other information they may
provide. The commissioner, or a designee, shall conduct a public
hearing in a county within the geographical area being considered.
(2) The commissioner of public lands may issue a forest health
hazard warning when he or she deems such action is necessary to manage
the development of a threat to forest health or contain or suppress an
existing threat to forest health. A decision to issue a forest health
hazard warning may be based on existing forest stand conditions and:
(a) The presence of insects, disease, or other pests that are
likely to (i) spread to multiple forest ownerships and, if not
controlled or contained, cause extensive damage to forests; or (ii)
increase forest fuel that is likely to further the spread of fire;
(b) When, due to physical damage from wind or ice storm or other
cause, there is the likelihood of (i) insect populations building up to
damaging levels; or (ii) increasing forest fuel that is likely to
further the spread of fire; or
(c) When otherwise determined by the commissioner to be
appropriate.
(3) The commissioner of public lands may issue a forest health
hazard order when he or she deems such action is necessary to address
a significant threat to forest health. A decision to issue a forest
health hazard order may be based on existing forest stand conditions
and:
(a) The presence of insects, disease, or other pests that have (i)
spread to multiple forest ownerships and have caused and are likely to
continue to cause extensive damage to forests; or (ii) increased forest
fuel that is likely to further the spread of fire;
(b) When, due to extensive physical damage from wind or ice storm
or other cause, there is likelihood of (i) insect populations causing
extensive damage to forests; or (ii) increasing forest fuel that is
likely to further the spread of fire;
(c) Insufficient landowner action under a forest health hazard
warning; or
(d) When otherwise determined by the commissioner to be
appropriate.
(4) A forest health hazard warning or forest health hazard order
shall be issued by use of a commissioner's order. General notice of
the commissioner's order shall be published in a newspaper of general
circulation in each county within the area covered by the order and on
the department's web site. The order shall specify the boundaries of
the area affected, including federal and tribal lands, the forest stand
conditions that would make a parcel subject to the provisions of the
order, and the actions landowners or land managers should take to
reduce the hazard.
(5) Written notice of a forest health hazard warning or forest
health hazard order shall be provided to forest landowners of
specifically affected property.
(a) The notice shall set forth:
(i) The reasons for the action;
(ii) The boundaries of the area affected, including federal and
tribal lands;
(iii) Suggested actions that should be taken by the forest
landowner under a forest health hazard warning or the actions that must
be taken by a forest landowner under a forest health hazard order;
(iv) The time within which such actions should or must be taken;
(v) How to obtain information or technical assistance on forest
health conditions and treatment options;
(vi) The right to request mitigation under subsection (6) of this
section and appeal under subsection (7) of this section;
(vii) These requirements are advisory only for federal and tribal
lands.
(b) The notice shall be served by personal service or by mail to
the latest recorded real property owner, as shown by the records of the
county recording officer as defined in RCW 65.08.060. Service by mail
is effective on the date of mailing. Proof of service shall be by
affidavit or declaration under penalty of perjury.
(6) Forest landowners who have been issued a forest health hazard
order under subsection (5) of this section may apply to the department
for the remission or mitigation of such order. The application shall
be made to the department within fifteen days after notice of the order
has been served. Upon receipt of the application, the department may
remit or mitigate the order upon whatever terms the department in its
discretion deems proper, provided the department deems the remission or
mitigation to be in the best interests of carrying out the purposes of
this chapter. The department may ascertain the facts regarding all
such applications in such reasonable manner and under such rule as it
deems proper.
(7) Forest landowners who have been issued a forest health hazard
order under subsection (5) of this section may appeal the order to the
forest practices appeals board.
(a) The appeal shall be filed within thirty days after notice of
the order has been served, unless application for mitigation has been
made to the department. When such an application for mitigation is
made, such appeal shall be filed within thirty days after notice of the
disposition of the application for mitigation has been served.
(b) The appeal must set forth:
(i) The name and mailing address of the appellant;
(ii) The name and mailing address of the appellant's attorney, if
any;
(iii) A duplicate copy of the forest health hazard order;
(iv) A separate and concise statement of each error alleged to have
been committed;
(v) A concise statement of facts upon which the appellant relies to
sustain the statement of error; and
(vi) A statement of the relief requested.
(8) A forest health hazard order issued under subsection (5) of
this section is effective thirty days after date of service unless
application for remission or mitigation is made or an appeal is filed.
When an application for remission or mitigation is made, the order is
effective thirty days after notice setting forth the disposition of the
application is served unless an appeal is filed from such disposition.
Whenever an appeal of the order is filed, the order shall become
effective only upon completion of all administrative and judicial
review proceedings and the issuance of a final decision confirming the
order in whole or in part.
(9) Upon written request, the department may certify as adequate a
forest health management plan developed by a forest landowner, before
or in response to a forest health hazard warning or forest health
hazard order, if the plan is likely to achieve the desired result and
the terms of the plan are being diligently followed by the forest
landowner. The certification of adequacy shall be determined by the
department in its sole discretion, and be provided to the requestor in
writing.

Sec. 8 RCW 76.09.220 and 2003 c 393 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The appeals board shall operate on either a part-time or a
full-time basis, as determined by the governor. If it is determined
that the appeals board shall operate on a full-time basis, each member
shall receive an annual salary to be determined by the governor. If it
is determined that the appeals board shall operate on a part-time
basis, each member shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.250. The director of the environmental hearings office shall
make the determination, required under RCW 43.03.250, as to what
statutorily prescribed duties, in addition to attendance at a hearing
or meeting of the board, shall merit compensation. This compensation
shall not exceed ten thousand dollars in a fiscal year. Each member
shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in the
discharge of his or her duties in accordance with the provisions of RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(2) The appeals board shall as soon as practicable after the
initial appointment of the members thereof, meet and elect from among
its members a chair, and shall at least biennially thereafter meet and
elect or reelect a chair.
(3) The principal office of the appeals board shall be at the state
capital, but it may sit or hold hearings at any other place in the
state. A majority of the appeals board shall constitute a quorum for
making orders or decisions, adopting rules necessary for the conduct of
its powers and duties, or transacting other official business, and may
act though one position on the board be vacant. One or more members
may hold hearings and take testimony to be reported for action by the
board when authorized by rule or order of the board. The appeals board
shall perform all the powers and duties granted to it in this chapter
or as otherwise provided by law.
(4) The appeals board shall make findings of fact and prepare a
written decision in each case decided by it, and such findings and
decision shall be effective upon being signed by two or more members
and upon being filed at the appeals board's principal office, and shall
be open to public inspection at all reasonable times.
(5) The appeals board shall either publish at its expense or make
arrangements with a publishing firm for the publication of those of its
findings and decisions which are of general public interest, in such
form as to assure reasonable distribution thereof.
(6) The appeals board shall maintain at its principal office a
journal which shall contain all official actions of the appeals board,
with the exception of findings and decisions, together with the vote of
each member on such actions. The journal shall be available for public
inspection at the principal office of the appeals board at all
reasonable times.
(7) The forest practices appeals board shall have exclusive
jurisdiction to hear appeals arising from an action or determination by
the department, and the department of fish and wildlife, and the
department of ecology with respect to management plans provided for
under RCW 76.09.350.
(8)(a) Any person aggrieved by the approval or disapproval of an
application to conduct a forest practice or the approval or disapproval
of any landscape plan or permit or watershed analysis may, except as
otherwise provided in chapter 43.21L RCW, seek review from the appeals
board by filing a request for the same within thirty days of the
approval or disapproval. Concurrently with the filing of any request
for review with the board as provided in this section, the requestor
shall file a copy of his or her request with the department and the
attorney general. The attorney general may intervene to protect the
public interest and ensure that the provisions of this chapter are
complied with.
(b) The review proceedings authorized in (a) of this subsection are
subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW pertaining to procedures
in adjudicative proceedings.
(9) The forest practices appeals board shall have exclusive
jurisdiction to hear appeals of forest health hazard orders issued by
the commissioner under section 7(5) of this act. Such proceedings are
subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW pertaining to procedures
in adjudicative proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 76.06 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this act shall exempt actions specified under the
authority of this act from the application of the provisions of chapter
76.09 RCW and rules adopted thereunder which govern forest practices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 76.06 RCW
to read as follows:
If any part of this chapter or requirements imposed upon landowners
pursuant to this chapter are found to conflict with requirements of
other statutes or rules, the conflicting part of this chapter or
requirements imposed pursuant to this chapter shall be inoperative
solely to the extent of the conflict. The finding or determination
shall not affect the operation of the remainder of this chapter or such
requirements.

Sec. 11 RCW 76.09.060 and 2005 c 274 s 357 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The following shall apply to those forest practices administered
and enforced by the department and for which the board shall promulgate
regulations as provided in this chapter:))
(1) The department shall prescribe the form and contents of the
notification and application. The forest practices rules shall specify
by whom and under what conditions the notification and application
shall be signed or otherwise certified as acceptable. Activities
conducted by the department or a contractor under the direction of the
department under the provisions of RCW 76.04.660, shall be exempt from
the landowner signature requirement on any forest practice application
required to be filed. The application or notification shall be
delivered in person to the department, sent by first class mail to the
department or electronically filed in a form defined by the department.
The form for electronic filing shall be readily convertible to a paper
copy, which shall be available to the public pursuant to chapter 42.56
RCW. The information required may include, but is not limited to:
(a) Name and address of the forest landowner, timber owner, and
operator;
(b) Description of the proposed forest practice or practices to be
conducted;
(c) Legal description and tax parcel identification numbers of the
land on which the forest practices are to be conducted;
(d) Planimetric and topographic maps showing location and size of
all lakes and streams and other public waters in and immediately
adjacent to the operating area and showing all existing and proposed
roads and major tractor roads;
(e) Description of the silvicultural, harvesting, or other forest
practice methods to be used, including the type of equipment to be used
and materials to be applied;
(f) Proposed plan for reforestation and for any revegetation
necessary to reduce erosion potential from roadsides and yarding roads,
as required by the forest practices rules;
(g) Soil, geological, and hydrological data with respect to forest
practices;
(h) The expected dates of commencement and completion of all forest
practices specified in the application;
(i) Provisions for continuing maintenance of roads and other
construction or other measures necessary to afford protection to public
resources;
(j) An affirmation that the statements contained in the
notification or application are true; and
(k) All necessary application or notification fees.
(2) Long range plans may be submitted to the department for review
and consultation.
(3) The application for a forest practice or the notification of a
Class II forest practice is subject to the three-year reforestation
requirement.
(a) If the application states that any such land will be or is
intended to be so converted:
(i) The reforestation requirements of this chapter and of the
forest practices rules shall not apply if the land is in fact so
converted unless applicable alternatives or limitations are provided in
forest practices rules issued under RCW 76.09.070 as now or hereafter
amended;
(ii) Completion of such forest practice operations shall be deemed
conversion of the lands to another use for purposes of chapters 84.33
and 84.34 RCW unless the conversion is to a use permitted under a
current use tax agreement permitted under chapter 84.34 RCW;
(iii) The forest practices described in the application are subject
to applicable county, city, town, and regional governmental authority
permitted under RCW 76.09.240 as now or hereafter amended as well as
the forest practices rules.
(b) Except as provided elsewhere in this section, if the
application or notification does not state that any land covered by the
application or notification will be or is intended to be so converted:
(i) For six years after the date of the application the county,
city, town, and regional governmental entities shall deny any or all
applications for permits or approvals, including building permits and
subdivision approvals, relating to nonforestry uses of land subject to
the application;
(A) The department shall submit to the local governmental entity a
copy of the statement of a forest landowner's intention not to convert
which shall represent a recognition by the landowner that the six-year
moratorium shall be imposed and shall preclude the landowner's ability
to obtain development permits while the moratorium is in place. This
statement shall be filed by the local governmental entity with the
county recording officer, who shall record the documents as provided in
chapter 65.04 RCW, except that lands designated as forest lands of
long-term commercial significance under chapter 36.70A RCW shall not be
recorded due to the low likelihood of conversion. Not recording the
statement of a forest landowner's conversion intention shall not be
construed to mean the moratorium is not in effect.
(B) The department shall collect the recording fee and reimburse
the local governmental entity for the cost of recording the
application.
(C) When harvesting takes place without an application, the local
governmental entity shall impose the six-year moratorium provided in
(b)(i) of this subsection from the date the unpermitted harvesting was
discovered by the department or the local governmental entity.
(D) The local governmental entity shall develop a process for
lifting the six-year moratorium, which shall include public
notification, and procedures for appeals and public hearings.
(E) The local governmental entity may develop an administrative
process for lifting or waiving the six-year moratorium for the purposes
of constructing a single-family residence or outbuildings, or both, on
a legal lot and building site. Lifting or waiving of the six-year
moratorium is subject to compliance with all local ordinances.
(F) The six-year moratorium shall not be imposed on a forest
practices application that contains a conversion option harvest plan
approved by the local governmental entity unless the forest practice
was not in compliance with the approved forest practice permit. Where
not in compliance with the conversion option harvest plan, the six-year
moratorium shall be imposed from the date the application was approved
by the department or the local governmental entity;
(ii) Failure to comply with the reforestation requirements
contained in any final order or decision shall constitute a removal of
designation under the provisions of RCW 84.33.140, and a change of use
under the provisions of RCW 84.34.080, and, if applicable, shall
subject such lands to the payments and/or penalties resulting from such
removals or changes; and
(iii) Conversion to a use other than commercial forest product
operations within six years after approval of the forest practices
without the consent of the county, city, or town shall constitute a
violation of each of the county, municipal city, town, and regional
authorities to which the forest practice operations would have been
subject if the application had so stated.
(c) The application or notification shall be signed by the forest
landowner and accompanied by a statement signed by the forest landowner
indicating his or her intent with respect to conversion and
acknowledging that he or she is familiar with the effects of this
subsection.
(4) Whenever an approved application authorizes a forest practice
which, because of soil condition, proximity to a water course or other
unusual factor, has a potential for causing material damage to a public
resource, as determined by the department, the applicant shall, when
requested on the approved application, notify the department two days
before the commencement of actual operations.
(5) Before the operator commences any forest practice in a manner
or to an extent significantly different from that described in a
previously approved application or notification, there shall be
submitted to the department a new application or notification form in
the manner set forth in this section.
(6) Except as provided in RCW 76.09.350(4), the notification to or
the approval given by the department to an application to conduct a
forest practice shall be effective for a term of two years from the
date of approval or notification and shall not be renewed unless a new
application is filed and approved or a new notification has been filed.
At the option of the applicant, an application or notification may be
submitted to cover a single forest practice or a number of forest
practices within reasonable geographic or political boundaries as
specified by the department. An application or notification that
covers more than one forest practice may have an effective term of more
than two years. The board shall adopt rules that establish standards
and procedures for approving an application or notification that has an
effective term of more than two years. Such rules shall include
extended time periods for application or notification approval or
disapproval. On an approved application with a term of more than two
years, the applicant shall inform the department before commencing
operations.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no prior
application or notification shall be required for any emergency forest
practice necessitated by fire, flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other
emergency as defined by the board, but the operator shall submit an
application or notification, whichever is applicable, to the department
within forty-eight hours after commencement of such practice or as
required by local regulations.
(8) Forest practices applications or notifications are not required
for forest practices conducted to control exotic forest insect or
disease outbreaks, when conducted by or under the direction of the
department of agriculture in carrying out an order of the governor or
director of the department of agriculture to implement pest control
measures as authorized under chapter 17.24 RCW, and are not required
when conducted by or under the direction of the department in carrying
out emergency measures under a forest health emergency declaration by
the commissioner of public lands as provided in RCW 76.06.130.
(a) For the purposes of this subsection, exotic forest insect or
disease has the same meaning as defined in RCW 76.06.020.
(b) In order to minimize adverse impacts to public resources,
control measures must be based on integrated pest management, as
defined in RCW 17.15.010, and must follow forest practices rules
relating to road construction and maintenance, timber harvest, and
forest chemicals, to the extent possible without compromising control
objectives.
(c) Agencies conducting or directing control efforts must provide
advance notice to the appropriate regulatory staff of the department of
the operations that would be subject to exemption from forest practices
application or notification requirements.
(d) When the appropriate regulatory staff of the department are
notified under (c) of this subsection, they must consult with the
landowner, interested agencies, and affected tribes, and assist the
notifying agencies in the development of integrated pest management
plans that comply with forest practices rules as required under (b) of
this subsection.
(e) Nothing under this subsection relieves agencies conducting or
directing control efforts from requirements of the federal clean water
act as administered by the department of ecology under RCW 90.48.260.
(f) Forest lands where trees have been cut as part of an exotic
forest insect or disease control effort under this subsection are
subject to reforestation requirements under RCW 76.09.070.
(g) The exemption from obtaining approved forest practices
applications or notifications does not apply to forest practices
conducted after the governor, the director of the department of
agriculture, or the commissioner of public lands have declared that an
emergency no longer exists because control objectives have been met,
that there is no longer an imminent threat, or that there is no longer
a good likelihood of control.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The forest practices board shall evaluate the eastside riparian
rules to determine if adjustments are needed to meet the riparian
function intended by the rules and contribute toward forest health and
wildfire protection goals set forth in RCW 76.06.140. The forest
practices board shall consider creating a class of emergency forest
practices or other mechanisms that will enable forest landowners to
prevent the spread of disturbance agents, as defined in RCW 76.06.020,
when rapid spread resulting in extensive loss is likely or has
occurred. Such emergency forest practices or other mechanisms are
intended to assist forest landowners in meeting their ownership
objectives and protect public resources.

Sec. 13 RCW 76.04.005 and 1992 c 52 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Additional fire hazard" means a condition existing on any land
in the state:
(a) Covered wholly or in part by forest debris which is likely to
further the spread of fire and thereby endanger life or property; or
(b) When, due to the effects of disturbance agents, broken, down,
dead, or dying trees exist on forest land in sufficient quantity to be
likely to further the spread of fire within areas covered by a forest
health hazard warning or order issued by the commissioner of public
lands under section 7 of this act. The term "additional fire hazard"
does not include green trees or snags left standing in upland or
riparian areas under the provisions of RCW 76.04.465 or chapter 76.09
RCW.
(2) "Closed season" means the period between April 15 and October
15, unless the department designates different dates because of
prevailing fire weather conditions.
(3) "Department" means the department of natural resources, or its
authorized representatives, as defined in chapter 43.30 RCW.
(4) "Department protected lands" means all lands subject to the
forest protection assessment under RCW 76.04.610 or covered under
contract or agreement pursuant to RCW 76.04.135 by the department.
(5) "Disturbance agent" means those agents that damage or kill
significant numbers of forest trees, such as insects, diseases, other
pests, wind storms, ice storms, and fires.
(6) "Emergency fire costs" means those costs incurred or approved
by the department for emergency forest fire suppression, including the
employment of personnel, rental of equipment, and purchase of supplies
over and above costs regularly budgeted and provided for nonemergency
fire expenses for the biennium in which the costs occur.
(((6))) (7) "Forest debris" includes forest slash, chips, and any
other vegetative residue resulting from activities on forest land.
(((7))) (8) "Forest fire service" includes all wardens, rangers,
and other persons employed especially for preventing or fighting forest
fires.
(((8))) (9) "Forest land" means any unimproved lands which have
enough trees, standing or down, or flammable material, to constitute in
the judgment of the department, a fire menace to life or property.
Sagebrush and grass areas east of the summit of the Cascade mountains
may be considered forest lands when such areas are adjacent to or
intermingled with areas supporting tree growth. Forest land, for
protection purposes, does not include structures.
(((9))) (10) "Forest landowner," "owner of forest land,"
"landowner," or "owner" means the owner or the person in possession of
any public or private forest land.
(((10))) (11) "Forest material" means forest slash, chips, timber,
standing or down, or other vegetation.
(((11))) (12) "Landowner operation" means every activity, and
supporting activities, of a forest landowner and the landowner's
agents, employees, or independent contractors or permittees in the
management and use of forest land subject to the forest protection
assessment under RCW 76.04.610 for the primary benefit of the owner.
The term includes, but is not limited to, the growing and harvesting of
forest products, the development of transportation systems, the
utilization of minerals or other natural resources, and the clearing of
land. The term does not include recreational and/or residential
activities not associated with these enumerated activities.
(((12))) (13) "Participating landowner" means an owner of forest
land whose land is subject to the forest protection assessment under
RCW 76.04.610.
(((13))) (14) "Slash" means organic forest debris such as tree
tops, limbs, brush, and other dead flammable material remaining on
forest land as a result of a landowner operation.
(((14))) (15) "Slash burning" means the planned and controlled
burning of forest debris on forest lands by broadcast burning,
underburning, pile burning, or other means, for the purposes of
silviculture, hazard abatement, or reduction and prevention or
elimination of a fire hazard.
(((15))) (16) "Suppression" means all activities involved in the
containment and control of forest fires, including the patrolling
thereof until such fires are extinguished or considered by the
department to pose no further threat to life or property.
(((16))) (17) "Unimproved lands" means those lands that will
support grass, brush and tree growth, or other flammable material when
such lands are not cleared or cultivated and, in the opinion of the
department, are a fire menace to life and property.

Sec. 14 RCW 76.04.660 and 1986 c 100 s 39 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The owner of land on which there is an additional fire hazard
((and the person responsible for the existence of an additional fire
hazard)), when the hazard is the result of a landowner operation or the
land is within an area covered by a forest health hazard warning issued
under section 7 of this act, shall take reasonable measures to reduce
the danger of fire spreading from the area and may abate the hazard by
burning or other satisfactory means.
(2) An extreme fire hazard shall exist within areas covered by a
forest health hazard order issued by the commissioner of public lands
under section 7 of this act in which there is an additional fire hazard
caused by disturbance agents and the landowner has failed to take such
action as required by the forest health hazard order. The duties and
liability of such landowner under this chapter are as described in
subsections (5), (6), and (7) of this section.
(3) The department shall adopt rules defining areas of extreme fire
hazard that the owner and person responsible shall abate. The areas
shall include but are not limited to high risk areas such as where life
or buildings may be endangered, areas adjacent to public highways, and
areas of frequent public use.
(((3))) (4) The department may adopt rules, after consultation with
the forest fire advisory board, defining other conditions of extreme
fire hazard with a high potential for fire spreading to lands in other
ownerships. The department may prescribe additional measures that
shall be taken by the owner and person responsible to isolate or reduce
the extreme fire hazard.
(((4))) (5) The owner or person responsible for the existence of
the extreme fire hazard is required to abate, isolate, or reduce the
hazard. The duty to abate, isolate, or reduce, and liability under
this chapter, arise upon creation of the extreme fire hazard.
Liability shall include but not be limited to all fire suppression
expenses incurred by the department, regardless of fire cause.
(((5))) (6) If the owner or person responsible for the existence of
the extreme fire hazard or forest debris subject to RCW 76.04.650
refuses, neglects, or unsuccessfully attempts to abate, isolate, or
reduce the same, the department may summarily abate, isolate, or reduce
the hazard as required by this chapter and recover twice the actual
cost thereof from the owner or person responsible. Landowner
contingency forest fire suppression account moneys may be used by the
department, when available, for this purpose. Moneys recovered by the
department pursuant to this section shall be returned to the landowner
contingency forest fire suppression account.
(((6))) (7) Such costs shall include all salaries and expenses of
people and equipment incurred therein, including those of the
department. All such costs shall also be a lien upon the land
enforceable in the same manner with the same effect as a mechanic's
lien.
(((7))) (8) The summary action may be taken only after ten days'
notice in writing has been given to the owner or reputed owner of the
land on which the extreme fire hazard or forest debris subject to RCW
76.04.650 exists. The notice shall include a suggested method of
abatement and estimated cost thereof. The notice shall be by personal
service or by registered or certified mail addressed to the owner or
reputed owner at the owner's last known place of residence.
(9) A landowner or manager may make a written request to the
department to inspect their property and provide a written notice that
they have complied with a forest health hazard warning or forest health
hazard order, or otherwise adequately abated, isolated, or reduced an
additional or extreme fire hazard. An additional or extreme fire
hazard shall be considered to continue to exist unless and until the
department, in its sole discretion, issues such notice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 76.06.050 (Infestation control district -- Creation -- Notice
to owners) and 1988 c 128 s 17, 1961 c 72 s 1, & 1951 c 233 s 5;
(2) RCW 76.06.060 (Department to control pests and diseases if
owner fails) and 1988 c 128 s 18 & 1951 c 233 s 6;
(3) RCW 76.06.070 (Lien for costs of control -- Collection) and 1988
c 128 s 19 & 1951 c 233 s 7;
(4) RCW 76.06.080 (Owner complying with notice is exempt) and 1988
c 128 s 20 & 1951 c 233 s 11;
(5) RCW 76.06.090 (Dissolution of infestation control district) and
1988 c 128 s 21 & 1951 c 233 s 12; and
(6) RCW 76.06.110 (Deposit of moneys in general fund -- Allotment as
unanticipated receipts) and 1979 ex.s. c 67 s 12 & 1951 c 233 s 9.

--- END ---