BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
assure that no segment of the grocery store industry, licensed to sell
beer and wine off the premises, is disadvantaged as the result of a
judgment by the court in regards to central warehousing in the case of
Costco Wholesale Corporation v. Roger Hoen, et. al., No. C04-260P. The
legislature further intends that the liquor control board take timely
action to implement a storage and transportation system for the
independent grocery stores and their primary grocery distributors upon
receipt of any judgment that allows chain grocery retailers to store
in, and transport from, their own warehouses to their retail outlets.
The legislature intends that the system should accommodate the current
market place structure and relationships of the independent grocery
store and their primary grocery distributors and avoid any unnecessary
administrative barriers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An independent grocery store may take delivery and store beer
and wine at, and transport to its own independent grocery store from,
a primary grocery distributor that supplies at least thirty percent of
the independent grocery store's merchandise on a regular basis. The
independent grocery store must retain ownership of the beer and wine
until it is purchased by the consumer.
(2) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Primary grocery distributor" means a person that makes
wholesale sales of a broad mix of products to independent grocery
stores and supplies at least thirty percent of the total grocery
store's merchandise on a regular basis. A person sells a broad mix of
products if the person sells at least five of the following categories
of products: Canned food; frozen food; produce; meat; seafood;
poultry; dairy products; dry grocery items such as coffee, tea, flour,
sugar, salt and spices, snacks and candy, pasta, rice, baking mixes and
other baking goods, packaged soup, canned and powdered milk, cereals,
and desserts; pet foods; bakery goods; deli items; health and beauty
care items; and general household merchandise.
(b) "Independent grocery store" means a retailer that:
(i) Has a grocery store license under RCW 66.24.360;
(ii) Is in the business of making retail sales of commercially
prepared and prepackaged food and food ingredients that are customarily
sold for consumption off the premises;
(iii) Does not own a warehouse for purposes of serving as its own
primary grocery distributor; and
(iv) Is not primarily engaged in making retail sales of prepared
food or food and food ingredients through vending machines.
(3) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act only takes effect on
the date the liquor control board permits retailers to take delivery of
beer or wine at a central warehouse owned by the retailer as a result
of a judgment, which is not stayed, that is entered by a court of
competent jurisdiction in the case of Costco Wholesale Corporation v.
Roger Hoen, et. al., No. C04-260P.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The liquor control board must provide notice
of the effective date of this act to the appropriate committees of the
legislature, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed
appropriate by the board, when the condition in section 3 of this act
has been met.

--- END ---