BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.71.030 and 1996 c 178 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to or interfere
in any way with the practice of religion or any kind of treatment by
prayer; nor shall anything in this chapter be construed to prohibit:
(1) The furnishing of medical assistance in cases of emergency
requiring immediate attention;
(2) The domestic administration of family remedies;
(3) The administration of oral medication of any nature to students
by public school district employees or private elementary or secondary
school employees as provided for in chapter 28A.210 RCW;
(4) The practice of dentistry, osteopathic medicine and surgery,
nursing, chiropractic, podiatric medicine and surgery, optometry,
naturopathy, or any other healing art licensed under the methods or
means permitted by such license;
(5) The practice of medicine in this state by any commissioned
medical officer serving in the armed forces of the United States or
public health service or any medical officer on duty with the United
States veterans administration while such medical officer is engaged in
the performance of the duties prescribed for him or her by the laws and
regulations of the United States;
(6) The practice of medicine by any practitioner licensed by
another state or territory in which he or she resides, provided that
such practitioner shall not open an office or appoint a place of
meeting patients or receiving calls within this state;
(7) The practice of medicine by a person who is a regular student
in a school of medicine approved and accredited by the commission,
however, the performance of such services be only pursuant to a regular
course of instruction or assignments from his or her instructor, or
that such services are performed only under the supervision and control
of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter;
(8) The practice of medicine by a person serving a period of
postgraduate medical training in a program of clinical medical training
sponsored by a college or university in this state or by a hospital
accredited in this state, however, the performance of such services
shall be only pursuant to his or her duties as a trainee;
(9) The practice of medicine by a person who is regularly enrolled
in a physician assistant program approved by the commission, however,
the performance of such services shall be only pursuant to a regular
course of instruction in said program and such services are performed
only under the supervision and control of a person licensed pursuant to
this chapter;
(10) The practice of medicine by a licensed physician assistant
which practice is performed under the supervision and control of a
physician licensed pursuant to this chapter;
(11) The practice of medicine, in any part of this state which
shares a common border with Canada and which is surrounded on three
sides by water, by a physician licensed to practice medicine and
surgery in Canada or any province or territory thereof;
(12) The administration of nondental anesthesia by a dentist who
has completed a residency in anesthesiology at a school of medicine
approved by the commission, however, a dentist allowed to administer
nondental anesthesia shall do so only under authorization of the
patient's attending surgeon, obstetrician, or psychiatrist, and the
commission has jurisdiction to discipline a dentist practicing under
this exemption and enjoin or suspend such dentist from the practice of
nondental anesthesia according to this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW;
(13) Emergency lifesaving service rendered by a physician's trained
emergency medical service intermediate life support technician and
paramedic, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, if the emergency lifesaving
service is rendered under the responsible supervision and control of a
licensed physician;
(14) The provision of clean, intermittent bladder catheterization
for students by public school district employees or private school
employees as provided for in RCW 18.79.290 and 28A.210.280;
(15) The provision of complementary and alternative health care
treatments or the provision of health care advice regarding the human
body and its functions by an unlicensed health care practitioner,
including but not limited to the use of:
(a) Natural elements such as air, heat, water, and light;
(b) Class I or class II nonprescriptive medical devices as defined
in section 513 of the food, drug, and cosmetic act;
(c) Vitamins, minerals, herbs, natural food products and their
extracts, nutritional supplements, and dietary supplements as defined
by the federal food and drug administration;
(d) Homeopathic remedies;
(e) Detoxification practices, including but not limited to colon
hydrotherapy and oxidative therapies; and
(f) Traditional cultural practices;
(16) The provision of complementary and alternative health care
treatments or the provision of health care advice regarding the human
body and its functions by an unlicensed health care practitioner as
long as the unlicensed practitioner:
(a) Does not use legend drugs or prescription drugs in such a
practice;
(b) Does not recommend the discontinuance of legend drugs or
prescription drugs or controlled substances prescribed by an
appropriately licensed practitioner;
(c) Does not render services that constitute the performance of
surgery or any other procedure that severs or penetrates the tissues of
human beings except for finger pricking for screening purposes.
Penetration of natural body cavities is not penetration of tissue;
(d) Does not set fractures;
(e) Does not treat lacerations or abrasions through electrotherapy;
(f) Does not administer or prescribe X-ray radiation; and
(g) Does not willfully diagnose or treat a physical or mental
condition of any person that causes serious bodily or mental harm or
has the potential for such harm that is easily recognizable and not
remote or dependent upon tenuous argument; and is proven by clear and
convincing evidence. Delay of conventional allopathic treatments alone
cannot be determined to be, or potentially to be, serious bodily or
mental harm;
(17) The provision of complementary and alternative health care
treatments or the provision of health care advice regarding the human
body and its functions by an unlicensed health care practitioner, as
long as each person receiving such services signs a declaration of
disclosure that includes an overview of the health care practitioner's
education and states that the health care practitioner is not an "M.D."
or other licensed health care practitioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Any pending investigations or disciplinary
actions that would not or could not be brought under the provisions of
this act must be dismissed. Any disciplinary sanctions that have been
imposed that could not have been imposed under the provisions of this
act are revoked and must be expunged without application by the
unlicensed health care practitioner. To this extent, this act applies
retroactively, but in all other respects it applies prospectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2007.

--- END ---