BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 60.04.031 and 1992 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, every person
furnishing professional services, materials, or equipment for the
improvement of real property shall give the owner or reputed owner
notice in writing of the right to claim a lien. If the prime
contractor is in compliance with the requirements of RCW 19.27.095,
60.04.230, and 60.04.261, this notice shall also be given to the prime
contractor as described in this subsection unless the potential lien
claimant has contracted directly with the prime contractor. The notice
may be given at any time but only protects the right to claim a lien
for professional services, materials, or equipment supplied after the
date which is sixty days before:
(a) Mailing the notice by certified or registered mail to the owner
or reputed owner; or
(b) Delivering or serving the notice personally upon the owner or
reputed owner and obtaining evidence of delivery in the form of a
receipt or other acknowledgement signed by the owner or reputed owner
or an affidavit of service.
In the case of new construction of a single-family residence, the
notice of a right to claim a lien ((may)) shall be given at ((any time
but only protects the right to claim a lien for professional services,
materials, or equipment supplied after a date which is ten days before
the notice is given as described in this subsection)) the time of
service.
(2) Notices of a right to claim a lien shall not be required of((:
(a) Persons who contract directly with the owner or the owner's
common law agent;
(b))) laborers whose claim of lien is based solely on performing
labor((; or
(c) Subcontractors who contract for the improvement of real
property directly with the prime contractor, except as provided in
subsection (3)(b) of this section)).
(3) Persons who furnish professional services, materials, or
equipment in connection with new construction of a residence or the
repair, alteration, or remodel of an existing owner-occupied single-family residence or appurtenant garage:
(a) Who contract directly with the owner-occupier or their common
law agent shall not be required to send a written notice of the right
to claim a lien and shall have a lien for the full amount due under
their contract, as provided in RCW 60.04.021; or
(b) Who do not contract directly with the owner-occupier or their
common law agent shall give notice of the right to claim a lien to the
owner-occupier. Liens of persons furnishing professional services,
materials, or equipment who do not contract directly with the owner-occupier or their common law agent may only be satisfied from amounts
not yet paid to the prime contractor by the owner at the time the
notice described in this section is received, regardless of whether
amounts not yet paid to the prime contractor are due. For the purposes
of this subsection "received" means actual receipt of notice by
personal service, or registered or certified mail, or three days after
mailing by registered or certified mail, excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
or legal holidays.
(4) The notice of right to claim a lien described in subsection (1)
of this section, shall include but not be limited to the following
information and shall substantially be in the following form, using
lower-case and upper-case ten-point type where appropriate.

NOTICE TO OWNER

IMPORTANT: READ BOTH SIDES OF THIS NOTICE CAREFULLY.

PROTECT YOURSELF FROM PAYING TWICE

Re: (description of property: Street address or general location.)

From: . . . . . . . . . . . .

AT THE REQUEST OF: (Name of person ordering the professional
services, materials, or equipment)

THIS IS NOT A LIEN: This notice is sent to you to tell you who is
providing professional services, materials, or equipment for the
improvement of your property and to advise you of the rights of these
persons and your responsibilities. Also take note that laborers on
your project may claim a lien without sending you a notice.

OWNER/OCCUPIER OF EXISTING RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY

Under Washington law, those who furnish labor, professional services,
materials, or equipment for the repair, remodel, or alteration of your
owner-occupied principal residence and who are not paid, have a right
to enforce their claim for payment against your property. This claim
is known as a construction lien.

The law limits the amount that a lien claimant can claim against your
property. Claims may only be made against that portion of the contract
price you have not yet paid to your prime contractor as of the time
this notice was given to you or three days after this notice was mailed
to you. Review the back of this notice for more information and ways
to avoid lien claims.

COMMERCIAL AND/OR NEW RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY

We have or will be providing professional services, materials, or
equipment for the improvement of your commercial or new residential
project. In the event you or your contractor fail to pay us, we may
file a lien against your property. A lien may be claimed for all
professional services, materials, or equipment furnished after a date
that is sixty days before this notice was given to you or mailed to
you, unless the improvement to your property is the construction of a
new single-family residence, then ten days before this notice was given
to you or mailed to you.

Sender: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Address: . . . . . . . . . . . .
Telephone: . . . . . . . . . . . .

Brief description of professional services, materials, or equipment
provided or to be provided: . . . . . . . . . . . .

IMPORTANT INFORMATION ON REVERSE SIDE

IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR YOUR PROTECTION

This notice is sent to inform you that we have or will provide
professional services, materials, or equipment for the improvement of
your property. We expect to be paid by the person who ordered our
services, but if we are not paid, we have the right to enforce our
claim by filing a construction lien against your property.

LEARN more about the lien laws and the meaning of this notice by
discussing them with your contractor, suppliers, Department of Labor
and Industries, the firm sending you this notice, your lender, or your
attorney.

COMMON METHODS TO AVOID CONSTRUCTION LIENS: There are several methods
available to protect your property from construction liens. The
following are two of the more commonly used methods.

DUAL PAYCHECKS (Joint Checks): When paying your contractor for
services or materials, you may make checks payable jointly to
the contractor and the firms furnishing you this notice.

LIEN RELEASES: ((You may require)) Your contractor is required
to provide you with lien releases signed by all the suppliers
and subcontractors from whom you have received this notice. If
they cannot obtain lien releases because you have not paid
them, you may use the dual payee check method to protect
yourself.

YOU SHOULD TAKE APPROPRIATE STEPS TO PROTECT YOUR PROPERTY FROM LIENS.

YOUR PRIME CONTRACTOR AND YOUR CONSTRUCTION LENDER ARE REQUIRED BY LAW
TO GIVE YOU WRITTEN INFORMATION ABOUT LIEN CLAIMS. IF YOU HAVE NOT
RECEIVED IT, ASK THEM FOR IT.

* * * * * * * * * * * * *

(5) This notice shall be signed by the owner as proof that he or
she has received it. Failure to obtain the owner's signature on the
notice waives the right of the contractor to claim a lien against the
owner's property and relieves the owner of any further obligations
under the contract. The contractor shall keep the signed notice for
three years.
(6) Every contractor must provide to the owner lien releases signed
by the suppliers and subcontractors within seven calendar days of
paying the suppliers and subcontractors for work for which they are
entitled to file a lien.
(7) Both the notice of right to claim a lien and the lien releases
shall be personally delivered by the contractor to the owner or shall
be mailed to the owner, return receipt requested. If the notices are
mailed, they shall be mailed to the address designated by the owner.
(8) Every potential lien claimant providing professional services
where no improvement as defined in RCW 60.04.011(5) (a) or (b) has been
commenced, and the professional services provided are not visible from
an inspection of the real property may record in the real property
records of the county where the property is located a notice which
shall contain the professional service provider's name, address,
telephone number, legal description of the property, the owner or
reputed owner's name, and the general nature of the professional
services provided. If such notice is not recorded, the lien claimed
shall be subordinate to the interest of any subsequent mortgagee and
invalid as to the interest of any subsequent purchaser if the mortgagee
or purchaser acts in good faith and for a valuable consideration
acquires an interest in the property prior to the commencement of an
improvement as defined in RCW 60.04.011(5) (a) or (b) without notice of
the professional services being provided. The notice described in this
subsection shall be substantially in the following form:

NOTICE OF FURNISHING PROFESSIONAL SERVICES

That on the (day) day of (month and year) , (name of
provider) began providing professional services upon or for the
improvement of real property legally described as follows:

[Legal Description is mandatory]

The general nature of the professional services provided is . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

The owner or reputed owner of the real property is . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .

(((6))) (9) A lien authorized by this chapter shall not be enforced
unless the lien claimant has complied with the applicable provisions of
this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 60.04.091 and 1992 c 126 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person claiming a lien under RCW 60.04.021 shall file for
recording, in the county where the subject property is located, a
notice of claim of lien not later than ninety days after the person has
ceased to furnish labor, professional services, materials, or equipment
or the last date on which employee benefit contributions were due. The
notice of claim of lien:
(1) Shall state in substance and effect:
(a) The name, phone number, and address of the claimant;
(b) The first and last date on which the labor, professional
services, materials, or equipment was furnished or employee benefit
contributions were due;
(c) The name of the person indebted to the claimant;
(d) The street address, legal description, or other description
reasonably calculated to identify, for a person familiar with the area,
the location of the real property to be charged with the lien;
(e) The name of the owner or reputed owner of the property, if
known, and, if not known, that fact shall be stated; and
(f) The principal amount for which the lien is claimed. The
principal amount of the lien shall not include any interest, late fees,
costs, attorneys' fees, or similar charges.
(2) Shall be signed by the claimant or some person authorized to
act on his or her behalf who shall affirmatively state they have read
the notice of claim of lien and believe the notice of claim of lien to
be true and correct under penalty of perjury, and shall be acknowledged
pursuant to chapter 64.08 RCW. If the lien has been assigned, the name
of the assignee shall be stated. Where an action to foreclose the lien
has been commenced such notice of claim of lien may be amended as
pleadings may be by order of the court insofar as the interests of
third parties are not adversely affected by such amendment. A claim of
lien substantially in the following form shall be sufficient:

CLAIM OF LIEN

. . . . . ., claimant, vs . . . . . ., name of person indebted
to claimant:

Notice is hereby given that the person named below claims a
lien pursuant to chapter ((64.04)) 60.04 RCW. In support of
this lien the following information is submitted:

1. NAME OF LIEN CLAIMANT: . . . . . . . . . . . .

TELEPHONE NUMBER: . . . . . . . . . . . .

ADDRESS: . . . . . . . . . . . .

2. DATE ON WHICH THE CLAIMANT BEGAN TO PERFORM LABOR,
PROVIDE PROFESSIONAL SERVICES, SUPPLY MATERIAL OR EQUIPMENT OR
THE DATE ON WHICH EMPLOYEE BENEFIT CONTRIBUTIONS BECAME DUE: . . . . . . . . . . . .

3. NAME OF PERSON INDEBTED TO THE CLAIMANT:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

4. DESCRIPTION OF THE PROPERTY AGAINST WHICH A LIEN IS
CLAIMED (Street address, legal description or other information
that will reasonably describe the property): . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

5. NAME OF THE OWNER OR REPUTED OWNER (If not known
state "unknown"): . . . . . . . . . . . .

6. THE LAST DATE ON WHICH LABOR WAS PERFORMED;
PROFESSIONAL SERVICES WERE FURNISHED; CONTRIBUTIONS TO AN
EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLAN WERE DUE; OR MATERIAL, OR EQUIPMENT WAS
FURNISHED: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

7. PRINCIPAL AMOUNT FOR WHICH THE LIEN IS CLAIMED IS: . . . . . . . . . . . .

8. IF THE CLAIMANT IS THE ASSIGNEE OF THIS CLAIM SO
STATE HERE: . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

STATE OF WASHINGTON, COUNTY OF
. . . . . . . ., ss.
. . . . . . . ., being sworn, says: I am the claimant (or attorney of
the claimant, or administrator, representative, or agent of the
trustees of an employee benefit plan) above named; I have read or heard
the foregoing claim, read and know the contents thereof, and believe
the same to be true and correct and that the claim of lien is not
frivolous and is made with reasonable cause, and is not clearly
excessive under penalty of perjury.

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

Subscribed and sworn to before me this . . . . day of . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

The period provided for recording the claim of lien is a period of
limitation and no action to foreclose a lien shall be maintained unless
the claim of lien is filed for recording within the ninety-day period
stated. The lien claimant shall give a copy of the claim of lien to
the owner or reputed owner by mailing it by certified or registered
mail or by personal service within fourteen days of the time the claim
of lien is filed for recording. Failure to do so results in a
forfeiture of any right the claimant may have to attorneys' fees and
costs against the owner under RCW 60.04.181.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.27.010 and 2001 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Contractor" means any person, firm, or corporation who or
which, in the pursuit of an independent business undertakes to, or
offers to undertake, or submits a bid to, construct, alter, repair, add
to, subtract from, improve, move, wreck or demolish, for another, any
building, highway, road, railroad, excavation or other structure,
project, development, or improvement attached to real estate or to do
any part thereof including the installation of carpeting or other floor
covering, the erection of scaffolding or other structures or works in
connection therewith or who installs or repairs roofing or siding; or,
who, to do similar work upon his or her own property, employs members
of more than one trade upon a single job or project or under a single
building permit except as otherwise provided herein. "Contractor"
includes any person, firm, corporation, or other entity covered by this
subsection, whether or not registered as required under this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries or designated representative employed by the department.
(4) "General contractor" means a contractor whose business
operations require the use of more than two unrelated building trades
or crafts whose work the contractor shall superintend or do in whole or
in part. "General contractor" shall not include an individual who does
all work personally without employees or other "specialty contractors"
as defined in this section. The terms "general contractor" and
"builder" are synonymous.
(5) "Partnership" means a business formed under Title 25 RCW.
(6) "Prime residential contractor" means a prime contractor, as
defined in RCW 60.04.011, who is engaged in the business of
constructing, altering, repairing, or remodeling residences.
(7) "Registration cancellation" means a written notice from the
department that a contractor's action is in violation of this chapter
and that the contractor's registration has been revoked.
(((7))) (8) "Registration suspension" means a written notice from
the department that a contractor's action is a violation of this
chapter and that the contractor's registration has been suspended for
a specified time, or until the contractor shows evidence of compliance
with this chapter.
(((8))) (9) "Residential homeowner" means an individual person or
persons owning or leasing real property:
(a) Upon which one single-family residence is to be built and in
which the owner or lessee intends to reside upon completion of any
construction; or
(b) Upon which there is a single-family residence to which
improvements are to be made and in which the owner or lessee intends to
reside upon completion of any construction.
(((9))) (10) "Specialty contractor" means a contractor whose
operations do not fall within the definition of "general contractor".
(((10))) (11) "Unregistered contractor" means a person, firm,
corporation, or other entity doing work as a contractor without being
registered in compliance with this chapter. "Unregistered contractor"
includes contractors whose registration is expired, revoked, or
suspended. "Unregistered contractor" does not include a contractor who
has maintained a valid bond and the insurance or assigned account
required by RCW 18.27.050, and whose registration has lapsed for thirty
or fewer days.
(((11))) (12) "Unsatisfied final judgment" means a judgment that
has not been satisfied either through payment, court approved
settlement, discharge in bankruptcy, or assignment under RCW 19.72.070.
(((12))) (13) "Verification" means the receipt and duplication by
the city, town, or county of a contractor registration card that is
current on its face, checking the department's contractor registration
data base, or calling the department to confirm that the contractor is
registered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 60.04 RCW
to read as follows:
If an owner has paid a prime contractor for certain work to be done
by a subcontractor, or for materials, equipment, or labor to be
provided, and the prime contractor has not paid either the
subcontractor or for the materials, equipment, or labor in a timely
manner, the lien that the prime contractor, subcontractor, supplier, or
laborer may file against the owner's property is limited to the amount
the owner still owes the prime contractor under the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 60.04 RCW
to read as follows:
When a subcontractor, supplier, or laborer does work for a prime
contractor who does not pay for the work done by the subcontractor,
supplier, or laborer and, as a result, the subcontractor, supplier, or
laborer files a lien against the homeowner, that subcontractor,
supplier, or laborer may not have a lien enforced at a later date
against a homeowner if the work performed is for the same prime
contractor.

--- END ---