BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 30.04.300 and 1955 c 33 s 30.04.300 are each amended
to read as follows:
A branch of any foreign bank or banker actually and publicly
engaged in banking in this state on March 10, 1917, in full compliance
with the laws hereof, which were in force immediately prior to March
10, 1917, and which branch has a capital not less in amount than that
required for the organization of a state bank as provided in this title
at the time and place when and where such branch was established, may
continue its said business, subject to all of the regulations and
supervision provided for banks. The amount upon which it pays taxes
shall be prima facie evidence of the amount and existence of such
capital. No such bank or banker shall set forth on ((its or his))
stationery or in any manner advertise in this state a greater capital,
surplus and undivided profits than are actually maintained at such
branch. Every foreign corporation, bank and banker, and every officer,
agent and employee thereof who violates any provision of this section
((or which violates the terms of the resolution filed as required by
RCW 30.04.290)) shall for each violation forfeit and pay to the state
of Washington the sum of one thousand dollars. A civil action for the
recovery of any such sum may be brought by the attorney general in the
name of the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 30.12.190 and 1989 c 220 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person who shall violate, or knowingly aid or abet the
violation of any provision of RCW 30.04.010, 30.04.030, 30.04.050,
30.04.060, 30.04.070, 30.04.075, 30.04.111, 30.04.120, 30.04.130,
30.04.180, 30.04.210, 30.04.220, 30.04.280, ((30.04.290,)) 30.04.300,
30.08.010, 30.08.020, 30.08.030, 30.08.040, 30.08.050, 30.08.060,
30.08.080, 30.08.090, 30.08.095, ((30.08.110, 30.08.120,)) 30.08.140,
30.08.150, 30.08.160, 30.08.180, 30.08.190, 30.12.010, 30.12.020,
30.12.030, 30.12.060, 30.12.070, 30.12.130, 30.12.180, 30.12.190,
30.16.010, 30.20.060, ((30.40.010,)) 30.44.010, 30.44.020, 30.44.030,
30.44.040, 30.44.050, 30.44.060, 30.44.070, 30.44.080, 30.44.090,
30.44.100, 30.44.130, 30.44.140, 30.44.150, 30.44.160, 30.44.170,
30.44.240, 30.44.250, ((43.19.020, 43.19.030, 43.19.050, and
43.19.090)) 43.320.060, 43.320.070, 43.320.080, and 43.320.100, and
every person who fails to perform any act which it is therein made his
duty to perform, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. No person who has
been convicted for the violation of the banking laws of this or any
other state or of the United States shall be permitted to engage in or
become an officer or official of any bank or trust company organized
and existing under the laws of this state.

Sec. 3 RCW 30.38.010 and 2005 c 348 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An out-of-state bank may engage in banking in this state
without violating RCW 30.04.280 only if the conditions and filing
requirements of this chapter are met and the bank was lawfully engaged
in banking in this state on June 6, 1996, or the bank's in-state
banking activities:
(a) Resulted from an interstate combination pursuant to RCW
30.49.125 or 32.32.500;
(b) Resulted from a relocation of a head office of a state bank
pursuant to 12 U.S.C. Sec. 30 and RCW 30.04.215(3);
(c) Resulted from a relocation of a main office of a national bank
pursuant to 12 U.S.C. Sec. 30;
(d) Resulted from the establishment of a branch of a savings bank
in compliance with RCW 32.04.030(((2))) (6); or
(e) Resulted from interstate branching under RCW 30.38.015.
Nothing in this section affects the authorities of alien banks as
defined by RCW 30.42.020 to engage in banking within this state.
(2) The director, consistent with 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1831u(b)(2)(D),
may approve an interstate combination if the standard on which the
approval is based does not discriminate against out-of-state banks,
out-of-state bank holding companies, or subsidiaries of those banks or
holding companies.

Sec. 4 RCW 32.20.330 and 1999 c 14 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
A mutual savings bank may invest in loans to sole proprietorships,
partnerships, limited liability companies, corporations, or other
entities, or in preferred stock or discounted or other interest bearing
obligations issued, guaranteed, or assumed by limited liability
companies or corporations commonly accepted as industrial corporations
or engaged in communications, transportation, agriculture, furnishing
utility professional services, manufacturing, construction, mining,
fishing, processing or merchandising of goods, food, or information,
banking, or commercial or consumer financing, doing business or
incorporated under the laws of the United States, or any state thereof,
or the District of Columbia, or the Dominion of Canada, or any province
thereof, subject to the following conditions:
(1) Not more than two percent of the bank's funds shall be
invested, pursuant to this section, in the aggregate of loans to and
preferred stock and obligations of any person, as defined in RCW
32.32.228(1)(((c))) (d), and such person's affiliates, as defined in
RCW 32.32.025(1), incorporating the definition of control in RCW
32.32.025(8).
(2) Such loans or securities shall be prudent investments.
(3) Pursuant to this section, the total amount a savings bank may
invest shall not exceed fifty percent of its funds, and not more than
fifteen percent of the bank's funds may be invested in such loans to or
securities of any industry.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.05.410 and 1993 c 492 s 414 are each amended to
read as follows:
Effective July 1, 1994, each health care provider, facility, or
health maintenance organization that self-insures for liability risks
related to medical malpractice and employs physicians or other
independent health care practitioners in Washington state shall
condition each physician's and practitioner's liability coverage by
that entity upon that physician's or practitioner's participation in
risk management training offered by the provider, facility, or health
maintenance organization to its employees. The risk management
training shall provide information related to avoiding adverse health
outcomes resulting from substandard practice and minimizing damages
associated with those adverse health outcomes that do occur. ((For
purposes of this section, "independent health care practitioner" means
those health care practitioner licensing classifications designated by
the department of health in rule pursuant to RCW 18.130.330.))

Sec. 6 RCW 48.05.430 and 1995 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in RCW 48.05.430 through ((48.05.490)) 48.05.485, these
terms have the following meanings:
(1) "RBC" means risk-based capital.
(2) "NAIC" means the national association of insurance
commissioners.
(3) "Domestic insurer" means any insurance company domiciled in
this state.
(4) "Foreign or alien insurer" means any insurance company that is
licensed to do business in this state under this chapter but is not
domiciled in this state.
(5) "Life and disability insurer" means any insurance company
authorized to write only life insurance, disability insurance, or both,
as defined in chapter 48.11 RCW.
(6) "Property and casualty insurer" means any insurance company
authorized to write only property insurance, marine and transportation
insurance, general casualty insurance, vehicle insurance, or any
combination thereof, including disability insurance, as defined in
chapter 48.11 RCW.
(7) "Corrective order" means an order issued by the commissioner
specifying corrective actions that the commissioner has determined are
required.
(8) "Negative trend" means, with respect to a life insurer, a
disability insurer, or a life and disability insurer, the negative
trend over a period of time, as determined in accordance with the trend
test calculation included in the RBC instructions.
(9) "Adjusted RBC report" means an RBC report that has been
adjusted by the commissioner in accordance with RCW 48.05.435(5).
(10) "RBC instructions" means the RBC report including risk-based
capital instructions adopted by the NAIC.
(11) "RBC level" means an insurer's company action level RBC,
regulatory action level RBC, authorized control level RBC, or mandatory
control level RBC where:
(a) "Company action level RBC" means, with respect to any insurer,
the product of 2.0 and its authorized control level RBC;
(b) "Regulatory action level RBC" means the product (([of])) of 1.5
and its authorized control level RBC;
(c) "Authorized control level RBC" means the number determined
under the risk-based capital formula in accordance with the RBC
instructions; and
(d) "Mandatory control level RBC" means the product of .70 and the
authorized control level RBC.
(12) "RBC plan" means a comprehensive financial plan containing the
elements specified in RCW 48.05.440(2). If the commissioner rejects
the RBC plan, and it is revised by the insurer, with or without the
commissioner's recommendation, the plan shall be called the "revised
RBC plan."
(13) "RBC report" means the report required in RCW 48.05.435.
(14) "Total adjusted capital" means the sum of:
(a) An insurer's statutory capital and surplus as determined in
accordance with statutory accounting applicable to the annual financial
statements required to be filed under RCW 48.05.250; and
(b) Other items, if any, as the RBC instructions may provide.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.05.435 and 1995 c 83 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every domestic insurer shall, on or prior to the filing date,
which is hereby established as March 1, prepare and submit to the
commissioner a report of its RBC levels as of the end of the calendar
year just ended, in a form and containing that information required by
the RBC instructions. In addition, every domestic insurer shall file
its RBC report:
(a) With the NAIC in accordance with the RBC instructions; and
(b) With the insurance commissioner in any state in which the
insurer is authorized to do business, if the insurance commissioner has
notified the insurer of its request in writing, in which case the
insurer shall file its RBC report not later than the later of:
(i) Fifteen days from the receipt of notice to file its RBC report
with that state; or
(ii) The filing date.
(2) A life and disability insurer's RBC shall be determined in
accordance with the formula set forth in the RBC instructions. The
formula shall take into account and may adjust for the covariance
between:
(a) The risk with respect to the insurer's assets;
(b) The risk of adverse insurance experience with respect to the
insurer's liabilities and obligations;
(c) The interest rate risk with respect to the insurer's business;
and
(d) All other business risks and other relevant risks as are set
forth in the RBC instructions; determined in each case by applying the
factors in the manner set forth in the RBC instructions.
(3) A property and casualty insurer's RBC shall be determined in
accordance with the formula set forth in the RBC instructions. The
formula shall take into account and may adjust for the covariance
between:
(a) Asset risk;
(b) Credit risk;
(c) Underwriting risk; and
(d) All other business risks and other relevant risks as are set
forth in the RBC instructions; determined in each case by applying the
factors in the manner set forth in the RBC instructions.
(4) An excess of capital over the amount produced by the RBC
requirements and the formulas, schedules, and instructions under RCW
48.05.430 through ((48.05.490)) 48.05.485 is desirable in the business
of insurance. Accordingly, insurers should seek to maintain capital
above the RBC levels required. Additional capital is used and useful
in the insurance business and helps to secure an insurer against
various risks inherent in, or affecting, the business of insurance and
not accounted for or only partially measured by the RBC requirements.
(5) If a domestic insurer files an RBC report that in the judgment
of the commissioner is inaccurate, then the commissioner shall adjust
the RBC report to correct the inaccuracy and shall notify the insurer
of the adjustment. The notice shall contain a statement of the reason
for the adjustment.

Sec. 8 RCW 48.05.465 and 1995 c 83 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All RBC reports, to the extent the information is not required
to be set forth in a publicly available annual statement schedule, and
RBC plans, including the results or report of any examination or
analysis of an insurer and any corrective order issued by the
commissioner, with respect to any domestic insurer or foreign insurer
that are filed with the commissioner constitute information that might
be damaging to the insurer if made available to its competitors, and
therefore shall be kept confidential by the commissioner. This
information shall not be made public or be subject to subpoena, other
than by the commissioner and then only for the purpose of enforcement
actions taken by the commissioner.
(2) The comparison of an insurer's total adjusted capital to any of
its RBC levels is a regulatory tool that may indicate the need for
possible corrective action with respect to the insurer, and is not a
means to rank insurers generally. Therefore, except as otherwise
required under the provisions of RCW 48.05.430 through ((48.05.490))
48.05.485, the making, publishing, disseminating, circulating, or
placing before the public, or causing, directly or indirectly to be
made, published, disseminated, circulated, or placed before the public,
in a newspaper, magazine, or other publication, or in the form of a
notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, or poster, or over any radio or
television station, or in any other way, an advertisement,
announcement, or statement containing an assertion, representation, or
statement with regard to the RBC levels of any insurer, or of any
component derived in the calculation, by any insurer, agent, broker, or
other person engaged in any manner in the insurance business would be
misleading and is therefore prohibited. However, if any materially
false statement with respect to the comparison regarding an insurer's
total adjusted capital to its RBC levels, or any of them, or an
inappropriate comparison of any other amount to the insurer's RBC
levels is published in any written publication and the insurer is able
to demonstrate to the commissioner with substantial proof the falsity
of such statement, or the inappropriateness, as the case may be, then
the insurer may publish an announcement in a written publication if the
sole purpose of the announcement is to rebut the materially false
statement.
(3) The RBC instructions, RBC reports, adjusted RBC reports, RBC
plans, and revised RBC plans are solely for use by the commissioner in
monitoring the solvency of insurers and the need for possible
corrective action with respect to insurers and shall not be used by the
commissioner for ratemaking nor considered or introduced as evidence in
any rate proceeding nor used by the commissioner to calculate or derive
any elements of an appropriate premium level or rate of return for any
line of insurance that an insurer or any affiliate is authorized to
write.

Sec. 9 RCW 48.05.470 and 1995 c 83 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of RCW 48.05.430 through ((48.05.490)) 48.05.485
are supplemental to any other provisions of the laws of this state, and
shall not preclude or limit any other powers or duties of the
commissioner under those laws, including, but not limited to, chapter
48.31 RCW.
(2) The commissioner may exempt any domestic property and casualty
insurer from RCW 48.05.430 through ((48.05.490)) 48.05.485, if the
insurer:
(a) Writes direct business only in this state;
(b) Writes direct annual premiums of two million dollars or less;
and
(c) Assumes no reinsurance in excess of five percent of direct
premiums written.

Sec. 10 RCW 48.05.475 and 1995 c 83 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any foreign or alien insurer shall, upon the written request of
the commissioner, submit to the commissioner an RBC report as of the
end of the calendar year just ended by the later of:
(a) The date an RBC report would be required to be filed by a
domestic insurer under RCW 48.05.435; or
(b) Fifteen days after the request is received by the foreign or
alien insurer. Any foreign or alien insurer shall, at the written
request of the commissioner, promptly submit to the commissioner a copy
of any RBC plan that is filed with the insurance commissioner of any
other state.
(2) In the event of a company action level event, regulatory action
level event, or authorized control level event with respect to any
foreign or alien insurer as determined under the RBC statute applicable
in the state of domicile of the insurer or, if no RBC statute is in
force in that state, under the provisions of RCW 48.05.430 through
((48.05.490)) 48.05.485, if the insurance commissioner of the state of
domicile of the foreign or alien insurer fails to require the foreign
or alien insurer to file an RBC plan in the manner specified under that
state's RBC statute, the commissioner may require the foreign or alien
insurer to file an RBC plan. In this event, the failure of the foreign
or alien insurer to file an RBC plan is grounds to order the insurer to
cease and desist from writing new insurance business in this state.
(3) In the event of a mandatory control level event with respect to
any foreign or alien insurer, if no domiciliary receiver has been
appointed with respect to the foreign or alien insurer under the
rehabilitation and liquidation statute applicable in the state of
domicile of the foreign or alien insurer, the commissioner may apply
for an order under RCW 48.31.080 or 48.31.090 to conserve the assets
within this state of foreign or alien insurers, and the occurrence of
the mandatory control level event is considered adequate grounds for
the application.

Sec. 11 RCW 48.05.480 and 1995 c 83 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is no liability on the part of, and no cause of action may
arise against, the commissioner or insurance department or its
employees or agents for any action taken by them in the performance of
their powers and duties under RCW 48.05.430 through ((48.05.490))
48.05.485.

Sec. 12 RCW 48.09.270 and 1963 c 195 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A domestic mutual insurer on the cash premium plan, after it
has established a surplus not less in amount than the minimum capital
funds required of a domestic stock insurer to transact like kinds of
insurance, and for so long as it maintains such surplus, may extinguish
the contingent liability of its members to assessment and omit
provisions imposing contingent liability in all policies currently
issued.
(2) Any deposit made with the commissioner as a prerequisite to the
insurer's certificate of authority may be included as part of the
surplus required in this section.
(3) When the surplus has been so established and the commissioner
has so ascertained, he shall issue to the insurer, at its request, his
certificate authorizing the extinguishment of the contingent liability
of its members and the issuance of policies free therefrom.
(4) While it maintains surplus funds in amount not less than the
minimum capital required of a domestic stock insurer authorized to
transact like kinds of insurance, ((and subject to the requirements of
RCW 48.05.360 as to special surplus,)) a foreign or alien mutual
insurer on the cash premium plan may, if consistent with its charter
and the laws of its domicile, issue nonassessable policies covering
subjects located, resident, or to be performed in this state.

Sec. 13 RCW 48.10.070 and 1985 c 264 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A domestic reciprocal insurer hereafter formed, if it has
otherwise complied with the provisions of this code, may be authorized
to transact insurance if it initially possesses surplus in an amount
equal to or exceeding the capital and surplus requirements required
under RCW 48.05.340(1) ((plus special surplus, if any, required under
RCW 48.05.360 and thereafter possesses,)) and maintains surplus funds
equal to the paid-in capital stock required under RCW 48.05.340 of a
stock insurer transacting like kinds of insurance((, and the special
surplus, if any, required under RCW 48.05.360)).
(2) A domestic reciprocal insurer which under prior laws held
authority to transact insurance in this state may continue to be so
authorized so long as it otherwise qualifies therefor and maintains
surplus funds in amount not less than as required under laws of this
state in force at the time such authority to transact insurance in this
state was granted.
(3) A domestic reciprocal insurer heretofore formed shall maintain
on deposit with the commissioner surplus funds of not less than the sum
of one hundred thousand dollars, and to transact kinds of insurance
transacted by it in addition to that authorized by its original
certificate of authority, shall have and maintain surplus (including
the amount of such deposit) in amount not less than the paid-in capital
stock required under RCW 48.05.340(1) ((plus special surplus, if any,
required under RCW 48.05.360,)) of a domestic stock insurer formed
after 1967 and transacting the same kinds of insurance. Such
additional surplus funds need not be deposited with the commissioner.

Sec. 14 RCW 48.10.300 and 1983 c 3 s 148 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Subject to the special surplus requirements of RCW
48.05.360,)) If a reciprocal insurer has a surplus of assets over all
liabilities at least equal to the minimum capital stock required of a
domestic stock insurer authorized to transact like kinds of insurance,
upon application of the attorney and as approved by the subscribers'
advisory committee the commissioner shall issue his certificate
authorizing the insurer to extinguish the contingent liability of
subscribers under its policies then in force in this state, and to omit
provisions imposing contingent liability in all policies delivered or
issued for delivery in this state for so long as all such surplus
remains unimpaired.
(2) Upon impairment of such surplus, the commissioner shall
forthwith revoke the certificate. No policy shall thereafter be issued
or renewed without providing for the contingent assessment liability of
subscribers.
(3) The commissioner shall not authorize a domestic reciprocal
insurer so to extinguish the contingent liability of any of its
subscribers or in any of its policies to be issued, unless it qualifies
to and does extinguish such liability of all its subscribers and in all
such policies for all kinds of insurance transacted by it. Except,
that if required by the laws of another state in which the insurer is
transacting insurance as an authorized insurer, the insurer may issue
policies providing for the contingent liability of such of its
subscribers as may acquire such policies in such state, and need not
extinguish the contingent liability applicable to policies theretofore
in force in such state.

Sec. 15 RCW 48.13.110 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 154 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
An insurer may invest any of its funds in:
(1)(a) Bonds or evidences of debt which are secured by first
mortgages or deeds of trust on improved unencumbered real property
located in the United States;
(b) Chattel mortgages in connection therewith pursuant to RCW
48.13.150;
(c) The equity of the seller of any such property in the contract
for a deed, covering the entire balance due on a bona fide sale of such
property, in amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars or the amount
permissible under RCW 48.13.030, whichever is greater, in any one such
contract for deed.
(2) Purchase money mortgages or like securities received by it upon
the sale or exchange of real property acquired pursuant to RCW
48.13.160 as amended by section 7, chapter 241, Laws of 1969 ex. sess.
(3) Bonds or notes secured by mortgage or trust deed guaranteed or
insured by the Federal Housing Administration under the terms of an act
of congress of the United States of June 27, 1934, entitled the
"National Housing Act," as amended.
(4) Bonds or notes secured by mortgage or trust deed guaranteed or
insured as to principal in whole or in part by the Administrator of
Veterans' Affairs pursuant to the provisions of Title III of an act of
congress of the United States of June 22, 1944, entitled the
"Servicemen's Readjustment Act of 1944," as amended.
(5) Evidences of debt secured by first mortgages or deeds of trust
upon leasehold estates, except agricultural leaseholds executed
pursuant to RCW ((79.01.096)) 79.11.010, running for a term of not less
than fifteen years beyond the maturity of the loan as made or as
extended, in improved real property, otherwise unencumbered, and if the
mortgagee is entitled to be subrogated to all the rights under the
leasehold.
(6) Evidences of debt secured by first mortgages or deeds of trust
upon agricultural leasehold estates executed pursuant to RCW
((79.01.096)) 79.11.010, otherwise unencumbered, and if the mortgagee
is entitled to be subrogated to all the rights under the leasehold.

Sec. 16 RCW 48.20.012 and 1951 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
No disability policy shall be delivered or issued for delivery to
any person in this state unless it otherwise complies with this code,
and complies with the following:
(1) It shall purport to insure only one person, except as to family
expense insurance written pursuant to RCW 48.20.340.
(2) The style, arrangement and over-all appearance of the policy
shall give no undue prominence to any portion of the text, and every
printed portion of the text of the policy and of any endorsements or
attached papers shall be plainly printed in light-faced type of a style
in general use, the size of which shall be uniform and not less than
ten-point with a lower-case unspaced alphabet length not less than one
hundred and twenty-point (the "text" shall include all printed matter
except the name and address of the insurer, name or title of the
policy, the brief description if any, and caption and subcaptions).
(3) The exceptions and reductions of indemnity shall be set forth
in the policy and, other than those contained in RCW 48.20.042 to
((48.20.272)) 48.20.262, inclusive, shall be printed, at the insurer's
option, either included with the benefit provision to which they apply,
or under an appropriate caption such as "Exceptions," or "Exceptions
and reductions," except that if an exception or reduction specifically
applies only to a particular benefit of the policy, a statement of such
exception or reduction shall be included with the benefit provision to
which it applies.
(4) Each such form, including riders and endorsements, shall be
identified by a form number in the lower left hand corner of the first
page thereof.
(5) It shall contain no provision purporting to make any portion of
the insurer's charter, rules, constitution, or bylaws a part of the
policy unless such portion is set forth in full in the policy, except
in the case of the incorporation of, or reference to, a statement of
rates or classification of risks, or short-rate table filed with the
commissioner.

Sec. 17 RCW 48.20.162 and 1951 c 229 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 48.18.130, no such policy delivered or
issued for delivery to any person in this state shall contain
provisions respecting the matters set forth in RCW 48.20.172 to
((48.20.272)) 48.20.262, inclusive, unless such provisions are in the
words in which the same appear in the applicable section; except, that
the insurer may, at its option, use in lieu of any such provision a
corresponding provision of different wording approved by the
commissioner which is not less favorable in any respect to the insured
or the beneficiary. Any such provision contained in the policy shall
be preceded individually by the appropriate caption or, at the
insurer's option, by such appropriate individual or group caption or
subcaption as the commissioner may approve.

Sec. 18 RCW 48.20.282 and 1951 c 229 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions which are the subject of RCW 48.20.042 to
((48.20.272)) 48.20.262, inclusive, or any corresponding provisions
which are used in lieu thereof in accordance with such sections, shall
be printed in the consecutive order of the provisions in such sections
or, at the insurer's option, any such provision may appear as a unit in
any part of the policy, with other provisions to which it may be
logically related, provided the resulting policy shall not be in whole
or in part unintelligible, uncertain, ambiguous, abstruse, or likely to
mislead a person to whom the policy is offered, delivered or issued.

Sec. 19 RCW 48.22.080 and 1994 c 102 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Effective July 1, 1994, a casualty insurer's issuance of a new
medical malpractice policy or renewal of an existing medical
malpractice policy to a physician or other independent health care
practitioner shall be conditioned upon that practitioner's
participation in, and completion of, an insurer-designed health care
liability risk management training program once every three years.
Completion of said training program during 1994 shall satisfy the first
three-year training requirement. The risk management training shall
provide information related to avoiding adverse health outcomes
resulting from substandard practice and minimizing damages associated
with the adverse health outcomes that do occur. ((For purposes of this
section, "independent health care practitioners" means those health
care practitioner licensing classifications designated by the
department of health in rule pursuant to RCW 18.130.330.))

Sec. 20 RCW 48.23.080 and 1981 c 247 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a provision that after three full years'
premiums have been paid thereon, the insurer at any time, while the
policy is in force, will advance, on proper assignment or pledge of the
policy and on the sole security thereof, at a rate of interest provided
in this chapter as now or hereafter amended, a sum to be determined as
follows:
(a) If such policy is issued prior to ((the operative date of RCW
48.23.350)) June 12, 1947, the sum, including any interest paid in
advance but not beyond the end of the current policy year, shall be
equal to or at the option of the owner of the policy less than, the
reserve at the end of the current policy year on the policy and on any
dividend additions thereto, less a sum not more than two and one-half
percent of the amount insured by the policy and of any dividend
additions thereto. The policy may contain a provision by which the
insurer reserves the right to defer the making of the loan, except when
made to pay premiums, for a period not exceeding six months after the
date of application therefor.
(b) If such policy is issued on or after ((such operative date))
June 12, 1947, the sum, including any interest to the end of the
current policy year shall not exceed the cash surrender value at the
end of the current policy year((, as required by RCW 48.23.350)).
(c)(i) The policy shall contain (A) a provision that policy loans
shall bear interest at a specified rate not exceeding six percent per
annum, or (B) a provision that policy loans shall bear interest at a
variable of not less than four nor more than eight percent per annum.
(ii) The variable rate shall not be changed more frequently than
once per year and no change may exceed one percent per annum except
reductions. The insurer shall give at least thirty days' notice to the
policy owner or the owner's designee of any changes in the interest
rate.
(iii) The provisions of (c)(i) and (c)(ii) of this subsection shall
apply only in policies in existence prior to August 1, 1981.
(2) Such policy shall further provide that the insurer may deduct
from such loan value any existing indebtedness on the policy (unless
such indebtedness has already been deducted in determining the cash
surrender value) and any unpaid balance of the premium for the current
policy year; and that if the loan is made or repaid on a date other
than the anniversary of the policy, the insurer shall be entitled to
interest for the portion of the current policy year at the rate of
interest specified in the policy.
(3) Such policy may further provide that if the interest on the
loan is not paid when due, it shall be added to the existing
indebtedness and shall bear interest at the same rate; and that if and
when the total indebtedness on the policy, including interest due or
accruing, equals or exceeds the amount of the loan value thereof which
would otherwise exist at such time, the policy shall terminate in full
settlement of such indebtedness and become void; except, that it shall
be stipulated in the policy that no such termination shall be effective
prior to the expiration of at least thirty days after notice of the
pendency of the termination was mailed by the insurer to the insured
and the assignee, if any, at their respective addresses last of record
with the insurer.
(4) The insurer shall provide in any policy issued on or after
((the operative date of RCW 48.23.350)) June 12, 1947, that the making
of any loan, other than a loan to pay premiums, may be deferred for not
exceeding six months after the application for the loan has been
received by it.

Sec. 21 RCW 48.23.360 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 162 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Nonforfeiture benefits: Any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit
available under any annuity or pure endowment contract pursuant to RCW
48.23.200, in the event of default in a consideration due on any
contract anniversary shall be such that its present value as of such
anniversary shall be not less than the excess, if any, of the present
value, on such anniversary, of the future guaranteed benefits
(excluding any total disability benefits attached to such contracts)
which would have been provided for by the contract including any
existing paid-up additions, if there had been no default, over the sum
of (a) the then present value of the net consideration defined in
subsection (2) of this section corresponding to considerations which
would have fallen due on and after such anniversary, and (b) the amount
of any indebtedness to the company on the contract, including interest
due or accrued. In determining the benefits referred to in this
section and in calculating the net consideration referred to in such
subsection (2), in the case of annuity contracts under which an
election may be made to have annuity payments commence at optional
dates, the annuity payments shall be deemed to commence at the latest
date permitted by the contract for the commencement of such payments
and the considerations shall be deemed to be payable until such date,
which, however, shall not be later than the contract anniversary
nearest the annuitant's seventieth birthday.
(2) Net considerations: The net considerations for any annuity or
pure endowment contract referred to in subsection (1) of this section
shall be calculated on an annual basis, shall be such that the present
value thereof at date of issue of the annuity shall equal the then
present value of the future benefits thereunder (excluding any total
disability benefits attached to such contracts) and shall be not less
than the following percentages of the respective considerations
specified in the contracts for the respective contract years:

First year . . . . . . . . . . . . fifty percent
Second and subsequent years . . . . . . . . . . . . ninety percent

PROVIDED, That in the case of participating annuity contracts the
percentages hereinbefore specified may be decreased by five.
(3) Basis of calculation: All net considerations and present
values for such contracts referred to in this section shall be
calculated on the basis of the 1937 Standard Annuity Mortality Table
or, at the option of the insurer, the Annuity Mortality Table for 1949,
Ultimate, or any modification of either of these tables approved by the
commissioner, and the rate of interest, not exceeding three and one-half percent per annum, specified in the contract for calculating cash
surrender values, if any, and paid-up nonforfeiture benefits; except
that with respect to annuity and pure endowment contracts issued on or
after ((the operative date of RCW 48.12.150(3)(b)(ii))) June 12, 1947,
for such contracts, such rate of interest may be as high as four
percent per annum: PROVIDED, That if such rate of interest exceeds
three and one-half percent per annum, all net considerations and
present values for such contracts referred to in this section shall be
calculated on the 1971 Individual Annuity Mortality Table, or any
modification of this table approved by the commissioner.
(4) Calculations on default: Any cash surrender value and any
paid-up nonforfeiture benefit, available under any such contract in the
event of default in the payment of any consideration due at any time
other than on the contract anniversary, shall be calculated with
allowance for the lapse of time and the payment of fractional
considerations beyond the last preceding contract anniversary. All
values herein referred to may be calculated upon the assumption that
any death benefit is payable at the end of the contract year of death.
(5) Deferment of payment: If an insurer provides for the payment
of a cash surrender value, it shall reserve the right to defer the
payment of such value for a period of six months after demand therefor
with surrender of the contract.
(6) Lump sum in lieu: Notwithstanding the requirements of this
section, any deferred annuity contract may provide that if the annuity
allowed under any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit would be less than one
hundred twenty dollars annually, the insurer may at its option grant a
cash surrender value in lieu of such paid-up nonforfeiture benefit of
such amount as may be required by subsection (3) of this section.
(7) Operative date: If no election is made by an insurer for an
operative date prior to July 1, 1948, such date shall be ((the
operative date for this section)) June 12, 1947.

Sec. 22 RCW 48.29.040 and 1990 c 76 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to ((the)) deposit requirements ((of RCW 48.29.030)),
a title insurer having its principal offices in one county may be
authorized to transact business in only such additional counties as to
which it owns or leases and maintains, or has a duly authorized agent
that owns or leases and maintains, a complete set of tract indexes.
(2) A title insurer not authorized to transact business in a
certain county may purchase a title policy on property located therein
from another title insurer which is so authorized in that county. The
first title insurer may thereafter issue its own policy of title
insurance to the owner of such property. The first title insurer may
combine the insurance on the title of such property in a single policy
which also insures the title of one or more other pieces of property.
The first title insurer must pay the full premium based on filed rates
for the policy, and must charge the precise same amount to its own
customer for the insurance as to the title of such property. A title
insurer using the authority granted by this subsection in a transaction
must so notify its customer.

Sec. 23 RCW 48.43.085 and 1996 c 312 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no health carrier
subject to the jurisdiction of the state of Washington may prohibit
directly or indirectly its enrollees from freely contracting at any
time to obtain any health care services outside the health care plan on
any terms or conditions the enrollees choose. Nothing in this section
shall be construed to bind a carrier for any services delivered outside
the health plan. ((The provisions of this section shall be disclosed
pursuant to RCW 48.43.095(2).)) The insurance commissioner is
prohibited from adopting rules regarding this section.

Sec. 24 RCW 48.43.370 and 1998 c 241 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
RCW 48.43.300 through 48.43.370 shall not apply to a carrier which
is subject to the provisions of RCW 48.05.430 through ((48.05.490))
48.05.485.

Sec. 25 RCW 48.53.040 and 1982 c 110 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
An insurer may cancel a fire insurance policy when the requirements
of RCW 48.53.030 are met only in accordance with the following
procedure:
(1) The insurer shall, not less than five days prior to
cancellation, issue written notice of cancellation to the insured or
the insured's representative in charge of the policy. The notice shall
contain at least the following:
(a) The date that the policy will be canceled;
(b) A description of the specific facts justifying the
cancellation;
(c) A copy of this chapter; and
(d) The name, title, address, and telephone number of the insurer's
employee who may be contacted regarding cancellation of the policy.
(2) The notice required by this section shall be actually delivered
or mailed to the insured by certified mail, return receipt requested,
and in addition by first class mail. A copy of the notice shall, at
the time of delivery or mailing to the insured, or the insured's
representative in charge of the policy, be mailed to the insurance
commissioner.
(3) The insurer shall also comply with the requirements of RCW
48.18.290 (1)(((b))) (e), (2) and (3), and shall provide not less than
twenty days notice of cancellation to each mortgagee, pledgee, or other
person shown by the policy to have an interest in any loss which may
occur thereunder except as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The portion of any premium paid to the insurer on account of
the policy, unearned because of the cancellation and in an amount as
computed on a pro rata basis, must be actually paid or mailed to the
insured or other person entitled thereto as shown by the policy or any
endorsement thereon, as soon as possible, and no later than thirty
days after the date that the notice of cancellation was issued.

Sec. 26 RCW 48.74.030 and 1993 c 462 s 86 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, or in RCW 48.74.090, the minimum standard for the valuation of
all such policies and contracts issued prior to July 10, 1982, shall be
that provided by the laws in effect immediately prior to such date.
Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, or in RCW 48.74.090, the minimum standard for the valuation of
all such policies and contracts issued on or after July 10, 1982, shall
be the commissioner's reserve valuation methods defined in RCW
48.74.040, 48.74.070, and 48.74.090, three and one-half percent
interest, or in the case of life insurance policies and contracts,
other than annuity and pure endowment contracts, issued on or after
July 16, 1973, four percent interest for such policies issued prior to
September 1, 1979, five and one-half percent interest for single
premium life insurance policies and four and one-half percent interest
for all other such policies issued on and after September 1, 1979, and
the following tables:
(a) For all ordinary policies of life insurance issued on the
standard basis, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits
in such policies -- the commissioner's 1941 standard ordinary mortality
table for such policies issued prior to ((the operative date of RCW
48.23.350(5a))) June 12, 1947, and the commissioner's 1958 standard
ordinary mortality table for such policies issued on or after ((such
operative date)) June 12, 1947, and prior to the operative date of RCW
48.76.050(4), except that for any category of such policies issued on
female risks, all modified net premiums and present values referred to
in this chapter may be calculated according to an age not more than six
years younger than the actual age of the insured; and for such policies
issued on or after the operative date of RCW 48.76.050(4): (i) The
commissioner's 1980 standard ordinary mortality table; or (ii) at the
election of the company for any one or more specified plans of life
insurance, the commissioner's 1980 standard ordinary mortality table
with ten-year select mortality factors; or (iii) any ordinary mortality
table, adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners, that is approved by regulation promulgated by the
commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation
for such policies.
(b) For all industrial life insurance policies issued on the
standard basis, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits
in such policies -- the 1941 standard industrial mortality table for such
policies issued prior to ((the operative date of RCW 48.23.350(5b)))
June 12, 1947, and for such policies issued on or after ((such
operative date)) June 12, 1947, the commissioner's 1961 standard
industrial mortality table or any industrial mortality table, adopted
after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, that
is approved by rule of the commissioner for use in determining the
minimum standard of valuation for such policies.
(c) For individual annuity and pure endowment contracts, excluding
any disability and accidental death benefits in such policies -- the 1937
standard annuity mortality table or, at the option of the company, the
annuity mortality table for 1949, ultimate, or any modification of
either of these tables approved by the commissioner.
(d) For group annuity and pure endowment contracts, excluding any
disability and accidental death benefits in such policies -- the group
annuity mortality table for 1951, any modification of such table
approved by the commissioner, or, at the option of the company, any of
the tables or modifications of tables specified for individual annuity
and pure endowment contracts.
(e) For total and permanent disability benefits in or supplementary
to ordinary policies or contracts -- for policies or contracts issued on
or after January 1, 1966, the tables of period 2 disablement rates and
the 1930 to 1950 termination rates of the 1952 disability study of the
Society of Actuaries, with due regard to the type of benefit or any
tables of disablement rates and termination rates, adopted after 1980
by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, that are
approved by regulation promulgated by the commissioner for use in
determining the minimum standard of valuation for such policies; for
policies or contracts issued on or after January 1, 1961, and prior to
January 1, 1966, either such tables or, at the option of the company,
the class (3) disability table (1926); and for policies issued prior to
January 1, 1961, the class (3) disability table (1926). Any such table
shall, for active lives, be combined with a mortality table permitted
for calculating the reserves for life insurance policies.
(f) For accidental death benefits in or supplementary to policies--for policies issued on or after January 1, 1966, the 1959 accidental
death benefits table or any accidental death benefits table, adopted
after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, that
is approved by regulation promulgated by the commissioner for use in
determining the minimum standard of valuation for such policies; for
policies issued on or after January 1, 1961, and prior to January 1,
1966, either such table or, at the option of the company, the
intercompany double indemnity mortality table; and for policies issued
prior to January 1, 1961, the intercompany double indemnity mortality
table. Either table shall be combined with a mortality table permitted
for calculating the reserves for life insurance policies.
(g) For group life insurance, life insurance issued on the
substandard basis and other special benefits -- such tables as may be
approved by the commissioner.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the
minimum standard for the valuation of all individual annuity and pure
endowment contracts issued on or after July 10, 1982, and for all
annuities and pure endowments purchased on or after such effective date
under group annuity and pure endowment contracts, shall be the
commissioner's reserve valuation methods defined in RCW 48.74.040 and
the following tables and interest rates:
(a) For individual annuity and pure endowment contracts issued
before September 1, 1979, excluding any disability and accidental death
benefit in such contracts -- the 1971 individual annuity mortality table,
or any modification of this table approved by the commissioner, and six
percent interest for single premium immediate annuity contracts, and
four percent interest for all other individual annuity and pure
endowment contracts.
(b) For individual single premium immediate annuity contracts
issued on or after September 1, 1979, excluding any disability and
accidental death benefits in such contracts -- the 1971 individual
annuity mortality table or any individual annuity mortality table,
adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners, that is approved by regulation promulgated by the
commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation
for such contracts, or any modification of these tables approved by the
commissioner, and seven and one-half percent interest.
(c) For individual annuity and pure endowment contracts issued on
or after September 1, 1979, other than single premium immediate annuity
contracts, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits in
such contracts -- the 1971 individual annuity mortality table or any
individual annuity mortality table, adopted after 1980 by the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners, that is approved by regulation
promulgated by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum
standard of valuation for such contracts, or any modification of these
tables approved by the commissioner, and five and one-half percent
interest for single premium deferred annuity and pure endowment
contracts and four and one-half percent interest for all other such
individual annuity and pure endowment contracts.
(d) For all annuities and pure endowments purchased prior to
September 1, 1979, under group annuity and pure endowment contracts,
excluding any disability and accidental death benefits purchased under
such contracts -- the 1971 group annuity mortality table, or any
modification of this table approved by the commissioner, and six
percent interest.
(e) For all annuities and pure endowments purchased on or after
September 1, 1979, under group annuity and pure endowment contracts,
excluding any disability and accidental death benefits purchased under
such contracts -- the 1971 group annuity mortality table or any group
annuity mortality table, adopted after 1980 by the National Association
of Insurance Commissioners, that is approved by regulation promulgated
by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of
valuation for such annuities and pure endowments, or any modification
of these tables approved by the commissioner, and seven and one-half
percent interest.
After July 16, 1973, any company may file with the commissioner a
written notice of its election to comply with the provisions of this
section after a specified date before January 1, 1979, which shall be
the operative date of this section for such company. If a company
makes no such election, the operative date of this section for such
company shall be January 1, 1979.
(3)(a) The interest rates used in determining the minimum standard
for the valuation of:
(i) All life insurance policies issued in a particular calendar
year, on or after the operative date of RCW 48.76.050(4);
(ii) All individual annuity and pure endowment contracts issued in
a particular calendar year on or after January 1, 1982;
(iii) All annuities and pure endowments purchased in a particular
calendar year on or after January 1, 1982, under group annuity and pure
endowment contracts; and
(iv) The net increase, if any, in a particular calendar year after
January 1, 1982, in amounts held under guaranteed interest contracts
shall be the calendar year statutory valuation interest rates as
defined in this section.
(b) The calendar year statutory valuation interest rates, I, shall
be determined as follows and the results rounded to the nearer one-quarter of one percent:
(i) For life insurance:
I .03 + W (R1 - .03) + W/2 (R2 - .09);
(ii) For single premium immediate annuities and for annuity
benefits involving life contingencies arising from other annuities with
cash settlement options and from guaranteed interest contracts with
cash settlement options:
I .03 + W (R - .03)
where R1 is the lesser of R and .09,
R2 is the greater of R and .09,
R is the reference interest rate defined in this section, and
W is the weighting factor defined in this section;
(iii) For other annuities with cash settlement options and
guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on
an issue year basis, except as stated in (ii) of this subparagraph, the
formula for life insurance stated in (i) of this subparagraph shall
apply to annuities and guaranteed interest contracts with guarantee
durations in excess of ten years and the formula for single premium
immediate annuities stated in (ii) of this subparagraph shall apply to
annuities and guaranteed interest contracts with guarantee duration of
ten years or less;
(iv) For other annuities with no cash settlement options and for
guaranteed interest contracts with no cash settlement options, the
formula for single premium immediate annuities stated in (ii) of this
subparagraph shall apply;
(v) For other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed
interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on a change in
fund basis, the formula for single premium immediate annuities stated
in (ii) of this subparagraph shall apply.
(c) However, if the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate
for any life insurance policies issued in any calendar year determined
without reference to this sentence differs from the corresponding
actual rate for similar policies issued in the immediately preceding
calendar year by less than one-half of one percent, the calendar year
statutory valuation interest rate for such life insurance policies
shall be equal to the corresponding actual rate for the immediately
preceding calendar year. For purposes of applying the immediately
preceding sentence, the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate
for life insurance policies issued in a calendar year shall be
determined for 1983 using the reference interest rate defined for 1982
and shall be determined for each subsequent calendar year regardless of
when RCW 48.76.050(4) becomes operative.
(d) The weighting factors referred to in the formulas stated in
subparagraph (b) of this subsection are given in the following tables:
(i) Weighting Factors for Life Insurance:

Guarantee Duration Weighting

(Years) Factors

10 or less .50

More than 10, but not more than 20 .45

More than 20 .35

For life insurance, the guarantee duration is the maximum number of
years the life insurance can remain in force on a basis guaranteed in
the policy or under options to convert to plans of life insurance with
premium rates or nonforfeiture values or both which are guaranteed in
the original policy;
(ii) Weighting factor for single premium immediate annuities and
for annuity benefits involving life contingencies arising from other
annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest
contracts with cash settlement options: .80;
(iii) Weighting factors for other annuities and for guaranteed
interest contracts, except as stated in (ii) of this subparagraph,
shall be as specified in (d)(iii)(A), (B), and (C) of this subsection,
according to the rules and definitions in (d)(iii)(D), (E), and (F) of
this subsection:
(A) For annuities and guaranteed interest contracts valued on an
issue year basis:

Guarantee Duration Weighting Factor

for Plan Type

(Years)
A B C

5 or less: .80 .60 .50

More than 5, but not more than 10: .75 .60 .50

More than 10, but not more than 20: .65 .50 .45

More than 20: .45 .35 .35

(B) For annuities and guaranteed interest contracts valued on a
change in fund basis, the factors shown in (d)(iii)(A) of this
subsection increased by:

Plan Type

A
B C

.15 .25 .05

(C) For annuities and guaranteed interest contracts valued on an
issue year basis other than those with no cash settlement options which
do not guarantee interest on considerations received more than one year
after issue or purchase and for annuities and guaranteed interest
contracts valued on a change in fund basis which do not guarantee
interest rates on considerations received more than twelve months
beyond the valuation date, the factors shown in (d)(iii)(A) of this
subsection or derived in (d)(iii)(B) of this subsection increased by:

Plan Type

A
B C

.05 .05 .05

(D) For other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed
interest contracts with cash settlement options, the guarantee duration
is the number of years for which the contract guarantees interest rates
in excess of the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate for
life insurance policies with guarantee duration in excess of twenty
years. For other annuities with no cash settlement options and for
guaranteed interest contracts with no cash settlement options, the
guarantee duration is the number of years from the date of issue or
date of purchase to the date annuity benefits are scheduled to
commence.
(E) Plan type as used in the tables in (d)(iii)(A), (B), and (C) of
this subsection is defined as follows:
Plan Type A: At any time a policyholder may withdraw funds only:
(1) With an adjustment to reflect changes in interest rates or asset
values since receipt of the funds by the insurance company; or (2)
without such adjustment but in installments over five years or more; or
(3) as an immediate life annuity; or (4) no withdrawal permitted.
Plan Type B: Before expiration of the interest rate guarantee, a
policyholder may withdraw funds only: (1) With adjustment to reflect
changes in interest rates or asset values since receipt of the funds by
the insurance company; or (2) without such adjustment but in
installments over five years or more; or (3) no withdrawal permitted.
At the end of the interest rate guarantee, funds may be withdrawn
without such adjustment in a single sum or installments over less than
five years.
Plan Type C: A policyholder may withdraw funds before expiration
of the interest rate guarantee in a single sum or installments over
less than five years either: (1) Without adjustment to reflect changes
in interest rates or asset values since receipt of the funds by the
insurance company; or (2) subject only to a fixed surrender charge
stipulated in the contract as a percentage of the fund.
(F) A company may elect to value guaranteed interest contracts with
cash settlement options and annuities with cash settlement options on
either an issue year basis or on a change in fund basis. Guaranteed
interest contracts with no cash settlement options and other annuities
with no cash settlement options must be valued on an issue year basis.
As used in this section, an issue year basis of valuation refers to a
valuation basis under which the interest rate used to determine the
minimum valuation standard for the entire duration of the annuity or
guaranteed interest contract is the calendar year valuation interest
rate for the year of issue or year of purchase of the annuity or
guaranteed interest contract. The change in fund basis of valuation
refers to a valuation basis under which the interest rate used to
determine the minimum valuation standard applicable to each change in
the fund held under the annuity or guaranteed interest contract is the
calendar year valuation interest rate for the year of the change in the
fund.
(e) The reference interest rate referred to in subparagraphs (b)
and (c) of this subsection is defined as follows:
(i) For all life insurance, the lesser of the average over a period
of thirty-six months and the average over a period of twelve months,
ending on June 30th of the calendar year next preceding the year of
issue, of Moody's corporate bond yield average -- monthly average
corporates, as published by Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
(ii) For single premium immediate annuities and for annuity
benefits involving life contingencies arising from other annuities with
cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash
settlement options, the average over a period of twelve months, ending
on June 30th of the calendar year of issue or year of purchase of
Moody's corporate bond yield average -- monthly average corporates, as
published by Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
(iii) For other annuities with cash settlement options and
guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on
a year of issue basis, except as stated in (ii) of this subparagraph,
with guarantee duration in excess of ten years, the lesser of the
average over a period of thirty-six months and the average over a
period of twelve months, ending on June 30th of the calendar year of
issue or purchase, of Moody's corporate bond yield average -- monthly
average corporates, as published by Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
(iv) For other annuities with cash settlement options and
guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on
a year of issue basis, except as stated in (ii) of this subparagraph,
with guarantee duration of ten years or less, the average over a period
of twelve months, ending on June 30th of the calendar year of issue or
purchase, of Moody's corporate bond yield average -- monthly average
corporates, as published by Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
(v) For other annuities with no cash settlement options and for
guaranteed interest contracts with no cash settlement options, the
average over a period of twelve months, ending on June 30th of the
calendar year of issue or purchase, of Moody's corporate bond yield
average -- monthly average corporates, as published by Moody's Investors
Service, Inc.
(vi) For other annuities with cash settlement options and
guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on
a change in fund basis, except as stated in (ii) of this subparagraph,
the average over a period of twelve months, ending on June 30th of the
calendar year of the change in the fund, of Moody's corporate bond
yield average -- monthly average corporates, as published by Moody's
Investors Service, Inc.
(f) If Moody's corporate bond yield average -- monthly average
corporates is no longer published by Moody's Investors Service, Inc.,
or if the National Association of Insurance Commissioners determines
that Moody's corporate bond yield average -- monthly average corporates
as published by Moody's Investors Service, Inc. is no longer
appropriate for the determination of the reference interest rate, then
an alternative method for determination of the reference interest rate,
which is adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners
and approved by rule adopted by the commissioner, may be substituted.

--- END ---