BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide access to legal education and to improve access to the justice
system for the residents of the state of Washington. Until 2006, the
University of Washington law school was the only law school in the
state and one of only a few top ranked public law schools that did not
have a loan repayment assistance program in place for graduates who
enter public interest law. The nationwide decline in the percentage of
new lawyers choosing to enter public interest law fields, from five and
four-tenths percent to two and nine-tenths percent in the last thirty
years, can be substantially attributed to dramatic increases in higher
education debt coupled with wide discrepancies between public and
private salaries for new lawyers. Today, more than three-quarters of
all low-income households in Washington experience at least one civil
legal problem each year. Low-income residents face more than eighty-five percent of their legal problems without help from an attorney.
In 2006 the University of Washington law school established a loan
repayment assistance program to provide graduates who pursue careers in
public interest legal positions with payment assistance toward their
student loan debt. However, while the structure is in place, the
program lacks the resources and accountability measures to allow it to
be effective in its purpose. Therefore, the legislature finds that it
is in the best interest of the state to contribute funding to the loan
repayment assistance program endowment fund at the University of
Washington law school. It is the intent of this act to provide for the
partial or full repayment of educational loans of University of
Washington law school graduates who provide legal services in a public
service area of the law within Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The appropriation of funds from the general fund to the University
of Washington school of law public service legal loan repayment
assistance program is subject to the following requirements:
(1) The University of Washington law school shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2008, and every two years thereafter, with
information about the loan repayment assistance program. The report
shall contain at least the following information:
(a) A financial summary of the endowment fund;
(b) The amounts and sources of funds received;
(c) The number of individuals receiving assistance from the program
and information related to the positions in which these individuals are
working;
(d) Efforts being undertaken to increase the amount of the
endowment fund;
(e) Any available information regarding the effect of the loan
repayment assistance program on student recruitment and enrollment; and
(f) Other information the school of law deems relevant to the
evaluation of the program.
(2) In its rules for administering the program, the school of law
must make provision for cases of hardship or exceptional circumstances,
as defined by the school of law. Examples of such circumstances
include, but are not limited to, family leave, medical leave, illness
or disability, and loss of employment.
(3) The loan repayment assistance program must be available to
otherwise eligible graduates of the law school who work in positions
with nonprofit organizations or government agencies. Such positions
must be located within Washington state. Government agencies shall
include the various branches of the military.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The sum of five hundred thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the
University of Washington school of law loan repayment assistance
program endowment fund for the purposes of this act.
(2) A sum equal to the total amount contributed to the University
of Washington school of law loan repayment assistance program endowment
fund from private sources subsequent to the effective date of this
section, up to a maximum of five hundred thousand dollars, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, from the general
fund to the University of Washington school of law loan repayment
assistance program endowment fund for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---