BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall study and review the governance structure of the
department of fish and wildlife. The joint legislative audit and
review committee shall review and report to the legislature on whether
providing appointment authority of both the fish and wildlife
commission, under RCW 77.04.030, and the director of the department of
fish and wildlife, under RCW 77.04.055, to the commissioner of public
lands would provide for a more unified public land management approach
and more effective use of public resources. This review must include
examination and recommendations regarding the fish and wildlife
commission's role as an advisory body to the commissioner of public
lands, rather than a regulatory body as the fish and wildlife
commission currently is comprised. The joint legislative audit and
review committee shall also review and report on the issues surrounding
consolidating the department of fish and wildlife into the department
of natural resources and solutions to make the consolidation as
seamless and effective as possible. The joint legislative audit and
review committee shall provide a final report on this review to the
legislature by December 1, 2009.

--- END ---