BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.100.010 and 2006 c 153 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Abandoned vessel" means ((the vessel's owner is not known or
cannot be located, or if the vessel's owner is known and located but is
unwilling to take control of the vessel, and the vessel has been left,
moored, or anchored in the same area without the express consent, or
contrary to the rules, of the owner, manager, or lessee of the aquatic
lands below or on which the vessel is located for either a period of
more than thirty consecutive days or for more than a total of ninety
days in any three hundred sixty-five day period)) a vessel that has
been left, moored, or anchored in the same area without the express
consent, or contrary to the rules of, the owner, manager, or lessee of
the aquatic lands below or on which the vessel is located for either a
period of more than thirty consecutive days or for more than a total of
ninety days in any three hundred sixty-five-day period, and the
vessel's owner is: (a) Not known or cannot be located; or (b) known
and located but is unwilling to take control of the vessel. For the
purposes of this subsection (1) only, "in the same area" means within
a radius of five miles of any location where the vessel was previously
moored or anchored on aquatic lands.
(2) "Aquatic lands" means all tidelands, shorelands, harbor areas,
and the beds of navigable waters, including lands owned by the state
and lands owned by other public or private entities.
(3) "Authorized public entity" includes any of the following: The
department of natural resources; the department of fish and wildlife;
the parks and recreation commission; a metropolitan park district; a
port district; and any city, town, or county with ownership,
management, or jurisdiction over the aquatic lands where an abandoned
or derelict vessel is located.
(4) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(5) "Derelict vessel" means the vessel's owner is known and can be
located, and exerts control of a vessel that:
(a) Has been moored, anchored, or otherwise left in the waters of
the state or on public property contrary to RCW 79.02.300 or rules
adopted by an authorized public entity;
(b) Has been left on private property without authorization of the
owner; or
(c) Has been left for a period of seven consecutive days, and:
(i) Is sunk or in danger of sinking;
(ii) Is obstructing a waterway; or
(iii) Is endangering life or property.
(6) "Owner" means any natural person, firm, partnership,
corporation, association, government entity, or organization that has
a lawful right to possession of a vessel by purchase, exchange, gift,
lease, inheritance, or legal action whether or not the vessel is
subject to a security interest.
(7) "Vessel" ((has the same meaning as defined in RCW 53.08.310))
means every species of watercraft or other mobile artificial
contrivance, powered or unpowered, intended to be used for transporting
people or goods on water or for floating marine construction or repair
and which does not exceed two hundred feet in length. "Vessel"
includes any trailer used for the transportation of watercraft, or any
attached floats or debris.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.100.040 and 2006 c 153 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to exercising the authority granted in RCW 79.100.030,
the authorized public entity must first obtain custody of the vessel.
To do so, the authorized public entity must:
(a) Mail notice of its intent to obtain custody, at least twenty
days prior to taking custody, to the last known address of the previous
owner to register the vessel in any state or with the federal
government and to any lien holders or secured interests on record. A
notice need not be sent to the purported owner or any other person
whose interest in the vessel is not recorded with a state or federal
agency;
(b) Post notice of its intent clearly on the vessel for thirty days
and publish its intent at least once, more than ten days but less than
twenty days prior to taking custody, in a newspaper of general
circulation for the county in which the vessel is located; and
(c) Post notice of its intent on the department's internet web site
on a page specifically designated for such notices. If the authorized
public entity is not the department, the department must facilitate the
internet posting.
(2) All notices sent, posted, or published in accordance with this
section must, at a minimum, explain the intent of the authorized public
entity to take custody of the vessel, the rights of the authorized
public entity after taking custody of the vessel as provided in RCW
79.100.030, the procedures the owner must follow in order to avoid
custody being taken by the authorized public entity, the procedures the
owner must follow in order to reclaim possession after custody is taken
by the authorized public entity, and the financial liabilities that the
owner may incur as provided for in RCW 79.100.060.
(3)(a) If a vessel is: (i) In immediate danger of sinking,
breaking up, or blocking navigational channels((,)); or (ii) poses a
reasonably imminent threat to human health or safety, including a
threat of environmental contamination; and (iii) the owner of the
vessel cannot be located or is unwilling or unable to assume immediate
responsibility for the vessel, any authorized public entity may tow,
beach, or otherwise take temporary possession of the vessel.
(b) Before taking temporary possession of the vessel, the
authorized public entity must make reasonable attempts to consult with
the department or the United States coast guard to ensure that other
remedies are not available. The basis for taking temporary possession
of the vessel must be set out in writing by the authorized public
entity within seven days of taking action and be submitted to the
owner, if known, as soon thereafter as is reasonable. If the
authorized public entity has not already provided the required notice,
immediately after taking possession of the vessel, the authorized
public entity must initiate the notice provisions in subsection (1) of
this section. The authorized public entity must complete the notice
requirements of subsection (1) of this section before using or
disposing of the vessel as authorized in RCW 79.100.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79.100 RCW
to read as follows:
A marina owner may contract with a local government for the purpose
of participating in the derelict vessel removal program. The local
government shall serve as the authorized public entity for the removal
of the derelict vessel from the marina owner's property. The contract
must provide for the marina owner to be financially responsible for the
removal costs that are not reimbursed by the department as provided
under RCW 79.100.100, and any additional reasonable administrative
costs incurred by the local government during the removal of the
derelict vessel. Prior to the commencement of any removal which will
seek reimbursement from the derelict vessel removal program, the
contract and the proposed vessel removal shall be submitted to the
department for review and approval. The local government shall use the
procedure specified under RCW 79.100.100(6).

Sec. 4 RCW 79.100.100 and 2006 c 153 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The derelict vessel removal account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from RCW 79.100.050 and 79.100.060 and those
moneys specified in RCW 88.02.030 and 88.02.050 must be deposited into
the account. The account is authorized to receive fund transfers from
the general fund, deposits from the watercraft excise tax under RCW
82.49.030, deposits from the derelict vessel removal surcharge under
section 9 of this act, as well as gifts, grants, and endowments from
public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of this chapter and
expend the same or any income according to the terms of the gifts,
grants, or endowments provided those terms do not conflict with any
provisions of this section or any guidelines developed to prioritize
reimbursement of removal projects associated with this chapter. Moneys
in the account may only be spent after appropriation. Expenditures
from the account shall be used by the department to reimburse
authorized public entities for up to ninety percent of the total
reasonable and auditable administrative, removal, disposal, and
environmental damage costs of abandoned or derelict vessels when the
previous owner is either unknown after a reasonable search effort or
insolvent. Reimbursement shall not be made unless the department
determines that the public entity has made reasonable efforts to
identify and locate the party responsible for the vessel, regardless of
the title of owner of the vessel. Funds in the account resulting from
transfers from the general fund or from the deposit of funds from the
watercraft excise tax as provided for under RCW 82.49.030 shall be used
to reimburse one hundred percent of these costs and should be
prioritized for the removal of large vessels. Costs associated with
removal and disposal of an abandoned or derelict vessel under the
authority granted in RCW 53.08.320 also qualify for reimbursement from
the derelict vessel removal account. In each biennium, up to twenty
percent of the expenditures from the account may be used for
administrative expenses of the department of licensing and department
of natural resources in implementing this chapter.
(2) If the balance of the account reaches one million dollars as of
March 1st of any year, exclusive of any fund transfers from the general
fund or any funds deposited into the account collected under RCW
82.49.030 and section 9 of this act, the department must notify the
department of licensing and the collection of any fees associated with
this account must be suspended for the following fiscal year.
(3) Priority for use of this account is for the removal of derelict
and abandoned vessels that are in danger of sinking, breaking up, or
blocking navigation channels, or that present environmental risks such
as leaking fuel or other hazardous substances. The department must
develop criteria, in the form of informal guidelines, to prioritize
removal projects associated with this chapter, but may not consider
whether the applicant is a state or local entity when prioritizing.
The guidelines must also include guidance to the authorized public
entities as to what removal activities and associated costs are
reasonable and eligible for reimbursement.
(4) The department must keep all authorized public entities
apprized of the balance of the derelict vessel removal account and the
funds available for reimbursement. The guidelines developed by the
department must also be made available to the other authorized public
entities. This subsection (4) must be satisfied by utilizing the least
costly method, including maintaining the information on the
department's internet web site, or any other cost-effective method.
(5) An authorized public entity may contribute its ten percent of
costs that are not eligible for reimbursement by using in-kind
services, including the use of existing staff, equipment, and
volunteers.
(6) This chapter does not guarantee reimbursement for an authorized
public entity. Authorized public entities seeking certainty in
reimbursement prior to taking action under this chapter may first
notify the department of their proposed action and the estimated total
costs. Upon notification by an authorized public entity, the
department must make the authorized public entity aware of the status
of the fund and the likelihood of reimbursement being available. The
department may offer technical assistance and assure reimbursement for
up to two years following the removal action if an assurance is
appropriate given the balance of the fund and the details of the
proposed action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 88.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A marina that leases permanent moorage to vessels must require
the following information from the lessee as a condition of leasing
moorage space: (a) The name of the legal owner of the vessel; (b) a
local contact person, if different than the owner; (c) the owner's
address and telephone number; (d) the vessel's hull identification
number; (e) the vessel's coast guard registration, if applicable; (f)
the vessel's home port; (g) the date on which the moorage lease began;
and (h) the vessel's country or state of registration and registration
number. A marina shall maintain records of this information for at
least two years. The marina shall permit any authorized agent of the
department of natural resources to inspect these records upon request.
(2) A marina that leases permanent moorage to vessels must require
proof of vessel registration or a written statement of intent to
register a vessel as a condition of leasing moorage space. If the
applicant's vessel is not registered in this state, the marina must
inform the moorage applicant of the state law requiring vessel
registration and direct the moorage applicant to the appropriate vessel
registration forms. Thereafter, it is the moorage applicant's
responsibility to register the vessel.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.49.030 and 2000 c 103 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The excise tax imposed under this chapter is due and payable to
the department of licensing or its agents at the time of registration
of a vessel. The department of licensing shall not issue or renew a
registration for a vessel until the tax is paid in full.
(2) ((The)) In calendar year 2007, one million dollars of the
watercraft excise tax collected under this chapter shall be deposited
into the derelict vessel removal account under RCW 79.100.100.
Beginning January 1, 2008, through December 31, 2012, the first one
million dollars of watercraft excise tax collected under this chapter
shall be deposited in the derelict vessel removal account under RCW
79.100.100. Once one million dollars has been deposited into the
derelict vessel removal account the excise tax collected under this
chapter shall be deposited into the general fund.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2013, the excise tax collected under this
chapter shall be deposited in the general fund.

Sec. 7 RCW 88.02.050 and 2005 c 464 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for a vessel registration shall be made to the
department or its authorized agent in the manner and upon forms
prescribed by the department. The application shall state the name and
address of each owner of the vessel and such other information as may
be required by the department, shall be signed by at least one owner,
and shall be accompanied by a vessel registration fee of ten dollars
and fifty cents per year and the excise tax imposed under chapter 82.49
RCW.
(2) Five additional dollars must be collected annually from every
vessel registration application. These moneys must be distributed in
the following manner:
(a) Two dollars must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal
account established in RCW 79.100.100. If the department of natural
resources indicates that the balance of the derelict vessel removal
account, not including any transfer of funds into the account or funds
deposited into the account collected under RCW 82.49.030 and section 9
of this act, reaches one million dollars as of March 1st of any year,
the collection of the two-dollar fee must be suspended for the
following fiscal year.
(b) One dollar and fifty cents must be deposited in the aquatic
invasive species prevention account created in RCW 77.12.879.
(c) One dollar must be deposited into the freshwater aquatic algae
control account created in RCW 43.21A.667.
(d) Fifty cents must be deposited into the aquatic invasive species
enforcement account created in RCW 43.43.400.
(3) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.01.140
shall be in addition to the ten dollar and fifty cent annual
registration fee and the five-dollar fee created in subsection (2) of
this section.
(4) Upon receipt of the application and the registration fee, the
department shall assign a registration number and issue a decal for
each vessel. The registration number and decal shall be issued and
affixed to the vessel in a manner prescribed by the department
consistent with the standard numbering system for vessels set forth in
volume 33, part 174, of the code of federal regulations. A valid decal
affixed as prescribed shall indicate compliance with the annual
registration requirements of this chapter.
(5) The vessel registrations and decals are valid for a period of
one year, except that the director of licensing may extend or diminish
vessel registration periods, and the decals therefor, for the purpose
of staggered renewal periods. For registration periods of more or less
than one year, the department may collect prorated annual registration
fees and excise taxes based upon the number of months in the
registration period. Vessel registrations are renewable every year in
a manner prescribed by the department upon payment of the vessel
registration fee, excise tax, and the derelict vessel fee. Upon
renewing a vessel registration, the department shall issue a new decal
to be affixed as prescribed by the department.
(6) When the department issues either a notice to renew a vessel
registration or a decal for a new or renewed vessel registration, it
shall also provide information on the location of marine oil recycling
tanks and sewage holding tank pumping stations. This information will
be provided to the department by the state parks and recreation
commission in a form ready for distribution. The form will be
developed and prepared by the state parks and recreation commission
with the cooperation of the department of ecology. The department, the
state parks and recreation commission, and the department of ecology
shall enter into a memorandum of agreement to implement this process.
(7) A person acquiring a vessel from a dealer or a vessel already
validly registered under this chapter shall, within fifteen days of the
acquisition or purchase of the vessel, apply to the department or its
authorized agent for transfer of the vessel registration, and the
application shall be accompanied by a transfer fee of one dollar.

Sec. 8 RCW 88.02.050 and 2002 c 286 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
Application for a vessel registration shall be made to the
department or its authorized agent in the manner and upon forms
prescribed by the department. The application shall state the name and
address of each owner of the vessel and such other information as may
be required by the department, shall be signed by at least one owner,
and shall be accompanied by a vessel registration fee of ten dollars
and fifty cents per year and the excise tax imposed under chapter 82.49
RCW. In addition, two additional dollars must be collected annually
from every vessel registration application. These moneys must be
deposited into the derelict vessel removal account established in RCW
79.100.100. If the department of natural resources indicates that the
balance of the derelict vessel removal account, not including any
transfer of funds into the account or funds deposited into the account
collected under RCW 82.49.030 and section 9 of this act, reaches one
million dollars as of March 1st of any year, the collection of the two-dollar fee must be suspended for the following fiscal year. Any fees
required for licensing agents under RCW 46.01.140 shall be in addition
to the ten dollar and fifty cent annual registration fee and the two-dollar derelict vessel fee.
Upon receipt of the application and the registration fee, the
department shall assign a registration number and issue a decal for
each vessel. The registration number and decal shall be issued and
affixed to the vessel in a manner prescribed by the department
consistent with the standard numbering system for vessels set forth in
volume 33, part 174, of the code of federal regulations. A valid decal
affixed as prescribed shall indicate compliance with the annual
registration requirements of this chapter.
The vessel registrations and decals are valid for a period of one
year, except that the director of licensing may extend or diminish
vessel registration periods, and the decals therefor, for the purpose
of staggered renewal periods. For registration periods of more or less
than one year, the department may collect prorated annual registration
fees and excise taxes based upon the number of months in the
registration period. Vessel registrations are renewable every year in
a manner prescribed by the department upon payment of the vessel
registration fee, excise tax, and the derelict vessel fee. Upon
renewing a vessel registration, the department shall issue a new decal
to be affixed as prescribed by the department.
When the department issues either a notice to renew a vessel
registration or a decal for a new or renewed vessel registration, it
shall also provide information on the location of marine oil recycling
tanks and sewage holding tank pumping stations. This information will
be provided to the department by the state parks and recreation
commission in a form ready for distribution. The form will be
developed and prepared by the state parks and recreation commission
with the cooperation of the department of ecology. The department, the
state parks and recreation commission, and the department of ecology
shall enter into a memorandum of agreement to implement this process.
A person acquiring a vessel from a dealer or a vessel already
validly registered under this chapter shall, within fifteen days of the
acquisition or purchase of the vessel, apply to the department or its
authorized agent for transfer of the vessel registration, and the
application shall be accompanied by a transfer fee of one dollar.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 88.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to address the significant backlog of derelict vessels
that have accumulated in our state's waters that pose a threat to the
health and safety of the people and to our environment, the legislature
intends to collect a derelict vessel removal surcharge.
(2) In addition to the fees collected under RCW 88.02.050, the
department shall collect an annual derelict vessel removal surcharge of
one dollar effective with vessel registrations that are due or will
become due on or after January 1, 2008. The revenue generated from the
derelict vessel surcharge must be deposited into the derelict vessel
removal account established under RCW 79.100.100, and is to be used
only for the removal of vessels that are less than seventy-five feet in
length.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The department of natural resources, in
consultation with the department of revenue, the department of
licensing, and other appropriate stakeholder groups, shall examine:
(a) The costs and benefits of extending a derelict vessel removal
fee or surcharges to vessels that are not subject to RCW 88.02.050; and
(b) The use of alternative revenue sources, such as the watercraft
excise tax, in order to more equitably distribute the financial
responsibility of supporting the cost of the derelict vessel program.
The departments shall submit a report of the findings to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by November
1, 2007.
(2) The department of natural resources, the department of ecology,
representatives from the ship demolition industry, and representatives
from the environmental community shall convene a work group to discuss
operations and permitting requirements surrounding the demolition and
disposal of large abandoned and derelict vessels. The department of
natural resources shall consider the findings of the work group when
updating the guidelines for the derelict vessel program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 7 of this act expires June 30,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Section 8 of this act takes effect June 30,
2012.

--- END ---