BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that
greenhouse gases offset contracts, credits, and other greenhouse gases
mitigation efforts are a recognized utility purpose that confers a
direct benefit on the utility's ratepayers. The legislature declares
that this act is intended to reverse the result of Okeson v. City of
Seattle, No. 77888-4 (January 18, 2007), by expressly granting
municipal utilities and public utility districts the statutory
authority to engage in mitigation activities to offset their utility's
impact on the environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city or town authorized to acquire and operate utilities for
the purpose of furnishing the city or town and its inhabitants and
other persons with water, with electricity for lighting and other
purposes, or with service from sewerage, storm water, surface water, or
waste handling facilities, may develop and make publicly available a
plan to reduce its greenhouse gases emissions or achieve no-net
emissions from all sources of greenhouse gases that the utility owns,
leases, uses, contracts for, or otherwise controls.
(2) A city or town authorized to acquire and operate utilities for
the purpose of furnishing the city or town and its inhabitants and
other persons with water, with electricity for lighting and other
purposes, or with service from sewerage, storm water, surface water, or
waste handling facilities, may, as part of its utility operation,
mitigate the environmental impacts, such as greenhouse gases emissions,
of its operation, including any power purchases. The mitigation may
include, but is not limited to, those greenhouse gases mitigation
mechanisms recognized by independent, qualified organizations with
proven experience in emissions mitigation activities. Mitigation
mechanisms may include the purchase, trade, and banking of greenhouse
gases offsets or credits. If a state greenhouse gases registry is
established, a utility that has purchased, traded, or banked greenhouse
gases mitigation mechanisms under this section shall receive credit in
the registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 54.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A public utility district may develop and make publicly
available a plan for the district to reduce its greenhouse gases
emissions or achieve no-net emissions from all sources of greenhouse
gases that the district owns, leases, uses, contracts for, or otherwise
controls.
(2) A public utility district may, as part of its utility
operation, mitigate the environmental impacts, such as greenhouse gases
emissions, of its operation and any power purchases. Mitigation may
include, but is not limited to, those greenhouse gases mitigation
mechanisms recognized by independent, qualified organizations with
proven experience in emissions mitigation activities. Mitigation
mechanisms may include the purchase, trade, and banking of greenhouse
gases offsets or credits. If a state greenhouse gases registry is
established, a public utility district that has purchased, traded, or
banked greenhouse gases mitigation mechanisms under this section shall
receive credit in the registry.

--- END ---