BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
A public or private landowner is not liable for unintentional
injuries to any person when the injury is caused by the theft of
copper, aluminum, steel, or other metal material from property owned by
the landowner.

--- END ---