BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Arsonists often pose a high risk of reoffense; and
(b) Law enforcement's efforts to protect our communities, conduct
investigations, and quickly apprehend arsonists are impaired by the
lack of information available to law enforcement agencies about
convicted arsonists who live out in the community.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to:
(a) Assist local law enforcement agencies to increase public safety
by providing them with another tool for them to use in arson
investigations; and
(b) Require arson offenders to register with local law enforcement
agencies in a regulatory, rather than punitive, manner.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.48.010 and 2002 c 32 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of this chapter, unless the context indicates
otherwise:
(a) "Arson offender" means a person convicted, or found not guilty
by reason of insanity, of arson in the first degree or arson in the
second degree;
(b) "Building" has the definition in RCW 9A.04.110(5), and where a
building consists of two or more units separately secured or occupied,
each unit shall not be treated as a separate building;
(((b))) (c) "Damages", in addition to its ordinary meaning,
includes any charring, scorching, burning, or breaking, or agricultural
or industrial sabotage, and shall include any diminution in the value
of any property as a consequence of an act;
(((c))) (d) "Property of another" means property in which the actor
possesses anything less than exclusive ownership.
(2) To constitute arson it is not necessary that a person other
than the actor has ownership in the building or structure damaged or
set on fire.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9A.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) An arson offender who resides, whether or not the offender
has a fixed residence, in this state, or who is a student, is employed,
or carries on a vocation in this state, shall register with the county
sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the person is
not a resident of this state, the county of the person's school, place
of employment or vocation, or as otherwise specified in this section.
(b) An arson offender who lacks a fixed residence and is under the
supervision of the state department of corrections shall also register
in the county of his or her supervision if he or she is not already
required to do so under (a) of this subsection.
(c) An offender required to register under this section shall do so
in person.
(2)(a) An offender who has a fixed residence shall provide the
following information when registering:
(i) Name;
(ii) Residential address;
(iii) Date and place of birth;
(iv) Place of employment;
(v) Arson offense for which convicted;
(vi) Date and location of conviction;
(vii) Aliases used;
(viii) Social security number;
(ix) Photograph; and
(x) Fingerprints.
(b) An offender who lacks a fixed residence shall provide the
following information when registering:
(i) Name;
(ii) Where he or she plans to stay;
(iii) Date and place of birth;
(iv) Place of employment;
(v) Arson offense for which convicted;
(vi) Date and location of conviction;
(vii) Aliases used;
(viii) Social security number;
(ix) Photograph; and
(x) Fingerprints.
(3)(a) An arson offender shall register with the county sheriff
subject to the following deadlines and restrictions:
(i) OFFENDERS IN CUSTODY. An arson offender who is in the custody
of the United States bureau of prisons or other federal or military
correctional agency, the state department of corrections, the state
department of social and health services, a local division of youth
services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility, for an arson
offense, shall register within twenty-four hours of the time of release
with the county sheriff for the county of the offender's residence, or
if the person is not a resident of this state, the county of the
offender's school or place of employment or vocation. A state or local
agency that has jurisdiction over the offender shall provide notice to
the offender of the duty to register.
(ii) OFFENDERS WHO ARE CONVICTED BUT NOT CONFINED. An arson
offender who is convicted of an arson offense, but who is not sentenced
to serve a term of confinement immediately upon sentencing, shall
report to the county sheriff to register immediately upon completion of
being sentenced.
(iii) OFFENDERS WHO ARE NEW RESIDENTS OR RETURNING WASHINGTON
RESIDENTS. An arson offender who moves to Washington state from
another state or a foreign country who is not under the jurisdiction of
the state department of corrections at the time of moving to Washington
must register within ten days of establishing residence or
reestablishing residence if the offender is a former Washington
resident. An arson offender from another state or a foreign country
who, when the offender moves to Washington, is under the jurisdiction
of the department of corrections must register within twenty-four hours
of moving to Washington. The agency that has jurisdiction over the
offender shall notify the offender of the registration requirements
before the offender moves to Washington. It is an affirmative defense
to a charge that a person failed to register within the deadlines in
this subsection (3)(a)(iii) that: (A) The person was not under the
jurisdiction of the Washington state department of corrections at the
time of moving to Washington; (B) the person was unaware of his or her
duty to register; (C) it was reasonable for the person to be unaware of
his or her duty to register; and (D) the person registered within
twenty-four hours of receiving notice of his or her duty to register
from a law enforcement official. The defendant must establish the
defense by a preponderance of the evidence.
(iv) OFFENDERS FOUND NOT GUILTY BY REASON OF INSANITY. An arson
offender who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under
chapter 10.77 RCW of committing arson in the first degree or arson in
the second degree and who, on or after the effective date of this act,
is in custody, as a result of that finding, of the state department of
social and health services must register within twenty-four hours from
the time of release with the county sheriff for the county of the
person's residence. The state department of social and health services
shall provide notice to the arson offender in its custody of the duty
to register.
(v) OFFENDERS WHO LACK A FIXED RESIDENCE. Any arson offender who
lacks a fixed residence and leaves the county in which he or she is
registered and enters and remains within a new county for twenty-four
hours is required to register with the county sheriff not more than
twenty-four hours after entering the county and provide the information
required in subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(vi) OFFENDERS WHO MOVE TO, WORK, CARRY ON A VOCATION, OR ATTEND
SCHOOL IN ANOTHER STATE. An arson offender required to register in
Washington, who moves to another state, must send written notice within
ten days of moving to the new state or to a foreign country to the
county sheriff with whom the person last registered in Washington
state.
(vii) ALL OTHER OFFENDERS. An arson offender who is not subject to
one of the deadlines in (a)(i) through (vi) of this subsection shall
register no later than thirty days after the effective date of this
act. It is an affirmative defense to a charge of failure to register
under this section that (A) the charge of failure to register is based
solely on an out-of-state conviction that would require a person to
register in Washington if he or she had been convicted in Washington;
(B) the person who is charged works, carries on a vocation, or attends
school in Washington but resides in another state; (C) the person was
unaware of his or her duty to register in Washington; (D) it was
reasonable for the person to be unaware of his or her duty to register
in Washington; and (E) the person registered in Washington within
twenty-four hours of receiving notice of his or her duty to register
from a law enforcement official. The defendant must establish the
defense by a preponderance of the evidence.
(b) Failure to register within the deadlines required under this
section constitutes a per se violation of this section and is
punishable under subsection (8) of this section. The county sheriff is
not required to determine whether the person is living within the
county.
(c) An arrest on charges of failure to register, service of an
information, or a complaint for a violation of this section, or
arraignment on charges for a violation of this section, constitutes
actual notice of the duty to register. Any person charged with the
crime of failure to register under this section who asserts as a
defense the lack of notice of the duty to register shall register
immediately following actual notice of the duty through arrest,
service, or arraignment. Failure to register as required under this
subsection (3)(c) constitutes grounds for filing another charge of
failing to register. Registering following arrest, service, or
arraignment on charges shall not relieve the offender from criminal
liability for failure to register prior to the filing of the original
charge.
(4)(a) If any person required to register pursuant to this section
changes his or her residence address within the same county, the person
must send written notice of the change of address to the county sheriff
within seventy-two hours of moving. If any person required to register
pursuant to this section moves to a new county, the person must send
written notice of the change of address at least fourteen days before
moving to the county sheriff in the new county of residence and must
register with that county sheriff within twenty-four hours of moving.
The person must also send written notice within ten days of the change
of address in the new county to the county sheriff with whom the person
last registered. The county sheriff with whom the person last
registered shall promptly forward the information concerning the change
of address to the county sheriff for the county of the person's new
residence. Upon receipt of notice of change of address to a new state,
the county sheriff shall promptly forward the information regarding the
change of address to the agency designated by the new state as the
state's offender registration agency.
(b) It is an affirmative defense to a charge that the person failed
to send a notice at least fourteen days in advance of moving as
required under (a) of this subsection that the person did not know the
location of his or her new residence at least fourteen days before
moving. The defendant must establish the defense by a preponderance of
the evidence and, to prevail on the defense, must also prove by a
preponderance that the defendant sent the required notice within
twenty-four hours of determining the new address.
(5)(a) Any person required to register under this section who lacks
a fixed residence shall provide written notice to the sheriff of the
county where he or she last registered within forty-eight hours
excluding weekends and holidays after ceasing to have a fixed
residence. The notice shall include the information required by
subsection (2)(b) of this section, except the photograph and
fingerprints. The county sheriff may, for reasonable cause, require
the offender to provide a photograph and fingerprints. The sheriff
shall forward this information to the sheriff of the county in which
the person intends to reside, if the person intends to reside in
another county.
(b) A person who lacks a fixed residence must report weekly, in
person, to the sheriff of the county where he or she is registered.
The weekly report shall be on a day specified by the county sheriff's
office and shall occur during normal business hours. The county
sheriff's office may require the person to list the locations where the
person has stayed during the last seven days.
(c) If any person required to register pursuant to this section
does not have a fixed residence, it is an affirmative defense to the
charge of failure to register that he or she provided written notice to
the sheriff of the county where he or she last registered within forty-eight hours excluding weekends and holidays after ceasing to have a
fixed residence and has subsequently complied with the requirements of
this subsection and subsection (3)(a)(vi) or (vii) of this section. To
prevail, the person must prove the defense by a preponderance of the
evidence.
(6) An arson offender subject to registration requirements under
this section who applies to change his or her name under RCW 4.24.130
or any other law shall submit a copy of the application to the county
sheriff of the county of the person's residence and to the state patrol
not fewer than five days before the entry of an order granting the name
change. No arson offender subject to the requirement to register under
this section at the time of application shall be granted an order
changing his or her name if the court finds that doing so will
interfere with legitimate law enforcement interests, except that no
order shall be denied when the name change is requested for religious
or legitimate cultural reasons or in recognition of marriage or
dissolution of marriage. An arson offender under the requirement to
register under this section who receives an order changing his or her
name shall submit a copy of the order to the county sheriff of the
county of the person's residence and to the state patrol within five
days of the entry of the order.
(7) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Employed" or "carries on a vocation" means employment that is
full time or part time for a period of time exceeding fourteen days or
for an aggregate period of time exceeding thirty days during any
calendar year. A person is employed or carries on a vocation whether
the person's employment is financially compensated, volunteered, or for
the purpose of government or educational benefit.
(b) "Student" means a person who is enrolled, on a full-time or
part-time basis, in any public or private educational institution. An
educational institution includes any secondary school, trade or
professional institution, or institution of higher education.
(8)(a) A person who knowingly fails to register with the county
sheriff or notify the county sheriff, or who changes his or her name
without notifying the county sheriff and the state patrol, as required
by this section is guilty of a class C felony.
(b) Unless the person is relieved of the duty to register under
section 4 of this act, a violation of this section is an ongoing
offense for purposes of the statute of limitations under RCW 9A.04.080.
(9) The requirements of this section apply to an arson offender who
commits an arson offense on or after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9A.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An arson offender may only be relieved of the duty to register
imposed under section 3 of this act by petitioning the superior court
under subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(2) An offender having a duty to register under section 3 of this
act for an offense committed when the offender was an adult may
petition the superior court to be relieved of that duty, if the person
has spent ten consecutive years in the community without being
convicted of any new offenses. The court shall consider the nature of
the registrable offense committed, and the criminal and relevant
noncriminal behavior of the petitioner both before and after
conviction, and may consider other factors.
(a) The petition shall be made to the court in which the petitioner
was convicted, or found not guilty by reason of insanity, of the
offense that subjects him or her to the duty to register, or, in the
case of convictions in other states, a foreign country, or a federal or
military court, to the court in Thurston county. The prosecuting
attorney of the county shall be named and served as the respondent in
any such petition.
(b) The court may relieve the petitioner of the duty to register
only if the petitioner shows, with clear and convincing evidence, that
future registration of the petitioner will not serve the purposes of
this act.
(3) An offender having a duty to register under section 3 of this
act for an offense committed when the offender was a juvenile may
petition the superior court, at any time after adjudication, to be
relieved of that duty. The court shall consider the nature of the
registrable offense committed, and the criminal and relevant
noncriminal behavior of the petitioner both before and after
adjudication, and may consider other factors.
(a) The petition must be made in the manner required by subsection
(2)(a) of this section.
(b) The court may relieve the petitioner of the duty to register if
the petitioner shows, with clear and convincing evidence, that future
registration of the petitioner will not serve the purposes of this act.
(c) This subsection shall not apply to juveniles prosecuted as
adults.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The county sheriff shall forward the information, photographs,
and fingerprints obtained pursuant to section 3 of this act, including
any notice of change of address, to the Washington state patrol within
five working days.
(2) The state patrol shall maintain a central registry of arson
offenders required to register under section 3 of this act.
(a) The state patrol shall grant access to the registry to law
enforcement agencies.
(b) The state patrol and the entities receiving information under
(a) of this subsection may not disclose the information obtained from
the registry to any other person or entity.
(3) The state patrol shall adopt rules consistent with chapters
10.97, 10.98, and 43.43 RCW as are necessary to carry out the purposes
of this act.
(4) The state patrol shall reimburse the counties for the cost of
processing the offender registration, including taking the fingerprints
and photographs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 9A.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When an offender registers with the county sheriff pursuant to
section 3 of this act, the county sheriff shall notify the chief law
enforcement officer, if any, of the jurisdiction in which the offender
has registered to live. If the offender registers to live in an
unincorporated area of the county, the sheriff shall make reasonable
attempts to verify that the offender is residing at the registered
address. If the offender registers to live in an incorporated city or
town, the chief law enforcement officer of the city or town shall make
reasonable attempts to verify that the offender is residing at the
registered address.
(2)(a) For purposes of this section, "reasonable attempts" shall
include at a minimum sending by certified mail, with return receipt
requested, a nonforwardable annual verification form to the offender at
the offender's last registered address.
(b) The offender must sign the verification form, state on the form
whether he or she still resides at the last registered address, and
return the form to the chief law enforcement officer of the
jurisdiction where the offender is registered to live within ten days
after receipt of the form.
(3) The chief law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction where the
offender has registered to live, or the county sheriff if the offender
has registered in an unincorporated area, shall make reasonable
attempts to locate any arson offender who fails to return the
verification form or who cannot be located at the registered address.
(4) When an offender notifies the county sheriff of a change to his
or her residence address pursuant to section 3 of this act, and the new
address is in a different law enforcement jurisdiction, the county
sheriff shall notify the chief law enforcement officer of the
jurisdiction from which the offender has moved.

Sec. 7 RCW 10.01.200 and 1997 c 113 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The court shall provide written notification to any defendant
charged with a sex offense or kidnapping offense of the registration
requirements of RCW 9A.44.130. The court shall provide written notice
to any defendant charged with arson in the first degree or arson in the
second degree of the registration requirements of section 3 of this
act. Such notice shall be included on any guilty plea forms and
judgment and sentence forms provided to the defendant.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.48.470 and 2000 c 91 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person having charge of a jail shall:
(i) Notify in writing any confined person who is in the custody of
the jail for a conviction of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030
or a kidnapping offense as defined in RCW 9A.44.130 of the registration
requirements of RCW 9A.44.130 at the time of the inmate's release from
confinement, and shall obtain written acknowledgment of such
notification; and
(ii) Notify in writing any confined person who is in the custody of
the jail for a conviction of arson in the first degree or arson in the
second degree of the registration requirements of section 3 of this act
at the time of the inmate's release from confinement, and shall obtain
written acknowledgment of such notification.
(b) The person having charge of the jail shall also obtain from the
inmate the county of the inmate's residence upon release from jail and,
where applicable, the city.
(2)(a) When a sex offender or a person convicted of a kidnapping
offense as defined in RCW 9A.44.130 under local government jurisdiction
will reside in a county other than the county of conviction upon
discharge or release, the chief law enforcement officer of the jail or
his or her designee shall give notice of the inmate's discharge or
release to the sheriff of the county and, where applicable, to the
police chief of the city where the offender will reside.
(b) When an offender convicted of arson in the first degree or
arson in the second degree under local government jurisdiction will
reside in a county other than the county of conviction upon discharge
or release, the chief law enforcement officer of the jail or his or her
designee shall give notice of the inmate's discharge or release to the
sheriff of the county where the offender will reside.

Sec. 9 RCW 72.09.330 and 1997 c 113 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Provide written notification to an inmate convicted of a sex
offense or kidnapping offense of the registration requirements of RCW
9A.44.130 at the time of the inmate's release from confinement and
shall receive and retain a signed acknowledgement of receipt; and
(b) Provide written notification to an inmate convicted of arson in
the first degree or arson in the second degree of the registration
requirements of section 3 of this act at the time of the inmate's
release from confinement and shall receive and retain a signed
acknowledgement of receipt.
(2) The department shall:
(a) Provide written notification to an individual convicted of a
sex offense or kidnapping offense from another state of the
registration requirements of RCW 9A.44.130 at the time the department
accepts supervision and has legal authority of the individual under the
terms and conditions of the interstate compact agreement under RCW
9.95.270; and
(b) Provide written notification to an individual convicted of
arson in the first degree or arson in the second degree from another
state of the registration requirements of section 3 of this act at the
time the department accepts supervision and has legal authority of the
individual under the terms and conditions of the interstate compact
agreement under RCW 9.95.270.

--- END ---