BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) A legislative task force on the
structure of the department of fish and wildlife is established, with
members as provided in this section.
(i) The two largest caucuses of the senate shall each appoint one
member.
(ii) The two largest caucuses of the house of representatives shall
each appoint one member.
(iii) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives jointly shall appoint nine members representing the
timber industry, the farming community, the environmental community,
the ranching community, the shellfish community, the sport fishing
community, the commercial fishing community, the hunting community, and
a citizen with no affiliation with any of these or related groups.
(iv) The governor shall appoint two members representing the
department of fish and wildlife as nonvoting members. The governor
shall also appoint one member to represent the governor's office as a
nonvoting member.
(b) The task force shall choose its chair from among its
legislative membership. The governor, or the governor's
representative, shall convene the initial meeting of the task force.
(2) The task force's review and recommendations shall include, but
not be limited to, the following:
(a) The effectiveness and accountability of the current fish and
wildlife commission model;
(b) Whether or not the fish and wildlife commission should retain
the power to hire and terminate the director;
(c) Whether or not the fish and wildlife commissioner appointment
process is effective and whether or not commissioners should be limited
to no more than two consecutive terms in office;
(d) Whether or not a citizens' ombuds function should be added to
the fish and wildlife commission model and if so, what would the role
of the ombuds be;
(e) Whether or not it is necessary to restructure the policy
authority of the fish and wildlife commission;
(f) Possible alternative models for fish and wildlife commission
structures;
(g) Whether or not the fish and wildlife commission's role should
be limited to that of an advisory body;
(h) Possible alternatives for appointment and confirmation of fish
and wildlife commission members;
(i) Whether or not the fish and wildlife commission's effectiveness
and accountability would be improved with the addition of either policy
staff or fiscal staff, or both;
(j) Whether or not the role of regulating recreational fishing and
hunting policy and season setting should be separated from commercial
activities, regulatory role/functions, land management, and other
departmental administrative functions;
(k) The effectiveness and responsiveness to the public, the office
of the governor, and the legislature of the fish and wildlife
commission and department of fish and wildlife management structure;
and
(l) Whether or not the existing geographic, consultation, and
expertise mandates for fish and wildlife commission appointments meet
the needs of the state or whether or not the fish and wildlife
commission should be restructured.
(3) Staff support for the task force shall be provided by the house
office of program research and senate committee services.
(4) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) The expenses of the task force shall be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.
(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor, the fish and wildlife commission, the director of fish
and wildlife, and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2007. Final recommendations shall be officially adopted
according to rules agreed to by a majority of the legislators or the
task force.
(7) This section expires June 30, 2008.

--- END ---