BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that sugar beets were
a major crop grown in Washington state for a number of years. The
legislature finds that sugar beets have a significant potential to be
used to produce biofuels, may be capable of producing more gallons of
biofuel per acre than other crops grown as feedstock for biofuel
production, and that such production could create significant
opportunities for rural economic development. The purpose of this act
is to provide funds for a study of economic and agronomic potential and
suitability of growing sugar beets for biofuel production in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington State University
agricultural research center for bioproducts and bioenergy shall
conduct a study that includes the potential and suitability of growing
sugar beets for biofuel production that evaluates the following
factors:
(a) Current and potential availability of sugar beet feedstock
sources in the state;
(b) Suitability of growing conditions in various regions of the
state;
(c) Expected fuel yield per acre, in relation to other potential
biofuel feedstocks;
(d) Technological feasibility of converting sugar beets into fuel;
(e) Economic feasibility of growing sugar beets for production of
biofuel;
(f) A description of the infrastructure needed including processing
plants and machinery;
(g) The opportunity to produce coproducts and by-products such as
an alternative feed source for livestock; and
(h) Potential contributions to rural economic development.
(2) By December 1, 2009, the Washington State University
agricultural research center for bioproducts and bioenergy shall
provide a written report to the chief clerk of the house of
representatives and to the secretary of the senate containing the
findings and conclusions of its study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The sum of one hundred twenty-five
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2008, from the general
fund to the Washington State University agricultural research center
for bioproducts and bioenergy for the purposes of this act.
(2) The sum of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2009, from the general fund to the Washington State University
agricultural research center for bioproducts and bioenergy for the
purposes of this act.

--- END ---