BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.365 and 2006 c 51 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The summons must contain the names of the parties to the
proceeding, the attorney or attorneys if any, the court in which the
same is brought, the nature of the action, in concise terms, and the
relief sought, and also the return day; and must notify the defendant
to appear and answer within the time designated or that the relief
sought will be taken against him or her. The summons must contain a
street address for service of the notice of appearance or answer and,
if available, a facsimile number for the plaintiff or the plaintiff's
attorney, if represented. The summons must be served and returned in
the same manner as a summons in other actions is served and returned.
(2) A defendant may serve a copy of an answer or notice of
appearance((, and if required by the summons, the sworn statement
regarding nonpayment of rent described in RCW 59.18.375,)) by any of
the following methods:
(a) By delivering a copy of the answer or notice of appearance to
the person who signed the summons at the street address listed on the
summons;
(b) By mailing a copy of the answer or notice of appearance
addressed to the person who signed the summons to the street address
listed on the summons;
(c) By facsimile to the facsimile number listed on the summons.
Service by facsimile is complete upon successful transmission to the
facsimile number listed upon the summons;
(d) As otherwise authorized by the superior court civil rules.
(3) The summons for unlawful detainer actions for tenancies covered
by this chapter shall be substantially in the following form((. In
unlawful detainer actions based on nonpayment of rent, the summons may
contain the provisions authorized by RCW 59.18.375.)):

IN THE SUPERIOR COURT OF THE
STATE OF WASHINGTON IN AND FOR . . . . . . COUNTY

THIS IS NOTICE OF A LAWSUIT TO EVICT YOU.
PLEASE READ IT CAREFULLY. THE DEADLINE FOR YOUR WRITTEN
RESPONSE IS: 5:00 p.m., on . . . . . . . . .

TO: . . . . . . . . . . . . (Name)
. . . . . . . . . . . . (Address)

This is notice of a lawsuit to evict you from the property which
you are renting. Your landlord is asking the court to terminate your
tenancy, direct the sheriff to remove you and your belongings from the
property, enter a money judgment against you for unpaid rent and/or
damages for your use of the property, and for court costs and
attorneys' fees.
If you want to defend yourself in this lawsuit, you must respond to
the eviction complaint in writing on or before the deadline stated
above. You must respond in writing even if no case number has been
assigned by the court yet.
You can respond to the complaint in writing by delivering a copy of
a notice of appearance or answer to your landlord's attorney (or your
landlord if there is no attorney) by personal delivery, mailing, or
facsimile to the address or facsimile number stated below TO BE
RECEIVED NO LATER THAN THE DEADLINE STATED ABOVE. Service by facsimile
is complete upon successful transmission to the facsimile number, if
any, listed in the summons.
The notice of appearance or answer must include the name of this
case (plaintiff(s) and defendant(s)), your name, the street address
where further legal papers may be sent, your telephone number (if any),
and your signature.
If there is a number on the upper right side of the eviction
summons and complaint, you must also file your original notice of
appearance or answer with the court clerk by the deadline for your
written response.
You may demand that the plaintiff file this lawsuit with the court.
If you do so, the demand must be in writing and must be served upon the
person signing the summons. Within fourteen days after you serve the
demand, the plaintiff must file this lawsuit with the court, or the
service on you of this summons and complaint will be void.
If you wish to seek the advice of an attorney in this matter, you
should do so promptly so that your written response, if any, may be
served on time.
You may also be instructed in a separate order to appear for a
court hearing on your eviction. If you receive an order to show cause
you must personally appear at the hearing on the date indicated in the
order to show cause IN ADDITION to delivering and filing your notice of
appearance or answer by the deadline stated above.

IF YOU DO NOT RESPOND TO THE COMPLAINT IN WRITING BY THE
DEADLINE STATED ABOVE YOU WILL LOSE BY DEFAULT. YOUR LANDLORD
MAY PROCEED WITH THE LAWSUIT, EVEN IF YOU HAVE MOVED OUT OF THE
PROPERTY.

The notice of appearance or answer must be delivered to:

Sec. 2 RCW 59.18.375 and 2006 c 51 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The procedures and remedies provided by this section are
optional and in addition to other procedures and remedies provided by
this chapter.
(2) In an action of forcible entry, detainer, or unlawful detainer,
commenced under this chapter which is based upon nonpayment of rent as
provided in RCW 59.12.030(3), the defendant shall pay into the court
registry the amount alleged due in the ((complaint)) notice described
in this section and continue to pay into the court registry the monthly
rent as it becomes due under the terms of the rental agreement while
the action is pending. Such payment is not required if the defendant
submits to the court a written statement signed and sworn under penalty
of perjury ((denying)) that sets forth the reasons why the rent alleged
due in the notice is not owed. In the written statement, the defendant
may provide as a reason that the rent alleged due in the ((complaint))
notice is ((owing)) not owed based upon a legal or equitable defense or
set-off arising out of the tenancy((, such payment shall not be
required)).
(3) A defendant must comply with subsection (2) of this section
((within seven days after completed service of a filed summons and
complaint or, in the case of service of an unfiled summons and
complaint, seven days after delivering written notice to the defendant,
in the manner provided in RCW 59.12.040, advising the defendant of the
date of filing, the cause number for the action, and the date by which
the defendant must comply with this section to avoid the immediate
issuance of a writ of restitution)) on or before the deadline date
specified in the notice, which must not precede the deadline for
responding to the eviction summons and complaint for unlawful detainer.
If the notice is served with the eviction summons and complaint, then
the deadline for complying with the notice and the deadline for
responding to the eviction summons and complaint must be the same date.
(4) Failure of the defendant to comply with this section shall be
grounds for the immediate issuance of a writ of restitution without
further notice to the defendant and without bond directing the sheriff
to deliver possession of the premises to the plaintiff. Issuance of a
writ of restitution under this section shall not affect the defendant's
right to schedule a hearing ((to contest the amount of rent alleged to
be due)) on the merits. If the defendant fails to comply with this
section and a writ of restitution is issued, the defendant may seek a
hearing on the merits and an immediate stay of the writ of restitution.
To obtain a stay of the writ of restitution, the defendant must make an
offer of proof to the court that the plaintiff is not entitled to
possession of the property based on a legal or equitable defense
arising out of the tenancy. The court shall only grant the stay upon
such prior notice as the court deems appropriate to the plaintiff's
attorney, or to the plaintiff if there is no attorney. The court may
grant the stay on such conditions as the court deems appropriate. The
court may set a show cause hearing as soon as possible, but no later
than seven days from the date the stay is sought or the date the
defendant moves the court for a show cause hearing. If the court
concludes at the show cause hearing that the writ of restitution should
not have been issued because of any legal or equitable defense to the
eviction, then the writ of restitution must be quashed and the
defendant must be restored to possession.
(((4))) (5) The defendant shall ((send)) deliver written notice
that the rent has been paid into the court registry or ((send)) deliver
a copy of the sworn statement referred to in subsection (2) of this
section to the ((person whose name is signed on the unlawful detainer
summons. A defendant may serve the written notice or a copy of the
sworn statement)) plaintiff by any of the following methods ((described
in RCW 59.18.365)):
(a) By delivering a copy of the payment notice or sworn statement
to the person who signed the notice to the street address listed on the
notice;
(b) By mailing a copy of the payment notice or sworn statement
addressed to the person who signed the notice to the street address
listed on the notice;
(c) By facsimile to the facsimile number listed on the notice.
Service by facsimile is complete upon successful transmission to the
facsimile number listed upon the notice; or
(d) As otherwise authorized by the superior court civil rules.
(((5))) (6) Before applying to the court for a writ of restitution
under this section, the plaintiff must check with the clerk of the
court to determine if the defendant has complied with subsection (2) of
this section.
(((6))) (7) If the plaintiff intends to use the procedures in this
section, the plaintiff must first file the summons ((must contain)) and
complaint with the superior court of the appropriate county and deliver
notice to the defendant of the payment requirements or sworn statement
requirements of this section ((and be substantially in the following
form:

NOTICE

This unlawful detainer action is based upon nonpayment of rent in an
amount alleged to be $. . . . . . The plaintiff is entitled to an
order from the court directing the sheriff to evict you without a
hearing unless you pay into the court registry the amount of delinquent
rent alleged to be due in the complaint and continue paying into the
court registry the monthly rent as it becomes due while this lawsuit is
pending. If you deny that you owe the rent claimed to be due and you
do not want to be evicted immediately without a hearing, you must file
with the clerk of the court a written statement signed and sworn under
penalty of perjury setting forth why you do not owe the amount claimed
in the complaint to be due. The sworn statement must be filed IN
ADDITION TO your written answer to the complaint.
Payment or the sworn statement must be submitted to the clerk of
the superior court within seven days after you have been served with
this summons or, if the summons has not yet been filed, within seven
days after service of written notice that the lawsuit has been filed.
You must also deliver written notice that the rent has been paid
into the court registry or send a copy of your sworn statement to the
person whose signature appears below by personal delivery, mail, or
facsimile.
This complaint:

( ) is filed with the superior court;
( ) is not filed. The plaintiff must notify you in writing when it is
filed.

IMPORTANT

If you intend to contest this action, you must also file a written
answer as indicated above on this summons)). The notice must:
(a) State that the defendant is required to comply with this
section by a deadline date that is not less than seven days after the
notice has been served on the defendant;
(b) Be separate from the eviction summons and complaint;
(c) Contain the names of the parties to the proceeding, the
attorney or attorneys, if any, and the court in which the proceeding is
being brought;
(d) Be signed and dated by the plaintiff's attorney, or by the
plaintiff if there is no attorney;
(e) Contain a street address for service of the payment statement
or sworn statement and, if available, a facsimile number for the
landlord; and
(f) Be no less than twelve-point font type, in boldface type or
capital letters where indicated below, and be substantially in the
following form:

IN THE SUPERIOR COURT OF THE STATE
OF WASHINGTON IN AND FOR . . . . . .
COUNTY

TO:. . . . . . . . (Name)
. . . . . . . . . (Address)

IMPORTANT NOTICE
READ THESE INSTRUCTIONS CAREFULLY

YOU MUST DO THE FOLLOWING BY THE DEADLINE DATE:

THE DEADLINE DATE IS. . . . . . . .

1. PAY RENT INTO THE COURT REGISTRY;
OR
2. FILE A SWORN STATEMENT THAT YOU DO NOT OWE THE RENT CLAIMED DUE.

IF YOU FAIL TO DO ONE OF THE ABOVE ON OR BEFORE THE DEADLINE DATE,
THE SHERIFF COULD EVICT YOU WITHOUT A HEARING EVEN IF YOU HAVE ALSO
RECEIVED A NOTICE THAT A HEARING HAS BEEN SCHEDULED.

YOUR LANDLORD CLAIMS YOU OWE RENT

This eviction lawsuit is based upon nonpayment of rent. Your
landlord claims you owe the following amount: $. . . . . . The
landlord is entitled to an order from the court directing the sheriff
to evict you without a hearing unless you do the following by the
deadline date: . . . . . . . .

YOU MUST DO THE FOLLOWING BY THE DEADLINE DATE:

1. Pay into the court registry the amount your landlord claims you
owe set forth above and continue paying into the court registry the
monthly rent as it becomes due while this lawsuit is pending;
OR
2. If you deny that you owe the amount set forth above and you do
not want to be evicted immediately without a hearing, you must file
with the clerk of the court a written statement signed and sworn under
penalty of perjury that sets forth why you do not owe that amount.
3. You must deliver written notice that the rent has been paid
into the court registry OR deliver a copy of your sworn statement to
the person named below by personal delivery, mail, or facsimile.

. . . . . . . . . .
Name

. . . . . . . . . .
Address

. . . . . . . . . .
Telephone Number

. . . . . . . . . .
Fax Number

4. The sworn statement must be filed IN ADDITION TO delivering
your written response to the complaint and YOU MUST ALSO appear for any
hearing that has been scheduled.

Dated:. . . . . . . . . .

Signed:. . . . . . . . . .

(8) The notice authorized in this section may be served pursuant to
applicable civil rules either with a filed eviction summons and
complaint or at any time after an eviction summons and complaint have
been filed with the court. If the defendant has served a response to
the eviction summons and complaint, then the notice may be served
before or with an order to show cause as described in RCW 59.18.370.
(9) This section does not affect the defendant's right to restore
the tenancy under RCW 59.18.410.

--- END ---