BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of restrictive confinement of a caged egg
laying hen if he or she confines any caged egg laying hen, for all
hours or the majority of the day, to a living space that does not allow
each caged egg laying hen sufficient space to fully extend both wings
without touching the sides of the living space or other birds.
(2) This section applies to commercial egg production and
operations that are required to be licensed under chapter 69.25 RCW.
(3) This section does not apply to:
(a) The confinement of caged egg laying hens in:
(i) Individualized veterinary care;
(ii) Lawful transport;
(iii) Lawful slaughter; or
(iv) Lawful state or county fair exhibitions; and
(b) RCW 16.52.185.
(4) Restrictive confinement of a caged egg laying hen is a gross
misdemeanor, punishable as provided in RCW 9A.20.021.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Egg laying hen" means a female domesticated chicken, turkey,
duck, goose, or guinea used for the purposes of egg production.
(b) "Living space" means any cage, crate, or other structure used
to confine caged egg laying hens.

Sec. 2 RCW 16.52.185 and 1994 c 261 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter applies to accepted husbandry practices
used in the commercial raising or slaughtering of livestock or poultry,
or products thereof or to the use of animals in the normal and usual
course of rodeo events or to the customary use or exhibiting of animals
in normal and usual events at fairs as defined in RCW 15.76.120.
Section 1 of this act does not apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2009.

--- END ---