BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of restrictive confinement of a calf or pig
if the person confines a calf or pig for more than twelve hours during
any twenty-four-hour period in a manner that prevents the calf or pig
from:
(a) Laying down and fully extending its limbs; or
(b) Turning around freely.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(a)(i) A calf or pig that is being lawfully transported;
(ii) A calf or pig in a lawful rodeo exhibition, a state or county
fair exhibition, or other similar lawful exhibitions;
(iii) The lawful killing of a calf or pig according to the
provisions under chapter 16.50 RCW and other applicable laws and rules;
(iv) A calf or pig during lawful scientific or agricultural
research;
(v) A calf or pig during an examination, operation, test, or
individualized temporary treatment for veterinary purposes; or
(vi) A pig in the seven-day period prior to the pig's expected
farrowing date; and
(b) RCW 16.52.185.
(3) Restrictive confinement of a calf or pig is a gross
misdemeanor, punishable as provided in RCW 9A.20.021.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Calf" means a bovine that is raised with the intent of
marketing or distributing the meat, organs, or any part of the calf as
a food product described as "veal."
(b) "Pig" means a porcine of a type used for livestock purposes.
(c) "Turning around freely" means the ability to turn around in a
complete circle without any impediment, including a tether, and without
touching any side of the enclosure.

Sec. 2 RCW 16.52.185 and 1994 c 261 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter applies to accepted husbandry practices
used in the commercial raising or slaughtering of livestock or poultry,
or products thereof or to the use of animals in the normal and usual
course of rodeo events or to the customary use or exhibiting of animals
in normal and usual events at fairs as defined in RCW 15.76.120.
Section 1 of this act does not apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2011.

--- END ---