BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2009, the department shall require that
all persons who are part of an independent provider bargaining unit,
private agency home care provider, adult family home care workers, or
other providers of long-term care services to the elderly and persons
with disabilities, including adult family home providers, adult
residential care providers, long-term care providers, boarding home
administrators, boarding home caregivers, and other home and community
service care providers identified in this chapter meet the following
minimum training requirements described in this section.
(2) All entry-level persons employed as providers of long-term care
services to the elderly and persons with disabilities shall be required
to obtain one hundred fifty hours of entry-level training including
eighty-five hours of precertification training as follows:
(a) Two hours of orientation training in the role of the caregiver
and the terms of employment to be completed within two weeks of
employment or within fifty hours of work, whichever is later;
(b) Three hours of safety training including basic safety
precautions and emergency procedures and infection control to be
completed within two weeks of employment or within fifty hours of work,
whichever is later; and
(c) Eighty hours of long-term care core competencies training
including but not limited to: Consumer rights and confidentiality;
communication and problem solving skills; personal care skills; health-related tasks training; in-home and nutritional support; body systems,
disease, and disability training; and self-care training to be
completed within six months of employment or within six hundred hours
of work, whichever is later.
(3) The department shall offer sixty-five hours of advanced and
specialty training including but not limited to topics such as: Client
rights; personal care; mental illness; dementia; developmental
disabilities; depression; medication assistance; advanced communication
skills; positive client behavior support; developing or improving
client-centered activities; dealing with wandering or aggressive client
behaviors; medical conditions; nurse delegation core training; peer
mentor training; and advocacy for quality care training.
(4) The department may develop a review process waiving some or all
mandatory training requirements for a person who already possesses a
health care degree, is certified under chapter 18.88A RCW, is a
registered nurse, or has other significant experience and training.
(5) Effective January 1, 2009, the department shall require that
all providers of long-term care services to the elderly and persons
with disabilities shall obtain twelve hours of continuing education
training in advanced and specialty training topics each year beginning
on the anniversary date of completion of the one hundred fifty hours of
training, or beginning on January 1, 2010, for existing workers.
(6) Effective January 1, 2010, the department shall require that
all providers of long-term care services to the elderly and persons
with disabilities shall be offered or made available on-the-job
training or peer mentorship of at least one hour a week for the first
one hundred twenty days of work from a long-term care worker who has
completed at least twelve hours of mentor training and is mentoring no
more than ten other workers at any given time.
(7) The department shall adopt rules by January 1, 2009, that
establish a certified home care aide designation and testing process.
After completing at least eight-five hours of required entry-level
training, workers subject to this section will be eligible to take the
test established by the department to receive a home care aide
certification. The department shall administer the home care aide
certification examination and shall certify home care aides who pass
the test. To maintain their certification, personal care aides must
complete all training and continuing education requirements within the
time limits specified in this section.
(8) Only training curriculum approved by the department may be used
to fulfill the training requirements under this section. The
department shall approve any training curriculum that has been
developed with input from consumer and worker representatives, that
allows for comprehensive instruction by qualified instructors on the
competencies and training topics in this section, and that encourages
direct participation by consumers and workers as associate instructors
for some modules.
(9) The department shall deny payment to any provider of long-term
care services to the elderly and persons with disabilities who does not
or whose employees do not complete the training requirements and obtain
certification as a personal care aide within six months or six hundred
hours of work, whichever is later.
(10) For all providers of long-term care services to the elderly
and persons with disabilities represented by an exclusive bargaining
representative under RCW 74.39A.270 and 74.39A.300, all training under
this section shall be provided by joint labor-management partnership or
trust. The partnership or trust shall provide reports as required by
the department verifying that all providers have complied with all
training requirements. Employer contributions to the entity is a
mandatory subject of the collective bargaining agreement and shall be
fixed at a level sufficient to meet the cost of the training
requirements and to contribute towards the cost of other services such
as adult education, caregiver support, and career development services
necessary to recruit and retain a high quality direct care workforce.
The partnership or trust shall be designated by the certified exclusive
bargaining representative representing at least twenty thousand
employees.
(11) The requirements of this section do not apply to nursing homes
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW.
(12) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.39A.050 and 2004 c 140 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department's system of quality improvement for long-term care
services shall use the following principles, consistent with applicable
federal laws and regulations:
(1) The system shall be client-centered and promote privacy,
independence, dignity, choice, and a home or home-like environment for
consumers consistent with chapter 392, Laws of 1997.
(2) The goal of the system is continuous quality improvement with
the focus on consumer satisfaction and outcomes for consumers. This
includes that when conducting licensing or contract inspections, the
department shall interview an appropriate percentage of residents,
family members, resident case managers, and advocates in addition to
interviewing providers and staff.
(3) Providers should be supported in their efforts to improve
quality and address identified problems initially through training,
consultation, technical assistance, and case management.
(4) The emphasis should be on problem prevention both in monitoring
and in screening potential providers of service.
(5) Monitoring should be outcome based and responsive to consumer
complaints and based on a clear set of health, quality of care, and
safety standards that are easily understandable and have been made
available to providers, residents, and other interested parties.
(6) Prompt and specific enforcement remedies shall also be
implemented without delay, pursuant to RCW 74.39A.080, RCW 70.128.160,
chapter 18.51 RCW, or chapter 74.42 RCW, for providers found to have
delivered care or failed to deliver care resulting in problems that are
serious, recurring, or uncorrected, or that create a hazard that is
causing or likely to cause death or serious harm to one or more
residents. These enforcement remedies may also include, when
appropriate, reasonable conditions on a contract or license. In the
selection of remedies, the safety, health, and well-being of residents
shall be of paramount importance.
(7) To the extent funding is available, all long-term care staff
directly responsible for the care, supervision, or treatment of
vulnerable persons should be screened through background checks in a
uniform and timely manner to ensure that they do not have a criminal
history that would disqualify them from working with vulnerable
persons. Whenever a state conviction record check is required by state
law, persons may be employed or engaged as volunteers or independent
contractors on a conditional basis according to law and rules adopted
by the department.
(8) No provider or staff, or prospective provider or staff, with a
stipulated finding of fact, conclusion of law, an agreed order, or
finding of fact, conclusion of law, or final order issued by a
disciplining authority, a court of law, or entered into a state
registry finding him or her guilty of abuse, neglect, exploitation, or
abandonment of a minor or a vulnerable adult as defined in chapter
74.34 RCW shall be employed in the care of and have unsupervised access
to vulnerable adults.
(9) The department shall establish, by rule, a state registry which
contains identifying information about personal care aides identified
under this chapter who have substantiated findings of abuse, neglect,
financial exploitation, or abandonment of a vulnerable adult as defined
in RCW 74.34.020. The rule must include disclosure, disposition of
findings, notification, findings of fact, appeal rights, and fair
hearing requirements. The department shall disclose, upon request,
substantiated findings of abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or
abandonment to any person so requesting this information.
(10) ((The department shall by rule develop training requirements
for individual providers and home care agency providers. Effective
March 1, 2002, individual providers and home care agency providers must
satisfactorily complete department-approved orientation, basic
training, and continuing education within the time period specified by
the department in rule. The department shall adopt rules by March 1,
2002, for the implementation of this section based on the
recommendations of the community long-term care training and education
steering committee established in RCW 74.39A.190. The department shall
deny payment to an individual provider or a home care provider who does
not complete the training requirements within the time limit specified
by the department by rule.
(11) In an effort to improve access to training and education and
reduce costs, especially for rural communities, the coordinated system
of long-term care training and education must include the use of
innovative types of learning strategies such as internet resources,
videotapes, and distance learning using satellite technology
coordinated through community colleges or other entities, as defined by
the department.
(12) The department shall create an approval system by March 1,
2002, for those seeking to conduct department-approved training. In
the rule-making process, the department shall adopt rules based on the
recommendations of the community long-term care training and education
steering committee established in RCW 74.39A.190.
(13))) The department shall establish, by rule, ((training,))
background checks, and other quality assurance requirements for
personal aides who provide in-home services funded by medicaid personal
care as described in RCW 74.09.520, community options program entry
system waiver services as described in RCW 74.39A.030, or chore
services as described in RCW 74.39A.110 that are equivalent to
requirements for individual providers.
(((14))) (11) Under existing funds the department shall establish
internally a quality improvement standards committee to monitor the
development of standards and to suggest modifications.
(((15) Within existing funds)) (12) Consistent with section 1 of
this act, the department shall design, develop, and implement a long-term care training program that is flexible, relevant, and qualifies
towards the requirements for a nursing assistant certificate as
established under chapter 18.88A RCW. This subsection does not require
completion of the nursing assistant certificate training program by
providers or their staff. The long-term care teaching curriculum must
consist of a fundamental module, or modules, and a range of other
available relevant training modules that provide the caregiver with
appropriate options that assist in meeting the resident's care needs.
Some of the training modules may include, but are not limited to,
specific training on the special care needs of persons with
developmental disabilities, dementia, mental illness, and the care
needs of the elderly. No less than one training module must be
dedicated to workplace violence prevention. The nursing care quality
assurance commission shall work together with the department to develop
the curriculum modules. The nursing care quality assurance commission
shall direct the nursing assistant training programs to accept some or
all of the skills and competencies from the curriculum modules towards
meeting the requirements for a nursing assistant certificate as defined
in chapter 18.88A RCW. A process may be developed to test persons
completing modules from a caregiver's class to verify that they have
the transferable skills and competencies for entry into a nursing
assistant training program. The department may review whether
facilities can develop their own related long-term care training
programs. The department may develop a review process for determining
what previous experience and training may be used to waive some or all
of the mandatory training. ((The department of social and health
services and the nursing care quality assurance commission shall work
together to develop an implementation plan by December 12, 1998.))

Sec. 3 RCW 74.39A.270 and 2006 c 106 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the public employer, as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW, of
individual providers, who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, are public employees as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW. To
accommodate the role of the state as payor for the community-based
services provided under this chapter and to ensure coordination with
state employee collective bargaining under chapter 41.80 RCW and the
coordination necessary to implement RCW 74.39A.300, the public employer
shall be represented for bargaining purposes by the governor or the
governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW. The governor or
governor's designee shall periodically consult with the authority
during the collective bargaining process to allow the authority to
communicate issues relating to the long-term in-home care services
received by consumers. The governor or the governor's designee shall
consult the authority on all issues for which the exclusive bargaining
representative requests to engage in collective bargaining under
subsections (6) and (7) of this section. The authority shall work with
the developmental disabilities council, the governor's committee on
disability issues and employment, the state council on aging, and other
consumer advocacy organizations to obtain informed input from consumers
on their interests, including impacts on consumer choice, for all
issues proposed for collective bargaining under subsections (6) and (7)
of this section.
(2) Chapter 41.56 RCW governs the collective bargaining
relationship between the governor and individual providers, except as
otherwise expressly provided in this chapter and except as follows:
(a) The only unit appropriate for the purpose of collective
bargaining under RCW 41.56.060 is a statewide unit of all individual
providers;
(b) The showing of interest required to request an election under
RCW 41.56.060 is ten percent of the unit, and any intervener seeking to
appear on the ballot must make the same showing of interest;
(c) The mediation and interest arbitration provisions of RCW
41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and 41.56.480 apply, except that:
(i) With respect to commencement of negotiations between the
governor and the bargaining representative of individual providers,
negotiations shall be commenced by May 1st of any year prior to the
year in which an existing collective bargaining agreement expires;
(ii) With respect to factors to be taken into consideration by an
interest arbitration panel, the panel shall consider the financial
ability of the state to pay for the compensation and fringe benefit
provisions of a collective bargaining agreement; and
(iii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit
provisions of the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, is not
binding on the authority or the state;
(d) Individual providers do not have the right to strike; and
(e) Individual providers who are related to, or family members of,
consumers or prospective consumers are not, for that reason, exempt
from this chapter or chapter 41.56 RCW.
(3) Individual providers who are public employees solely for the
purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this section
are not, for that reason, employees of the state, its political
subdivisions, or an area agency on aging for any purpose. Chapter
41.56 RCW applies only to the governance of the collective bargaining
relationship between the employer and individual providers as provided
in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) Consumers and prospective consumers retain the right to select,
hire, supervise the work of, and terminate any individual provider
providing services to them. Consumers may elect to receive long-term
in-home care services from individual providers who are not referred to
them by the authority.
(5) In implementing and administering this chapter, neither the
authority nor any of its contractors may reduce or increase the hours
of service for any consumer below or above the amount determined to be
necessary under any assessment prepared by the department or an area
agency on aging.
(6) Except as expressly limited in this section and RCW 74.39A.300,
the wages, hours, and working conditions of individual providers are
determined solely through collective bargaining as provided in this
chapter. No agency or department of the state may establish policies
or rules governing the wages or hours of individual providers.
However, this subsection does not modify:
(a) The department's authority to establish a plan of care for each
consumer or its core responsibility to manage long-term in-home care
services under this chapter, including determination of the level of
care that each consumer is eligible to receive. However, at the
request of the exclusive bargaining representative, the governor or the
governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW shall engage in
collective bargaining, as defined in RCW 41.56.030(4), with the
exclusive bargaining representative over how the department's core
responsibility affects hours of work for individual providers. This
subsection shall not be interpreted to require collective bargaining
over an individual consumer's plan of care;
(b) The department's authority to terminate its contracts with
individual providers who are not adequately meeting the needs of a
particular consumer, or to deny a contract under RCW 74.39A.095(8);
(c) The consumer's right to assign hours to one or more individual
providers selected by the consumer within the maximum hours determined
by his or her plan of care;
(d) The consumer's right to select, hire, terminate, supervise the
work of, and determine the conditions of employment for each individual
provider providing services to the consumer under this chapter;
(e) The department's obligation to comply with the federal medicaid
statute and regulations and the terms of any community-based waiver
granted by the federal department of health and human services and to
ensure federal financial participation in the provision of the
services; and
(f) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to
the delivery of state services under this title, including standards of
eligibility of consumers and individual providers participating in the
programs under this title, and the nature of services provided. The
governor shall not enter into, extend, or renew any agreement under
this chapter that does not expressly reserve the legislative rights
described in this subsection (6)(f).
(7) At the request of the exclusive bargaining representative, the
governor or the governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW
shall engage in collective bargaining, as defined in RCW 41.56.030(4),
with the exclusive bargaining representative over employer
contributions for the cost of meeting the training requirements in
section 1 of this act and providing other such programs and services
necessary to establish and promote the education, training, career
development, career ladders, certification, and licensing of a stable,
professionally trained long-term care workforce.
(8)(a) The state, the department, the authority, the area agencies
on aging, or their contractors under this chapter may not be held
vicariously or jointly liable for the action or inaction of any
individual provider or prospective individual provider, whether or not
that individual provider or prospective individual provider was
included on the authority's referral registry or referred to a consumer
or prospective consumer. The existence of a collective bargaining
agreement, the placement of an individual provider on the referral
registry, or the development or approval of a plan of care for a
consumer who chooses to use the services of an individual provider and
the provision of case management services to that consumer, by the
department or an area agency on aging, does not constitute a special
relationship with the consumer.
(b) The members of the board are immune from any liability
resulting from implementation of this chapter.
(((8))) (9) Nothing in this section affects the state's
responsibility with respect to unemployment insurance for individual
providers. However, individual providers are not to be considered, as
a result of the state assuming this responsibility, employees of the
state.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.39A.300 and 2004 c 3 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon meeting the requirements of subsection (2) of this
section, the governor must submit, as a part of the proposed biennial
or supplemental operating budget submitted to the legislature under RCW
43.88.030, a request for funds necessary to administer chapter 3, Laws
of 2002 and to implement the compensation and fringe benefits
provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into under RCW
74.39A.270 or for legislation necessary to implement such agreement.
(2) A request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and
fringe benefits provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered
into under RCW 74.39A.270 shall not be submitted by the governor to the
legislature unless such request:
(a) Has been submitted to the director of financial management by
October 1st prior to the legislative session at which the request is to
be considered; and
(b) Has been certified by the director of financial management as
being feasible financially for the state or reflects the binding
decision of an arbitration panel reached under RCW 74.39A.270(2)(c).
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the governor
must submit to the first available legislative session a request for
funds necessary to implement the training contributions provisions of
a collective bargaining agreement entered into under RCW 74.39A.270 as
a part of the proposed biennial or supplemental operating budget
submitted to the legislature under RCW 43.88.030.
(4) The legislature must approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds as a whole. If the legislature rejects or fails to
act on the submission, any such agreement will be reopened solely for
the purpose of renegotiating the funds necessary to implement the
agreement.
(((4))) (5) When any increase in individual provider wages or
benefits is negotiated or agreed to, no increase in wages or benefits
negotiated or agreed to under this chapter will take effect unless and
until, before its implementation, the department has determined that
the increase is consistent with federal law and federal financial
participation in the provision of services under Title XIX of the
federal social security act.
(((5))) (6) The governor shall periodically consult with the joint
committee on employment relations established by RCW 41.80.010
regarding appropriations necessary to implement the compensation and
fringe benefits provisions of any collective bargaining agreement and,
upon completion of negotiations, advise the committee on the elements
of the agreement and on any legislation necessary to implement such
agreement.
(((6))) (7) After the expiration date of any collective bargaining
agreement entered into under RCW 74.39A.270, all of the terms and
conditions specified in any such agreement remain in effect until the
effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from
the expiration date stated in the agreement, except as provided in RCW
74.39A.270(6)(f).
(((7))) (8) If, after the compensation and benefit provisions of an
agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue
shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by
proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both
parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a
mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.39A.310 and 2006 c 9 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall create a formula that converts the cost of
the increase in wages and benefits negotiated and funded in the
contract for individual providers of home care services pursuant to RCW
74.39A.270 and 74.39A.300, into a per-hour amount, excluding those
benefits defined in subsection (2) of this section. That per-hour
amount shall be added to the statewide home care agency vendor rate and
shall be used exclusively for improving the wages and benefits of home
care agency workers who provide direct care. The formula shall account
for:
(a) All types of wages, benefits, and compensation negotiated and
funded each biennium, including but not limited to:
(i) Regular wages;
(ii) Benefit pay, such as vacation, sick, and holiday pay;
(iii) Taxes on wages/benefit pay; ((and))
(iv) Mileage; and
(v) Contributions to a joint labor-management partnership or trust
pursuant to section 1 of this act; and
(b) The increase in the average cost of worker's compensation for
home care agencies and application of the increases identified in (a)
of this subsection to all hours required to be paid, including travel
time, of direct service workers under the wage and hour laws and
associated employer taxes.
(2) The contribution rate for health care benefits, including but
not limited to medical, dental, and vision benefits, for eligible
agency home care workers shall be paid by the department to home care
agencies at the same rate as negotiated and funded in the collective
bargaining agreement for individual providers of home care services.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.56.465 and 1995 c 273 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In making its determination, the panel shall be mindful of the
legislative purpose enumerated in RCW 41.56.430 and, as additional
standards or guidelines to aid it in reaching a decision, it shall take
into consideration the following factors:
(a) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(b) Stipulations of the parties;
(c)(i) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(7)(a) through (d),
comparison of the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
personnel involved in the proceedings with the wages, hours, and
conditions of employment of like personnel of like employers of similar
size on the west coast of the United States;
(ii) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(7)(e) through (h),
comparison of the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
personnel involved in the proceedings with the wages, hours, and
conditions of employment of like personnel of public fire departments
of similar size on the west coast of the United States. However, when
an adequate number of comparable employers exists within the state of
Washington, other west coast employers may not be considered;
(iii) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.026 and 41.56.028, the cost
of meeting the training requirements in section 1 of this act and
providing other programs and services necessary to protect the quality
of health care services;
(d) The average consumer prices for goods and services, commonly
known as the cost of living;
(e) Changes in any of the circumstances under (a) through (d) of
this subsection during the pendency of the proceedings; and
(f) Such other factors, not confined to the factors under (a)
through (e) of this subsection, that are normally or traditionally
taken into consideration in the determination of wages, hours, and
conditions of employment. For those employees listed in RCW
41.56.030(7)(a) who are employed by the governing body of a city or
town with a population of less than fifteen thousand, or a county with
a population of less than seventy thousand, consideration must also be
given to regional differences in the cost of living.
(2) Subsection (1)(c) of this section may not be construed to
authorize the panel to require the employer to pay, directly or
indirectly, the increased employee contributions resulting from chapter
502, Laws of 1993 or chapter 517, Laws of 1993 as required under
chapter 41.26 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.88A.085 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 712 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) After January 1, 1990, the secretary shall issue a certificate
to any applicant who demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction that
the following requirements have been met:
(a) Completion of an approved training program or successful
completion of alternate training meeting established criteria approved
by the commission; and
(b) Successful completion of a competency evaluation.
(2) The secretary may permit some of the training hours earned
under chapter 74.39A RCW to be applied toward certification under this
section.
(3) In addition, applicants shall be subject to the grounds for
denial of certification under chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 74.39A.190 (Community long-term care
training and education steering committee) and 2002 c 233 s 4 & 2000 c
121 s 8 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The provisions of this act are to be
liberally construed to effectuate the intent, policies, and purposes of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act may be known and cited as the
establishing quality in long-term care services to the elderly and
persons with disabilities act.

--- END ---