BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of transportation shall
conduct a feasibility study to provide information on whether commuter
rail service between Everett and Index can be a meaningful component of
the region's future transportation system. The study must:
(a) Assess how many riders might be attracted to commuter rail
service in this region;
(b) Identify and evaluate which locations along state route number
2 would most benefit from commuter rail service;
(c) Identify and evaluate potential station sites;
(d) Estimate costs for securing rights and constructing platforms
and stations;
(e) Provide a general analysis of the ability of the Everett to
Index rail section to accommodate commuter rail service, the effect of
this service on existing and planned rail freight operations, and an
estimate of how tourism in the region might be affected.
(2) The department shall deliver a report of this feasibility study
to the transportation committees of the house of representatives and
senate by February 1, 2008.
(3) This section expires December 31, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2007, in the omnibus transportation appropriations act, this
act is null and void.

--- END ---