BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington's agricultural forest products industry is a vital
component of Washington's economy and has a direct relationship to the
economic health and welfare of workers, rural communities, and
businesses.
(2) Central to the viability of the forest products industry is a
stable work force of log haulers available to transport wood from
Washington's forests. This stability is endangered, threatening the
viability of rural communities and the employment of those in the
forests products sector.
(3) Based on patterns and configurations of forest landownership,
the hauling of forest products are performed by numerous truckers who,
in many cases, despite being labeled "independent contractors" are
economically dependent and thus effectively employees of forest
landowners.
(4) An imbalance of market power exists when one forest landowner
owns, possesses, or acquires economic control over more than one
hundred thousand acres of forest in a labor market area.
(5) The inequity of power in determining compensation results in
unfair contract rates for the services of log haulers. This imbalance
prevents the labor market from operating in a manner suitable for the
public interest of Washington residents.
(6) It is in the public interest to ensure a reasonable rate of
compensation for log hauling services. This chapter is enacted to
create a process whereby forest landowners may refer to utilities and
transportation advisory rates when determining compensation for log
haulers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Economic control" means the legal right, whether through
ownership, contract, or otherwise, to make or influence decisions
regarding the harvest of trees and disposition in general of logs on
subject land.
(2) "Forest land" means agricultural forest land used primarily for
the growth of trees to be harvested for commercial use.
(3) "Forest landowner" means:
(a) A person, corporation, limited partnership, government,
municipality, or any form of business organization registered with the
state of Washington that owns directly, or through affiliated persons,
or possesses economic control over, more than one hundred thousand
acres in a labor market area; or
(b) An agent or subsidiary of a person described in (a) of this
subsection if that agent or subsidiary is involved in contracting or
negotiating contracts or other arrangements, written or oral, with log
haulers.
(4) "Labor market area" means those counties in one of two forest
excise tax hauling areas set forth by the Washington state department
of revenue for the purposes of applying the forest excise tax as
follows:
(a) Those counties located in hauling areas 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, and 10
are in one labor market; and
(b) Those counties located in hauling areas 6 and 7 are in a second
labor market area.
(5) "Log hauler" means a person having a place of business in this
state who is engaged in the agricultural activity of hauling harvested
trees from forest land in the state under a contract or subcontract,
directly or indirectly, for a forest landowner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The commission in conjunction with the
Northwest log truckers cooperative may establish fair, just, and
reasonable advisory rates of compensation for log hauling services in
each labor market area. Advisory rates may be established as often as
the commission deems it necessary and proper.
(2) In approving advisory rates with respect to any given forest
landowner, the following criteria must be considered. Rates need not
be unitary and may take into account variations in these criteria with
respect to different portions of the subject land or operations
thereon:
(a) The log hauler's costs including, but not limited to, wages,
overhead, fuel, insurance including health insurance, pensions or other
retirement costs, and the cost of replacing equipment;
(b) Environmental and highway laws or rules;
(c) The impact of the advisory rate on the competitive position of
the landowner in the market area or competing market areas;
(d) A fair return on investment for all parties;
(e) The amount of hauling conducted on private roads and the amount
of hauling conducted on public roads including travel time from the
hauling site to the delivery site and the conditions of the road; and
(f) Safety considerations.
(3) Rates established under this section must be published annually
on the commission's web site and must be distinguished among labor
market areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The commission and each commissioner, or any
person employed by the commission, may inspect the accounts, books,
papers, and documents of any forest landowner or log hauler seeking to
use the advisory rates established by this chapter. The commission or
any commissioner may examine under oath any officer, agent, or employee
of the forest landowner or log hauler in relation to information sought
under section 3 of this act. However, any person other than a
commissioner seeking information under this section must be working
under the authority of the commission to make the inspection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Records, subject to chapter 42.56 RCW,
received by the commission from any forest landowner or log hauler that
contain valuable commercial information, including trade secrets or
confidential marketing, cost, or financial information, are not subject
to inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW: (1) Until notice to
the forest landowner or log hauler directly affected has been given;
and (2) if, within ten days of the notice, the forest landowner or log
hauler has obtained a superior court order protecting the records as
confidential. The court must determine that the records are
confidential and not subject to inspection and copying if disclosure
would result in private loss, including an unfair competitive
disadvantage. When providing information to the commission, a forest
landowner or log hauler must designate which records or portions of
records contain valuable commercial information. This section does not
prevent the use of protective orders by the commission governing
disclosure of proprietary or confidential information in contested
proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This chapter does not prohibit the
negotiation and execution of a contract between a forest landowner and
an individual log hauler that provides for the payment of compensation
rates other than those determined under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

--- END ---