BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds:
(1) College and university faculty are subject specialists in
teaching and learning assessment, as well as their specialized fields;
(2) College and university faculty are frontline service providers,
designing courses, assessing students, supervising student research,
pursuing research grants, and conducting studies that can affect the
health, economy, teaching, music, and art of the state; and
(3) College and university faculty are policymakers, establishing
admissions standards for programs, curricula for programs, degree
requirements, and the need for and acceptability of new degree
programs, at the levels of the department, for each school or college,
and for the college or university as a whole.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.20.100 and 2006 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of the University of Washington shall be vested
in a board of regents to consist of ten members, one of whom shall be
a student and, beginning with the first appointment after the effective
date of this section, one of whom shall be a full-time member of the
faculty of the university. The governor shall select the student
member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than
five, submitted by the governing body of the associated students. The
governor shall select the faculty member from a list of candidates, of
at least three and not more than five, submitted by the governing body
of the university faculty. They shall be appointed by the governor
with the consent of the senate, and, except for the student member,
shall hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of
October and until their successors shall be appointed and qualified.
The student member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year
from the first day of July until the first day of July of the following
year or until his or her successor is appointed and qualified,
whichever is later. The student member shall be a full-time student in
good standing at the university at the time of appointment.
(2) Six members of said board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In the case of a vacancy, or when an
appointment is made after the date of the expiration of a term, the
governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the
regent whose office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.30.100 and 2006 c 78 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of Washington State University shall be vested
in a board of regents to consist of ten members one of whom shall be a
student and, beginning with the first appointment after the effective
date of this section, one of whom shall be a full-time member of the
faculty of the university. The governor shall select the student
member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than
five, submitted by the governing body of the associated students. The
governor shall select the faculty member from a list of candidates, of
at least three and not more than five, submitted by the governing body
of the university faculty. They shall be appointed by the governor, by
and with the consent of the senate and, except for the student member,
shall hold their offices for a term of six years from the first day of
October and until their successors are appointed and qualified. The
student member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year from
the first day of July until the first day of July of the following year
or until his or her successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is
later. The student member shall be a full-time student in good
standing at the university at the time of appointment.
(2) Six members of said board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In the case of a vacancy or when an
appointment is made after the date of the expiration of a term, the
governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the
regent whose office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) Each regent shall, before entering upon the discharge of his or
her respective duties as such, execute a good and sufficient bond to
the state of Washington, with two or more sufficient sureties,
residents of the state, or with a surety company licensed to do
business within the state, in the penal sum of not less than five
thousand dollars, conditioned for the faithful performance of his or
her duties as such regent: PROVIDED, That the university shall pay any
fees incurred for any such bonds for their board members.
(5) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.35.100 and 2006 c 78 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of each of the regional universities shall be
vested in a board of trustees consisting of eight members, one of whom
shall be a student and, beginning with the first appointment after the
effective date of this section, one of whom shall be a full-time member
of the faculty of the university. The governor shall select the
student member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not
more than five, submitted by the governing body of the associated
students. The governor shall select the faculty member from a list of
candidates, of at least three and not more than five, submitted by the
governing body of the university faculty. They shall be appointed by
the governor with the consent of the senate and, except for the student
member, shall hold their offices for a term of six years from the first
day of October and until their successors are appointed and qualified.
The student member shall hold his or her office for a term of one year
from the first day of July and until the first day of July of the
following year or until his or her successor is appointed and
qualified, whichever is later. The student member shall be a full-time
student in good standing at the respective university at the time of
appointment.
(2) Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In case of a vacancy, or when an appointment
is made after the date of expiration of the term, the governor shall
fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the trustee whose
office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.40.100 and 2006 c 78 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governance of The Evergreen State College shall be vested
in a board of trustees consisting of eight members, one of whom shall
be a student and, beginning with the first appointment after the
effective date of this section, one of whom shall be a full-time member
of the faculty of the college. The governor shall select the student
member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than
five, submitted by the student body. The governor shall select the
faculty member from a list of candidates, of at least three and not
more than five, submitted by the college faculty. They shall be
appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate and, except
for the student member, shall hold their offices for a term of six
years from the first day of October and until their successors are
appointed and qualified. The student member shall hold his or her
office for a term of one year from the first day of July and until the
first day of July of the following year or until his or her successor
is appointed and qualified, whichever is later. The student member
shall be a full-time student in good standing at the college at the
time of appointment.
(2) Five members of the board constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. In case of a vacancy, or when an appointment
is made after the date of expiration of the term, the governor shall
fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of the trustee whose
office has become vacant or expired.
(3) Except for the term of the student member, no more than the
terms of two members will expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.
(4) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.

--- END ---