BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW
to read as follows:
As part of the proposition to support additional implementation
phases of the regional transit authority's system and financing plan
submitted to voters at the 2007 general election under RCW
81.112.030(10), the authority shall issue general obligation bonds or
other evidences of indebtedness, the term of which must be forty years.
The plan must provide funding sufficient to complete a regional transit
authority light rail transit link from SeaTac airport to the Tacoma
Dome in Pierce county, which project must be started as soon as
practicable, but no later than 2010, with a project completion date of
2015. If bond proceeds received under this section, in conjunction
with all other revenues generated under the plan, are not sufficient to
fully fund the project identified in this section, the authority may
impose an additional sales and use tax of up to 0.1 percent, as
provided under RCW 81.104.170(3).

Sec. 2 RCW 81.104.170 and 1997 c 450 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Cities that operate transit systems, county transportation
authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation
benefit areas, and regional transit authorities may submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters and if approved by a majority of
persons voting, fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with
the terms of this chapter, solely for the purpose of providing high
capacity transportation service.
(2) The tax authorized pursuant to this section shall be in
addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and shall be collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state pursuant to chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
taxing district. The maximum rate of such tax shall be approved by the
voters and shall not exceed one percent of the selling price (in the
case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use
tax). The maximum rate of such tax that may be imposed shall not
exceed nine-tenths of one percent in any county that imposes a tax
under RCW 82.14.340, or within a regional transit authority if any
county within the authority imposes a tax under RCW 82.14.340. The
exemptions in RCW 82.08.820 and 82.12.820 are for the state portion of
the sales and use tax and do not extend to the tax authorized in this
section.
(3) If regional transit authority bond proceeds received under
section 1 of this act, in conjunction with all other revenues generated
under the plan submitted to voters at the 2007 general election under
RCW 81.112.030(10), are not sufficient to fully fund the project
identified in section 1 of this act, the authority may impose an
additional sales and use tax under this section of up to 0.1 percent.

--- END ---