BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Manufactured/mobile home communities provide a significant
source of homeownership opportunities for Washington residents.
However, the increasing closure and conversion of manufactured/mobile
home communities to other uses, combined with increasing
manufactured/mobile home lot rents, low vacancy rates in existing
manufactured/mobile home communities, and the extremely high cost of
moving homes when manufactured/mobile home communities close,
increasingly make manufactured/mobile home community living insecure
for manufactured/mobile home tenants.
(b) Many tenants who reside in manufactured/mobile home communities
are low-income households and senior citizens and are, therefore, those
residents most in need of reasonable security in the siting of their
manufactured/mobile homes because of the adverse impacts on the health,
safety, and welfare of tenants forced to move due to closure, change of
use, or discontinuance of manufactured/mobile home communities.
(c) Manufactured/mobile home communities are a crucial component of
low-income housing as they represent one of the few opportunities for
low-income households to own a home, typically without the assistance
of public subsidies. Furthermore, the preservation of
manufactured/mobile home communities:
(i) Is a more economical alternative than providing new replacement
housing units for tenants who are displaced from closing
manufactured/mobile home communities;
(ii) Is a strategy by which all local governments can meet the
affordable housing needs of their residents; and
(iii) Is a strategy by which local governments planning under RCW
36.70A.040 may meet the housing element of their comprehensive plans as
it relates to the provision of housing affordable to all economic
sectors.
(d) Creating incentives to encourage private financial institutions
to provide financial assistance to organizations seeking to purchase
manufactured/mobile home communities for the purpose of the
preservation of affordable housing for low-income and elderly
households confers a valuable benefit on the public that constitutes
consideration for such assistance and incentives subject to
restrictions that provide continued protection of the public interest.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to encourage and facilitate
the preservation of existing manufactured/mobile home communities and,
to the extent necessary and possible, to assist manufactured/mobile
home community resident organizations or eligible organizations
representing residents in the preservation of manufactured/mobile home
communities. The legislature hereby establishes tax credits for
financial institutions who provide financial assistance to eligible
organizations by making below market rate loans or by purchasing bonds
issued by the Washington state housing finance commission in order that
the eligible organization may purchase and preserve an affordable
housing manufactured/mobile home community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means a financial institution applying for a tax
credit under this chapter.
(2) "Financial institution" means a bank, trust company, mutual
savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union authorized
by federal or state law to accept deposits in this state.
(3) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(4) "Financial assistance" means a below market rate loan or the
purchase of bonds issued by the Washington state housing finance
commission for the purpose of assisting an eligible organization to
purchase and preserve an affordable housing manufactured/mobile home
community.
(5) "Market rate" and "below market rate" shall be defined by the
Washington state housing finance commission and the definition shall be
provided to any financial institution wishing to make application under
this chapter.
(6) "Affordable housing manufactured/mobile home community" means
any real property which is rented or held out for rent to others for
the placement of two or more mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park
models for the primary purpose of production of income where greater
than fifty percent of the tenants are low-income households or are over
sixty years of age, except where such real property is rented or held
out for rent for seasonal recreational purposes only and is not
intended for year-round occupancy.
(7) "Low-income household" means the same as in RCW 43.185A.010(5).
(8) "Eligible organization" means the same as in RCW 43.185A.040.
(9) "Manufactured/mobile home community resident organization"
means the same as "resident organization" in RCW 59.22.020.
(10) "Tenant" or "resident" means a person who rents a
manufactured/mobile home lot for a term of one month or longer and who
owns the manufactured/mobile home on the lot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) An application for preliminary approval
for a tax credit under section 4 of this act must be made by a
financial institution to the Washington state housing finance
commission, and preliminary approval must be received by that financial
institution, before a financial institution provides financial
assistance to an eligible organization interested in purchasing an
affordable housing manufactured/mobile home community. The application
must be made in a form and manner prescribed by the Washington state
housing finance commission. The application must contain information
regarding the proposed amount and any applicable terms of the loan or
bonds purchased. The Washington state housing finance commission may
require additional information in order to determine eligibility under
this act.
(2) The Washington state housing finance commission shall provide
a preliminary approval, contingent on its certification of the
financial assistance, to those applications which meet the requirements
of the tax credit program so long as the total amount of preliminarily
approved tax credits statewide does not exceed ten million dollars in
any calendar year. Applications must receive preapproval status on a
first-come basis.
(3) The financial institution must provide the financial assistance
described in the approved application by the end of the calendar year
in which the application is preapproved to claim a credit allowed under
section 4 of this act.
(4) The Washington state housing finance commission may not accept
any applications before September 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Subject to the limitations in this
chapter, a credit is allowed against the tax imposed by chapter 82.04
RCW for approved financial assistance, certified as described in
subsection (2) of this section, that is made by a financial institution
to an eligible organization for the purpose of affordable housing
manufactured/mobile home community purchase and preservation.
(2) To receive the tax credit, after providing the financial
assistance as described in the preapproved application, the financial
institution must file copies of the loan documents or the bond
purchasing contract with the Washington state housing finance
commission. The Washington state housing finance commission shall
verify the amount and terms of the financial assistance and shall
verify that the financial assistance was provided to an eligible
organization to purchase an affordable housing manufactured/mobile home
community. Upon verification that the financial institution qualifies
for the tax credit, the Washington state housing finance commission
shall approve the application and issue a certification to the
financial institution which it must provide to the department when
claiming the tax credit. The Washington state housing finance
commission shall notify the department of each approved application
within thirty days after the certification is issued.
(3) The tax credit allowed under this section is limited to an
amount equal to ten percent of the total financial assistance.
(4) The tax credit may be claimed against the tax due under chapter
82.04 RCW only in the calendar year immediately following the calendar
year in which the financial assistance was made to the eligible
organization and the application was approved by the Washington state
housing finance commission. Tax credits may not exceed the tax
liability of the financial institution for any tax reporting period,
but may be carried over for up to three subsequent years. No refunds
may be granted for credits under this chapter.
(5) To claim a credit under this chapter, a financial institution
must electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and
other information that the department requires in an electronic format
as provided or approved by the department. Any return, form, or
information required to be filed in an electronic format under this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format. As used in this section, "returns" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the
administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---