BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.04.010 and 2006 c 225 s 1 and 2006 c 101 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
In this title, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Alcohol" is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated
oxide of ethyl, or spirit of wine, which is commonly produced by the
fermentation or distillation of grain, starch, molasses, or sugar, or
other substances including all dilutions and mixtures of this
substance. The term "alcohol" does not include alcohol in the
possession of a manufacturer or distiller of alcohol fuel, as described
in RCW 66.12.130, which is intended to be denatured and used as a fuel
for use in motor vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements
of husbandry.
(2) "Authorized representative" means a person who:
(a) Is required to have a federal basic permit issued pursuant to
the federal alcohol administration act, 27 U.S.C. Sec. 204;
(b) Has its business located in the United States outside of the
state of Washington;
(c) Acquires ownership of beer or wine for transportation into and
resale in the state of Washington; and which beer or wine is produced
anywhere outside Washington by a brewery or winery which does not hold
a certificate of approval issued by the board; and
(d) Is appointed by the brewery or winery referenced in (c) of this
subsection as its exclusive authorized representative for marketing and
selling its products within the United States in accordance with a
written agreement between the authorized representative and such
brewery or winery pursuant to this title. The board may waive the
requirement for the written agreement of exclusivity in situations
consistent with the normal marketing practices of certain products,
such as classified growths.
(3) "Beer" means any malt beverage, flavored malt beverage, or malt
liquor as these terms are defined in this chapter.
(4) "Beer distributor" means a person who buys beer from a domestic
brewery, microbrewery, beer certificate of approval holder, or beer
importers, or who acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to
this title, or who represents such brewer or brewery as agent.
(5) "Beer importer" means a person or business within Washington
who purchases beer from a beer certificate of approval holder or who
acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside of the United
States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.
(6) "Brewer" or "brewery" means any person engaged in the business
of manufacturing beer and malt liquor. Brewer includes a brand owner
of malt beverages who holds a brewer's notice with the federal bureau
of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms at a location outside the state and
whose malt beverage is contract-produced by a licensed in-state
brewery, and who may exercise within the state, under a domestic
brewery license, only the privileges of storing, selling to licensed
beer distributors, and exporting beer from the state.
(7) "Board" means the liquor control board, constituted under this
title.
(8) "Club" means an organization of persons, incorporated or
unincorporated, operated solely for fraternal, benevolent, educational,
athletic or social purposes, and not for pecuniary gain.
(9) "Consume" includes the putting of liquor to any use, whether by
drinking or otherwise.
(10) "Contract liquor store" means a business that sells liquor on
behalf of the board through a contract with a contract liquor store
manager.
(11) "Dentist" means a practitioner of dentistry duly and regularly
licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within the state
pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.
(12) "Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of
distilling spirits.
(13) "Domestic brewery" means a place where beer and malt liquor
are manufactured or produced by a brewer within the state.
(14) "Domestic winery" means a place where wines are manufactured
or produced within the state of Washington.
(15) "Druggist" means any person who holds a valid certificate and
is a registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly engaged in
carrying on the business of pharmaceutical chemistry pursuant to
chapter 18.64 RCW.
(16) "Drug store" means a place whose principal business is, the
sale of drugs, medicines and pharmaceutical preparations and maintains
a regular prescription department and employs a registered pharmacist
during all hours the drug store is open.
(17) "Employee" means any person employed by the board.
(18) "Flavored malt beverage" means:
(a) A malt beverage containing six percent or less alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than forty-nine
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content; or
(b) A malt beverage containing more than six percent alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than one and one-half
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content.
(19) "Fund" means 'liquor revolving fund.'
(20) "Hotel" means every building ((or other)), structure, and
amenities as may be offered that are kept, used, maintained,
advertised, or held out to the public to be a place where food is
served and sleeping accommodations are offered for pay to transient
guests, in which twenty or more rooms are used for the sleeping
accommodation of such transient guests and ((having one or more dining
rooms where meals are served to such transient guests, such sleeping
accommodations and dining rooms being conducted in the same building
and buildings, in connection therewith, and such structure or
structures being provided, in the judgment of the board, with adequate
and sanitary kitchen and dining room equipment and capacity, for
preparing, cooking and serving suitable food for its guests: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That in cities and towns of less than five thousand
population, the board shall have authority to waive the provisions
requiring twenty or more rooms)) shall include all grounds and other
buildings or structures as may exist thereon and any amenities whether
exterior or within a structure or building as may be offered, and
having facilities for preparing, cooking, and serving food.
(21) "Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits from a
distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such spirituous
liquor into the state for sale to the board or for export.
(22) "Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.
(23) "Liquor" includes the four varieties of liquor herein defined
(alcohol, spirits, wine and beer), and all fermented, spirituous,
vinous, or malt liquor, or combinations thereof, and mixed liquor, a
part of which is fermented, spirituous, vinous or malt liquor, or
otherwise intoxicating; and every liquid or solid or semisolid or other
substance, patented or not, containing alcohol, spirits, wine or beer,
and all drinks or drinkable liquids and all preparations or mixtures
capable of human consumption, and any liquid, semisolid, solid, or
other substance, which contains more than one percent of alcohol by
weight shall be conclusively deemed to be intoxicating. Liquor does
not include confections or food products that contain one percent or
less of alcohol by weight.
(24) "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the preparation of
liquor for sale, in any form whatsoever.
(25) "Malt beverage" or "malt liquor" means any beverage such as
beer, ale, lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the alcoholic
fermentation of an infusion or decoction of pure hops, or pure extract
of hops and pure barley malt or other wholesome grain or cereal in pure
water containing not more than eight percent of alcohol by weight, and
not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume. For the
purposes of this title, any such beverage containing more than eight
percent of alcohol by weight shall be referred to as "strong beer."
(26) "Package" means any container or receptacle used for holding
liquor.
(27) "Passenger vessel" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or
other floating craft of any kind carrying passengers for compensation.
(28) "Permit" means a permit for the purchase of liquor under this
title.
(29) "Person" means an individual, copartnership, association, or
corporation.
(30) "Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and regularly
licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within the state
pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW.
(31) "Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a physician and
given by him to a patient for the obtaining of liquor pursuant to this
title for medicinal purposes.
(32) "Public place" includes streets and alleys of incorporated
cities and towns; state or county or township highways or roads;
buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance halls and
grounds adjacent thereto; those parts of establishments where beer may
be sold under this title, soft drink establishments, public buildings,
public meeting halls, lobbies, halls and dining rooms of hotels,
restaurants, theatres, stores, garages and filling stations which are
open to and are generally used by the public and to which the public is
permitted to have unrestricted access; railroad trains, stages, and
other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and the depots and
waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are open to
unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned bathing
beaches, parks, and/or playgrounds; and all other places of like or
similar nature to which the general public has unrestricted right of
access, and which are generally used by the public.
(33) "Regulations" means regulations made by the board under the
powers conferred by this title.
(34) "Restaurant" means any establishment provided with special
space and accommodations where, in consideration of payment, food,
without lodgings, is habitually furnished to the public, not including
drug stores and soda fountains.
(35) "Sale" and "sell" include exchange, barter, and traffic; and
also include the selling or supplying or distributing, by any means
whatsoever, of liquor, or of any liquid known or described as beer or
by any name whatever commonly used to describe malt or brewed liquor or
of wine, by any person to any person; and also include a sale or
selling within the state to a foreign consignee or his agent in the
state. "Sale" and "sell" shall not include the giving, at no charge,
of a reasonable amount of liquor by a person not licensed by the board
to a person not licensed by the board, for personal use only. "Sale"
and "sell" also does not include a raffle authorized under RCW
9.46.0315: PROVIDED, That the nonprofit organization conducting the
raffle has obtained the appropriate permit from the board.
(36) "Soda fountain" means a place especially equipped with
apparatus for the purpose of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed or
otherwise.
(37) "Spirits" means any beverage which contains alcohol obtained
by distillation, except flavored malt beverages, but including wines
exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume.
(38) "Store" means a state liquor store established under this
title.
(39) "Tavern" means any establishment with special space and
accommodation for sale by the glass and for consumption on the
premises, of beer, as herein defined.
(40) "Winery" means a business conducted by any person for the
manufacture of wine for sale, other than a domestic winery.
(41)(a) "Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by
fermentation of fruits (grapes, berries, apples, et cetera) or other
agricultural product containing sugar, to which any saccharine
substances may have been added before, during or after fermentation,
and containing not more than twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume,
including sweet wines fortified with wine spirits, such as port,
sherry, muscatel and angelica, not exceeding twenty-four percent of
alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol
by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage containing no more
than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when bottled or packaged by
the manufacturer shall be referred to as "table wine," and any beverage
containing alcohol in an amount more than fourteen percent by volume
when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as
"fortified wine." However, "fortified wine" shall not include: (i)
Wines that are both sealed or capped by cork closure and aged two years
or more; and (ii) wines that contain more than fourteen percent alcohol
by volume solely as a result of the natural fermentation process and
that have not been produced with the addition of wine spirits, brandy,
or alcohol.
(b) This subsection shall not be interpreted to require that any
wine be labeled with the designation "table wine" or "fortified wine."
(42) "Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from a
domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, or wine importer,
or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of the
United States, for the purpose of selling the same not in violation of
this title, or who represents such vintner or winery as agent.
(43) "Wine importer" means a person or business within Washington
who purchases wine from a wine certificate of approval holder or who
acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of the United
States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a retailer's license to be designated as a hotel
license. The hotel license may be issued to an applicant regardless of
whether the applicant holds any other class of retail license under
this title. No license may be issued to a hotel offering rooms to its
guests on an hourly basis. If all or any facilities for alcoholic
beverage service and the preparation, cooking, and serving of food are
operated under contract or joint venture agreement, the operator may
hold a license separate from the license held by the operator of the
hotel. Food and beverage inventory used in separate licensed
operations at the hotel may not be shared and shall be separately owned
and stored by the separate licensees. Food service provided for room
service, banquets or conferences, or restaurant operation under this
license shall meet the requirements of rules adopted by the board.
(2) The hotel license authorizes the licensee to:
(a) Sell, at retail, from locked honor bars, in individual units,
spirits not to exceed fifty milliliters, beer in individual units not
to exceed twelve ounces, and wine in individual bottles not to exceed
three hundred eighty-five milliliters, to registered guests of the
hotel for consumption in guest rooms.
(i) All spirits to be sold under the license must be purchased from
the board.
(ii) The licensee shall require proof of age from the guest renting
a guest room and requesting the use of an honor bar. The guest shall
also execute an affidavit verifying that no one under twenty-one years
of age shall have access to the spirits, beer, and wine in the honor
bar;
(b) Provide without additional charge, to overnight guests,
spirits, beer, and wine, including wine by the bottle, by the
individual serving for on-premises consumption at a specified regular
date, time, and place as may be fixed by the board. Self-service by
attendees is prohibited. All alcoholic beverage service must be done
by an alcohol server as defined in RCW 66.20.300 and comply with RCW
66.20.310;
(c) Sell beer, including strong beer, wine, or spirits, in the
manufacturer's sealed container or by the individual drink to guests
through room service, or through service to occupants of private
residential units managed by the hotel;
(d) Sell beer, including strong beer, or wine, in the
manufacturer's sealed container at retail sales locations within the
hotel premises;
(e) Sell for on or off-premises consumption, including through room
service and service to occupants of private residential units managed
by the hotel, wine carrying a label exclusive to the hotel license
holder;
(f) Place in guest rooms at check-in, a complimentary bottle of
beer, including strong beer, or wine, including wine carrying a label
exclusive to the hotel license holder, in a manufacturer-sealed
container, and make a reference to this service in promotional
material.
(3)(a) The facilities may be owned or leased, and operated by the
hotel or another party under a contract or joint venture agreement with
the licensee, or may be owned or leased, and operated by another party
holding a contract or joint venture agreement with the licensee. Food
and alcohol beverage service for banquets and conferences at the hotel
and for guest rooms shall be provided by the hotel or through another
party operating the food and beverage services at the hotel's location.
(b) The license issued to a hotel shall be valid only upon the
contiguous property of the hotel, and where all facilities and grounds
at the hotel are owned or leased by the same person or persons.
(4)(a) The hotel license allows the licensee to remove from the
liquor stocks at the licensed premises, liquor for sale and service at
event locations at a specified date and place not currently licensed by
the board. If the event is open to the public, it must be sponsored by
a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If attendance
at the event is limited to members or invited guests of the sponsoring
individual, society, or organization, the requirement that the sponsor
must be a society or organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375 is
waived.
(b) The holder of this license shall, if requested by the board,
notify the board or its designee of the date, time, place, and location
of any event. Upon request, the licensee shall provide to the board
all necessary or requested information concerning the society or
organization that will be holding the function at which the endorsed
license will be utilized.
(c) Licensees may cater events on a domestic winery premises.
(5) The holder of this license or its manager may furnish beer or
wine to the licensee's employees who are twenty-one years of age or
older free of charge as may be required for use in connection with
instruction on beer and wine. The instruction may include the history,
nature, values, and characteristics of beer or wine, the use of wine
lists, and the methods of presenting, serving, storing, and handling
beer or wine. The licensee must use the beer or wine it obtains under
its license for the sampling as part of the instruction. The
instruction must be given on the premises of the licensee.
(6) Minors may be allowed in all areas of the hotel where alcohol
may be consumed; however, the consumption must be incidental to the
primary use of the area. These areas include, but are not limited to,
tennis courts, hotel lobbies, and swimming pool areas. If an area is
not a mixed use area, and is primarily used for alcohol service, the
area must be designated and restricted to access by minors.
(7) Minors may be allowed for special dining occasions in an area,
such as a lounge that is normally off-limits to minors, if no seating
or beverage consumption is allowed at a bar, which may be used as a
service bar for the special dining occasion, if dining will predominate
over the consumption of alcoholic beverages during the special use, and
if the license holder has provided advance written notice to the board
of the occasion, date, and hours of the special use. Once advance
written notice has been received for an event, the licensee will not be
required to provide such notice again for any similar event for that
calendar year.
(8) The annual fee for this license is two thousand dollars. The
fee shall be prorated according to the calendar quarters, or portion
thereof, during which the licensee is open for business, except in case
of suspension or revocation of the license.
(9) As used in this section, "hotel," "spirits," "beer," and "wine"
have the meanings defined in RCW 66.24.410 and 66.04.010.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.44.310 and 1998 c 126 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by RCW 66.44.316 ((and)),
66.44.350, and section 2 of this act, it shall be a misdemeanor:
(a) To serve or allow to remain in any area classified by the board
as off-limits to any person under the age of twenty-one years;
(b) For any person under the age of twenty-one years to enter or
remain in any area classified as off-limits to such a person, but
persons under twenty-one years of age may pass through a restricted
area in a facility holding a spirits, beer, and wine private club
license;
(c) For any person under the age of twenty-one years to represent
his or her age as being twenty-one or more years for the purpose of
purchasing liquor or securing admission to, or remaining in any area
classified by the board as off-limits to such a person.
(2) The Washington state liquor control board shall have the power
and it shall be its duty to classify licensed premises or portions of
licensed premises as off-limits to persons under the age of twenty-one
years of age.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.24.400 and 2005 c 152 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a retailer's license, to be known and designated
as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, to sell spirituous
liquor by the individual glass, beer, and wine, at retail, for
consumption on the premises, including mixed drinks and cocktails
compounded or mixed on the premises only((: PROVIDED, That a hotel,
or)). A club licensed under chapter 70.62 RCW with overnight sleeping
accommodations, that is licensed under this section may sell liquor by
the bottle to registered guests of the ((hotel or)) club for
consumption in guest rooms, hospitality rooms, or at banquets in the
((hotel or)) club((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). A patron of a bona
fide ((hotel,)) restaurant((,)) or club licensed under this section may
remove from the premises recorked or recapped in its original container
any portion of wine which was purchased for consumption with a meal,
and registered guests who have purchased liquor from the ((hotel or))
club by the bottle may remove from the premises any unused portion of
such liquor in its original container. Such license may be issued only
to bona fide restaurants((, hotels)) and clubs, and to dining, club and
buffet cars on passenger trains, and to dining places on passenger
boats and airplanes, and to dining places at civic centers with
facilities for sports, entertainment, and conventions, and to such
other establishments operated and maintained primarily for the benefit
of tourists, vacationers and travelers as the board shall determine are
qualified to have, and in the discretion of the board should have, a
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license under the provisions and
limitations of this title.
(2) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant license to sell for off-premises consumption wine
vinted and bottled in the state of Washington and carrying a label
exclusive to the license holder selling the wine. Spirits and beer may
not be sold for off-premises consumption under this section. The
annual fee for the endorsement under this subsection is one hundred
twenty dollars.
(3) The holder of a spirits, beer, and wine license or its manager
may furnish beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to the licensee's
employees free of charge as may be required for use in connection with
instruction on beer, wine, or spirituous liquor. The instruction may
include the history, nature, values, and characteristics of beer, wine,
or spirituous liquor, the use of wine lists, and the methods of
presenting, serving, storing, and handling beer, wine, and spirituous
liquor. The spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee must use the
beer, wine, or spirituous liquor it obtains under its license for the
sampling as part of the instruction. The instruction must be given on
the premises of the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.08.180 and 2000 c 192 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 66.24.290(1), moneys in the liquor
revolving fund shall be distributed by the board at least once every
three months in accordance with RCW 66.08.190, 66.08.200 and 66.08.210:
PROVIDED, That the board shall reserve from distribution such amount
not exceeding five hundred thousand dollars as may be necessary for the
proper administration of this title.
(1) All license fees, penalties and forfeitures derived under
chapter 13, Laws of 1935 from spirits, beer, and wine restaurant;
spirits, beer, and wine private club; hotel; and sports entertainment
facility licenses or spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer,
and wine private club; and sports entertainment facility licensees
shall every three months be disbursed by the board as follows:
(a) Three hundred thousand dollars per biennium, to the death
investigations account for the state toxicology program pursuant to RCW
68.50.107; and
(b) Of the remaining funds:
(i) 6.06 percent to the University of Washington and 4.04 percent
to Washington State University for alcoholism and drug abuse research
and for the dissemination of such research; and
(ii) 89.9 percent to the general fund to be used by the department
of social and health services solely to carry out the purposes of RCW
70.96A.050;
(2) The first fifty-five dollars per license fee provided in RCW
66.24.320 and 66.24.330 up to a maximum of one hundred fifty thousand
dollars annually shall be disbursed every three months by the board to
the general fund to be used for juvenile alcohol and drug prevention
programs for kindergarten through third grade to be administered by the
superintendent of public instruction;
(3) Twenty percent of the remaining total amount derived from
license fees pursuant to RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, and
66.24.360, shall be transferred to the general fund to be used by the
department of social and health services solely to carry out the
purposes of RCW 70.96A.050; and
(4) One-fourth cent per liter of the tax imposed by RCW 66.24.210
shall every three months be disbursed by the board to Washington State
University solely for wine and wine grape research, extension programs
related to wine and wine grape research, and resident instruction in
both wine grape production and the processing aspects of the wine
industry in accordance with RCW 28B.30.068. The director of financial
management shall prescribe suitable accounting procedures to ensure
that the funds transferred to the general fund to be used by the
department of social and health services and appropriated are
separately accounted for.

Sec. 6 RCW 66.08.220 and 1999 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall set aside in a separate account in the liquor
revolving fund an amount equal to ten percent of its gross sales of
liquor to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine
private club; hotel; and sports entertainment facility licensees
collected from these licensees pursuant to the provisions of RCW
82.08.150, less the fifteen percent discount provided for in RCW
66.24.440; and the moneys in said separate account shall be distributed
in accordance with the provisions of RCW 66.08.190, 66.08.200 and
66.08.210((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). No election unit in which the
sale of liquor under spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer,
and wine private club; and sports entertainment facility licenses is
unlawful shall be entitled to share in the distribution of moneys from
such separate account.

Sec. 7 RCW 66.20.010 and 1998 c 126 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon application in the prescribed form being made to any employee
authorized by the board to issue permits, accompanied by payment of the
prescribed fee, and upon the employee being satisfied that the
applicant should be granted a permit under this title, the employee
shall issue to the applicant under such regulations and at such fee as
may be prescribed by the board a permit of the class applied for, as
follows:
(1) Where the application is for a special permit by a physician or
dentist, or by any person in charge of an institution regularly
conducted as a hospital or sanitorium for the care of persons in ill
health, or as a home devoted exclusively to the care of aged people, a
special liquor purchase permit;
(2) Where the application is for a special permit by a person
engaged within the state in mechanical or manufacturing business or in
scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use therein, or by any
private individual, a special permit to purchase alcohol for the
purpose named in the permit;
(3) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor
at a banquet, at a specified date and place, a special permit to
purchase liquor for consumption at such banquet, to such applicants as
may be fixed by the board;
(4) Where the application is for a special permit to consume liquor
on the premises of a business not licensed under this title, a special
permit to purchase liquor for consumption thereon for such periods of
time and to such applicants as may be fixed by the board;
(5) Where the application is for a special permit by a manufacturer
to import or purchase within the state alcohol, malt, and other
materials containing alcohol to be used in the manufacture of liquor,
or other products, a special permit;
(6) Where the application is for a special permit by a person
operating a drug store to purchase liquor at retail prices only, to be
thereafter sold by such person on the prescription of a physician, a
special liquor purchase permit;
(7) Where the application is for a special permit by an authorized
representative of a military installation operated by or for any of the
armed forces within the geographical boundaries of the state of
Washington, a special permit to purchase liquor for use on such
military installation at prices to be fixed by the board;
(8) Where the application is for a special permit by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at a convention of
a trade association composed of licensees of the board, when the said
liquor is served in a hospitality room or from a booth in a board-approved suppliers' display room at the convention, and when the liquor
so served is for consumption in the said hospitality room or display
room during the convention, anything in Title 66 RCW to the contrary
notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor shall be purchased from
the board or a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee and any such
beer and wine shall be subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290
and 66.24.210;
(9) Where the application is for a special permit by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
donate liquor for a reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner for
delegates and guests at a convention of a trade association composed of
licensees of the board, when the liquor so donated is for consumption
at the said reception, breakfast, luncheon, or dinner during the
convention, anything in Title 66 RCW to the contrary notwithstanding.
Any such spirituous liquor shall be purchased from the board or a
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee and any such beer and wine
shall be subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
(10) Where the application is for a special permit by a
manufacturer, importer, or distributor, or representative thereof, to
donate and/or serve liquor without charge to delegates and guests at an
international trade fair, show, or exposition held under the auspices
of a federal, state, or local governmental entity or organized and
promoted by a nonprofit organization, anything in Title 66 RCW to the
contrary notwithstanding. Any such spirituous liquor shall be
purchased from the board and any such beer or wine shall be subject to
the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210;
(11) Where the application is for an annual special permit by a
person operating a bed and breakfast lodging facility to donate or
serve wine or beer without charge to overnight guests of the facility
if the wine or beer is for consumption on the premises of the facility.
"Bed and breakfast lodging facility," as used in this subsection, means
a ((hotel or similar)) facility offering from one to eight lodging
units and breakfast to travelers and guests.

Sec. 8 RCW 66.20.310 and 1997 c 321 s 45 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) There shall be an alcohol server permit, known as a class 12
permit, for a manager or bartender selling or mixing alcohol, spirits,
wines, or beer for consumption at an on-premises licensed facility.
(b) There shall be an alcohol server permit, known as a class 13
permit, for a person who only serves alcohol, spirits, wines, or beer
for consumption at an on-premises licensed facility.
(c) As provided by rule by the board, a class 13 permit holder may
be allowed to act as a bartender without holding a class 12 permit.
(2)(a) Effective January 1, 1997, except as provided in (d) of this
subsection, every person employed, under contract or otherwise, by an
annual retail liquor licensee holding a license as authorized by RCW
66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, 66.24.400, 66.24.425, 66.24.450,
section 2 of this act, or 66.24.570, who as part of his or her
employment participates in any manner in the sale or service of
alcoholic beverages shall have issued to them a class 12 or class 13
permit.
(b) Every class 12 and class 13 permit issued shall be issued in
the name of the applicant and no other person may use the permit of
another permit holder. The holder shall present the permit upon
request to inspection by a representative of the board or a peace
officer. The class 12 or class 13 permit shall be valid for employment
at any retail licensed premises described in (a) of this subsection.
(c) No licensee described in (a) of this subsection, except as
provided in (d) of this subsection, may employ or accept the services
of any person without the person first having a valid class 12 or class
13 permit.
(d) Within sixty days of initial employment, every person whose
duties include the compounding, sale, service, or handling of liquor
shall have a class 12 or class 13 permit.
(e) No person may perform duties that include the sale or service
of alcoholic beverages on a retail licensed premises without possessing
a valid alcohol server permit.
(3) A permit issued by a training entity under this section is
valid for employment at any retail licensed premises described in
subsection (2)(a) of this section for a period of five years unless
suspended by the board.
(4) The board may suspend or revoke an existing permit if any of
the following occur:
(a) The applicant or permittee has been convicted of violating any
of the state or local intoxicating liquor laws of this state or has
been convicted at any time of a felony; or
(b) The permittee has performed or permitted any act that
constitutes a violation of this title or of any rule of the board.
(5) The suspension or revocation of a permit under this section
does not relieve a licensee from responsibility for any act of the
employee or agent while employed upon the retail licensed premises.
The board may, as appropriate, revoke or suspend either the permit of
the employee who committed the violation or the license of the licensee
upon whose premises the violation occurred, or both the permit and the
license.
(6)(a) After January 1, 1997, it is a violation of this title for
any retail licensee or agent of a retail licensee as described in
subsection (2)(a) of this section to employ in the sale or service of
alcoholic beverages, any person who does not have a valid alcohol
server permit or whose permit has been revoked, suspended, or denied.
(b) It is a violation of this title for a person whose alcohol
server permit has been denied, suspended, or revoked to accept
employment in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages.
(7) Grocery stores licensed under RCW 66.24.360, the primary
commercial activity of which is the sale of grocery products and for
which the sale and service of beer and wine for on-premises consumption
with food is incidental to the primary business, and employees of such
establishments, are exempt from RCW 66.20.300 through 66.20.350.

Sec. 9 RCW 66.24.410 and 1983 c 3 s 164 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Spirituous liquor," as used in RCW 66.24.400 to 66.24.450,
inclusive, means "liquor" as defined in RCW 66.04.010, except "wine"
and "beer" sold as such.
(2) "Restaurant" as used in RCW 66.24.400 to 66.24.450, inclusive,
means an establishment provided with special space and accommodations
where, in consideration of payment, food, without lodgings, is
habitually furnished to the public, not including drug stores and soda
fountains: PROVIDED, That such establishments shall be approved by the
board and that the board shall be satisfied that such establishment is
maintained in a substantial manner as a place for preparing, cooking
and serving of complete meals. The service of only fry orders or such
food and victuals as sandwiches, hamburgers, or salads shall not be
deemed in compliance with this definition.
(3) "Hotel," "clubs," "wine" and "beer" are used in RCW 66.24.400
to 66.24.450, inclusive, with the meaning given in chapter 66.04 RCW((:
PROVIDED, That any such hotel shall be provided with special space and
accommodations where, in consideration of payment, food is habitually
furnished to the public: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the board shall be
satisfied that such hotel is maintained in a substantial manner as a
place for preparing, cooking and serving of complete meals. The
service of only fry orders, sandwiches, hamburgers, or salads shall not
be deemed in compliance with this definition)).

Sec. 10 RCW 66.24.420 and 2006 c 101 s 3 and 2006 c 85 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license shall be issued
in accordance with the following schedule of annual fees:
(a) The annual fee for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license
shall be graduated according to the dedicated dining area and type of
service provided as follows:

(b) The annual fee for the license when issued to any other
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensee outside of incorporated
cities and towns shall be prorated according to the calendar quarters,
or portion thereof, during which the licensee is open for business,
except in case of suspension or revocation of the license.
(c) Where the license shall be issued to any corporation,
association or person operating a bona fide restaurant in an airport
terminal facility providing service to transient passengers with more
than one place where liquor is to be dispensed and sold, such license
shall be issued upon the payment of the annual fee, which shall be a
master license and shall permit such sale within and from one such
place. Such license may be extended to additional places on the
premises at the discretion of the board and a duplicate license may be
issued for each such additional place. The holder of a master license
for a restaurant in an airport terminal facility must maintain in a
substantial manner at least one place on the premises for preparing,
cooking, and serving of complete meals, and such food service shall be
available on request in other licensed places on the premises. An
additional license fee of twenty-five percent of the annual master
license fee shall be required for such duplicate licenses.
(d) Where the license shall be issued to any corporation,
association, or person operating dining places at a publicly or
privately owned civic or convention center with facilities for sports,
entertainment, or conventions, or a combination thereof, with more than
one place where liquor is to be dispensed and sold, such license shall
be issued upon the payment of the annual fee, which shall be a master
license and shall permit such sale within and from one such place.
Such license may be extended to additional places on the premises at
the discretion of the board and a duplicate license may be issued for
each such additional place. The holder of a master license for a
dining place at such a publicly or privately owned civic or convention
center must maintain in a substantial manner at least one place on the
premises for preparing, cooking, and serving of complete meals, and
food service shall be available on request in other licensed places on
the premises. An additional license fee of ten dollars shall be
required for such duplicate licenses.
(e) Where the license shall be issued to any corporation,
association or person operating more than one building containing
dining places at privately owned facilities which are open to the
public and where there is a continuity of ownership of all adjacent
property, such license shall be issued upon the payment of an annual
fee which shall be a master license and shall permit such sale within
and from one such place. Such license may be extended to the
additional dining places on the property ((or, in the case of a
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensed hotel, property owned or
controlled by leasehold interest by that hotel for use as a conference
or convention center or banquet facility open to the general public for
special events in the same metropolitan area, at the discretion of the
board and a duplicate license may be issued for each additional
place)). The holder of the master license for the dining place shall
not offer alcoholic beverages for sale, service, and consumption at the
additional place unless food service is available at both the location
of the master license and the duplicate license. An additional license
fee of twenty dollars shall be required for such duplicate licenses.
(2) The board, so far as in its judgment is reasonably possible,
shall confine spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses to the
business districts of cities and towns and other communities, and not
grant such licenses in residential districts, nor within the immediate
vicinity of schools, without being limited in the administration of
this subsection to any specific distance requirements.
(3) The board shall have discretion to issue spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant licenses outside of cities and towns in the state of
Washington. The purpose of this subsection is to enable the board, in
its discretion, to license in areas outside of cities and towns and
other communities, establishments which are operated and maintained
primarily for the benefit of tourists, vacationers and travelers, and
also golf and country clubs, and common carriers operating dining, club
and buffet cars, or boats.
(4) The total number of spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses
issued in the state of Washington by the board, not including spirits,
beer, and wine private club licenses, shall not in the aggregate at any
time exceed one license for each one thousand four hundred fifty of
population in the state, determined according to the yearly population
determination developed by the office of financial management pursuant
to RCW 43.62.030.
(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (4) of this
section, the board shall refuse a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license to any applicant if in the opinion of the board the spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant licenses already granted for the particular
locality are adequate for the reasonable needs of the community.
(6)(a) The board may issue a caterer's endorsement to this license
to allow the licensee to remove the liquor stocks at the licensed
premises, for use as liquor for sale and service at event locations at
a specified date and, except as provided in subsection (7) of this
section, place not currently licensed by the board. If the event is
open to the public, it must be sponsored by a society or organization
as defined by RCW 66.24.375. If attendance at the event is limited to
members or invited guests of the sponsoring individual, society, or
organization, the requirement that the sponsor must be a society or
organization as defined by RCW 66.24.375 is waived. Cost of the
endorsement is three hundred fifty dollars.
(b) The holder of this license with catering endorsement shall, if
requested by the board, notify the board or its designee of the date,
time, place, and location of any catered event. Upon request, the
licensee shall provide to the board all necessary or requested
information concerning the society or organization that will be holding
the function at which the endorsed license will be utilized.
(7) Licensees under this section that hold a caterer's endorsement
are allowed to use this endorsement on a domestic winery premises or on
the premises of a passenger vessel under the following conditions:
(a) Agreements between the domestic winery or passenger vessel, as
the case may be, and the retail licensee shall be in writing, contain
no exclusivity clauses regarding the alcohol beverages to be served,
and be filed with the board; and
(b) The domestic winery or passenger vessel, as the case may be,
and the retail licensee shall be separately contracted and compensated
by the persons sponsoring the event for their respective services.

Sec. 11 RCW 66.24.440 and 1998 c 126 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each spirits, beer, and wine restaurant, spirits, beer, and wine
private club, hotel, and sports entertainment facility licensee shall
be entitled to purchase any spirituous liquor items salable under such
license from the board at a discount of not less than fifteen percent
from the retail price fixed by the board, together with all taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect July 1, 2008.

--- END ---