BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.500.020 and 2004 c 21 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(a) "Prior tax collection year" means the year immediately
preceding the year in which the local effort assistance shall be
allocated.
(b) "Statewide average ((twelve)) twenty-four percent levy rate"
means ((twelve)) twenty-four percent of the total levy bases as defined
in RCW 84.52.0531 (3) and (4) summed for all school districts, and
divided by the total assessed valuation for excess levy purposes in the
prior tax collection year for all districts as adjusted to one hundred
percent by the county indicated ratio established in RCW 84.48.075.
(c) The "district's ((twelve)) twenty-four percent levy amount"
means the school district's maximum levy authority after transfers
determined under RCW 84.52.0531(2) (a) through (c) divided by the
district's maximum levy percentage determined under RCW 84.52.0531(5)
multiplied by ((twelve)) twenty-four percent.
(d) The "district's ((twelve)) twenty-four percent levy rate" means
the district's ((twelve)) twenty-four percent levy amount divided by
the district's assessed valuation for excess levy purposes for the
prior tax collection year as adjusted to one hundred percent by the
county indicated ratio.
(e) "Districts eligible for local effort assistance" means those
districts with a ((twelve)) twenty-four percent levy rate that exceeds
the statewide average ((twelve)) twenty-four percent levy rate.
(2) Unless otherwise stated all rates, percents, and amounts are
for the calendar year for which local effort assistance is being
calculated under this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.500.020 and 1999 c 317 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(a) "Prior tax collection year" means the year immediately
preceding the year in which the local effort assistance shall be
allocated.
(b) "Statewide average ((twelve)) twenty-four percent levy rate"
means ((twelve)) twenty-four percent of the total levy bases as defined
in RCW 84.52.0531(3) summed for all school districts, and divided by
the total assessed valuation for excess levy purposes in the prior tax
collection year for all districts as adjusted to one hundred percent by
the county indicated ratio established in RCW 84.48.075.
(c) The "district's ((twelve)) twenty-four percent levy amount"
means the school district's maximum levy authority after transfers
determined under RCW 84.52.0531(2) (a) through (c) divided by the
district's maximum levy percentage determined under RCW 84.52.0531(4)
multiplied by ((twelve)) twenty-four percent.
(d) The "district's ((twelve)) twenty-four percent levy rate" means
the district's ((twelve)) twenty-four percent levy amount divided by
the district's assessed valuation for excess levy purposes for the
prior tax collection year as adjusted to one hundred percent by the
county indicated ratio.
(e) "Districts eligible for local effort assistance" means those
districts with a ((twelve)) twenty-four percent levy rate that exceeds
the statewide average ((twelve)) twenty-four percent levy rate.
(2) Unless otherwise stated all rates, percents, and amounts are
for the calendar year for which local effort assistance is being
calculated under this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.500.030 and 2006 c 372 s 904 and 2006 c 119 s 1
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Allocation of state matching funds to eligible districts for local
effort assistance shall be determined as follows:
(1) Funds raised by the district through maintenance and operation
levies shall be matched with state funds using the following ratio of
state funds to levy funds:
(a) The difference between the district's ((twelve)) twenty-four
percent levy rate and the statewide average ((twelve)) twenty-four
percent levy rate; to
(b) The statewide average ((twelve)) twenty-four percent levy rate.
(2) The maximum amount of state matching funds for districts
eligible for local effort assistance shall be the district's ((twelve))
twenty-four percent levy amount, multiplied by the following
percentage:
(a) The difference between the district's ((twelve)) twenty-four
percent levy rate and the statewide average ((twelve)) twenty-four
percent levy rate; divided by
(b) The district's ((twelve)) twenty-four percent levy rate.
(3) ((Calendar year 2003 allocations and maximum eligibility under
this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.99.
(4) From January 1, 2004, to December 31, 2005, allocations and
maximum eligibility under this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.937.
(5) From January 1, 2006, to December 31, 2006, allocations and
maximum eligibility under this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.9563.))
Beginning with calendar year 2007, allocations and maximum eligibility
under this chapter shall be fully funded at one hundred percent and
shall not be reduced.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 1 of this act expires January 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2012.

--- END ---