BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.743 and 2004 c 213 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Consistent with the policy of the state to reduce outdoor
burning to the greatest extent practical:
(a) Outdoor burning shall not be allowed in any area of the state
where federal or state ambient air quality standards are exceeded for
pollutants emitted by outdoor burning.
(b)(i) After December 31, 2000, outdoor burning shall not be
allowed in any urban growth area as defined by RCW 36.70A.030, or any
city of the state having a population greater than ten thousand people
if such cities are threatened to exceed state or federal air quality
standards, and alternative disposal practices consistent with good
solid waste management are reasonably available or practices
eliminating production of organic refuse are reasonably available,
except as provided in (b)(ii) and (iii) of this subsection.
((In no event shall such burning be allowed)) (ii) After December
31, ((2000)) 2006, ((except that)) outdoor burning is not allowed
within the urban growth areas for cities having a population of less
than five thousand people((, that are neither within nor contiguous
with any nonattainment or maintenance area designated under the federal
clean air act, in no event shall such burning be allowed after December
31, 2006)).
(iii) However, in counties that do not contain any nonattainment or
maintenance areas designated under the federal clean air act for
pollutants emitted by outdoor burning, such burning may continue to be
allowed until July 1, 2008, within the urban growth areas, as defined
in RCW 36.70A.030, for cities having a population of less than two
thousand five hundred people, as determined by the office of financial
management, if the city legislative authority, after public hearing and
due public involvement process, through majority vote, decides to allow
burning to continue. Cities electing to continue burning must submit
vegetative waste management plans to the department by June 30, 2008,
that identify adopted alternative practices to burning and begin
implementing alternative practices by July 1, 2008.
(iv) If additional funding for alternatives to burning is provided
through the coordinated prevention grant program in the 2007-2009
biennium grant cycle, those cities not electing to continue burning
under (b)(iii) of this subsection must receive highest priority for
available grant dollars.
(c) The department shall convene a work group with representatives
of affected stakeholders to assess opportunities, other than burning,
to manage vegetative solid waste and recommend best management
practices, consistent with good solid waste management practices, that
work for smaller communities. The work group recommendations must be
completed by December 31, 2007. The department shall provide the
recommendations to the cities electing to continue burning under
(b)(iii) of this subsection and to the appropriate standing committees
of the legislature.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, outdoor
burning may be allowed for the exclusive purpose of managing storm or
flood-related debris. The decision to allow burning shall be made by
the entity with permitting jurisdiction as determined under RCW
70.94.660 or 70.94.755. If outdoor burning is allowed in areas subject
to (a) or (b) of this subsection, a permit shall be required, and a fee
may be collected to cover the expenses of administering and enforcing
the permit. All conditions and restrictions pursuant to RCW
70.94.750(1) and 70.94.775 apply to outdoor burning allowed under this
section.
(((d))) (e)(i) Outdoor burning that is normal, necessary, and
customary to ongoing agricultural activities, that is consistent with
agricultural burning authorized under RCW 70.94.650 and 70.94.656, is
allowed within the urban growth area as defined in (b) of this
subsection if the burning is not conducted during air quality episodes,
or where a determination of impaired air quality has been made as
provided in RCW 70.94.473, and the agricultural activities preceded the
designation as an urban growth area.
(ii) Outdoor burning of cultivated orchard trees, whether or not
agricultural crops will be replanted on the land, shall be allowed as
an ongoing agricultural activity under this section if a local
horticultural pest and disease board formed under chapter 15.09 RCW, an
extension office agent with Washington State University that has
horticultural experience, or an entomologist employed by the department
of agriculture, has determined in writing that burning is an
appropriate method to prevent or control the spread of horticultural
pests or diseases.
(2) "Outdoor burning" means the combustion of material of any type
in an open fire or in an outdoor container without providing for the
control of combustion or the control of emissions from the combustion.
(3) This section shall not apply to silvicultural burning used to
improve or maintain fire dependent ecosystems for rare plants or
animals within state, federal, and private natural area preserves,
natural resource conservation areas, parks, and other wildlife areas.

--- END ---