BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that health professionals require easy
and timely access to medical journals and other related scientific and
evidence-based information on a regular basis to enhance evidence-based
medical practice. The University of Washington health sciences library
has numerous medical journals, extensive databases, and decision
support tools, indexed and current, online and in other forms, for all
health professionals with teaching appointments at the university.
Other material critical to ensuring high quality care may be available
in the future, including certified patient aids for use in shared
decision making with patients contemplating treatment options.
Washington health professionals without these appointments do not
currently have access to all of these journals and related materials.
(2) Health professionals shall pay a fee of twenty-five dollars in
addition to their annual licensing fee to the department of health.
This money shall be used to provide access for all health professionals
in the state to critical evidence-based resources and tools online and
otherwise from the University of Washington health sciences library.
(3) The department of health shall provide funds from the fees from
health professionals under this section to the University of Washington
for this purpose and shall arrange access for each licensed health
professional in the mailing of his or her annual license.
(4) As used in this section, "health professionals" means
physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, osteopathic physicians
licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, physician assistants licensed under
chapter 18.71A RCW, osteopathic physicians' assistants licensed under
chapter 18.57A RCW, advanced registered nurse practitioners licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW, optometrists licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW,
pharmacists licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW, naturopaths licensed
under chapter 18.36A RCW, and podiatric physicians licensed under
chapter 18.22 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The University of Washington shall cooperate with the department of
health in the implementation of section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.70.250 and 2006 c 72 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of
each professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. The
secretary shall from time to time establish the amount of all
application fees, license fees, registration fees, examination fees,
permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee associated with licensing
or regulation of professions, occupations, or businesses administered
by the department. In fixing said fees, the secretary shall set the
fees for each program at a sufficient level to include the fee
established in section 1 of this act and defray the costs of
administering that program and the cost of regulating licensed
volunteer medical workers in accordance with RCW 18.130.360, except as
provided in RCW 18.79.202 until June 30, 2013. All such fees shall be
fixed by rule adopted by the secretary in accordance with the
provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

--- END ---