BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.813 and 2005 c 296 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of new
passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles,
which utilize hybrid technology and have a United States environmental
protection agency estimated highway gasoline or diesel mileage rating
of at least forty miles per gallon.
(2) The seller must keep records necessary for the department to
verify eligibility under this section.
(3) As used in this section, "hybrid technology" means propulsion
units powered by both electricity and gasoline or diesel.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.813 and 2005 c 296 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of new passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger
vehicles, which utilize hybrid technology and have a United States
environmental protection agency estimated highway gasoline or diesel
mileage rating of at least forty miles per gallon.
(2) "Hybrid technology" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.08.813.

Sec. 3 2005 c 296 s 5 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
This act takes effect January 1, ((2009)) 2008.

--- END ---