BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.0298 and 1987 c 494 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of diesel
fuel for use in the operation of watercraft in commercial ((deep sea))
fishing operations or commercial passenger fishing boat operations by
persons who are regularly engaged in the business of commercial ((deep
sea)) fishing or commercial passenger fishing boat operations both
within and outside the territorial waters of this state.
For purposes of this section, a person is not regularly engaged in
the business of commercial ((deep sea)) fishing or the operation of a
commercial passenger fishing boat if the person has gross receipts from
these operations of less than five thousand dollars a year.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.0298 and 1987 c 494 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply with respect to the
use of diesel fuel in the operation of watercraft in commercial ((deep
sea)) fishing operations or commercial passenger fishing boat
operations by persons who are regularly engaged in the business of
commercial ((deep sea)) fishing or commercial passenger fishing boat
operations both within and outside the territorial waters of this
state.
For purposes of this section, a person is not regularly engaged in
the business of commercial ((deep sea)) fishing or the operation of a
commercial passenger fishing boat if the person has gross receipts from
these operations of less than five thousand dollars a year.

--- END ---