BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.210 RCW
to read as follows:
The small business export finance assistance center shall develop
a rural manufacturer export outreach program in collaboration with
Washington manufacturing services. The program must provide outreach
services to rural manufacturing businesses in Washington to inform them
of the importance of, and opportunities in, international trade, and to
inform them of the export assistance programs available to assist these
businesses to become exporters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the small business
export finance assistance center, created under RCW 43.210.020, for the
purposes of section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 43.210.050 (Export assistance services
contract with department of community, trade, and economic development)
and 1998 c 245 s 84, 1995 c 399 s 107, & 1991 c 314 s 16 are each
repealed.

--- END ---