BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that state
demographic, economic, environmental, and climate trends result in a
need to change management policies of state lands. Recent studies
indicate that a continuing loss of working timber lands may threaten
the long-term outlook for the state's timber products industry. The
majority of revenues from state lands are derived from the harvest of
timber. The economic activity and jobs in the timber products industry
also produce other tax revenues important to local communities and the
beneficiaries of income from state lands. Continuation of this primary
source of revenue is dependent on the continued viability of the
state's timber products industry.
(2) The legislature also finds that long-term growth in state
population and pressures from environmental and climate changes will
create important new values derived from state natural resource lands.
In addition to income from the sustainable harvest of timber, these
lands also provide water storage, improved water quality, carbon
sequestration, habitat, and recreation. These additional values are
likely to yield very significant long-term investment returns to the
beneficiaries of state lands and to all the people of the state.
(3) The legislature also finds that increased investment of state
land assets in commercial properties over the past twenty years has not
achieved a significant diversification of the state land portfolio.
The acquisition of commercial properties has not sufficiently increased
revenues to keep pace with the growth in the state school construction
budget. Other state revenues have filled the gap between income from
state lands and the total school construction budget. In order for
commercial land holdings to provide sufficient revenues to reverse the
decline in the percentage of the school construction budget that is
supported by state land revenues, significant portions of state natural
resource lands would have to be sold or transferred. The loss of those
working natural resource lands would threaten the viability of
industries and communities dependent on these lands and would threaten
the main source of revenues to the beneficiaries of state lands.
Furthermore, commercial land holdings yield none of the long-term
benefits derived from state natural resource lands.
(4) The long-term stewardship of state lands requires a planning
and investment horizon that considers demographic, economic,
environmental, and climate trends of fifty to one hundred years or
more. Long-term stewardship of state lands balances the need for
short-term income with an equal focus on long-term benefits from state
lands for future generation.
(5) The legislature intends to preserve and enhance state land
holdings of working natural resource lands to achieve a sustained and
perpetual return for current and future generations of beneficiaries of
state lands. The long-term stewardship of state lands will also
benefit the communities that depend on these lands, and all the people
of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79.10 RCW
under the subchapter heading "general provisions" to read as follows:
The department shall not acquire additional commercial properties
as state lands after the effective date of this section. The
department, in cooperation with the state investment board, shall
develop a plan to transition commercial properties to the state
investment board or to land-holding firms on behalf of the state
investment board, or to dispose of the commercial properties and
reinvest the proceeds in working natural resource lands that are at
high risk of conversion out of working timber land status. The
department shall evaluate the investment return for these natural
resource lands at risk of conversion by also including the value of
leasing development rights as permitted in chapter 79.13 RCW. The
legislature intends that this transition will be complete by June 30,
2013. The department shall submit the transition plan to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008, and
shall submit progress reports showing implementation of the plan by
December 1, 2010, and December 1, 2012.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.13.010 and 2003 c 334 s 366 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to other provisions of this chapter and subject to
rules adopted by the board, the department may lease state lands for
purposes it deems advisable, including, but not limited to, commercial,
industrial, residential, agricultural, and recreational purposes in
order to obtain a fair market rental return to the state or the
appropriate constitutional or statutory trust.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary,
in leases for residential purposes, the board may waive or modify any
conditions of the lease if the waiver or modification is necessary to
enable any federal agency or lending institution authorized to do
business in this state or elsewhere in the United States to participate
in any loan secured by a security interest in a leasehold interest.
(3) Any land granted to the state by the United States may be
leased for any lawful purpose in such minimum acreage as may be fixed
by the department.
(4) The department shall exercise general supervision and control
over the lease of state lands for any lawful purpose.
(5) State lands leased or for which permits are issued or contracts
are entered into for the prospecting and extraction of valuable
materials, coal, oil, gas, or other hydrocarbons are subject to the
provisions of chapter 79.14 RCW.
(6) The department may also lease state lands or development rights
on state lands to public agencies, as defined in RCW 79.17.200.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.13.060 and 2003 c 334 s 323 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) State lands may be leased not to exceed ten years with the
following exceptions:
(a) The lands may be leased for agricultural purposes not to exceed
twenty-five years, except:
(i) Leases that authorize tree fruit or grape production may be for
up to fifty-five years;
(ii) Share crop leases may not exceed ten years;
(b) The lands may be leased for commercial, industrial, business,
or recreational purposes not to exceed fifty-five years;
(c) The lands may be leased for public school, college, or
university purposes not to exceed seventy-five years; ((and))
(d) The lands may be leased for residential purposes not to exceed
ninety-nine years; and
(e) The lands and development rights on state lands may be leased
to public agencies, as defined in RCW 79.17.200, not to exceed
ninety-nine years. The leases may also include provisions for renewal
of lease terms.
(2) No lessee of state lands may remain in possession of the land
after the termination or expiration of the lease without the written
consent of the department.
(a) The department may authorize a lease extension for a specific
period beyond the term of the lease for cropping improvements for the
purpose of crop rotation. These improvements shall be deemed
authorized improvements under RCW 79.13.030.
(b) Upon expiration of the lease term, the department may allow the
lessee to continue to hold the land for a period not exceeding one year
upon such rent, terms, and conditions as the department may prescribe,
if the leased land is not otherwise utilized.
(c) Upon expiration of the one-year lease extension, the department
may issue a temporary permit to the lessee upon terms and conditions it
prescribes if the department has not yet determined the disposition of
the land for other purposes.
(d) The temporary permit shall not extend beyond a five-year
period.
(3) If during the term of the lease of any state lands for
agricultural, grazing, commercial, residential, business, or
recreational purposes, in the opinion of the department it is in the
best interest of the state so to do, the department may, on the
application of the lessee and in agreement with the lessee, alter and
amend the terms and conditions of the lease. The sum total of the
original lease term and any extension thereof shall not exceed the
limits provided in this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 79.13.110 and 2003 c 334 s 368 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may authorize the use of state land by lease at
state auction for initial leases or by negotiation for existing leases.
(2) Leases that authorize commercial, industrial, or residential
uses may be entered into by public auction or negotiations at the
option of the department. Negotiations are subject to rules approved
by the board.
(3) Leases to public agencies, as defined in RCW 79.17.200, may be
entered into by negotiations. The leases may allow for a lump sum
payment for the entire term of the lease at the beginning of the lease.
The department shall consider the appraised fair market value of the
land minus the present value of the residual value of the land at the
end of the lease in calculating the lump sum payment. Renewal terms
for the leases must include provisions for calculating appropriate
payments upon renewal.

Sec. 6 RCW 79.17.010 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 939 and 2003 c 334
s 452 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department, with the approval of the board, may exchange
any state land and any timber thereon for any land of equal value in
order to:
(a) Facilitate the marketing of forest products of state lands; or
(b) Consolidate and block-up state timber, agricultural, or other
natural resource lands((;
(c) Acquire lands having commercial recreational leasing potential;
(d) Acquire county-owned lands;
(e) Acquire urban property which has greater income potential or
which could be more efficiently managed by the department in exchange
for state urban lands as defined in RCW 79.19.100; or
(f) Acquire any other lands when such exchange is determined by the
board to be in the best interest of the trust for which the state land
is held)).
(2) Land exchanged under this section shall not be used to reduce
the publicly owned forest land base.
(3) The board shall determine that each land exchange is in the
best interest of the trust for which the land is held prior to
authorizing the land exchange.
(4) ((During the biennium ending June 30, 2005)) To achieve the
purposes of this section, the department, with approval of the board,
may exchange any state land and any timber thereon for any land and
proceeds of equal value. Proceeds may be in the form of cash or
services ((in order to achieve the purposes established in this
section)). Any cash received as part of an exchange transaction shall
be deposited in the resource management cost account to pay for
administrative expenses incurred in carrying out an exchange
transaction. The amount of proceeds received from the exchange partner
may not exceed five percent of the total value of the exchange. The
receipt of proceeds shall not change the character of the transaction
from an exchange to a sale.

Sec. 7 RCW 79.17.020 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 937 and 2003 c 334
s 209 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The board of county commissioners of any county and/or the
mayor and city council or city commission of any city or town and/or
the board shall have authority to exchange, each with the other, or
with the federal forest service, the federal government or any proper
agency thereof and/or with any private landowner, county land of any
character, land owned by municipalities of any character, and state
forest land owned by the state under the jurisdiction of the
department, for real property of equal value for the purpose of
consolidating and blocking up the respective land holdings of any
county, municipality, the federal government, or the state of
Washington or for the purpose of obtaining lands having commercial
recreational leasing potential.
(2) ((During the biennium ending June 30, 2005,)) The department,
with approval of the board, may exchange any state forest land and any
timber thereon for any real property and proceeds of equal value.
Proceeds may be in the form of cash or services in order to achieve the
purposes established in this section. Any cash received as part of an
exchange transaction shall be deposited in the forest development
account to pay for administrative expenses incurred in carrying out an
exchange transaction. The amount of proceeds received from the
exchange partner may not exceed five percent of the total value of the
exchange. The receipt of proceeds shall not change the character of
the transaction from an exchange to a sale.

Sec. 8 RCW 79.17.200 and 1992 c 167 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "public agency" means any
agency, political subdivision, or unit of local government of this
state including, but not limited to, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, special purpose districts, and local service
districts; any agency of the state government; any agency of the United
States; and any Indian tribe recognized as such by the federal
government.
(2) With the approval of the board of natural resources, the
department of natural resources may directly transfer, lease, or
dispose of real property, without public auction, in the following
circumstances:
(a) Transfers in lieu of condemnations;
(b) Transfers or leases to public agencies; and
(c) Transfers to resolve trespass and property ownership disputes.
(3) Real property to be transferred, leased, or disposed of under
this section shall be transferred, leased, or disposed of only after
appraisal and for at least fair market value, and only if such
transaction is in the best interest of the state or affected trust.

Sec. 9 RCW 79.19.010 and 2003 c 334 s 525 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that from time to time it may be desirable
for the department to sell state lands which have low potential for
((natural resource management or low income-generating potential))
long-term stewardship of state natural resource lands or which, because
of geographic location or other factors, are inefficient for the
department to manage. However, it is also important to acquire lands
for long-term management to replace those sold so that the publicly
owned natural resource land base will ((not)) be ((depleted)) enhanced
and the publicly owned forest land base will ((not)) be ((reduced))
enhanced. The purpose of this chapter is to provide a means to
facilitate such sales and purchases so that the ((diversity of public
uses on the trust lands will be maintained. In making the
determinations,)) benefits of long-term stewardship of state natural
resource lands are achieved in perpetuity. The department shall comply
with local land use plans and applicable growth management principles
when selling or acquiring state lands.

Sec. 10 RCW 79.19.020 and 2003 c 334 s 526 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department, with the approval of the board, may purchase
property at fair market value to be held in a land bank, which is
hereby created within the department. Property so purchased shall be
property ((which would be desirable for addition to the public lands of
the state because of the potential for natural resource or income
production of the property)) that has potential for long-term
stewardship of natural resource values. The total acreage held in the
land bank shall not exceed one thousand five hundred acres.

Sec. 11 RCW 79.19.030 and 2004 c 199 s 215 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department, with the approval of the board, may:
(1) Exchange property held in the land bank for any other lands of
equal value administered by the department, including any lands held in
trust((.));
(2) Exchange property held in the land bank for property of equal
or greater value which is owned publicly or privately, and which has
greater potential for ((natural resource or income production)) the
long-term stewardship of state natural resource lands or which could be
more efficiently managed by the department, however, no power of
eminent domain is hereby granted to the department; and
(3) Sell property held in the land bank in the manner provided by
law for the sale of state lands without any requirement of platting and
to use the proceeds to acquire property for the land bank which has
greater potential for ((natural resource or income production))
long-term stewardship of state natural resource lands or which would be
more efficiently managed by the department.

Sec. 12 RCW 79.19.070 and 1984 c 222 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created a land bank ((technical)) advisory committee,
consisting of ((three)) eight members. Membership shall consist of:
One member qualified by experience and training in matters pertaining
to land use planning and real estate appointed by the commissioner of
public lands, one member qualified by experience and training in public
trust matters appointed by the superintendent of public instruction,
((and)) one member qualified by experience and training in financial
matters appointed by the state treasurer, and five members appointed by
the governor representing a small forest landowner, an industrial
forest landowner, a land conservancy organization involved in
preserving working timber lands, a local government representative from
a high growth urban area, and a local government representative from a
rural area with a significant timber products industry.
(2) The ((technical)) advisory committee shall provide professional
advice and counsel to the board of natural resources regarding land
bank sales, purchases, and exchanges involving urban property.
(3) Members of the ((technical)) advisory committee shall be
appointed for five-year terms and shall serve until a successor is
appointed. In the case of a vacancy the vacancy shall be filled by the
appointing authority. The initial term of the appointee of the
commissioner shall expire in three years. The initial term of the
appointee of the superintendent shall expire in four years. The
initial term of the appointee of the treasurer shall expire in five
years. The initial terms of two appointees by the governor shall
expire in three years. All terms expire December 31st.
(4) Members of the ((technical)) advisory committee shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their
duties under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 13 RCW 79.19.080 and 2003 c 334 s 531 are each amended to
read as follows:
Periodically, at intervals to be determined by the board, the
department shall identify trust lands which are within urban growth
boundaries or which are expected to convert to commercial, residential,
or industrial uses within ten years. The department shall adhere to
existing local comprehensive plans, zoning classifications, and duly
adopted local policies when making this identification and determining
the fair market value of the property. The department shall prepare a
list of such properties with the amount of acreage, the approximate
value as working natural resource lands compared to the approximate
value if the land converts to an alternative use, the long-term natural
resource values of the land, and proposed alternative uses of the land.
For properties with significant natural resource values, the department
shall estimate the price for leasing development rights under chapter
79.13 RCW that would be required to retain the lands as working natural
resource lands while providing a rate of return comparable to other
natural resource lands. The land bank advisory committee shall review
the list of properties and shall recommend the appropriate future use
of these properties. The land bank advisory committee shall prioritize
retention of working natural resource lands at risk of conversion
through the use of transfers or leases of development rights. The land
bank advisory committee may also recommend lands within urban growth
boundaries for the high growth school district land pool specified in
section 14 of this act.
The department shall hold a public hearing on the proposal in the
county where the state land is located. At least fifteen days but not
more than thirty days before the hearing, the department shall publish
a public notice of reasonable size in display advertising form, setting
forth the date, time, and place of the hearing, at least once in one or
more daily newspapers of general circulation in the county and at least
once in one or more weekly newspapers circulated in the area where the
trust land is located. At the same time that the published notice is
given, the department shall give written notice of the hearings to the
departments of fish and wildlife and general administration, to the
parks and recreation commission, and to the county, city, or town in
which the property is situated. The department shall disseminate a
news release pertaining to the hearing among printed and electronic
media in the area where the trust land is located. The public notice
and news release also shall identify trust lands in the area which are
expected to convert to commercial, residential, or industrial uses
within ten years.
A summary of the testimony presented at the hearings shall be
prepared for the board's consideration. The board shall designate
trust lands which are expected to convert to commercial, residential,
or industrial uses as urban land. Descriptions of lands designated by
the board shall be made available to the county and city or town in
which the land is situated and for public inspection and copying at the
department's administrative office in Olympia, Washington and at each
area office.
((The hearing and notice requirements of this section apply to
those trust lands which have been identified by the department prior to
July 1, 1984, as being expected to convert to commercial, residential,
or industrial uses within the next ten years, and which have not been
sold or exchanged prior to July 1, 1984.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 79.17 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that high growth school districts are often
unable to acquire lands best suited for siting new schools because
current funding capacity is devoted to current needs. Once a new
school is required in a community, districts that were unable to
purchase land in advance of population growth must piece together
multiple parcels at a high cost and in locations that are not optimal
considering transportation needs and proximity to neighborhoods. The
department shall coordinate with the superintendent of public
instruction to assist high growth school districts in acquiring land
suitable for future school sites. The superintendent of public
instruction shall identify high growth school districts and shall
accept applications from these school districts for land acquisition
assistance. The department may use existing state land parcels if
appropriate, may acquire preferred parcels with land replacement funds,
or may trade state lands for preferred parcels. The department shall
hold these future school site parcels as state lands based on an
agreement reached with the school districts for future development.
The agreements must define the methodology for determining fair market
value of the land at the time the school district desires to develop
the site. The agreements must also specify how long the land will be
held as state land and the means of disposing of the land if it no
longer is desirable as a school location.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act does not affect any existing right
acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the sections amended
or under any rule or order adopted under those sections, nor does it
affect any proceeding instituted under those sections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---