BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.170.010 and 2004 c 50 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Armed private security guard" means a private security guard
who has a current firearms certificate issued by the commission and is
licensed as an armed private security guard under this chapter.
(2) "Armored vehicle guard" means a person who transports in an
armored vehicle under armed guard, from one place to another place,
valuables, jewelry, currency, documents, or any other item that
requires secure delivery.
(3) "Burglar alarm response runner" means a person employed by a
private security company to respond to burglar alarm system signals.
(4) "Burglar alarm system" means a device or an assembly of
equipment and devices used to detect or signal unauthorized intrusion,
movement, or exit at a protected premises, other than in a vehicle, to
which police or private security guards are expected to respond.
(5) "Chief law enforcement officer" means the elected or appointed
police administrator of a municipal, county, or state police or
sheriff's department that has full law enforcement powers in its
jurisdiction.
(6) "Classroom instruction" means instruction that takes place in
a setting where individuals receiving training are assembled together
and learn through lectures, study papers, class discussion, textbook
study, or other means of organized formal education techniques, such as
video, closed circuit, or other forms of electronic means, and as
distinguished from on-the-job education or training.
(7) "Commission" means the criminal justice training commission
established in chapter 43.101 RCW.
(8) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(9) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.
(10) "Employer" includes any individual, firm, corporation,
partnership, association, company, society, manager, contractor,
subcontractor, bureau, agency, service, office, or an agent of any of
the foregoing that employs or seeks to enter into an arrangement to
employ any person as a private security guard.
(11) "Firearms certificate" means the certificate issued by the
commission.
(12) "Licensee" means a person granted a license required by this
chapter.
(13) "Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation,
partnership, association, company, society, manager, contractor,
subcontractor, bureau, agency, service, office, or an agent or employee
of any of the foregoing.
(14) "Postassignment or on-the-job training" means training that
occurs in either an assisted field environment or in a classroom
instruction setting, or both.
(15) "Preassignment training" means the classroom training
completed prior to being assigned to work independently.
(16) "Primary responsibility" means activity that is fundamental
to, and required or expected in, the regular course of employment and
is not merely incidental to employment.
(17) "Principal corporate officer" means the president, vice-president, treasurer, secretary, comptroller, or any other person who
performs the same functions for the corporation as performed by these
officers.
(((17))) (18) "Private security company" means a person or entity
licensed under this chapter and engaged in the business of providing
the services of private security guards on a contractual basis.
(((18))) (19) "Private security guard" means an individual who is
licensed under this chapter and principally employed as or typically
referred to as one of the following:
(a) Security officer or guard;
(b) Patrol or merchant patrol service officer or guard;
(c) Armed escort or bodyguard;
(d) Armored vehicle guard;
(e) Burglar alarm response runner; or
(f) Crowd control officer or guard.
(((19))) (20) "Qualifying agent" means an officer or manager of a
corporation who meets the requirements set forth in this chapter for
obtaining a license to own or operate a private security company.
(((20))) (21) "Sworn peace officer" means a person who is an
employee of the federal government, the state, a political subdivision,
agency, or department branch of a municipality, or other unit of local
government, and has law enforcement powers.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.170.020 and 2006 c 173 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The requirements of this chapter do not apply to:
(1) A person who is employed exclusively or regularly by one
employer and performs the functions of a private security guard solely
in connection with the affairs of that employer, if the employer is not
a private security company;
(2) A sworn peace officer while engaged in the performance of the
officer's official duties;
(3) A sworn peace officer while employed by any person to engage in
off-duty employment as a private security guard, but only if the
employment is approved by the chief law enforcement officer of the
jurisdiction where the employment takes place and the sworn peace
officer does not employ, contract with, or broker for profit other
persons to assist him or her in performing the duties related to his or
her private employer; or
(4) ((Guest services or crowd management employees who do not
perform the duties of a private security guard.)) A person performing
crowd management or guest services including, but not limited to, a
person described as a ticket taker, usher, door attendant, parking
attendant, crowd monitor, or event staff who:
(a) Does not carry a firearm or other dangerous weapon including,
but not limited to, a stun gun, taser, pepper mace, or nightstick;
(b) Does not wear a uniform or clothing readily identifiable by a
member of the public as that worn by a private security officer or law
enforcement officer; and
(c) Does not have as his or her primary responsibility the
detainment of persons or placement of persons under arrest.
The exemption provided in this subsection applies only when a crowd
has assembled for the purpose of attending or taking part in an
organized event, including preevent assembly, event operation hours,
and postevent departure activities.

--- END ---