BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
address the ongoing challenges posed by the current ad valorem method
of taxing moist snuff. Since 1996, the department of revenue, as
administrator of the tax, has been in disputes with taxpayers on the
measure of the tax on moist snuff. In 2005, the legislature sought to
solve the problem through tightening language regarding transfers to
affiliates. Current activity in the marketplace indicates that the
2005 legislation, while advancing the issue, did not altogether solve
the problem. Furthermore, the recent settlement between the department
of revenue and a major manufacturer of moist snuff points to the need
for a lasting resolution. The legislature finds that reforming how
this product is taxed will provide more certainty to taxpayers, provide
stability to the revenue stream, maintain pricing levels to address
access to youth, and simplify administration by the department of
revenue. It is the intent of the legislature that any new money
attributable to this act shall be dedicated to the health services
account, while keeping other accounts whole.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.26.010 and 2005 c 180 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Tobacco products" means cigars, cheroots, stogies, periques,
granulated, plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed, and other smoking
tobacco, snuff, snuff flour, cavendish, plug and twist tobacco, fine-cut and other chewing tobaccos, shorts, refuse scraps, clippings,
cuttings and sweepings of tobacco, and other kinds and forms of
tobacco, prepared in such manner as to be suitable for chewing or
smoking in a pipe or otherwise, or both for chewing and smoking, but
shall not include cigarettes as defined in RCW 82.24.010.
(2) "Manufacturer" means a person who manufactures and sells
tobacco products.
(3) "Distributor" means (a) any person engaged in the business of
selling tobacco products in this state who brings, or causes to be
brought, into this state from without the state any tobacco products
for sale, (b) any person who makes, manufactures, fabricates, or stores
tobacco products in this state for sale in this state, (c) any person
engaged in the business of selling tobacco products without this state
who ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this state, to
be sold by those retailers, (d) any person engaged in the business of
selling tobacco products in this state who handles for sale any tobacco
products that are within this state but upon which tax has not been
imposed.
(4) "Retailer" means any person engaged in the business of selling
tobacco products to ultimate consumers.
(5)(a) "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, or barter, in any
manner or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration, and includes
and means all sales made by any person.
(b) The term "sale" includes a gift by a person engaged in the
business of selling tobacco products, for advertising, promoting, or as
a means of evading the provisions of this chapter.
(6) "Business" means any trade, occupation, activity, or enterprise
engaged in for the purpose of selling or distributing tobacco products
in this state.
(7) "Place of business" means any place where tobacco products are
sold or where tobacco products are manufactured, stored, or kept for
the purpose of sale, including any vessel, vehicle, airplane, train, or
vending machine.
(8) "Retail outlet" means each place of business from which tobacco
products are sold to consumers.
(9) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(10) "Person" means any individual, receiver, administrator,
executor, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm,
copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint stock company,
business trust, municipal corporation, the state and its departments
and institutions, political subdivision of the state of Washington,
corporation, limited liability company, association, society, any group
of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual, cooperative,
fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise. The term excludes any person
immune from state taxation, including the United States or its
instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes and enrolled
tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.
(11) "Indian country" means the same as defined in chapter 82.24
RCW.
(12) "Actual price" means the total amount of consideration for
which tobacco products are sold, valued in money, whether received in
money or otherwise, including any charges by the seller necessary to
complete the sale such as charges for delivery, freight,
transportation, or handling.
(13) "Affiliated" means related in any way by virtue of any form or
amount of common ownership, control, operation, or management.
(14) "Board" means the liquor control board.
(15) "Cigar" means a roll for smoking that is of any size or shape
and that is made wholly or in part of tobacco, irrespective of whether
the tobacco is pure or flavored, adulterated or mixed with any other
ingredient, if the roll has a wrapper made wholly or in greater part of
tobacco. "Cigar" does not include a cigarette.
(16) "Cigarette" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.24.010.
(17) "Manufacturer's representative" means a person hired by a
manufacturer to sell or distribute the manufacturer's tobacco products,
and includes employees and independent contractors.
(18)(a) "Taxable sales price" means:
(i) In the case of a taxpayer that is not affiliated with the
manufacturer, distributor, or other person from whom the taxpayer
purchased tobacco products, the actual price for which the taxpayer
purchased the tobacco products;
(ii) In the case of a taxpayer that purchases tobacco products from
an affiliated manufacturer, affiliated distributor, or other affiliated
person, and that sells those tobacco products to unaffiliated
distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate consumers, the actual
price for which that taxpayer sells those tobacco products to
unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate
consumers;
(iii) In the case of a taxpayer that sells tobacco products only to
affiliated distributors or affiliated retailers, the price, determined
as nearly as possible according to the actual price, that other
distributors sell similar tobacco products of like quality and
character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or
ultimate consumers;
(iv) In the case of a taxpayer that is a manufacturer selling
tobacco products directly to ultimate consumers, the actual price for
which the taxpayer sells those tobacco products to ultimate consumers;
(v) In the case of a taxpayer that has acquired tobacco products
under a sale as defined in subsection (5)(b) of this section, the
price, determined as nearly as possible according to the actual price,
that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same tobacco products
or similar tobacco products of like quality and character to
unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate
consumers; or
(vi) In any case where (a)(i) through (v) of this subsection do not
apply, the price, determined as nearly as possible according to the
actual price, that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same
tobacco products or similar tobacco products of like quality and
character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or
ultimate consumers.
(b) For purposes of (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection only,
"person" includes both persons as defined in subsection (10) of this
section and any person immune from state taxation, including the United
States or its instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes
and enrolled tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.
(c) The department may adopt rules regarding the determination of
taxable sales price under this subsection.
(19) "Taxpayer" means a person liable for the tax imposed by this
chapter.
(20) "Unaffiliated distributor" means a distributor that is not
affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from
whom the distributor has purchased tobacco products.
(21) "Unaffiliated retailer" means a retailer that is not
affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from
whom the retailer has purchased tobacco products.
(22) "Moist snuff" means any finely cut, ground, or powdered
tobacco that is not intended to be smoked but does not include any
finely cut, ground, or powdered tobacco that is intended to be placed
in the nasal cavity.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.26.020 and 2005 c 180 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected a tax upon the
sale, handling, or distribution of all tobacco products in this state
at the following rate:
(a) Seventy-five percent of the taxable sales price of cigars, not
to exceed fifty cents per cigar; ((or))
(b) One dollar and eighty-eight cents per ounce of moist snuff with
a proportionate tax at the like rate on all fractional parts of an
ounce thereof, provided that cans or packages of moist snuff with a net
weight of less than one and two-tenths ounces shall be taxed at the
equivalent rate of packages or cans weighing one and two-tenths ounces.
Such tax on moist snuff shall be computed based on the net weight as
listed by the manufacturer; or
(c) Seventy-five percent of the taxable sales price of all tobacco
products that are not cigars or moist snuff.
(2) Taxes under this section shall be imposed at the time the
distributor (a) brings, or causes to be brought, into this state from
without the state tobacco products for sale, (b) makes, manufactures,
fabricates, or stores tobacco products in this state for sale in this
state, (c) ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this
state, to be sold by those retailers, or (d) handles for sale any
tobacco products that are within this state but upon which tax has not
been imposed.
(3) The moneys collected under this section shall be deposited as
follows:
(a) ((Thirty-seven)) Twenty-eight percent in the general fund;
(b) ((Fifty)) Sixty-two percent in the health services account
created under RCW 43.72.900; and
(c) ((Thirteen)) Ten percent in the water quality account under RCW
70.146.030 for the period beginning July 1, 2005, through June 30,
2021, and in the general fund for the period beginning July 1, 2021.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.26.030 and 2005 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent and purpose of this chapter to levy a tax on all
tobacco products sold, used, consumed, handled, or distributed within
this state and to collect the tax from the distributor as defined in
RCW 82.26.010. It is the further intent and purpose of this chapter to
impose the tax once, and only once, on all tobacco products for sale in
this state, but nothing in this chapter shall be construed to exempt
any person taxable under any other law or under any other tax imposed
under Title 82 RCW. It is the further intent and purpose of this
chapter that the distributor who first possesses the tobacco product in
this state shall be the distributor liable for the tax and that (1) for
moist snuff the tax will be based on the net weight as listed by the
manufacturer and (2) in most other instances the tax will be based on
the actual price that the distributor paid for the tobacco product,
unless the distributor is affiliated with the seller.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.26 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature recognizes that the trade and commerce in tobacco
products continues to evolve, and thus the tax administration issues
likewise will by necessity evolve. The legislature directs the
department of revenue to work with manufacturers and wholesalers to
continue to improve the tax assessment and collection methods in regard
to other tobacco products, including consideration of product
identification. The department shall periodically advise the
legislature on the state of tax administration under this chapter.

--- END ---