BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 1" to read as follows:
Members who have not made an irrevocable election as provided by
RCW 41.40.191 may earn an additional benefit of two percent of their
average final compensation for each service credit year of membership
service in excess of thirty years earned after July 1, 2007, to a
maximum of ten percent in excess of that provided in RCW 41.40.185.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 1" to read as follows:
Members who have not made an irrevocable election as provided by
RCW 41.32.4986 may earn an additional benefit of two percent of their
average final compensation for each year of creditable service in
excess of thirty years earned after July 1, 2007, to a maximum of ten
percent in excess of that provided in RCW 41.32.498.

--- END ---