BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Research has shown that early, intensive interventions can
significantly improve reading, written language, and mathematics skills
for children who are struggling academically. This early research-based assistance has been successful in reducing the number of children
who require specialized programs. Research further suggests that the
disabilities of many students with mild and moderate disabilities are
correctable through strategic early intervention and the students do
not necessitate special education eligibility. However, by being
effective in reducing the number of students eligible for these
programs, school district funding is reduced.
(b) The purpose of the program in this section is to continue
support to the existing pilot districts and to encourage other school
districts to participate as pilot districts to improve the
implementation of high quality general education research-based core
instructional programs to meet the needs of students struggling
academically, while reducing the number of students inappropriately
referred and placed in special education under the specific learning
disability eligibility category because of ineffective instructional
practices. This will allow special education programs to concentrate
specially designed instruction on students who truly require special
education services. The goal of this assistance is to effectively
address reading, written language, and mathematics difficulties
resulting in a substantially greater proportion of students meeting the
progressively increasing performance standards for both the aggregate
and disaggregated subgroups under federal law.
(c) The participating pilot districts implementing the special
services pilot program have met the goals of the pilot program
resulting in (i) a substantial number of underachieving students
meeting the progressively increasing reading performance standards and
(ii) a reduction in the number of children who require special
education.
(2) Seven school districts may participate in the special services
pilot program, including two school districts already participating and
five additional school districts. The special services pilot program
shall begin in the 2007-08 school year and conclude in the 2010-11
school year.
(3) School districts participating in the pilot program shall
receive state special education funding in accordance with state
special education funding formulas and a separate pilot program
appropriation from sources other than special education funds. The
separate appropriation shall be calculated as provided in this
subsection.
(a) The school district's estimated state special education funding
for the current year based on the school district's average percentage
of students age three through twenty-one who were eligible for special
education services for the school year before participation as a pilot
program as reported to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Minus the school district's actual state special education
funding based on the district's current percentage of students age
three through twenty-one eligible for special education services as
reported to the superintendent of public instruction.
(c) The superintendent shall adjust the factors in (a) of this
subsection for one or more participating school districts, where
legislative changes to the special education funding formula impact the
funding mechanism of this program.
(4) Participation in the pilot program shall not increase or
decrease a district's ability to access the safety net for high-cost
students by virtue of the district's participation in the program.
Districts participating in the pilot program shall have access to the
special education safety net using a modified application approach for
the office of the superintendent of public instruction demonstration of
financial need. The superintendent shall create a modified application
to include all special education revenues received by the district, all
pilot program funding, expenditures for students with individual
education programs, and expenditures for students generating pilot
program revenue. Districts participating in the pilot program that
seek safety net funding shall convincingly demonstrate to the committee
that any change in demonstrated need is not attributable to their
participation in this pilot program.
(5) School districts participating in the program must agree to:
(a) Implement the program as part of the school districts' general
education curriculum for all students;
(b) Use a multitiered service delivery system to provide scientific
research-based instructional interventions addressing individual
student needs in the areas of reading, written language, or
mathematics;
(c) Develop and implement an assessment system to conduct universal
screening, progress monitoring, targeted assessments, and outcome
assessments to identify the reading, written language, or mathematics
needs of each student and to monitor student progress;
(d) Incorporate student-specific data obtained through the pilot
program when conducting an evaluation to determine if the student has
a disability;
(e) Assure that parents are informed of: The amount and nature of
student performance data that is collected and the general education
services that are provided; the strategies for increasing the student's
rate of learning; the parents' right to make a referral for special
education evaluation if they suspect the student has a disability; and
the parents' right to have input into designed interventions;
(f) Assure that parents are provided assessments of achievement at
reasonable intervals addressing student progress during instruction;
(g) Actively engage parents as partners in the learning process;
(h) Comply with state special education requirements; and
(i) Participate and provide staff expertise in the design and
implementation of an evaluation of the program as determined by the
superintendent of public instruction. Districts shall annually review
and report progress, including objective measures or indicators that
show the progress towards achieving the purpose and goal of the
program, to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(6) By December 15, 2010, the superintendent of public instruction
shall submit a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature that summarizes the effectiveness of the pilot program in
this section. The report shall also include a recommendation as to
whether or not the pilot program should be continued, expanded, or
otherwise modified.
(7) This section expires June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---