BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Commercial account" means a relationship between a recycler or
scrap metal processor and a commercial enterprise that is ongoing and
properly documented under section 3 of this act.
(2) "Commercial enterprise" means a corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, association, state agency, political
subdivision of the state, public corporation, or any other legal or
commercial entity that has a current business license.
(3) "Commercial metal property" means: Utility access covers;
street light poles and fixtures; road and bridge guardrails; highway or
street signs; water meter covers; traffic directional and control
signs; traffic light signals; any metal property marked with the name
of a commercial enterprise, including but not limited to a telephone,
cable, electric, water, natural gas, or other utility, or railroad;
unused or undamaged building construction materials consisting of
copper pipe, tubing, or insulated or noninsulated wiring, or aluminum
wire, siding, downspouts, gutters, or fence materials; aluminum
decking; aluminum bleachers; historical markers; statue plaques; grave
markers and funeral vases; agricultural implements, including
irrigation wheels, sprinkler heads and pipes; or electrical conductors.
(4) "Metal property" means any item that contains metal for which
the value of the metal content of the item exceeds the commercial value
of the item itself, or which has reached the end of its useful life but
still has residual value due to its metal content. "Metal property"
does not include precious metals.
(5) "Nonferrous metal property" is metal property for which the
value of the metal property is derived from the property's content of
copper, brass, aluminum, bronze, lead, zinc, or nickel, and their
alloys, and includes electronic scrap.
(6) "Precious metals" means gold, silver, and platinum.
(7) "Record" means a paper, electronic, or other method of storing
information.
(8) "Recycler" means a person with a current business license
engaged in the business of purchasing or receiving metal property for
the purpose of aggregation and sale to a scrap metal processor or
another recycler, and maintains a fixed place of business within the
state.
(9) "Scrap metal processor" means a person with a current business
license that conducts business from a permanent location and that is
engaged in the business of purchasing or receiving metal property for
the purpose of sorting or upgrading the metal in preparation for its
use as feedstock in the manufacture of new products.
(10) "Transaction" means the purchase of any item of metal property
by a recycler or scrap metal processor from a member of the general
public. "Transaction" does not include the purchase or receipt of
metal property by a recycler or scrap metal processor from a commercial
enterprise, from another recycler or scrap metal processor, or from a
duly authorized employee or agent of the commercial enterprise,
recycler, or scrap metal processor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RECORDS REQUIRED FOR PURCHASING METAL
PROPERTY FROM THE GENERAL PUBLIC. At the time of a transaction
involving nonferrous metal property, every recycler and scrap metal
processor doing business in this state shall produce wherever that
business is conducted an accurate and legible record of each
transaction involving metal property. This record must be written in
the English language and contain the following information:
(1) The signature of the person with whom the transaction is made;
(2) The time, date, location, and value of the transaction;
(3) The name of the employee representing the recycler or scrap
metal processor in the transaction;
(4) The name, street address, and telephone number of the person
with whom the transaction is made;
(5) The current driver's license number or other government-issued
picture identification card number of the seller;
(6) A copy of the seller's government-issued picture identification
card;
(7) A description of the motor vehicle used to deliver the metal
property subject to the transaction; and
(8) A description of the predominant types of metal property
subject to the transaction, including the property's weight, quantity,
or volume.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 REQUIREMENTS FOR PURCHASING OR RECEIVING
METAL PROPERTY FROM THE GENERAL PUBLIC. (1) No recycler or scrap metal
processor may enter into a transaction to purchase or receive metal
property from any person who cannot produce at least one piece of
current government-issued picture identification, including a valid
driver's license or identification card issued by any state.
(2) No recycler may purchase or receive commercial metal property.
A scrap metal processor may purchase or receive commercial metal
property if the seller: (a) Has a commercial account with the scrap
metal processor; (b) can prove ownership of the property by producing
written documentation that the seller is the owner of the property; (c)
signs a receipt provided by the scrap metal processor stating that they
have the legal right to sell the metal property; or (d) can produce
written documentation that the seller is an employee or agent
authorized to sell the property on behalf of a commercial enterprise.
(3) No recycler or scrap metal processor may offer cash payment in
exchange for metal property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RECORD FOR COMMERCIAL ACCOUNTS. (1) Every
recycler and scrap metal processor must create and maintain a permanent
record with a commercial enterprise, including another recycler or
scrap metal processor, in order to establish a commercial account.
That record, at a minimum, must include the following information:
(a) The full name of the commercial enterprise or commercial
account;
(b) The business address and telephone number of the commercial
enterprise or commercial account; and
(c) The full name of the person employed by the commercial
enterprise who is authorized to deliver metal property and commercial
metal property to the recycler or scrap metal processor.
(2) The record maintained by a recycler and scrap metal processor
for a commercial account must document every purchase or receipt of
metal property and commercial metal property from the commercial
enterprise. The documentation must include, at a minimum, the
following information:
(a) The time, date, and value of the property being purchased or
received;
(b) A description of the predominant types of metal property being
purchased or received; and
(c) The signature of the person delivering the metal property to
the recycler or scrap metal processor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 REPORTING TO LAW ENFORCEMENT. (1) If in the
course of an investigation of metal theft by state or local law
enforcement, a recycler or scrap metal processor is requested by a
commissioned law enforcement officer to provide information relating to
an investigation of metal theft, the recycler or scrap metal processor
shall provide any pertinent records relating to the investigation
subject. Failure to produce the requested information in a reasonable
time as determined by the requesting law enforcement agency, but not
less than two business days from receipt of a written request, shall
subject the recycler or scrap metal processor to a fine of up to one
hundred dollars per day.
(2) If the records produced by the recycler or scrap metal
processor are incomplete, illegible, or otherwise in violation of the
requirements in section 2 of this act, a commissioned law enforcement
officer may demand the disclosure of all records for the preceding
ninety days. A fine of one hundred dollars per transaction shall apply
to all transactions for which the records required under section 2 of
this act are materially missing, incomplete, or illegible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 PRESERVING EVIDENCE OF METAL THEFT. (1)
Following notification, either verbally or in writing, from a
commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its
political subdivisions that an item of metal property or commercial
metal property has been reported as stolen, a recycler and scrap metal
processor shall hold that property intact and safe from alteration,
damage, or commingling, and shall place an identifying tag or other
suitable identification upon the property. The recycler and scrap
metal processor shall hold the property for a period of time as
directed by the applicable law enforcement agency up to a maximum of
ten business days.
(2) A commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of
its political subdivisions shall not place on hold any item of metal
property or commercial metal property unless that law enforcement
agency reasonably suspects that the property is a lost or stolen item.
Any hold that is placed on the property must be removed within ten
business days after the property on hold is determined not to be stolen
or lost and the property must be returned to the owner or released.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 UNLAWFUL VIOLATIONS. It is a gross
misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW for:
(1) Any person to remove, alter, or obliterate any manufacturer's
make, model, or serial number, personal identification number, or
identifying marks engraved or etched upon an item of nonferrous metal
property or commercial metal property;
(2) Any recycler or scrap metal processor to purchase or receive
any nonferrous metal property or commercial metal property where the
manufacturer's make, model, or serial number, personal identification
number, or identifying marks engraved or etched upon the property have
been removed, altered, or obliterated;
(3) Any person to knowingly make, cause, or allow to be made any
false entry or misstatement of any material matter in any book, record,
or writing required to be kept under this chapter; or
(4) Any recycler or scrap metal processor to possess commercial
metal property that was not lawfully purchased or received under the
requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 EXEMPTIONS. The provisions of this chapter
do not apply to transactions conducted by the following:
(1) Motor vehicle dealers licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW;
(2) Vehicle wreckers or hulk haulers licensed under chapter 46.79
or 46.80 RCW;
(3) Persons in the business of operating an automotive repair
facility as defined under RCW 46.71.011; and
(4) Persons in the business of buying or selling empty food and
beverage containers, including metal food and beverage containers, or
nonmetal junk.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
ELECTRICAL UTILITIES. The commission shall require an electrical
company regulated under this chapter to mark critical infrastructure
with identifying markings that are not obvious to inspection by the
human eye without magnification or other assistance and to take
adequate measures to secure sensitive components of the company's
generating and transmission facilities. If marked equipment is stolen,
the electrical company shall report the theft to the appropriate law
enforcement authority along with information necessary to identify the
markings required under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RCW 9.91.110 (Metal buyers -- Records of
purchases -- Penalty) and 1971 ex.s. c 302 s 18 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---