BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As soon as practicable after the effective date of this act,
and after consulting with the city of Seattle, the department shall
hire a mediator, and appropriate planning staff, including urban,
transportation, and neighborhood planners, to assist the department in
developing a state route number 520 expansion impact plan for
addressing the impacts of the state route number 520 bridge replacement
and HOV project on Seattle neighborhoods, parks, and institutions of
higher education, and the city of Seattle. The mediator must have
significant professional experience in working with impacted
communities that surround major transportation construction projects,
mitigating the construction impacts on those communities. In
evaluating the project impacts, the mediator shall consider the
concerns of neighborhoods and institutions of higher education directly
impacted by the proposed designs, and shall work with the appropriate
planning staff. The mediator shall work to ensure that the plan
provides a comprehensive approach to mitigating the impacts of the
project. The department shall hire the mediator and the planning staff
within existing appropriations allocated for the state route number 520
bridge replacement and HOV project. The position of mediator under
this section is not considered a certified or legally binding position.
(2) The state route number 520 expansion impact plan must be
submitted to the commission, which shall oversee the development of the
plan. The commission shall approve the plan sixty days before the
propositions required under RCW 36.120.070(2) and 81.112.030(10) are
submitted to regional voters at the 2007 general election, or before
the beginning of the 2008 regular legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---