BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.01 RCW
to read as follows:
A city attorney, county prosecutor, or other prosecuting authority
may not dismiss, amend, or agree not to file a criminal charge in
exchange for a contribution, donation, or payment to any person,
corporation, or organization. This does not prohibit:
(1) Contribution, donation, or payment to any specific fund
authorized by state statute;
(2) The collection of costs associated with actual supervision,
treatment, or collection of restitution under agreements to defer or
divert; or
(3) Dismissal following payment that is authorized by any other
statute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.63 RCW
to read as follows:
A city attorney, county prosecutor, or other prosecuting authority
may not dismiss, amend, or agree not to file an infraction in exchange
for a contribution, donation, or payment to any person, corporation, or
organization. This does not prohibit:
(1) Contribution, donation, or payment to any specific fund
authorized by state statute;
(2) The collection of costs associated with actual supervision,
treatment, or collection of restitution under agreements to defer or
divert; or
(3) Dismissal following payment that is authorized by any other
statute.

--- END ---