BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to establish a
state-sanctioned web site that shall serve as a more efficient, single
repository for the posting on the internet, by any person or entity
choosing to do so, of any public notice that is legally required by law
or rule of the state or any of its political subdivisions, which
posting shall serve as an alternative and/or as a supplement to such
other public legal notice. The legislature intends that the
state-sanctioned web site shall serve the public interest by furthering
the public policy underlying the public notice requirements generally:
To make noticed information as widely available to the public as
possible. The state-sanctioned web site shall exist to serve the
public interest consistent with the aim of providing fairness and
equality of access to public information for all persons, including
persons with disabilities, persons who are elderly or indigent, and
other persons not having reasonable access to the courthouse forum or
other traditional notice publication forums. The state-sanctioned web
site shall exist to serve the public interest by increasing the
efficiency of courthouse personnel and courthouse safety by reducing
paperwork and by significantly reducing the foot traffic through the
courthouses of the state. The state-sanctioned web site shall serve
the public interest by creating greater security and integrity for
notices heretofore posted solely at "the courthouse door." The state-sanctioned web site shall exist to serve the public interest by
lowering the cost of publishing by traditional forms of notice. The
state-sanctioned web site shall serve the public interest by providing
a ready means of transition from traditional print publications to
electronic media as the public and its institutions evolve rapidly to
increased use of internet communication. The state-sanctioned web site
shall serve the public interest by making the public information
thereon more widely available geographically by providing state-wide,
national, and international access to notice postings. The
state-sanctioned web site shall serve the public interest by making the
information thereon more publicly accessible in that it shall have no
limitation time-wise or date-wise to access and posting. The
state-sanctioned web site shall serve the public interest by
establishing its own infrastructure and providing its services,
maintenance, and backup to the state free of charge and without the
expenditure of taxpayer revenues. The state-sanctioned web site shall
serve the public interest by remitting a portion of its reasonable fees
to the state as revenue, thereby decreasing the burden on taxpayers.
The state-sanctioned web site shall serve the public interest by
creating a forum in which the information posted thereon shall be
incorruptible in form for an indefinite period of time into the future.
The state-sanctioned web site shall serve the public interest by
providing important services which do not at present exist with regard
to public notice: Freely accessible archiving of the notices which may
be searched without limitation by the public and the ability to search
for information contained within a public notice which is not now
possible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
There is hereby established a state-recognized web site which shall
be known as the legal notice repository. The company selected to
operate the web site and disseminate information by and through the
state's web site shall maintain the state's interest in the domain and
the use of the web site, at no cost to the public to access the web
site and the information available there. The company shall maintain
and operate the official state web site twenty-four hours per day,
seven days per week, each day of the year.

--- END ---