BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) It is the intent of the legislature to
create a pilot program to provide assistance for jurisdictions
enforcing financial fraud and identity theft laws.
(2) Three pilot enforcement areas shall be established beginning on
January 1, 2008, two in the two largest counties by population west of
the crest of the Cascade mountains, and one in the largest county by
population east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.
(3) Funding received for the purposes of this section through
appropriations, gifts, and grants shall be divided equally between the
three pilot enforcement areas. This funding is intended to provide for
additional deputy prosecutors, law enforcement, clerical staff, and
other support for the prosecution of financial fraud and identity theft
crimes. County prosecutors are encouraged to utilize and share
resources that operate in the region through the use of interlocal
agreements. The funding appropriated for this purpose must not be used
to supplant existing funding and cannot be used for any purpose other
than the enforcement of financial fraud and identity theft laws.
Appropriated state funds must be used to match gifts and grants of
private sector funds for the purposes of this section, and expenditure
of appropriated state funds may not exceed expenditure of private
funds.
(4) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall appoint a task force in each county with a pilot enforcement
area. Each task force shall include the following members:
(a) Two members from financial institutions;
(b) One member of the Washington association of county prosecutors;
(c) One member of the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs;
(d) One member of the Washington state association of municipal
attorneys; and
(e) One law enforcement officer.
(5) The task force in each county shall provide advice and
expertise in order to facilitate the prosecutor's efforts to prosecute
and reduce the incidence of financial fraud and identity theft crimes.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "financial fraud and identity
theft crimes" include those that involve: Check fraud, chronic
unlawful issuance of bank checks, embezzlement, credit/debit card
fraud, identity theft, forgery, counterfeit instruments (checks,
documents, etc.), organized counterfeit check rings, and organized ID
theft rings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of one million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2008, from the general fund to the department of community,
trade, and economic development to be used as matching funds for the
purposes of section 1 of this act.

--- END ---