BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 2.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A judge of a superior court, upon a proper oath or affirmation
showing probable cause, shall have the power to issue a civil
inspection warrant directed to a state or local official commanding the
official to conduct an inspection, examination, test, or sampling
pursuant to or to determine compliance with a state or local law, rule,
or code protecting the public health, safety, or welfare including, but
not limited to, the uniform building, health, fire, mechanical,
electrical, or plumbing code, laws authorizing abatement of unfit or
dangerous buildings, or environmental or zoning laws.
(2) A warrant shall be issued only upon application of a designated
officer or employee of a prosecuting or regulatory authority supported
by declaration or affidavit made under oath or upon sworn testimony
before the judge, establishing probable cause for the issuance of the
warrant, and particularly describing the place, dwelling, building,
structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected and the purpose for
which the inspection, examination, test, or sampling is made. For
purposes of this section, probable cause exists if either:
(a) The inspection, examination, test, or sampling is pursuant to
reasonable legislative or administrative standards for conducting an
area-wide inspection to determine compliance with a state or local law
or rule; or
(b) There is reasonable cause to believe that a violation of a
state or local building, health, safety, fire, plumbing, electrical,
environmental, labor, or zoning law or rule, or other laws or rules
protecting the public health, safety, or welfare, has occurred or is
occurring in or upon the particular place, dwelling, building,
structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected.
(3) If the judge is satisfied that the standard for issuing a
warrant has been met, the judge shall issue the warrant. The warrant
must particularly describe the place, dwelling, building, structure,
premises, or vehicle to be inspected and designate the purpose of the
inspection, including any books, records, or other property that may be
inspected, examined, or seized, and any tests or samples that may be
conducted or taken.
(4) A warrant issued pursuant to this section must be executed and
returned within ten days unless, upon a showing of a need for
additional time, the period is extended or renewed upon by a judge upon
a finding that such extension or renewal is in the public's interest.
A copy of the warrant and a receipt for any property seized pursuant to
the warrant shall be given to the person whose property is inspected
or, if the person is not at the property, the copy shall be left in or
on the property that was inspected or from which the property was
taken. The return of the warrant shall be promptly made accompanied by
a written inventory of any property taken.
(5) A copy of the return shall be attached to the warrant and filed
with the clerk of the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 3.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A judge of a court of limited jurisdiction, upon a proper oath
or affirmation showing probable cause, shall have the power to issue a
civil inspection warrant directed to a state or local official
commanding the official to conduct an inspection, examination, test, or
sampling pursuant to or to determine compliance with a state or local
law, rule, or code protecting the public health, safety, or welfare
including, but not limited to, the uniform building, health, fire,
mechanical, electrical, or plumbing code, laws authorizing abatement of
unfit or dangerous buildings, or environmental or zoning laws.
(2) A warrant shall be issued only upon application of a designated
officer or employee of a prosecuting or regulatory authority supported
by declaration or affidavit made under oath or upon sworn testimony
before the judge, establishing probable cause for the issuance of the
warrant, and particularly describing the place, dwelling, building,
structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected and the purpose for
which the inspection, examination, test, or sampling is made. For
purposes of this section, probable cause exists if either:
(a) The inspection, examination, test, or sampling is pursuant to
a general administrative plan to determine compliance with a state or
local law or rule; or
(b) There is reasonable cause to believe that a violation of a
state or local building, health, safety, fire, plumbing, electrical,
environmental, labor, or zoning law or rule, or other laws or rules
protecting the public health, safety, or welfare, has occurred or is
occurring in or upon the particular place, dwelling, building,
structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected.
(3) If the judge is satisfied that the standard for issuing a
warrant has been met, the judge shall issue the warrant. The warrant
must particularly describe the place, dwelling, building, structure,
premises, or vehicle to be inspected and designate the purpose of the
inspection, including any books, records, or other property that may be
inspected, examined, or seized, and any tests or samples that may be
conducted or taken.
(4) A warrant issued pursuant to this section must be executed and
returned within ten days unless, upon a showing of a need for
additional time, the period is extended or renewed upon by a judge upon
a finding that such extension or renewal is in the public's interest.
A copy of the warrant and a receipt for any property seized pursuant to
the warrant shall be given to the person whose property is inspected
or, if the person is not at the property, the copy shall be left in or
on the property that was inspected or from which the property was
taken. The return of the warrant shall be promptly made accompanied by
a written inventory of any property taken.
(5) A copy of the return shall be attached to the warrant and filed
with the clerk of the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 3.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A judge of a municipal department, upon a proper oath or
affirmation showing probable cause, shall have the power to issue a
civil inspection warrant directed to a state or local official
commanding the official to conduct an inspection, examination, test, or
sampling pursuant to or to determine compliance with a state or local
law, rule, or code protecting the public health, safety, or welfare
including, but not limited to, the uniform building, health, fire,
mechanical, electrical, or plumbing code, laws authorizing abatement of
unfit or dangerous buildings, or environmental or zoning laws.
(2) A warrant shall be issued only upon application of a designated
officer or employee of a prosecuting or regulatory authority supported
by declaration or affidavit made under oath or upon sworn testimony
before the judge, establishing probable cause for the issuance of the
warrant, and particularly describing the place, dwelling, building,
structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected and the purpose for
which the inspection, examination, test, or sampling is made. For
purposes of this section, probable cause exists if either:
(a) The inspection, examination, test, or sampling is pursuant to
a general administrative plan to determine compliance with a state or
local law or rule; or
(b) There is reasonable cause to believe that a violation of a
state or local building, health, safety, fire, plumbing, electrical,
environmental, labor, or zoning law or rule, or other laws or rules
protecting the public health, safety, or welfare, has occurred or is
occurring in or upon the particular place, dwelling, building,
structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected.
(3) If the judge is satisfied that the standard for issuing a
warrant has been met, the judge shall issue the warrant. The warrant
must particularly describe the place, dwelling, building, structure,
premises, or vehicle to be inspected and designate the purpose of the
inspection, including any books, records, or other property that may be
inspected, examined, or seized, and any tests or samples that may be
conducted or taken.
(4) A warrant issued pursuant to this section must be executed and
returned within ten days unless, upon a showing of a need for
additional time, the period is extended or renewed upon by a judge upon
a finding that such extension or renewal is in the public's interest.
A copy of the warrant and a receipt for any property seized pursuant to
the warrant shall be given to the person whose property is inspected
or, if the person is not at the property, the copy shall be left in or
on the property that was inspected or from which the property was
taken. The return of the warrant shall be promptly made accompanied by
a written inventory of any property taken.
(5) A copy of the return shall be attached to the warrant and filed
with the clerk of the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 3.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A judge of a municipal court, upon a proper oath or affirmation
showing probable cause, shall have the power to issue a civil
inspection warrant directed to a state or local official commanding the
official to conduct an inspection, examination, test, or sampling
pursuant to or to determine compliance with a state or local law, rule,
or code protecting the public health, safety, or welfare including, but
not limited to, the uniform building, health, fire, mechanical,
electrical, or plumbing code, laws authorizing abatement of unfit or
dangerous buildings, or environmental or zoning laws.
(2) A warrant shall be issued only upon application of a designated
officer or employee of a prosecuting or regulatory authority supported
by declaration or affidavit made under oath or upon sworn testimony
before the judge, establishing probable cause for the issuance of the
warrant, and particularly describing the place, dwelling, building,
structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected and the purpose for
which the inspection, examination, test, or sampling is made. For
purposes of this section, probable cause exists if either:
(a) The inspection, examination, test, or sampling is pursuant to
a general administrative plan to determine compliance with a state or
local law or rule; or
(b) There is reasonable cause to believe that a violation of a
state or local building, health, safety, fire, plumbing, electrical,
environmental, labor, or zoning law or rule, or other laws or rules
protecting the public health, safety, or welfare, has occurred or is
occurring in or upon the particular place, dwelling, building,
structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected.
(3) If the judge is satisfied that the standard for issuing a
warrant has been met, the judge shall issue the warrant. The warrant
must particularly describe the place, dwelling, building, structure,
premises, or vehicle to be inspected and designate the purpose of the
inspection, including any books, records, or other property that may be
inspected, examined, or seized, and any tests or samples that may be
conducted or taken.
(4) A warrant issued pursuant to this section must be executed and
returned within ten days unless, upon a showing of a need for
additional time, the period is extended or renewed upon by a judge upon
a finding that such extension or renewal is in the public's interest.
A copy of the warrant and a receipt for any property seized pursuant to
the warrant shall be given to the person whose property is inspected
or, if the person is not at the property, the copy shall be left in or
on the property that was inspected or from which the property was
taken. The return of the warrant shall be promptly made accompanied by
a written inventory of any property taken.
(5) A copy of the return shall be attached to the warrant and filed
with the clerk of the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 3.66 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A judge of a district court, upon a proper oath or affirmation
showing probable cause, shall have the power to issue a civil
inspection warrant directed to a state or local official commanding the
official to conduct an inspection, examination, test, or sampling
pursuant to or to determine compliance with a state or local law, rule,
or code protecting the public health, safety, or welfare including, but
not limited to, the uniform building, health, fire, mechanical,
electrical, or plumbing code, laws authorizing abatement of unfit or
dangerous buildings, or environmental or zoning laws.
(2) A warrant shall be issued only upon application of a designated
officer or employee of a prosecuting or regulatory authority supported
by declaration or affidavit made under oath or upon sworn testimony
before the judge, establishing probable cause for the issuance of the
warrant, and particularly describing the place, dwelling, building,
structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected and the purpose for
which the inspection, examination, test, or sampling is made. For
purposes of this section, probable cause exists if either:
(a) The inspection, examination, test, or sampling is pursuant to
a general administrative plan to determine compliance with a state or
local law or rule; or
(b) There is reasonable cause to believe that a violation of a
state or local building, health, safety, fire, plumbing, electrical,
environmental, labor, or zoning law or rule, or other laws or rules
protecting the public health, safety, or welfare, has occurred or is
occurring in or upon the particular place, dwelling, building,
structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected.
(3) If the judge is satisfied that the standard for issuing a
warrant has been met, the judge shall issue the warrant. The warrant
must particularly describe the place, dwelling, building, structure,
premises, or vehicle to be inspected and designate the purpose of the
inspection, including any books, records, or other property that may be
inspected, examined, or seized, and any tests or samples that may be
conducted or taken.
(4) A warrant issued pursuant to this section must be executed and
returned within ten days unless, upon a showing of a need for
additional time, the period is extended or renewed upon by a judge upon
a finding that such extension or renewal is in the public's interest.
A copy of the warrant and a receipt for any property seized pursuant to
the warrant shall be given to the person whose property is inspected
or, if the person is not at the property, the copy shall be left in or
on the property that was inspected or from which the property was
taken. The return of the warrant shall be promptly made accompanied by
a written inventory of any property taken.
(5) A copy of the return shall be attached to the warrant and filed
with the clerk of the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 35.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A judge of a municipal court, upon a proper oath or affirmation
showing probable cause, shall have the power to issue a civil
inspection warrant directed to a state or local official commanding the
official to conduct an inspection, examination, test, or sampling
pursuant to or to determine compliance with a state or local law, rule,
or code protecting the public health, safety, or welfare including, but
not limited to, the uniform building, health, fire, mechanical,
electrical, or plumbing code, laws authorizing abatement of unfit or
dangerous buildings, or environmental or zoning laws.
(2) A warrant shall be issued only upon application of a designated
officer or employee of a prosecuting or regulatory authority supported
by declaration or affidavit made under oath or upon sworn testimony
before the judge, establishing probable cause for the issuance of the
warrant, and particularly describing the place, dwelling, building,
structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected and the purpose for
which the inspection, examination, test, or sampling is made. For
purposes of this section, probable cause exists if either:
(a) The inspection, examination, test, or sampling is pursuant to
a general administrative plan to determine compliance with a state or
local law or rule; or
(b) There is reasonable cause to believe that a violation of a
state or local building, health, safety, fire, plumbing, electrical,
environmental, labor, or zoning law or rule, or other laws or rules
protecting the public health, safety, or welfare, has occurred or is
occurring in or upon the particular place, dwelling, building,
structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected.
(3) If the judge is satisfied that the standard for issuing a
warrant has been met, the judge shall issue the warrant. The warrant
must particularly describe the place, dwelling, building, structure,
premises, or vehicle to be inspected and designate the purpose of the
inspection, including any books, records, or other property that may be
inspected, examined, or seized, and any tests or samples that may be
conducted or taken.
(4) A warrant issued pursuant to this section must be executed and
returned within ten days unless, upon a showing of a need for
additional time, the period is extended or renewed upon by a judge upon
a finding that such extension or renewal is in the public's interest.
A copy of the warrant and a receipt for any property seized pursuant to
the warrant shall be given to the person whose property is inspected
or, if the person is not at the property, the copy shall be left in or
on the property that was inspected or from which the property was
taken. The return of the warrant shall be promptly made accompanied by
a written inventory of any property taken.
(5) A copy of the return shall be attached to the warrant and filed
with the clerk of the court.

--- END ---