BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The energy facility site evaluation
council shall review the status of pipeline utility corridor capacity
and distribution for natural gas, petroleum, and biofuels in the
southwest region of the state. In conducting this study, the council
shall, at a minimum, review the following:
(a) Whether pipeline utility corridor constraints exist, and if so,
to what extent;
(b) Whether there is adequate pipeline utility corridor capacity in
the state to meet existing demand; and
(c) Whether the current pipeline utility corridor system is
expected to meet projected demand growth in the southwest region of the
state.
(2) The council may also examine pipeline utility corridor capacity
and distribution in other areas of the state to the extent that it has
an impact on supply to southwest Washington.
(3) The council shall identify needed improvements in pipeline
utility corridor capacity and make preliminary recommendations on
specific projects that will meet current and future fuel delivery
needs.
(4) After making preliminary recommendations on specific, proposed
projects, the council shall investigate the feasibility of the proposed
projects and to what extent the projects would adequately meet the
pipeline utility corridor needs of the southwest region of the state.
(5) The council shall submit its findings and recommendations to
the legislature by December 1, 2007.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2008.

--- END ---