BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.655.065 and 2006 c 115 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature has made a commitment to rigorous academic
standards for receipt of a high school diploma. The primary way that
students will demonstrate that they meet the standards in reading,
writing, mathematics, and science is through the Washington assessment
of student learning. Only objective assessments that are comparable in
rigor to the state assessment are authorized as an alternative
assessment. Before seeking an alternative assessment, the legislature
expects students to make a genuine effort to meet state standards,
through retaking the Washington assessment of student learning; regular
and consistent attendance at school; and participation in extended
learning and other assistance programs.
(2) Under RCW 28A.655.061, beginning in the 2006-07 school year,
the superintendent of public instruction shall implement objective
alternative assessment methods as provided in this section for students
to demonstrate achievement of the state standards in content areas in
which the student has not yet met the standard on the high school
Washington assessment of student learning. A student may access an
alternative if the student meets applicable eligibility criteria in RCW
28A.655.061 and other eligibility criteria established by the
superintendent of public instruction, including but not limited to
attendance criteria and participation in the remediation or
supplemental instruction contained in the student learning plan
developed under RCW 28A.655.061. A school district may waive
attendance and/or remediation criteria for special, unavoidable
circumstances.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "applicant" means a student
seeking to use one of the alternative assessment methods in this
section.
(4) One alternative assessment method shall be a combination of the
applicant's grades in applicable courses and the applicant's highest
score on the high school Washington assessment of student learning, as
provided in this subsection. The superintendent of public instruction
shall determine which high school courses are applicable to the
alternative assessment method and shall issue guidelines to school
districts.
(a) Using guidelines prepared by the superintendent of public
instruction, a school district shall identify the group of students in
the same school as the applicant who took the same high school courses
as the applicant in the applicable content area. From the group of
students identified in this manner, the district shall select the
comparison cohort that shall be those students who met or slightly
exceeded the state standard on the Washington assessment of student
learning.
(b) The district shall compare the applicant's grades in high
school courses in the applicable content area to the grades of students
in the comparison cohort for the same high school courses. If the
applicant's grades are equal to or above the mean grades of the
comparison cohort, the applicant shall be deemed to have met the state
standard on the alternative assessment.
(c) An applicant may not use the alternative assessment under this
subsection (4) if there are fewer than six students in the comparison
cohort.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop an
alternative assessment method that shall be an evaluation of a
collection of work samples prepared and submitted by the applicant, as
provided in this subsection and, for career and technical applicants,
the additional requirements of subsection (6) of this section.
(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
guidelines for the types and number of work samples in each content
area that may be submitted as a collection of evidence that the
applicant has met the state standard in that content area. Work
samples may be collected from academic, career and technical, or
remedial courses and may include performance tasks as well as written
products. The superintendent shall submit the guidelines for approval
by the state board of education.
(b) The superintendent shall develop protocols for submission of
the collection of work samples that include affidavits from the
applicant's teachers and school district that the samples are the work
of the applicant and a requirement that a portion of the samples be
prepared under the direct supervision of a classroom teacher. The
superintendent shall submit the protocols for approval by the state
board of education.
(c) The superintendent shall develop uniform scoring criteria for
evaluating the collection of work samples and submit the scoring
criteria for approval by the state board of education. Collections
shall be scored at the state level or regionally by a panel of
educators selected and trained by the superintendent to ensure
objectivity, reliability, and rigor in the evaluation. An educator may
not score work samples submitted by applicants from the educator's
school district. If the panel awards an applicant's collection of work
samples the minimum required score, the applicant shall be deemed to
have met the state standard on the alternative assessment.
(d) Using an open and public process that includes consultation
with district superintendents, school principals, and other educators,
the state board of education shall consider the guidelines, protocols,
scoring criteria, and other information regarding the collection of
work samples submitted by the superintendent of public instruction.
The collection of work samples may be implemented as an alternative
assessment after the state board of education has approved the
guidelines, protocols, and scoring criteria and determined that the
collection of work samples: (i) Will meet professionally accepted
standards for a valid and reliable measure of the grade level
expectations and the essential academic learning requirements; and (ii)
is comparable to or exceeds the rigor of the skills and knowledge that
a student must demonstrate on the Washington assessment of student
learning in the applicable content area. The state board shall make an
approval decision and determination no later than December 1, 2006, and
thereafter may increase the required rigor of the collection of work
samples.
(e) By September of 2006, the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop informational materials for parents, teachers, and
students regarding the collection of work samples and the status of its
development as an alternative assessment method. The materials shall
provide specific guidance regarding the type and number of work samples
likely to be required, include examples of work that meets the state
learning standards, and describe the scoring criteria and process for
the collection. The materials shall also encourage students in the
graduating class of 2008 to begin creating a collection if they believe
they may seek to use the collection once it is implemented as an
alternative assessment.
(6)(a) For students enrolled in a career and technical education
program approved under RCW 28C.04.110, the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop additional guidelines for a collection of
work samples that evidences that the collection:
(i) Is relevant to the student's particular career and technical
program;
(ii) Focuses on the application of academic knowledge and skills
within the program;
(iii) Includes completed activities or projects where demonstration
of academic knowledge is inferred; and
(iv) Is related to the essential academic learning requirements and
state standards that students must meet to earn a certificate of
academic achievement or certificate of individual achievement, but also
represents the knowledge and skills that successful individuals in the
career and technical field of the approved program are expected to
possess.
(b) To meet the state standard on the alternative assessment under
this subsection (6), an applicant must also attain the state or
nationally recognized certificate or credential associated with the
approved career and technical program.
(c) The superintendent shall consult with community and technical
colleges, employers, the work force training and education coordinating
board, apprenticeship programs, and other regional and national experts
in career and technical education to create an appropriate collection
of work samples and other evidence of a career and technical student's
knowledge and skills on the state academic standards.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall study the
feasibility of using existing mathematics assessments in languages
other than English as an additional alternative assessment option. The
study shall include an estimation of the cost of translating the tenth
grade mathematics assessment into other languages and scoring the
assessments should they be implemented.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction shall implement:
(a) By June 1, 2006, a process for students to appeal the score
they received on the high school assessments; ((and))
(b) By January 1, 2007, guidelines and appeal processes for waiving
specific requirements in RCW 28A.655.061 pertaining to the certificate
of academic achievement and to the certificate of individual
achievement for students who: (i) Transfer to a Washington public
school in their junior or senior year with the intent of obtaining a
public high school diploma, or (ii) have special, unavoidable
circumstances; and
(c) By June 1, 2007, a process for students to appeal the score
they received on the elementary or middle school assessments.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to
implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---