BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the cost of
transporting high quality sand and gravel by truck for major public and
private construction projects, including state and local highway
projects, beach restoration, and construction of public and private
buildings, is increasing dramatically as the result of increased fuel
prices.
(2) The legislature finds that marine transportation of sand and
gravel would not only be more cost-effective than trucking such
materials, it also significantly reduces the volume of heavy truck
traffic on highways and roads that are already congested.
(3) The legislature finds that marine transportation of sand and
gravel also uses less fuel per vehicle mile than truck transportation,
thereby reducing fossil fuel consumption, which in turn improves air
quality and mitigates the impact of global warming.
(4) The legislature finds that marine transportation of sand and
gravel also provides a more reliable and cost-effective source of
material for beach restoration and enhancement in the Puget Sound.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.200 and 2002 c 68 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The comprehensive plan of each county and city that is planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall include a process for identifying and siting
essential public facilities. Essential public facilities include those
facilities that are typically difficult to site, such as airports,
state education facilities and state or regional transportation
facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, state and local correctional
facilities, solid waste handling facilities, ((and)) in-patient
facilities including substance abuse facilities, mental health
facilities, group homes, and secure community transition facilities as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, and facilities necessary for the marine
transportation of sand and gravel from mining projects located
primarily on lands designated as forest or mineral resource lands
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.060(1)(a) in counties in western Washington that
have a population of less than thirty-five thousand people.
(2) Each county and city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process, or amend its
existing process, for identifying and siting essential public
facilities and adopt or amend its development regulations as necessary
to provide for the siting of secure community transition facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(3) Any city or county not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process for siting secure
community transition facilities and adopt or amend its development
regulations as necessary to provide for the siting of such facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(4) The office of financial management shall maintain a list of
those essential state public facilities that are required or likely to
be built within the next six years. The office of financial management
may at any time add facilities to the list.
(5) No local comprehensive plan or development regulation may
preclude the siting of essential public facilities.
(6) No person may bring a cause of action for civil damages based
on the good faith actions of any county or city to provide for the
siting of secure community transition facilities in accordance with
this section and with the requirements of chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess. For purposes of this subsection, "person" includes, but is
not limited to, any individual, agency as defined in RCW 42.17.020,
corporation, partnership, association, and limited liability entity.
(7) Counties or cities siting facilities pursuant to subsection (2)
or (3) of this section shall comply with RCW 71.09.341.
(8) The failure of a county or city to act by the deadlines
established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section is not:
(a) A condition that would disqualify the county or city for
grants, loans, or pledges under RCW 43.155.070 or 70.146.070;
(b) A consideration for grants or loans provided under RCW
43.17.250(2); or
(c) A basis for any petition under RCW 36.70A.280 or for any
private cause of action.

--- END ---