BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The office of Washington state
climatologist is created.
(2) The office of Washington state climatologist consists of the
director of the office, who is the state climatologist, and appropriate
staff and administrative support as necessary to carry out the powers
and duties of the office as enumerated in section 2 of this act.
(3) The director of the office of Washington state climatologist
must be appointed jointly by the president of Washington State
University and the president of the University of Washington. The
office of Washington state climatologist is administered as determined
jointly by these two presidents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The office of Washington state climatologist
has the following powers and duties:
(1) To serve as a credible and expert source of climate and weather
information for state and local decision makers and agencies working on
drought, flooding, climate change, and other related issues;
(2) To gather and disseminate, and where practicable archive, in
the most cost-effective manner possible, all climate and weather
information that is or could be of value to policy and decision makers
in the state;
(3) To act as the representative of the state in all climatological
and meteorological matters, both within and outside of the state, when
requested by the legislative or executive branches of the state
government;
(4) To prepare, publish, and disseminate climate summaries for
those individuals, agencies, and organizations whose activities are
related to the welfare of the state and are affected by climate and
weather;
(5) To supply critical information for drought preparedness and
emergency response as needed to implement the state's drought
contingency response plan maintained by the department of ecology under
RCW 43.83B.410, and to serve as a member of the state's drought water
supply and emergency response committees as may be formed in response
to a drought event;
(6) To conduct and report on studies of climate and weather
phenomena of significant socioeconomic importance to the state; and
(7) To evaluate the significance of natural and man-made changes in
important features of the climate affecting the state, and to report
this information to those agencies and organizations in the state who
are likely to be affected by these changes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---