BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21F RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state energy office within the department of community,
trade, and economic development shall develop a strategic plan for
public and private collaboration to promote more efficient use of
current electrical transmission and distribution systems. The plan
shall include recommendations for appropriate legislative and
administrative policy changes, tax credits, and legislative
appropriations. The plan shall also recommend proposals for creating
and strengthening public and private partnerships to promote smart grid
energy improvements, proposals for federal financial assistance,
expenditures for research and development programs, and enhancement of
smart grid business development in Washington state. The finalized
strategic plan shall be provided to the governor and to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives by January 1,
2008.
(2) No later than December 1, 2008, the department shall adopt
rules creating a tax credit certification process for smart grid energy
technologies that promise to significantly improve the reliability,
efficiency, and environmental integrity of electrical transmission and
distribution systems. The rules may not take effect until after the
end of the next regular legislative session. "Smart grid energy
technology" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.63.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.63.010 and 2004 c 2 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Advanced computing" means technologies used in the designing
and developing of computing hardware and software, including
innovations in designing the full spectrum of hardware from hand-held
calculators to super computers, and peripheral equipment.
(2) "Advanced materials" means materials with engineered properties
created through the development of specialized processing and synthesis
technology, including ceramics, high value-added metals, electronic
materials, composites, polymers, and biomaterials.
(3) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(4) "Biotechnology" means the application of technologies, such as
recombinant DNA techniques, biochemistry, molecular and cellular
biology, genetics and genetic engineering, cell fusion techniques, and
new bioprocesses, using living organisms, or parts of organisms, to
produce or modify products, to improve plants or animals, to develop
microorganisms for specific uses, to identify targets for small
molecule pharmaceutical development, or to transform biological systems
into useful processes and products or to develop microorganisms for
specific uses.
(5) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(6) "Electronic device technology" means technologies involving
microelectronics; semiconductors; electronic equipment and
instrumentation; radio frequency, microwave, and millimeter
electronics; optical and optic-electrical devices; and data and digital
communications and imaging devices.
(7) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project which
either initiates a new operation, or expands or diversifies a current
operation by expanding, renovating, or equipping an existing facility.
The lessor or owner of the qualified building is not eligible for a
deferral unless:
(a) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(b)(i) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(ii) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.63.020(2); and
(iii) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is
no less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced
by written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(8) "Environmental technology" means assessment and prevention of
threats or damage to human health or the environment, environmental
cleanup, smart grid energy technology development, and the development
of alternative energy sources.
(9) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction or improvement
of the project.
(10) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030 and includes
state universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(11) "Pilot scale manufacturing" means design, construction, and
testing of preproduction prototypes and models in the fields of
biotechnology, advanced computing, electronic device technology,
advanced materials, and environmental technology other than for
commercial sale. As used in this subsection, "commercial sale"
excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total
gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or process do
not exceed one million dollars.
(12) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures,
and expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of
increasing floor space or production capacity used for pilot scale
manufacturing or qualified research and development, including plant
offices and other facilities that are an essential or an integral part
of a structure used for pilot scale manufacturing or qualified research
and development. If a building is used partly for pilot scale
manufacturing or qualified research and development, and partly for
other purposes, the applicable tax deferral shall be determined by
apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the
department.
(13) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means fixtures, equipment,
and support facilities that are an integral and necessary part of a
pilot scale manufacturing or qualified research and development
operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes: Computers;
software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment,
instrumentation, and other devices used in a process of experimentation
to develop a new or improved pilot model, plant process, product,
formula, invention, or similar property; manufacturing components such
as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies;
vats, tanks, and fermenters; operating structures; and all other
equipment used to control, monitor, or operate the machinery. For
purposes of this chapter, qualified machinery and equipment must be
either new to the taxing jurisdiction of the state or new to the
certificate holder, except that used machinery and equipment may be
treated as qualified machinery and equipment if the certificate holder
either brings the machinery and equipment into Washington or makes a
retail purchase of the machinery and equipment in Washington or
elsewhere.
(14) "Qualified research and development" means research and
development performed within this state in the fields of advanced
computing, advanced materials, biotechnology, electronic device
technology, and environmental technology.
(15) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.
(16) "Research and development" means activities performed to
discover technological information, and technical and nonroutine
activities concerned with translating technological information into
new or improved products, processes, techniques, formulas, inventions,
or software. The term includes exploration of a new use for an
existing drug, device, or biological product if the new use requires
separate licensing by the federal food and drug administration under
chapter 21, C.F.R., as amended. The term does not include adaptation
or duplication of existing products where the products are not
substantially improved by application of the technology, nor does the
term include surveys and studies, social science and humanities
research, market research or testing, quality control, sale promotion
and service, computer software developed for internal use, and research
in areas such as improved style, taste, and seasonal design.
(17) "Smart grid energy technology" means a technology certified
under the provisions of section 1(2) of this act and developed with the
intent to significantly improve the reliability, efficiency, and
environmental integrity of electrical transmission and distribution
systems, and may include advanced metering, load management, and
control technologies, high-temperature superconductor technologies, the
development and use of advanced grid design, operation, and planning
tools, and advanced energy delivery, storage and transmission
technologies, materials, and systems that contribute to significant
load reductions or enhancements in reliability, operational
flexibility, or power-carrying capability within electric transmission
or distribution systems.
(18) "Smart grid energy technology product development" means
research, design, and engineering activities performed in relation to
the development of smart grid energy technology.
(19)(a) "Initiation of construction" means the date that a building
permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031
for:
(i) Construction of the qualified building, if the underlying
ownership of the building vests exclusively with the person receiving
the economic benefit of the deferral;
(ii) Construction of the qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (7) of this section; or
(iii) Tenant improvements for a qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (7) of this section.
(b) "Initiation of construction" does not include soil testing,
site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related
activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit
for the construction of the foundation of the building.
(c) If the investment project is a phased project, "initiation of
construction" shall apply separately to each phase.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
tangible personal property used primarily in smart grid energy
technology product development, to sales of smart grid energy
technology products certified by the state energy office, or to charges
made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such
tangible personal property. The exemption is available only when the
buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of
the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Smart grid energy technology" has the meaning provided in RCW
82.63.010; and
(b) "Smart grid energy technology product development" has the
meaning provided in RCW 82.63.010.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of tangible personal property used primarily in smart grid energy
technology product development, to the use of smart grid energy
technology products certified by the state energy office, or to the use
of labor and services rendered in respect to installing such tangible
personal property.
(2) The definitions in section 3 of this act apply to this section.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 through 4 of this act take effect
July 1, 2010.

--- END ---